                        THE _LANCET_ BUILDING
              (_see_ Constitution in the Appendix).
          American Policies in the Philippines and the Orient      497
          Colonial Relations with the British Government            64
          Cuba and the Spanish War                                 485
          Mining and Manufacturing in the West                     436
          On to the Pacific--Texas and the Mexican War             276
          Progressive Insurgency and the Election of 1912          530
          Reconstruction in the South                              370
          Relations with the Indians and the French                 57
          Retaliation by the British Government                     93
          Summary of Democracy and the World War                   620
          Summary of the Revolutionary Period                      135
          Summary of the Sectional Conflict                        375
          The Administration of President Taft                     527
          The Admission of New States                              440
          The Advance of the Middle Border                         271
          The Agencies of American Colonization                      2
          The Calling of a Constitutional Convention               143
          The Colonial Peoples                                       6
          The Colonial Press                                        46
          The Currency Question                                    452
          The Democratic Movement in the East                      238
          The Diplomacy of the Revolution                          127
          The Drift of Events toward the Irrepressible Conflict    332
          The Economic Advance of the South                        389
          The Effects of Warfare on the Colonies                    61
          The Establishment of Government and the New Allegiance   108
          The Evolution in Political Institutions                   48
          The Evolution of Grazing and Agriculture                 431
          The Finances of the Revolution                           125
          The Framing of the Constitution                          146
          The Growth of Opposition to Republican Rule              417
          The Industrial Revolution                                296
          The Industrial Revolution and National Politics          307
          The Influence of the Far West on National Life           443
          The Interaction of American and European Opinion         265
          The Land and the Westward Movement                        20
          The Leadership of the Churches                            39
          The Men and Measures of the New Government               162
          The Minor Parties and Unrest                             462
          The National Decisions of Chief Justice Marshall         208
          The National Struggle for Woman Suffrage                 562
          The New Democracy Enters the Arena                       244
          The New Democracy at Washington                          250
          The Pacific Coast and Utah                               284
          The Process of Colonization                               12
          The Promise and the Difficulties of America              139
          The Protective Tariff and Taxation                       459
          The Railways and Trusts                                  460
          The Railways as Trail Blazers                            425
          The Republican War for Commercial Independence           193
          The Republicans Nationalized                             201
          The Republicans and the Great West                       188
          The Restoration of White Supremacy                       382
          The Results of the Civil War                             365
          The Rise and Growth of Organized Labor                   575
          The Rise of Political Parties                            168
          The Rise of the Whigs                                    260
          The Rise of the Woman Movement                           555
          The Roosevelt Domestic Policies                          519
          The Settlement at Paris                                  612
          The Sound Money Battle of 1896                           466
          The South at the Close of the War                        379
          The Southern Confederacy                                 344
          The Spirit of the Frontier                               228
          The Struggle over Ratification                           157
          The Supremacy of the Republican Party (1861-1885)        412
          The United States and the European War                   596
          The United States at War                                 604
          The War Measures of the Federal Government               350
          The West and the East Meet                               230
          The Western Migration and New States                     221
          The Wider Relations of Organized Labor                   577
          be used to convey punctuation intended by the
          be used to convey punctuation intended by the
          form by the program that displays the eBook (as is
          form by the program that displays the eBook (as is
          government _versus_ states' rights, and the Alien and
          intended by the author of the work, although tilde
          intended by the author of the work, although tilde
          no additional cost, fee or expense, a copy of the
          no additional cost, fee or expense, a copy of the
          the case, for instance, with most word processors);
          the case, for instance, with most word processors);
         _a._ British imperial control over the colonies (64-72).
         _a._ Mexican independence and the Monroe Doctrine (205-207).
         _a._ Policies of the Federation (576-577).
         _a._ Slavery and the "Ostend Manifesto" (485-486).
         _a._ The corporation and labor (410, 570-571).
         _a._ The first United States bank (167).
         _a._ The trading corporation (2-4), religious congregation
         _b._ Government of the colonies (48-53).
         _b._ Mexico and French intervention--policy of the United
         _b._ Provisions of the first state constitutions
         _b._ The acquisition of the Panama Canal strip (508-510).
         _b._ The revolutionary period, 1867-1877 (487).
         _b._ The second United States bank--origin and destruction
         _c._ Formation of the first state constitutions (108-110).
         _c._ The Homestead act (368, 432-445).
         _c._ The Stamp Act Congress (85-86).
         _c._ The first tariff under the Constitution (150, 167-168).
         _c._ The overthrow of Diaz (1911) and recent questions
         _c._ The revival of revolution (487-491).
         _d._ American intervention and the Spanish War (491-496).
         _d._ Development of the tariff, 1816-1832 (252-254).
         _d._ Powers of Congress under the Constitution to coin money
         _d._ The Continental Congresses (99-101).
         _d._ The admission of new states (_see_ Index under each
         _e._ Social reform and the war on poverty (549-551).
         _e._ The Articles of Confederation (110-111, 139-143).
         _e._ The Platt amendment and American protection (518-519).
         _e._ The national banking system of 1864 (369).
         _f._ The formation of the federal Constitution (143-160).
         _g._ Development of the federal Constitution.
         _g._ Development to the Civil War--attitude of South and West
         _h._ The doctrine of secession (345-346).
         _i._ Effects of the Civil War on position of states (366,
         _i._ Revival of the tariff controversy under Cleveland (422).
         _i._ The Civil War debt (252).
         _l._ The gold standard (472).
         _m._ The federal reserve notes (589).
        24 guns of the artillery of the Guards
       1. Before the Civil War: Free Soil (319) and Labor Parties
       1. Early phases before the Civil War: local unions, city
       1. Peculiarities of the West (433-440).
       1. Territory of the United States in 1783 (134 and color map).
       1. The colonial land system: freehold, plantation, and manor
       1. The colonial wars (59-61).
       1. The lower valley (271-273).
       1. The rise of local and domestic industries (28-32).
       10. The Samoan question (481-482)
       11. Acquisition of Porto Rico, the Philippines, and Guam at
       11. The Venezuelan question (482-484).
       14. The World War (603-620).
       2. Assimilation to an American type; influence of the land
       2. Development of the freehold in the West (220-221, 228-230).
       2. In the War of 1812 (193-201).
       2. Since the Civil War: Greenback (463-464), Populist (464),
       2. The French alliance of 1778 (128-130).
       2. The National Trade Union, 1866-1872 (574-575).
       2. The Samoan controversy (481-482).
       2. The free homesteads (432-433).
       2. The opening of China (447).
       2. The railways (425-431).
       2. The routes (222-224).
       2. The upper valley (275-276).
       3. Controversies over the French Revolution (128-130).
       3. Development of the suffrage.
       3. Effects of the Revolution and the Constitution
       3. In the Civil War (353-354).
       3. Issues: funding the debt, assumption of state debts, first
       3. Relations to the East and Europe (443-447).
       3. The French alliance of 1778 (128-130).
       3. The Homestead act and its results (368, 432-433).
       3. The Knights of Labor (575-576).
       3. The opening of Japan (448).
       3. The settlers (221-223, 228-230).
       3. The tariff.
       4. American power in the Pacific (447-449).
       4. Commercial questions arising out of the European wars
       4. Development of industry previous to the Civil War (295-307).
       4. In the Spanish-American War (492).
       4. Relations with the East (230-236).
       4. The American Federation of Labor (573-574).
       4. The Boxer rebellion and the "open door" policy (499-502).
       4. The Venezuelan controversy (512).
       4. The cattle range and cowboy (431-432).
       5. Attitude of Napoleon III toward the Civil War (354-355).
       5. Great progress of industry after the war (401-406).
       5. In the Caribbean region (512-519).
       5. Roosevelt and the close of the Russo-Japanese War (511).
       5. The World War (596-620).
       5. The relations of capital and labor.
       6. In the Pacific (447-448, 481).
       6. Rise and extension of the railway system (298-300).
       6. The Gadsden purchase, 1853 (283).
       6. The Mexican entanglement (478-479).
       6. The Oriental immigration question (583-584).
       6. The restriction of immigration (583-585).
       7. Movement for the conservation of resources (523-526).
       7. Settlement of the Oregon boundary question, 1846 (284-286).
       7. The World War (596-620).
       7. The role of the American navy (515).
       As to give the historian a place."
       The Bible Mind.
       The Earth around.
       The story of England's disgrace,
       of the Median Nerve
     "THE NATIONS OF THE WEST" (popularly called "The
     'Such is the vow I take, so help me God.'"
     D The Deluge drown'd
     F The judgment made
     Fair money of the free,
     French-Canadian, the Alaskan, the Latin-American, the
     German, the Italian, the Anglo-American, and the American
     I. Beyond the Appalachians.
     I. Development of the American system of government.
     I. The Federalists _versus_ the Anti-Federalists [Jeffersonian
     I. The land and natural resources.
     II. Beyond the Mississippi.
     III. The Democrats [former Jeffersonian Republicans] _versus_ the
     IV. The Democrats _versus_ the Republicans from about 1856 to the
     IV. The Far West.
     IX. The World War, 1914-1918 [American participation, 1917-1918]
     Indian, squaw and warrior. In the place of honor in the
     Mr. Calder, F.G.R. Roth, and Leo Lentelli, topped the Arch
     No fetters in the Bay State--no slave upon our land."
     San Francisco in 1915. Facing the Court of the Universe
     To share the plunder and fix things right.
     To-morrow. Above the group rides the Spirit of Enterprise,
     V. The War of 1812, 1812-1815 (193-201).
     VI. Relations with the Orient.
     VI. The Mexican War, 1845-1848 (276-284).
     VII. The Civil War, 1861-1865 (344-375).
     VII. The United States and Latin America.
     VIII. The Spanish War, 1898 (485-497).
     Wafting sweet music music the lea,
     [*]  The eBook may be readily converted by the reader at
     [*]  The eBook may be readily converted by the reader at
     [*]  The eBook, when displayed, is clearly readable, and
     [*]  The eBook, when displayed, is clearly readable, and
     center of the group, standing between the oxen on the tongue
     destroy all copies of the works possessed in a physical medium
     destroy all copies of the works possessed in a physical medium
     does not agree to the terms of the full Project Gutenberg-tm
     does not agree to the terms of the full Project Gutenberg-tm
     flanked right and left by the Hopes of the Future in the
     girlish, but strong, dignified, and womanly, the Mother of
     gross profits you derive calculated using the method you
     gross profits you derive calculated using the method you
     has agreed to donate royalties under this paragraph to the
     has agreed to donate royalties under this paragraph to the
     let us know your plans and to work out the details.
     let us know your plans and to work out the details.
     made our civilization. From left to right appear the
     money paid for a work or a replacement copy, if a defect in the
     money paid for a work or a replacement copy, if a defect in the
     of receipt of the work.
     of receipt of the work.
     of the Setting Sun at the Panama-Pacific Exposition held at
     of the prairie schooner, is a figure, beautiful and almost
     owed to the owner of the Project Gutenberg-tm trademark, but he
     owed to the owner of the Project Gutenberg-tm trademark, but he
     person of two boys. The group as a whole is beautifully
     requires that you do not remove, alter or modify the
     requires that you do not remove, alter or modify the
     seen on the hotel breakfast table.
     sent to the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation at the
     sent to the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation at the
     symbolic of the westward march of American civilization.
     the 60 days following each date you prepare (or were
     the 60 days following each date you prepare (or were
     the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation."
     the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation."
     the blessings that 'brighten as they take their flight.'
     the use of Project Gutenberg-tm works calculated using the method
     the use of Project Gutenberg-tm works calculated using the method
     you already use to calculate your applicable taxes.  The fee is
     you already use to calculate your applicable taxes.  The fee is
    Bold pioneers for the wilderness, defenders in the field."
    Fell the snow so soft and light...
    I.  THE GREAT MIGRATION TO AMERICA                               1
    Strong natures tuned to the harvest-song and bound to the kindly soil;
    THE BLOOD VESSELS                                               258
    THE BURSAE                                                       426
    THE LYMPH VESSELS AND GLANDS                                    321
    THE MUSCLES, TENDONS, AND TENDON SHEATHS                        405
    THE NERVES                                                      342
    V.  THE NEW COURSE IN BRITISH IMPERIAL POLICY                   77
    X.  THE FARMERS BEYOND THE APPALACHIANS                        217
    _Haemophilia_--Diseases associated with affections of the nervous
    bovine tuberculosis--Action of the bacillus upon the
    disease--Tumours--_Diseases of individual bursae in the upper and
    of the disease--THE TUBERCULOUS ABSCESS--Contents and wall of the
    the individual nerves: _Brachial neuralgia_; _Sciatica_;
    the nervous system--Fragilitas ossium--Tumours and cysts of bone.
    transmission of the disease to our patients through four
   20. Senile Gangrene of the Foot                                   89
   35. Tuberculous Sinus injected through its opening in the        144
   91. To illustrate the Loss of Sensation produced by Division     367
   A Rhipheus at home, a Caesar in the field!
   And on the throne our Titus shield.
   At nighttime in the moon's fair glow
   IV.  THE DEVELOPMENT OF COLONIAL NATIONALISM                     56
   IX.  THE JEFFERSONIAN REPUBLICANS IN POWER                      186
   That while her fingers touch the harp
   The Imperial Camp near Mozhaysk,
   VI.  THE AMERICAN REVOLUTION                                     99
   XV.  THE CIVIL WAR AND RECONSTRUCTION                           344
  116. Great Enlargement of the Ischial Bursa                       431
  118. Shaft of the Femur after Acute Osteomyelitis                 444
  129. Shortening of Middle Finger of Adult, the result of          461
  134. Changes in the Skull resulting from Ostitis Deformans        474
  135. Cadaver, illustrating the alterations in the Lower Limbs     475
  South of the Ohio, 219
  VII.  THE FORMATION OF THE CONSTITUTION                          139
  Virgin Islands of the United States   |    26,051[24]|     27,086[25]
  XII.  THE MIDDLE BORDER AND THE GREAT WEST                       271
  XIV.  THE PLANTING SYSTEM AND NATIONAL POLITICS                  316
  XIX.  DOMESTIC ISSUES BEFORE THE COUNTRY (1865-1897)             451
  XVI.  THE POLITICAL AND ECONOMIC EVOLUTION OF THE SOUTH          379
  XXI.  THE EVOLUTION OF REPUBLICAN POLICIES (1901-1913)           507
  XXV.  PRESIDENT WILSON AND THE WORLD WAR                         588
  and the Constitution, 324
 "All our stupidity, Yakov Alpatych," came the answers, and the
 "All over?" he repeated. "If I were not myself, but the handsomest,
 "And the count wanted him to say it was from Klyucharev? I
 "What is that, mon cher ami?" asked the countess, who had
 ** the patients observed by the authors. The dotted line shows the
 2. Obedience to those of higher ranks in the Order.  3. Morality.  4.
 After this, three pages were left blank in the diary, and then
 At the edge of the road stood an oak. Probably ten times the age of
 Come to calm the torments of my gloomy retreat,
 Despite her excitement, Princess Mary realized that this was the
 He had felt it for the first time when the shell spun like a top
 The band struck up the newly introduced mazurka. Nicholas could not
 The cold, austere tone of this man, whom he had almost always
 Two girlish voices sang a musical passage--the end of some song.
 VIII.  THE CLASH OF POLITICAL PARTIES                             162
 XIII.  THE RISE OF THE INDUSTRIAL SYSTEM                          295
 XVII.  BUSINESS ENTERPRISE AND THE REPUBLICAN PARTY               401
 XXII.  THE SPIRIT OF REFORM IN AMERICA                            536
 the
" 'About the same.'
" 'Absolute and complete silence before, during, and after? No reference to the matter at all, either in word or writing?'
" 'Ah!' said he carelessly, 'we have our own process. We compress the earth into bricks, so as to remove them without revealing what they are. But that is a mere detail. I have taken you fully into my confidence now, Mr. Hatherley, and I have shown you how I trust you.' He rose as he spoke. 'I shall expect you, then, at Eyford at 11:15.'
" 'Ah, very well; then that quite settles the matter. It is a pity, because in other respects you would really have done very nicely. In that case, Miss Stoper, I had best inspect a few more of your young ladies.'
" 'And be laughed at for my pains. Nothing of the sort.'
" 'And he is admirably suited for it,' the other answered. 'He has every requirement. I cannot recall when I have seen anything so fine.' He took a step backward, cocked his head on one side, and gazed at my hair until I felt quite bashful. Then suddenly he plunged forward, wrung my hand, and congratulated me warmly on my success.
" 'And how far from the edge of the wood?'
" 'And not a word to a soul.' He looked at me with a last long, questioning gaze, and then, pressing my hand in a cold, dank grasp, he hurried from the room.
" 'And the work?'
" 'And the work?'
" 'At least,' said he, 'you will not have me arrested at once. It would be to your advantage as well as mine if I might leave the house for five minutes.'
" 'Because during the last few nights I have always, about three in the morning, heard a low, clear whistle. I am a light sleeper, and it has awakened me. I cannot tell where it came from--perhaps from the next room, perhaps from the lawn. I thought that I would just ask you whether you had heard it.'
" 'Between nine and ten last night Police-Constable Cook, of the H Division, on duty near Waterloo Bridge, heard a cry for help and a splash in the water. The night, however, was extremely dark and stormy, so that, in spite of the help of several passers-by, it was quite impossible to effect a rescue. The alarm, however, was given, and, by the aid of the water-police, the body was eventually recovered. It proved to be that of a young gentleman whose name, as it appears from an envelope which was found in his pocket, was John Openshaw, and whose residence is near Horsham. It is conjectured that he may have been hurrying down to catch the last train from Waterloo Station, and that in his haste and the extreme darkness he missed his path and walked over the edge of one of the small landing-places for river steamboats. The body exhibited no traces of violence, and there can be no doubt that the deceased had been the victim of an unfortunate accident, which should have the effect of calling the attention of the authorities to the condition of the riverside landing-stages.' "
" 'But was there another with a barred tail?' I asked, 'the same as the one I chose?'
" 'But, madam,' said I, 'I have not yet done what I came for. I cannot possibly leave until I have seen the machine.'
" 'Come! come!' she cried breathlessly. 'They will be here in a moment. They will see that you are not there. Oh, do not waste the so-precious time, but come!'
" 'DEAR MISS HUNTER:--Miss Stoper has very kindly given me your address, and I write from here to ask you whether you have reconsidered your decision. My wife is very anxious that you should come, for she has been much attracted by my description of you. We are willing to give $30 a quarter, or $120 a year, so as to recompense you for any little inconvenience which our fads may cause you. They are not very exacting, after all. My wife is fond of a particular shade of electric blue and would like you to wear such a dress indoors in the morning. You need not, however, go to the expense of purchasing one, as we have one belonging to my dear daughter Alice (now in Philadelphia), which would, I should think, fit you very well. Then, as to sitting here or there, or amusing yourself in any manner indicated, that need cause you no inconvenience. As regards your hair, it is no doubt a pity, especially as I could not help remarking its beauty during our short interview, but I am afraid that I must remain firm upon this point, and I only hope that the increased salary may recompense you for the loss. Your duties, as far as the child is concerned, are very light. Now do try to come, and I shall meet you with the dog-cart at Winchester. Let me know your train. Yours faithfully,
" 'Dear me!' he said gravely, 'that is very serious indeed! I am sorry to hear you say that. The fund was, of course, for the propagation and spread of the red-heads as well as for their maintenance. It is exceedingly unfortunate that you should be a bachelor.'
" 'Dearest do not be frightened. All will come well. There is a huge error which it may take some little time to rectify. Wait in patience.--NEVILLE.' Written in pencil upon the fly-leaf of a book, octavo size, no water-mark. Hum! Posted to-day in Gravesend by a man with a dirty thumb. Ha! And the flap has been gummed, if I am not very much in error, by a person who had been chewing tobacco. And you have no doubt that it is your husband's hand, madam?"
" 'Death,' said he, and rising from the table he retired to his room, leaving me palpitating with horror. I took up the envelope and saw scrawled in red ink upon the inner flap, just above the gum, the letter K three times repeated. There was nothing else save the five dried pips. What could be the reason of his overpowering terror? I left the breakfast-table, and as I ascended the stair I met him coming down with an old rusty key, which must have belonged to the attic, in one hand, and a small brass box, like a cashbox, in the other.
" 'Do you desire your name to be kept upon the books?' she asked.
" 'Don't be frightened,' said my employer, laughing at the start which I had given. 'It's only Carlo, my mastiff. I call him mine, but really old Toller, my groom, is the only man who can do anything with him. We feed him once a day, and not too much then, so that he is always as keen as mustard. Toller lets him loose every night, and God help the trespasser whom he lays his fangs upon. For goodness' sake don't you ever on any pretext set your foot over the threshold at night, for it's as much as your life is worth.'
" 'Fritz! Fritz!' she cried in English, 'remember your promise after the last time. You said it should not be again. He will be silent! Oh, he will be silent!'
" 'From Dundee,' I answered, glancing at the postmark.
" 'Gone to the dealer's, Jem.'
" 'Hampshire. Charming rural place. The Copper Beeches, five miles on the far side of Winchester. It is the most lovely country, my dear young lady, and the dearest old country-house.'
" 'Have you never heard of the League of the Red-headed Men?' he asked with his eyes open.
" 'Here we are, Jack,' says he, touching me on the arm; 'we'll be as good as a family to you. There's two of us, me and my son, and you can have the keeping of us. If you don't--it's a fine, law-abiding country is England, and there's always a policeman within hail.'
" 'How far from the body?'
" 'I beg that you will state your business, sir,' said I; 'my time is of value.' Heaven forgive me for that last sentence, but the words came to my lips.
" 'I quite follow you,' said I. 'The only point which I could not quite understand was what use you could make of a hydraulic press in excavating fuller's-earth, which, as I understand, is dug out like gravel from a pit.'
" 'I say a night's work, but an hour's would be nearer the mark. I simply want your opinion about a hydraulic stamping machine which has got out of gear. If you show us what is wrong we shall soon set it right ourselves. What do you think of such a commission as that?'
" 'I should be happy to advance it without further parley from my own private purse,' said I, 'were it not that the strain would be rather more than it could bear. If, on the other hand, I am to do it in the name of the firm, then in justice to my partner I must insist that, even in your case, every businesslike precaution should be taken.'
" 'I should certainly speak to the police,' I said.
" 'I should much prefer to have it so,' said he, raising up a square, black morocco case which he had laid beside his chair. 'You have doubtless heard of the Beryl Coronet?'
" 'I was foolish enough to go into the empty wing,' I answered. 'But it is so lonely and eerie in this dim light that I was frightened and ran out again. Oh, it is so dreadfully still in there!'
" 'I wish to the Lord, Mr. Wilson, that I was a red-headed man.'
" 'I wish you, John,' said my uncle, 'to witness my will. I leave my estate, with all its advantages and all its disadvantages, to my brother, your father, whence it will, no doubt, descend to you. If you can enjoy it in peace, well and good! If you find you cannot, take my advice, my boy, and leave it to your deadliest enemy. I am sorry to give you such a two-edged thing, but I can't say what turn things are going to take. Kindly sign the paper where Mr. Fordham shows you.'
" 'In the case of another,' said he, 'the objection might be fatal, but we must stretch a point in favour of a man with such a head of hair as yours. When shall you be able to enter upon your new duties?'
" 'Is to copy out the Encyclopaedia Britannica. There is the first volume of it in that press. You must find your own ink, pens, and blotting-paper, but we provide this table and chair. Will you be ready to-morrow?'
" 'It is also my custom,' said he, smiling in the most pleasant fashion until his eyes were just two little shining slits amid the white creases of his face, 'to advance to my young ladies half their salary beforehand, so that they may meet any little expenses of their journey and their wardrobe.'
" 'It is not worth your while to wait,' she went on. 'You can pass through the door; no one hinders.' And then, seeing that I smiled and shook my head, she suddenly threw aside her constraint and made a step forward, with her hands wrung together. 'For the love of Heaven!' she whispered, 'get away from here before it is too late!'
" 'It is to keep people out who have no business there. Do you see?' He was still smiling in the most amiable manner.
" 'It would be injustice to hesitate,' said he. 'You will, however, I am sure, excuse me for taking an obvious precaution.' With that he seized my hair in both his hands, and tugged until I yelled with the pain. 'There is water in your eyes,' said he as he released me. 'I perceive that all is as it should be. But we have to be careful, for we have twice been deceived by wigs and once by paint. I could tell you tales of cobbler's wax which would disgust you with human nature.' He stepped over to the window and shouted through it at the top of his voice that the vacancy was filled. A groan of disappointment came up from below, and the folk all trooped away in different directions until there was not a red-head to be seen except my own and that of the manager.
" 'Jephro,' said she, 'there is an impertinent fellow upon the road there who stares up at Miss Hunter.'
" 'Keep your forgiveness for those who ask for it,' he answered, turning away from me with a sneer. I saw that he was too hardened for any words of mine to influence him. There was but one way for it. I called in the inspector and gave him into custody. A search was made at once not only of his person but of his room and of every portion of the house where he could possibly have concealed the gems; but no trace of them could be found, nor would the wretched boy open his mouth for all our persuasions and our threats. This morning he was removed to a cell, and I, after going through all the police formalities, have hurried round to you to implore you to use your skill in unravelling the matter. The police have openly confessed that they can at present make nothing of it. You may go to any expense which you think necessary. I have already offered a reward of $1000. My God, what shall I do! I have lost my honour, my gems, and my son in one night. Oh, what shall I do!"
" 'Ku Klux Klan. A name derived from the fanciful resemblance to the sound produced by cocking a rifle. This terrible secret society was formed by some ex-Confederate soldiers in the Southern states after the Civil War, and it rapidly formed local branches in different parts of the country, notably in Tennessee, Louisiana, the Carolinas, Georgia, and Florida. Its power was used for political purposes, principally for the terrorising of the negro voters and the murdering and driving from the country of those who were opposed to its views. Its outrages were usually preceded by a warning sent to the marked man in some fantastic but generally recognised shape--a sprig of oak-leaves in some parts, melon seeds or orange pips in others. On receiving this the victim might either openly abjure his former ways, or might fly from the country. If he braved the matter out, death would unfailingly come upon him, and usually in some strange and unforeseen manner. So perfect was the organisation of the society, and so systematic its methods, that there is hardly a case upon record where any man succeeded in braving it with impunity, or in which any of its outrages were traced home to the perpetrators. For some years the organisation flourished in spite of the efforts of the United States government and of the better classes of the community in the South. Eventually, in the year 1869, the movement rather suddenly collapsed, although there have been sporadic outbreaks of the same sort since that date.'
" 'MY DEAR MR. SHERLOCK HOLMES:--Lord Backwater tells me that I may place implicit reliance upon your judgment and discretion. I have determined, therefore, to call upon you and to consult you in reference to the very painful event which has occurred in connection with my wedding. Mr. Lestrade, of Scotland Yard, is acting already in the matter, but he assures me that he sees no objection to your co-operation, and that he even thinks that it might be of some assistance. I will call at four o'clock in the afternoon, and, should you have any other engagement at that time, I hope that you will postpone it, as this matter is of paramount importance. Yours faithfully,
" 'Mr. Holder,' said he, 'I have been informed that you are in the habit of advancing money.'
" 'My name,' said he, 'is Mr. Duncan Ross, and I am myself one of the pensioners upon the fund left by our noble benefactor. Are you a married man, Mr. Wilson? Have you a family?'
" 'Never mind. I'll have the other, and I'll take it now,' said I.
" 'Next Monday I have a large sum due to me, and I shall then most certainly repay what you advance, with whatever interest you think it right to charge. But it is very essential to me that the money should be paid at once.'
" 'No, I have not. It must be those wretched gipsies in the plantation.'
" 'No, no, not the sole, not the sole, my dear young lady,' he cried. 'Your duty would be, as I am sure your good sense would suggest, to obey any little commands my wife might give, provided always that they were such commands as a lady might with propriety obey. You see no difficulty, heh?'
" 'No, no. This is only where we compress it. But never mind that. All we wish you to do is to examine the machine and to let us know what is wrong with it.'
" 'Not so many as you might think,' he answered. 'You see it is really confined to Londoners, and to grown men. This American had started from London when he was young, and he wanted to do the old town a good turn. Then, again, I have heard it is no use your applying if your hair is light red, or dark red, or anything but real bright, blazing, fiery red. Now, if you cared to apply, Mr. Wilson, you would just walk in; but perhaps it would hardly be worth your while to put yourself out of the way for the sake of a few hundred pounds.'
" 'Oh, any old key will fit that bureau. When I was a youngster I have opened it myself with the key of the box-room cupboard.'
" 'Oh, at his new offices. He did tell me the address. Yes, 17 King Edward Street, near St. Paul's.'
" 'Oh, merely a couple of hundred a year, but the work is slight, and it need not interfere very much with one's other occupations.'
" 'Oh, no, it is in the house.'
" 'Oh, tut, tut! sweating--rank sweating!' he cried, throwing his fat hands out into the air like a man who is in a boiling passion. 'How could anyone offer so pitiful a sum to a lady with such attractions and accomplishments?'
" 'Oh, yes,' said he, turning to me, 'we are very much obliged to you, Miss Hunter, for falling in with our whims so far as to cut your hair. I assure you that it has not detracted in the tiniest iota from your appearance. We shall now see how the electric-blue dress will become you. You will find it laid out upon the bed in your room, and if you would be so good as to put it on we should both be extremely obliged.'
" 'Oh,' says she, 'we've set yours aside for you--Jem's bird, we call it. It's the big white one over yonder. There's twenty-six of them, which makes one for you, and one for us, and two dozen for the market.'
" 'On the contrary,' said I, 'I opened the door myself because I felt the room to be a little close.'
" 'One of the most precious public possessions of the empire,' said I.
" 'Perhaps you will have the kindness to wait in this room for a few minutes,' said he, throwing open another door. It was a quiet, little, plainly furnished room, with a round table in the centre, on which several German books were scattered. Colonel Stark laid down the lamp on the top of a harmonium beside the door. 'I shall not keep you waiting an instant,' said he, and vanished into the darkness.
" 'Pon my word, Watson, you are coming along wonderfully. You have really done very well indeed. It is true that you have missed everything of importance, but you have hit upon the method, and you have a quick eye for colour. Never trust to general impressions, my boy, but concentrate yourself upon details. My first glance is always at a woman's sleeve. In a man it is perhaps better first to take the knee of the trouser. As you observe, this woman had plush upon her sleeves, which is a most useful material for showing traces. The double line a little above the wrist, where the typewritist presses against the table, was beautifully defined. The sewing-machine, of the hand type, leaves a similar mark, but only on the left arm, and on the side of it farthest from the thumb, instead of being right across the broadest part, as this was. I then glanced at her face, and, observing the dint of a pince-nez at either side of her nose, I ventured a remark upon short sight and typewriting, which seemed to surprise her."
" 'Pooh!' said he, gripping hard at his courage. 'We are in a civilised land here, and we can't have tomfoolery of this kind. Where does the thing come from?'
" 'Precisely so. We shall want you to come to-night by the last train.'
" 'Precisely.' He opened the case, and there, imbedded in soft, flesh-coloured velvet, lay the magnificent piece of jewellery which he had named. 'There are thirty-nine enormous beryls,' said he, 'and the price of the gold chasing is incalculable. The lowest estimate would put the worth of the coronet at double the sum which I have asked. I am prepared to leave it with you as my security.'
" 'Put the papers on the sundial,' I read, peeping over his shoulder.
" 'Quite so. It is very natural that the pledge of secrecy which we have exacted from you should have aroused your curiosity. I have no wish to commit you to anything without your having it all laid before you. I suppose that we are absolutely safe from eavesdroppers?'
" 'She came in just now by the back door. I have no doubt that she has only been to the side gate to see someone, but I think that it is hardly safe and should be stopped.'
" 'So,' said he, smiling, 'it was you, then. I thought that it must be when I saw the door open.'
" 'Sold to Mr. Windigate of the Alpha, at 12s.' "
" 'Some little time ago I bought a small place--a very small place--within ten miles of Reading. I was fortunate enough to discover that there was a deposit of fuller's-earth in one of my fields. On examining it, however, I found that this deposit was a comparatively small one, and that it formed a link between two very much larger ones upon the right and left--both of them, however, in the grounds of my neighbours. These good people were absolutely ignorant that their land contained that which was quite as valuable as a gold-mine. Naturally, it was to my interest to buy their land before they discovered its true value, but unfortunately I had no capital by which I could do this. I took a few of my friends into the secret, however, and they suggested that we should quietly and secretly work our own little deposit and that in this way we should earn the money which would enable us to buy the neighbouring fields. This we have now been doing for some time, and in order to help us in our operations we erected a hydraulic press. This press, as I have already explained, has got out of order, and we wish your advice upon the subject. We guard our secret very jealously, however, and if it once became known that we had hydraulic engineers coming to our little house, it would soon rouse inquiry, and then, if the facts came out, it would be good-bye to any chance of getting these fields and carrying out our plans. That is why I have made you promise me that you will not tell a human being that you are going to Eyford to-night. I hope that I make it all plain?'
" 'Tell me, Helen,' said she, 'have you ever heard anyone whistle in the dead of the night?'
" 'Tell me, dad,' said she, looking, I thought, a little disturbed, 'did you give Lucy, the maid, leave to go out to-night?'
" 'Thank you, Maggie,' says I; 'but if it is all the same to you, I'd rather have that one I was handling just now.'
" 'That white one with the barred tail, right in the middle of the flock.'
" 'That will do,' said he; 'I could not ask for anything better. Capital! capital!' He seemed quite enthusiastic and rubbed his hands together in the most genial fashion. He was such a comfortable-looking man that it was quite a pleasure to look at him.
" 'That would suit me very well,' said I. 'And the pay?'
" 'That you may get away, or perhaps that you may conceal what you have stolen,' said I. And then, realising the dreadful position in which I was placed, I implored him to remember that not only my honour but that of one who was far greater than I was at stake; and that he threatened to raise a scandal which would convulse the nation. He might avert it all if he would but tell me what he had done with the three missing stones.
" 'That's all right,' said he, coming back. 'I know that clerks are sometimes curious as to their master's affairs. Now we can talk in safety.' He drew up his chair very close to mine and began to stare at me again with the same questioning and thoughtful look.
" 'The Church of St. Monica, John,' she cried, 'and half a sovereign if you reach it in twenty minutes.'
" 'The Copper Beeches, near Winchester.
" 'The ceremony, which was performed at St. George's, Hanover Square, was a very quiet one, no one being present save the father of the bride, Mr. Aloysius Doran, the Duchess of Balmoral, Lord Backwater, Lord Eustace and Lady Clara St. Simon (the younger brother and sister of the bridegroom), and Lady Alicia Whittington. The whole party proceeded afterwards to the house of Mr. Aloysius Doran, at Lancaster Gate, where breakfast had been prepared. It appears that some little trouble was caused by a woman, whose name has not been ascertained, who endeavoured to force her way into the house after the bridal party, alleging that she had some claim upon Lord St. Simon. It was only after a painful and prolonged scene that she was ejected by the butler and the footman. The bride, who had fortunately entered the house before this unpleasant interruption, had sat down to breakfast with the rest, when she complained of a sudden indisposition and retired to her room. Her prolonged absence having caused some comment, her father followed her, but learned from her maid that she had only come up to her chamber for an instant, caught up an ulster and bonnet, and hurried down to the passage. One of the footmen declared that he had seen a lady leave the house thus apparelled, but had refused to credit that it was his mistress, believing her to be with the company. On ascertaining that his daughter had disappeared, Mr. Aloysius Doran, in conjunction with the bridegroom, instantly put themselves in communication with the police, and very energetic inquiries are being made, which will probably result in a speedy clearing up of this very singular business. Up to a late hour last night, however, nothing had transpired as to the whereabouts of the missing lady. There are rumours of foul play in the matter, and it is said that the police have caused the arrest of the woman who had caused the original disturbance, in the belief that, from jealousy or some other motive, she may have been concerned in the strange disappearance of the bride.' "
" 'The family of Lord Robert St. Simon has been thrown into the greatest consternation by the strange and painful episodes which have taken place in connection with his wedding. The ceremony, as shortly announced in the papers of yesterday, occurred on the previous morning; but it is only now that it has been possible to confirm the strange rumours which have been so persistently floating about. In spite of the attempts of the friends to hush the matter up, so much public attention has now been drawn to it that no good purpose can be served by affecting to disregard what is a common subject for conversation.
" 'The firm does so when the security is good.' I answered.
" 'The other is a good three pound heavier,' said she, 'and we fattened it expressly for you.'
" 'The propriety of my leaving it. You may set your mind at rest about that. I should not dream of doing so were it not absolutely certain that I should be able in four days to reclaim it. It is a pure matter of form. Is the security sufficient?'
" 'The sundial in the garden. There is no other,' said I; 'but the papers must be those that are destroyed.'
" 'The work appears to be light and the pay munificent.'
" 'Then the matter stands thus. You are probably aware that fuller's-earth is a valuable product, and that it is only found in one or two places in England?'
" 'Then we can hardly get there before midnight. I suppose there would be no chance of a train back. I should be compelled to stop the night.'
" 'Then, good-bye, Mr. Jabez Wilson, and let me congratulate you once more on the important position which you have been fortunate enough to gain.' He bowed me out of the room and I went home with my assistant, hardly knowing what to say or do, I was so pleased at my own good fortune.
" 'They may do what they like, but I'll checkmate them still,' said he with an oath. 'Tell Mary that I shall want a fire in my room to-day, and send down to Fordham, the Horsham lawyer.'
" 'This is Mr. Jabez Wilson,' said my assistant, 'and he is willing to fill a vacancy in the League.'
" 'This is my secretary and manager,' said the colonel. 'By the way, I was under the impression that I left this door shut just now. I fear that you have felt the draught.'
" 'To Eyford, in Berkshire. It is a little place near the borders of Oxfordshire, and within seven miles of Reading. There is a train from Paddington which would bring you there at about 11:15.'
" 'Tut, tut!' he cried. 'This is all quite beside the question. The point is, have you or have you not the bearing and deportment of a lady? There it is in a nutshell. If you have not, you are not fitted for the rearing of a child who may some day play a considerable part in the history of the country. But if you have why, then, how could any gentleman ask you to condescend to accept anything under the three figures? Your salary with me, madam, would commence at $100 a year.'
" 'Undoubtedly so. But you will find that all I say is really to the point. I have a professional commission for you, but absolute secrecy is quite essential--absolute secrecy, you understand, and of course we may expect that more from a man who is alone than from one who lives in the bosom of his family.'
" 'Very good.' He suddenly sprang up, and darting like lightning across the room he flung open the door. The passage outside was empty.
" 'Very likely. And yet if it were on the lawn, I wonder that you did not hear it also.'
" 'Very well,' said he, 'you shall know all about the machine.' He took a step backward, slammed the little door, and turned the key in the lock. I rushed towards it and pulled at the handle, but it was quite secure, and did not give in the least to my kicks and shoves. 'Hullo!' I yelled. 'Hullo! Colonel! Let me out!'
" 'We are now,' said he, 'actually within the hydraulic press, and it would be a particularly unpleasant thing for us if anyone were to turn it on. The ceiling of this small chamber is really the end of the descending piston, and it comes down with the force of many tons upon this metal floor. There are small lateral columns of water outside which receive the force, and which transmit and multiply it in the manner which is familiar to you. The machine goes readily enough, but there is some stiffness in the working of it, and it has lost a little of its force. Perhaps you will have the goodness to look it over and to show us how we can set it right.'
" 'We have judged it best that you should come late. It is to recompense you for any inconvenience that we are paying to you, a young and unknown man, a fee which would buy an opinion from the very heads of your profession. Still, of course, if you would like to draw out of the business, there is plenty of time to do so.'
" 'Well, I hope to goodness the house won't be burgled during the night.' said he.
" 'Well, it is of no great consequence, at any rate.' She smiled back at me, closed my door, and a few moments later I heard her key turn in the lock."
" 'Well, perhaps it is better that I should not tell you that just at this moment. I have it from the same source that you are both an orphan and a bachelor and are residing alone in London.'
" 'Well, really, it seems rather useless, since you refuse the most excellent offers in this fashion,' said she sharply. 'You can hardly expect us to exert ourselves to find another such opening for you. Good-day to you, Miss Hunter.' She struck a gong upon the table, and I was shown out by the page.
" 'Well, then, you know now. And if you ever put your foot over that threshold again'--here in an instant the smile hardened into a grin of rage, and he glared down at me with the face of a demon--'I'll throw you to the mastiff.'
" 'Well, you have to be in the office, or at least in the building, the whole time. If you leave, you forfeit your whole position forever. The will is very clear upon that point. You don't comply with the conditions if you budge from the office during that time.'
" 'Well,' said I, 'the gentleman at No. 4.'
" 'Well,' said I, 'you said you'd give me one for Christmas, and I was feeling which was the fattest.'
" 'Well,' said he, showing me the advertisement, 'you can see for yourself that the League has a vacancy, and there is the address where you should apply for particulars. As far as I can make out, the League was founded by an American millionaire, Ezekiah Hopkins, who was very peculiar in his ways. He was himself red-headed, and he had a great sympathy for all red-headed men; so, when he died, it was found that he had left his enormous fortune in the hands of trustees, with instructions to apply the interest to the providing of easy berths to men whose hair is of that colour. From all I hear it is splendid pay and very little to do.'
" 'What would be the hours?' I asked.
" 'What, the red-headed man?'
" 'What, you dig fuller's-earth in the house?'
" 'Why, I wonder at that, for you are eligible yourself for one of the vacancies.'
" 'Why, what is it, then?' I asked. You see, Mr. Holmes, I am a very stay-at-home man, and as my business came to me instead of my having to go to it, I was often weeks on end without putting my foot over the door-mat. In that way I didn't know much of what was going on outside, and I was always glad of a bit of news.
" 'Why,' says he, 'here's another vacancy on the League of the Red-headed Men. It's worth quite a little fortune to any man who gets it, and I understand that there are more vacancies than there are men, so that the trustees are at their wits' end what to do with the money. If my hair would only change colour, here's a nice little crib all ready for me to step into.'
" 'Yes, but you would not have me leave it a dishonoured man,' said he. 'I could not bear the disgrace. I must raise the money in some way, and if you will not let me have it, then I must try other means.'
" 'Yes, our little place is quite out in the country. It is a good seven miles from Eyford Station.'
" 'Yes, thief!' I roared, shaking him by the shoulder.
" 'You are mad, Elise!' he shouted, struggling to break away from her. 'You will be the ruin of us. He has seen too much. Let me pass, I say!' He dashed her to one side, and, rushing to the window, cut at me with his heavy weapon. I had let myself go, and was hanging by the hands to the sill, when his blow fell. I was conscious of a dull pain, my grip loosened, and I fell into the garden below.
" 'You blackguard!' I shouted, beside myself with rage. 'You have destroyed it! You have dishonoured me forever! Where are the jewels which you have stolen?'
" 'You have been very kind,' said he, 'but I must have this money, or else I can never show my face inside the club again.'
" 'You have called me names enough,' said he, 'I will not stand it any longer. I shall not say another word about this business, since you have chosen to insult me. I will leave your house in the morning and make my own way in the world.'
" 'You may as well face the matter,' said I; 'you have been caught in the act, and no confession could make your guilt more heinous. If you but make such reparation as is in your power, by telling us where the beryls are, all shall be forgiven and forgotten.'
" 'You must speak to her in the morning, or I will if you prefer it. Are you sure that everything is fastened?'
" 'You shall learn nothing from me,' said he with a passion such as I should not have thought was in his nature. 'If you choose to call the police, let the police find what they can.'
" 'You shall leave it in the hands of the police!' I cried half-mad with grief and rage. 'I shall have this matter probed to the bottom.'
" 'You understand, Mr. Holder, that I am giving you a strong proof of the confidence which I have in you, founded upon all that I have heard of you. I rely upon you not only to be discreet and to refrain from all gossip upon the matter but, above all, to preserve this coronet with every possible precaution because I need not say that a great public scandal would be caused if any harm were to befall it. Any injury to it would be almost as serious as its complete loss, for there are no beryls in the world to match these, and it would be impossible to replace them. I leave it with you, however, with every confidence, and I shall call for it in person on Monday morning.'
"'Come along to the colonel,' I said. He starts yelling, and
"'From all my riding,' he writes to the Emperor, 'I have got a
"'I most ardently desire,' writes the King of Prussia to
"'I showed them the path to glory, but they did not follow it,'"
"'The Brook,'" suggested Nicholas.
"'You see, St. Thomas,' he said to me the other day. 'Monsieur Kiril
"7th. Set the pips on McCauley, Paramore, and
"800 rubles" in clear upright figures; he emptied the glass of warm
"A Frenchman or a Russian prince incognito," said the officer,
"A Juryman: Did you see nothing which aroused your suspicions when you returned on hearing the cry and found your father fatally injured?
"A bayonet wound. I remained at the front. Remember, your
"A bear, lads," said one of the men.
"A certain selection and discretion must be used in producing a realistic effect," remarked Holmes. "This is wanting in the police report, where more stress is laid, perhaps, upon the platitudes of the magistrate than upon the details, which to an observer contain the vital essence of the whole matter. Depend upon it, there is nothing so unnatural as the commonplace."
"A charming woman!" said Ilyin, with all the gravity of a boy of
"A day which has saved England from a great public scandal," said the banker, rising. "Sir, I cannot find words to thank you, but you shall not find me ungrateful for what you have done. Your skill has indeed exceeded all that I have heard of it. And now I must fly to my dear boy to apologise to him for the wrong which I have done him. As to what you tell me of poor Mary, it goes to my very heart. Not even your skill can inform me where she is now."
"A feeling of repulsion, and of something akin to fear had begun to rise within me at the strange antics of this fleshless man. Even my dread of losing a client could not restrain me from showing my impatience.
"A fine thing too!" replied the captain, "and really..."
"A full-grown one?" asked Ilagin as he approached the whip who had
"A house on fire?" asked Bradstreet as the train steamed off again on its way.
"A joke indeed!" put in the count. "Let him but say the word and
"A likely story! As if a man bent on felony would slam his door so as to wake a household. What did they say, then, of the disappearance of these gems?"
"A member without salary," repeated Arakcheev. "I have the
"A mo-o-st me-r-r-y co-o-m-pa...!" sang one of the peasants with a
"A most painful matter to me, as you can most readily imagine, Mr. Holmes. I have been cut to the quick. I understand that you have already managed several delicate cases of this sort, sir, though I presume that they were hardly from the same class of society."
"A nice little hot torch for the infantry! Good luck to you,
"A pair, by the sound," said he. "Yes," he continued, glancing out of the window. "A nice little brougham and a pair of beauties. A hundred and fifty guineas apiece. There's money in this case, Watson, if there is nothing else."
"A perfect picture! How he chased a fox out of the rank grass by the
"A petition? This way, to the officer on duty" (he was
"A present to Your Majesty from the Empress."
"A proposition which I took the liberty of doubting."
"A thousand pounds! Great Lord of mercy!" The commissionaire plumped down into a chair and stared from one to the other of us.
"A town captured by the enemy is like a maid who has lost her
"A trifle," said the colonel in his bass voice: "two hussars
"A-tu!" came the long-drawn cry of one of the borzoi whippers-in,
"Aah!" Rostov almost screamed lifting both hands to his head. The
"According to the scouts the last of them crossed on rafts during
"Adieu, Mary," said he gently to his sister, taking her by the
"Afraid of being late..." said the old man, looking at Kochubey.
"After all, Watson," said Holmes, reaching up his hand for his clay pipe, "I am not retained by the police to supply their deficiencies. If Horner were in danger it would be another thing; but this fellow will not appear against him, and the case must collapse. I suppose that I am commuting a felony, but it is just possible that I am saving a soul. This fellow will not go wrong again; he is too terribly frightened. Send him to gaol now, and you make him a gaol-bird for life. Besides, it is the season of forgiveness. Chance has put in our way a most singular and whimsical problem, and its solution is its own reward. If you will have the goodness to touch the bell, Doctor, we will begin another investigation, in which, also a bird will be the chief feature."
"After the next affair... epaulettes."
"Again!" she commanded, pointing with a peremptory gesture to the
"Ah what a calamity! You say the affair was decisive? But Mortier is
"Ah yes, my dear," said the count, addressing the visitor and
"Ah! One of the old ones! Has your regiment had its rice?"
"Ah! That's a good thing. So, my dear boy, you wish to serve the
"Ah! Very glad! Kiss me," he said, having learned who the young
"Ah! here's the warrior! Wants to vanquish Buonaparte?" said the old
"Ah! that is suggestive. Now, on the other side of this narrow wing runs the corridor from which these three rooms open. There are windows in it, of course?"
"Ah! what joy for the princess!" exclaimed she: "At last! I must let
"Ah! who? I would call your attention very particularly to two points. One is that the murdered man had an appointment with someone at the pool, and that the someone could not have been his son, for his son was away, and he did not know when he would return. The second is that the murdered man was heard to cry 'Cooee!' before he knew that his son had returned. Those are the crucial points upon which the case depends. And now let us talk about George Meredith, if you please, and we shall leave all minor matters until to-morrow."
"Ah!" said Rostopchin, hurriedly turning away his eyes from the
"Ah!" said the Emperor reassured, and with a kindly gleam in his
"Ah, Bondarenko, dear friend!" said he to the hussar who rushed up
"Ah, Bradstreet, how are you?" A tall, stout official had come down the stone-flagged passage, in a peaked cap and frogged jacket. "I wish to have a quiet word with you, Bradstreet." "Certainly, Mr. Holmes. Step into my room here." It was a small, office-like room, with a huge ledger upon the table, and a telephone projecting from the wall. The inspector sat down at his desk.
"Ah, God! My God! What is it? The stomach? That means death! My
"Ah, I'm so sorry I wasn't there when you met the children," said
"Ah, Pierre," said the countess going up to her husband. "You
"Ah, Timokhin!" said he, recognizing the red-nosed captain who had
"Ah, Watson," said Holmes, smiling, "perhaps you would not be very gracious either, if, after all the trouble of wooing and wedding, you found yourself deprived in an instant of wife and of fortune. I think that we may judge Lord St. Simon very mercifully and thank our stars that we are never likely to find ourselves in the same position. Draw your chair up and hand me my violin, for the only problem we have still to solve is how to while away these bleak autumnal evenings."
"Ah, a weapon?" said the officer and turned to the barefooted
"Ah, ah!" muttered the officer with a frown. "Well then, march!"
"Ah, but you are a crusty fellow, friend!" said the count.
"Ah, he has passed judgment... passed judgement!" said the old man
"Ah, he looks very much like an incendiary," remarked the officer.
"Ah, here he is!" she added. "Quand on... No, no," she said to the
"Ah, here she is!" said the old count, when he saw Natasha enter.
"Ah, here she is, the Queen of Petersburg, Countess Bezukhova," said
"Ah, how afraid I am for her, how afraid I am!" said the countess,
"Ah, how do you do, great warrior?" said Rostopchin as soon as the
"Ah, it can't be avoided!" thought Nicholas, for the first and
"Ah, madam, it is a great sacrament," replied the priest, passing
"Ah, may the devil take you and evewybody," were the last words
"Ah, money, Count, money! How much sorrow it causes in the world,"
"Ah, my boy, my head's in a whirl!" said the old man with a smile,
"Ah, my dear friend! Forget the wrongs that may have been done
"Ah, my dear," said the countess, "my life is not all roses
"Ah, my friend!" said he, taking Pierre by the elbow; and there
"Ah, of course, I forgot that. But the writing?"
"Ah, ours! And there?..." Pierre pointed to another knoll in the
"Ah, that's always the way!" said Nesvitski with a wave of the hand.
"Ah, that's the way to talk French," said the picket soldiers. "Now,
"Ah, the letter? Yes..." replied the prince peevishly. "Yes...
"Ah, the standards!" said Kutuzov, evidently detaching himself
"Ah, the villains! What heathens! Yes; dead, dead, so he is... And
"Ah, there are still lights in the drawingroom!" she said,
"Ah, thereby hangs a rather painful tale. This fellow is madly, insanely, in love with her, but some two years ago, when he was only a lad, and before he really knew her, for she had been away five years at a boarding-school, what does the idiot do but get into the clutches of a barmaid in Bristol and marry her at a registry office? No one knows a word of the matter, but you can imagine how maddening it must be to him to be upbraided for not doing what he would give his very eyes to do, but what he knows to be absolutely impossible. It was sheer frenzy of this sort which made him throw his hands up into the air when his father, at their last interview, was goading him on to propose to Miss Turner. On the other hand, he had no means of supporting himself, and his father, who was by all accounts a very hard man, would have thrown him over utterly had he known the truth. It was with his barmaid wife that he had spent the last three days in Bristol, and his father did not know where he was. Mark that point. It is of importance. Good has come out of evil, however, for the barmaid, finding from the papers that he is in serious trouble and likely to be hanged, has thrown him over utterly and has written to him to say that she has a husband already in the Bermuda Dockyard, so that there is really no tie between them. I think that that bit of news has consoled young McCarthy for all that he has suffered."
"Ah, those are the French! And over there?..." Pierre pointed to a
"Ah, yes! Today's events mark an epoch, the greatest epoch in our
"Ah, yes, I shall keep the stone. Thank you. And, I say, Peterson, just buy a goose on your way back and leave it here with me, for we must have one to give to this gentleman in place of the one which your family is now devouring."
"Ah, yes, of course! Well, a cheetah is just a big cat, and yet a saucer of milk does not go very far in satisfying its wants, I daresay. There is one point which I should wish to determine." He squatted down in front of the wooden chair and examined the seat of it with the greatest attention.
"Ah, you'd better not go, sir," said the doctor, "or you may have to
"Ah, you're up already," said Denisov, entering the room.
"Ah, your excellency," put in Zherkov, his eyes fixed on the
"Ah," said Holmes, "I think that what you have been good enough to tell us makes the matter fairly clear, and that I can deduce all that remains. Mr. Rucastle then, I presume, took to this system of imprisonment?"
"Ah," said he, "I forgot that I had not seen you for some weeks. It is a little souvenir from the King of Bohemia in return for my assistance in the case of the Irene Adler papers."
"Alas!" replied our visitor, "the very horror of my situation lies in the fact that my fears are so vague, and my suspicions depend so entirely upon small points, which might seem trivial to another, that even he to whom of all others I have a right to look for help and advice looks upon all that I tell him about it as the fancies of a nervous woman. He does not say so, but I can read it from his soothing answers and averted eyes. But I have heard, Mr. Holmes, that you can see deeply into the manifold wickedness of the human heart. You may advise me how to walk amid the dangers which encompass me."
"All right!" said Dolokhov, having finished the addition. "All
"All right!" said the doctor.
"All right, all right!" said the old count. "He always flares up!
"All right, all right," he said, throwing the bits under the table.
"All right, all right," interrupted the prince, and laughing his
"All right, all right," replied the commander, and turned to Major
"All right," said Holmes quietly. "I have given you the chance. Here are your lodgings. Good-bye. I shall drop you a line before I leave."
"All right," said Jones with a stare and a snigger. "Well, would you please, sir, march upstairs, where we can get a cab to carry your Highness to the police-station?"
"All right," said Pierre, still smiling in the same way. A feeling
"All the points of our position are in the enemy's hands and we
"All the same I shan't sleep. What silliness, to sleep! Mummy!
"All the same! They say this one is the commander of all the Emperor
"All the same, Aunt, it is impossible," he rejoined with a sigh,
"All the same, I love and value nothing but triumph over them all, I
"All the same, it was Bilibin who found a suitable form for the
"All the same, one is afraid! Oh, you clever people," said a third
"All we can know is that we know nothing. And that's the height of
"All with grapeshot!" shouted the officer.
"Alley! Alley!" said the Cossack, touching the prisoner's arm to
"Allow me to give you a piece of advice. When you reach the capital,
"Allow me to introduce you to my daughter," said the countess,
"Allow me, Miss! I can't do it like that," said the maid who was
"Alone all the same, without my friends.... And he expects me not to
"Alpatych!" a familiar voice suddenly hailed the old man.
"Altogether such heroism as was displayed by the Russian warriors
"Always about the same thing," said Pierre with a smile. "Jealo..."
"Always the same thing," said Pierre, looking round at his
"Am I to let the troops have the oats, and to take a receipt for
"An institution upholding honor, the source of emulation, is one
"An officer, I have to see him," came the reply in a pleasant,
"An order to who?" asked the colonel morosely.
"Anarchists"--terms which had been weakened by excessive use. When the
"And I am for north," said I, "because there are no hills there, and our friend says that he did not notice the carriage go up any."
"And I feel dissatisfied. It is this infernal St. Simon marriage case. I can make neither head nor tail of the business."
"And I have known so many cases of a splinter wound" (the Gazette
"And I tell you, Rostov, that you must apologize to the colonel!"
"And Nicholas? Where is he? By the Lyadov upland, isn't he?"
"And also with the result of causing it to turn upon its master at the other side. Some of the blows of my cane came home and roused its snakish temper, so that it flew upon the first person it saw. In this way I am no doubt indirectly responsible for Dr. Grimesby Roylott's death, and I cannot say that it is likely to weigh very heavily upon my conscience."
"And am I to bring the gypsy girls along with him?" asked
"And an exceedingly interesting case it appears to be. I would not have missed it for worlds. But there is a ring at the bell, Watson, and as the clock makes it a few minutes after four, I have no doubt that this will prove to be our noble client. Do not dream of going, Watson, for I very much prefer having a witness, if only as a check to my own memory."
"And are the hours the same? And the walks in the avenues? And the
"And as for the man who advised forming this camp--the Drissa camp,"
"And brought Miss Hunter down from London in order to get rid of the disagreeable persistence of Mr. Fowler."
"And do you know, Daddy, the day before yesterday we ran at them
"And do you remember how we rolled hard-boiled eggs in the ballroom,
"And have you been here long?" Pierre asked as he munched the last
"And have you brought little Nicholas?" he asked in the same slow,
"And he is so unreasonable, the count himself I mean. The
"And he... he... he said he was wishing for it at the very moment I
"And here's the commander," said Likhachev.
"And here, friend, the people are quite beggarly. There they all
"And how about you, Count Peter Kirilych? If they call up the
"And how do you get on with the officers?" inquired Zherkov.
"And how does he now regard the matter?" asked Pierre, referring
"And how in the world did you find them?"
"And how we've been begging, your honor," said the old soldier,
"And if I should meet His Majesty before I meet the commander in
"And if he asks about the losses?"
"And in this way he managed that your good man should have no want of drink, and that a ladder should be ready at the moment when your master had gone out."
"And it did, though they hardly found upon the mud-bank what they had feared to find. It was Neville St. Clair's coat, and not Neville St. Clair, which lay uncovered as the tide receded. And what do you think they found in the pockets?"
"And now I have a very strange experience to tell you. I had, as you know, cut off my hair in London, and I had placed it in a great coil at the bottom of my trunk. One evening, after the child was in bed, I began to amuse myself by examining the furniture of my room and by rearranging my own little things. There was an old chest of drawers in the room, the two upper ones empty and open, the lower one locked. I had filled the first two with my linen, and as I had still much to pack away I was naturally annoyed at not having the use of the third drawer. It struck me that it might have been fastened by a mere oversight, so I took out my bunch of keys and tried to open it. The very first key fitted to perfection, and I drew the drawer open. There was only one thing in it, but I am sure that you would never guess what it was. It was my coil of hair.
"And now I will show you what is really a very interesting study, Mr. Windibank," Holmes continued. "I think of writing another little monograph some of these days on the typewriter and its relation to crime. It is a subject to which I have devoted some little attention. I have here four letters which purport to come from the missing man. They are all typewritten. In each case, not only are the 'e's' slurred and the 'r's' tailless, but you will observe, if you care to use my magnifying lens, that the fourteen other characteristics to which I have alluded are there as well."
"And now a word as to my household, Mr. Holmes, for I wish you to thoroughly understand the situation. My groom and my page sleep out of the house, and may be set aside altogether. I have three maid-servants who have been with me a number of years and whose absolute reliability is quite above suspicion. Another, Lucy Parr, the second waiting-maid, has only been in my service a few months. She came with an excellent character, however, and has always given me satisfaction. She is a very pretty girl and has attracted admirers who have occasionally hung about the place. That is the only drawback which we have found to her, but we believe her to be a thoroughly good girl in every way.
"And now as to the villains who seemed to be immediately implicated in the matter. The Lascar was known to be a man of the vilest antecedents, but as, by Mrs. St. Clair's story, he was known to have been at the foot of the stair within a very few seconds of her husband's appearance at the window, he could hardly have been more than an accessory to the crime. His defence was one of absolute ignorance, and he protested that he had no knowledge as to the doings of Hugh Boone, his lodger, and that he could not account in any way for the presence of the missing gentleman's clothes.
"And now there is only she to be described. She is my niece; but when my brother died five years ago and left her alone in the world I adopted her, and have looked upon her ever since as my daughter. She is a sunbeam in my house--sweet, loving, beautiful, a wonderful manager and housekeeper, yet as tender and quiet and gentle as a woman could be. She is my right hand. I do not know what I could do without her. In only one matter has she ever gone against my wishes. Twice my boy has asked her to marry him, for he loves her devotedly, but each time she has refused him. I think that if anyone could have drawn him into the right path it would have been she, and that his marriage might have changed his whole life; but now, alas! it is too late--forever too late!
"And one who was at home in the district, for the pool can only be approached by the farm or by the estate, where strangers could hardly wander."
"And our share?" asked the princess smiling ironically, as if
"And over here is what appears to be the fragment of a hotel bill, which interests me deeply."
"And she's in love with Boris already. Just fancy!" said the
"And sit in the dark?"
"And so do I. It is precisely for that reason that we are going to Stoke Moran this day. I want to see whether the objections are fatal, or if they may be explained away. But what in the name of the devil!"
"And that is all the state has for the millions it has spent,"
"And that other one with him, the Austrian, looked as if he were
"And that was why she shrieked and fainted when she saw the coronet," cried Mr. Holder. "Oh, my God! what a blind fool I have been! And his asking to be allowed to go out for five minutes! The dear fellow wanted to see if the missing piece were at the scene of the struggle. How cruelly I have misjudged him!"
"And the cigar-holder?"
"And the fete at the English ambassador's? Today is Wednesday. I
"And the lady, I fancy, is Miss Stoner," observed Holmes, shading his eyes. "Yes, I think we had better do as you suggest."
"And the murderer?"
"And the old man said, 'God will forgive you, we are all sinners
"And the other one is not here. They've been telling tales," he
"And the papers?" asked the King hoarsely. "All is lost."
"And the prisoners he killed in Africa? That was horrible!" said the
"And the ring?" I asked, glancing at a remarkable brilliant which sparkled upon his finger.
"And then suddenly in the silence I heard a sound which sent my heart into my mouth. It was the clank of the levers and the swish of the leaking cylinder. He had set the engine at work. The lamp still stood upon the floor where I had placed it when examining the trough. By its light I saw that the black ceiling was coming down upon me, slowly, jerkily, but, as none knew better than myself, with a force which must within a minute grind me to a shapeless pulp. I threw myself, screaming, against the door, and dragged with my nails at the lock. I implored the colonel to let me out, but the remorseless clanking of the levers drowned my cries. The ceiling was only a foot or two above my head, and with my hand upraised I could feel its hard, rough surface. Then it flashed through my mind that the pain of my death would depend very much upon the position in which I met it. If I lay on my face the weight would come upon my spine, and I shuddered to think of that dreadful snap. Easier the other way, perhaps; and yet, had I the nerve to lie and look up at that deadly black shadow wavering down upon me? Already I was unable to stand erect, when my eye caught something which brought a gush of hope back to my heart.
"And then, old fellow, he gives him one in the teeth with the butt
"And there hasn't been anyone in the room except the lieutenant
"And they were posted to-day at Gravesend. Well, Mrs. St. Clair, the clouds lighten, though I should not venture to say that the danger is over."
"And this man too," thought Pierre, looking into the face of the
"And this, of course, remains to you, since the marriage is a fait accompli?"
"And to drink," said one of the officers, not wishing to quarrel.
"And very wet it seems to have made you," said Holmes laying his hand upon the arm of the pea-jacket.
"And was our militia of any use to the Empia? Not at all! It only
"And was the Holy Mother promoted to the rank of general?" said
"And what a well-preserved man he was!" remarked the aide-de-camp.
"And what about his character?" asked the regimental commander.
"And what do you think of this latest comedy, the coronation at
"And when I raise my hand--so--you will throw into the room what I give you to throw, and will, at the same time, raise the cry of fire. You quite follow me?"
"And where's the fur cloak?" asked Dolokhov. "Hey, Ignatka! Go to
"And who are you?" cried the officer, turning on him with tipsy
"And who could it be who was her confederate? A lover evidently, for who else could outweigh the love and gratitude which she must feel to you? I knew that you went out little, and that your circle of friends was a very limited one. But among them was Sir George Burnwell. I had heard of him before as being a man of evil reputation among women. It must have been he who wore those boots and retained the missing gems. Even though he knew that Arthur had discovered him, he might still flatter himself that he was safe, for the lad could not say a word without compromising his own family.
"And who is is this?" she asked her governess, peering into the face
"And why are they stopping? There's no proper order!" said the
"And why didn't you do it at seven in the morning? You ought to have
"And why has the Emperor Alexander taken command of the armies? What
"And why the deuce are we going to fight Bonaparte?" remarked
"And yet I am not convinced of it," I answered. "The cases which come to light in the papers are, as a rule, bald enough, and vulgar enough. We have in our police reports realism pushed to its extreme limits, and yet the result is, it must be confessed, neither fascinating nor artistic."
"And yet," said I, smiling, "I cannot quite hold myself absolved from the charge of sensationalism which has been urged against my records."
"And you all listen to me!" said Rostov to the peasants. "Be off
"And you are a benefactor of the race," said I.
"And you may expect us early in the afternoon. I have myself some small business matters to attend to. Will you not wait and breakfast?"
"And you're still the same diplomatist! But that's not the
"And you're surprised at the way she rides, Simon, eh?" said the
"And you, are you one of the doctors?"
"And you?" he asked Dolokhov, but as soon as he had asked the
"And, indeed, I could not wonder that such a man as Sir George Burnwell should gain an influence over him, for he has frequently brought him to my house, and I have found myself that I could hardly resist the fascination of his manner. He is older than Arthur, a man of the world to his finger-tips, one who had been everywhere, seen everything, a brilliant talker, and a man of great personal beauty. Yet when I think of him in cold blood, far away from the glamour of his presence, I am convinced from his cynical speech and the look which I have caught in his eyes that he is one who should be deeply distrusted. So I think, and so, too, thinks my little Mary, who has a woman's quick insight into character.
"Andre," said his wife, addressing her husband in the same
"Andrew, already!" said the little princess, turning pale and
"Andrew, why didn't you warn me?" said the princess, with mild
"Angel! Dear one! Hurrah! Father!..." cried the crowd, and Petya
"Anisya, go and see if the strings of my guitar are all right. I
"Annette, for heaven's sake don't refuse me," the countess began,
"Another petitioner," answered the man with the braces.
"Another romance," said the militia officer. "Really, this general
"Anybody can shove," said the footman, and also began working his
"Apropos, tell me please, is it true that the women have all left
"Arakcheev and Golitsyn," incautiously remarked Pierre, "are now the
"Are they not fresh and beautiful?" I cried with all the enthusiasm of a man fresh from the fogs of Baker Street.
"Are you going to Count Cyril Vladimirovich, my dear?" said the
"Are you the Elder? Bind him, Lavrushka!" shouted Rostov, as if that
"Aren't you ready? It is nearly ten," came the countess' voice.
"As I grew richer I grew more ambitious, took a house in the country, and eventually married, without anyone having a suspicion as to my real occupation. My dear wife knew that I had business in the City. She little knew what.
"As a rule," said Holmes, "the more bizarre a thing is the less mysterious it proves to be. It is your commonplace, featureless crimes which are really puzzling, just as a commonplace face is the most difficult to identify. But I must be prompt over this matter."
"As far as the service goes he is quite punctilious, your
"As far as you are personally concerned," remarked Holmes, "I do not see that you have any grievance against this extraordinary league. On the contrary, you are, as I understand, richer by some $30, to say nothing of the minute knowledge which you have gained on every subject which comes under the letter A. You have lost nothing by them."
"As it flies past me, Daddy, the ball I mean," said a young
"As it happens, he spoke of coming into town to-day upon some most important business. It is probable that he will be away all day, and that there would be nothing to disturb you. We have a housekeeper now, but she is old and foolish, and I could easily get her out of the way."
"As long as she was on the scene he could not take any action without a horrible exposure of the woman whom he loved. But the instant that she was gone he realised how crushing a misfortune this would be for you, and how all-important it was to set it right. He rushed down, just as he was, in his bare feet, opened the window, sprang out into the snow, and ran down the lane, where he could see a dark figure in the moonlight. Sir George Burnwell tried to get away, but Arthur caught him, and there was a struggle between them, your lad tugging at one side of the coronet, and his opponent at the other. In the scuffle, your son struck Sir George and cut him over the eye. Then something suddenly snapped, and your son, finding that he had the coronet in his hands, rushed back, closed the window, ascended to your room, and had just observed that the coronet had been twisted in the struggle and was endeavouring to straighten it when you appeared upon the scene."
"As low as you can," he answered; "I have excellent ears. If you would have the great kindness to get rid of that sottish friend of yours I should be exceedingly glad to have a little talk with you."
"As she spoke a light sprang into view at the further end of the passage, and I saw the lean figure of Colonel Lysander Stark rushing forward with a lantern in one hand and a weapon like a butcher's cleaver in the other. I rushed across the bedroom, flung open the window, and looked out. How quiet and sweet and wholesome the garden looked in the moonlight, and it could not be more than thirty feet down. I clambered out upon the sill, but I hesitated to jump until I should have heard what passed between my saviour and the ruffian who pursued me. If she were ill-used, then at any risks I was determined to go back to her assistance. The thought had hardly flashed through my mind before he was at the door, pushing his way past her; but she threw her arms round him and tried to hold him back.
"As the enemy's left wing rests on wooded hills and his right
"As you both locked your doors at night, your rooms were unapproachable from that side. Now, would you have the kindness to go into your room and bar your shutters?"
"Ask him to wait," and the sound was heard of a chair being pushed
"Ask the count to come to me."
"Ask the countess, I don't give orders."
"Ask them," replied Prince Andrew, indicating the officers.
"Assure the Emperor Alexander from me," said he, taking his hat,
"At Reading I had to change not only my carriage but my station. However, I was in time for the last train to Eyford, and I reached the little dim-lit station after eleven o'clock. I was the only passenger who got out there, and there was no one upon the platform save a single sleepy porter with a lantern. As I passed out through the wicket gate, however, I found my acquaintance of the morning waiting in the shadow upon the other side. Without a word he grasped my arm and hurried me into a carriage, the door of which was standing open. He drew up the windows on either side, tapped on the wood-work, and away we went as fast as the horse could go."
"At boss zides, Captain," he heard the voice of the colonel, who,
"At eight in the morning. She will not be up, so that we shall have a clear field. Besides, we must be prompt, for this marriage may mean a complete change in her life and habits. I must wire to the King without delay."
"At least, change your coiffure," said the little princess.
"At least," said I as we heard her quick, firm steps descending the stairs, "she seems to be a young lady who is very well able to take care of herself."
"At some evidence implicating Flora Millar in the disappearance."
"At the same time," he remarked after a pause, during which he had sat puffing at his long pipe and gazing down into the fire, "you can hardly be open to a charge of sensationalism, for out of these cases which you have been so kind as to interest yourself in, a fair proportion do not treat of crime, in its legal sense, at all. The small matter in which I endeavoured to help the King of Bohemia, the singular experience of Miss Mary Sutherland, the problem connected with the man with the twisted lip, and the incident of the noble bachelor, were all matters which are outside the pale of the law. But in avoiding the sensational, I fear that you may have bordered on the trivial."
"At the wedding breakfast."
"At what o'clock did the battle begin?" asked the Emperor.
"Att-ention!" shouted the regimental commander in a soul-shaking
"Attack indeed!" said the colonel in a bored voice, puckering up his
"Aunt, I did it gently," said the boy.
"Away they went, and I was just wondering whether I should not do well to follow them when up the lane came a neat little landau, the coachman with his coat only half-buttoned, and his tie under his ear, while all the tags of his harness were sticking out of the buckles. It hadn't pulled up before she shot out of the hall door and into it. I only caught a glimpse of her at the moment, but she was a lovely woman, with a face that a man might die for.
"Away we went then, and we drove for at least an hour. Colonel Lysander Stark had said that it was only seven miles, but I should think, from the rate that we seemed to go, and from the time that we took, that it must have been nearer twelve. He sat at my side in silence all the time, and I was aware, more than once when I glanced in his direction, that he was looking at me with great intensity. The country roads seem to be not very good in that part of the world, for we lurched and jolted terribly. I tried to look out of the windows to see something of where we were, but they were made of frosted glass, and I could make out nothing save the occasional bright blur of a passing light. Now and then I hazarded some remark to break the monotony of the journey, but the colonel answered only in monosyllables, and the conversation soon flagged. At last, however, the bumping of the road was exchanged for the crisp smoothness of a gravel-drive, and the carriage came to a stand. Colonel Lysander Stark sprang out, and, as I followed after him, pulled me swiftly into a porch which gaped in front of us. We stepped, as it were, right out of the carriage and into the hall, so that I failed to catch the most fleeting glance of the front of the house. The instant that I had crossed the threshold the door slammed heavily behind us, and I heard faintly the rattle of the wheels as the carriage drove away.
"Ay, bodies, Watson. We should be rich men if we had $1000 for every poor devil who has been done to death in that den. It is the vilest murder-trap on the whole riverside, and I fear that Neville St. Clair has entered it never to leave it more. But our trap should be here." He put his two forefingers between his teeth and whistled shrilly--a signal which was answered by a similar whistle from the distance, followed shortly by the rattle of wheels and the clink of horses' hoofs.
"Back or forward? Eh, no matter, forward..." the wolf seemed to
"Bad news! He's not among the prisoners nor among the killed!
"Bah, really? So much the better! You are certainly brave foes.
"Baron Funke has been recommended to the Dowager Empress by her
"Be quiet, quiet!" The prince slapped his hand on the table. "Yes, I
"Be quite easy," he continued playfully, as he adroitly took the
"Be so good as to step in. Makar Alexeevich, the brother of my
"Be so good..." shouted the captain, frowning angrily.
"Beat him!... Let the traitor perish and not disgrace the Russian
"Beautiful," said the doctor in answer to a remark about the
"Because it would spare your Majesty all fear of future annoyance. If the lady loves her husband, she does not love your Majesty. If she does not love your Majesty, there is no reason why she should interfere with your Majesty's plan."
"Because not everything happens as one expects or with the
"Because she has said that she would send it on the day when the betrothal was publicly proclaimed. That will be next Monday."
"Because you have just as good a chance of finding this lady in the one as in the other."
"Before the what?" asked Holmes with a start.
"Besides how can I ask the Emperor for his instructions for the
"Besides that, Peter Nikolaevich, by exchanging into the Guards I
"Besides, Monsieur Kiril, you have only to say a word to the
"Better close the front door," cried Holmes, and we all rushed down the stairs together. We had hardly reached the hall when we heard the baying of a hound, and then a scream of agony, with a horrible worrying sound which it was dreadful to listen to. An elderly man with a red face and shaking limbs came staggering out at a side door.
"Big Three," who assumed the burden of mighty decisions. On May 6, their
"Blast you!" he shouted, holding up his whip threateningly at the
"Board them!" yelled the tipsy man, trying to press the trigger.
"Bonaparte..." began Dolokhov, but the Frenchman interrupted him.
"Boris," she said to her son with a smile, "I shall go in to see the
"Borodino," the other corrected him.
"Boscombe Valley is a country district not very far from Ross, in Herefordshire. The largest landed proprietor in that part is a Mr. John Turner, who made his money in Australia and returned some years ago to the old country. One of the farms which he held, that of Hatherley, was let to Mr. Charles McCarthy, who was also an ex-Australian. The men had known each other in the colonies, so that it was not unnatural that when they came to settle down they should do so as near each other as possible. Turner was apparently the richer man, so McCarthy became his tenant but still remained, it seems, upon terms of perfect equality, as they were frequently together. McCarthy had one son, a lad of eighteen, and Turner had an only daughter of the same age, but neither of them had wives living. They appear to have avoided the society of the neighbouring English families and to have led retired lives, though both the McCarthys were fond of sport and were frequently seen at the race-meetings of the neighbourhood. McCarthy kept two servants--a man and a girl. Turner had a considerable household, some half-dozen at the least. That is as much as I have been able to gather about the families. Now for the facts.
"Bosse! Vincent!" Petya cried, stopping outside the door.
"Bowed Joseph," leader of the Meal Riots in Edinburgh, who died in 1780.
"Brigand! You shall pay for this," said the Frenchman, letting go of
"Buonaparte himself!... Just listen to the fool, what he doesn't
"Burdino, isn't it?" said the officer, turning to his companion.
"But I am all in the dark."
"But I am somewhat headstrong by nature, and the more ready to engage in an affair when there is some obstacle in the way. I thought of my fifty-guinea fee, of my wearisome journey, and of the unpleasant night which seemed to be before me. Was it all to go for nothing? Why should I slink away without having carried out my commission, and without the payment which was my due? This woman might, for all I knew, be a monomaniac. With a stout bearing, therefore, though her manner had shaken me more than I cared to confess, I still shook my head and declared my intention of remaining where I was. She was about to renew her entreaties when a door slammed overhead, and the sound of several footsteps was heard upon the stairs. She listened for an instant, threw up her hands with a despairing gesture, and vanished as suddenly and as noiselessly as she had come.
"But I don't in the least want to, Mamma."
"But I have heard that the crocuses promise well," continued my companion imperturbably.
"But I never said a word about the Emperor!" said the officer,
"But I never sent for them," declared the princess. "You must have
"But I should like to see the right flank. They say it's very
"But I understand that all the other clothes were found in the room. Would the body be dressed in a coat alone?"
"But I will, I'll give the order at once."
"But Mr. Fowler being a persevering man, as a good seaman should be, blockaded the house, and having met you succeeded by certain arguments, metallic or otherwise, in convincing you that your interests were the same as his."
"But a cripple!" said I. "What could he have done single-handed against a man in the prime of life?"
"But a terrible change came over our stepfather about this time. Instead of making friends and exchanging visits with our neighbours, who had at first been overjoyed to see a Roylott of Stoke Moran back in the old family seat, he shut himself up in his house and seldom came out save to indulge in ferocious quarrels with whoever might cross his path. Violence of temper approaching to mania has been hereditary in the men of the family, and in my stepfather's case it had, I believe, been intensified by his long residence in the tropics. A series of disgraceful brawls took place, two of which ended in the police-court, until at last he became the terror of the village, and the folks would fly at his approach, for he is a man of immense strength, and absolutely uncontrollable in his anger.
"But a very serious one to me," returned the King reproachfully.
"But after all who asked them here? Serves them right, the bloody
"But all that is only life's setting, the real thing is love-
"But all the same?"
"But am I not too cold with him?" thought the princess. "I try to be
"But as you are a philosopher, be a consistent one, look at the
"But do listen," returned Prince Andrew, holding him by the arm. "Do
"But do you know, my dear, that was a capital joke," said the count;
"But don't hurt my little horse!" said the Alsatian good-naturedly
"But he is right. Oh! I know that he is right. James never did it. And about his quarrel with his father, I am sure that the reason why he would not speak about it to the coroner was because I was concerned in it."
"But he must be a Freemason," said he, referring to the abbe whom he
"But how could you guess what the motive was?"
"But how is it the doctor from Moscow is not here yet?" said the
"But how? Are we to take him up to her? The room there has not
"But if the bridge is crossed it means that the army too is lost? It
"But in the Third Company they say nine men were missing yesterday."
"But in what position are we going to attack him? I have been at the
"But it can't be he, alone in the midst of this empty field!"
"But it is impossible," said Miss Hunter; "the ladder was not there when the Rucastles went away."
"But it is profoundly true. Singularity is almost invariably a clue. The more featureless and commonplace a crime is, the more difficult it is to bring it home. In this case, however, they have established a very serious case against the son of the murdered man."
"But it might have been a cry of surprise. Astonishment at the unexpected sight of you might cause him to throw up his hands?"
"But it's all the same now," Pierre could not help saying.
"But it's impossible..." declared the gentlemen of the suite,
"But it's strange, friends," continued the man who had wondered at
"But joking apart," said Prince Andrew, "do you really think the
"But military men have told me that it is impossible to fight in the
"But no! They shall eat horseflesh yet, like the Turks!" exclaimed
"But one cannot delay, Prince, at such a moment! Consider that the
"But perhaps that's my shirt on the table," he thought, "and
"But please don't interrupt me when I am entertaining the guests,"
"But see here, to tell the truth, Aunt..."
"But still this does not mean that the campaign is over," said
"But tell me, how will your husband look at the matter?" Bilibin
"But that is my conviction, and judging by the last letter with
"But that's just the same as myself--they are not others," explained
"But that's the Grand Duke, and I want the commander in chief or the
"But the best of it was," said one, telling of the misfortune of a
"But the gems, Mr. Holmes. Where are they?"
"But the law, religion..." said the prince, already yielding.
"But the letter had also a greater distance to come."
"But the money, Mr. Holmes, the money!"
"But the mystery?"
"But the reason is very obvious. The pressure of public opinion can do in the town what the law cannot accomplish. There is no lane so vile that the scream of a tortured child, or the thud of a drunkard's blow, does not beget sympathy and indignation among the neighbours, and then the whole machinery of justice is ever so close that a word of complaint can set it going, and there is but a step between the crime and the dock. But look at these lonely houses, each in its own fields, filled for the most part with poor ignorant folk who know little of the law. Think of the deeds of hellish cruelty, the hidden wickedness which may go on, year in, year out, in such places, and none the wiser. Had this lady who appeals to us for help gone to live in Winchester, I should never have had a fear for her. It is the five miles of country which makes the danger. Still, it is clear that she is not personally threatened."
"But the twelve-mile drive?" gasped Hatherley.
"But the worst of it, gentlemen--I am giving Kuragin away to you--is
"But they don't understand our talk at all," said the dancer with
"But they heard him at the council of war and will hear him when
"But they listened to my story with a smile. I am convinced that the inspector has formed the opinion that the letters are all practical jokes, and that the deaths of my relations were really accidents, as the jury stated, and were not to be connected with the warnings."
"But they say that war has been declared," replied the visitor.
"But they're a clean folk, lads," the first man went on; "he was
"But what do they want?" he asked the superintendent of police.
"But what have they been up to?" asked the countess.
"But what is that compared with the number of your successes?"
"But what is the good of all these vague theories," cried the banker impatiently, "when I have told you that I saw Arthur with the coronet in his hands?"
"But what is the matter with you, Count? You are not like
"But what nonsense I have been saying to the governor's wife!"
"But what other is there?" cried the banker with a gesture of despair. "If his motives were innocent, why does he not explain them?"
"But what's to be done? She can't help it," thought the princess.
"But what, then, did the gipsies do?"
"But where do you come from not to know what every coachman in the
"But why are you not conducting the case from Baker Street?" I asked.
"But why not?" asked the princess.
"But why this secrecy? Why doesn't he come to the house?" asked
"But you can understand," said our strange visitor, sitting down once more and passing his hand over his high white forehead, "you can understand that I am not accustomed to doing such business in my own person. Yet the matter was so delicate that I could not confide it to an agent without putting myself in his power. I have come incognito from Prague for the purpose of consulting you."
"But you have read the evidence. You have formed some conclusion? Do you not see some loophole, some flaw? Do you not yourself think that he is innocent?"
"But you know how it all ended, don't you? You heard of the duel?"
"But you know the wise maxim your excellency, advising one to expect
"But you take it without sugar?" she said, smiling all the time,
"But, Prince," Dessalles began timidly, "the letter mentions
"But, just what did the genewal tell you? To weturn at once?"
"But, my dear Monsieur Pierre," said she, "how do you explain the
"But, my dear," said Prince Vasili suddenly, clutching the little
"But, surely, it was obvious. I was then much surprised and interested on glancing down to observe that, though the boots which she was wearing were not unlike each other, they were really odd ones; the one having a slightly decorated toe-cap, and the other a plain one. One was buttoned only in the two lower buttons out of five, and the other at the first, third, and fifth. Now, when you see that a young lady, otherwise neatly dressed, has come away from home with odd boots, half-buttoned, it is no great deduction to say that she came away in a hurry."
"Bwing the prisoner here," said Denisov in a low voice, not taking
"By the Lord Jesus Christ, I thought we had put something under
"By the same brilliant reasoning, every man's body is to be found in the neighbourhood of his wardrobe. And pray what did you hope to arrive at through this?"
"By the select prices. Eight shillings for a bed and eightpence for a glass of sherry pointed to one of the most expensive hotels. There are not many in London which charge at that rate. In the second one which I visited in Northumberland Avenue, I learned by an inspection of the book that Francis H. Moulton, an American gentleman, had left only the day before, and on looking over the entries against him, I came upon the very items which I had seen in the duplicate bill. His letters were to be forwarded to 226 Gordon Square; so thither I travelled, and being fortunate enough to find the loving couple at home, I ventured to give them some paternal advice and to point out to them that it would be better in every way that they should make their position a little clearer both to the general public and to Lord St. Simon in particular. I invited them to meet him here, and, as you see, I made him keep the appointment."
"By the way, your excellency, I should inform you," he continued-
"By this time the whole house was astir, for I had raised my voice in my anger. Mary was the first to rush into my room, and, at the sight of the coronet and of Arthur's face, she read the whole story and, with a scream, fell down senseless on the ground. I sent the house-maid for the police and put the investigation into their hands at once. When the inspector and a constable entered the house, Arthur, who had stood sullenly with his arms folded, asked me whether it was my intention to charge him with theft. I answered that it had ceased to be a private matter, but had become a public one, since the ruined coronet was national property. I was determined that the law should have its way in everything.
"C'est grand!"* say the historians, and there no longer exists
"Can I see the count?" Pierre again asked.
"Captain Ramballe, of the 13th Light Regiment, Chevalier of the
"Captain Tushin's, your excellency!" shouted the red-haired,
"Captain, there is soup and a leg of mutton in the kitchen," said
"Catch hold of my arm or you'll drop him!" he heard one of the
"Catch hold!" whispered Gerasim to the porter.
"Catiche has had tea served in the small drawing room," said
"Certainly he must be moved onto the bed; here it will be
"Certainly, sir," said Baker, who had risen and tucked his newly gained property under his arm. "There are a few of us who frequent the Alpha Inn, near the Museum--we are to be found in the Museum itself during the day, you understand. This year our good host, Windigate by name, instituted a goose club, by which, on consideration of some few pence every week, we were each to receive a bird at Christmas. My pence were duly paid, and the rest is familiar to you. I am much indebted to you, sir, for a Scotch bonnet is fitted neither to my years nor my gravity." With a comical pomposity of manner he bowed solemnly to both of us and strode off upon his way.
"Certainly," said Holmes, stepping over and turning the key in the door. "I let you know, then, that I have caught him!"
"Certainly. You will find me at the Langham under the name of the Count Von Kramm."
"Charming!" said Anna Pavlovna with an inquiring glance at the
"Charming!" said he, kissing the tips of his fingers.
"Charming!" whispered the little princess, sticking the needle
"Christian" life, as he called his peasant existence. The proverbs, of
"Circumstantial evidence is a very tricky thing," answered Holmes thoughtfully. "It may seem to point very straight to one thing, but if you shift your own point of view a little, you may find it pointing in an equally uncompromising manner to something entirely different. It must be confessed, however, that the case looks exceedingly grave against the young man, and it is very possible that he is indeed the culprit. There are several people in the neighbourhood, however, and among them Miss Turner, the daughter of the neighbouring landowner, who believe in his innocence, and who have retained Lestrade, whom you may recollect in connection with the Study in Scarlet, to work out the case in his interest. Lestrade, being rather puzzled, has referred the case to me, and hence it is that two middle-aged gentlemen are flying westward at fifty miles an hour instead of quietly digesting their breakfasts at home."
"Clear that away!" said the officer, pointing to the beams and the
"Co-o-om-pa-ny!" roared the tipsy peasant with a beatific smile as
"Colonel Lysander Stark stopped at last before a low door, which he unlocked. Within was a small, square room, in which the three of us could hardly get at one time. Ferguson remained outside, and the colonel ushered me in.
"Colonel, I always require it," replied the Emperor. "Conceal
"Colonel," interrupted the officer of the suite, "You must be
"Come along then! Come along then!" the publican and the tall
"Come if you need anything. One can at least be of use on the
"Come inside, your honor!" repeated the tradesman, bowing.
"Come into the courtyard or you'll be seen; she'll come out
"Come later." And she went in, closing the door behind her.
"Come nearer, come nearer, friend! I used to be the only one to tell
"Come now! You with all your forces fall on the unfortunate
"Come over here, Helene, dear," said Anna Pavlovna to the
"Come to dinner tomorrow... in the evening. You must come.... Come!"
"Come to the mistress, please," said the footman in his deep bass,
"Come, come to him, Mary," said Natasha, leading her into the
"Come, come, Natasha!" said the count, as he turned back for his
"Come, go in there and drive them out!" shouted the senior officer.
"Come, that's right, Count!" cried the staff captain, turning
"Come, what's the matter, old fellow?" said Nesvitski trying to
"Come," cried the inspector, laughing; "it's a very pretty diversity of opinion. We have boxed the compass among us. Who do you give your casting vote to?"
"Come," said the doctor.
"Coming on the top of such a damning series of events, it was at least a most suspicious remark."
"Commander in Chief Kutuzov?" said the newly arrived general
"Commander of the third company wanted by the general!...
"Confound you and your Karl Ivanich!" He took the glass with the
"Consider my position, Peter Nikolaevich. Were I in the cavalry I
"Convinced that something was amiss with him, she rushed down the steps--for the house was none other than the opium den in which you found me to-night--and running through the front room she attempted to ascend the stairs which led to the first floor. At the foot of the stairs, however, she met this Lascar scoundrel of whom I have spoken, who thrust her back and, aided by a Dane, who acts as assistant there, pushed her out into the street. Filled with the most maddening doubts and fears, she rushed down the lane and, by rare good-fortune, met in Fresno Street a number of constables with an inspector, all on their way to their beat. The inspector and two men accompanied her back, and in spite of the continued resistance of the proprietor, they made their way to the room in which Mr. St. Clair had last been seen. There was no sign of him there. In fact, in the whole of that floor there was no one to be found save a crippled wretch of hideous aspect, who, it seems, made his home there. Both he and the Lascar stoutly swore that no one else had been in the front room during the afternoon. So determined was their denial that the inspector was staggered, and had almost come to believe that Mrs. St. Clair had been deluded when, with a cry, she sprang at a small deal box which lay upon the table and tore the lid from it. Out there fell a cascade of children's bricks. It was the toy which he had promised to bring home.
"Corporal, what will they do with the sick man?..." Pierre began.
"Count! Count!" shouted Berg who ran up from the other side as eager
"Count! Your excellency, how come you to be here?" asked the doctor.
"Count!" exclaimed the timid yet theatrical voice of Vereshchagin in
"Crew, to your guns!" commanded the officer.
"D'you think you know more about fowls than I, who have handled them ever since I was a nipper? I tell you, all those birds that went to the Alpha were town bred."
"Daniel!" Nicholas said timidly, conscious at the sight of the
"De Bal-macheve!" said the King (overcoming by his assurance the
"Dead, I fancy. Eh, Makeev?" queried the doctor, in a tone of
"Dear doctor," said she, "this young man is the count's son. Is
"Dear, dear! But still tell him to come to the Club--it will all
"Dear, dear! Just look at her!" exclaimed the countess as she
"Dearest, I'm afraid this morning's fruschtique*--as Foka the cook
"Dearest," said the little princess after breakfast on the morning
"Demosthenes, I know thee by the pebble thou secretest in thy golden
"Devil take it!" said the voice of a man stumbling over something.
"Devil take them!" he muttered, and after listening to the verbal
"Did you hear of the last event at the review in Petersburg? The
"Did you observe the colour?"
"Dieu sait quand reviendra. Go to the dining room."
"Dieu sait quand reviendra..." hummed the prince out of tune and,
"Discharge me, little mother, for God's sake! Order the keys to be
"Dispositions for an attack on the enemy position behind Kobelnitz
"Dmitri," said Rostov to his valet on the box, "those lights are
"Do make me acquainted with your charming daughters," said she. "The
"Do not go asleep; your very life may depend upon it. Have your pistol ready in case we should need it. I will sit on the side of the bed, and you in that chair."
"Do not lose an instant. And, above all, take care of yourself in the meanwhile, for I do not think that there can be a doubt that you are threatened by a very real and imminent danger. How do you go back?"
"Do not think of revenge, or anything of the sort, at present. I think that we may gain that by means of the law; but we have our web to weave, while theirs is already woven. The first consideration is to remove the pressing danger which threatens you. The second is to clear up the mystery and to punish the guilty parties."
"Do order them to form into battalion columns and go round the
"Do us the honor to come in, there's plenty of everything in the
"Do you hear how he's walking?" said Tikhon, drawing the architect's
"Do you know the young lady?" I asked.
"Do you know, Rapp, what military art is?" asked he. "It is the
"Do you know, Watson," said Holmes as we sat together in the gathering darkness, "I have really some scruples as to taking you to-night. There is a distinct element of danger."
"Do you know, Watson," said he, "that it is one of the curses of a mind with a turn like mine that I must look at everything with reference to my own special subject. You look at these scattered houses, and you are impressed by their beauty. I look at them, and the only thought which comes to me is a feeling of their isolation and of the impunity with which crime may be committed there."
"Do you know, dear boy," began the governor's wife with a serious
"Do you know," he said at last, evidently unable to check the sad
"Do you remember, sire, what you did me the honor to say at
"Do you speak French?" the officer asked again, keeping at a
"Do you think he can last till morning?" asked the German,
"Do you want to be doing the same?" said an old soldier, turning
"Do, please, for heaven's sake, relieve me of something!" said the
"Does it matter, Count, how the Note is worded," he asked, "so
"Don't be unkind," cried Anna Pavlovna from her end of the table
"Don't come in," she said to the old count who was following her.
"Don't kick up the dust, you infantry!" jested an hussar whose
"Don't laugh, stop!" cried Natasha. "You're shaking the whole bed!
"Don't mention it, General, as if I'd be so bold!" replied the
"Don't play the fool!" said Denisov, coughing angrily. "Why didn't
"Don't put it in so carelessly," said one of the peasants, a man
"Don't trouble about me," said Pierre. "I'll go up onto the knoll if
"Done about the same time as the bell-rope?" remarked Holmes.
"Done for!" he said with a frown, and went to the gate to meet
"Done for!" repeated Dolokhov as if the utterance of these words
"Drain the blood from men's veins and put in water instead, then
"Dram-da-da-dam, dam-dam..." rattled the drums, and Pierre
"Draw sabers!" cried the dragoon officer, drawing his own.
"Eh, brother! They've all bolted long ago!" said the soldier,
"Eh, is anything hurting you?" asked the soldier, shaking his
"Eh, lad, don't fret!" said he, in the tender singsong caressing
"Eh, sir, this is no place for you," said he, and ran down the
"Eh, who's there? Come in, come in! What news?" the field marshal
"Eh, you rascal!" Pierre heard the same kind voice saying at the
"Eh? What of it, then? Has it returned to life and flapped off through the kitchen window?" Holmes twisted himself round upon the sofa to get a fairer view of the man's excited face.
"Eight weeks passed away like this, and I had written about Abbots and Archery and Armour and Architecture and Attica, and hoped with diligence that I might get on to the B's before very long. It cost me something in foolscap, and I had pretty nearly filled a shelf with my writings. And then suddenly the whole business came to an end."
"Even then he wanted to tell me what he told me the day he died,"
"Everybody is wondering to whom the count will leave his fortune,
"Everything that is right or natural pleads for separation. The blood of
"Everything's still the same with them," thought Nicholas,
"Everything's the same with them. They know nothing about it!
"Evidently," said I, "Mr. Wilson's assistant counts for a good deal in this mystery of the Red-headed League. I am sure that you inquired your way merely in order that you might see him."
"Exactly so. But I am now sleeping in the middle one."
"Excellent! We shall then look thoroughly into the affair. Of course there is only one feasible explanation. You have been brought there to personate someone, and the real person is imprisoned in this chamber. That is obvious. As to who this prisoner is, I have no doubt that it is the daughter, Miss Alice Rucastle, if I remember right, who was said to have gone to America. You were chosen, doubtless, as resembling her in height, figure, and the colour of your hair. Hers had been cut off, very possibly in some illness through which she has passed, and so, of course, yours had to be sacrificed also. By a curious chance you came upon her tresses. The man in the road was undoubtedly some friend of hers--possibly her fiance--and no doubt, as you wore the girl's dress and were so like her, he was convinced from your laughter, whenever he saw you, and afterwards from your gesture, that Miss Rucastle was perfectly happy, and that she no longer desired his attentions. The dog is let loose at night to prevent him from endeavouring to communicate with her. So much is fairly clear. The most serious point in the case is the disposition of the child."
"Excellent. We have already a clue. There can be no doubt that the probability--the strong probability--is that the writer was on board of a ship. And now let us consider another point. In the case of Pondicherry, seven weeks elapsed between the threat and its fulfilment, in Dundee it was only some three or four days. Does that suggest anything?"
"Excuse me, I know everything of it. You are endeavouring to trace some geese which were sold by Mrs. Oakshott, of Brixton Road, to a salesman named Breckinridge, by him in turn to Mr. Windigate, of the Alpha, and by him to his club, of which Mr. Henry Baker is a member."
"Experience," said Holmes, laughing. "Indirectly it may be of value, you know; you have only to put it into words to gain the reputation of being excellent company for the remainder of your existence."
"Fancy his having the insolence to confound me with the official detective force! This incident gives zest to our investigation, however, and I only trust that our little friend will not suffer from her imprudence in allowing this brute to trace her. And now, Watson, we shall order breakfast, and afterwards I shall walk down to Doctors' Commons, where I hope to get some data which may help us in this matter."
"Fancy the Emperor's position!" said they, and instead of
"Farewell, then," said the old man solemnly. "Your own deathbeds, when they come, will be the easier for the thought of the peace which you have given to mine." Tottering and shaking in all his giant frame, he stumbled slowly from the room.
"Farintosh," said he. "Ah yes, I recall the case; it was concerned with an opal tiara. I think it was before your time, Watson. I can only say, madam, that I shall be happy to devote the same care to your case as I did to that of your friend. As to reward, my profession is its own reward; but you are at liberty to defray whatever expenses I may be put to, at the time which suits you best. And now I beg that you will lay before us everything that may help us in forming an opinion upon the matter."
"Faster!" came the word of command, and Rostov felt Rook's flanks
"Father! Andrew!"--said the ungraceful, awkward princess with such
"Federalists," drew back in fright as they heard of the cruel deeds
"Fifty-Four Forty or Fight" forced a settlement of the Oregon boundary.
"Fine fellows, the Pavlograds!" remarked the Emperor.
"Fine! Just like the Frenchie! Oh, ho ho! Do you want some more to
"Fire!" repeated the officer once more, and the reports of a musket
"Fool, I told you the sable one! Hey, Matrena, the sable!" he
"For the dissemination of pure truth and to secure the triumph of
"For the last time I say to you--turn all your attention upon
"For the peace that is from above, and for the salvation of our
"For the world of angels and all the spirits who dwell above us,"
"For tomorrow!" said he, quickly finding the page and making a
"For two days after my arrival at the Copper Beeches my life was very quiet; on the third, Mrs. Rucastle came down just after breakfast and whispered something to her husband.
"For what have you come hither?" asked the newcomer, turning in
"Forage has not been supplied to the extent..."
"Forever?" said the little girl. "Till death itself?"
"Forfeit, forfeit!" cried the militia officer.
"Fr... fr..." snorted Prince Bolkonski. "The prince is making a
"From Hatherley Farmhouse to the Boscombe Pool is a quarter of a mile, and two people saw him as he passed over this ground. One was an old woman, whose name is not mentioned, and the other was William Crowder, a game-keeper in the employ of Mr. Turner. Both these witnesses depose that Mr. McCarthy was walking alone. The game-keeper adds that within a few minutes of his seeing Mr. McCarthy pass he had seen his son, Mr. James McCarthy, going the same way with a gun under his arm. To the best of his belief, the father was actually in sight at the time, and the son was following him. He thought no more of the matter until he heard in the evening of the tragedy that had occurred.
"From Heloise?" asked the prince with a cold smile that showed his
"From the direction, it must be the enemy," repeated Rostov.
"From the first, two facts were very obvious to me, the one that the lady had been quite willing to undergo the wedding ceremony, the other that she had repented of it within a few minutes of returning home. Obviously something had occurred during the morning, then, to cause her to change her mind. What could that something be? She could not have spoken to anyone when she was out, for she had been in the company of the bridegroom. Had she seen someone, then? If she had, it must be someone from America because she had spent so short a time in this country that she could hardly have allowed anyone to acquire so deep an influence over her that the mere sight of him would induce her to change her plans so completely. You see we have already arrived, by a process of exclusion, at the idea that she might have seen an American. Then who could this American be, and why should he possess so much influence over her? It might be a lover; it might be a husband. Her young womanhood had, I knew, been spent in rough scenes and under strange conditions. So far I had got before I ever heard Lord St. Simon's narrative. When he told us of a man in a pew, of the change in the bride's manner, of so transparent a device for obtaining a note as the dropping of a bouquet, of her resort to her confidential maid, and of her very significant allusion to claim-jumping--which in miners' parlance means taking possession of that which another person has a prior claim to--the whole situation became absolutely clear. She had gone off with a man, and the man was either a lover or was a previous husband--the chances being in favour of the latter."
"From the general," said the officer. "Please excuse its not being
"From the governor," said Lavrushka in a sleepy voice. "A courier
"From the height of the Kremlin--yes, there is the Kremlin, yes--I
"From what I have seen of the lady, she seems, indeed, to be on a very different level to your Majesty," said Holmes coldly. "I am sorry that I have not been able to bring your Majesty's business to a more successful conclusion."
"Gave him leave? Leave? That's just like you young men," said the
"Gee up, my darlings!" shouted Nicholas, pulling the reins to one
"General Kutuzov," said Bolkonski, speaking French and stressing the
"Gentlemen!" said the Emperor with a quivering voice.
"Gentlemen, the dispositions for tomorrow--or rather for today,
"Gentlemen, who wishes to bet with me? I'll do the same thing!" he
"Gentlemen," said Kutuzov, "I cannot approve of the count's plan.
"Gently, gently! Can't you do it more gently?" said the Emperor
"Get back into your chair!" said Holmes sternly. "It is very well to cringe and crawl now, but you thought little enough of this poor Horner in the dock for a crime of which he knew nothing."
"Get into step, Fedor... I say, Fedor!" said the foremost peasant.
"Get onto the ice, over the ice! Go on! Turn! Don't you hear? Go
"Get well soon, lads!" he continued, turning to the soldiers.
"Give it to the peasants, let them have all they need; I give you
"Give me a pencil and that slip of paper. Now, then: 'Found at the corner of Goodge Street, a goose and a black felt hat. Mr. Henry Baker can have the same by applying at 6:30 this evening at 221B, Baker Street.' That is clear and concise."
"Give me your coat and umbrella," said Holmes. "They may rest here on the hook and will be dry presently. You have come up from the south-west, I see."
"Give this to the countess... if you see her."
"Glad to do our best!" shouted the soldiers.
"Go and get it for me," said the old prince to Mademoiselle
"Go in, Annette, or you will catch cold," said the little
"Go on! What the devil... Go on! Thirty thousand devils!..." the
"Go on, go on!" said the major.
"Go on, you must drink it all," said Anatole, giving Pierre the last
"Go to the devil! quick ma'ch, while you're safe and sound!" and
"Go to the devil!" cried Anatole and, clutching his hair, left the
"Go your way and God be with you. I know your path is the path of
"Go! Go! Killed in battle, where the best of Russian men and
"Go!" he cried, twisting the reins round his hands, and the troyka
"Go!" he repeated, amazed at himself and glad to see the look of
"Go!" the quivering voice repeated. And Prince Vasili had to go
"Go, Natasha! I will call you," said the countess in a whisper.
"Go, Tit, thresh a bit!" said the wag.
"Go, go quickly," the old man urged him.
"Go, go to him. He is asking for your hand," said the countess,
"Go, ma'am! Don't worry, go!" she whispered, smiling, with the
"Go, my dear fellow, and see whether the third division has passed
"God Almighty alone can decide the fate of our fatherland, Papa,"
"God be thanked that you are in time," said she to one of the
"God be with you, general!" said the Emperor.
"God bless you!" cried the prisoner passionately. "I would have endured imprisonment, ay, even execution, rather than have left my miserable secret as a family blot to my children.
"God help us!" said Holmes after a long silence. "Why does fate play such tricks with poor, helpless worms? I never hear of such a case as this that I do not think of Baxter's words, and say, 'There, but for the grace of God, goes Sherlock Holmes.' "
"God is in the midst, and each drop tries to expand so as to reflect
"God knows I have!--a trouble which is enough to unseat my reason, so sudden and so terrible is it. Public disgrace I might have faced, although I am a man whose character has never yet borne a stain. Private affliction also is the lot of every man; but the two coming together, and in so frightful a form, have been enough to shake my very soul. Besides, it is not I alone. The very noblest in the land may suffer unless some way be found out of this horrible affair."
"God, death, love, the brotherhood of man," he kept saying to himself,
"God, save the king." Later in the year, Parliament passed a sweeping
"Going on?" Pierre exclaimed. "Why more than ever! The Bible Society
"Gone to bed," replied the voice of Demyan the house steward, who
"Gone to bed?" asked the prince.
"Gone? That's all right!" said he; and looking angrily at the
"Good day, General!" said he. "I have received the letter you
"Good heavens!" cried my patient. "Then that explains what the girl said."
"Good morning, Uncle!" said Nicholas, when the old man drew near.
"Good morning, good morning! But don't go overriding the hounds,"
"Good morning, lads!" said the count briskly and loudly. "Thank
"Good news!... Go on!" he shouted to the driver, and they galloped
"Good!" said Murat and, turning to one of the gentlemen in his
"Good!" said the Rhetor quickly, apparently satisfied with this
"Good-by!" he said and turned with his groom toward the inn.
"Good-by, Peter Kirilych!" Pierre heard the other voices repeat.
"Good-by, dear niece," his voice called out of the darkness--not the
"Good-by, my dear," said she to the countess who saw her to the
"Good-day, Lord St. Simon," said Holmes, rising and bowing. "Pray take the basket-chair. This is my friend and colleague, Dr. Watson. Draw up a little to the fire, and we will talk this matter over."
"Good-morning, madam," said Holmes cheerily. "My name is Sherlock Holmes. This is my intimate friend and associate, Dr. Watson, before whom you can speak as freely as before myself. Ha! I am glad to see that Mrs. Hudson has had the good sense to light the fire. Pray draw up to it, and I shall order you a cup of hot coffee, for I observe that you are shivering."
"Gracious heavens! The young count!" he cried, recognizing his young
"Grapeshot!" the senior shouted, without answering the question,
"Great heavens!" cried the inspector, "it is, indeed, the missing man. I know him from the photograph."
"Ha ha ha! The theater of war!" said the prince. "I have said and
"Ha! Our party is complete," said Holmes, buttoning up his pea-jacket and taking his heavy hunting crop from the rack. "Watson, I think you know Mr. Jones, of Scotland Yard? Let me introduce you to Mr. Merryweather, who is to be our companion in to-night's adventure."
"Ha! You put me off, do you?" said our new visitor, taking a step forward and shaking his hunting-crop. "I know you, you scoundrel! I have heard of you before. You are Holmes, the meddler."
"Ha! You say so! You have heard something, Mr. Holmes; you have learned something! Where are the gems?"
"Ha! that was unfortunate. Your wedding was arranged, then, for the Friday. Was it to be in church?"
"Ha! this may save us a visit to Brixton Road," whispered Holmes. "Come with me, and we will see what is to be made of this fellow." Striding through the scattered knots of people who lounged round the flaring stalls, my companion speedily overtook the little man and touched him upon the shoulder. He sprang round, and I could see in the gas-light that every vestige of colour had been driven from his face.
"Ha!" cried I, "if it is anything in the nature of a problem which you desire to see solved, I should strongly recommend you to come to my friend, Mr. Sherlock Holmes, before you go to the official police."
"Ha, ha, ha!" The Frenchman emitted a merry, sanguine chuckle,
"Ha, what's this?" asked Napoleon, noticing that all the courtiers
"Ha-ha-ha!" laughed Pierre. And he said aloud to himself: "The
"Had there been women in the house, I should have suspected a mere vulgar intrigue. That, however, was out of the question. The man's business was a small one, and there was nothing in his house which could account for such elaborate preparations, and such an expenditure as they were at. It must, then, be something out of the house. What could it be? I thought of the assistant's fondness for photography, and his trick of vanishing into the cellar. The cellar! There was the end of this tangled clue. Then I made inquiries as to this mysterious assistant and found that I had to deal with one of the coolest and most daring criminals in London. He was doing something in the cellar--something which took many hours a day for months on end. What could it be, once more? I could think of nothing save that he was running a tunnel to some other building.
"Half dazed, I went into the station and asked about the morning train. There would be one to Reading in less than an hour. The same porter was on duty, I found, as had been there when I arrived. I inquired of him whether he had ever heard of Colonel Lysander Stark. The name was strange to him. Had he observed a carriage the night before waiting for me? No, he had not. Was there a police-station anywhere near? There was one about three miles off.
"Hallo, mate! Never again? Gave you a twist?" the Cossacks would
"Halt! Dress your ranks!" the order of the regimental commander
"Hark at them roaring there in the Fifth Company!" said one of the
"Has Prince Vasili aged much?" asked the countess. "I have not
"Has the enemy entered the city?" he asked.
"Has the snow been shoveled back?"
"Hasn't been in since the evening. Must have been losing,"
"Have some brought from the reserve," said Napoleon, and having gone
"Have the biscuits and rice been served out to the regiments of
"Have they thought of looking outside the house?"
"Have you a couple of days to spare? Have just been wired for from the west of England in connection with Boscombe Valley tragedy. Shall be glad if you will come with me. Air and scenery perfect. Leave Paddington by the 11:15."
"Have you any news of the Rostovs?" she asked, to change the
"Have you dragged the basin of Trafalgar Square fountain?" he asked.
"Have you heard anything of the case?" he asked.
"Have you heard the password?" asked one Guards' officer of another.
"Have you lost anyone, my dear fellow? You're of the gentry
"Have you never--" said Sherlock Holmes, bending forward and sinking his voice--"have you never heard of the Ku Klux Klan?"
"Have you seen the princess?" she asked, indicating with a
"Have you told them to bring the horse?" asked Telyanin, getting
"Having once spotted my man, it was easy to get corroboration. I knew the firm for which this man worked. Having taken the printed description. I eliminated everything from it which could be the result of a disguise--the whiskers, the glasses, the voice, and I sent it to the firm, with a request that they would inform me whether it answered to the description of any of their travellers. I had already noticed the peculiarities of the typewriter, and I wrote to the man himself at his business address asking him if he would come here. As I expected, his reply was typewritten and revealed the same trivial but characteristic defects. The same post brought me a letter from Westhouse & Marbank, of Fenchurch Street, to say that the description tallied in every respect with that of their employe, James Windibank. Voila tout!"
"He brought round both hat and goose to me on Christmas morning, knowing that even the smallest problems are of interest to me. The goose we retained until this morning, when there were signs that, in spite of the slight frost, it would be well that it should be eaten without unnecessary delay. Its finder has carried it off, therefore, to fulfil the ultimate destiny of a goose, while I continue to retain the hat of the unknown gentleman who lost his Christmas dinner."
"He can't lie in the street. May we bring him in, marm?"
"He certainly needs a wash," remarked Holmes. "I had an idea that he might, and I took the liberty of bringing the tools with me." He opened the Gladstone bag as he spoke, and took out, to my astonishment, a very large bath-sponge.
"He could not do that. The people only gave him power that he
"He did," replied Shinshin. "He was in the Caucasus and ran away
"He didn't mind me; in fact, he took a fancy to me, for at the time when he saw me first I was a youngster of twelve or so. This would be in the year 1878, after he had been eight or nine years in England. He begged my father to let me live with him and he was very kind to me in his way. When he was sober he used to be fond of playing backgammon and draughts with me, and he would make me his representative both with the servants and with the tradespeople, so that by the time that I was sixteen I was quite master of the house. I kept all the keys and could go where I liked and do what I liked, so long as I did not disturb him in his privacy. There was one singular exception, however, for he had a single room, a lumber-room up among the attics, which was invariably locked, and which he would never permit either me or anyone else to enter. With a boy's curiosity I have peeped through the keyhole, but I was never able to see more than such a collection of old trunks and bundles as would be expected in such a room.
"He does not look like a common man," said the interpreter, after
"He exists, but to understand Him is hard," the Mason began again,
"He has been very unwell since the evening and this is the third
"He has come back and done it. I tell you that he is a clever and dangerous man. I should not be very much surprised if this were he whose step I hear now upon the stair. I think, Watson, that it would be as well for you to have your pistol ready."
"He has forty thousand men at most," replied Weyrother, with the
"He has made wills enough!" quietly remarked the princess. "But he
"He has ordered me to inquire into the position of affairs," he added.
"He has weported himself sick, he's to be stwuck off the list
"He has, however, retained some degree of self-respect," he continued, disregarding my remonstrance. "He is a man who leads a sedentary life, goes out little, is out of training entirely, is middle-aged, has grizzled hair which he has had cut within the last few days, and which he anoints with lime-cream. These are the more patent facts which are to be deduced from his hat. Also, by the way, that it is extremely improbable that he has gas laid on in his house."
"He higher iss dan I in rank," said the German colonel of the
"He investigated the case with great care, for Dr. Roylott's conduct had long been notorious in the county, but he was unable to find any satisfactory cause of death. My evidence showed that the door had been fastened upon the inner side, and the windows were blocked by old-fashioned shutters with broad iron bars, which were secured every night. The walls were carefully sounded, and were shown to be quite solid all round, and the flooring was also thoroughly examined, with the same result. The chimney is wide, but is barred up by four large staples. It is certain, therefore, that my sister was quite alone when she met her end. Besides, there were no marks of any violence upon her."
"He is Minister of War, a man trusted by the Emperor, and I need not
"He is a cripple in the sense that he walks with a limp; but in other respects he appears to be a powerful and well-nurtured man. Surely your medical experience would tell you, Watson, that weakness in one limb is often compensated for by exceptional strength in the others."
"He is a great tactician!" said the prince to his son, pointing to
"He is dozing," said Anna Mikhaylovna, observing that one of the
"He is just the same as ever," replied Anna Mikhaylovna,
"He is not to be apprehended by reason, but by life," said the
"He is one of the most remarkable, but to me most unpleasant of men-
"He is said to be the richest man on the Pacific slope."
"He is the enemy of mankind!" cried another. "Allow me to speak...."
"He is warming himself there by the bonfire. Ho, Vesenya!
"He knows it already. When I had cleared it all up I had an interview with him, and finding that he would not tell me the story, I told it to him, on which he had to confess that I was right and to add the very few details which were not yet quite clear to me. Your news of this morning, however, may open his lips."
"He lets one win the singles and collahs it as soon as one doubles
"He looked inside the envelope. 'So it is,' he cried. 'Here are the very letters. But what is this written above them?'
"He might have leaped back. You did not see anyone else in the room?"
"He must first receive the trowel," whispered one of the brothers.
"He must guard himself, for he may find that there is someone more cunning than himself upon his track. You must lock yourself up from him to-night. If he is violent, we shall take you away to your aunt's at Harrow. Now, we must make the best use of our time, so kindly take us at once to the rooms which we are to examine."
"He must keep order, keep the law, that's what the government is
"He seems a very amiable person," said Holmes, laughing. "I am not quite so bulky, but if he had remained I might have shown him that my grip was not much more feeble than his own." As he spoke he picked up the steel poker and, with a sudden effort, straightened it out again.
"He shot one of his suspicious looks at me. 'Perhaps we had better proceed to business, then,' said he. 'Mr. Ferguson and I will take you up to see the machine.'
"He shouldn't have taken so many men," said the officer of the
"He slept on the premises."
"He stood," said Holmes, "to the left of the door--that is to say, farther up the path than is necessary to reach the door?"
"He travels for Westhouse & Marbank, the great claret importers of Fenchurch Street."
"He was a master... the peasants' affairs first and then his own. Of
"He was a very shy man, Mr. Holmes. He would rather walk with me in the evening than in the daylight, for he said that he hated to be conspicuous. Very retiring and gentlemanly he was. Even his voice was gentle. He'd had the quinsy and swollen glands when he was young, he told me, and it had left him with a weak throat, and a hesitating, whispering fashion of speech. He was always well dressed, very neat and plain, but his eyes were weak, just as mine are, and he wore tinted glasses against the glare."
"He was in the house about half an hour, and I could catch glimpses of him in the windows of the sitting-room, pacing up and down, talking excitedly, and waving his arms. Of her I could see nothing. Presently he emerged, looking even more flurried than before. As he stepped up to the cab, he pulled a gold watch from his pocket and looked at it earnestly, 'Drive like the devil,' he shouted, 'first to Gross & Hankey's in Regent Street, and then to the Church of St. Monica in the Edgeware Road. Half a guinea if you do it in twenty minutes!'
"He will have to be told, all the same," said some gentlemen of
"He writes about this war," said the prince, with the ironic smile
"He! he! You are a funny one," chuckled the inspector.
"He'll get away!" said the esaul, screwing up his eyes.
"He'll manage to walk, devil take him!" said the captain. "Pass
"He'll settle with all the villains, you'll see! And you said the
"He's a beauty, isn't he?" said the inspector.
"He's a brave fellow," said a woman. "They would have had the lady's purse and watch if it hadn't been for him. They were a gang, and a rough one, too. Ah, he's breathing now."
"He's a creature that wriggles in anywhere!" was the answer. "He has
"He's come, ma'am," whispered the nurse.
"He's coming! He's coming!" shouted a Cossack standing at the gate.
"He's coming!" shouted the signaler at that moment.
"He's done her to death. Killed the mistress!... Beat her... dragged
"He's gone for the dog!" cried Miss Hunter.
"He's with the army, Father, at Smolensk."
"He? He's crazy... he did not want to listen. But what's the use
"He? That's a tradesman, that is to say, he's the restaurant keeper,
"Health, at a time like this?" said the count. "Come, tell us the
"Hear the firing," said the groom, a discharged soldier. "All the
"Heaven only knows what the people here may imagine," muttered
"Heavens! what a virulent attack!" replied the prince, not in the
"Help him up. Sit down, dear fellow, sit down! Spread out the cloak,
"Her father is very rich and stingy. He lives in the country. He
"Here at least we shall have the benefit of your company all to
"Here is an advertisement which will interest you," said he. "It appeared in all the papers about a year ago. Listen to this: 'Lost, on the 9th inst., Mr. Jeremiah Hayling, aged twenty-six, a hydraulic engineer. Left his lodgings at ten o'clock at night, and has not been heard of since. Was dressed in,' etc., etc. Ha! That represents the last time that the colonel needed to have his machine overhauled, I fancy."
"Here is my lens. You know my methods. What can you gather yourself as to the individuality of the man who has worn this article?"
"Here is some sort of Key to the Mysteries that your Heloise has
"Here is that mob, the dregs of the people," he thought as he gazed at
"Here is the dispatch," said Bolkhovitinov. "My orders are to give
"Here is the first notice which I can find. It is in the personal column of the Morning Post, and dates, as you see, some weeks back: 'A marriage has been arranged,' it says, 'and will, if rumour is correct, very shortly take place, between Lord Robert St. Simon, second son of the Duke of Balmoral, and Miss Hatty Doran, the only daughter of Aloysius Doran. Esq., of San Francisco, Cal., U.S.A.' That is all."
"Here it is! The decisive moment has arrived. My turn has come,"
"Here it is!" thought he, seizing the staff of the standard and
"Here it's tolerable," said he, "but with Bagration on the left
"Here she is, the reward for all those fainthearted men," he
"Here we are!" said Holmes cheerily as we filed into the room. "The fire looks very seasonable in this weather. You look cold, Mr. Ryder. Pray take the basket-chair. I will just put on my slippers before we settle this little matter of yours. Now, then! You want to know what became of those geese?"
"Here's to the health of lovely women, Peterkin--and their
"Here, here," and Tushin led him into the next room, from whence
"Here, in that house," answered the adjutant.
"Here, take the child!" said Pierre peremptorily and hurriedly to
"Here, you of the Sixth Company! Devils that you are! Lend a hand...
"Herself," came the answer in a rough voice, and Marya Dmitrievna
"His Majesty drew attention to the Grenadier division and to the
"His excellency is staying in the same house with them."
"His height I know that you might roughly judge from the length of his stride. His boots, too, might be told from their traces."
"His son, you see, had grown up, and so had my girl, and as I was known to be in weak health, it seemed a fine stroke to him that his lad should step into the whole property. But there I was firm. I would not have his cursed stock mixed with mine; not that I had any dislike to the lad, but his blood was in him, and that was enough. I stood firm. McCarthy threatened. I braved him to do his worst. We were to meet at the pool midway between our houses to talk it over.
"Hm! Hm!" muttered the prince, sitting down.
"Hm!--his excellency is a puppy.... I got him his appointment in the
"Hm... Hm..." muttered the old prince to himself, finishing what
"Hm..." said the count, and stopped.
"Ho, ho!" said the old man, casting his eyes on her rounded
"Holmes, the Scotland Yard Jack-in-office!"
"Holmes, the busybody!"
"Holmes," I said, "you have drawn a net round this man from which he cannot escape, and you have saved an innocent human life as truly as if you had cut the cord which was hanging him. I see the direction in which all this points. The culprit is--"
"Holmes," said I as I stood one morning in our bow-window looking down the street, "here is a madman coming along. It seems rather sad that his relatives should allow him to come out alone."
"Home? Why, you meant to spend the evening with us.... You don't
"Hotel Cosmopolitan Jewel Robbery. John Horner, 26, plumber, was brought up upon the charge of having upon the 22nd inst., abstracted from the jewel-case of the Countess of Morcar the valuable gem known as the blue carbuncle. James Ryder, upper-attendant at the hotel, gave his evidence to the effect that he had shown Horner up to the dressing-room of the Countess of Morcar upon the day of the robbery in order that he might solder the second bar of the grate, which was loose. He had remained with Horner some little time, but had finally been called away. On returning, he found that Horner had disappeared, that the bureau had been forced open, and that the small morocco casket in which, as it afterwards transpired, the Countess was accustomed to keep her jewel, was lying empty upon the dressing-table. Ryder instantly gave the alarm, and Horner was arrested the same evening; but the stone could not be found either upon his person or in his rooms. Catherine Cusack, maid to the Countess, deposed to having heard Ryder's cry of dismay on discovering the robbery, and to having rushed into the room, where she found matters as described by the last witness. Inspector Bradstreet, B division, gave evidence as to the arrest of Horner, who struggled frantically, and protested his innocence in the strongest terms. Evidence of a previous conviction for robbery having been given against the prisoner, the magistrate refused to deal summarily with the offence, but referred it to the Assizes. Horner, who had shown signs of intense emotion during the proceedings, fainted away at the conclusion and was carried out of court."
"How about the horses?" he asked, without looking at Pierre.
"How am I to understand you, mon pere?" said the princess, growing
"How can one help it, lad? My name is Platon, and the surname is
"How can one push on? They are stuck there, wedged on the bridge,
"How can one talk to the masters like that? What were you thinking
"How can the Emperor be undecided?" thought Rostov, but then even
"How can we fight the French, Prince?" said Count Rostopchin. "Can
"How can we have when I saw him with my own eyes with the coronet in his hands."
"How can you ask why?" said Princess Mary. "The thought alone of
"How can you judge what's best?" he cried, the blood suddenly
"How can you show me that you are telling the truth?" said Davout
"How could I help suspecting him, when I actually saw him with the coronet in his hand?"
"How did the star get into the icon?" Pierre asked.
"How did you deduce the select?"
"How do you say it?" the captain asked quickly and doubtfully.
"How glad I am you've come! I am so happy today," she said, with the
"How handsome the old man still was only a year ago!" remarked the
"How is it you didn't go head over heels?" asked the boldest of all,
"How is that?" the Emperor interrupted him, frowning sternly. "Would
"How is the count? Can I see him?" asked Pierre, awkwardly as usual,
"How is the glass? Twenty-nine, I see. No wind, and not a cloud in the sky. I have a caseful of cigarettes here which need smoking, and the sofa is very much superior to the usual country hotel abomination. I do not think that it is probable that I shall use the carriage to-night."
"How is the prince?" she asked.
"How like the brother is to the sister," remarked the count. "And
"How long I remained unconscious I cannot tell. It must have been a very long time, for the moon had sunk, and a bright morning was breaking when I came to myself. My clothes were all sodden with dew, and my coat-sleeve was drenched with blood from my wounded thumb. The smarting of it recalled in an instant all the particulars of my night's adventure, and I sprang to my feet with the feeling that I might hardly yet be safe from my pursuers. But to my astonishment, when I came to look round me, neither house nor garden were to be seen. I had been lying in an angle of the hedge close by the highroad, and just a little lower down was a long building, which proved, upon my approaching it, to be the very station at which I had arrived upon the previous night. Were it not for the ugly wound upon my hand, all that had passed during those dreadful hours might have been an evil dream.
"How lovely!" said everyone who saw her; and the vicomte lifted
"How many years have you been fattening on the commune?" Karp
"How many?" Dolokhov asked the Cossack.
"How sweet!" said Countess Mary, looking at and playing with the
"How's it you're not drunk today?" said Nesvitski when the other had
"How, in the name of good-fortune, did you know all that, Mr. Holmes?" he asked. "How did you know, for example, that I did manual labour. It's as true as gospel, for I began as a ship's carpenter."
"Hum! So much for the police-court," said Holmes thoughtfully, tossing aside the paper. "The question for us now to solve is the sequence of events leading from a rifled jewel-case at one end to the crop of a goose in Tottenham Court Road at the other. You see, Watson, our little deductions have suddenly assumed a much more important and less innocent aspect. Here is the stone; the stone came from the goose, and the goose came from Mr. Henry Baker, the gentleman with the bad hat and all the other characteristics with which I have bored you. So now we must set ourselves very seriously to finding this gentleman and ascertaining what part he has played in this little mystery. To do this, we must try the simplest means first, and these lie undoubtedly in an advertisement in all the evening papers. If this fail, I shall have recourse to other methods."
"Hum! We will talk about that. And now let us hear a true account of the next act. How came the stone into the goose, and how came the goose into the open market? Tell us the truth, for there lies your only hope of safety."
"Hurrah!" rang the enthusiastic voices of the officers.
"Hurrah!" shouted Prince Andrew, and, scarcely able to hold up the
"Hurrah-ah-ah!" reverberated in the forest, and the Cossack
"Hush!" whispered the count and turned to Simon. "Have you seen
"I advertised for him in last Saturday's Chronicle," said she. "Here is the slip and here are four letters from him."
"I am afraid for the baby," she said to Mademoiselle Bourienne:
"I am afraid of mixing the figures," Pierre replied; "but if you
"I am afraid so. I had brought a pack of cards in my pocket, and I thought that, as we were a partie carree, you might have your rubber after all. But I see that the enemy's preparations have gone so far that we cannot risk the presence of a light. And, first of all, we must choose our positions. These are daring men, and though we shall take them at a disadvantage, they may do us some harm unless we are careful. I shall stand behind this crate, and do you conceal yourselves behind those. Then, when I flash a light upon them, close in swiftly. If they fire, Watson, have no compunction about shooting them down."
"I am afraid the doctor won't allow it."
"I am afraid," said I, "that the facts are so obvious that you will find little credit to be gained out of this case."
"I am afraid," said Pierre, smiling, and wavering between the
"I am delighted to see you," said she, pressing my hand warmly. "You will, I am sure, forgive anything that may be wanting in our arrangements, when you consider the blow which has come so suddenly upon us."
"I am endeavouring to tell you everything, Mr. Holmes, which may have any bearing upon the case, but I beg that you will question me upon any point which I do not make clear."
"I am expecting you, Pierre," said the same voice, but gently and
"I am fond of you, especially as you are the one live man among
"I am for west," remarked the plain-clothes man. "There are several quiet little villages up there."
"I am immensely indebted to you. Pray tell me in what way I can reward you. This ring--" He slipped an emerald snake ring from his finger and held it out upon the palm of his hand.
"I am naturally observant, as you may have remarked, Mr. Holmes, and I soon had a pretty good plan of the whole house in my head. There was one wing, however, which appeared not to be inhabited at all. A door which faced that which led into the quarters of the Tollers opened into this suite, but it was invariably locked. One day, however, as I ascended the stair, I met Mr. Rucastle coming out through this door, his keys in his hand, and a look on his face which made him a very different person to the round, jovial man to whom I was accustomed. His cheeks were red, his brow was all crinkled with anger, and the veins stood out at his temples with passion. He locked the door and hurried past me without a word or a look.
"I am not afraid," answered Sonya's voice, and along the path toward
"I am not in the cavalry, Colonel, but I am a Russian general and if
"I am not petitioning about anything. His Majesty the Emperor has
"I am so enchanted by the brilliancy of the wit and culture of the
"I am so sorry for the poor count," said the visitor. "He is in such
"I am sorry to knock you up so early, Doctor," said he, "but I have had a very serious accident during the night. I came in by train this morning, and on inquiring at Paddington as to where I might find a doctor, a worthy fellow very kindly escorted me here. I gave the maid a card, but I see that she has left it upon the side-table."
"I am speaking ze truce," replied the hussar with a smile.
"I am speaking, Prince, of the Emperor Napoleon," he replied. The
"I am still in the dark."
"I am sure my husband will consent," said the countess, "but your
"I am sure that rascal was lying," said the count.
"I am sure we owe you an apology, Mrs. Toller," said Holmes, "for you have certainly cleared up everything which puzzled us. And here comes the country surgeon and Mrs. Rucastle, so I think, Watson, that we had best escort Miss Hunter back to Winchester, as it seems to me that our locus standi now is rather a questionable one."
"I am to remain neutral, to get near the window, to watch you, and at the signal to throw in this object, then to raise the cry of fire, and to wait you at the corner of the street."
"I am very anxious about him. His health was better in the winter, but
"I am very glad I did not go to the ambassador's," said Prince
"I am very much afraid that it is not. But between ourselves, Windibank, it was as cruel and selfish and heartless a trick in a petty way as ever came before me. Now, let me just run over the course of events, and you will contradict me if I go wrong."
"I am very sorry, ma'am," answered the maid.
"I assure you that the town of Smolensk is not in the slightest
"I assure you, Watson, without affectation, that the status of my client is a matter of less moment to me than the interest of his case. It is just possible, however, that that also may not be wanting in this new investigation. You have been reading the papers diligently of late, have you not?"
"I assured him that I was not offended. 'By the way,' said I, 'you seem to have quite a suite of spare rooms up there, and one of them has the shutters up.'
"I beg that you will draw your chair up to the fire and favour me with some details as to your case."
"I beg that you will not touch me with your filthy hands," remarked our prisoner as the handcuffs clattered upon his wrists. "You may not be aware that I have royal blood in my veins. Have the goodness, also, when you address me always to say 'sir' and 'please.' "
"I begin ab ovo. 'The enemy of the human race,' as you know, attacks
"I begin to think, Watson," said Holmes, "that I make a mistake in explaining. 'Omne ignotum pro magnifico,' you know, and my poor little reputation, such as it is, will suffer shipwreck if I am so candid. Can you not find the advertisement, Mr. Wilson?"
"I bet fifty imperials"--he spoke French that the Englishman might
"I brought this with me." He opened a locket and showed us the full face of a very lovely woman. It was not a photograph but an ivory miniature, and the artist had brought out the full effect of the lustrous black hair, the large dark eyes, and the exquisite mouth. Holmes gazed long and earnestly at it. Then he closed the locket and handed it back to Lord St. Simon.
"I called about that beggarman, Boone--the one who was charged with being concerned in the disappearance of Mr. Neville St. Clair, of Lee."
"I came at His Majesty the Emperor's wish to learn from your
"I came to you, sir, because I heard of you from Mrs. Etherege, whose husband you found so easy when the police and everyone had given him up for dead. Oh, Mr. Holmes, I wish you would do as much for me. I'm not rich, but still I have a hundred a year in my own right, besides the little that I make by the machine, and I would give it all to know what has become of Mr. Hosmer Angel."
"I can't bear the sight of that woman."
"I can't help it," said the prince. "Lavater would have said I
"I can't imagine. I suppose that you have been watching the habits, and perhaps the house, of Miss Irene Adler."
"I can't tear myself to pieces," the doctor was saying. "Come to
"I can't think what the servants are about," said the countess,
"I cannot accept your praise," he interrupted her hurriedly. "On the
"I cannot do it, General. I cannot, because the law is stronger than
"I cannot help loving the light, it is not my fault. And I am very
"I cannot inform Your Majesty at what o'clock the battle began at
"I cannot now entirely see all the steps of your reasoning," I remarked.
"I cannot see that there is anything very funny," cried our client, flushing up to the roots of his flaming head. "If you can do nothing better than laugh at me, I can go elsewhere."
"I cannot, and I will not, believe it!" cried the banker with an ashen face.
"I come from the archduchess'. I heard nothing there."
"I come to a part of my story now in which I should wish to be particularly so. I am not a very heavy sleeper, and the anxiety in my mind tended, no doubt, to make me even less so than usual. About two in the morning, then, I was awakened by some sound in the house. It had ceased ere I was wide awake, but it had left an impression behind it as though a window had gently closed somewhere. I lay listening with all my ears. Suddenly, to my horror, there was a distinct sound of footsteps moving softly in the next room. I slipped out of bed, all palpitating with fear, and peeped round the corner of my dressing-room door.
"I confess that it is not the situation which I should like to see a sister of mine apply for."
"I could do with much less than that, Mr. Holmes, but you understand that as long as I live at home I don't wish to be a burden to them, and so they have the use of the money just while I am staying with them. Of course, that is only just for the time. Mr. Windibank draws my interest every quarter and pays it over to mother, and I find that I can do pretty well with what I earn at typewriting. It brings me twopence a sheet, and I can often do from fifteen to twenty sheets in a day."
"I could not sleep that night. A vague feeling of impending misfortune impressed me. My sister and I, you will recollect, were twins, and you know how subtle are the links which bind two souls which are so closely allied. It was a wild night. The wind was howling outside, and the rain was beating and splashing against the windows. Suddenly, amid all the hubbub of the gale, there burst forth the wild scream of a terrified woman. I knew that it was my sister's voice. I sprang from my bed, wrapped a shawl round me, and rushed into the corridor. As I opened my door I seemed to hear a low whistle, such as my sister described, and a few moments later a clanging sound, as if a mass of metal had fallen. As I ran down the passage, my sister's door was unlocked, and revolved slowly upon its hinges. I stared at it horror-stricken, not knowing what was about to issue from it. By the light of the corridor-lamp I saw my sister appear at the opening, her face blanched with terror, her hands groping for help, her whole figure swaying to and fro like that of a drunkard. I ran to her and threw my arms round her, but at that moment her knees seemed to give way and she fell to the ground. She writhed as one who is in terrible pain, and her limbs were dreadfully convulsed. At first I thought that she had not recognised me, but as I bent over her she suddenly shrieked out in a voice which I shall never forget, 'Oh, my God! Helen! It was the band! The speckled band!' There was something else which she would fain have said, and she stabbed with her finger into the air in the direction of the doctor's room, but a fresh convulsion seized her and choked her words. I rushed out, calling loudly for my stepfather, and I met him hastening from his room in his dressing-gown. When he reached my sister's side she was unconscious, and though he poured brandy down her throat and sent for medical aid from the village, all efforts were in vain, for she slowly sank and died without having recovered her consciousness. Such was the dreadful end of my beloved sister."
"I could see that the end had not been in his mouth. Therefore he used a holder. The tip had been cut off, not bitten off, but the cut was not a clean one, so I deduced a blunt pen-knife."
"I daresay you would like to bind me!" shouted the publican, pushing
"I desire peace, no less than the Emperor Alexander," he began.
"I did as I was told, and at the same instant Mrs. Rucastle drew down the blind. That was a week ago, and from that time I have not sat again in the window, nor have I worn the blue dress, nor seen the man in the road."
"I did as he ordered, and when the lawyer arrived I was asked to step up to the room. The fire was burning brightly, and in the grate there was a mass of black, fluffy ashes, as of burned paper, while the brass box stood open and empty beside it. As I glanced at the box I noticed, with a start, that upon the lid was printed the treble K which I had read in the morning upon the envelope.
"I did at first," she answered, "but now I know where the letters are without looking." Then, suddenly realising the full purport of his words, she gave a violent start and looked up, with fear and astonishment upon her broad, good-humoured face. "You've heard about me, Mr. Holmes," she cried, "else how could you know all that?"
"I did not come here at all to quarrel with you. On the contrary..."
"I did not expect this of you," said the staff captain seriously and
"I didn't know what to do, so I came straight to you." That was always the way. Folk who were in grief came to my wife like birds to a light-house.
"I do not know that there is anything else for me to explain. I was determined to preserve my disguise as long as possible, and hence my preference for a dirty face. Knowing that my wife would be terribly anxious, I slipped off my ring and confided it to the Lascar at a moment when no constable was watching me, together with a hurried scrawl, telling her that she had no cause to fear."
"I do not know what I have done to be so severely tried," said he. "Only two days ago I was a happy and prosperous man, without a care in the world. Now I am left to a lonely and dishonoured age. One sorrow comes close upon the heels of another. My niece, Mary, has deserted me."
"I do not know what you think, Father," whispered the princess.
"I do not wish to make a mystery," said he, laughing. "The matter was perfectly simple. You, of course, saw that everyone in the street was an accomplice. They were all engaged for the evening."
"I don't and can't," replied Nicholas, looking coldly at the baby.
"I don't at all say that all the plans are good," said Prince
"I don't even know what is in this paper," said the younger of the
"I don't know if it would be allowed," replied the officer in a weak
"I don't know what is the matter with me today. Don't take any
"I don't know what the reasons are. But there must be reasons!"
"I don't myself know 'to who,'" replied the cornet in a serious
"I don't say it's a plan I approve of," said the son; "I am only
"I don't understand," he said, "how it is that the mind of man
"I fail to see that anyone is to blame. I can hardly see how the lady could have acted otherwise, though her abrupt method of doing it was undoubtedly to be regretted. Having no mother, she had no one to advise her at such a crisis."
"I feel that time is of value," said he; "that is why I hastened here when the police inspector suggested that I should secure your co-operation. I came to Baker Street by the Underground and hurried from there on foot, for the cabs go slowly through this snow. That is why I was so out of breath, for I am a man who takes very little exercise. I feel better now, and I will put the facts before you as shortly and yet as clearly as I can.
"I felt angry at having been tricked by so elaborate a story as that which he had told me. 'I was admiring your fuller's-earth,' said I; 'I think that I should be better able to advise you as to your machine if I knew what the exact purpose was for which it was used.'
"I fully share your opinion, and I trust, with you, that we may prove it," returned Holmes, going back to the mat to knock the snow from his shoes. "I believe I have the honour of addressing Miss Mary Holder. Might I ask you a question or two?"
"I give you that column, lads," he said, riding up to the troops and
"I glanced at the books upon the table, and in spite of my ignorance of German I could see that two of them were treatises on science, the others being volumes of poetry. Then I walked across to the window, hoping that I might catch some glimpse of the country-side, but an oak shutter, heavily barred, was folded across it. It was a wonderfully silent house. There was an old clock ticking loudly somewhere in the passage, but otherwise everything was deadly still. A vague feeling of uneasiness began to steal over me. Who were these German people, and what were they doing living in this strange, out-of-the-way place? And where was the place? I was ten miles or so from Eyford, that was all I knew, but whether north, south, east, or west I had no idea. For that matter, Reading, and possibly other large towns, were within that radius, so the place might not be so secluded, after all. Yet it was quite certain, from the absolute stillness, that we were in the country. I paced up and down the room, humming a tune under my breath to keep up my spirits and feeling that I was thoroughly earning my fifty-guinea fee.
"I had a friend once called Maudsley, who went to the bad, and has just been serving his time in Pentonville. One day he had met me, and fell into talk about the ways of thieves, and how they could get rid of what they stole. I knew that he would be true to me, for I knew one or two things about him; so I made up my mind to go right on to Kilburn, where he lived, and take him into my confidence. He would show me how to turn the stone into money. But how to get to him in safety? I thought of the agonies I had gone through in coming from the hotel. I might at any moment be seized and searched, and there would be the stone in my waistcoat pocket. I was leaning against the wall at the time and looking at the geese which were waddling about round my feet, and suddenly an idea came into my head which showed me how I could beat the best detective that ever lived.
"I had come to these conclusions before ever I had entered his room. An inspection of his chair showed me that he had been in the habit of standing on it, which of course would be necessary in order that he should reach the ventilator. The sight of the safe, the saucer of milk, and the loop of whipcord were enough to finally dispel any doubts which may have remained. The metallic clang heard by Miss Stoner was obviously caused by her stepfather hastily closing the door of his safe upon its terrible occupant. Having once made up my mind, you know the steps which I took in order to put the matter to the proof. I heard the creature hiss as I have no doubt that you did also, and I instantly lit the light and attacked it."
"I had no chance to talk with you, Prince, during the animated
"I had not the pleasure of seeing you," said Prince Andrew, coldly
"I had the pleasure," replied Prince Andrew, "not only of taking
"I had," said he, "come to an entirely erroneous conclusion which shows, my dear Watson, how dangerous it always is to reason from insufficient data. The presence of the gipsies, and the use of the word 'band,' which was used by the poor girl, no doubt, to explain the appearance which she had caught a hurried glimpse of by the light of her match, were sufficient to put me upon an entirely wrong scent. I can only claim the merit that I instantly reconsidered my position when, however, it became clear to me that whatever danger threatened an occupant of the room could not come either from the window or the door. My attention was speedily drawn, as I have already remarked to you, to this ventilator, and to the bell-rope which hung down to the bed. The discovery that this was a dummy, and that the bed was clamped to the floor, instantly gave rise to the suspicion that the rope was there as a bridge for something passing through the hole and coming to the bed. The idea of a snake instantly occurred to me, and when I coupled it with my knowledge that the doctor was furnished with a supply of creatures from India, I felt that I was probably on the right track. The idea of using a form of poison which could not possibly be discovered by any chemical test was just such a one as would occur to a clever and ruthless man who had had an Eastern training. The rapidity with which such a poison would take effect would also, from his point of view, be an advantage. It would be a sharp-eyed coroner, indeed, who could distinguish the two little dark punctures which would show where the poison fangs had done their work. Then I thought of the whistle. Of course he must recall the snake before the morning light revealed it to the victim. He had trained it, probably by the use of the milk which we saw, to return to him when summoned. He would put it through this ventilator at the hour that he thought best, with the certainty that it would crawl down the rope and land on the bed. It might or might not bite the occupant, perhaps she might escape every night for a week, but sooner or later she must fall a victim.
"I hardly consider that a conclusive proof. Was the remainder of the coronet at all injured?"
"I have almost every link in my hands, and all the proofs which I could possibly need, so there is little which you need tell me. Still, that little may as well be cleared up to make the case complete. You had heard, Ryder, of this blue stone of the Countess of Morcar's?"
"I have an inspector and two officers waiting at the front door."
"I have been a governess for five years," said she, "in the family of Colonel Spence Munro, but two months ago the colonel received an appointment at Halifax, in Nova Scotia, and took his children over to America with him, so that I found myself without a situation. I advertised, and I answered advertisements, but without success. At last the little money which I had saved began to run short, and I was at my wit's end as to what I should do.
"I have begun giving the elder ones marks every evening, showing how
"I have come from the staff, Count. Have you heard of Raevski's
"I have come with my mother to see the count, but it seems he is not
"I have devised seven separate explanations, each of which would cover the facts as far as we know them. But which of these is correct can only be determined by the fresh information which we shall no doubt find waiting for us. Well, there is the tower of the cathedral, and we shall soon learn all that Miss Hunter has to tell."
"I have done my best for him, and I can assure you the education
"I have found out everything, your excellency: the Rostovs are
"I have four sons in the army but still I don't fret. It is all in
"I have given the order again and again, your honor, but they
"I have had one or two little scores of my own to settle with Mr. John Clay," said Holmes. "I have been at some small expense over this matter, which I shall expect the bank to refund, but beyond that I am amply repaid by having had an experience which is in many ways unique, and by hearing the very remarkable narrative of the Red-headed League."
"I have heard of you, Mr. Holmes. I heard from Major Prendergast how you saved him in the Tankerville Club scandal."
"I have heard of you, my dear sir," continued the stranger, "and
"I have just been to see the countess, your wife. Unfortunately
"I have loved you from the very first moment I saw you. May I hope?"
"I have no data yet. It is a capital mistake to theorise before one has data. Insensibly one begins to twist facts to suit theories, instead of theories to suit facts. But the note itself. What do you deduce from it?"
"I have notes of several similar cases, though none, as I remarked before, which were quite as prompt. My whole examination served to turn my conjecture into a certainty. Circumstantial evidence is occasionally very convincing, as when you find a trout in the milk, to quote Thoreau's example."
"I have one or two things which I would wish to do now that I am in town. But I shall return by the twelve o'clock train, so as to be there in time for your coming."
"I have ordered a carriage," said Lestrade as we sat over a cup of tea. "I knew your energetic nature, and that you would not be happy until you had been on the scene of the crime."
"I have quite lost the knack of talking to ladies," he said. "It was
"I have read our protests about the Oldenburg affair and was
"I have said that though the floor and ceiling were of iron, the walls were of wood. As I gave a last hurried glance around, I saw a thin line of yellow light between two of the boards, which broadened and broadened as a small panel was pushed backward. For an instant I could hardly believe that here was indeed a door which led away from death. The next instant I threw myself through, and lay half-fainting upon the other side. The panel had closed again behind me, but the crash of the lamp, and a few moments afterwards the clang of the two slabs of metal, told me how narrow had been my escape.
"I have seen the police."
"I have seen the princess," she replied. "I heard that they were
"I have seen the will of the deceased wife," said he. "To determine its exact meaning I have been obliged to work out the present prices of the investments with which it is concerned. The total income, which at the time of the wife's death was little short of $1100, is now, through the fall in agricultural prices, not more than $750. Each daughter can claim an income of $250, in case of marriage. It is evident, therefore, that if both girls had married, this beauty would have had a mere pittance, while even one of them would cripple him to a very serious extent. My morning's work has not been wasted, since it has proved that he has the very strongest motives for standing in the way of anything of the sort. And now, Watson, this is too serious for dawdling, especially as the old man is aware that we are interesting ourselves in his affairs; so if you are ready, we shall call a cab and drive to Waterloo. I should be very much obliged if you would slip your revolver into your pocket. An Eley's No. 2 is an excellent argument with gentlemen who can twist steel pokers into knots. That and a tooth-brush are, I think, all that we need."
"I have seen those symptoms before," said Holmes, throwing his cigarette into the fire. "Oscillation upon the pavement always means an affaire de coeur. She would like advice, but is not sure that the matter is not too delicate for communication. And yet even here we may discriminate. When a woman has been seriously wronged by a man she no longer oscillates, and the usual symptom is a broken bell wire. Here we may take it that there is a love matter, but that the maiden is not so much angry as perplexed, or grieved. But here she comes in person to resolve our doubts."
"I have seen too much not to know that the impression of a woman may be more valuable than the conclusion of an analytical reasoner. And in this letter you certainly have a very strong piece of evidence to corroborate your view. But if your husband is alive and able to write letters, why should he remain away from you?"
"I have spent the whole day," said he, "over Lloyd's registers and files of the old papers, following the future career of every vessel which touched at Pondicherry in January and February in '83. There were thirty-six ships of fair tonnage which were reported there during those months. Of these, one, the Lone Star, instantly attracted my attention, since, although it was reported as having cleared from London, the name is that which is given to one of the states of the Union."
"I have sworn it by the most solemn oaths which a man can take."
"I have talked and talked at the Assembly of the Nobility," Prince
"I have the honor to congratulate you. General Mack has arrived,
"I have the honor to present myself," repeated Prince Andrew
"I have the honor to report to you the actual truth," said Alpatych.
"I have the honor to report, sir, that only eight rounds are left.
"I have the pleasure of addressing Count Bezukhov, if I am not
"I have the pleasure of being already acquainted, if the countess
"I have them in the hollow of my hand. Young Openshaw shall not long remain unavenged. Why, Watson, let us put their own devilish trade-mark upon them. It is well thought of!"
"I have very little difficulty in finding what I want," said I, "for the facts are quite recent, and the matter struck me as remarkable. I feared to refer them to you, however, as I knew that you had an inquiry on hand and that you disliked the intrusion of other matters."
"I haven't been in the room. It must be where you put it."
"I hear that it was during the night, sir, but it has got worse, and the whole place is in a blaze."
"I heard about that affair of hers at the time. It was a great
"I helped you, but all the same I must tell you the truth; it is a
"I hope a wild goose may not prove to be the end of our chase," observed Mr. Merryweather gloomily.
"I hope that I may have the pleasure of introducing you to-night. I've had one or two little turns also with Mr. John Clay, and I agree with you that he is at the head of his profession. It is past ten, however, and quite time that we started. If you two will take the first hansom, Watson and I will follow in the second."
"I hope this will prove the last drop that will make the glass run
"I imagine that Freemasonry is the fraternity and equality of men
"I intended to re-form them beyond the village, your excellency,"
"I knew the princess at once," put in Mademoiselle Bourienne.
"I know from reliable sources that the Dowager Empress is taking a
"I know the law very well, mates! I'll take the matter to the
"I know the will was made, but I also know that it is invalid; and
"I know your heart," repeated the prince. "I value your friendship
"I know your outlook," said the Mason, "and the view of life you
"I know, my dear, kind princess," said Anna Mikhaylovna, seizing the
"I looked through and was conscious of two glowing eyes, and of a vague figure huddled up in the darkness.
"I make bold to inform your honor that the rude peasants here
"I met them the day before yesterday at the Arkharovs'. Natalie
"I must also inform you," said the Rhetor, "that our Order
"I must go home now, for dad is very ill, and he misses me so if I leave him. Good-bye, and God help you in your undertaking." She hurried from the room as impulsively as she had entered, and we heard the wheels of her carriage rattle off down the street.
"I must really ask you to be a little more quiet!" said Holmes severely. "You have already imperilled the whole success of our expedition. Might I beg that you would have the goodness to sit down upon one of those boxes, and not to interfere?"
"I never doubted the devotion of the Russian nobles, but today it
"I never hope to see such a sight as that again, Mr. Holmes. From north, south, east, and west every man who had a shade of red in his hair had tramped into the city to answer the advertisement. Fleet Street was choked with red-headed folk, and Pope's Court looked like a coster's orange barrow. I should not have thought there were so many in the whole country as were brought together by that single advertisement. Every shade of colour they were--straw, lemon, orange, brick, Irish-setter, liver, clay; but, as Spaulding said, there were not many who had the real vivid flame-coloured tint. When I saw how many were waiting, I would have given it up in despair; but Spaulding would not hear of it. How he did it I could not imagine, but he pushed and pulled and butted until he got me through the crowd, and right up to the steps which led to the office. There was a double stream upon the stair, some going up in hope, and some coming back dejected; but we wedged in as well as we could and soon found ourselves in the office."
"I noted, in passing, that she had written a note before leaving home but after being fully dressed. You observed that her right glove was torn at the forefinger, but you did not apparently see that both glove and finger were stained with violet ink. She had written in a hurry and dipped her pen too deep. It must have been this morning, or the mark would not remain clear upon the finger. All this is amusing, though rather elementary, but I must go back to business, Watson. Would you mind reading me the advertised description of Mr. Hosmer Angel?"
"I often think, though, perhaps it's a sin," said the princess,
"I only said that it would be more to the purpose to make sacrifices
"I only wonder that the fate of Russia could have been entrusted
"I owe you an apology," he said, raising his golden pince-nez to his eyes. "I trust that I am not intruding. I fear that I have brought some traces of the storm and rain into your snug chamber."
"I perceive also that whoever addressed the envelope had to go and inquire as to the address."
"I really have made no inquiries on the subject."
"I request you to have the goodness to change your coat," he said as
"I said at the time and before anyone else" (she insisted on her
"I said from the first," declared Anna Pavlovna referring to Pierre,
"I saw an ill-dressed vagabond in the lane yesterday evening," said Mr. Holder.
"I saw him myself." replied the man with a self-confident smile of
"I saw it in a paper," explained the American. "It gave the name and the church but not where the lady lived."
"I saw nothing remarkable save the bell-rope, and what purpose that could answer I confess is more than I can imagine."
"I saw the Pavlograd hussars attack there, your excellency,"
"I say so," he continued desperately, "because the Bourbons fled
"I say! Are the lads asleep?" asked Petya.
"I say, Balaga," said Anatole, putting his hands on the man's
"I say, Fedeshon!... Did he say when the battles are to begin? You
"I say, shall we soon be clear? They say the cavalry are blocking
"I say, we've been in the front line! Our regiment attacked!" said
"I searched the Dundee records, and when I found that the barque Lone Star was there in January, '85, my suspicion became a certainty. I then inquired as to the vessels which lay at present in the port of London."
"I see," said I as I glanced down the column, "that the coroner in his concluding remarks was rather severe upon young McCarthy. He calls attention, and with reason, to the discrepancy about his father having signalled to him before seeing him, also to his refusal to give details of his conversation with his father, and his singular account of his father's dying words. They are all, as he remarks, very much against the son."
"I see--her ladyship's waiting-maid. Well, the temptation of sudden wealth so easily acquired was too much for you, as it has been for better men before you; but you were not very scrupulous in the means you used. It seems to me, Ryder, that there is the making of a very pretty villain in you. You knew that this man Horner, the plumber, had been concerned in some such matter before, and that suspicion would rest the more readily upon him. What did you do, then? You made some small job in my lady's room--you and your confederate Cusack--and you managed that he should be the man sent for. Then, when he had left, you rifled the jewel-case, raised the alarm, and had this unfortunate man arrested. You then--"
"I see. Then at the gasfitters' ball you met, as I understand, a gentleman called Mr. Hosmer Angel."
"I see. You infer that she may have gone out to tell her sweetheart, and that the two may have planned the robbery."
"I shall be delighted to meet them," said the prince. "But tell me,"
"I shall glance into the case for you," said Holmes, rising, "and I have no doubt that we shall reach some definite result. Let the weight of the matter rest upon me now, and do not let your mind dwell upon it further. Above all, try to let Mr. Hosmer Angel vanish from your memory, as he has done from your life."
"I shall just have time to tell you the facts of the case before we get to Lee. It seems absurdly simple, and yet, somehow I can get nothing to go upon. There's plenty of thread, no doubt, but I can't get the end of it into my hand. Now, I'll state the case clearly and concisely to you, Watson, and maybe you can see a spark where all is dark to me."
"I shall never let it drop until the gems are found--never, Mary! Your affection for Arthur blinds you as to the awful consequences to me. Far from hushing the thing up, I have brought a gentleman down from London to inquire more deeply into it."
"I shall try not to miss anything of importance. The one unpleasant thing about the house, which struck me at once, was the appearance and conduct of the servants. There are only two, a man and his wife. Toller, for that is his name, is a rough, uncouth man, with grizzled hair and whiskers, and a perpetual smell of drink. Twice since I have been with them he has been quite drunk, and yet Mr. Rucastle seemed to take no notice of it. His wife is a very tall and strong woman with a sour face, as silent as Mrs. Rucastle and much less amiable. They are a most unpleasant couple, but fortunately I spend most of my time in the nursery and my own room, which are next to each other in one corner of the building.
"I should be very glad now to go upstairs," said he. "I shall probably wish to go over the outside of the house again. Perhaps I had better take a look at the lower windows before I go up."
"I should like to see the great man," he said, alluding to Napoleon,
"I should like to speak well of them, but as far as I the facts, I
"I should like," said the vicomte, "to ask how monsieur explains the
"I should never dare to say that I know the truth," said the
"I signed the paper as directed, and the lawyer took it away with him. The singular incident made, as you may think, the deepest impression upon me, and I pondered over it and turned it every way in my mind without being able to make anything of it. Yet I could not shake off the vague feeling of dread which it left behind, though the sensation grew less keen as the weeks passed and nothing happened to disturb the usual routine of our lives. I could see a change in my uncle, however. He drank more than ever, and he was less inclined for any sort of society. Most of his time he would spend in his room, with the door locked upon the inside, but sometimes he would emerge in a sort of drunken frenzy and would burst out of the house and tear about the garden with a revolver in his hand, screaming out that he was afraid of no man, and that he was not to be cooped up, like a sheep in a pen, by man or devil. When these hot fits were over, however, he would rush tumultuously in at the door and lock and bar it behind him, like a man who can brazen it out no longer against the terror which lies at the roots of his soul. At such times I have seen his face, even on a cold day, glisten with moisture, as though it were new raised from a basin.
"I spent the evening with her yesterday. She is going to their
"I suppose that everyone finds his first independent start in business a dreary experience. To me it has been exceptionally so. During two years I have had three consultations and one small job, and that is absolutely all that my profession has brought me. My gross takings amount to $27 10s. Every day, from nine in the morning until four in the afternoon, I waited in my little den, until at last my heart began to sink, and I came to believe that I should never have any practice at all.
"I suppose, Watson," said he, "that you imagine that I have added opium-smoking to cocaine injections, and all the other little weaknesses on which you have favoured me with your medical views."
"I suppose," said Holmes, "that when Mr. Windibank came back from France he was very annoyed at your having gone to the ball."
"I tell you that I would give one of the provinces of my kingdom to have that photograph."
"I thank you all!" he said, addressing the soldiers and then again
"I thank you," said the young man, rising and pulling on his overcoat. "You have given me fresh life and hope. I shall certainly do as you advise."
"I thank your Majesty. Then there is no more to be done in the matter. I have the honour to wish you a very good morning." He bowed, and, turning away without observing the hand which the King had stretched out to him, he set off in my company for his chambers.
"I thank your Serene Highness, but I fear I am no longer fit for the
"I then lounged down the street and found, as I expected, that there was a mews in a lane which runs down by one wall of the garden. I lent the ostlers a hand in rubbing down their horses, and received in exchange twopence, a glass of half-and-half, two fills of shag tobacco, and as much information as I could desire about Miss Adler, to say nothing of half a dozen other people in the neighbourhood in whom I was not in the least interested, but whose biographies I was compelled to listen to."
"I think I may congratulate you," whispered Anna Pavlovna to the old
"I think not," answered the Frenchman, feeling himself over. "But
"I think that I heard a ring," said Holmes. "Yes, there are steps on the landing. If I cannot persuade you to take a lenient view of the matter, Lord St. Simon, I have brought an advocate here who may be more successful." He opened the door and ushered in a lady and gentleman. "Lord St. Simon," said he "allow me to introduce you to Mr. and Mrs. Francis Hay Moulton. The lady, I think, you have already met."
"I think that I mentioned to you that the doctor kept a cheetah and a baboon. We had no feeling of security unless our doors were locked."
"I think that there you ask a little too much," responded his Lordship. "I may be forced to acquiesce in these recent developments, but I can hardly be expected to make merry over them. I think that with your permission I will now wish you all a very good-night." He included us all in a sweeping bow and stalked out of the room.
"I think that this should do," said he, glancing into the glass above the fireplace. "I only wish that you could come with me, Watson, but I fear that it won't do. I may be on the trail in this matter, or I may be following a will-o'-the-wisp, but I shall soon know which it is. I hope that I may be back in a few hours." He cut a slice of beef from the joint upon the sideboard, sandwiched it between two rounds of bread, and thrusting this rude meal into his pocket he started off upon his expedition.
"I think you will find," said Sherlock Holmes, "that you will play for a higher stake to-night than you have ever done yet, and that the play will be more exciting. For you, Mr. Merryweather, the stake will be some $30,000; and for you, Jones, it will be the man upon whom you wish to lay your hands."
"I think," said the prince with a smile, "that if you had been
"I thought it as well," said Holmes as we climbed the stile, "that this fellow should think we had come here as architects, or on some definite business. It may stop his gossip. Good-afternoon, Miss Stoner. You see that we have been as good as our word."
"I thought of the fifty guineas, and of how very useful they would be to me. 'Not at all,' said I, 'I shall be very happy to accommodate myself to your wishes. I should like, however, to understand a little more clearly what it is that you wish me to do.'
"I thought people would talk if I went to the Hall."
"I thought that if I told you the circumstances you would understand afterwards if I wanted your help. I should feel so much stronger if I felt that you were at the back of me."
"I told you it was all lumps and holes!" the little princess
"I took him into the forest. Then I see he's no good and think I'll go
"I took it up and examined it. It was of the same peculiar tint, and the same thickness. But then the impossibility of the thing obtruded itself upon me. How could my hair have been locked in the drawer? With trembling hands I undid my trunk, turned out the contents, and drew from the bottom my own hair. I laid the two tresses together, and I assure you that they were identical. Was it not extraordinary? Puzzle as I would, I could make nothing at all of what it meant. I returned the strange hair to the drawer, and I said nothing of the matter to the Rucastles as I felt that I had put myself in the wrong by opening a drawer which they had locked.
"I took the lamp from him, and I examined the machine very thoroughly. It was indeed a gigantic one, and capable of exercising enormous pressure. When I passed outside, however, and pressed down the levers which controlled it, I knew at once by the whishing sound that there was a slight leakage, which allowed a regurgitation of water through one of the side cylinders. An examination showed that one of the india-rubber bands which was round the head of a driving-rod had shrunk so as not quite to fill the socket along which it worked. This was clearly the cause of the loss of power, and I pointed it out to my companions, who followed my remarks very carefully and asked several practical questions as to how they should proceed to set it right. When I had made it clear to them, I returned to the main chamber of the machine and took a good look at it to satisfy my own curiosity. It was obvious at a glance that the story of the fuller's-earth was the merest fabrication, for it would be absurd to suppose that so powerful an engine could be designed for so inadequate a purpose. The walls were of wood, but the floor consisted of a large iron trough, and when I came to examine it I could see a crust of metallic deposit all over it. I had stooped and was scraping at this to see exactly what it was when I heard a muttered exclamation in German and saw the cadaverous face of the colonel looking down at me.
"I took the precious case into my hands and looked in some perplexity from it to my illustrious client.
"I want to test a little theory of mine," said he, pulling on his boots. "I think, Watson, that you are now standing in the presence of one of the most absolute fools in Europe. I deserve to be kicked from here to Charing Cross. But I think I have the key of the affair now."
"I wanted to listen at the door, but I knew you would tell me."
"I warn you, Captain," one of the officers, a short thin man,
"I was a little startled at the nature of the child's amusement, but the father's laughter made me think that perhaps he was joking.
"I was driven over by my employer, who was as amiable as ever, and was introduced by him that evening to his wife and the child. There was no truth, Mr. Holmes, in the conjecture which seemed to us to be probable in your rooms at Baker Street. Mrs. Rucastle is not mad. I found her to be a silent, pale-faced woman, much younger than her husband, not more than thirty, I should think, while he can hardly be less than forty-five. From their conversation I have gathered that they have been married about seven years, that he was a widower, and that his only child by the first wife was the daughter who has gone to Philadelphia. Mr. Rucastle told me in private that the reason why she had left them was that she had an unreasoning aversion to her stepmother. As the daughter could not have been less than twenty, I can quite imagine that her position must have been uncomfortable with her father's young wife.
"I was half-dragged up to the altar, and before I knew where I was I found myself mumbling responses which were whispered in my ear, and vouching for things of which I knew nothing, and generally assisting in the secure tying up of Irene Adler, spinster, to Godfrey Norton, bachelor. It was all done in an instant, and there was the gentleman thanking me on the one side and the lady on the other, while the clergyman beamed on me in front. It was the most preposterous position in which I ever found myself in my life, and it was the thought of it that started me laughing just now. It seems that there had been some informality about their license, that the clergyman absolutely refused to marry them without a witness of some sort, and that my lucky appearance saved the bridegroom from having to sally out into the streets in search of a best man. The bride gave me a sovereign, and I mean to wear it on my watch chain in memory of the occasion."
"I was never pleased at Bolkonski's engagement to Natasha," said the
"I was not and am not sure which; but I knew that the ship must have an American origin."
"I was recalled to myself by a frantic plucking at my wrist, and I found myself lying upon the stone floor of a narrow corridor, while a woman bent over me and tugged at me with her left hand, while she held a candle in her right. It was the same good friend whose warning I had so foolishly rejected.
"I was shaken but not hurt by the fall; so I picked myself up and rushed off among the bushes as hard as I could run, for I understood that I was far from being out of danger yet. Suddenly, however, as I ran, a deadly dizziness and sickness came over me. I glanced down at my hand, which was throbbing painfully, and then, for the first time, saw that my thumb had been cut off and that the blood was pouring from my wound. I endeavoured to tie my handkerchief round it, but there came a sudden buzzing in my ears, and next moment I fell in a dead faint among the rose-bushes.
"I was so glad to hear of your safety. It was the first piece of
"I was so terrified that I do not know what I did. I suppose that I must have rushed past him into my room. I remember nothing until I found myself lying on my bed trembling all over. Then I thought of you, Mr. Holmes. I could not live there longer without some advice. I was frightened of the house, of the man, of the woman, of the servants, even of the child. They were all horrible to me. If I could only bring you down all would be well. Of course I might have fled from the house, but my curiosity was almost as strong as my fears. My mind was soon made up. I would send you a wire. I put on my hat and cloak, went down to the office, which is about half a mile from the house, and then returned, feeling very much easier. A horrible doubt came into my mind as I approached the door lest the dog might be loose, but I remembered that Toller had drunk himself into a state of insensibility that evening, and I knew that he was the only one in the household who had any influence with the savage creature, or who would venture to set him free. I slipped in in safety and lay awake half the night in my joy at the thought of seeing you. I had no difficulty in getting leave to come into Winchester this morning, but I must be back before three o'clock, for Mr. and Mrs. Rucastle are going on a visit, and will be away all the evening, so that I must look after the child. Now I have told you all my adventures, Mr. Holmes, and I should be very glad if you could tell me what it all means, and, above all, what I should do."
"I was staggered, sir. I did not know what to do. Then I called at the offices round, but none of them seemed to know anything about it. Finally, I went to the landlord, who is an accountant living on the ground floor, and I asked him if he could tell me what had become of the Red-headed League. He said that he had never heard of any such body. Then I asked him who Mr. Duncan Ross was. He answered that the name was new to him.
"I was still balancing the matter in my mind when a hansom cab drove up to Briony Lodge, and a gentleman sprang out. He was a remarkably handsome man, dark, aquiline, and moustached--evidently the man of whom I had heard. He appeared to be in a great hurry, shouted to the cabman to wait, and brushed past the maid who opened the door with the air of a man who was thoroughly at home.
"I was there," said Rostov angrily, as if intending to insult the
"I was told it would be dangerous because of the enemy. Dear friend,
"I was very angry, for this was the third demand during the month. 'You shall not have a farthing from me,' I cried, on which he bowed and left the room without another word.
"I went home to Saxe-Coburg Square, and I took the advice of my assistant. But he could not help me in any way. He could only say that if I waited I should hear by post. But that was not quite good enough, Mr. Holmes. I did not wish to lose such a place without a struggle, so, as I had heard that you were good enough to give advice to poor folk who were in need of it, I came right away to you."
"I will come in all the same, I have to look through the books,"
"I will do nothing of the kind. My stepdaughter has been here. I have traced her. What has she been saying to you?"
"I will do so, and I will show you the steps by which I reached it. And let me say to you, first, that which it is hardest for me to say and for you to hear: there has been an understanding between Sir George Burnwell and your niece Mary. They have now fled together."
"I will do so," said Prince Andrew, moving away from the map.
"I will fly, Mr. Holmes. I will leave the country, sir. Then the charge against him will break down."
"I will give the order."
"I will go when I have said my say. Don't you dare to meddle with my affairs. I know that Miss Stoner has been here. I traced her! I am a dangerous man to fall foul of! See here." He stepped swiftly forward, seized the poker, and bent it into a curve with his huge brown hands.
"I will make a match for you with the princess. Catherine Petrovna
"I will send her to you," said the countess, and left the room.
"I will soon make it clear to you," said she; "and I'd have done so before now if I could ha' got out from the cellar. If there's police-court business over this, you'll remember that I was the one that stood your friend, and that I was Miss Alice's friend too.
"I will tell you frankly," said Prince Vasili in the tone of a
"I will tell you, then, what occurred in your house last night. Your niece, when you had, as she thought, gone to your room, slipped down and talked to her lover through the window which leads into the stable lane. His footmarks had pressed right through the snow, so long had he stood there. She told him of the coronet. His wicked lust for gold kindled at the news, and he bent her to his will. I have no doubt that she loved you, but there are women in whom the love of a lover extinguishes all other loves, and I think that she must have been one. She had hardly listened to his instructions when she saw you coming downstairs, on which she closed the window rapidly and told you about one of the servants' escapade with her wooden-legged lover, which was all perfectly true.
"I will the bridge fire," he said in a solemn tone as if to announce
"I won't insult your intelligence by telling you how I read that, especially as, rather against the strict rules of your order, you use an arc-and-compass breastpin."
"I won't!" cried Natasha, with one hand bolding back the hair that
"I won't, I can't sleep, what's the use? Come now for the last
"I wonder, is it not too late to administer unction?" asked the
"I wrote my articles and thought little more of the matter until, some time later, I backed a bill for a friend and had a writ served upon me for $25. I was at my wit's end where to get the money, but a sudden idea came to me. I begged a fortnight's grace from the creditor, asked for a holiday from my employers, and spent the time in begging in the City under my disguise. In ten days I had the money and had paid the debt.
"I'll flatten you into a pancake!" shouted the angry officer to
"I'll give you a hundwed sharp lashes--that'll teach you to play the
"I'll go there too, I too!" thought Pierre, and followed the
"I'll kill you!" he shouted, and seizing the marble top of a table
"I'll let two more letters pass, but the third I'll read," said
"I'll really call in on the nuns," he said to the officers who
"I'll show them; I'll give it to them, the brigands!" said he to
"I'll teach you to run into the yards!"
"I'm even weady to dance the pas de chale."
"I'm glad," answered Dolokhov briefly and clearly, as the song
"I'm not to blame that the conversation began in the presence of
"I'm sorry, sorry for that fine fellow. Give me the letter."
"I've been sent back to the regiment all on account of that devil,
"I've come to sit with you a bit, Masha," said the nurse, "and
"I've had an eye on him this long while," said the other.
"I've had enough of you and your geese," he shouted. "I wish you were all at the devil together. If you come pestering me any more with your silly talk I'll set the dog at you. You bring Mrs. Oakshott here and I'll answer her, but what have you to do with it? Did I buy the geese off you?"
"I've heard that voice before," said Holmes, staring down the dimly lit street. "Now, I wonder who the deuce that could have been."
"I've taken twansports from the infantwy by force!" he said.
"I've wasted time enough," said Lestrade, rising. "I believe in hard work and not in sitting by the fire spinning fine theories. Good-day, Mr. Holmes, and we shall see which gets to the bottom of the matter first." He gathered up the garments, thrust them into the bag, and made for the door.
"I? I? What of me? Leave me out of the question. I'm not going to
"I? I?..." said the prince as if unpleasantly awakened, and not
"If Buonaparte remains on the throne of France a year longer," the
"If I have time," answered Nicholas. "But I promised the
"If I may give an opinion," remarked the strange gentleman, "we've had just a little too much secrecy over this business already. For my part, I should like all Europe and America to hear the rights of it." He was a small, wiry, sunburnt man, clean-shaven, with a sharp face and alert manner.
"If I may take the liberty, your excellency, it would be a good
"If I tell her she will not believe me. You may remember the old Persian saying, 'There is danger for him who taketh the tiger cub, and danger also for whoso snatches a delusion from a woman.' There is as much sense in Hafiz as in Horace, and as much knowledge of the world."
"If Prince Andrew heard that I was in the power of the French!
"If all Russians are in the least like you, it is sacrilege to fight
"If anyone comes meddling again," said he, emitting the words
"If he fell into my hands, when I'd caught him I'd bury him in the
"If he is better, ask Pierre to dine with us. He has been to the
"If he is one of the ordinary little staff dandies sent to earn a
"If he manages the business properly he will be able to pay off
"If he" (he meant the enemy) "begins popping at the bridge now,"
"If only some fool would marry her!" Then he slammed the door,
"If so, it is a serious case. Nothing less would bring a man out on such a day and at such an hour. But I take it that it is more likely to be some crony of the landlady's."
"If the animals in front are continually changing and the
"If the animals leading the herd change, this happens because the
"If the count had been at home..." Mavra Kuzminichna went on
"If they had known that you wished it, the entertainment would
"If this patience comes out," he said to himself after shuffling the
"If we fought before," he said, "not letting the French pass, as
"If you are resolved, I must begin your initiation," said the Rhetor
"If you can call upon me at my Baker Street rooms to-morrow morning between nine and ten I shall be happy to do what I can to make it clearer. I understand that you give me carte blanche to act for you, provided only that I get back the gems, and that you place no limit on the sum I may draw."
"If you have nothing better to do, Count [or Prince], and if the
"If you leave it to a court of law to clear the matter up," said he, "of course you can hardly avoid publicity. On the other hand, if you convince the police authorities that there is no possible case against you, I do not know that there is any reason that the details should find their way into the papers. Inspector Bradstreet would, I am sure, make notes upon anything which you might tell us and submit it to the proper authorities. The case would then never go into court at all."
"If you noticed some disorder in the garden," said Alpatych, "it was
"If you please, Miss! allow me," said the maid, who on her knees was
"If you remember, Monday was an exceedingly hot day, and Mrs. St. Clair walked slowly, glancing about in the hope of seeing a cab, as she did not like the neighbourhood in which she found herself. While she was walking in this way down Swandam Lane, she suddenly heard an ejaculation or cry, and was struck cold to see her husband looking down at her and, as it seemed to her, beckoning to her from a second-floor window. The window was open, and she distinctly saw his face, which she describes as being terribly agitated. He waved his hands frantically to her, and then vanished from the window so suddenly that it seemed to her that he had been plucked back by some irresistible force from behind. One singular point which struck her quick feminine eye was that although he wore some dark coat, such as he had started to town in, he had on neither collar nor necktie.
"If you scare away the beast, Daniel'll give it you!"
"If you were counting on the evening soup, you have come too
"Ignorant of the import of what you were undertaking, you made a vow
"Immediately, I'm coming, I'm coming!" replied the princess
"Impudence! Impudence!" they heard behind them the voice of Mavra
"Impudent fellows!" said the prince. "You know Metivier? I turned
"In a word, a hearty one..." said the subaltern, laughing (the
"In our temples we recognize no other distinctions," read the
"In peace let us pray unto the Lord."
"In search of the body of Lady St. Simon."
"In that case I shall continue my professional round. But I shall come back in the evening at the hour you have mentioned, for I should like to see the solution of so tangled a business."
"In that case I think that it is probable that no further steps may be taken. But if you are found again, then all must come out. I am sure, Mr. Holmes, that we are very much indebted to you for having cleared the matter up. I wish I knew how you reach your results."
"In the bathroom," he answered. "Oh, yes, I am not joking," he continued, seeing my look of incredulity. "I have just been there, and I have taken it out, and I have got it in this Gladstone bag. Come on, my boy, and we shall see whether it will not fit the lock."
"In the cells."
"In the dress is a pocket. In the pocket is a card-case. In the card-case is a note. And here is the very note." He slapped it down upon the table in front of him. "Listen to this: 'You will see me when all is ready. Come at once. F. H. M.' Now my theory all along has been that Lady St. Simon was decoyed away by Flora Millar, and that she, with confederates, no doubt, was responsible for her disappearance. Here, signed with her initials, is the very note which was no doubt quietly slipped into her hand at the door and which lured her within their reach."
"In the first place, I may say that I have met, on the whole, with no actual ill-treatment from Mr. and Mrs. Rucastle. It is only fair to them to say that. But I cannot understand them, and I am not easy in my mind about them."
"In the first place, I tell you we have no right to question the
"In the first place, Trunila is not a 'dog,' but a harrier," thought
"In the first place, both my friend and I must spend the night in your room."
"In the meadows... in the meadows!" he heard, accompanied by
"In the seventh place, try, by the frequent thought of death," the
"In this sinister way I came into my inheritance. You will ask me why I did not dispose of it? I answer, because I was well convinced that our troubles were in some way dependent upon an incident in my uncle's life, and that the danger would be as pressing in one house as in another.
"In view of your health, nothing. You are yourself aware that you will soon have to answer for your deed at a higher court than the Assizes. I will keep your confession, and if McCarthy is condemned I shall be forced to use it. If not, it shall never be seen by mortal eye; and your secret, whether you be alive or dead, shall be safe with us."
"Incidental to our tenure in the Philippines," he said, "is the
"Indeed! My mistress told me that you were likely to call. She left this morning with her husband by the 5:15 train from Charing Cross for the Continent."
"Indeed! That is very interesting. And on the morning of the wedding?"
"Indeed! You say that there was a gentleman in the pew. Some of the general public were present, then?"
"Indeed, it is a likely ruse enough," observed Bradstreet thoughtfully. "Of course there can be no doubt as to the nature of this gang."
"Indeed, it seemed unnecessary to put so nice a bell-pull there. You will excuse me for a few minutes while I satisfy myself as to this floor." He threw himself down upon his face with his lens in his hand and crawled swiftly backward and forward, examining minutely the cracks between the boards. Then he did the same with the wood-work with which the chamber was panelled. Finally he walked over to the bed and spent some time in staring at it and in running his eye up and down the wall. Finally he took the bell-rope in his hand and gave it a brisk tug.
"Indeed, your example is an unfortunate one for your argument," said Holmes, taking the paper and glancing his eye down it. "This is the Dundas separation case, and, as it happens, I was engaged in clearing up some small points in connection with it. The husband was a teetotaler, there was no other woman, and the conduct complained of was that he had drifted into the habit of winding up every meal by taking out his false teeth and hurling them at his wife, which, you will allow, is not an action likely to occur to the imagination of the average story-teller. Take a pinch of snuff, Doctor, and acknowledge that I have scored over you in your example."
"India goods." Sugar and molasses, brought from the West Indies,
"Inform the prince and princess that I knew nothing: I acted on
"Inform the prince that I the bridge fired!" said the colonel
"Inform the prince that labor has begun," said Mary Bogdanovna,
"Into the stove... into the fire with it! I tell you once for all,
"Into the vewy chief..." Denisov repeated with a smile.
"Is a tall man, left-handed, limps with the right leg, wears thick-soled shooting-boots and a grey cloak, smokes Indian cigars, uses a cigar-holder, and carries a blunt pen-knife in his pocket. There are several other indications, but these may be enough to aid us in our search."
"Is he tall and with reddish hair?" asked the doctor.
"Is he weaker? Thinner?" asked the princess.
"Is it possible that I--the 'chit of a girl,' as everybody called
"Is it possible that he died in the bitter frame of mind he was then
"Is it possible?" gasped the banker.
"Is my carriage ready?" asked Rostopchin, stepping back from the
"Is such as we might expect. It ran, if I remember right, 'sent the pips to A, B, and C'--that is, sent the society's warning to them. Then there are successive entries that A and B cleared, or left the country, and finally that C was visited, with, I fear, a sinister result for C. Well, I think, Doctor, that we may let some light into this dark place, and I believe that the only chance young Openshaw has in the meantime is to do what I have told him. There is nothing more to be said or to be done to-night, so hand me over my violin and let us try to forget for half an hour the miserable weather and the still more miserable ways of our fellow men."
"Is that you, Clement?" he asked. "Where the devil...?" But, noticing
"Is the Englishman bragging?... Eh? Is it all right?" said Anatole.
"Is the cabman to be discharged, your honor?"
"Is the carriage ready?" he asked again.
"Is the general here?" asked the adjutant on reaching the knoll.
"Is the poor gentleman much hurt?" she asked.
"Is this the way to the princesses' apartments?" asked Anna
"Isn't it fine, eh, Uncle Ignat?" said the boy, suddenly beginning
"Isn't she exquisite?" she said to Pierre, pointing to the stately
"Isn't she too young? I have heard that it harms the voice to
"It all depends on the bringing up," remarked the visitor.
"It appears that his arrest did not take place at once, but after the return to Hatherley Farm. On the inspector of constabulary informing him that he was a prisoner, he remarked that he was not surprised to hear it, and that it was no more than his deserts. This observation of his had the natural effect of removing any traces of doubt which might have remained in the minds of the coroner's jury."
"It can't be helped It happens to everyone!" said the son, with a
"It flew a hair's breadth past my ear," said the adjutant.
"It goes to the housekeeper's room."
"It has been a case of considerable interest," he remarked, returning to his natural manner. "I fancy that this grey house on the right must be the lodge. I think that I will go in and have a word with Moran, and perhaps write a little note. Having done that, we may drive back to our luncheon. You may walk to the cab, and I shall be with you presently."
"It has been in some points a singular case," said Holmes, flicking the horse on into a gallop. "I confess that I have been as blind as a mole, but it is better to learn wisdom late than never to learn it at all."
"It has begun. Here it is!" thought Prince Andrew, feeling the blood
"It is The Morning Chronicle of April 27, 1890. Just two months ago."
"It is a curious thing," remarked Holmes, "that a typewriter has really quite as much individuality as a man's handwriting. Unless they are quite new, no two of them write exactly alike. Some letters get more worn than others, and some wear only on one side. Now, you remark in this note of yours, Mr. Windibank, that in every case there is some little slurring over of the 'e,' and a slight defect in the tail of the 'r.' There are fourteen other characteristics, but those are the more obvious."
"It is a little cold for the time of the year," said Holmes.
"It is a nice household," he murmured. "That is the baboon."
"It is a noiseless lock," said he. "It is no wonder that it did not wake you. This case, I presume, contains the coronet. We must have a look at it." He opened the case, and taking out the diadem he laid it upon the table. It was a magnificent specimen of the jeweller's art, and the thirty-six stones were the finest that I have ever seen. At one side of the coronet was a cracked edge, where a corner holding three gems had been torn away.
"It is a swamp adder!" cried Holmes; "the deadliest snake in India. He has died within ten seconds of being bitten. Violence does, in truth, recoil upon the violent, and the schemer falls into the pit which he digs for another. Let us thrust this creature back into its den, and we can then remove Miss Stoner to some place of shelter and let the county police know what has happened."
"It is a very suitable spot," said the esaul.
"It is an old maxim of mine that when you have excluded the impossible, whatever remains, however improbable, must be the truth. Now, I knew that it was not you who had brought it down, so there only remained your niece and the maids. But if it were the maids, why should your son allow himself to be accused in their place? There could be no possible reason. As he loved his cousin, however, there was an excellent explanation why he should retain her secret--the more so as the secret was a disgraceful one. When I remembered that you had seen her at that window, and how she had fainted on seeing the coronet again, my conjecture became a certainty.
"It is dated from Grosvenor Mansions, written with a quill pen, and the noble lord has had the misfortune to get a smear of ink upon the outer side of his right little finger," remarked Holmes as he folded up the epistle.
"It is done!" she said to the count, pointing triumphantly to the
"It is easy for me to be so, for every event of that dreadful time is seared into my memory. The manor-house is, as I have already said, very old, and only one wing is now inhabited. The bedrooms in this wing are on the ground floor, the sitting-rooms being in the central block of the buildings. Of these bedrooms the first is Dr. Roylott's, the second my sister's, and the third my own. There is no communication between them, but they all open out into the same corridor. Do I make myself plain?"
"It is for me to ask you that," he shrieked, "you thieves! Spies and thieves! I have caught you, have I? You are in my power. I'll serve you!" He turned and clattered down the stairs as hard as he could go.
"It is for the reasson, my goot sir," said he, speaking with a
"It is fortunate, for you will perhaps be able to post me up. I read nothing except the criminal news and the agony column. The latter is always instructive. But if you have followed recent events so closely you must have read about Lord St. Simon and his wedding?"
"It is long since we had the pleasure..." began the countess, but
"It is most unlikely that she carries it about with her. It is cabinet size. Too large for easy concealment about a woman's dress. She knows that the King is capable of having her waylaid and searched. Two attempts of the sort have already been made. We may take it, then, that she does not carry it about with her."
"It is not at all what you suppose; but that is what the German
"It is not cold which makes me shiver," said the woman in a low voice, changing her seat as requested.
"It is not the sugar I want, but only that your little hand should
"It is not too late yet, your Highness--the enemy has not gone away-
"It is not yet nine. The streets will be crowded, so I trust that you may be in safety. And yet you cannot guard yourself too closely."
"It is nothing very formidable," he said, taking a long cigar-shaped roll from his pocket. "It is an ordinary plumber's smoke-rocket, fitted with a cap at either end to make it self-lighting. Your task is confined to that. When you raise your cry of fire, it will be taken up by quite a number of people. You may then walk to the end of the street, and I will rejoin you in ten minutes. I hope that I have made myself clear?"
"It is obvious. And now, you see, I had narrowed the field down considerably. The possession of a grey garment was a third point which, granting the son's statement to be correct, was a certainty. We have come now out of mere vagueness to the definite conception of an Australian from Ballarat with a grey cloak."
"It is our French gold," whispered the director. "We have had several warnings that an attempt might be made upon it."
"It is really two days since you had the letter. We should have acted before this. You have no further evidence, I suppose, than that which you have placed before us--no suggestive detail which might help us?"
"It is really very good of you to come, Watson," said he. "It makes a considerable difference to me, having someone with me on whom I can thoroughly rely. Local aid is always either worthless or else biassed. If you will keep the two corner seats I shall get the tickets."
"It is robbery! You'll answer for it, sir!" said the infantry
"It is said that the Emperor was reluctant to give Kutuzov those
"It is simplicity itself," said he; "my eyes tell me that on the inside of your left shoe, just where the firelight strikes it, the leather is scored by six almost parallel cuts. Obviously they have been caused by someone who has very carelessly scraped round the edges of the sole in order to remove crusted mud from it. Hence, you see, my double deduction that you had been out in vile weather, and that you had a particularly malignant boot-slitting specimen of the London slavey. As to your practice, if a gentleman walks into my rooms smelling of iodoform, with a black mark of nitrate of silver upon his right forefinger, and a bulge on the right side of his top-hat to show where he has secreted his stethoscope, I must be dull, indeed, if I do not pronounce him to be an active member of the medical profession."
"It is some letter of recommendation... what the devil do I want
"It is straight enough. I should like to know who sold you the geese which you supplied to the Alpha."
"It is the Buonapartists who say that," replied the vicomte
"It is the purest accident. I cannot allow that there is any humiliation."
"It is the sword of Frederick the Great which I..." she began, but
"It is unfortunately more than possible; it is certain. Neither you nor your son knew the true character of this man when you admitted him into your family circle. He is one of the most dangerous men in England--a ruined gambler, an absolutely desperate villain, a man without heart or conscience. Your niece knew nothing of such men. When he breathed his vows to her, as he had done to a hundred before her, she flattered herself that she alone had touched his heart. The devil knows best what he said, but at least she became his tool and was in the habit of seeing him nearly every evening."
"It is very good of Lord St. Simon to honour my head by putting it on a level with his own," said Sherlock Holmes, laughing. "I think that I shall have a whisky and soda and a cigar after all this cross-questioning. I had formed my conclusions as to the case before our client came into the room."
"It is very strange, mon Monsieur Prince," said the staff officer.
"It is, I think, much more likely that Henry Baker is an absolutely innocent man, who had no idea that the bird which he was carrying was of considerably more value than if it were made of solid gold. That, however, I shall determine by a very simple test if we have an answer to our advertisement."
"It is, of course, well known to you that in a successful banking business as much depends upon our being able to find remunerative investments for our funds as upon our increasing our connection and the number of our depositors. One of our most lucrative means of laying out money is in the shape of loans, where the security is unimpeachable. We have done a good deal in this direction during the last few years, and there are many noble families to whom we have advanced large sums upon the security of their pictures, libraries, or plate.
"It is, your excellency," replied the adjutant.
"It looks like it," said I ruefully, pointing to a huge bundle in the corner. "I have had nothing else to do."
"It looks newer than the other things?"
"It may be he or it may be nothing," muttered the hussar. "It's
"It may be so, or it may not, Mr. Holmes," said he, "but if you are so very sharp you ought to be sharp enough to know that it is you who are breaking the law now, and not me. I have done nothing actionable from the first, but as long as you keep that door locked you lay yourself open to an action for assault and illegal constraint."
"It may be treachery," said Prince Andrew, vividly imagining the
"It may turn out to be of more interest than you think. You remember that the affair of the blue carbuncle, which appeared to be a mere whim at first, developed into a serious investigation. It may be so in this case, also."
"It means that it is all over," Holmes answered. "And perhaps, after all, it is for the best. Take your pistol, and we will enter Dr. Roylott's room."
"It might have been difficult, but friend Lestrade held information in his hands the value of which he did not himself know. The initials were, of course, of the highest importance, but more valuable still was it to know that within a week he had settled his bill at one of the most select London hotels."
"It must be from their food," said the sergeant major. "They used to
"It must stop here, however," said Bradstreet. "If the police are to hush this thing up, there must be no more of Hugh Boone."
"It saved me from ennui," he answered, yawning. "Alas! I already feel it closing in upon me. My life is spent in one long effort to escape from the commonplaces of existence. These little problems help me to do so."
"It seemed to me that I had never met so fascinating and so thoughtful a man. As I was already in debt to my tradesmen, the advance was a great convenience, and yet there was something unnatural about the whole transaction which made me wish to know a little more before I quite committed myself.
"It seems that even in the next world only the gentry are to have
"It seems to me that I have done you full justice in the matter," I remarked with some coldness, for I was repelled by the egotism which I had more than once observed to be a strong factor in my friend's singular character.
"It von't go begging," replied the German with a smile.
"It was a slight, sir, a public slight," said Lord St. Simon, tapping his fingers upon the table.
"It was all they could do to rescue the poor man," continued the
"It was all-important. When a woman thinks that her house is on fire, her instinct is at once to rush to the thing which she values most. It is a perfectly overpowering impulse, and I have more than once taken advantage of it. In the case of the Darlington Substitution Scandal it was of use to me, and also in the Arnsworth Castle business. A married woman grabs at her baby; an unmarried one reaches for her jewel-box. Now it was clear to me that our lady of to-day had nothing in the house more precious to her than what we are in quest of. She would rush to secure it. The alarm of fire was admirably done. The smoke and shouting were enough to shake nerves of steel. She responded beautifully. The photograph is in a recess behind a sliding panel just above the right bell-pull. She was there in an instant, and I caught a glimpse of it as she half drew it out. When I cried out that it was a false alarm, she replaced it, glanced at the rocket, rushed from the room, and I have not seen her since. I rose, and, making my excuses, escaped from the house. I hesitated whether to attempt to secure the photograph at once; but the coachman had come in, and as he was watching me narrowly, it seemed safer to wait. A little over-precipitance may ruin all."
"It was clamped to the floor. Did you ever see a bed fastened like that before?"
"It was from the reigning family of Holland, though the matter in which I served them was of such delicacy that I cannot confide it even to you, who have been good enough to chronicle one or two of my little problems."
"It was in January, '85, that my poor father met his end, and two years and eight months have elapsed since then. During that time I have lived happily at Horsham, and I had begun to hope that this curse had passed away from the family, and that it had ended with the last generation. I had begun to take comfort too soon, however; yesterday morning the blow fell in the very shape in which it had come upon my father."
"It was in the early '60's at the diggings. I was a young chap then, hot-blooded and reckless, ready to turn my hand at anything; I got among bad companions, took to drink, had no luck with my claim, took to the bush, and in a word became what you would call over here a highway robber. There were six of us, and we had a wild, free life of it, sticking up a station from time to time, or stopping the wagons on the road to the diggings. Black Jack of Ballarat was the name I went under, and our party is still remembered in the colony as the Ballarat Gang.
"It was lost, if I remember aright, at the Hotel Cosmopolitan," I remarked.
"It was most suggestive," said Holmes. "It has long been an axiom of mine that the little things are infinitely the most important. Can you remember any other little things about Mr. Hosmer Angel?"
"It was my fault, mon pere," interceded the little princess, with
"It was naturally my intention that he should succeed me in my business, but he was not of a business turn. He was wild, wayward, and, to speak the truth, I could not trust him in the handling of large sums of money. When he was young he became a member of an aristocratic club, and there, having charming manners, he was soon the intimate of a number of men with long purses and expensive habits. He learned to play heavily at cards and to squander money on the turf, until he had again and again to come to me and implore me to give him an advance upon his allowance, that he might settle his debts of honour. He tried more than once to break away from the dangerous company which he was keeping, but each time the influence of his friend, Sir George Burnwell, was enough to draw him back again.
"It was not the wife; it was the children," groaned the prisoner. "God help me, I would not have them ashamed of their father. My God! What an exposure! What can I do?"
"It was only yesterday that the chance came. I may tell you that, besides Mr. Rucastle, both Toller and his wife find something to do in these deserted rooms, and I once saw him carrying a large black linen bag with him through the door. Recently he has been drinking hard, and yesterday evening he was very drunk; and when I came upstairs there was the key in the door. I have no doubt at all that he had left it there. Mr. and Mrs. Rucastle were both downstairs, and the child was with them, so that I had an admirable opportunity. I turned the key gently in the lock, opened the door, and slipped through.
"It was pitch dark inside the house, and the colonel fumbled about looking for matches and muttering under his breath. Suddenly a door opened at the other end of the passage, and a long, golden bar of light shot out in our direction. It grew broader, and a woman appeared with a lamp in her hand, which she held above her head, pushing her face forward and peering at us. I could see that she was pretty, and from the gloss with which the light shone upon her dark dress I knew that it was a rich material. She spoke a few words in a foreign tongue in a tone as though asking a question, and when my companion answered in a gruff monosyllable she gave such a start that the lamp nearly fell from her hand. Colonel Stark went up to her, whispered something in her ear, and then, pushing her back into the room from whence she had come, he walked towards me again with the lamp in his hand.
"It was the officer, your honor, stained it," answered the
"It was too far for me to go, weak and ill as I was. I determined to wait until I got back to town before telling my story to the police. It was a little past six when I arrived, so I went first to have my wound dressed, and then the doctor was kind enough to bring me along here. I put the case into your hands and shall do exactly what you advise."
"It will very much depend upon the results of my first inquiries. I may have to go down to Horsham, after all."
"It would be good," thought Prince Andrew, glancing at the icon
"It would not be turned off the field even on the Tsaritsin Meadow."
"It's a bad business," said the general without answering him,
"It's a complicated story, you know," said the adjutant. "That
"It's a fraud, lads! Lead the way to him, himself!" shouted the tall
"It's a new patient," he whispered. "I thought I'd bring him round myself; then he couldn't slip away. There he is, all safe and sound. I must go now, Doctor; I have my dooties, just the same as you." And off he went, this trusty tout, without even giving me time to thank him.
"It's all about the war," the count shouted down the table. "You
"It's all clear," he whispered. "Have you the chisel and the bags? Great Scott! Jump, Archie, jump, and I'll swing for it!"
"It's all the fault of these fellows on the staff that there's
"It's all the same now. If the Emperor is wounded, am I to try to
"It's all the same to him," he muttered, turning quickly to a
"It's all the same to me," he said. "I only want to see whether
"It's all very well for you, Ivan Sidorych, to talk," said the first
"It's as if a dam had burst," said the Cossack hopelessly. "Are
"It's as the old men have decided--there's too many of you giving
"It's as well," said the old man; "it's a question whether I shall live to the Assizes, so it matters little to me, but I should wish to spare Alice the shock. And now I will make the thing clear to you; it has been a long time in the acting, but will not take me long to tell.
"It's because Papa wanted to give up all the carts to the
"It's certainly well written," said Tushin, "but that's not the
"It's different on different days," answered the captain. "One day
"It's good, quite good, thank you," said the Frenchman, in French,
"It's here, close by," said she and, running across the yard, opened
"It's in the inlaid portfolio that he keeps under his pillow,"
"It's more than a precious stone. It is the precious stone."
"It's more to the left, why, Little Mytishchi is over there, and
"It's not the soldiers only, but I've seen peasants today, too....
"It's nothing of the kind."
"It's ready, Miss," said the maid, holding up the shortened gauze
"It's shameful, sir!" he said to the adjutant. "What..."
"It's the business of us soldiers. But in a gentleman it's
"It's the enemy?... No!... Yes, see it is!... for certain.... But
"It's time, Count; it's time!" cried the adjutant.
"Jacob, bring a bottle!" shouted the host, a tall, handsome fellow
"John Clay, the murderer, thief, smasher, and forger. He's a young man, Mr. Merryweather, but he is at the head of his profession, and I would rather have my bracelets on him than on any criminal in London. He's a remarkable man, is young John Clay. His grandfather was a royal duke, and he himself has been to Eton and Oxford. His brain is as cunning as his fingers, and though we meet signs of him at every turn, we never know where to find the man himself. He'll crack a crib in Scotland one week, and be raising money to build an orphanage in Cornwall the next. I've been on his track for years and have never set eyes on him yet."
"Just look at the master! A regular eagle he is!" loudly remarked
"Just look up the trains in Bradshaw," said he, and turned back to his chemical studies.
"Just look! See what it's doing now. O Lord! You can even see the
"Just one hint to you, Lestrade," drawled Holmes before his rival vanished; "I will tell you the true solution of the matter. Lady St. Simon is a myth. There is not, and there never has been, any such person."
"Just see, the German sausage is making tracks, too!"
"Just so, just so," repeated the countess, and shaking all over, she
"Just so," said the Cossack.
"Just to flutter the nuns a bit. They say there are Italian girls
"Karay, ulyulyu!..." he shouted, looking round for the old borzoi
"Kill the Germans!" shouted one.
"Killed?" cried Denisov, recognizing from a distance the
"Kindly look her up in my index, Doctor," murmured Holmes without opening his eyes. For many years he had adopted a system of docketing all paragraphs concerning men and things, so that it was difficult to name a subject or a person on which he could not at once furnish information. In this case I found her biography sandwiched in between that of a Hebrew rabbi and that of a staff-commander who had written a monograph upon the deep-sea fishes.
"Kindly return to your posts," said the staff officer trying to
"Kiss the doll," said she.
"Know that if you stir up Prussia against me, I'll wipe it off the
"La balance y est...* A German knows how to skin a flint, as the
"Labor and share alike." All were supposed to work in the fields and
"Lads! here's to our Sovereign, the Emperor, and victory over our
"Lady St. Simon said something about 'jumping a claim.' She was accustomed to use slang of the kind. I have no idea what she meant."
"Lady St. Simon, then, returned from the wedding in a less cheerful frame of mind than she had gone to it. What did she do on re-entering her father's house?"
"Last Monday I had finished for the day and was dressing in my room above the opium den when I looked out of my window and saw, to my horror and astonishment, that my wife was standing in the street, with her eyes fixed full upon me. I gave a cry of surprise, threw up my arms to cover my face, and, rushing to my confidant, the Lascar, entreated him to prevent anyone from coming up to me. I heard her voice downstairs, but I knew that she could not ascend. Swiftly I threw off my clothes, pulled on those of a beggar, and put on my pigments and wig. Even a wife's eyes could not pierce so complete a disguise. But then it occurred to me that there might be a search in the room, and that the clothes might betray me. I threw open the window, reopening by my violence a small cut which I had inflicted upon myself in the bedroom that morning. Then I seized my coat, which was weighted by the coppers which I had just transferred to it from the leather bag in which I carried my takings. I hurled it out of the window, and it disappeared into the Thames. The other clothes would have followed, but at that moment there was a rush of constables up the stair, and a few minutes after I found, rather, I confess, to my relief, that instead of being identified as Mr. Neville St. Clair, I was arrested as his murderer.
"Last Monday Mr. Neville St. Clair went into town rather earlier than usual, remarking before he started that he had two important commissions to perform, and that he would bring his little boy home a box of bricks. Now, by the merest chance, his wife received a telegram upon this same Monday, very shortly after his departure, to the effect that a small parcel of considerable value which she had been expecting was waiting for her at the offices of the Aberdeen Shipping Company. Now, if you are well up in your London, you will know that the office of the company is in Fresno Street, which branches out of Upper Swandam Lane, where you found me to-night. Mrs. St. Clair had her lunch, started for the City, did some shopping, proceeded to the company's office, got her packet, and found herself at exactly 4:35 walking through Swandam Lane on her way back to the station. Have you followed me so far?"
"Last week he hurled the local blacksmith over a parapet into a stream, and it was only by paying over all the money which I could gather together that I was able to avert another public exposure. He had no friends at all save the wandering gipsies, and he would give these vagabonds leave to encamp upon the few acres of bramble-covered land which represent the family estate, and would accept in return the hospitality of their tents, wandering away with them sometimes for weeks on end. He has a passion also for Indian animals, which are sent over to him by a correspondent, and he has at this moment a cheetah and a baboon, which wander freely over his grounds and are feared by the villagers almost as much as their master.
"Lazarev!" the colonel called, with a frown, and Lazarev, the
"Leave me alone, please leave me alone! It is all quite the same
"Leave off talking nonsense," said the countess.
"Let go, I tell you! I will take the responsibility. I myself will
"Let me introduce you," he shouted, "to Mr. Neville St. Clair, of Lee, in the county of Kent."
"Let me see!" said Holmes. "Hum! Born in New Jersey in the year 1858. Contralto--hum! La Scala, hum! Prima donna Imperial Opera of Warsaw--yes! Retired from operatic stage--ha! Living in London--quite so! Your Majesty, as I understand, became entangled with this young person, wrote her some compromising letters, and is now desirous of getting those letters back."
"Let me see," said Holmes, standing at the corner and glancing along the line, "I should like just to remember the order of the houses here. It is a hobby of mine to have an exact knowledge of London. There is Mortimer's, the tobacconist, the little newspaper shop, the Coburg branch of the City and Suburban Bank, the Vegetarian Restaurant, and McFarlane's carriage-building depot. That carries us right on to the other block. And now, Doctor, we've done our work, so it's time we had some play. A sandwich and a cup of coffee, and then off to violin-land, where all is sweetness and delicacy and harmony, and there are no red-headed clients to vex us with their conundrums."
"Let no one know of it!" the Emperor added with a frown.
"Let the bold and insolent Goliath from the borders of France
"Let them have my wardrobe cart," said the countess. "Dunyasha can
"Let us elect only a few men and make them clearly responsible for the
"Let us go and have supper," he said with a sigh, going to the door.
"Let us go, Ivan Lukich," he said to the captain.
"Let us have everything in its due order." Holmes thrust his long thin legs out towards the fire and composed himself to listen.
"Liar, indeed! It's the real truth."
"Liberty and equality," said the vicomte contemptuously, as if at
"Lie down!" cried the adjutant, throwing himself flat on the ground.
"Lie down, darling; lie down, my pet," said the countess, softly
"Lieutenant, he has a dagger," were the first words Pierre
"Like my father?" asked the boy, flushing crimson and looking up
"Lise!" said Prince Andrew dryly, raising his voice to the pitch
"Listen, dear Annette," said the prince, suddenly taking Anna
"Little countess!" the count's voice called from behind the door.
"Long ago," answered Rostov, "I have already been for the hay, and
"Look at Papa!" shouted Natasha to the whole company, and quite
"Look at the stars. It's wonderful how they shine! You would think
"Look at them scurrying! It's burning! Just see the smoke! Fine!
"Look here, Watson," he said when the cloth was cleared "just sit down in this chair and let me preach to you for a little. I don't know quite what to do, and I should value your advice. Light a cigar and let me expound."
"Look out, your soles will fly off!" shouted the red-haired man,
"Look then at thy inner self with the eyes of the spirit, and ask
"Look, his mustache and eyelashes are all white!" said one of the
"Look, look!" said this adjutant, looking not at the troops in the
"Looting continues in the city despite the decrees against it. Order
"Lord God of might, God of our salvation!" began the priest in
"Lord Jesus Christ!" exclaimed the pilgrim woman, crossing
"Lord Robert St. Simon," announced our page-boy, throwing open the door. A gentleman entered, with a pleasant, cultured face, high-nosed and pale, with something perhaps of petulance about the mouth, and with the steady, well-opened eye of a man whose pleasant lot it had ever been to command and to be obeyed. His manner was brisk, and yet his general appearance gave an undue impression of age, for he had a slight forward stoop and a little bend of the knees as he walked. His hair, too, as he swept off his very curly-brimmed hat, was grizzled round the edges and thin upon the top. As to his dress, it was careful to the verge of foppishness, with high collar, black frock-coat, white waistcoat, yellow gloves, patent-leather shoes, and light-coloured gaiters. He advanced slowly into the room, turning his head from left to right, and swinging in his right hand the cord which held his golden eyeglasses.
"MY DEAR MR. SHERLOCK HOLMES,--You really did it very well. You took me in completely. Until after the alarm of fire, I had not a suspicion. But then, when I found how I had betrayed myself, I began to think. I had been warned against you months ago. I had been told that, if the King employed an agent, it would certainly be you. And your address had been given me. Yet, with all this, you made me reveal what you wanted to know. Even after I became suspicious, I found it hard to think evil of such a dear, kind old clergyman. But, you know, I have been trained as an actress myself. Male costume is nothing new to me. I often take advantage of the freedom which it gives. I sent John, the coachman, to watch you, ran upstairs, got into my walking clothes, as I call them, and came down just as you departed.
"Ma chere, there is a time for everything," said the countess with
"Ma foi!" said he, "tomorrow we shall see all that on the
"Makar Alexeevich has the list," answered the assistant. "But if
"Mamma told me to ask you to join the dancers."
"Mamma!" rang out the clear contralto notes of her childish voice,
"Mamma, I don't at all want to," replied Natasha, but all the same
"Mamma, it's impossible: see what is going on in the yard!" she
"Mamma, tell us what happened to you in the barn."
"Marriages are made in heaven," replied the elderly lady.
"Mary, you know the Gosp..." but he broke off.
"Mary," she said, moving away from the embroidery frame and lying
"Marya Lvovna Karagina and her daughter!" announced the countess'
"Mashka's sweet root," because it was the second week that the last of
"Matvevna," the gun from which they had removed the dead officer.
"May the devil take them--the traitors!"
"May the kingdom of Heaven be his! God's will be done to us all!" He
"May the wounded men stay in our house?" she asked.
"Me petition the Empewo'!" exclaimed Denisov, in a voice to which he
"Merci, monsieur,"* said the drummer boy in a trembling almost
"Michael Feoklitych," said he to the esaul, "this is again fwom that
"Michael Ivanovich!" cried the old prince to the architect who, busy
"Mind, the count knows nothing. Behave as if you know nothing
"Missing," it said, "on the morning of the fourteenth, a gentleman named Hosmer Angel. About five ft. seven in. in height; strongly built, sallow complexion, black hair, a little bald in the centre, bushy, black side-whiskers and moustache; tinted glasses, slight infirmity of speech. Was dressed, when last seen, in black frock-coat faced with silk, black waistcoat, gold Albert chain, and grey Harris tweed trousers, with brown gaiters over elastic-sided boots. Known to have been employed in an office in Leadenhall Street. Anybody bringing--"
"Mon Dieu! Mon Dieu! Oh!" she heard as she left the room.
"Monster! Villain!" shouted the woman angrily, suddenly ceasing to
"More than that. It is probable. And now you see the deadly urgency of this new case, and why I urged young Openshaw to caution. The blow has always fallen at the end of the time which it would take the senders to travel the distance. But this one comes from London, and therefore we cannot count upon delay."
"More, please, more!" cried Natasha at the door as soon as the
"Mot d'ordre," repeated the sentinel, barring the way and not
"Mother! The dew is cold but clear.... It's well that I'm a
"Mount!" he commanded in a whisper. The men took their places and
"Mr. Dimmler, please play my favorite nocturne by Field," came the
"Mr. Henry Baker, I believe," said he, rising from his armchair and greeting his visitor with the easy air of geniality which he could so readily assume. "Pray take this chair by the fire, Mr. Baker. It is a cold night, and I observe that your circulation is more adapted for summer than for winter. Ah, Watson, you have just come at the right time. Is that your hat, Mr. Baker?"
"Mr. Hosmer Angel came to the house again and proposed that we should marry before father came back. He was in dreadful earnest and made me swear, with my hands on the Testament, that whatever happened I would always be true to him. Mother said he was quite right to make me swear, and that it was a sign of his passion. Mother was all in his favour from the first and was even fonder of him than I was. Then, when they talked of marrying within the week, I began to ask about father; but they both said never to mind about father, but just to tell him afterwards, and mother said she would make it all right with him. I didn't quite like that, Mr. Holmes. It seemed funny that I should ask his leave, as he was only a few years older than me; but I didn't want to do anything on the sly, so I wrote to father at Bordeaux, where the company has its French offices, but the letter came back to me on the very morning of the wedding."
"Mr. James McCarthy, the only son of the deceased, was then called and gave evidence as follows: 'I had been away from home for three days at Bristol, and had only just returned upon the morning of last Monday, the 3rd. My father was absent from home at the time of my arrival, and I was informed by the maid that he had driven over to Ross with John Cobb, the groom. Shortly after my return I heard the wheels of his trap in the yard, and, looking out of my window, I saw him get out and walk rapidly out of the yard, though I was not aware in which direction he was going. I then took my gun and strolled out in the direction of the Boscombe Pool, with the intention of visiting the rabbit warren which is upon the other side. On my way I saw William Crowder, the game-keeper, as he had stated in his evidence; but he is mistaken in thinking that I was following my father. I had no idea that he was in front of me. When about a hundred yards from the pool I heard a cry of "Cooee!" which was a usual signal between my father and myself. I then hurried forward, and found him standing by the pool. He appeared to be much surprised at seeing me and asked me rather roughly what I was doing there. A conversation ensued which led to high words and almost to blows, for my father was a man of a very violent temper. Seeing that his passion was becoming ungovernable, I left him and returned towards Hatherley Farm. I had not gone more than 150 yards, however, when I heard a hideous outcry behind me, which caused me to run back again. I found my father expiring upon the ground, with his head terribly injured. I dropped my gun and held him in my arms, but he almost instantly expired. I knelt beside him for some minutes, and then made my way to Mr. Turner's lodge-keeper, his house being the nearest, to ask for assistance. I saw no one near my father when I returned, and I have no idea how he came by his injuries. He was not a popular man, being somewhat cold and forbidding in his manners, but he had, as far as I know, no active enemies. I know nothing further of the matter.'
"Mr. John Turner," cried the hotel waiter, opening the door of our sitting-room, and ushering in a visitor.
"Mrs. Rucastle seemed to me to be colourless in mind as well as in feature. She impressed me neither favourably nor the reverse. She was a nonentity. It was easy to see that she was passionately devoted both to her husband and to her little son. Her light grey eyes wandered continually from one to the other, noting every little want and forestalling it if possible. He was kind to her also in his bluff, boisterous fashion, and on the whole they seemed to be a happy couple. And yet she had some secret sorrow, this woman. She would often be lost in deep thought, with the saddest look upon her face. More than once I have surprised her in tears. I have thought sometimes that it was the disposition of her child which weighed upon her mind, for I have never met so utterly spoiled and so ill-natured a little creature. He is small for his age, with a head which is quite disproportionately large. His whole life appears to be spent in an alternation between savage fits of passion and gloomy intervals of sulking. Giving pain to any creature weaker than himself seems to be his one idea of amusement, and he shows quite remarkable talent in planning the capture of mice, little birds, and insects. But I would rather not talk about the creature, Mr. Holmes, and, indeed, he has little to do with my story."
"Mrs. St. Clair had fainted at the sight of the blood upon the window, and she was escorted home in a cab by the police, as her presence could be of no help to them in their investigations. Inspector Barton, who had charge of the case, made a very careful examination of the premises, but without finding anything which threw any light upon the matter. One mistake had been made in not arresting Boone instantly, as he was allowed some few minutes during which he might have communicated with his friend the Lascar, but this fault was soon remedied, and he was seized and searched, without anything being found which could incriminate him. There were, it is true, some blood-stains upon his right shirt-sleeve, but he pointed to his ring-finger, which had been cut near the nail, and explained that the bleeding came from there, adding that he had been to the window not long before, and that the stains which had been observed there came doubtless from the same source. He denied strenuously having ever seen Mr. Neville St. Clair and swore that the presence of the clothes in his room was as much a mystery to him as to the police. As to Mrs. St. Clair's assertion that she had actually seen her husband at the window, he declared that she must have been either mad or dreaming. He was removed, loudly protesting, to the police-station, while the inspector remained upon the premises in the hope that the ebbing tide might afford some fresh clue.
"Murderer!" he shouted suddenly to the publican. "Bind him, lads!"
"My God!" he cried. "Someone has loosed the dog. It's not been fed for two days. Quick, quick, or it'll be too late!"
"My God, how happy I should be if he ordered me to leap into the
"My cabby drove fast. I don't think I ever drove faster, but the others were there before us. The cab and the landau with their steaming horses were in front of the door when I arrived. I paid the man and hurried into the church. There was not a soul there save the two whom I had followed and a surpliced clergyman, who seemed to be expostulating with them. They were all three standing in a knot in front of the altar. I lounged up the side aisle like any other idler who has dropped into a church. Suddenly, to my surprise, the three at the altar faced round to me, and Godfrey Norton came running as hard as he could towards me.
"My commands? Let them go away, that's all.... And let the
"My darling Mummy!" she repeated, straining all the power of her
"My dear Watson, you as a medical man are continually gaining light as to the tendencies of a child by the study of the parents. Don't you see that the converse is equally valid. I have frequently gained my first real insight into the character of parents by studying their children. This child's disposition is abnormally cruel, merely for cruelty's sake, and whether he derives this from his smiling father, as I should suspect, or from his mother, it bodes evil for the poor girl who is in their power."
"My dear doctor, this is a time for observation, not for talk. We are spies in an enemy's country. We know something of Saxe-Coburg Square. Let us now explore the parts which lie behind it."
"My dear fellow, I know you well. I know the military neatness which characterises you. You shave every morning, and in this season you shave by the sunlight; but since your shaving is less and less complete as we get farther back on the left side, until it becomes positively slovenly as we get round the angle of the jaw, it is surely very clear that that side is less illuminated than the other. I could not imagine a man of your habits looking at himself in an equal light and being satisfied with such a result. I only quote this as a trivial example of observation and inference. Therein lies my metier, and it is just possible that it may be of some service in the investigation which lies before us. There are one or two minor points which were brought out in the inquest, and which are worth considering."
"My dear fellow, how are you?" said he through the singing, making
"My dear fellow, is it possible you do not see how strongly it bears upon the case?"
"My dear fellow, there lies the problem. It is true that 'For Mrs. Henry Baker' was printed upon a small card which was tied to the bird's left leg, and it is also true that the initials 'H. B.' are legible upon the lining of this hat, but as there are some thousands of Bakers, and some hundreds of Henry Bakers in this city of ours, it is not easy to restore lost property to any one of them."
"My dear fellow," Nesvitski whispered to Prince Andrew, "the old man
"My dear fellow," said Sherlock Holmes as we sat on either side of the fire in his lodgings at Baker Street, "life is infinitely stranger than anything which the mind of man could invent. We would not dare to conceive the things which are really mere commonplaces of existence. If we could fly out of that window hand in hand, hover over this great city, gently remove the roofs, and peep in at the queer things which are going on, the strange coincidences, the plannings, the cross-purposes, the wonderful chains of events, working through generations, and leading to the most outre results, it would make all fiction with its conventionalities and foreseen conclusions most stale and unprofitable."
"My eye caught the name of Openshaw, and the heading 'Tragedy Near Waterloo Bridge.' Here is the account:
"My face lengthened at this, Mr. Holmes, for I thought that I was not to have the vacancy after all; but after thinking it over for a few minutes he said that it would be all right.
"My friend," said Anna Mikhaylovna in gentle tones, addressing the
"My geese!" The man seemed surprised.
"My last client of the sort was a king."
"My name is Helen Stoner, and I am living with my stepfather, who is the last survivor of one of the oldest Saxon families in England, the Roylotts of Stoke Moran, on the western border of Surrey."
"My name, sir; but you have the advantage of me," said my companion quietly.
"My name," answered our visitor, "is probably familiar to your ears. I am Alexander Holder, of the banking firm of Holder & Stevenson, of Threadneedle Street."
"My name," said he, "is John Openshaw, but my own affairs have, as far as I can understand, little to do with this awful business. It is a hereditary matter; so in order to give you an idea of the facts, I must go back to the commencement of the affair.
"My part is played out," said Prince Andrew. "What's the use of
"My sister had told me some weeks before that I might have the pick of her geese for a Christmas present, and I knew that she was always as good as her word. I would take my goose now, and in it I would carry my stone to Kilburn. There was a little shed in the yard, and behind this I drove one of the birds--a fine big one, white, with a barred tail. I caught it, and prying its bill open, I thrust the stone down its throat as far as my finger could reach. The bird gave a gulp, and I felt the stone pass along its gullet and down into its crop. But the creature flapped and struggled, and out came my sister to know what was the matter. As I turned to speak to her the brute broke loose and fluttered off among the others.
"My uncle Elias emigrated to America when he was a young man and became a planter in Florida, where he was reported to have done very well. At the time of the war he fought in Jackson's army, and afterwards under Hood, where he rose to be a colonel. When Lee laid down his arms my uncle returned to his plantation, where he remained for three or four years. About 1869 or 1870 he came back to Europe and took a small estate in Sussex, near Horsham. He had made a very considerable fortune in the States, and his reason for leaving them was his aversion to the negroes, and his dislike of the Republican policy in extending the franchise to them. He was a singular man, fierce and quick-tempered, very foul-mouthed when he was angry, and of a most retiring disposition. During all the years that he lived at Horsham, I doubt if ever he set foot in the town. He had a garden and two or three fields round his house, and there he would take his exercise, though very often for weeks on end he would never leave his room. He drank a great deal of brandy and smoked very heavily, but he would see no society and did not want any friends, not even his own brother.
"Natasha! Natasha!..." cried the countess. "It's not true... it's
"Natasha! Now it's your turn. Sing me something," they heard the
"Natasha, I love you too much! More than anything in the world."
"Natasha, Natasha!" came Countess Mary's frightened whisper from the
"Natasha, what are you about? Come here!" said the countess.
"Natasha, you would not deceive me? You'll tell me the whole truth?"
"Natasha, you'd better lie in the middle," said Sonya.
"Nay, he was bringing home the goose as a peace-offering to his wife. Remember the card upon the bird's leg."
"Nicholas has the weakness of never agreeing with anything not
"Nicholas! Get up!" Natasha's voice was again heard at the door.
"Nicholas, have you come? Come here, dear!" called the old
"Nicholas, when did you break your cameo?" she asked to change the
"Nikolenka, what is the matter?" Sonya's eyes fixed on him seemed to
"No good... no good..." said the prince rapidly, and thrusting his
"No prisoners!" said he, repeating the aide-de-camp's words. "They
"No talking in the ranks!... No talking, no talking!"
"No! What is there to talk about?" said Pierre. "It's all the
"No, I am used to this," said Petya. "I say, aren't the flints in
"No, I do not think so. I think that there was probably some more tangible cause. And now, Miss Stoner, we must leave you for if Dr. Roylott returned and saw us our journey would be in vain. Good-bye, and be brave, for if you will do what I have told you, you may rest assured that we shall soon drive away the dangers that threaten you."
"No, I don't think you would guess. Every pocket stuffed with pennies and half-pennies--421 pennies and 270 half-pennies. It was no wonder that it had not been swept away by the tide. But a human body is a different matter. There is a fierce eddy between the wharf and the house. It seemed likely enough that the weighted coat had remained when the stripped body had been sucked away into the river."
"No, I have been transferred to the line," said Anatole, hardly able
"No, I must go. My heart is lightened already since I have confided my trouble to you. I shall look forward to seeing you again this afternoon." She dropped her thick black veil over her face and glided from the room.
"No, I shall commence with the City. Just ring the bell and the maid will bring up your coffee."
"No, I think the sale will come off in a few days," said someone.
"No, I went to look at the fire, and they arrested me there, and
"No, I've come on my own," answered Pierre, and he went down the
"No, Mamma, I will lie down here on the floor," Natasha replied
"No, Peter Nikolaevich; I only want to show that in the cavalry
"No, Prince, our regiment has gone to the front, but I am
"No, after dinner," said the old count, evidently expecting much
"No, alone. She was very independent in little matters like that. Then, after we had sat down for ten minutes or so, she rose hurriedly, muttered some words of apology, and left the room. She never came back."
"No, and the general's out too."
"No, but I observe the second half of a return ticket in the palm of your left glove. You must have started early, and yet you had a good drive in a dog-cart, along heavy roads, before you reached the station."
"No, but imagine the old Countess Zubova, with false curls and her
"No, but the enclosure is."
"No, but this horrible man confessed to having been there, and the Lascar was at the foot of the stairs."
"No, don't... the island of Madagascar!" she said, and jumping off
"No, fifty," replied the latter.
"No, he thinks only of himself," muttered the princess without
"No, his friend. He wished us to leave him alone. He is round in the stable lane now."
"No, it can't be helped, lad," said the prince. "They're all like
"No, it is not even attached to a wire. This is very interesting. You can see now that it is fastened to a hook just above where the little opening for the ventilator is."
"No, it is not selfishness or conceit," said he, answering, as was his wont, my thoughts rather than my words. "If I claim full justice for my art, it is because it is an impersonal thing--a thing beyond myself. Crime is common. Logic is rare. Therefore it is upon the logic rather than upon the crime that you should dwell. You have degraded what should have been a course of lectures into a series of tales."
"No, it's only the unexpectedness of it," thought Pierre. But as
"No, it's the chorus from The Water-Carrier, listen!" and Natasha
"No, my dear boy" (the count, too, felt embarrassed. He knew he
"No, my fwiend! The Tugendbund is all vewy well for the sausage
"No, no, he found it. Its owner is unknown. I beg that you will look upon it not as a battered billycock but as an intellectual problem. And, first, as to how it came here. It arrived upon Christmas morning, in company with a good fat goose, which is, I have no doubt, roasting at this moment in front of Peterson's fire. The facts are these: about four o'clock on Christmas morning, Peterson, who, as you know, is a very honest fellow, was returning from some small jollification and was making his way homeward down Tottenham Court Road. In front of him he saw, in the gaslight, a tallish man, walking with a slight stagger, and carrying a white goose slung over his shoulder. As he reached the corner of Goodge Street, a row broke out between this stranger and a little knot of roughs. One of the latter knocked off the man's hat, on which he raised his stick to defend himself and, swinging it over his head, smashed the shop window behind him. Peterson had rushed forward to protect the stranger from his assailants; but the man, shocked at having broken the window, and seeing an official-looking person in uniform rushing towards him, dropped his goose, took to his heels, and vanished amid the labyrinth of small streets which lie at the back of Tottenham Court Road. The roughs had also fled at the appearance of Peterson, so that he was left in possession of the field of battle, and also of the spoils of victory in the shape of this battered hat and a most unimpeachable Christmas goose."
"No, no, my girl, the matter must be probed to the bottom."
"No, no, nothing of the kind. It is perhaps the best possible solution. I trust, Mr. Holder, that you are nearing the end of your troubles."
"No, no, please not... You are Mademoiselle Bourienne," said the
"No, no, the mystery!" I cried.
"No, no," cried Holmes, shoving him back into the chair from which he had half risen. "I really wouldn't miss your case for the world. It is most refreshingly unusual. But there is, if you will excuse my saying so, something just a little funny about it. Pray what steps did you take when you found the card upon the door?"
"No, no. No crime," said Sherlock Holmes, laughing. "Only one of those whimsical little incidents which will happen when you have four million human beings all jostling each other within the space of a few square miles. Amid the action and reaction of so dense a swarm of humanity, every possible combination of events may be expected to take place, and many a little problem will be presented which may be striking and bizarre without being criminal. We have already had experience of such."
"No, no; I call him a gentleman by courtesy, but he was quite a common-looking person. I hardly noticed his appearance. But really I think that we are wandering rather far from the point."
"No, no; the real name," said Holmes sweetly. "It is always awkward doing business with an alias."
"No, on my word it's not obstinacy! I can't describe the feeling.
"No, on the contrary, on the contrary! His face was cheerful, and he
"No, pardon me, I won't go now till the child is better," thought
"No, she has dressed and gone into the drawing room," said Sonya.
"No, she was in her night-dress. In her right hand was found the charred stump of a match, and in her left a match-box."
"No, sir, but the facts might be met speciously enough. Suppose that this man Boone had thrust Neville St. Clair through the window, there is no human eye which could have seen the deed. What would he do then? It would of course instantly strike him that he must get rid of the tell-tale garments. He would seize the coat, then, and be in the act of throwing it out, when it would occur to him that it would swim and not sink. He has little time, for he has heard the scuffle downstairs when the wife tried to force her way up, and perhaps he has already heard from his Lascar confederate that the police are hurrying up the street. There is not an instant to be lost. He rushes to some secret hoard, where he has accumulated the fruits of his beggary, and he stuffs all the coins upon which he can lay his hands into the pockets to make sure of the coat's sinking. He throws it out, and would have done the same with the other garments had not he heard the rush of steps below, and only just had time to close the window when the police appeared."
"No, stop!" said Anatole. "Shut the door; we have first to sit down.
"No, that was not the point. However, I shall write two letters, which should settle the matter. One is to a firm in the City, the other is to the young lady's stepfather, Mr. Windibank, asking him whether he could meet us here at six o'clock to-morrow evening. It is just as well that we should do business with the male relatives. And now, Doctor, we can do nothing until the answers to those letters come, so we may put our little problem upon the shelf for the interim."
"No, the chief point is that to Nicholas ideas and discussions are
"No, the debt is not to me. You owe a very humble apology to that noble lad, your son, who has carried himself in this matter as I should be proud to see my own son do, should I ever chance to have one."
"No, wait, Pierre! The princess is too kind to wish to deprive me of
"No, why disturb the old fellow?" said the countess. "Besides, you
"No," answered Pierre, evidently not considering awkward the meaning
"No. All I say is that it is not argument that convinces me of the
"No. Give me the book," said the stranger.
"No. His orders were to stay in the house."
"No. They were found floating near the margin by a park-keeper. They have been identified as her clothes, and it seemed to me that if the clothes were there the body would not be far off."
"No... Why should it be? On the contrary... But why do you ask me?"
"No; I shall be my own police. When I have spun the web they may take the flies, but not before."
"No; a client. It seems that a young lady has arrived in a considerable state of excitement, who insists upon seeing me. She is waiting now in the sitting-room. Now, when young ladies wander about the metropolis at this hour of the morning, and knock sleepy people up out of their beds, I presume that it is something very pressing which they have to communicate. Should it prove to be an interesting case, you would, I am sure, wish to follow it from the outset. I thought, at any rate, that I should call you and give you the chance."
"No; but one of them was mine all the same," whined the little man.
"None at all," said Holmes. "They are coiners on a large scale, and have used the machine to form the amalgam which has taken the place of silver."
"None of those which come to me are. I am the last court of appeal."
"Nonsense!" he cried, and the veins on his forehead and neck stood
"Nonsense, indeed! I am telling you the fact," said Natasha
"Nonsense, nonsense!" cried the old man, shaking his pigtail to
"Nor from below," said Mr. Merryweather, striking his stick upon the flags which lined the floor. "Why, dear me, it sounds quite hollow!" he remarked, looking up in surprise.
"Not Bonaparte. He is the Emperor! Sacre nom...!" cried he angrily.
"Not at all," rejoined the adjutant in dismay. "Klyucharev had his
"Not at all," replied Nicholas as if offended at the idea. "As
"Not at all. Drink this." I dashed some brandy into the water, and the colour began to come back to his bloodless cheeks.
"Not at all. I am glad to have a friend with whom I can discuss my results. The matter is a perfectly trivial one"--he jerked his thumb in the direction of the old hat--"but there are points in connection with it which are not entirely devoid of interest and even of instruction."
"Not at all. The 'G' with the small 't' stands for 'Gesellschaft,' which is the German for 'Company.' It is a customary contraction like our 'Co.' 'P,' of course, stands for 'Papier.' Now for the 'Eg.' Let us glance at our Continental Gazetteer." He took down a heavy brown volume from his shelves. "Eglow, Eglonitz--here we are, Egria. It is in a German-speaking country--in Bohemia, not far from Carlsbad. 'Remarkable as being the scene of the death of Wallenstein, and for its numerous glass-factories and paper-mills.' Ha, ha, my boy, what do you make of that?" His eyes sparkled, and he sent up a great blue triumphant cloud from his cigarette.
"Not at all. This gentleman, Mr. Wilson, has been my partner and helper in many of my most successful cases, and I have no doubt that he will be of the utmost use to me in yours also."
"Not in the least," replied the vicomte. "After the murder of the
"Not in the least. Is it possible that even now, when I give you these results, you are unable to see how they are attained?"
"Not in the least."
"Not invisible but unnoticed, Watson. You did not know where to look, and so you missed all that was important. I can never bring you to realise the importance of sleeves, the suggestiveness of thumb-nails, or the great issues that may hang from a boot-lace. Now, what did you gather from that woman's appearance? Describe it."
"Not let the wife have him?" said the old man, and laughed.
"Not more stupid than you, madam," said the nine-year-old Petya,
"Not only occupied, but Bonaparte is at Schonbrunn, and the count,
"Not only that, but the signature is typewritten. Look at the neat little 'Hosmer Angel' at the bottom. There is a date, you see, but no superscription except Leadenhall Street, which is rather vague. The point about the signature is very suggestive--in fact, we may call it conclusive."
"Not seen Duport--the famous dancer? Well then, you won't
"Not that either. That puts the court in too bad a light," replied
"Not the Countess of Morcar's blue carbuncle!" I ejaculated.
"Not this way! To the infantry!" added another with loud laughter,
"Nothing new, except that the soldiers are robbing and pillaging-
"Nothing of the sort. Orders are issued for a battle."
"Nothing! What business is it of yours?" muttered the count angrily.
"Nothing," answered the countess. "If everything is ready let us
"Nothing," said he and turned again to the horses.
"Nothing. You mustn't cry here," he said, looking at her with the
"Nous verrons," answered Holmes calmly. "You work your own method, and I shall work mine. I shall be busy this afternoon, and shall probably return to London by the evening train."
"Now I am all right," she said, and asking the vicomte to begin, she
"Now I must disclose to you the chief aim of our Order," he said,
"Now a pawnbroker's business is mostly done of an evening, Mr. Holmes, especially Thursday and Friday evening, which is just before pay-day; so it would suit me very well to earn a little in the mornings. Besides, I knew that my assistant was a good man, and that he would see to anything that turned up.
"Now for Mr. Breckinridge," he continued, buttoning up his coat as we came out into the frosty air. "Remember, Watson that though we have so homely a thing as a goose at one end of this chain, we have at the other a man who will certainly get seven years' penal servitude unless we can establish his innocence. It is possible that our inquiry may but confirm his guilt; but, in any case, we have a line of investigation which has been missed by the police, and which a singular chance has placed in our hands. Let us follow it out to the bitter end. Faces to the south, then, and quick march!"
"Now for the recitation!" said Speranski on returning from his
"Now listen to me. I'm telling you this for the last time. Why
"Now look out for the ball... we'll throw it back."
"Now softly, softly die away!" and the sounds obeyed him. "Now
"Now that's right!" said the one behind joyfully, when he had got
"Now the fun begins," thought Anatole, sitting down with a smile
"Now then! Nearly ready? You're dawdling!" he shouted to the
"Now then, Mr. Cocksure," said the salesman, "I thought that I was out of geese, but before I finish you'll find that there is still one left in my shop. You see this little book?"
"Now then, all together, like bargees!" rose the merry voices of
"Now then, all together--shove!" cried the voices, and the huge
"Now then, catch hold in twos! Hand up the lever! That's it... Where
"Now then, go away and take your monstrosity with you," said the
"Now then, go on, go on!" incited the officer, bending forward and
"Now then, niece!" he exclaimed, waving to Natasha the hand that had
"Now then, what do you want?" asked Napoleon in the tone of a man
"Now thou hast seen the lesser light," uttered a voice. Then the
"Now to tell one's fortune in the empty bathhouse is frightening!"
"Now what does this mean, gentlemen?" said the staff officer, in the
"Now, Mr. Holder," said Holmes, "here is the corner which corresponds to that which has been so unfortunately lost. Might I beg that you will break it off."
"Now, Mr. Holmes, you know the people who live under my roof, and I shall continue with my miserable story.
"Now, Mr. Sherlock Holmes," said the lady as we entered a well-lit dining-room, upon the table of which a cold supper had been laid out, "I should very much like to ask you one or two plain questions, to which I beg that you will give a plain answer."
"Now, Sonya!" she said, going to the very middle of the room,
"Now, Watson," said Holmes, as a tall dog-cart dashed up through the gloom, throwing out two golden tunnels of yellow light from its side lanterns. "You'll come with me, won't you?"
"Now, if you will have the great goodness to open that door very quietly, we will soon make him cut a much more respectable figure."
"Now, it is a fact, gentlemen, as you may see for yourselves, that my hair is of a very full and rich tint, so that it seemed to me that if there was to be any competition in the matter I stood as good a chance as any man that I had ever met. Vincent Spaulding seemed to know so much about it that I thought he might prove useful, so I just ordered him to put up the shutters for the day and to come right away with me. He was very willing to have a holiday, so we shut the business up and started off for the address that was given us in the advertisement.
"Now, my dear sir," said Holmes. "is it not obvious to you now that this matter really strikes very much deeper than either you or the police were at first inclined to think? It appeared to you to be a simple case; to me it seems exceedingly complex. Consider what is involved by your theory. You suppose that your son came down from his bed, went, at great risk, to your dressing-room, opened your bureau, took out your coronet, broke off by main force a small portion of it, went off to some other place, concealed three gems out of the thirty-nine, with such skill that nobody can find them, and then returned with the other thirty-six into the room in which he exposed himself to the greatest danger of being discovered. I ask you now, is such a theory tenable?"
"Now, remember," said Count Orlov-Denisov to the sergeant at
"Now, then, what's the last entry?"
"Now, what is your own impression as to the young lady's--your wife's character?"
"Nowadays old friends are not remembered," the countess would say
"Nowhere," writes Powell, a historian of the West, in his picturesque
"O Lord! Oh, it will be the death of me! O Lord!" moaned the man
"O Lord! The people are like wild beasts! How could he be alive?"
"O Lord, O Lord!" exclaimed the count. "Where is the manifesto?"
"O Lord, O Lord, it's always the same! Oh, where am I to go? What am
"O Lord, have mercy!" added the deacon.
"Of course it is," he answered absently. "That's not the point. I
"Of course, we only just missed one another," said the staff
"Of course, we still have the feathers, legs, crop, and so on of your own bird, so if you wish--"
"Of four hundred thousand who crossed the Vistula," he wrote further
"Oh God, what would happen to me if the Emperor spoke to me?"
"Oh come, that's enough!" said the other.
"Oh dear, what a beast I am!" muttered Rostov, as he read the
"Oh no, not at all too young!" replied the count. "Why, our
"Oh no, not at all! On the contrary, I am very glad to make your
"Oh no, we are good friends with him," said Nicholas in the
"Oh yes, I heard it today," said Shinshin, coming into the
"Oh yes, I understand," said the governor's wife.
"Oh yes, and what do the Masonic brothers say about war? How would
"Oh yes, the war," he said. "No! What sort of warrior should I make?
"Oh yes, very much! My brother knows him, he's dined with him--the
"Oh yes, your plan. To join the hussars? I'll mention it, I'll bring
"Oh! Oh! Oh!" he muttered, looking down from the window at the
"Oh! Oh!" groaned Nesvitski as if in fierce pain, seizing the
"Oh, Anstruther would do your work for you. You have been looking a little pale lately. I think that the change would do you good, and you are always so interested in Mr. Sherlock Holmes' cases."
"Oh, Heaven! How ill he is!" exclaimed the mother.
"Oh, I have heard of that fellow," answered my visitor, "and I should be very glad if he would take the matter up, though of course I must use the official police as well. Would you give me an introduction to him?"
"Oh, I have my hand upon him. He and the two mates, are as I learn, the only native-born Americans in the ship. The others are Finns and Germans. I know, also, that they were all three away from the ship last night. I had it from the stevedore who has been loading their cargo. By the time that their sailing-ship reaches Savannah the mail-boat will have carried this letter, and the cable will have informed the police of Savannah that these three gentlemen are badly wanted here upon a charge of murder."
"Oh, Mamma, how is it you don't understand that the Holy Father, who
"Oh, Mr. Sherlock Holmes!" she cried, glancing from one to the other of us, and finally, with a woman's quick intuition, fastening upon my companion, "I am so glad that you have come. I have driven down to tell you so. I know that James didn't do it. I know it, and I want you to start upon your work knowing it, too. Never let yourself doubt upon that point. We have known each other since we were little children, and I know his faults as no one else does; but he is too tender-hearted to hurt a fly. Such a charge is absurd to anyone who really knows him."
"Oh, Nikita, please go... where can I send him?... Yes, go to the
"Oh, a trusty comrade is always of use; and a chronicler still more so. My room at The Cedars is a double-bedded one."
"Oh, but he had only picked it up to look at it. Oh, do, do take my word for it that he is innocent. Let the matter drop and say no more. It is so dreadful to think of our dear Arthur in prison!"
"Oh, but he was a regular good-for-nothing," said Tikhon. "The
"Oh, dear sir!" she cried, seizing him by the legs. "My
"Oh, do the best you can! Isn't it all the same?" The doctor noticed
"Oh, do you know? While you were talking in the study I was
"Oh, go to the devil!" called out a voice, drowned by the laughter
"Oh, go to the devil, all of you! To the devil, the devil, the
"Oh, he has his faults, too," said Mr. Wilson. "Never was such a fellow for photography. Snapping away with a camera when he ought to be improving his mind, and then diving down into the cellar like a rabbit into its hole to develop his pictures. That is his main fault, but on the whole he's a good worker. There's no vice in him."
"Oh, he is in a dreadful state," said the mother to her son when
"Oh, he's a hard nut to crack," said one of the officers who was
"Oh, he's all right, a good horse," answered Rostov, though the
"Oh, how terrible," said Sonya returning from the yard chilled and
"Oh, if you say so, Mr. Jones, it is all right," said the stranger with deference. "Still, I confess that I miss my rubber. It is the first Saturday night for seven-and-twenty years that I have not had my rubber."
"Oh, in the Globe, Star, Pall Mall, St. James's, Evening News, Standard, Echo, and any others that occur to you."
"Oh, indeed! Then you think that the Serpentine plays no part in the matter?"
"Oh, indeed! You seem to have done the thing very completely. I must compliment you."
"Oh, indeed!" said my friend, blowing blue rings into the air. "You dragged them from the Serpentine?"
"Oh, it is childish. She dropped her bouquet as we went towards the vestry. She was passing the front pew at the time, and it fell over into the pew. There was a moment's delay, but the gentleman in the pew handed it up to her again, and it did not appear to be the worse for the fall. Yet when I spoke to her of the matter, she answered me abruptly; and in the carriage, on our way home, she seemed absurdly agitated over this trifling cause."
"Oh, it is really too late," said Count Orlov, looking at the camp.
"Oh, ja," said the other, "der Zweck ist nur den Feind zu schwachen,
"Oh, leave off!" said the accountant with a beaming but rather
"Oh, little countess!"... and the count began bustling to get out
"Oh, master, what are you saying?" exclaimed the horrified Pelageya,
"Oh, my bower new...!" chimed in twenty voices, and the castanet
"Oh, my enchantress!" she cried to the blushing Natasha.
"Oh, no, Mary Hendrikhovna," replied the officer, "one must look
"Oh, no, no! I want the doctor's advice and help, too. It's about Isa. He has not been home for two days. I am so frightened about him!"
"Oh, no, no!" And besides the pallor and the physical suffering on
"Oh, no, not now. I shall have to tell my tale to the police; but, between ourselves, if it were not for the convincing evidence of this wound of mine, I should be surprised if they believed my statement, for it is a very extraordinary one, and I have not much in the way of proof with which to back it up; and, even if they believe me, the clues which I can give them are so vague that it is a question whether justice will be done."
"Oh, no, sir! He was too good and kind to leave me so. Why, all the morning he was saying to me that, whatever happened, I was to be true; and that even if something quite unforeseen occurred to separate us, I was always to remember that I was pledged to him, and that he would claim his pledge sooner or later. It seemed strange talk for a wedding-morning, but what has happened since gives a meaning to it."
"Oh, no, sir. It is quite separate and was left me by my uncle Ned in Auckland. It is in New Zealand stock, paying 4 1/4 per cent. Two thousand five hundred pounds was the amount, but I can only touch the interest."
"Oh, no," agreed the other.
"Oh, nothing," said he, as if weary of being continually asked the
"Oh, oh, oh! What have they done?" the prisoners on one side and
"Oh, she has turned all the men's heads down in that part. She is the daintiest thing under a bonnet on this planet. So say the Serpentine-mews, to a man. She lives quietly, sings at concerts, drives out at five every day, and returns at seven sharp for dinner. Seldom goes out at other times, except when she sings. Has only one male visitor, but a good deal of him. He is dark, handsome, and dashing, never calls less than once a day, and often twice. He is a Mr. Godfrey Norton, of the Inner Temple. See the advantages of a cabman as a confidant. They had driven him home a dozen times from Serpentine-mews, and knew all about him. When I had listened to all they had to tell, I began to walk up and down near Briony Lodge once more, and to think over my plan of campaign.
"Oh, she nearly knocked our gentleman's hat off!" cried the
"Oh, sir, you are the very man whom I have longed to meet," cried the little fellow with outstretched hands and quivering fingers. "I can hardly explain to you how interested I am in this matter."
"Oh, so so. Nothing to complain of. I have been out to Streatham since I saw you last, but I did not call at the house. It is a very sweet little problem, and I would not have missed it for a good deal. However, I must not sit gossiping here, but must get these disreputable clothes off and return to my highly respectable self."
"Oh, so that is Vereshchagin!" said Pierre, looking at the firm,
"Oh, tell that blockhead," he said in reply to the question from the
"Oh, that count of yours!" said the princess malevolently. "He is
"Oh, that is all the same," Dolgorukov said quickly, and getting
"Oh, that! I thought of the salt that I have been working upon. There was never any mystery in the matter, though, as I said yesterday, some of the details are of interest. The only drawback is that there is no law, I fear, that can touch the scoundrel."
"Oh, the cause is excellent!"
"Oh, the coxcombs!" he muttered reproachfully.
"Oh, the devil!" exclaimed Denisov angrily, and showing his teeth he
"Oh, the faiwy! She can do anything with me!" said Denisov, and he
"Oh, the nasty beasts!" said he with disgust.
"Oh, the old fool," he thought. "That Princess Helene will be
"Oh, then we have three days yet," said Holmes with a yawn. "That is very fortunate, as I have one or two matters of importance to look into just at present. Your Majesty will, of course, stay in London for the present?"
"Oh, those Moscow gossips!" said Dolokhov, and he took up the
"Oh, those damned fellows!" muttered the officer who followed him,
"Oh, those servants!" said the count, swaying his head.
"Oh, to the other side of the West End. It may be some time before I get back. Don't wait up for me in case I should be late."
"Oh, tut, tut! I have no time! That left foot of yours with its inward twist is all over the place. A mole could trace it, and there it vanishes among the reeds. Oh, how simple it would all have been had I been here before they came like a herd of buffalo and wallowed all over it. Here is where the party with the lodge-keeper came, and they have covered all tracks for six or eight feet round the body. But here are three separate tracks of the same feet." He drew out a lens and lay down upon his waterproof to have a better view, talking all the time rather to himself than to us. "These are young McCarthy's feet. Twice he was walking, and once he ran swiftly, so that the soles are deeply marked and the heels hardly visible. That bears out his story. He ran when he saw his father on the ground. Then here are the father's feet as he paced up and down. What is this, then? It is the butt-end of the gun as the son stood listening. And this? Ha, ha! What have we here? Tiptoes! tiptoes! Square, too, quite unusual boots! They come, they go, they come again--of course that was for the cloak. Now where did they come from?" He ran up and down, sometimes losing, sometimes finding the track until we were well within the edge of the wood and under the shadow of a great beech, the largest tree in the neighbourhood. Holmes traced his way to the farther side of this and lay down once more upon his face with a little cry of satisfaction. For a long time he remained there, turning over the leaves and dried sticks, gathering up what seemed to me to be dust into an envelope and examining with his lens not only the ground but even the bark of the tree as far as he could reach. A jagged stone was lying among the moss, and this also he carefully examined and retained. Then he followed a pathway through the wood until he came to the highroad, where all traces were lost.
"Oh, vile and heartless brood!" he exclaimed, and left the room.
"Oh, we shall soon clear up all that," said Bradstreet. "Well, I have drawn my circle, and I only wish I knew at what point upon it the folk that we are in search of are to be found."
"Oh, well, well!" remarked the regimental commander. "Still, one
"Oh, what sleep-?" said the countess, waking up just as she was
"Oh, women, women!" and the captain, looking with glistening eyes at
"Oh, yes! he is the green-grocer who brings our vegetables round. His name is Francis Prosper."
"Oh, yes, I did. You remember in her statement she said that her sister could smell Dr. Roylott's cigar. Now, of course that suggested at once that there must be a communication between the two rooms. It could only be a small one, or it would have been remarked upon at the coroner's inquiry. I deduced a ventilator."
"Oh, yes, I know that I have treated you real bad and that I should have spoken to you before I went; but I was kind of rattled, and from the time when I saw Frank here again I just didn't know what I was doing or saying. I only wonder I didn't fall down and do a faint right there before the altar."
"Oh, yes, Mr. Holmes. We were engaged after the first walk that we took. Hosmer--Mr. Angel--was a cashier in an office in Leadenhall Street--and--"
"Oh, yes, master, I was found worthy. Such a brightness on the
"Oh, yes, mother is alive and well. I wasn't best pleased, Mr. Holmes, when she married again so soon after father's death, and a man who was nearly fifteen years younger than herself. Father was a plumber in the Tottenham Court Road, and he left a tidy business behind him, which mother carried on with Mr. Hardy, the foreman; but when Mr. Windibank came he made her sell the business, for he was very superior, being a traveller in wines. They got $4700 for the goodwill and interest, which wasn't near as much as father could have got if he had been alive."
"Oh, yes, with the deepest interest."
"Oh, yes, yes!" replied the commander in chief. "How is he?..."
"Oh, yes, yes, yes!" said the count hastily. "I shall be very
"Oh, yes, you can. This is my point." He placed his finger in the centre of the circle. "This is where we shall find them."
"Oh, yes," said Petya, nodding at the first words Denisov uttered as
"Oh, yes. It is impossible to exclude them when the church is open."
"Oh, yes; plenty. Then there is another note in the Morning Post to say that the marriage would be an absolutely quiet one, that it would be at St. George's, Hanover Square, that only half a dozen intimate friends would be invited, and that the party would return to the furnished house at Lancaster Gate which has been taken by Mr. Aloysius Doran. Two days later--that is, on Wednesday last--there is a curt announcement that the wedding had taken place, and that the honeymoon would be passed at Lord Backwater's place, near Petersfield. Those are all the notices which appeared before the disappearance of the bride."
"Oh, you fool!" said the old man, spitting angrily. Some time passed
"Oh, you may carry that feeling away with you. I assure you that your little problem promises to be the most interesting which has come my way for some months. There is something distinctly novel about some of the features. If you should find yourself in doubt or in danger--"
"Oh, you mean the little problem of the Grosvenor Square furniture van. That is quite cleared up now--though, indeed, it was obvious from the first. Pray give me the results of your newspaper selections."
"Oh, you must not discourage me, Mr. Holmes. I know that all is well with him. There is so keen a sympathy between us that I should know if evil came upon him. On the very day that I saw him last he cut himself in the bedroom, and yet I in the dining-room rushed upstairs instantly with the utmost certainty that something had happened. Do you think that I would respond to such a trifle and yet be ignorant of his death?"
"Oh, your excellency!" said Franz, with difficulty rolling the
"On June 3rd, that is, on Monday last, McCarthy left his house at Hatherley about three in the afternoon and walked down to the Boscombe Pool, which is a small lake formed by the spreading out of the stream which runs down the Boscombe Valley. He had been out with his serving-man in the morning at Ross, and he had told the man that he must hurry, as he had an appointment of importance to keep at three. From that appointment he never came back alive.
"On entering the house, however, I examined, as you remember, the sill and framework of the hall window with my lens, and I could at once see that someone had passed out. I could distinguish the outline of an instep where the wet foot had been placed in coming in. I was then beginning to be able to form an opinion as to what had occurred. A man had waited outside the window; someone had brought the gems; the deed had been overseen by your son; he had pursued the thief; had struggled with him; they had each tugged at the coronet, their united strength causing injuries which neither alone could have effected. He had returned with the prize, but had left a fragment in the grasp of his opponent. So far I was clear. The question now was, who was the man and who was it brought him the coronet?
"On that day I always go to pay my devotions to the relics of Prince
"On the 4th, the first courier arrives from Petersburg. The mails
"On the box. You'll sit on the box, won't you, Petya?" cried
"On the contrary it's very interesting!" replied Pierre not quite
"On the contrary, I will do what I can. Only I thought..."
"On the contrary, Watson, you can see everything. You fail, however, to reason from what you see. You are too timid in drawing your inferences."
"On the contrary, Your Majesty," said Balashev, hardly able to
"On the contrary, but what dignity? A princess!" he whispered to
"On the contrary, my dear sir," cried the King; "nothing could be more successful. I know that her word is inviolate. The photograph is now as safe as if it were in the fire."
"On the contrary, that coiffure suits the princess very well,"
"On the contrary, things seem satisfactory, ma cousine," said Pierre
"On the contrary, this is the right side."
"On the contrary, your Highness, in indecisive actions it is
"On the contrary, your statement is singularly lucid."
"On the contrary," he said, in a querulous and angry tone that
"On the contrary," replied the prince, who had plainly become
"On the contrary," said Holmes quietly; "I have every reason to believe that I will succeed in discovering Mr. Hosmer Angel."
"On the contrary," said Holmes, "it is the brightest rift which I can at present see in the clouds. However innocent he might be, he could not be such an absolute imbecile as not to see that the circumstances were very black against him. Had he appeared surprised at his own arrest, or feigned indignation at it, I should have looked upon it as highly suspicious, because such surprise or anger would not be natural under the circumstances, and yet might appear to be the best policy to a scheming man. His frank acceptance of the situation marks him as either an innocent man, or else as a man of considerable self-restraint and firmness. As to his remark about his deserts, it was also not unnatural if you consider that he stood beside the dead body of his father, and that there is no doubt that he had that very day so far forgotten his filial duty as to bandy words with him, and even, according to the little girl whose evidence is so important, to raise his hand as if to strike him. The self-reproach and contrition which are displayed in his remark appear to me to be the signs of a healthy mind rather than of a guilty one."
"On the feeling that is in me and in him," he pointed to Timokhin,
"On the same business. But you are damp! Let me wring you out!"
"On the third day after the coming of the letter my father went from home to visit an old friend of his, Major Freebody, who is in command of one of the forts upon Portsdown Hill. I was glad that he should go, for it seemed to me that he was farther from danger when he was away from home. In that, however, I was in error. Upon the second day of his absence I received a telegram from the major, imploring me to come at once. My father had fallen over one of the deep chalk-pits which abound in the neighbourhood, and was lying senseless, with a shattered skull. I hurried to him, but he passed away without having ever recovered his consciousness. He had, as it appears, been returning from Fareham in the twilight, and as the country was unknown to him, and the chalk-pit unfenced, the jury had no hesitation in bringing in a verdict of 'death from accidental causes.' Carefully as I examined every fact connected with his death, I was unable to find anything which could suggest the idea of murder. There were no signs of violence, no footmarks, no robbery, no record of strangers having been seen upon the roads. And yet I need not tell you that my mind was far from at ease, and that I was well-nigh certain that some foul plot had been woven round him.
"Once again, Colonel," said the general, "I can't leave half my
"One can see them with the naked eye... Why, there!"
"One can't write so fast, your honor," said the clerk, glancing
"One day a gold convoy came down from Ballarat to Melbourne, and we lay in wait for it and attacked it. There were six troopers and six of us, so it was a close thing, but we emptied four of their saddles at the first volley. Three of our boys were killed, however, before we got the swag. I put my pistol to the head of the wagon-driver, who was this very man McCarthy. I wish to the Lord that I had shot him then, but I spared him, though I saw his wicked little eyes fixed on my face, as though to remember every feature. We got away with the gold, became wealthy men, and made our way over to England without being suspected. There I parted from my old pals and determined to settle down to a quiet and respectable life. I bought this estate, which chanced to be in the market, and I set myself to do a little good with my money, to make up for the way in which I had earned it. I married, too, and though my wife died young she left me my dear little Alice. Even when she was just a baby her wee hand seemed to lead me down the right path as nothing else had ever done. In a word, I turned over a new leaf and did my best to make up for the past. All was going well when McCarthy laid his grip upon me.
"One day--it was in March, 1883--a letter with a foreign stamp lay upon the table in front of the colonel's plate. It was not a common thing for him to receive letters, for his bills were all paid in ready money, and he had no friends of any sort. 'From India!' said he as he took it up, 'Pondicherry postmark! What can this be?' Opening it hurriedly, out there jumped five little dried orange pips, which pattered down upon his plate. I began to laugh at this, but the laugh was struck from my lips at the sight of his face. His lip had fallen, his eyes were protruding, his skin the colour of putty, and he glared at the envelope which he still held in his trembling hand, 'K. K. K.!' he shrieked, and then, 'My God, my God, my sins have overtaken me!'
"One moment, one moment!" replied the adjutant, and riding up to a
"One moment," Holmes interposed, "your statement is, I foresee, one of the most remarkable to which I have ever listened. Let me have the date of the reception by your uncle of the letter, and the date of his supposed suicide."
"One more question. How did your mother take the matter?"
"One of the highest in England."
"One should make up to the husbands of pretty women," said Denisov.
"One step beyond that boundary line which resembles the line
"One tallow stain, or even two, might come by chance; but when I see no less than five, I think that there can be little doubt that the individual must be brought into frequent contact with burning tallow--walks upstairs at night probably with his hat in one hand and a guttering candle in the other. Anyhow, he never got tallow-stains from a gas-jet. Are you satisfied?"
"One was damaged," answered the staff officer, "and the other I
"One!" came the command.
"Only don't blame me!" the doctor shouted up after him.
"Only fancy!" answered Ignat, surprised at the broadening grin on
"Only one little item in another of the morning papers, but it is a suggestive one."
"Only our holy brotherhood has the real meaning of life, all the
"Only, for Christ's sake..." the girl went on, as Natasha, without
"Onterkoff," said the captain and looked at Pierre for some
"Oo-oo, my beauty!" exclaimed the count, "she looks better than
"Ooh!" wailed the girl, pointing to the wing. "That's it, that was
"Ooh, ooh, ooh!" grunted the Tartar, and suddenly lifting up his
"Oooh! For Christ's sake let me alone!" cried the wounded man, but
"Or rather, I fancy, of that goose. It was one bird, I imagine in which you were interested--white, with a black bar across the tail."
"Other territories have been offered in exchange for the Duchy of
"Ou-rou-rou!" yelled the crowd, echoing the crash of the
"Our position?" replied the officer with a smile of satisfaction. "I
"Our quest is practically finished. I shall call with the King to-morrow, and with you, if you care to come with us. We will be shown into the sitting-room to wait for the lady, but it is probable that when she comes she may find neither us nor the photograph. It might be a satisfaction to his Majesty to regain it with his own hands."
"Our sovereign the Emperor will be here in a moment," said
"Owe!" He caught up a pen. "Name the sum, and I will pay it."
"Owing to the present state of things Sophia Danilovna has gone to
"Ozheg-zheg, Ozheg-zheg..." hissed the saber against the
"Papa! Here's Berg coming to see us," said she, looking out of the
"Papa, is it all right--I've invited some of the wounded into the
"Papa," said his beautiful daughter in the same tone as before,
"Pardon me! A snuffbox with the Emperor's portrait is a reward but
"Paris--the capital of the world," Pierre finished his remark for
"Pass on, pass on!" the captain reiterated, frowning sternly, and
"Patrons of Husbandry," which was destined to play a large role in the
"Peculiar--that is the very word," said Holmes. "It is not an English paper at all. Hold it up to the light."
"Pending the alterations, as I understand. By the way, there does not seem to be any very pressing need for repairs at that end wall."
"People are being arrested..." said the count. "I've told the
"Perhaps it's the state of affairs?"
"Perhaps the count did not ask for me," said Pierre when he
"Perhaps the heart took no part in that speech," said Anna Pavlovna.
"Perhaps you had better not speak of the matter. It is evidently trying to your nerves."
"Perhaps, Mrs. Moulton, you would like my friend and me to leave the room while you explain this matter?"
"Petrusha has come with papers from your father," whispered the
"Petya! Be quiet, I tell you!" cried the count, with a glance at his
"Pick him up, lift him, it's all the same!" cried someone.
"Piti-piti-piti and ti-ti and piti-piti-piti boom!" flopped the
"Plain Vanilla ASCII" or other format used in the official version
"Plain Vanilla ASCII" or other format used in the official version
"Platoche! Eh, Platoche! Keep them yourself!" And handing back the
"Plea..." began Dolokhov, but could not at first pronounce the word.
"Please be at the Black Swan Hotel at Winchester at midday to-morrow," it said. "Do come! I am at my wit's end.
"Please come in here. The masters are going away and the whole house
"Please come to tea. The prince will be out in a moment," came the
"Please come, Princess... The Prince," said Dunyasha in a breaking
"Please step into the gallery, your excellency," said the
"Please, Miss!" whispered a maid entering the room with a mysterious
"Plenty of time, your excellency," muttered Kutuzov in the midst
"Pray sit down on the sofa," said Holmes gently. "You had my note?"
"Pray take a seat," said Holmes. "This is my friend and colleague, Dr. Watson, who is occasionally good enough to help me in my cases. Whom have I the honour to address?"
"Precisely so, on December 22nd, just five days ago. John Horner, a plumber, was accused of having abstracted it from the lady's jewel-case. The evidence against him was so strong that the case has been referred to the Assizes. I have some account of the matter here, I believe." He rummaged amid his newspapers, glancing over the dates, until at last he smoothed one out, doubled it over, and read the following paragraph:
"Precisely so. Head attendant at the Hotel Cosmopolitan. Pray step into the cab, and I shall soon be able to tell you everything which you would wish to know."
"Precisely so. I ought to know its size and shape, seeing that I have read the advertisement about it in The Times every day lately. It is absolutely unique, and its value can only be conjectured, but the reward offered of $1000 is certainly not within a twentieth part of the market price."
"Precisely. And if it were guilty, why did he not invent a lie? His silence appears to me to cut both ways. There are several singular points about the case. What did the police think of the noise which awoke you from your sleep?"
"Precisely. And the man who wrote the note is a German. Do you note the peculiar construction of the sentence--'This account of you we have from all quarters received.' A Frenchman or Russian could not have written that. It is the German who is so uncourteous to his verbs. It only remains, therefore, to discover what is wanted by this German who writes upon Bohemian paper and prefers wearing a mask to showing his face. And here he comes, if I am not mistaken, to resolve all our doubts."
"Precisely. It was I. I found that I had my man, so I came home and changed my clothes. It was a delicate part which I had to play then, for I saw that a prosecution must be avoided to avert scandal, and I knew that so astute a villain would see that our hands were tied in the matter. I went and saw him. At first, of course, he denied everything. But when I gave him every particular that had occurred, he tried to bluster and took down a life-preserver from the wall. I knew my man, however, and I clapped a pistol to his head before he could strike. Then he became a little more reasonable. I told him that we would give him a price for the stones he held--$1000 apiece. That brought out the first signs of grief that he had shown. 'Why, dash it all!' said he, 'I've let them go at six hundred for the three!' I soon managed to get the address of the receiver who had them, on promising him that there would be no prosecution. Off I set to him, and after much chaffering I got our stones at $1000 apiece. Then I looked in upon your son, told him that all was right, and eventually got to my bed about two o'clock, after what I may call a really hard day's work."
"Precisely. You allude to my attempt to recover the Irene Adler papers, to the singular case of Miss Mary Sutherland, and to the adventure of the man with the twisted lip. Well, I have no doubt that this small matter will fall into the same innocent category. You know Peterson, the commissionaire?"
"Prince Auersperg is on this, on our side of the river, and is
"Prince Hippolyte Kuragin, M. Krug, the charge d'affaires from 
"Prince, humanum est errare,* but..." replied the doctor, swallowing
"Princess, my dear, there's someone driving up the avenue!" she
"Probably," said Prince Andrew moving toward the outer door.
"Pshaw, my dear fellow, what do the public, the great unobservant public, who could hardly tell a weaver by his tooth or a compositor by his left thumb, care about the finer shades of analysis and deduction! But, indeed, if you are trivial. I cannot blame you, for the days of the great cases are past. Man, or at least criminal man, has lost all enterprise and originality. As to my own little practice, it seems to be degenerating into an agency for recovering lost lead pencils and giving advice to young ladies from boarding-schools. I think that I have touched bottom at last, however. This note I had this morning marks my zero-point, I fancy. Read it!" He tossed a crumpled letter across to me.
"Put that down, that's bad... very bad," sternly remarked the
"Quartier, quartier, logement!" said the officer, looking down at
"Qui s'excuse s'accuse,"* said Julie, smiling and waving the lint
"Quite an interesting study, that maiden," he observed. "I found her more interesting than her little problem, which, by the way, is rather a trite one. You will find parallel cases, if you consult my index, in Andover in '77, and there was something of the sort at The Hague last year. Old as is the idea, however, there were one or two details which were new to me. But the maiden herself was most instructive."
"Quite avare, your excellency," suddenly shouted the colonel,
"Quite different and yet the same," thought Nicholas, looking at her
"Quite right," said the Englishman.
"Quite so! You have not observed. And yet you have seen. That is just my point. Now, I know that there are seventeen steps, because I have both seen and observed. By the way, since you are interested in these little problems, and since you are good enough to chronicle one or two of my trifling experiences, you may be interested in this." He threw over a sheet of thick, pink-tinted notepaper which had been lying open upon the table. "It came by the last post," said he. "Read it aloud."
"Quite so," he answered, lighting a cigarette, and throwing himself down into an armchair. "You see, but you do not observe. The distinction is clear. For example, you have frequently seen the steps which lead up from the hall to this room."
"Quite so. Now turn that up in the ledger."
"Quite so. That was the word the man uttered, and of which his son only caught the last two syllables. He was trying to utter the name of his murderer. So and so, of Ballarat."
"Quite so; at the gold-mines, where, as I understand, Mr. Turner made his money."
"Quite so; but the sequel was rather unusual. I will tell you, however. I left the house a little after eight o'clock this morning in the character of a groom out of work. There is a wonderful sympathy and freemasonry among horsey men. Be one of them, and you will know all that there is to know. I soon found Briony Lodge. It is a bijou villa, with a garden at the back, but built out in front right up to the road, two stories. Chubb lock to the door. Large sitting-room on the right side, well furnished, with long windows almost to the floor, and those preposterous English window fasteners which a child could open. Behind there was nothing remarkable, save that the passage window could be reached from the top of the coach-house. I walked round it and examined it closely from every point of view, but without noting anything else of interest.
"Quite well? All right then, sit down." He took the exercise book
"Read this if you like, Father," said the princess, blushing still
"Ready, your Serene Highness," replied the general.
"Really! Does it not strike you as a little singular that this McCarthy, who appears to have had little of his own, and to have been under such obligations to Turner, should still talk of marrying his son to Turner's daughter, who is, presumably, heiress to the estate, and that in such a very cocksure manner, as if it were merely a case of a proposal and all else would follow? It is the more strange, since we know that Turner himself was averse to the idea. The daughter told us as much. Do you not deduce something from that?"
"Really, I don't yet know. I don't like either the one or the
"Really, Mr. Holmes," said Mr. Merryweather as we followed them from the cellar, "I do not know how the bank can thank you or repay you. There is no doubt that you have detected and defeated in the most complete manner one of the most determined attempts at bank robbery that have ever come within my experience."
"Really, now!" cried the inspector, "you have formed your opinion! Come, now, we shall see who agrees with you. I say it is south, for the country is more deserted there."
"Reannexation of Texas," based on claims which the United States once
"Remember that you will answer for the consequences," said Prince
"Republican"; the term "Democrat," then applied only to obscure and
"Robber!... Ungrateful wretch!... I'll hack the dog to pieces! I'm
"Rousseau's Contrat social," said the vicomte with a tolerant smile.
"Routed up the earth like a pig," said another.
"Rugay, here's a pad for you!" he said, throwing down the hare's
"Run to the reserves and bring up the ammunition boxes!" he
"Russia is done for!" he cried. "Alpatych, I'll set the place on
"Saber him!" the dragoon officer almost whispered.
"Sarasate plays at the St. James's Hall this afternoon," he remarked. "What do you think, Watson? Could your patients spare you for a few hours?"
"Save, perhaps, the Sign of Four."
"Schon fleissig?"* said Rostov with the same gay brotherly smile
"Schubert, the colonel of the Pavlograd Hussars, is dining with us
"Scoundrel, what are you doing?" shouted the innkeeper, rushing to
"Scoundrels! Blackguards!" shrieked the old man, turning his face
"See here, sir! See what my wife found in its crop!" He held out his hand and displayed upon the centre of the palm a brilliantly scintillating blue stone, rather smaller than a bean in size, but of such purity and radiance that it twinkled like an electric point in the dark hollow of his hand.
"See how smart she's made herself! Oh, the devils!"
"See that you keep yourself out of my grip," he snarled, and hurling the twisted poker into the fireplace he strode out of the room.
"See where we've met again!" said the little man. "Tushin, Tushin,
"See, it fits well!" Platon kept repeating, pulling the shirt
"Seeing that my client was anxious to leave, I said no more but, calling for my cashier, I ordered him to pay over fifty $1000 notes. When I was alone once more, however, with the precious case lying upon the table in front of me, I could not but think with some misgivings of the immense responsibility which it entailed upon me. There could be no doubt that, as it was a national possession, a horrible scandal would ensue if any misfortune should occur to it. I already regretted having ever consented to take charge of it. However, it was too late to alter the matter now, so I locked it up in my private safe and turned once more to my work.
"Sell me the missis," said another soldier, addressing the German,
"Sell us that horse!" Denisov called out to the Cossacks.
"Semen! Do you know the Daniel Cooper?"
"Sergey Kuzmich--From all sides-" he said, unbuttoning the top
"Shall I call up our men from beyond the hill?" he called out.
"Shall I join the army and enter the service, or wait?" he asked
"Shall I loose them or not?" Nicholas asked himself as the wolf
"Shall we have three cold dishes then?" asked the cook.
"Sharpshooters of the 86th, forward!" shouted someone. The fifth
"She died just two years ago, and it is of her death that I wish to speak to you. You can understand that, living the life which I have described, we were little likely to see anyone of our own age and position. We had, however, an aunt, my mother's maiden sister, Miss Honoria Westphail, who lives near Harrow, and we were occasionally allowed to pay short visits at this lady's house. Julia went there at Christmas two years ago, and met there a half-pay major of marines, to whom she became engaged. My stepfather learned of the engagement when my sister returned and offered no objection to the marriage; but within a fortnight of the day which had been fixed for the wedding, the terrible event occurred which has deprived me of my only companion."
"She has come to stay with me," said Princess Mary. "The count and
"She let the hawk fly upward from her wide right sleeve," went the
"She said... Oh yes! She said, 'Girl,' to the maid, 'put on a
"She walked into the breakfast-room."
"She was angry, and said that I was never to speak of the matter again."
"She was as bright as possible--at least until after the ceremony."
"She was never happy at home, Miss Alice wasn't, from the time that her father married again. She was slighted like and had no say in anything, but it never really became bad for her until after she met Mr. Fowler at a friend's house. As well as I could learn, Miss Alice had rights of her own by will, but she was so quiet and patient, she was, that she never said a word about them but just left everything in Mr. Rucastle's hands. He knew he was safe with her; but when there was a chance of a husband coming forward, who would ask for all that the law would give him, then her father thought it time to put a stop on it. He wanted her to sign a paper, so that whether she married or not, he could use her money. When she wouldn't do it, he kept on worrying her until she got brain-fever, and for six weeks was at death's door. Then she got better at last, all worn to a shadow, and with her beautiful hair cut off; but that didn't make no change in her young man, and he stuck to her as true as man could be."
"She was so tired that she has fallen asleep on the sofa in my room.
"She went. Suddenly there was a great wind. The girl lost her hat
"She will go to the country."
"She will not be able to. But I hear the rumble of wheels. It is her carriage. Now carry out my orders to the letter."
"She's much thinner, but all the same she's pretty!"
"Shelter?" Pierre repeated. "The German for shelter is Unterkunft."
"Short and energetic!" he remarked when he had read over the
"Show me the way, show me, I... I'll do it," gasped Pierre rapidly.
"Showing that she had struck a light and looked about her when the alarm took place. That is important. And what conclusions did the coroner come to?"
"Shut up!" cried Dolokhov, pushing him away from the window. The lad
"Since the day of our brilliant success at Austerlitz," wrote
"Singers to the front " came the captain's order.
"Sire! The Emperor, my master..." but the sight of the Emperor's
"Sire!" said he, "Your Majesty is at this moment signing the glory
"Sire, I ask your permission to present the Legion of Honor to the
"Sire, I expected nothing less than to find you at the gates of
"Sire, the prince..." began the adjutant.
"Sire?" asked the adjutant who had not heard the remark.
"Sit down with me a little," said the countess.
"Six out and six back. Nothing simpler. You say yourself that the horse was fresh and glossy when you got in. How could it be that if it had gone twelve miles over heavy roads?"
"Smack at 'em, lads!" he kept saying, seizing the guns by the wheels
"Smart fellow, that," observed Holmes as we walked away. "He is, in my judgment, the fourth smartest man in London, and for daring I am not sure that he has not a claim to be third. I have known something of him before."
"Smart, that!" said the esaul.
"Smolensk is being abandoned. Bald Hills will be occupied by the
"So I can fire when I like!" said Pierre, and at the word "three,"
"So I come, master, and the people say to me: 'A great blessing
"So I see," the other answered with the utmost coolness. "I fancy that my pal is all right, though I see you have got his coat-tails."
"So far I had got when we went to visit the scene of action. I surprised you by beating upon the pavement with my stick. I was ascertaining whether the cellar stretched out in front or behind. It was not in front. Then I rang the bell, and, as I hoped, the assistant answered it. We have had some skirmishes, but we had never set eyes upon each other before. I hardly looked at his face. His knees were what I wished to see. You must yourself have remarked how worn, wrinkled, and stained they were. They spoke of those hours of burrowing. The only remaining point was what they were burrowing for. I walked round the corner, saw the City and Suburban Bank abutted on our friend's premises, and felt that I had solved my problem. When you drove home after the concert I called upon Scotland Yard and upon the chairman of the bank directors, with the result that you have seen."
"So much for Mr. Henry Baker," said Holmes when he had closed the door behind him. "It is quite certain that he knows nothing whatever about the matter. Are you hungry, Watson?"
"So much for the Lascar manager. Now for the sinister cripple who lives upon the second floor of the opium den, and who was certainly the last human being whose eyes rested upon Neville St. Clair. His name is Hugh Boone, and his hideous face is one which is familiar to every man who goes much to the City. He is a professional beggar, though in order to avoid the police regulations he pretends to a small trade in wax vestas. Some little distance down Threadneedle Street, upon the left-hand side, there is, as you may have remarked, a small angle in the wall. Here it is that this creature takes his daily seat, cross-legged with his tiny stock of matches on his lap, and as he is a piteous spectacle a small rain of charity descends into the greasy leather cap which lies upon the pavement beside him. I have watched the fellow more than once before ever I thought of making his professional acquaintance, and I have been surprised at the harvest which he has reaped in a short time. His appearance, you see, is so remarkable that no one can pass him without observing him. A shock of orange hair, a pale face disfigured by a horrible scar, which, by its contraction, has turned up the outer edge of his upper lip, a bulldog chin, and a pair of very penetrating dark eyes, which present a singular contrast to the colour of his hair, all mark him out from amid the common crowd of mendicants and so, too, does his wit, for he is ever ready with a reply to any piece of chaff which may be thrown at him by the passers-by. This is the man whom we now learn to have been the lodger at the opium den, and to have been the last man to see the gentleman of whom we are in quest."
"So much for the servants. My family itself is so small that it will not take me long to describe it. I am a widower and have an only son, Arthur. He has been a disappointment to me, Mr. Holmes--a grievous disappointment. I have no doubt that I am myself to blame. People tell me that I have spoiled him. Very likely I have. When my dear wife died I felt that he was all I had to love. I could not bear to see the smile fade even for a moment from his face. I have never denied him a wish. Perhaps it would have been better for both of us had I been sterner, but I meant it for the best.
"So much so," I remarked, "that of the last six cases which I have added to my notes, three have been entirely free of any legal crime."
"So much the better! I shall see it close," he thought.
"So tell them that I shall await a reply till the tenth, and if by
"So that's what they hit with?" asked the accountant. "How awful!"
"So the attack is definitely resolved on?" asked Bolkonski.
"So they are!" said the officers. "Won't the soldiers be glad!"
"So this is what the Emperor is!" thought Petya. "No, I can't
"So you are really going to the war, Andrew?" she said sighing.
"So you understand the whole position of our troops?" Prince
"Sold out of geese, I see," continued Holmes, pointing at the bare slabs of marble.
"Some cold beef and a glass of beer," he answered, ringing the bell. "I have been too busy to think of food, and I am likely to be busier still this evening. By the way, Doctor, I shall want your co-operation."
"Some ten or twelve, but none which present any feature of interest. They are important, you understand, without being interesting. Indeed, I have found that it is usually in unimportant matters that there is a field for the observation, and for the quick analysis of cause and effect which gives the charm to an investigation. The larger crimes are apt to be the simpler, for the bigger the crime the more obvious, as a rule, is the motive. In these cases, save for one rather intricate matter which has been referred to me from Marseilles, there is nothing which presents any features of interest. It is possible, however, that I may have something better before very many minutes are over, for this is one of my clients, or I am much mistaken."
"Some years ago--to be definite, in May, 1884--there came to Lee a gentleman, Neville St. Clair by name, who appeared to have plenty of money. He took a large villa, laid out the grounds very nicely, and lived generally in good style. By degrees he made friends in the neighbourhood, and in 1887 he married the daughter of a local brewer, by whom he now has two children. He had no occupation, but was interested in several companies and went into town as a rule in the morning, returning by the 5:14 from Cannon Street every night. Mr. St. Clair is now thirty-seven years of age, is a man of temperate habits, a good husband, a very affectionate father, and a man who is popular with all who know him. I may add that his whole debts at the present moment, as far as we have been able to ascertain, amount to $88 10s., while he has $220 standing to his credit in the Capital and Counties Bank. There is no reason, therefore, to think that money troubles have been weighing upon his mind.
"Sometimes I have thought that it was merely the wild talk of delirium, sometimes that it may have referred to some band of people, perhaps to these very gipsies in the plantation. I do not know whether the spotted handkerchiefs which so many of them wear over their heads might have suggested the strange adjective which she used."
"Sonya! Sonya!" he again heard the first speaker. "Oh, how can you
"Sonya! What is anyone in the world to me? You alone are
"Sonya! What is it? What is the matter?... Oo... Oo... Oo...!" And
"Sonya!" said the countess, raising her eyes from her letter as
"Sonya!... Nicholas!"... was all they said. They ran to the barn and
"Sonya, what is the matter with you? How can you?" said he,
"Sonya," she suddenly exclaimed, as if she had guessed the true
"Still the same," she said to her husband.
"Still the same. Wait, for heaven's sake. Karl Ivanich always says
"Still the same; but what can you expect, this noise..." said the
"Still, I am not the same as his own mother," said Countess Mary. "I
"Still, if I had married Lord St. Simon, of course I'd have done my duty by him. We can't command our love, but we can our actions. I went to the altar with him with the intention to make him just as good a wife as it was in me to be. But you may imagine what I felt when, just as I came to the altar rails, I glanced back and saw Frank standing and looking at me out of the first pew. I thought it was his ghost at first; but when I looked again there he was still, with a kind of question in his eyes, as if to ask me whether I were glad or sorry to see him. I wonder I didn't drop. I know that everything was turning round, and the words of the clergyman were just like the buzz of a bee in my ear. I didn't know what to do. Should I stop the service and make a scene in the church? I glanced at him again, and he seemed to know what I was thinking, for he raised his finger to his lips to tell me to be still. Then I saw him scribble on a piece of paper, and I knew that he was writing me a note. As I passed his pew on the way out I dropped my bouquet over to him, and he slipped the note into my hand when he returned me the flowers. It was only a line asking me to join him when he made the sign to me to do so. Of course I never doubted for a moment that my first duty was now to him, and I determined to do just whatever he might direct.
"Stop playing--there's a time for everything," said the old woman.
"Stop those wretches!" gasped Kutuzov to the regimental commander,
"Subtle enough and horrible enough. When a doctor does go wrong he is the first of criminals. He has nerve and he has knowledge. Palmer and Pritchard were among the heads of their profession. This man strikes even deeper, but I think, Watson, that we shall be able to strike deeper still. But we shall have horrors enough before the night is over; for goodness' sake let us have a quiet pipe and turn our minds for a few hours to something more cheerful."
"Such an insolent scoundrel!" he cried, growing hot again at the
"Such demands as to retreat beyond the Vistula and Oder may be
"Suddenly, without any preliminary sound in the midst of the utter stillness, the door of my room swung slowly open. The woman was standing in the aperture, the darkness of the hall behind her, the yellow light from my lamp beating upon her eager and beautiful face. I could see at a glance that she was sick with fear, and the sight sent a chill to my own heart. She held up one shaking finger to warn me to be silent, and she shot a few whispered words of broken English at me, her eyes glancing back, like those of a frightened horse, into the gloom behind her.
"Sufferer," and now as the "Postulant," to the accompaniment of
"Supper, it's time for supper! And here are the gypsies!"
"Surely he will leave something to Boris," said the countess.
"Surely. Bring him into the sitting-room. There is a comfortable sofa. This way, please!"
"Surrounded! Cut off? We're lost!" shouted the fugitives.
"THE NATIONS OF THE WEST"]
"TO THE RED-HEADED LEAGUE: On account of the bequest of the late Ezekiah Hopkins, of Lebanon, Pennsylvania, U. S. A., there is now another vacancy open which entitles a member of the League to a salary of $4 a week for purely nominal services. All red-headed men who are sound in body and mind and above the age of twenty-one years, are eligible. Apply in person on Monday, at eleven o'clock, to Duncan Ross, at the offices of the League, 7 Pope's Court, Fleet Street."
"Take it if you like," said the officer, giving the girl an apple.
"Take this and deliver it," said he to his adjutant, handing him the
"Talk indeed!" cried the thin one. "In my three shops here I have
"Tell me, when did the battle begin?" he asked hurriedly.
"Tell me, you did not know of the countess' death when you decided
"Tell me," broke in the engineer, "is Dr. Becher a German, very thin, with a long, sharp nose?"
"Tell the King of Naples," said he sternly, "that it is not noon
"Tell what happened to the young lady!" said the second Melyukov
"Terse and to the point," remarked Holmes, stretching his long, thin legs towards the fire.
"Texas," exclaimed Channing in a letter to Clay, "is but the first step
"Thank God!" said the voice. "And Father?"
"Thank you very much, Prince," answered one of the officers, pleased
"Thank you!" said Holmes, folding up the paper and returning it to our visitor. "And now you must on no account lose another instant. We cannot spare time even to discuss what you have told me. You must get home instantly and act."
"Thank you, Mrs. St. Clair. Those are the principal points about which I wished to be absolutely clear. We shall now have a little supper and then retire, for we may have a very busy day to-morrow."
"Thank you, my dear." She kissed him on the forehead and sat down
"Thank you," said Holmes, "I only wished to ask you how you would go from here to the Strand."
"Thank you," said my patient. "but I have felt another man since the doctor bandaged me, and I think that your breakfast has completed the cure. I shall take up as little of your valuable time as possible, so I shall start at once upon my peculiar experiences."
"Thank you. I have already learned all that is in the public prints, nothing more. I presume that I may take it as correct--this article, for example, as to the disappearance of the bride."
"Thank you. We have certainly been favoured with extraordinary luck during this inquiry, and it will be entirely our own fault if we do not succeed in clearing the matter up. With your permission, Mr. Holder, I shall now continue my investigations outside."
"Thank you. You have made your statement very clearly. You will leave the papers here, and remember the advice which I have given you. Let the whole incident be a sealed book, and do not allow it to affect your life."
"Thanks, thanks, old fellow.... But the bits left over?" said the
"That McCarthy senior met his death from McCarthy junior and that all theories to the contrary are the merest moonshine."
"That Miss Flora Millar, the lady who had caused the disturbance, has actually been arrested. It appears that she was formerly a danseuse at the Allegro, and that she has known the bridegroom for some years. There are no further particulars, and the whole case is in your hands now--so far as it has been set forth in the public press."
"That abbe is very interesting but he does not see the thing in
"That hurts my pride, Watson," he said at last. "It is a petty feeling, no doubt, but it hurts my pride. It becomes a personal matter with me now, and, if God sends me health, I shall set my hand upon this gang. That he should come to me for help, and that I should send him away to his death--!" He sprang from his chair and paced about the room in uncontrollable agitation, with a flush upon his sallow cheeks and a nervous clasping and unclasping of his long thin hands.
"That is a possible solution--in fact, as matters stand, it is the most probable one. But in any case it does not seem to be a nice household for a young lady."
"That is also quite modern," said the lady.
"That is better," said John Clay serenely. He made a sweeping bow to the three of us and walked quietly off in the custody of the detective.
"That is enough." She rose briskly from her chair with the anxiety all swept from her face. "I shall go down to Hampshire quite easy in my mind now. I shall write to Mr. Rucastle at once, sacrifice my poor hair to-night, and start for Winchester to-morrow." With a few grateful words to Holmes she bade us both good-night and bustled off upon her way.
"That is excellent. I think, perhaps, it is almost time that I prepare for the new role I have to play."
"That is it on the dressing-table."
"That is life," said the old teacher.
"That is not quite so common, is it? Ah, me! it's a wicked world, and when a clever man turns his brains to crime it is the worst of all. I think that I have seen enough now, Miss Stoner, and with your permission we shall walk out upon the lawn."
"That is our signal," said Holmes, springing to his feet; "it comes from the middle window."
"That is probably the work of Vinesse," said Pierre, mentioning a
"That is the Dutch ambassador, do you see? That gray-haired man,"
"That is the letter which I have just received, Mr. Holmes, and my mind is made up that I will accept it. I thought, however, that before taking the final step I should like to submit the whole matter to your consideration."
"That is the reward, and I have reason to know that there are sentimental considerations in the background which would induce the Countess to part with half her fortune if she could but recover the gem."
"That is well. And the Rucastles go out to-night?"
"That is well. The letter which I hold in my hand is from Lord St. Simon. I will read it to you, and in return you must turn over these papers and let me have whatever bears upon the matter. This is what he says:
"That peasant near Mozhaysk where the battle was said the men were
"That was a nice snub for the little aide-de-camp," came a voice
"That was a real battle," said an old soldier. "It's the only one
"That was what the county coroner asked me at the inquiry. It is my strong impression that I heard it, and yet, among the crash of the gale and the creaking of an old house, I may possibly have been deceived."
"That which my son himself indicated--that of the cupboard of the lumber-room."
"That will do very nicely. Then perhaps I had better postpone my analysis of the acetones, as we may need to be at our best in the morning."
"That will do, Mr. Wilson. I shall be happy to give you an opinion upon the subject in the course of a day or two. To-day is Saturday, and I hope that by Monday we may come to a conclusion."
"That will do, please, that will do. Have the goodness--please, sir,
"That will do," said Holmes. "As to the letters," he continued, glancing over them, "they are very commonplace. Absolutely no clue in them to Mr. Angel, save that he quotes Balzac once. There is one remarkable point, however, which will no doubt strike you."
"That will teach them to start fires," said one of the Frenchmen.
"That would be unnecessary. Three thousand will cover the matter. And there is a little reward, I fancy. Have you your check-book? Here is a pen. Better make it out for $4000."
"That would take too long to tell," answered the son.
"That'll do, that'll do!" replied the sergeant major quietly.
"That's Mary Nikolievna! They went inside the garden when these
"That's Rostova, the one who..."
"That's all right. No one thinks you a coward, but that's not the
"That's all the same," continued Dmitrievna. "If they hear of
"That's always the way," thought Countess Mary. "He talks to
"That's another matter. That's necessary for the people," said the
"That's better!" said he. "And now, Doctor, perhaps you would kindly attend to my thumb, or rather to the place where my thumb used to be."
"That's better, Count," said the staff captain, beginning to address
"That's for Belova? Excellent!" She felt the quality of the
"That's for them all," he said to the officer who came up.
"That's grand, it bucks one up!" laughed the first. "Lucky you
"That's his again," said the officer. (It was the Shevardino
"That's how everything is done with us, all topsy-turvy!" said the
"That's how we used to dance in our time, ma chere," said the count.
"That's it!" cried Hatherley, in intense excitement. "There is the gravel-drive, and there are the rose-bushes where I lay. That second window is the one that I jumped from."
"That's it, that's it!" exclaimed the count, and gaily seizing his
"That's just it, my dear fellow. You see it's hurrah for the Tsar,
"That's just it," answered Bilibin. "Listen! The French entered
"That's not he himself, that's the father of the fellow who wrote
"That's not right! That's not right!" cried the prince, and
"That's not the point, my dear."
"That's not the point. I'm not going to discuss the matter. I do not
"That's not the way, that's not the way, Sonya!" cried Natasha
"That's our battery," said the staff officer indicating the
"That's right, hit him on the snout--on his snout! Like this, we
"That's right, my dear," chimed in the old count, thoroughly
"That's right," said the man, whom Petya took to be an hussar.
"That's the list of the folk from whom I buy. D'you see? Well, then, here on this page are the country folk, and the numbers after their names are where their accounts are in the big ledger. Now, then! You see this other page in red ink? Well, that is a list of my town suppliers. Now, look at that third name. Just read it out to me."
"That's the owner himself," cried several voices.
"That's the way," said Dolokhov, "and then so!" and he turned the
"That's the worst of it, Mr. Holmes, I don't know."
"That's what I say. Folks are foolish! Always afraid of the French."
"That's what comes of a modern education," exclaimed the visitor.
"That, my dear, you must ask the doctor," he replied, and again
"The Americans are rebels!"
"The Anferovs? No," said the woman. "They left in the morning.
"The Apsherons must be stopped, your excellency," cried he. But at
"The Berlin cabinet cannot express a feeling of alliance," began
"The Cedars?"
"The Club is closed and the police are leaving."
"The Coroner: Did your father make any statement to you before he died?
"The Coroner: How was it, then, that he uttered it before he saw you, and before he even knew that you had returned from Bristol?
"The Coroner: I am afraid that I must press it.
"The Coroner: I understand that the cry of 'Cooee' was a common signal between you and your father?
"The Coroner: That is for the court to decide. I need not point out to you that your refusal to answer will prejudice your case considerably in any future proceedings which may arise.
"The Coroner: What did you understand by that?
"The Coroner: What do you mean?
"The Coroner: What was the point upon which you and your father had this final quarrel?
"The Cossack, not knowing in what company he was, for Napoleon's
"The Cossacks have taken their boots. They were clearing the hut for
"The Cossacks!" one of them shouted, and a moment later a crowd of
"The Duke of Oldenburg bears his misfortunes with admirable strength
"The Eighteenth."
"The Elder.... He wants the Elder!... Dron Zakharych, you!" meek and
"The Elder? What do you want with him?..." asked Karp.
"The Emperor Alexander," said she, with the melancholy which
"The Emperor is extremely displeased that despite the strict
"The Emperor returns these Austrian banners," said Bilibin,
"The Emperor! The Emperor! The Marshal! The Duke!" and hardly had
"The Emperor! The Emperor!" a sudden cry resounded through the halls
"The Emperor! The Emperor!" was suddenly heard among the hussars.
"The Emperor's appeal? Oh yes!"
"The Emperor," Pierre repeated, and his face suddenly became sad and
"The Emperor? He is generosity, mercy, justice, order, genius-
"The Emperor?... No, a minister.... prince... ambassador. Don't
"The Fatherland," was founded to secure "fair play for Germany and
"The First Column will march here and here," "the Second Column will
"The French at Vitebsk, in four days' march they may be at Smolensk;
"The French have abandoned the left bank?"
"The French," replied Ilyin jestingly, "and here is Napoleon
"The Gospels. I haven't one."
"The Grand Marshal of the palace," wrote the governor, "complains
"The Karagins, Julie--and Boris with them. One can see at once
"The King of Rome!" he said, pointing to the portrait with a
"The King of Scandinavia."
"The London press has not had very full accounts. I have just been looking through all the recent papers in order to master the particulars. It seems, from what I gather, to be one of those simple cases which are so extremely difficult."
"The Lone Star had arrived here last week. I went down to the Albert Dock and found that she had been taken down the river by the early tide this morning, homeward bound to Savannah. I wired to Gravesend and learned that she had passed some time ago, and as the wind is easterly I have no doubt that she is now past the Goodwins and not very far from the Isle of Wight."
"The Lord be thanked, yes!"
"The Niemen?" repeated Napoleon. "So now you want me to retire
"The Pavlograd hussars?" he inquired.
"The Republican party suppressed a gigantic rebellion, emancipated four
"The Russians are very devout," replied Balashev.
"The Smolensk Mother of God," another corrected him.
"The United States," said the Secretary, "is practically sovereign on
"The abandonment of Moscow."
"The ammunition for the guns in position is exhausted, Your
"The auditor wrote out a petition for you," continued Tushin, "and
"The band! the speckled band!" whispered Holmes.
"The best possible."
"The campaign began only a week ago, and you haven't even been
"The case has been an interesting one," remarked Holmes when our visitors had left us, "because it serves to show very clearly how simple the explanation may be of an affair which at first sight seems to be almost inexplicable. Nothing could be more natural than the sequence of events as narrated by this lady, and nothing stranger than the result when viewed, for instance, by Mr. Lestrade of Scotland Yard."
"The cavalry ride to battle and meet the wounded and do not for a
"The chairman of the Committee on Army Regulations is my good friend
"The chessmen are set up, the game will begin tomorrow!"
"The children will live just the same. With such masters one can
"The circumstances are of great delicacy, and every precaution has to be taken to quench what might grow to be an immense scandal and seriously compromise one of the reigning families of Europe. To speak plainly, the matter implicates the great House of Ormstein, hereditary kings of Bohemia."
"The colonel of those Wurttembergers is delightful," he suddenly
"The commander in chief is engaged," repeated Kozlovski calmly.
"The commander in chief is engaged," said Kozlovski, going hurriedly
"The convention as a whole," according to the historian Hildreth,
"The cotton manufacture alone employs six thousand persons in Lowell,"
"The count had a sty," replied the adjutant smiling, "and was very
"The count has not left, he is here, and an order will be issued
"The count is pathetic, they say. He cried like a child when the
"The count is suffering physically and mentally, and apparently
"The count's books."
"The count's things? Bring them here," she said, pointing to the
"The count--Count Ilya Andreevich Rostov."
"The countess has been to Mass at the Razumovskis' and heard the new
"The countess told me to inquire whether your excellency was at
"The day before yesterday it was 'Napoleon, France, bravoure';
"The decline of his fortunes, then?"
"The devil knows! They've killed everybody! It's all up now!" he was
"The devil only knows what they're about!" muttered Denisov. "Ah,
"The devil only knows! They say so."
"The devil skin your Emperor."
"The dishes must go in here among the carpets," said she.
"The dispositions!" exclaimed Kutuzov bitterly. "Who told you
"The divine mercy is inexhaustible! Unction is about to be
"The doctor says that he is not in danger," said the countess, but
"The doctor?"
"The doctors examined her for it, but without success."
"The doubt is flattering," said "the man of profound intellect,"
"The dress which I found waiting for me was of a peculiar shade of blue. It was of excellent material, a sort of beige, but it bore unmistakable signs of having been worn before. It could not have been a better fit if I had been measured for it. Both Mr. and Mrs. Rucastle expressed a delight at the look of it, which seemed quite exaggerated in its vehemence. They were waiting for me in the drawing-room, which is a very large room, stretching along the entire front of the house, with three long windows reaching down to the floor. A chair had been placed close to the central window, with its back turned towards it. In this I was asked to sit, and then Mr. Rucastle, walking up and down on the other side of the room, began to tell me a series of the funniest stories that I have ever listened to. You cannot imagine how comical he was, and I laughed until I was quite weary. Mrs. Rucastle, however, who has evidently no sense of humour, never so much as smiled, but sat with her hands in her lap, and a sad, anxious look upon her face. After an hour or so, Mr. Rucastle suddenly remarked that it was time to commence the duties of the day, and that I might change my dress and go to little Edward in the nursery.
"The eggs... the eggs are teaching the hen," muttered the count
"The end may have been so," I answered, "but the methods I hold to have been novel and of interest."
"The enemy has been repulsed on the left and defeated on the right
"The enemy has entered the borders of Russia with immense forces. He
"The enemy has quenched his fires and a continual noise is heard
"The enemy is still far away, your excellency. According to the
"The exchange horses have just come," answered the servant. "Will
"The execution of the Duc d'Enghien," declared Monsieur Pierre, "was
"The fact of the matter is," said she significantly, and also in a
"The facts are briefly these: Some five years ago, during a lengthy visit to Warsaw, I made the acquaintance of the well-known adventuress, Irene Adler. The name is no doubt familiar to you."
"The family was at one time among the richest in England, and the estates extended over the borders into Berkshire in the north, and Hampshire in the west. In the last century, however, four successive heirs were of a dissolute and wasteful disposition, and the family ruin was eventually completed by a gambler in the days of the Regency. Nothing was left save a few acres of ground, and the two-hundred-year-old house, which is itself crushed under a heavy mortgage. The last squire dragged out his existence there, living the horrible life of an aristocratic pauper; but his only son, my stepfather, seeing that he must adapt himself to the new conditions, obtained an advance from a relative, which enabled him to take a medical degree and went out to Calcutta, where, by his professional skill and his force of character, he established a large practice. In a fit of anger, however, caused by some robberies which had been perpetrated in the house, he beat his native butler to death and narrowly escaped a capital sentence. As it was, he suffered a long term of imprisonment and afterwards returned to England a morose and disappointed man.
"The field marshal is angry with the Emperor and he punishes us all,
"The first man that turns up--she forgets her father and
"The first thing that put us out was that advertisement. Spaulding, he came down into the office just this day eight weeks, with this very paper in his hand, and he says:
"The first was from Pondicherry, the second from Dundee, and the third from London."
"The fish that you have tattooed immediately above your right wrist could only have been done in China. I have made a small study of tattoo marks and have even contributed to the literature of the subject. That trick of staining the fishes' scales of a delicate pink is quite peculiar to China. When, in addition, I see a Chinese coin hanging from your watch-chain, the matter becomes even more simple."
"The fowls of the air sow not, neither do they reap, yet your Father
"The further points, that he is middle-aged, that his hair is grizzled, that it has been recently cut, and that he uses lime-cream, are all to be gathered from a close examination of the lower part of the lining. The lens discloses a large number of hair-ends, clean cut by the scissors of the barber. They all appear to be adhesive, and there is a distinct odour of lime-cream. This dust, you will observe, is not the gritty, grey dust of the street but the fluffy brown dust of the house, showing that it has been hung up indoors most of the time, while the marks of moisture upon the inside are proof positive that the wearer perspired very freely, and could therefore, hardly be in the best of training."
"The game's up, Ryder," said Holmes quietly. "Hold up, man, or you'll be into the fire! Give him an arm back into his chair, Watson. He's not got blood enough to go in for felony with impunity. Give him a dash of brandy. So! Now he looks a little more human. What a shrimp it is, to be sure!"
"The gas was half up, as I had left it, and my unhappy boy, dressed only in his shirt and trousers, was standing beside the light, holding the coronet in his hands. He appeared to be wrenching at it, or bending it with all his strength. At my cry he dropped it from his grasp and turned as pale as death. I snatched it up and examined it. One of the gold corners, with three of the beryls in it, was missing.
"The general on duty, quick! It's very important!" said he to
"The general orders them all to be driven out at once, without fail.
"The gentleman I describe."
"The glass still keeps very high," he remarked as he sat down. "It is of importance that it should not rain before we are able to go over the ground. On the other hand, a man should be at his very best and keenest for such nice work as that, and I did not wish to do it when fagged by a long journey. I have seen young McCarthy."
"The goose, Mr. Holmes! The goose, sir!" he gasped.
"The grass was growing under it. It had only lain there a few days. There was no sign of a place whence it had been taken. It corresponds with the injuries. There is no sign of any other weapon."
"The head of the garrison at Glogau, with ten thousand men, asks the
"The herd goes in that direction because the animal in front leads
"The highest wisdom and truth are like the purest liquid we may wish
"The highest wisdom is not founded on reason alone, not on those
"The hollow is impassable--there's a swamp there," said the esaul.
"The hoof's cracked! That's nothing. I'll teach you what to do and
"The horses would sink. We must ride round more to the left...."
"The hours are the same, and the lathe, and also the mathematics and
"The house for your wife is ready. Princess Mary will take her there
"The importation of slaves into the colonies from the coast of Africa
"The impression of his right foot was always less distinct than his left. He put less weight upon it. Why? Because he limped--he was lame."
"The instant that I uttered the words I regretted the rashness of my speech. His face set hard, and a baleful light sprang up in his grey eyes.
"The intelligent white men of the South," said Governor Tillman, "intend
"The irrepressible conflict is about to be visited upon us through the
"The island of Madagascar," she said, "Ma-da-gas-car," she repeated,
"The king's heart is in the hands of the Lord."
"The knees of his trousers."
"The lady could not move her bed. It must always be in the same relative position to the ventilator and to the rope--or so we may call it, since it was clearly never meant for a bell-pull."
"The landlord of the Alpha."
"The landlord's grain is all safe," replied Dron proudly. "Our
"The law cannot, as you say, touch you," said Holmes, unlocking and throwing open the door, "yet there never was a man who deserved punishment more. If the young lady has a brother or a friend, he ought to lay a whip across your shoulders. By Jove!" he continued, flushing up at the sight of the bitter sneer upon the man's face, "it is not part of my duties to my client, but here's a hunting crop handy, and I think I shall just treat myself to--" He took two swift steps to the whip, but before he could grasp it there was a wild clatter of steps upon the stairs, the heavy hall door banged, and from the window we could see Mr. James Windibank running at the top of his speed down the road.
"The law, religion... What have they been invented for if they can't
"The leader of the gang. I shall have the others, but he first."
"The league of nations has for its object the establishment of universal
"The least sound would be fatal to our plans."
"The letter arrived on March 10, 1883. His death was seven weeks later, upon the night of May 2nd."
"The limits of human life... are fixed and may not be o'erpassed,"
"The man married a woman very much older than himself for her money," said he, "and he enjoyed the use of the money of the daughter as long as she lived with them. It was a considerable sum, for people in their position, and the loss of it would have made a serious difference. It was worth an effort to preserve it. The daughter was of a good, amiable disposition, but affectionate and warm-hearted in her ways, so that it was evident that with her fair personal advantages, and her little income, she would not be allowed to remain single long. Now her marriage would mean, of course, the loss of a hundred a year, so what does her stepfather do to prevent it? He takes the obvious course of keeping her at home and forbidding her to seek the company of people of her own age. But soon he found that that would not answer forever. She became restive, insisted upon her rights, and finally announced her positive intention of going to a certain ball. What does her clever stepfather do then? He conceives an idea more creditable to his head than to his heart. With the connivance and assistance of his wife he disguised himself, covered those keen eyes with tinted glasses, masked the face with a moustache and a pair of bushy whiskers, sunk that clear voice into an insinuating whisper, and doubly secure on account of the girl's short sight, he appears as Mr. Hosmer Angel, and keeps off other lovers by making love himself."
"The man who wrote it was presumably well to do," I remarked, endeavouring to imitate my companion's processes. "Such paper could not be bought under half a crown a packet. It is peculiarly strong and stiff."
"The manageress had sat all this while busy with her papers without a word to either of us, but she glanced at me now with so much annoyance upon her face that I could not help suspecting that she had lost a handsome commission through my refusal.
"The marshal, a Count Rostov, hasn't sent half his contingent. He
"The master is not in, he's gone to headquarters," said Telyanin's
"The masters won't object..." she said.
"The matter is in my hands and is clear and definite in my head.
"The matter is too serious for any hesitation. Your life may depend upon your compliance."
"The means are... the balance of power in Europe and the rights of
"The militia have put on clean white shirts to be ready to die. What
"The mummers from the count's. I know by the horses," replied some
"The name of the maker, no doubt; or his monogram, rather."
"The name, you see, is in perfectly black ink, which has dried itself. The rest is of the greyish colour, which shows that blotting-paper has been used. If it had been written straight off, and then blotted, none would be of a deep black shade. This man has written the name, and there has then been a pause before he wrote the address, which can only mean that he was not familiar with it. It is, of course, a trifle, but there is nothing so important as trifles. Let us now see the letter. Ha! there has been an enclosure here!"
"The neighborhood of my ward continues to be pillaged by soldiers of
"The newcomers were Colonel Lysander Stark and a short thick man with a chinchilla beard growing out of the creases of his double chin, who was introduced to me as Mr. Ferguson.
"The news is reliable," said Bolkhovitinov. "Prisoners, Cossacks,
"The next I heard of Frank was that he was in Montana, and then he went prospecting in Arizona, and then I heard of him from New Mexico. After that came a long newspaper story about how a miners' camp had been attacked by Apache Indians, and there was my Frank's name among the killed. I fainted dead away, and I was very sick for months after. Pa thought I had a decline and took me to half the doctors in 'Frisco. Not a word of news came for a year and more, so that I never doubted that Frank was really dead. Then Lord St. Simon came to 'Frisco, and we came to London, and a marriage was arranged, and Pa was very pleased, but I felt all the time that no man on this earth would ever take the place in my heart that had been given to my poor Frank.
"The old men have met to talk over the business of the commune,"
"The one in pink is mine, so keep off!" said Ilyin on seeing
"The only question in my mind is how far it is now possible for us to
"The only thing is, we mustn't have children too soon," he
"The only thing that is hard for me... I will tell you the truth,
"The other day when he came out from Mass in full uniform, Michael
"The paper was made in Bohemia," I said.
"The papers which Openshaw carried are obviously of vital importance to the person or persons in the sailing-ship. I think that it is quite clear that there must be more than one of them. A single man could not have carried out two deaths in such a way as to deceive a coroner's jury. There must have been several in it, and they must have been men of resource and determination. Their papers they mean to have, be the holder of them who it may. In this way you see K. K. K. ceases to be the initials of an individual and becomes the badge of a society."
"The past always seems good," said he, "but did not Suvorov
"The path to Warsaw, perhaps," Prince Hippolyte remarked loudly
"The peasants are ruined? They have no bread?" she asked.
"The people are still hoping to see Your Majesty again."
"The people have decided," he said, "that such legislation should be had
"The picket is still on the hill, your excellency, just where it was
"The police have watched this Lascar," said Inspector Bradstreet, "and I can quite understand that he might find it difficult to post a letter unobserved. Probably he handed it to some sailor customer of his, who forgot all about it for some days."
"The position?" repeated the doctor. "Well, that's not my line.
"The potatoes are grand!" he said once more. "Eat some like that!"
"The power is in your hands," Dron rejoined sadly.
"The praise of a great commander is a soldier's highest reward,"
"The prince is not very well: bile and rush of blood to the head.
"The prince says nothing about that," he remarked gently.
"The prince wants to bathe."
"The princess ordered me to ask your regiment and your name."
"The professors with their books, the socialists with their schemes, the
"The reserves, sire!" replied a voice, a very human one compared
"The rest you will leave in our hands."
"The rice too?"
"The right side? You're mad! Here is the note written in pencil over here."
"The scoundrels! What are they doing?" shouted the officer,
"The second hundred," replied the Cossack.
"The servants say he is still the same."
"The signal!" said he.
"The snow is deep. I am having the avenue swept, your honor."
"The soldiers say it feels easier without boots," said Captain
"The sovereigns? I do not speak of Russia," said the vicomte, polite
"The squadron quartermaster!" said Lavrushka.
"The squadwon can't pass," shouted Vaska Denisov, showing his
"The stable lane?" She raised her dark eyebrows. "What can he hope to find there? Ah! this, I suppose, is he. I trust, sir, that you will succeed in proving, what I feel sure is the truth, that my cousin Arthur is innocent of this crime."
"The step must be taken but I cannot, I cannot!" thought Pierre, and
"The tea has been thrown overboard; the revolution of 1860 has been
"The third on the right is his," said the inspector. "Here it is!" He quietly shot back a panel in the upper part of the door and glanced through.
"The third, I said the third!" cried the prince abruptly, pushing
"The trail of war is visible throughout the valley in burnt-up gin
"The two McCarthys were seen after the time when William Crowder, the game-keeper, lost sight of them. The Boscombe Pool is thickly wooded round, with just a fringe of grass and of reeds round the edge. A girl of fourteen, Patience Moran, who is the daughter of the lodge-keeper of the Boscombe Valley estate, was in one of the woods picking flowers. She states that while she was there she saw, at the border of the wood and close by the lake, Mr. McCarthy and his son, and that they appeared to be having a violent quarrel. She heard Mr. McCarthy the elder using very strong language to his son, and she saw the latter raise up his hand as if to strike his father. She was so frightened by their violence that she ran away and told her mother when she reached home that she had left the two McCarthys quarrelling near Boscombe Pool, and that she was afraid that they were going to fight. She had hardly said the words when young Mr. McCarthy came running up to the lodge to say that he had found his father dead in the wood, and to ask for the help of the lodge-keeper. He was much excited, without either his gun or his hat, and his right hand and sleeve were observed to be stained with fresh blood. On following him they found the dead body stretched out upon the grass beside the pool. The head had been beaten in by repeated blows of some heavy and blunt weapon. The injuries were such as might very well have been inflicted by the butt-end of his son's gun, which was found lying on the grass within a few paces of the body. Under these circumstances the young man was instantly arrested, and a verdict of 'wilful murder' having been returned at the inquest on Tuesday, he was on Wednesday brought before the magistrates at Ross, who have referred the case to the next Assizes. Those are the main facts of the case as they came out before the coroner and the police-court."
"The unpleasant things were said to me," remarked Vera, "I said none
"The vanishing of the lady."
"The vicomte knew the duc personally," whispered Anna Pavlovna to of
"The warning was no idle one, for two nights later I happened to look out of my bedroom window about two o'clock in the morning. It was a beautiful moonlight night, and the lawn in front of the house was silvered over and almost as bright as day. I was standing, rapt in the peaceful beauty of the scene, when I was aware that something was moving under the shadow of the copper beeches. As it emerged into the moonshine I saw what it was. It was a giant dog, as large as a calf, tawny tinted, with hanging jowl, black muzzle, and huge projecting bones. It walked slowly across the lawn and vanished into the shadow upon the other side. That dreadful sentinel sent a chill to my heart which I do not think that any burglar could have done.
"The wascal!" said Denisov.
"The ways of God are past finding out!" she thought, feeling that
"The welfare, the happiness, the energy, and the spirit of the men and
"The whole plan of our order should be based on the idea of
"The wife!" said the old prince, briefly and significantly.
"The will will show that, my dear; our fate also depends on it."
"The windows of the three rooms open out upon the lawn. That fatal night Dr. Roylott had gone to his room early, though we knew that he had not retired to rest, for my sister was troubled by the smell of the strong Indian cigars which it was his custom to smoke. She left her room, therefore, and came into mine, where she sat for some time, chatting about her approaching wedding. At eleven o'clock she rose to leave me, but she paused at the door and looked back.
"The withdrawal of your army beyond the Niemen, sire," replied
"The word attack is always on your tongue, but you don't see that we
"The wound is not here, it is there!" said Kutuzov, pressing the
"The young lady came to London, then, and you renewed your acquaintance?"
"The young man's a real hussar!" shouted the colonel, again thumping
"Their reasons for their conduct. But you shall have it all just as it occurred. When I came down, Mr. Rucastle met me here and drove me in his dog-cart to the Copper Beeches. It is, as he said, beautifully situated, but it is not beautiful in itself, for it is a large square block of a house, whitewashed, but all stained and streaked with damp and bad weather. There are grounds round it, woods on three sides, and on the fourth a field which slopes down to the Southampton highroad, which curves past about a hundred yards from the front door. This ground in front belongs to the house, but the woods all round are part of Lord Southerton's preserves. A clump of copper beeches immediately in front of the hall door has given its name to the place.
"Then I can wait in the next room."
"Then I do not see the point."
"Then I have just time, with your assistance, to get clear upon the subject. Turn over those papers and arrange the extracts in their order of time, while I take a glance as to who our client is." He picked a red-covered volume from a line of books of reference beside the mantelpiece. "Here he is," said he, sitting down and flattening it out upon his knee. " 'Lord Robert Walsingham de Vere St. Simon, second son of the Duke of Balmoral.' Hum! 'Arms: Azure, three caltrops in chief over a fess sable. Born in 1846.' He's forty-one years of age, which is mature for marriage. Was Under-Secretary for the colonies in a late administration. The Duke, his father, was at one time Secretary for Foreign Affairs. They inherit Plantagenet blood by direct descent, and Tudor on the distaff side. Ha! Well, there is nothing very instructive in all this. I think that I must turn to you Watson, for something more solid."
"Then I shall call upon you in a day, or in two days, with news as to the box and the papers. I shall take your advice in every particular." He shook hands with us and took his leave. Outside the wind still screamed and the rain splashed and pattered against the windows. This strange, wild story seemed to have come to us from amid the mad elements--blown in upon us like a sheet of sea-weed in a gale--and now to have been reabsorbed by them once more.
"Then I trust that you at least will honour me with your company," said Sherlock Holmes. "It is always a joy to meet an American, Mr. Moulton, for I am one of those who believe that the folly of a monarch and the blundering of a minister in far-gone years will not prevent our children from being some day citizens of the same world-wide country under a flag which shall be a quartering of the Union Jack with the Stars and Stripes."
"Then I will." Holmes suddenly bent his strength upon it, but without result. "I feel it give a little," said he; "but, though I am exceptionally strong in the fingers, it would take me all my time to break it. An ordinary man could not do it. Now, what do you think would happen if I did break it, Mr. Holder? There would be a noise like a pistol shot. Do you tell me that all this happened within a few yards of your bed and that you heard nothing of it?"
"Then I'll tell our story right away," said the lady. "Frank here and I met in '84, in McQuire's camp, near the Rockies, where Pa was working a claim. We were engaged to each other, Frank and I; but then one day father struck a rich pocket and made a pile, while poor Frank here had a claim that petered out and came to nothing. The richer Pa grew the poorer was Frank; so at last Pa wouldn't hear of our engagement lasting any longer, and he took me away to 'Frisco. Frank wouldn't throw up his hand, though; so he followed me there, and he saw me without Pa knowing anything about it. It would only have made him mad to know, so we just fixed it all up for ourselves. Frank said that he would go and make his pile, too, and never come back to claim me until he had as much as Pa. So then I promised to wait for him to the end of time and pledged myself not to marry anyone else while he lived. 'Why shouldn't we be married right away, then,' said he, 'and then I will feel sure of you; and I won't claim to be your husband until I come back?' Well, we talked it over, and he had fixed it all up so nicely, with a clergyman all ready in waiting, that we just did it right there; and then Frank went off to seek his fortune, and I went back to Pa.
"Then am I to order those large sterlets?" asked the steward.
"Then and there," wrote John Adams, "the child Independence was born."
"Then comes our expedition of to-day. By an examination of the ground I gained the trifling details which I gave to that imbecile Lestrade, as to the personality of the criminal."
"Then dress. No one is stirring yet, but I know where the stable-boy sleeps, and we shall soon have the trap out." He chuckled to himself as he spoke, his eyes twinkled, and he seemed a different man to the sombre thinker of the previous night.
"Then hand to the governor in person a letter about the deed."
"Then it is certain?" said the prince.
"Then it must be so!" thought Prince Andrew as he drove out of the
"Then it will mean that I must go to the army," said Pierre to
"Then it's all right?" said Nicholas, again scrutinizing the
"Then my servant will call a cab, and I shall be with you in an instant." I rushed upstairs, explained the matter shortly to my wife, and in five minutes was inside a hansom, driving with my new acquaintance to Baker Street.
"Then perhaps you will kindly explain how it is that we found this in it?" He opened his bag as he spoke, and tumbled onto the floor a wedding-dress of watered silk, a pair of white satin shoes and a bride's wreath and veil, all discoloured and soaked in water. "There," said he, putting a new wedding-ring upon the top of the pile. "There is a little nut for you to crack, Master Holmes."
"Then pray send him home in it. You may safely trust him, for he appears to be too limp to get into any mischief. I should recommend you also to send a note by the cabman to your wife to say that you have thrown in your lot with me. If you will wait outside, I shall be with you in five minutes."
"Then put on your hat and come. I am going through the City first, and we can have some lunch on the way. I observe that there is a good deal of German music on the programme, which is rather more to my taste than Italian or French. It is introspective, and I want to introspect. Come along!"
"Then the page we have seen--"
"Then they carried me in. She was bound to have me in. What else could she do? And into her sitting-room, which was the very room which I suspected. It lay between that and her bedroom, and I was determined to see which. They laid me on a couch, I motioned for air, they were compelled to open the window, and you had your chance."
"Then tomorrow you will speak to the Emperor?"
"Then we had a talk as to what we should do, and Frank was all for openness, but I was so ashamed of it all that I felt as if I should like to vanish away and never see any of them again--just sending a line to Pa, perhaps, to show him that I was alive. It was awful to me to think of all those lords and ladies sitting round that breakfast-table and waiting for me to come back. So Frank took my wedding-clothes and things and made a bundle of them, so that I should not be traced, and dropped them away somewhere where no one could find them. It is likely that we should have gone on to Paris to-morrow, only that this good gentleman, Mr. Holmes, came round to us this evening, though how he found us is more than I can think, and he showed us very clearly and kindly that I was wrong and that Frank was right, and that we should be putting ourselves in the wrong if we were so secret. Then he offered to give us a chance of talking to Lord St. Simon alone, and so we came right away round to his rooms at once. Now, Robert, you have heard it all, and I am very sorry if I have given you pain, and I hope that you do not think very meanly of me."
"Then we have stopped all the holes. And now we must be silent and wait."
"Then what is this blood on the gun carriage?" inquired Tushin.
"Then you are Russians?" the peasant asked again.
"Then you don't consider the Emperor Alexander the aggressor?" he
"Then, for pity's sake, tell me what was the cause of my sister's death."
"Then, good-night, your Majesty, and I trust that we shall soon have some good news for you. And good-night, Watson," he added, as the wheels of the royal brougham rolled down the street. "If you will be good enough to call to-morrow afternoon at three o'clock I should like to chat this little matter over with you."
"Then, pray, sit down, and let us hear it for there are several points on which I must confess that I am still in the dark."
"Then, when the row broke out, I had a little moist red paint in the palm of my hand. I rushed forward, fell down, clapped my hand to my face, and became a piteous spectacle. It is an old trick."
"There are a thousand reasons why," laying special emphasis on the
"There are gentry here; the general himself is in that hut, and you
"There are so many prisoners today, nearly the whole Russian army,
"There are three men waiting for him at the door," said Holmes.
"There he is, always losing everything!" remarked the countess.
"There is a well-known agency for governesses in the West End called Westaway's, and there I used to call about once a week in order to see whether anything had turned up which might suit me. Westaway was the name of the founder of the business, but it is really managed by Miss Stoper. She sits in her own little office, and the ladies who are seeking employment wait in an anteroom, and are then shown in one by one, when she consults her ledgers and sees whether she has anything which would suit them.
"There is at least a presumption that the vessel in which the man or men are is a sailing-ship. It looks as if they always send their singular warning or token before them when starting upon their mission. You see how quickly the deed followed the sign when it came from Dundee. If they had come from Pondicherry in a steamer they would have arrived almost as soon as their letter. But, as a matter of fact, seven weeks elapsed. I think that those seven weeks represented the difference between the mail-boat which brought the letter and the sailing vessel which brought the writer."
"There is but one thing to do. It must be done at once. You must put this piece of paper which you have shown us into the brass box which you have described. You must also put in a note to say that all the other papers were burned by your uncle, and that this is the only one which remains. You must assert that in such words as will carry conviction with them. Having done this, you must at once put the box out upon the sundial, as directed. Do you understand?"
"There is no getting them together. The army should push on before the
"There is no mystery, my dear madam," said he, smiling. "The left arm of your jacket is spattered with mud in no less than seven places. The marks are perfectly fresh. There is no vehicle save a dog-cart which throws up mud in that way, and then only when you sit on the left-hand side of the driver."
"There is nothing more deceptive than an obvious fact," he answered, laughing. "Besides, we may chance to hit upon some other obvious facts which may have been by no means obvious to Mr. Lestrade. You know me too well to think that I am boasting when I say that I shall either confirm or destroy his theory by means which he is quite incapable of employing, or even of understanding. To take the first example to hand, I very clearly perceive that in your bedroom the window is upon the right-hand side, and yet I question whether Mr. Lestrade would have noted even so self-evident a thing as that."
"There is one thing," said John Openshaw. He rummaged in his coat pocket, and, drawing out a piece of discoloured, blue-tinted paper, he laid it out upon the table. "I have some remembrance," said he, "that on the day when my uncle burned the papers I observed that the small, unburned margins which lay amid the ashes were of this particular colour. I found this single sheet upon the floor of his room, and I am inclined to think that it may be one of the papers which has, perhaps, fluttered out from among the others, and in that way has escaped destruction. Beyond the mention of pips, I do not see that it helps us much. I think myself that it is a page from some private diary. The writing is undoubtedly my uncle's."
"There is serious news this morning," Lestrade observed. "It is said that Mr. Turner, of the Hall, is so ill that his life is despaired of."
"There is something nasty, something wrong, in the feeling she excites
"There is something so enchanting in the smile of melancholy," she
"There is the writing."
"There is your child! Oh, a girl, so much the better!" said the
"There is your hat, then, and there your bird," said he. "By the way, would it bore you to tell me where you got the other one from? I am somewhat of a fowl fancier, and I have seldom seen a better grown goose."
"There now!" said one of the soldiers.
"There now!" said the officer of the suite, "that's grapeshot."
"There now!... So you, too, are in the great world?" said he to
"There now, Prince! We can't stop those fellows," said the staff
"There now, the Kurskies have also gone past," was being said in the
"There now, the gentry and merchants have gone away and left us to
"There now, your excellency! That's the truth, the real truth," said
"There was a double line of tracks of a booted man, and a second double line which I saw with delight belonged to a man with naked feet. I was at once convinced from what you had told me that the latter was your son. The first had walked both ways, but the other had run swiftly, and as his tread was marked in places over the depression of the boot, it was obvious that he had passed after the other. I followed them up and found they led to the hall window, where Boots had worn all the snow away while waiting. Then I walked to the other end, which was a hundred yards or more down the lane. I saw where Boots had faced round, where the snow was cut up as though there had been a struggle, and, finally, where a few drops of blood had fallen, to show me that I was not mistaken. Boots had then run down the lane, and another little smudge of blood showed that it was he who had been hurt. When he came to the highroad at the other end, I found that the pavement had been cleared, so there was an end to that clue.
"There was a little passage in front of me, unpapered and uncarpeted, which turned at a right angle at the farther end. Round this corner were three doors in a line, the first and third of which were open. They each led into an empty room, dusty and cheerless, with two windows in the one and one in the other, so thick with dirt that the evening light glimmered dimly through them. The centre door was closed, and across the outside of it had been fastened one of the broad bars of an iron bed, padlocked at one end to a ring in the wall, and fastened at the other with stout cord. The door itself was locked as well, and the key was not there. This barricaded door corresponded clearly with the shuttered window outside, and yet I could see by the glimmer from beneath it that the room was not in darkness. Evidently there was a skylight which let in light from above. As I stood in the passage gazing at the sinister door and wondering what secret it might veil, I suddenly heard the sound of steps within the room and saw a shadow pass backward and forward against the little slit of dim light which shone out from under the door. A mad, unreasoning terror rose up in me at the sight, Mr. Holmes. My overstrung nerves failed me suddenly, and I turned and ran--ran as though some dreadful hand were behind me clutching at the skirt of my dress. I rushed down the passage, through the door, and straight into the arms of Mr. Rucastle, who was waiting outside.
"There was a paragraph amplifying this in one of the society papers of the same week. Ah, here it is: 'There will soon be a call for protection in the marriage market, for the present free-trade principle appears to tell heavily against our home product. One by one the management of the noble houses of Great Britain is passing into the hands of our fair cousins from across the Atlantic. An important addition has been made during the last week to the list of the prizes which have been borne away by these charming invaders. Lord St. Simon, who has shown himself for over twenty years proof against the little god's arrows, has now definitely announced his approaching marriage with Miss Hatty Doran, the fascinating daughter of a California millionaire. Miss Doran, whose graceful figure and striking face attracted much attention at the Westbury House festivities, is an only child, and it is currently reported that her dowry will run to considerably over the six figures, with expectancies for the future. As it is an open secret that the Duke of Balmoral has been compelled to sell his pictures within the last few years, and as Lord St. Simon has no property of his own save the small estate of Birchmoor, it is obvious that the Californian heiress is not the only gainer by an alliance which will enable her to make the easy and common transition from a Republican lady to a British peeress.' "
"There was nothing in the office but a couple of wooden chairs and a deal table, behind which sat a small man with a head that was even redder than mine. He said a few words to each candidate as he came up, and then he always managed to find some fault in them which would disqualify them. Getting a vacancy did not seem to be such a very easy matter, after all. However, when our turn came the little man was much more favourable to me than to any of the others, and he closed the door as we entered, so that he might have a private word with us.
"There was one like that," said the doctor, as if pleased. "That one
"There will call upon you to-night, at a quarter to eight o'clock," it said, "a gentleman who desires to consult you upon a matter of the very deepest moment. Your recent services to one of the royal houses of Europe have shown that you are one who may safely be trusted with matters which are of an importance which can hardly be exaggerated. This account of you we have from all quarters received. Be in your chamber then at that hour, and do not take it amiss if your visitor wear a mask."
"There you are," said he. "That circle is drawn at a radius of ten miles from the village. The place we want must be somewhere near that line. You said ten miles, I think, sir."
"There! There!" shouted the Frenchman at the window, pointing to the
"There! They are bringing another!" cried one of the officers,
"There's a cold-blooded scoundrel!" said Holmes, laughing, as he threw himself down into his chair once more. "That fellow will rise from crime to crime until he does something very bad, and ends on a gallows. The case has, in some respects, been not entirely devoid of interest."
"There's the corner at the crossroads, where the cabman, Zakhar, has
"There's the village," said the driver, pointing to a cluster of roofs some distance to the left; "but if you want to get to the house, you'll find it shorter to get over this stile, and so by the foot-path over the fields. There it is, where the lady is walking."
"There, by the wheel!"
"There, lads... oh, oh!" they mimicked the peasants, "they don't
"There, that's me!" the expression of her face seemed to say as she
"There, you see!" and he drew attention to the bullets whistling,
"They always fill me with a certain horror. It is my belief, Watson, founded upon my experience, that the lowest and vilest alleys in London do not present a more dreadful record of sin than does the smiling and beautiful countryside."
"They always will forget everything!" said the countess. "Don't
"They are all seaports. That the writer was on board of a ship."
"They are bringing her, our Protectress!... The Iberian Mother of
"They are regular brigands, especially Dolokhov," replied the
"They are still sounding the planking and probing the furniture in the hope of finding them."
"They can't be far off, probably just beyond the stream," he said to
"They can't have wanted to kill me." But at the same time, his left
"They coax me as if I were Vaska the cat!" said Denisov jokingly.
"They even say," remarked the "man of great merit" who did not yet
"They give little hope," replied the prince.
"They have brought the cock, Miss," she said in a whisper.
"They have but one retreat," whispered Holmes. "That is back through the house into Saxe-Coburg Square. I hope that you have done what I asked you, Jones?"
"They have laid the supper, then," he said, rubbing his hands.
"They have, however, allowed me a policeman, who may remain in the house with me."
"They impose on the people," he repeated.
"They keep dwagging the wegiment to and fwo all day. If they mean to
"They must be cunning devils," he exclaimed at last. "How could they have decoyed him down there? The Embankment is not on the direct line to the station. The bridge, no doubt, was too crowded, even on such a night, for their purpose. Well, Watson, we shall see who will win in the long run. I am going out now!"
"They must be feeling dull, too," said one of the bolder officers,
"They must understand that we can only lose by taking the offensive.
"They often vanish before the ceremony, and occasionally during the honeymoon; but I cannot call to mind anything quite so prompt as this. Pray let me have the details."
"They probably think I am offering them the grain to bribe them to
"They say that the rivals are reconciled, thanks to the angina..."
"They say the ball will be very good," replied the princess, drawing
"They say the poor countess is very ill. The doctor says it is
"They seem to have been of a most interesting character--dummy bell-ropes, and ventilators which do not ventilate. With your permission, Miss Stoner, we shall now carry our researches into the inner apartment."
"They tell me this is the room the Emperor Alexander occupied?
"They'll cweep up to the garden; you'll wide up fwom there with the
"They've been saying so a long while," said the count, "and
"They've brought us all to ruin... the brigands!" he repeated, and
"They've withdrawn the front line, it has retired," said they,
"They, the soldiers at the battery, Prince Andrew killed... that old
"Third right, fourth left," answered the assistant promptly, closing the door.
"This Godfrey Norton was evidently an important factor in the matter. He was a lawyer. That sounded ominous. What was the relation between them, and what the object of his repeated visits? Was she his client, his friend, or his mistress? If the former, she had probably transferred the photograph to his keeping. If the latter, it was less likely. On the issue of this question depended whether I should continue my work at Briony Lodge, or turn my attention to the gentleman's chambers in the Temple. It was a delicate point, and it widened the field of my inquiry. I fear that I bore you with these details, but I have to let you see my little difficulties, if you are to understand the situation."
"This aroused my curiosity, so when I went out for a walk in the grounds with my charge, I strolled round to the side from which I could see the windows of this part of the house. There were four of them in a row, three of which were simply dirty, while the fourth was shuttered up. They were evidently all deserted. As I strolled up and down, glancing at them occasionally, Mr. Rucastle came out to me, looking as merry and jovial as ever.
"This concluded the examination of the witness."
"This discovery, and the evident confusion which the cripple showed, made the inspector realise that the matter was serious. The rooms were carefully examined, and results all pointed to an abominable crime. The front room was plainly furnished as a sitting-room and led into a small bedroom, which looked out upon the back of one of the wharves. Between the wharf and the bedroom window is a narrow strip, which is dry at low tide but is covered at high tide with at least four and a half feet of water. The bedroom window was a broad one and opened from below. On examination traces of blood were to be seen upon the windowsill, and several scattered drops were visible upon the wooden floor of the bedroom. Thrust away behind a curtain in the front room were all the clothes of Mr. Neville St. Clair, with the exception of his coat. His boots, his socks, his hat, and his watch--all were there. There were no signs of violence upon any of these garments, and there were no other traces of Mr. Neville St. Clair. Out of the window he must apparently have gone for no other exit could be discovered, and the ominous bloodstains upon the sill gave little promise that he could save himself by swimming, for the tide was at its very highest at the moment of the tragedy.
"This has been done," said I, examining the wound, "by a very heavy and sharp instrument."
"This hat is three years old. These flat brims curled at the edge came in then. It is a hat of the very best quality. Look at the band of ribbed silk and the excellent lining. If this man could afford to buy so expensive a hat three years ago, and has had no hat since, then he has assuredly gone down in the world."
"This is a very deep business," he said at last. "There are a thousand details which I should desire to know before I decide upon our course of action. Yet we have not a moment to lose. If we were to come to Stoke Moran to-day, would it be possible for us to see over these rooms without the knowledge of your stepfather?"
"This is my niece," said the count, introducing Sonya--"You don't
"This is not at all the thing," he said. "What sort of Polish
"This is the envelope," he continued. "The postmark is London--eastern division. Within are the very words which were upon my father's last message: 'K. K. K.'; and then 'Put the papers on the sundial.' "
"This is the first act. Those that follow are naturally increasingly
"This is the girl's stepfather, Mr. James Windibank," said Holmes. "He has written to me to say that he would be here at six. Come in!"
"This is what I want, my dear fellow," said the count to the
"This is what you must do," said Boris. "I will do the honors of the
"This may interest you, Lestrade," he remarked, holding it out. "The murder was done with it."
"This time, at least, I did not scorn her advice. I staggered to my feet and ran with her along the corridor and down a winding stair. The latter led to another broad passage, and just as we reached it we heard the sound of running feet and the shouting of two voices, one answering the other from the floor on which we were and from the one beneath. My guide stopped and looked about her like one who is at her wit's end. Then she threw open a door which led into a bedroom, through the window of which the moon was shining brightly.
"This was quite too good to lose, Watson. I was just balancing whether I should run for it, or whether I should perch behind her landau when a cab came through the street. The driver looked twice at such a shabby fare, but I jumped in before he could object. 'The Church of St. Monica,' said I, 'and half a sovereign if you reach it in twenty minutes.' It was twenty-five minutes to twelve, and of course it was clear enough what was in the wind.
"This way, uncle," cried the girl. "We'll pass through the side
"This went on day after day, Mr. Holmes, and on Saturday the manager came in and planked down four golden sovereigns for my week's work. It was the same next week, and the same the week after. Every morning I was there at ten, and every afternoon I left at two. By degrees Mr. Duncan Ross took to coming in only once of a morning, and then, after a time, he did not come in at all. Still, of course, I never dared to leave the room for an instant, for I was not sure when he might come, and the billet was such a good one, and suited me so well, that I would not risk the loss of it.
"This, I take it, belongs to the room in which you used to sleep, the centre one to your sister's, and the one next to the main building to Dr. Roylott's chamber?"
"Those were horses!" Balaga continued the tale. "That time I'd
"Those who pass the examinations, I suppose," replied Kochubey,
"Threatens to send them the photograph. And she will do it. I know that she will do it. You do not know her, but she has a soul of steel. She has the face of the most beautiful of women, and the mind of the most resolute of men. Rather than I should marry another woman, there are no lengths to which she would not go--none."
"Three-fourths of the business enterprises of this country are conducted
"Thrice have they slain me, thrice have I risen from the dead.
"Through the skylight. We shall soon see how he managed it." He swung himself up onto the roof. "Ah, yes," he cried, "here's the end of a long light ladder against the eaves. That is how he did it."
"Tiens!" said the captain.
"Tit! I say, Tit!" said the groom.
"To Clotilde Lothman von Saxe-Meningen, second daughter of the King of Scandinavia. You may know the strict principles of her family. She is herself the very soul of delicacy. A shadow of a doubt as to my conduct would bring the matter to an end."
"To be on the march in such weather..." he began.
"To be sure, we all have to die. I'm not against the commune,"
"To be sure, your excellency." replied the architect.
"To bring men to be well acquainted with the duties of a soldier," wrote
"To change the water in this glass. I am just finishing the design."
"To combat the evil which sways the world..." Pierre repeated, and a
"To do nothing whatever. There will probably be some small unpleasantness. Do not join in it. It will end in my being conveyed into the house. Four or five minutes afterwards the sitting-room window will open. You are to station yourself close to that open window."
"To endure war is the most difficult subordination of man's
"To presence the tranquillity of the city," explains Count Rostopchin.
"To search far..." repeated the count, evidently sorry Simon had not
"To see the Governor by his excellency's order," answered
"To smoke," he answered. "It is quite a three pipe problem, and I beg that you won't speak to me for fifty minutes." He curled himself up in his chair, with his thin knees drawn up to his hawk-like nose, and there he sat with his eyes closed and his black clay pipe thrusting out like the bill of some strange bird. I had come to the conclusion that he had dropped asleep, and indeed was nodding myself, when he suddenly sprang out of his chair with the gesture of a man who has made up his mind and put his pipe down upon the mantelpiece.
"To speak to her now wouldn't do," said the princess all the same.
"To tell the truth"--he sank his face into his thin, white hands--"I have felt helpless. I have felt like one of those poor rabbits when the snake is writhing towards it. I seem to be in the grasp of some resistless, inexorable evil, which no foresight and no precautions can guard against."
"To tell you the truth, between ourselves, God only knows what state
"To the Committee on Army Regulations, and I have recommended that
"To the Emperor."
"To the Governor's, as you ordered," answered the coachman.
"To the Head of the French Government... Au chef du gouvernement
"To the Leadenhall Street Post Office, to be left till called for. He said that if they were sent to the office he would be chaffed by all the other clerks about having letters from a lady, so I offered to typewrite them, like he did his, but he wouldn't have that, for he said that when I wrote them they seemed to come from me, but when they were typewritten he always felt that the machine had come between us. That will just show you how fond he was of me, Mr. Holmes, and the little things that he would think of."
"To the army."
"To the crossing!" said the general coldly and sternly in reply to
"To the fifth gun, wheel it up!" came shouts from one side.
"To the health of our Sovereign, the Emperor!" he cried, and at
"To the left!... Keep to the right!" the men shouted to him.
"To the man who loves art for its own sake," remarked Sherlock Holmes, tossing aside the advertisement sheet of the Daily Telegraph, "it is frequently in its least important and lowliest manifestations that the keenest pleasure is to be derived. It is pleasant to me to observe, Watson, that you have so far grasped this truth that in these little records of our cases which you have been good enough to draw up, and, I am bound to say, occasionally to embellish, you have given prominence not so much to the many causes celebres and sensational trials in which I have figured but rather to those incidents which may have been trivial in themselves, but which have given room for those faculties of deduction and of logical synthesis which I have made my special province."
"To the police?"
"To the right from the corridor, Euer Hochgeboren! There you will
"To try his luck or the certainty?" Rostov asked himself.
"To what committee has the memorandum been referred?" inquired
"To whom shall it be given?" the Emperor Alexander asked
"To your places!" cried the young officer to the men gathered
"Today--it was the same affair. Oh, Mary, don't remind me of it!"
"Tomorrow very likely I may be sent with some message to the
"Tomorrow, I hear, the Preobrazhenskis will give them a dinner."
"Tomorrow," replied Rostov and left the room.
"Too dear!" Natasha remarked. "How pleased the children will be
"Tproo! Get out of the way! Hi!... Tproo!..." The shouting of Balaga
"Treason" were calmly met by the orator who finished: "George III may
"Try the settee," said Holmes, relapsing into his armchair and putting his fingertips together, as was his custom when in judicial moods. "I know, my dear Watson, that you share my love of all that is bizarre and outside the conventions and humdrum routine of everyday life. You have shown your relish for it by the enthusiasm which has prompted you to chronicle, and, if you will excuse my saying so, somewhat to embellish so many of my own little adventures."
"Tss, tt...!" said the little man. "Ah, what a sin... what a sin!"
"Turn this way!" he shouted, jumping over the ice which creaked
"Tut, tut, tut! Tell that to others," said the officer, waving his
"Two days later this same performance was gone through under exactly similar circumstances. Again I changed my dress, again I sat in the window, and again I laughed very heartily at the funny stories of which my employer had an immense repertoire, and which he told inimitably. Then he handed me a yellow-backed novel, and moving my chair a little sideways, that my own shadow might not fall upon the page, he begged me to read aloud to him. I read for about ten minutes, beginning in the heart of a chapter, and then suddenly, in the middle of a sentence, he ordered me to cease and to change my dress.
"Two years have passed since then, and my life has been until lately lonelier than ever. A month ago, however, a dear friend, whom I have known for many years, has done me the honour to ask my hand in marriage. His name is Armitage--Percy Armitage--the second son of Mr. Armitage, of Crane Water, near Reading. My stepfather has offered no opposition to the match, and we are to be married in the course of the spring. Two days ago some repairs were started in the west wing of the building, and my bedroom wall has been pierced, so that I have had to move into the chamber in which my sister died, and to sleep in the very bed in which she slept. Imagine, then, my thrill of terror when last night, as I lay awake, thinking over her terrible fate, I suddenly heard in the silence of the night the low whistle which had been the herald of her own death. I sprang up and lit the lamp, but nothing was to be seen in the room. I was too shaken to go to bed again, however, so I dressed, and as soon as it was daylight I slipped down, got a dog-cart at the Crown Inn, which is opposite, and drove to Leatherhead, from whence I have come on this morning with the one object of seeing you and asking your advice."
"Ugh! I don't like that fellow," he said, regardless of the
"Ugh. The hussars will get it hot!" said Nesvitski; "they are within
"Ulyulyulyu! ulyulyu!..." he cried. When he caught sight of the
"Ulyulyulyu!" whispered Rostov, pouting his lips. The borzois jumped
"Uncle Tom's Cabin," published two years after the Compromise of 1850.
"Uncle" dismounted at the porch of his little wooden house which
"Uncle" for his guitar and at once found the chords of the song.
"Uncle" had the reputation of being the most honorable and
"Uncle" led the visitors through the anteroom into a small hall with
"Uncle" too was in high spirits and far from being offended by the
"Uncle's" huntsman was galloping from the other side across the
"Under the lower pillow."
"Undoubtedly. It is quite clear that the colonel was a cool and desperate man, who was absolutely determined that nothing should stand in the way of his little game, like those out-and-out pirates who will leave no survivor from a captured ship. Well, every moment now is precious, so if you feel equal to it we shall go down to Scotland Yard at once as a preliminary to starting for Eyford."
"Undress him! What are you waiting for?" he cried angrily to the
"Universal democracy," sighed Carlyle, who was widely read in the United
"Unless this is a clever forgery to put us on the wrong scent. The ring, after all, proves nothing. It may have been taken from him."
"Vasili Dmitrich, I thank you for the honor," she said, with an
"Ve must vight to the last tr-r-op of our plood!" said the
"Very glad to see you. I dine at seven. There is a woodcock, I believe. By the way, in view of recent occurrences, perhaps I ought to ask Mrs. Hudson to examine its crop."
"Very good!" said the prince closing the door behind him, and Tikhon
"Very good, Lestrade," said Holmes, laughing. "You really are very fine indeed. Let me see it." He took up the paper in a listless way, but his attention instantly became riveted, and he gave a little cry of satisfaction. "This is indeed important," said he.
"Very good. I shall look into the matter between this and then. Good-bye; it is just possible that I may have to come over here again before evening."
"Very likely not. However that may be, the young lady was very decidedly carried away, and, having quite made up her mind that her stepfather was in France, the suspicion of treachery never for an instant entered her mind. She was flattered by the gentleman's attentions, and the effect was increased by the loudly expressed admiration of her mother. Then Mr. Angel began to call, for it was obvious that the matter should be pushed as far as it would go if a real effect were to be produced. There were meetings, and an engagement, which would finally secure the girl's affections from turning towards anyone else. But the deception could not be kept up forever. These pretended journeys to France were rather cumbrous. The thing to do was clearly to bring the business to an end in such a dramatic manner that it would leave a permanent impression upon the young lady's mind and prevent her from looking upon any other suitor for some time to come. Hence those vows of fidelity exacted upon a Testament, and hence also the allusions to a possibility of something happening on the very morning of the wedding. James Windibank wished Miss Sutherland to be so bound to Hosmer Angel, and so uncertain as to his fate, that for ten years to come, at any rate, she would not listen to another man. As far as the church door he brought her, and then, as he could go no farther, he conveniently vanished away by the old trick of stepping in at one door of a four-wheeler and out at the other. I think that was the chain of events, Mr. Windibank!"
"Very likely not. It is most important, all the same. As to the note, it is important also, or at least the initials are, so I congratulate you again."
"Very naturally not. Did you see Miss Doran on the day before the wedding?"
"Very naturally. By the way, about the bird, we were compelled to eat it."
"Very possibly the theater of war will move so near to us that..."
"Very sorry to knock you up, Watson," said he, "but it's the common lot this morning. Mrs. Hudson has been knocked up, she retorted upon me, and I on you."
"Very strange!" muttered Holmes, pulling at the rope. "There are one or two very singular points about this room. For example, what a fool a builder must be to open a ventilator into another room, when, with the same trouble, he might have communicated with the outside air!"
"Very well, then!" shouted the little officer, undaunted and not
"Very well, very well!" muttered the officer, threateningly, and
"Very well. And, I say, Doctor, there may be some little danger, so kindly put your army revolver in your pocket." He waved his hand, turned on his heel, and disappeared in an instant among the crowd.
"Very, indeed. And what does she propose to do with the photograph?"
"Vesenny? Oh, he's thrown himself down there in the passage. Fast
"Vienna considers the bases of the proposed treaty so unattainable
"Vile woman!" shouted the princess, darting unexpectedly at Anna
"Vivarika! Vif-seruvaru! Sedyablyaka!" repeated the soldier,
"Vivat!" and looked ecstatically at the spot where Napoleon had been
"Vivat!" and, commanding the Uhlans to follow him, spurred his horse
"Vivat!" shouted the Poles, ecstatically, breaking their ranks and
"Voila l'agrement des camps, monsieur le Prince,"* said the staff
"Vous etes le bourgeois?"* the officer asked Gerasim.
"Wait a bit, here's a letter for you," said the old man suddenly,
"Wait a little, Mr. Holder. We must come back to that. About this girl, Miss Holder. You saw her return by the kitchen door, I presume?"
"Wait a little, gentlemen," said he. "The battle is won, and there
"Wait!" cried Dolokhov, hammering with the bottle on the window sill
"Wait, haven't you dropped it?" said Rostov, picking up the
"Wait--just a word! When he has been transferred to the Guards..."
"Wants to turn on the other side," whispered the servant, and got up
"Warm! You'd be as warm, maybe, if you were as pestered as I am. When I pay good money for a good article there should be an end of the business; but it's 'Where are the geese?' and 'Who did you sell the geese to?' and 'What will you take for the geese?' One would think they were the only geese in the world, to hear the fuss that is made over them."
"Was Kutuzov well? When had he left Krems?" and so on. The Emperor
"Was he the only applicant?"
"Was it from the cold?" asked someone.
"Was the cup left here?"
"Was the window open?"
"We are close there now," my friend remarked. "This fellow Merryweather is a bank director, and personally interested in the matter. I thought it as well to have Jones with us also. He is not a bad fellow, though an absolute imbecile in his profession. He has one positive virtue. He is as brave as a bulldog and as tenacious as a lobster if he gets his claws upon anyone. Here we are, and they are waiting for us."
"We are on the outskirts of Lee," said my companion. "We have touched on three English counties in our short drive, starting in Middlesex, passing over an angle of Surrey, and ending in Kent. See that light among the trees? That is The Cedars, and beside that lamp sits a woman whose anxious ears have already, I have little doubt, caught the clink of our horse's feet."
"We are to spend the night in Znaim."
"We both thought the best resource was flight, when pursued by so formidable an antagonist; so you will find the nest empty when you call to-morrow. As to the photograph, your client may rest in peace. I love and am loved by a better man than he. The King may do what he will without hindrance from one whom he has cruelly wronged. I keep it only to safeguard myself, and to preserve a weapon which will always secure me from any steps which he might take in the future. I leave a photograph which he might care to possess; and I remain, dear Mr. Sherlock Holmes,
"We can take four more men," said the steward. "They can have my
"We can't have less--yes, three... the mayonnaise, that's one," said
"We could see the other side of the road and the Park."
"We couldn't take Murat prisoner this morning or get to the place in
"We denounce," exclaimed the Labor party in 1888, "the Democratic and
"We do all our correspondence with this machine at the office, and no doubt it is a little worn," our visitor answered, glancing keenly at Holmes with his bright little eyes.
"We don't do the French any harm," said Tikhon, evidently frightened
"We don't expect to get him home! We must ask the doctor."
"We don't riot, we're following the orders," declared Karp, and at
"We have at least an hour before us," he remarked, "for they can hardly take any steps until the good pawnbroker is safely in bed. Then they will not lose a minute, for the sooner they do their work the longer time they will have for their escape. We are at present, Doctor--as no doubt you have divined--in the cellar of the City branch of one of the principal London banks. Mr. Merryweather is the chairman of directors, and he will explain to you that there are reasons why the more daring criminals of London should take a considerable interest in this cellar at present."
"We have been looking for you everywhere," said the adjutant. "The
"We have got to the deductions and the inferences," said Lestrade, winking at me. "I find it hard enough to tackle facts, Holmes, without flying away after theories and fancies."
"We have had the pleasure of making the doctor's acquaintance," said Holmes, and in a few words he sketched out what had occurred. Miss Stoner turned white to the lips as she listened.
"We have known for some time that a clever gang was at work," said the inspector. "They have been turning out half-crowns by the thousand. We even traced them as far as Reading, but could get no farther, for they had covered their traces in a way that showed that they were very old hands. But now, thanks to this lucky chance, I think that we have got them right enough."
"We heard so," replied the man.
"We may as well go back," said the son in French.
"We must be circumspect, for we are dealing with a very cunning man. We can do nothing until seven o'clock. At that hour we shall be with you, and it will not be long before we solve the mystery."
"We must distinguish between the Vienna cabinet and the Emperor of
"We must sit without light. He would see it through the ventilator."
"We shall be at the Copper Beeches by seven o'clock, my friend and I. The Rucastles will be gone by that time, and Toller will, we hope, be incapable. There only remains Mrs. Toller, who might give the alarm. If you could send her into the cellar on some errand, and then turn the key upon her, you would facilitate matters immensely."
"We shall endeavour to clear up these points for you. And, first, one or two questions, Mr. Wilson. This assistant of yours who first called your attention to the advertisement--how long had he been with you?"
"We shall not send an emigrant beyond the Mississippi in a hundred
"We shall see." He pushed past the servant and rushed into the drawing-room, followed by the King and myself. The furniture was scattered about in every direction, with dismantled shelves and open drawers, as if the lady had hurriedly ransacked them before her flight. Holmes rushed at the bell-pull, tore back a small sliding shutter, and, plunging in his hand, pulled out a photograph and a letter. The photograph was of Irene Adler herself in evening dress, the letter was superscribed to "Sherlock Holmes, Esq. To be left till called for." My friend tore it open, and we all three read it together. It was dated at midnight of the preceding night and ran in this way:
"We shall spend the night in your room, and we shall investigate the cause of this noise which has disturbed you."
"We went upstairs together, the colonel first with the lamp, the fat manager and I behind him. It was a labyrinth of an old house, with corridors, passages, narrow winding staircases, and little low doors, the thresholds of which were hollowed out by the generations who had crossed them. There were no carpets and no signs of any furniture above the ground floor, while the plaster was peeling off the walls, and the damp was breaking through in green, unhealthy blotches. I tried to put on as unconcerned an air as possible, but I had not forgotten the warnings of the lady, even though I disregarded them, and I kept a keen eye upon my two companions. Ferguson appeared to be a morose and silent man, but I could see from the little that he said that he was at least a fellow-countryman.
"We were both in the photograph."
"We were ordered to be at the place before nine, but we haven't
"We'll reckon up! Well, have you been to the Governor's?" asked
"We'll send the infantwy down by the swamps," Denisov continued.
"We're hunting in couples again, Doctor, you see," said Jones in his consequential way. "Our friend here is a wonderful man for starting a chase. All he wants is an old dog to help him to do the running down."
"We've stayed too long!" said the count with involuntary vexation.
"Well and when the money's gone, what then?"
"Well now, good-by. Tell Denisov, 'at the first shot at
"Well now, isn't she a fool!" shouted the prince, pushing the book
"Well then, mind and have cocks' comb in the turtle soup, you know!"
"Well!..." said the old count, spreading out his arms and sinking
"Well, I did what she said, Mr. Holmes, and I carried the bird all the way to Kilburn. I told my pal what I had done, for he was a man that it was easy to tell a thing like that to. He laughed until he choked, and we got a knife and opened the goose. My heart turned to water, for there was no sign of the stone, and I knew that some terrible mistake had occurred. I left the bird, rushed back to my sister's, and hurried into the back yard. There was not a bird to be seen there.
"Well, I don't know why not," said the inspector. "He doesn't look a credit to the Bow Street cells, does he?" He slipped his key into the lock, and we all very quietly entered the cell. The sleeper half turned, and then settled down once more into a deep slumber. Holmes stooped to the water-jug, moistened his sponge, and then rubbed it twice vigorously across and down the prisoner's face.
"Well, I followed you to your door, and so made sure that I was really an object of interest to the celebrated Mr. Sherlock Holmes. Then I, rather imprudently, wished you good-night, and started for the Temple to see my husband.
"Well, I found my plans very seriously menaced. It looked as if the pair might take an immediate departure, and so necessitate very prompt and energetic measures on my part. At the church door, however, they separated, he driving back to the Temple, and she to her own house. 'I shall drive out in the park at five as usual,' she said as she left him. I heard no more. They drove away in different directions, and I went off to make my own arrangements."
"Well, I got the two dozen from a salesman in Covent Garden."
"Well, I have no connection with any other people who have been making inquiries," said Holmes carelessly. "If you won't tell us the bet is off, that is all. But I'm always ready to back my opinion on a matter of fowls, and I have a fiver on it that the bird I ate is country bred."
"Well, I have only just heard the facts, but my mind is made up."
"Well, I think it is. The bigwigs here think so too, but they
"Well, I thought over the matter all day, and by evening I was in low spirits again; for I had quite persuaded myself that the whole affair must be some great hoax or fraud, though what its object might be I could not imagine. It seemed altogether past belief that anyone could make such a will, or that they would pay such a sum for doing anything so simple as copying out the Encyclopaedia Britannica. Vincent Spaulding did what he could to cheer me up, but by bedtime I had reasoned myself out of the whole thing. However, in the morning I determined to have a look at it anyhow, so I bought a penny bottle of ink, and with a quill-pen, and seven sheets of foolscap paper, I started off for Pope's Court.
"Well, I've nothing against it," the prince said to himself, "but he
"Well, Mamma? Everything is ready. What's the matter?" asked
"Well, Michael Mitrich, sir?" he said, addressing one of the
"Well, Miss Hunter, if your mind is made up, that settles the question," said Holmes, smiling.
"Well, Mr. Holmes, from the moment that I understood that there was something about that suite of rooms which I was not to know, I was all on fire to go over them. It was not mere curiosity, though I have my share of that. It was more a feeling of duty--a feeling that some good might come from my penetrating to this place. They talk of woman's instinct; perhaps it was woman's instinct which gave me that feeling. At any rate, it was there, and I was keenly on the lookout for any chance to pass the forbidden door.
"Well, Mr. Holmes, when I got back to my lodgings and found little enough in the cupboard, and two or three bills upon the table. I began to ask myself whether I had not done a very foolish thing. After all, if these people had strange fads and expected obedience on the most extraordinary matters, they were at least ready to pay for their eccentricity. Very few governesses in England are getting $100 a year. Besides, what use was my hair to me? Many people are improved by wearing it short and perhaps I should be among the number. Next day I was inclined to think that I had made a mistake, and by the day after I was sure of it. I had almost overcome my pride so far as to go back to the agency and inquire whether the place was still open when I received this letter from the gentleman himself. I have it here and I will read it to you:
"Well, Nastasya Ivanovna!" whispered the count, winking at him.
"Well, Prince, so Genoa and Lucca are now just family estates of the
"Well, Vasilich, is everything ready?" asked the count, and stroking
"Well, adorer and courtier of the Emperor Alexander, why don't you
"Well, all the same, you must refuse him."
"Well, and he?" asked the count.
"Well, and to whom did you apply about Bory?" asked the countess.
"Well, and what are you going to do? Will you stay here if the enemy
"Well, are they all right?" said the soldier with a smile. "You
"Well, at last I've finished, now I'll rest," thought the prince,
"Well, at least," said Holmes, "you have had your revenge upon them. There can be no question that it was your oil-lamp which, when it was crushed in the press, set fire to the wooden walls, though no doubt they were too excited in the chase after you to observe it at the time. Now keep your eyes open in this crowd for your friends of last night, though I very much fear that they are a good hundred miles off by now."
"Well, certainly that is also a conceivable hypothesis," said Holmes, smiling. "And now, Lord St. Simon, I think that I have nearly all my data. May I ask whether you were seated at the breakfast-table so that you could see out of the window?"
"Well, do you recognize your little madcap playmate?" asked the
"Well, down they came to the west country, there was no shaking them off, and there they have lived rent free on my best land ever since. There was no rest for me, no peace, no forgetfulness; turn where I would, there was his cunning, grinning face at my elbow. It grew worse as Alice grew up, for he soon saw I was more afraid of her knowing my past than of the police. Whatever he wanted he must have, and whatever it was I gave him without question, land, money, houses, until at last he asked a thing which I could not give. He asked for Alice.
"Well, everything is going to ruin! Robbery in the law courts, in
"Well, father was going off to France again in a week, and Hosmer wrote and said that it would be safer and better not to see each other until he had gone. We could write in the meantime, and he used to write every day. I took the letters in in the morning, so there was no need for father to know."
"Well, friends, I have now thought the whole matter over and this is
"Well, gentlemen, I see that it is I who will have to pay for the
"Well, have you heard the great news? Prince Kutuzov is field
"Well, he is sure to keep an eye on the papers, since, to a poor man, the loss was a heavy one. He was clearly so scared by his mischance in breaking the window and by the approach of Peterson that he thought of nothing but flight, but since then he must have bitterly regretted the impulse which caused him to drop his bird. Then, again, the introduction of his name will cause him to see it, for everyone who knows him will direct his attention to it. Here you are, Peterson, run down to the advertising agency and have this put in the evening papers."
"Well, if you do, so much the better, and you can go back to her!"
"Well, is ev'wything weady?" asked Denisov. "Bwing the horses."
"Well, it is conjectured to be so. I shall take nothing for granted until I have the opportunity of looking personally into it. I will explain the state of things to you, as far as I have been able to understand it, in a very few words.
"Well, it is just as I have been telling you, Mr. Sherlock Holmes," said Jabez Wilson, mopping his forehead; "I have a small pawnbroker's business at Coburg Square, near the City. It's not a very large affair, and of late years it has not done more than just give me a living. I used to be able to keep two assistants, but now I only keep one; and I would have a job to pay him but that he is willing to come for half wages so as to learn the business."
"Well, it is not for me to judge you," said Holmes as the old man signed the statement which had been drawn out. "I pray that we may never be exposed to such a temptation."
"Well, it is very ingenious," said I, laughing; "but since, as you said just now, there has been no crime committed, and no harm done save the loss of a goose, all this seems to be rather a waste of energy."
"Well, it was the beginning of '84 when my father came to live at Horsham, and all went as well as possible with us until the January of '85. On the fourth day after the new year I heard my father give a sharp cry of surprise as we sat together at the breakfast-table. There he was, sitting with a newly opened envelope in one hand and five dried orange pips in the outstretched palm of the other one. He had always laughed at what he called my cock-and-bull story about the colonel, but he looked very scared and puzzled now that the same thing had come upon himself.
"Well, it's as you like," said the staff captain. "And what has
"Well, lad," and a smile changed the tone of his voice "we thought
"Well, let her sleep," said Marya Dmitrievna as she went of the room
"Well, let us hope so. But our doubts will very soon be solved, for here, unless I am much mistaken, is the person in question."
"Well, let's go and sing 'The Brook.'"
"Well, let's go," said Denisov, and rode all the way to the
"Well, look at this!" He took up a small saucer of milk which stood on the top of it.
"Well, madam," he began, stooping over the book close to his
"Well, mon cher, have you got the manifesto?" asked the old count.
"Well, mon cher," said the vicomte, having seated himself beside
"Well, moonshine is a brighter thing than fog," said Holmes, laughing. "But I am very much mistaken if this is not Hatherley Farm upon the left."
"Well, my dear?" asked the countess.
"Well, never mind, some of the things can be unloaded," he added
"Well, now to the health of handsome women!" said Dolokhov, and with
"Well, now, in considering this case there are two points about young McCarthy's narrative which struck us both instantly, although they impressed me in his favour and you against him. One was the fact that his father should, according to his account, cry 'Cooee!' before seeing him. The other was his singular dying reference to a rat. He mumbled several words, you understand, but that was all that caught the son's ear. Now from this double point our research must commence, and we will begin it by presuming that what the lad says is absolutely true."
"Well, obviously it could not have been meant for the son. The son, as far as he knew, was in Bristol. It was mere chance that he was within earshot. The 'Cooee!' was meant to attract the attention of whoever it was that he had the appointment with. But 'Cooee' is a distinctly Australian cry, and one which is used between Australians. There is a strong presumption that the person whom McCarthy expected to meet him at Boscombe Pool was someone who had been in Australia."
"Well, of course it was obvious from the first that this Mr. Hosmer Angel must have some strong object for his curious conduct, and it was equally clear that the only man who really profited by the incident, as far as we could see, was the stepfather. Then the fact that the two men were never together, but that the one always appeared when the other was away, was suggestive. So were the tinted spectacles and the curious voice, which both hinted at a disguise, as did the bushy whiskers. My suspicions were all confirmed by his peculiar action in typewriting his signature, which, of course, inferred that his handwriting was so familiar to her that she would recognise even the smallest sample of it. You see all these isolated facts, together with many minor ones, all pointed in the same direction."
"Well, of course! That's what we were saying," replied the first
"Well, of course," replied Platon quickly, "the horses' saints.
"Well, old fellow," said he to the peasant guide, "lead us to
"Well, one more day and my grain and the peasants' will all be under
"Well, really!" he cried, and then he choked and laughed again until he was obliged to lie back, limp and helpless, in the chair.
"Well, really, I came to seek a theory, not to propound one. I have given you all the facts. Since you ask me, however, I may say that it has occurred to me as possible that the excitement of this affair, the consciousness that she had made so immense a social stride, had the effect of causing some little nervous disturbance in my wife."
"Well, say you went to the barn now, and listened. It depends on
"Well, send number three company again," the officer replied
"Well, she had a slate-coloured, broad-brimmed straw hat, with a feather of a brickish red. Her jacket was black, with black beads sewn upon it, and a fringe of little black jet ornaments. Her dress was brown, rather darker than coffee colour, with a little purple plush at the neck and sleeves. Her gloves were greyish and were worn through at the right forefinger. Her boots I didn't observe. She had small round, hanging gold earrings, and a general air of being fairly well-to-do in a vulgar, comfortable, easy-going way."
"Well, supposing N. N. swindled the country and the Tsar, and the
"Well, that is clear enough, certainly. But how about the foresight and the moral retrogression?"
"Well, that's all right," continued the regimental commander. "A cup
"Well, that's all!" said Kutuzov as he signed the last of the
"Well, that's only till the first engagement."
"Well, that's right. As soon as the countess wakes we'll be off, God
"Well, the Lord be thanked, Princess," said Mary Bogdanovna, not
"Well, the Lord have mercy on us!" said the count, half in jest,
"Well, the snuff, then, and the Freemasonry?"
"Well, then, au revoir!" said the count, and went out of the room.
"Well, then, do you imagine that this other one, Henry Baker, had anything to do with the matter?"
"Well, then, go back to the army," he said, drawing himself up to
"Well, then, listen! I'll go to the police officer, and you tell
"Well, then, mates... that very prince who..." some voice at the
"Well, then, of course I saw it all, and I ran off as hard as my feet would carry me to this man Breckinridge; but he had sold the lot at once, and not one word would he tell me as to where they had gone. You heard him yourselves to-night. Well, he has always answered me like that. My sister thinks that I am going mad. Sometimes I think that I am myself. And now--and now I am myself a branded thief, without ever having touched the wealth for which I sold my character. God help me! God help me!" He burst into convulsive sobbing, with his face buried in his hands.
"Well, then, you know," Nicholas went on, growing hot at the mere
"Well, then, you've lost your fiver, for it's town bred," snapped the salesman.
"Well, there are some on the stall with the gas-flare."
"Well, there is at least a curious coincidence of dates. A ventilator is made, a cord is hung, and a lady who sleeps in the bed dies. Does not that strike you?"
"Well, there seems to me to be only one possible solution. Mr. Rucastle seemed to be a very kind, good-natured man. Is it not possible that his wife is a lunatic, that he desires to keep the matter quiet for fear she should be taken to an asylum, and that he humours her fancies in every way in order to prevent an outbreak?"
"Well, they say," continued the adjutant with the same smile,
"Well, they've sent you a tidy sum," said Berg, eying the heavy
"Well, to come to an end of the matter, Mr. Holmes, and not to abuse your patience, there came a night when he made one of those drunken sallies from which he never came back. We found him, when we went to search for him, face downward in a little green-scummed pool, which lay at the foot of the garden. There was no sign of any violence, and the water was but two feet deep, so that the jury, having regard to his known eccentricity, brought in a verdict of 'suicide.' But I, who knew how he winced from the very thought of death, had much ado to persuade myself that he had gone out of his way to meet it. The matter passed, however, and my father entered into possession of the estate, and of some $14,000, which lay to his credit at the bank."
"Well, to my surprise and delight, everything was as right as possible. The table was set out ready for me, and Mr. Duncan Ross was there to see that I got fairly to work. He started me off upon the letter A, and then he left me; but he would drop in from time to time to see that all was right with me. At two o'clock he bade me good-day, complimented me upon the amount that I had written, and locked the door of the office after me.
"Well, to tell the truth, I saw then the first signs that I had ever seen that her temper was just a little sharp. The incident however, was too trivial to relate and can have no possible bearing upon the case."
"Well, very soon I found that I was saving considerable sums of money. I do not mean that any beggar in the streets of London could earn $700 a year--which is less than my average takings--but I had exceptional advantages in my power of making up, and also in a facility of repartee, which improved by practice and made me quite a recognised character in the City. All day a stream of pennies, varied by silver, poured in upon me, and it was a very bad day in which I failed to take $2.
"Well, we will take it as a working hypothesis for want of a better. Boone, as I have told you, was arrested and taken to the station, but it could not be shown that there had ever before been anything against him. He had for years been known as a professional beggar, but his life appeared to have been a very quiet and innocent one. There the matter stands at present, and the questions which have to be solved--what Neville St. Clair was doing in the opium den, what happened to him when there, where is he now, and what Hugh Boone had to do with his disappearance--are all as far from a solution as ever. I confess that I cannot recall any case within my experience which looked at the first glance so simple and yet which presented such difficulties."
"Well, what is it tonight?" said the mother, having arranged her
"Well, when I called last week I was shown into the little office as usual, but I found that Miss Stoper was not alone. A prodigiously stout man with a very smiling face and a great heavy chin which rolled down in fold upon fold over his throat sat at her elbow with a pair of glasses on his nose, looking very earnestly at the ladies who entered. As I came in he gave quite a jump in his chair and turned quickly to Miss Stoper.
"Well, when I came to think it all over in cool blood I was very much astonished, as you may both think, at this sudden commission which had been intrusted to me. On the one hand, of course, I was glad, for the fee was at least tenfold what I should have asked had I set a price upon my own services, and it was possible that this order might lead to other ones. On the other hand, the face and manner of my patron had made an unpleasant impression upon me, and I could not think that his explanation of the fuller's-earth was sufficient to explain the necessity for my coming at midnight, and his extreme anxiety lest I should tell anyone of my errand. However, I threw all fears to the winds, ate a hearty supper, drove to Paddington, and started off, having obeyed to the letter the injunction as to holding my tongue.
"Well, when they closed their League offices that was a sign that they cared no longer about Mr. Jabez Wilson's presence--in other words, that they had completed their tunnel. But it was essential that they should use it soon, as it might be discovered, or the bullion might be removed. Saturday would suit them better than any other day, as it would give them two days for their escape. For all these reasons I expected them to come to-night."
"Well, why are you going to the war?" asked Pierre.
"Well, yes, of course the pay is good--too good. That is what makes me uneasy. Why should they give you $120 a year, when they could have their pick for $40? There must be some strong reason behind."
"Well, yes. Save, perhaps, that. And yet this John Openshaw seems to me to be walking amid even greater perils than did the Sholtos."
"Well, you can ask the King of Proosia, for all I care. I've had enough of it. Get out of this!" He rushed fiercely forward, and the inquirer flitted away into the darkness.
"Well, you can do that later, but the chief thing is the left
"Well, you can easily think that that made me prick up my ears, for the business has not been over good for some years, and an extra couple of hundred would have been very handy.
"Well, you can imagine how hard it was to settle down to arduous work at $2 a week when I knew that I could earn as much in a day by smearing my face with a little paint, laying my cap on the ground, and sitting still. It was a long fight between my pride and the money, but the dollars won at last, and I threw up reporting and sat day after day in the corner which I had first chosen, inspiring pity by my ghastly face and filling my pockets with coppers. Only one man knew my secret. He was the keeper of a low den in which I used to lodge in Swandam Lane, where I could every morning emerge as a squalid beggar and in the evenings transform myself into a well-dressed man about town. This fellow, a Lascar, was well paid by me for his rooms, so that I knew that my secret was safe in his possession.
"Well, you know father didn't like anything of the sort. He wouldn't have any visitors if he could help it, and he used to say that a woman should be happy in her own family circle. But then, as I used to say to mother, a woman wants her own circle to begin with, and I had not got mine yet."
"Well, you know it's burned, so what's the use of talking?" said the
"Well, you know," said the sharp-nosed man they called Jackdaw in
"Well, you see, I'll tell you the whole secret of dueling in two
"Well, you should get some sleep now," said the Cossack.
"Well, you've told me nothing new," and the old man repeated,
"Well, your own good sense will suggest what measures I took next. I went in the shape of a loafer to Sir George's house, managed to pick up an acquaintance with his valet, learned that his master had cut his head the night before, and, finally, at the expense of six shillings, made all sure by buying a pair of his cast-off shoes. With these I journeyed down to Streatham and saw that they exactly fitted the tracks."
"Well," began the old maid, "a young lady once went out, took a
"Well--had a good time?" said the old count, smiling gaily and
"Well?" returned the old man.
"Were there gipsies in the plantation at the time?"
"Were you engaged to the gentleman at this time?"
"Wetched business," he muttered to himself. "How much is left in the
"Wh-what is the matter?" asked both the young and old Rostov.
"What I cannot understand," said I, "is why they should have spared you when they found you lying fainting in the garden. Perhaps the villain was softened by the woman's entreaties."
"What a beauty--a very queen!" said the nurse as she came to the
"What a charming creature your younger girl is," said the visitor;
"What a fine fellow you are, friend!" said the Cossack to a convoy
"What a lot of those Frenchies were taken today, and the fact is
"What a nice figure the policeman must have cut, my dear!" shouted
"What a pity you weren't at the Arkharovs' on Thursday. It was so
"What a splendid reign the Emperor Alexander's might have been!"
"What a style! How charmingly he describes!" said she, reading the
"What a treasure that Dmitri is," added the count with a smile
"What a woman--oh, what a woman!" cried the King of Bohemia, when we had all three read this epistle. "Did I not tell you how quick and resolute she was? Would she not have made an admirable queen? Is it not a pity that she was not on my level?"
"What a wonderful coincidence! Just during the service. But what a
"What a young lady she is!" remarked the major-domo.
"What about the left flank?" asked Pierre
"What am I to do with the people?" said Dron. "They're quite
"What are you disputing about?" said the major angrily. "What does
"What are you pushing for? Is the fire only for you? Look how he's
"What are you saying about the militia?" he asked Boris.
"What are you sharpening?" asked a man coming up to the wagon.
"What are you staring at, you good-for-nothing?... The count will be
"What are you staring at?" he shouted to the cook, who in her red
"What are you up to?" suddenly came the authoritative voice of a
"What becomes, then, of these nocturnal whistles, and what of the very peculiar words of the dying woman?"
"What brings you here?" cried the officers turning to the newcomer.
"What business is it of yours?" cried the count.
"What can be the matter, then? Can you suggest no explanation?"
"What can it be?" he thought. "The enemy in the rear of our army?
"What can one say about it?" replied the prince in a cold,
"What could we fasten this onto?" asked the servants, trying to
"What crowds! Just look at the crowds!... They've loaded goods
"What d'you think of the treat? All on silver plate," one of them
"What delicacy!" thought the princess. "Is it possible that Amelie"
"What devils these quartermasters are! See, the fifth company is
"What did you go into the pool for?" he asked.
"What did you want to see the count for?" she asked.
"What do I care? Let him hear! We're not dogs," said the
"What do you want, sir?" said the doctor. "What do you want? The
"What does he want the bits for?" said Karataev. "They'd make fine
"What does that woman want?" asked the officer.
"What else can be indicated by that right cuff so very shiny for five inches, and the left one with the smooth patch near the elbow where you rest it upon the desk?"
"What else do you expect?" answered the soldier. "She has no
"What for? Why? What is going on in the world?" he would ask himself
"What force!" remarked one. "Knocked the roof and ceiling all to
"What has Speranski to do with the army regulations?" asked Prince
"What has she been saying to you?" screamed the old man furiously.
"What have the young people come to nowadays, eh, Feoktist?" said
"What if the Smolensk people have offahd to waise militia for the
"What is 'the talk of all Moscow'?" Pierre asked angrily, rising
"What is he talking about?" thought Prince Andrew. "Oh, the
"What is it? What's the matter?"
"What is it?" asked the countess, startled; but seeing by her
"What is it?" asked the person in the other room.
"What is that?" asked the countess as if she did not know what the
"What is the German for 'shelter'?"
"What is the commander in chief doing here?" he asked.
"What is the government of this state? What has it been during the forty
"What is the matter with you, my darling? You look pale. Oh, you are
"What is the matter with you, my dear?" she said crossly to the maid
"What is the matter, Count?" asked the countess in a surprised and
"What is the matter, Mary?"
"What is the matter?" she asked.
"What is the meaning of it all, Mr. Holmes?"
"What is the name of this obliging youth?" asked Sherlock Holmes.
"What is the something?" asked he.
"What is the young man's own account of the matter?"
"What is there to see?" said the assistant.
"What is this, my dear? I hear that the luggage is being unloaded."
"What is to be done? In a few months the year will be up. The
"What manners! I thought they would never go," said the countess,
"What news, sir?" asked the officer, evidently anxious to start a
"What next?" the princess interrupted, smiling sardonically and
"What nonsense! Much I need it!" said Rostov, throwing the letter
"What now?" the officer asked with a cold look as if not recognizing
"What of the rat, then?"
"What on earth can be the matter with him?" I asked. "He is looking up at the numbers of the houses."
"What on earth does this mean?" I ejaculated after I had twice read over the extraordinary announcement.
"What orders, your excellency?" said the huntsman in his deep
"What people are these?" he shouted to the men, who were moving
"What prince? Ours?" said many voices, and the men were in such
"What rubbish you're talking!" said the countess.
"What swells they are! Why, the water streams from them! Don't
"What was the good of bringing him?" Tikhon interrupted hastily
"What were you saying?" he asked the general, who continuing his
"What will the Duke say," he murmured, "when he hears that one of the family has been subjected to such humiliation?"
"What would it cost you to say a word to the Emperor, and then he
"What year did you enter the service?" he asked with that
"What! To whom?... Nonsense!" cried the count, suddenly reddening
"What's in here?" he asked, tapping the safe.
"What's it all about? Why, the French have crossed the bridge that
"What's that that has fallen?" asked the accountant with a naive
"What's that? What do you make of it?" said Rostov to the hussar
"What's the good of denying it, my dear? Our dear countess was too
"What's the good of freedom to me, your excellency? We lived under
"What's the matter with her?" thought Pierre, glancing at her. She
"What's the matter with you? Are you ill?"
"What's the matter with you? Who are 'they'? What do you want?"
"What's the matter? I only congratulated them," said Zherkov.
"What's the matter?" exclaimed Prince Andrew standing still in his
"What's this?" said the doctor, rising from his bed. "Please go
"What, are you wounded, my lad?" said Tushin, approaching the gun on
"What, teasing again? Go to the devil! Eh?" said Anatole, making a
"What? Here? But why did they not blow up the bridge, if it was
"What? Saw the real Mack? With hands and feet?"
"What? What did he say?" was heard in the ranks of the Polish Uhlans
"What? What's that?" asked Anna Pavlovna, securing silence for the
"What?" answered the old man absent-mindedly.
"What?" asked the commander.
"What?" said Kutuzov, in the midst of Denisov's explanations, "are
"Whatever made me say 'Je vous aime'?" On the contrary, he now
"Whatever the European sovereigns and commanders may do to
"Whatever your reasons may be, you are perfectly correct," said she. "I started from home before six, reached Leatherhead at twenty past, and came in by the first train to Waterloo. Sir, I can stand this strain no longer; I shall go mad if it continues. I have no one to turn to--none, save only one, who cares for me, and he, poor fellow, can be of little aid. I have heard of you, Mr. Holmes; I have heard of you from Mrs. Farintosh, whom you helped in the hour of her sore need. It was from her that I had your address. Oh, sir, do you not think that you could help me, too, and at least throw a little light through the dense darkness which surrounds me? At present it is out of my power to reward you for your services, but in a month or six weeks I shall be married, with the control of my own income, and then at least you shall not find me ungrateful."
"When Dr. Roylott was in India he married my mother, Mrs. Stoner, the young widow of Major-General Stoner, of the Bengal Artillery. My sister Julia and I were twins, and we were only two years old at the time of my mother's re-marriage. She had a considerable sum of money--not less than $1000 a year--and this she bequeathed to Dr. Roylott entirely while we resided with him, with a provision that a certain annual sum should be allowed to each of us in the event of our marriage. Shortly after our return to England my mother died--she was killed eight years ago in a railway accident near Crewe. Dr. Roylott then abandoned his attempts to establish himself in practice in London and took us to live with him in the old ancestral house at Stoke Moran. The money which my mother had left was enough for all our wants, and there seemed to be no obstacle to our happiness.
"When I arrived at the house," continued Holmes, "I at once went very carefully round it to observe if there were any traces in the snow which might help me. I knew that none had fallen since the evening before, and also that there had been a strong frost to preserve impressions. I passed along the tradesmen's path, but found it all trampled down and indistinguishable. Just beyond it, however, at the far side of the kitchen door, a woman had stood and talked with a man, whose round impressions on one side showed that he had a wooden leg. I could even tell that they had been disturbed, for the woman had run back swiftly to the door, as was shown by the deep toe and light heel marks, while Wooden-leg had waited a little, and then had gone away. I thought at the time that this might be the maid and her sweetheart, of whom you had already spoken to me, and inquiry showed it was so. I passed round the garden without seeing anything more than random tracks, which I took to be the police; but when I got into the stable lane a very long and complex story was written in the snow in front of me.
"When I got back I told my maid, who had known him in California, and had always been his friend. I ordered her to say nothing, but to get a few things packed and my ulster ready. I know I ought to have spoken to Lord St. Simon, but it was dreadful hard before his mother and all those great people. I just made up my mind to run away and explain afterwards. I hadn't been at the table ten minutes before I saw Frank out of the window at the other side of the road. He beckoned to me and then began walking into the Park. I slipped out, put on my things, and followed him. Some woman came talking something or other about Lord St. Simon to me--seemed to me from the little I heard as if he had a little secret of his own before marriage also--but I managed to get away from her and soon overtook Frank. We got into a cab together, and away we drove to some lodgings he had taken in Gordon Square, and that was my true wedding after all those years of waiting. Frank had been a prisoner among the Apaches, had escaped, came on to 'Frisco, found that I had given him up for dead and had gone to England, followed me there, and had come upon me at last on the very morning of my second wedding."
"When I told him that duty and the oath were above everything, he
"When I went down there I found him talking with his son, so I smoked a cigar and waited behind a tree until he should be alone. But as I listened to his talk all that was black and bitter in me seemed to come uppermost. He was urging his son to marry my daughter with as little regard for what she might think as if she were a slut from off the streets. It drove me mad to think that I and all that I held most dear should be in the power of such a man as this. Could I not snap the bond? I was already a dying and a desperate man. Though clear of mind and fairly strong of limb, I knew that my own fate was sealed. But my memory and my girl! Both could be saved if I could but silence that foul tongue. I did it, Mr. Holmes. I would do it again. Deeply as I have sinned, I have led a life of martyrdom to atone for it. But that my girl should be entangled in the same meshes which held me was more than I could suffer. I struck him down with no more compunction than if he had been some foul and venomous beast. His cry brought back his son; but I had gained the cover of the wood, though I was forced to go back to fetch the cloak which I had dropped in my flight. That is the true story, gentlemen, of all that occurred."
"When Mrs. Turner has brought in the tray I will make it clear to you. Now," he said as he turned hungrily on the simple fare that our landlady had provided, "I must discuss it while I eat, for I have not much time. It is nearly five now. In two hours we must be on the scene of action. Miss Irene, or Madame, rather, returns from her drive at seven. We must be at Briony Lodge to meet her."
"When am I to receive the money, Count?"
"When did you get the letter? Was it from Olmutz?" repeated Prince
"When evening came I felt that it would be an imprudence to leave so precious a thing in the office behind me. Bankers' safes had been forced before now, and why should not mine be? If so, how terrible would be the position in which I should find myself! I determined, therefore, that for the next few days I would always carry the case backward and forward with me, so that it might never be really out of my reach. With this intention, I called a cab and drove out to my house at Streatham, carrying the jewel with me. I did not breathe freely until I had taken it upstairs and locked it in the bureau of my dressing-room.
"When he was gone I unlocked my bureau, made sure that my treasure was safe, and locked it again. Then I started to go round the house to see that all was secure--a duty which I usually leave to Mary but which I thought it well to perform myself that night. As I came down the stairs I saw Mary herself at the side window of the hall, which she closed and fastened as I approached.
"When my father built Bald Hills he thought the place was his: his
"When my father took over the Horsham property, he, at my request, made a careful examination of the attic, which had been always locked up. We found the brass box there, although its contents had been destroyed. On the inside of the cover was a paper label, with the initials of K. K. K. repeated upon it, and 'Letters, memoranda, receipts, and a register' written beneath. These, we presume, indicated the nature of the papers which had been destroyed by Colonel Openshaw. For the rest, there was nothing of much importance in the attic save a great many scattered papers and note-books bearing upon my uncle's life in America. Some of them were of the war time and showed that he had done his duty well and had borne the repute of a brave soldier. Others were of a date during the reconstruction of the Southern states, and were mostly concerned with politics, for he had evidently taken a strong part in opposing the carpet-bag politicians who had been sent down from the North.
"When speaking to the Emperor, try as far as you can to praise the
"When the snow melts they'll sink in the Polish swamps. Only they
"When we were taking coffee in the drawing-room that night after dinner, I told Arthur and Mary my experience, and of the precious treasure which we had under our roof, suppressing only the name of my client. Lucy Parr, who had brought in the coffee, had, I am sure, left the room; but I cannot swear that the door was closed. Mary and Arthur were much interested and wished to see the famous coronet, but I thought it better not to disturb it.
"When you combine the ideas of whistles at night, the presence of a band of gipsies who are on intimate terms with this old doctor, the fact that we have every reason to believe that the doctor has an interest in preventing his stepdaughter's marriage, the dying allusion to a band, and, finally, the fact that Miss Helen Stoner heard a metallic clang, which might have been caused by one of those metal bars that secured the shutters falling back into its place, I think that there is good ground to think that the mystery may be cleared along those lines."
"When you see a man with whiskers of that cut and the 'Pink 'un' protruding out of his pocket, you can always draw him by a bet," said he. "I daresay that if I had put $100 down in front of him, that man would not have given me such complete information as was drawn from him by the idea that he was doing me on a wager. Well, Watson, we are, I fancy, nearing the end of our quest, and the only point which remains to be determined is whether we should go on to this Mrs. Oakshott to-night, or whether we should reserve it for to-morrow. It is clear from what that surly fellow said that there are others besides ourselves who are anxious about the matter, and I should--"
"Whenever will you be ready?" asked the count coming to the door.
"Where am I? Oh yes, in the skirmishing line... pass and
"Where are all the folks going?"
"Where are they taking you to, you poor dear?" said she. "And the
"Where are we?" thought he. "It's the Kosoy meadow, I suppose. But
"Where are you going?" shouted Pierre to the man, who was driving to
"Where does that bell communicate with?" he asked at last pointing to a thick bell-rope which hung down beside the bed, the tassel actually lying upon the pillow.
"Where have you been? To Kiev?" Prince Andrew asked the old woman.
"Where is he? Can I see him--can I?" asked the princess.
"Where is the Emperor? Where is Kutuzov?" Rostov kept asking
"Where is the commander in chief?" asked Bolkonski.
"Where is the princess?" he asked. "Hiding?"
"Where the devil have the leg bands been shoved to?" said an
"Where there's law there's injustice," put in the little man.
"Where to now, your excellency?" asked the coachman.
"Where would I not go at the countess' command!" said Denisov, who
"Where's the Elder?" demanded Rostov in a loud voice.
"Where? At Bykov's, at the rat's... I knew it," replied a piping
"Whew... whew... whew!" he whistled just audibly as he rode into the
"Which house is it?" asked the driver.
"Which is the senior?" he asked, on seeing the prisoners.
"Which were very well justified," observed Holmes. "And now it is time that we arranged our little plans. I expect that within an hour matters will come to a head. In the meantime Mr. Merryweather, we must put the screen over that dark lantern."
"Who are you?" asked the interpreter in poor Russian. "You must
"Who brought it?" asked Kutuzov with a look which, when the candle
"Who can tell, your honor?" replied the hussar reluctantly.
"Who do you want, sir?" asked a voice in the darkness.
"Who gave the report?" inquired Shcherbinin, taking the envelope.
"Who is it you want?" he asked. "The commander in chief? He was
"Who is it?" asked someone in the porch.
"Who is your Elder here? Hey?" shouted Rostov, coming up to the
"Who looks after the sick here?" he asked the assistant.
"Who sacrificed everything for him," chimed in the princess, who
"Who should it be? You yourself told him to come. It's the
"Who the devil has put the logs on the road?" snarled he.
"Who told you that? Who?" cried the prince. "Suvorov!" And he jerked
"Who was that? The Military Governor himself?" was being asked at
"Who was the criminal, then?"
"Who's that running on the middle of the bridge? To the right!
"Who's that?" asked the old prince, noticing Pierre as he got out
"Whose caleche is that?" she inquired, leaning out of the carriage
"Why 'What the devil'?" said Boris, picking it up and reading the
"Why are there none?" asked the princess.
"Why are they leaving the town?" asked Alpatych.
"Why aren't you beginning, Michael Ilarionovich?" said the Emperor
"Why aren't you serving in the army?"
"Why did you beat the pavement?"
"Why did you come away to consult me in such a hurry?" asked Sherlock Holmes, with his finger-tips together and his eyes to the ceiling.
"Why do you say this young man is so rich?" asked the countess,
"Why doesn't the red-haired gunner run away as he is unarmed? Why
"Why don't you enter the service, Uncle?"
"Why don't you renew the acquaintance?" said Dolokhov to Rostov.
"Why don't you speak, cousin?" suddenly shrieked the princess so
"Why have we stopped? Is the way blocked? Or have we already come up
"Why is it you were never at Annette's?" the little princess asked
"Why joke?" said the driver, laughing. "As if I'd grudge my
"Why no, my dear fellow," said the astonished narrator, shrugging
"Why not wash? That is not cleanly," said Prince Andrew; "on the
"Why not?" Dolokhov answered absently, scrutinizing the face of
"Why ride into the middle of the battalion?" one of them shouted
"Why should I mind Monsieur Pierre being here?" exclaimed the little
"Why should we agree? We don't want the grain."
"Why should you be God knows where out of sight, during the battle?"
"Why talk nonsense?" rejoined voices in the crowd. "Will they give
"Why this," began Pierre, not sitting down but pacing the room,
"Why were bundles of useless papers from the government offices, and
"Why's that fellow in front of the line?" shouted somebody at him
"Why, didn't you know, Miss?" replied the maid. "The wounded prince:
"Why, fleas, crickets, grasshoppers," answered the buffoon.
"Why, for this reason! My father is one of the most remarkable men
"Why, indeed? You seem most fortunate in having an employe who comes under the full market price. It is not a common experience among employers in this age. I don't know that your assistant is not as remarkable as your advertisement."
"Why, it's a mercy if we can get the carpets alone into three
"Why, so as not to lay waste the country we were abandoning to the
"Why, that must be the Anferovs," said an old deacon, addressing a
"Why, that one, right at the end, the big one. Don't you see? That's
"Why, that's our Tikhon," said the esaul.
"Why, the position of assistants. The society need not be secret
"Why, the wounded! It's impossible, Mamma. It's monstrous!... No,
"Why, this one seems..." he began, turning to the assistant.
"Why, to the police, of course!"
"Why, whatever is the matter, my dearest?"
"Why," said I, glancing up at my companion, "that was surely the bell. Who could come to-night? Some friend of yours, perhaps?"
"Why," thought Prince Andrew, "that's the captain who stood up in
"Why... she's wounded!" said the adjutant. "In the off foreleg above
"Why? Did the Tugendbund which saved Europe" (they did not then
"Why? Let him be," said Pierre, taking Nicholas by the arm and
"Why?" said the eldest Melyukov girl.
"Will Your Highness please take command of the first army?"
"Will Your Majesty allow me to consult the colonel?" said
"Will they burn the bridge or not? Who'll get there first? Will they
"Will you bet? The ribbon of the order is a different matter...."
"Will you have the portmanteaus brought in? And a bed got ready, and
"With making away with Mr. Neville St.-- Oh, come, you can't be charged with that unless they make a case of attempted suicide of it," said the inspector with a grin. "Well, I have been twenty-seven years in the force, but this really takes the cake."
"With the result of driving it through the ventilator."
"With young Count Peter, by the Zharov rank grass," answered
"Without, however, the knowledge of pre-existing cases which serves me so well. There was a parallel instance in Aberdeen some years back, and something on very much the same lines at Munich the year after the Franco-Prussian War. It is one of these cases--but, hullo, here is Lestrade! Good-afternoon, Lestrade! You will find an extra tumbler upon the sideboard, and there are cigars in the box."
"Witness: I was so disturbed and excited as I rushed out into the open, that I could think of nothing except of my father. Yet I have a vague impression that as I ran forward something lay upon the ground to the left of me. It seemed to me to be something grey in colour, a coat of some sort, or a plaid perhaps. When I rose from my father I looked round for it, but it was gone.
"Witness: It is really impossible for me to tell you. I can assure you that it has nothing to do with the sad tragedy which followed.
"Won't you come over to the other table?" suggested Anna Pavlovna.
"Wostov! Petya!" exclaimed Denisov, having run through the dispatch.
"Would not the French ladies leave Paris if the Russians entered
"Would not your Serene Highness like to come inside?" said the
"Would you like a little mash?" the first soldier asked, and
"Write to her and let me know how her father looks at the matter. Au
"Yakov Alpatych, discharge me! Take the keys from me and discharge
"Yes, Dmitri, clean ones, please," said the countess, sighing
"Yes, I belong to the Brotherhood of the Freemasons," said the
"Yes, I fancy we may have some company dropping in," said he. "I am surprised that Lord St. Simon has not already arrived. Ha! I fancy that I hear his step now upon the stairs."
"Yes, I feel a kind of oppression," she said in reply to the
"Yes, I have been dragging the Serpentine."
"Yes, I have got it now," he answered with his thick red finger planted halfway down the column. "Here it is. This is what began it all. You just read it for yourself, sir."
"Yes, I know you have made peace with the Turks without obtaining
"Yes, I saw it by the side-lights when I was stepping into the carriage. It was a chestnut."
"Yes, I think so," he said reluctantly, and left the study.
"Yes, I was brought up quite differently," remarked the handsome
"Yes, I've got it," said Pierre. "The Emperor is to be here
"Yes, a regular volcano," said the count. "Takes after me! And
"Yes, alone, for the sake of all, I must do it or perish!" he
"Yes, always first both on the grassland and here," answered Rostov,
"Yes, and I confess that the contents startled me beyond measure. Have you good authority for what you say?"
"Yes, and a most remarkable bird it proved. I don't wonder that you should take an interest in it. It laid an egg after it was dead--the bonniest, brightest little blue egg that ever was seen. I have it here in my museum."
"Yes, and for me nothing else is serious. All the time in Petersburg
"Yes, and he is over sixty. I hear the count no longer recognizes
"Yes, and she was the girl who waited in the drawing-room, and who may have heard uncle's remarks about the coronet."
"Yes, and some wine," answered the captain.
"Yes, and there, further on, are the French," said the officer.
"Yes, and where do you put the others?" inquired Dolokhov.
"Yes, at the mines."
"Yes, but between ourselves," said the princess, "that is a
"Yes, but you are not the only one. There are your sisters..."
"Yes, everything is different nowadays, everything is changed. The
"Yes, exactly; the left flank is now extremely strong."
"Yes, go and find out!" shouted the angry gentleman. "They've
"Yes, have you not heard? Poor father has never been strong for years back, but this has broken him down completely. He has taken to his bed, and Dr. Willows says that he is a wreck and that his nervous system is shattered. Mr. McCarthy was the only man alive who had known dad in the old days in Victoria."
"Yes, he is a very, very kind man when he is not under the influence
"Yes, he writes that the French were beaten at... at... what river
"Yes, indeed," replied the princess with a sigh. "So he may have
"Yes, it did. I fainted when it was done, and I think that I must have been senseless for a long time. When I came to I found that it was still bleeding, so I tied one end of my handkerchief very tightly round the wrist and braced it up with a twig."
"Yes, it has happened luckily for you," he said, raising the open
"Yes, it is the same oak," thought Prince Andrew, and all at once he
"Yes, it must be so. Let me explain. I believe that that is the village inn over there?"
"Yes, it would have been of no use to anyone had we not done so. But I presume that this other goose upon the sideboard, which is about the same weight and perfectly fresh, will answer your purpose equally well?"
"Yes, it's from Julie," replied the princess with a timid glance and
"Yes, just the same. Though I don't know what your opinion will be,"
"Yes, my correspondence has certainly the charm of variety," he answered, smiling, "and the humbler are usually the more interesting. This looks like one of those unwelcome social summonses which call upon a man either to be bored or to lie."
"Yes, one is afraid," continued the first speaker, he of the
"Yes, please do," answered the general, and he repeated the order
"Yes, she is right," thought the old princess, all her convictions
"Yes, sir!" said the station-master.
"Yes, sir, but very quietly. It was to be at St. Saviour's, near King's Cross, and we were to have breakfast afterwards at the St. Pancras Hotel. Hosmer came for us in a hansom, but as there were two of us he put us both into it and stepped himself into a four-wheeler, which happened to be the only other cab in the street. We got to the church first, and when the four-wheeler drove up we waited for him to step out, but he never did, and when the cabman got down from the box and looked there was no one there! The cabman said that he could not imagine what had become of him, for he had seen him get in with his own eyes. That was last Friday, Mr. Holmes, and I have never seen or heard anything since then to throw any light upon what became of him."
"Yes, sir, that be the house of Dr. Grimesby Roylott," remarked the driver.
"Yes, sir," said the man. "Please step into the portrait gallery."
"Yes, sir. And no later than this morning. I went to my work as usual at ten o'clock, but the door was shut and locked, with a little square of cardboard hammered on to the middle of the panel with a tack. Here it is, and you can read for yourself."
"Yes, sir. He and a girl of fourteen, who does a bit of simple cooking and keeps the place clean--that's all I have in the house, for I am a widower and never had any family. We live very quietly, sir, the three of us; and we keep a roof over our heads and pay our debts, if we do nothing more.
"Yes, sir. He knows where to stand. He understands the matter so
"Yes, sir. I am afraid that I am a little late, but I am not quite my own master, you know. I am sorry that Miss Sutherland has troubled you about this little matter, for I think it is far better not to wash linen of the sort in public. It was quite against my wishes that she came, but she is a very excitable, impulsive girl, as you may have noticed, and she is not easily controlled when she has made up her mind on a point. Of course, I did not mind you so much, as you are not connected with the official police, but it is not pleasant to have a family misfortune like this noised abroad. Besides, it is a useless expense, for how could you possibly find this Hosmer Angel?"
"Yes, sir. I met him that night, and he called next day to ask if we had got home all safe, and after that we met him--that is to say, Mr. Holmes, I met him twice for walks, but after that father came back again, and Mr. Hosmer Angel could not come to the house any more."
"Yes, sire," and the aide-de-camp disappeared through the door of
"Yes, so it is, so it is," said the general angrily, lowering the
"Yes, that is it." It was a widespread, comfortable-looking building, two-storied, slate-roofed, with great yellow blotches of lichen upon the grey walls. The drawn blinds and the smokeless chimneys, however, gave it a stricken look, as though the weight of this horror still lay heavy upon it. We called at the door, when the maid, at Holmes' request, showed us the boots which her master wore at the time of his death, and also a pair of the son's, though not the pair which he had then had. Having measured these very carefully from seven or eight different points, Holmes desired to be led to the court-yard, from which we all followed the winding track which led to Boscombe Pool.
"Yes, that is the Crown."
"Yes, that must be so," thought Pierre, when after these words the
"Yes, that's it!" cried the count, opening his moist eyes and
"Yes, that's me!" she seemed to say, answering the rapt gaze with
"Yes, the Austrian prince who built that castle was no fool. It's
"Yes, the ham was just delicious..." answered another with a loud
"Yes, the lodge-keeper brought it up. You said that you wished to see me here to avoid scandal."
"Yes, the oak is right, a thousand times right," thought Prince
"Yes, the wine-cellar."
"Yes, they are splendid, splendid youngsters," chimed in the
"Yes, they have shown extraordinary energy. The whole garden has already been minutely examined."
"Yes, they worked all day and didn't play!" remarked the tall,
"Yes, this is the one thing left me now," he said with a sigh.
"Yes, to-day." She stood smiling, holding up a little slip of paper in the air.
"Yes, very often. And do you know the new way of courting?" said
"Yes, wait a bit," said Denisov, glancing round at the officers, and
"Yes, we are soldiers of the Apsheron regiment. I was dying of
"Yes, we know that, but the harm I am conscious of in myself is
"Yes, we saw from the hill how you took to your heels through the
"Yes, yes! I love him!" thought Natasha, reading the letter for
"Yes, yes, I know. Let us go in..." said Pierre and entered the
"Yes, yes, all right!" said the count hurriedly. "Only excuse me, my
"Yes, yes, at thunderclaps!" was repeated approvingly in the back
"Yes, yes, of course!" Pierre chimed in, pleased at the arrival of
"Yes, yes, thank God! Well, and what news from the army?"
"Yes, yes," said she, "but you have no reason to regret the past,
"Yes, yes," the governor's wife said as if talking to herself. "But,
"Yes, yes; just so! Bring it. Give it to the countess."
"Yes, you can well enjoy the evening now! He is gone and no one will
"Yes, you do not know Him, my dear sir," said the Mason. "You cannot
"Yes, you might, but I am afraid of getting the accounts mixed. So I
"Yes, you're quite right," continued the countess. "Till now I
"Yes, you... you..." she said, uttering the word you rapturously-
"Yes, your excellency," answered the Ukrainian gaily, tossing his
"Yes, your honor," the soldier replied complacently, and rolling his
"Yes," I answered, laughing. "It was a singular document. Philosophy, astronomy, and politics were marked at zero, I remember. Botany variable, geology profound as regards the mud-stains from any region within fifty miles of town, chemistry eccentric, anatomy unsystematic, sensational literature and crime records unique, violin-player, boxer, swordsman, lawyer, and self-poisoner by cocaine and tobacco. Those, I think, were the main points of my analysis."
"Yes," replied Pierre with the smile of mild irony now habitual to
"Yes," replied the countess. She held out her hand to him, and
"Yes," said Holmes, answering the look rather than the words. "It is so. I know all about McCarthy."
"Yes," said Rostov as if it cost him a great deal to utter the word;
"Yes," said the countess when the brightness these young people
"Yes. Her bed this morning had not been slept in, her room was empty, and a note for me lay upon the hall table. I had said to her last night, in sorrow and not in anger, that if she had married my boy all might have been well with him. Perhaps it was thoughtless of me to say so. It is to that remark that she refers in this note:
"Yes. It was the bisulphate of baryta."
"Yes. We had occasion some months ago to strengthen our resources and borrowed for that purpose 30,000 napoleons from the Bank of France. It has become known that we have never had occasion to unpack the money, and that it is still lying in our cellar. The crate upon which I sit contains 2,000 napoleons packed between layers of lead foil. Our reserve of bullion is much larger at present than is usually kept in a single branch office, and the directors have had misgivings upon the subject."
"Yes; I rather think he is coming to consult me professionally. I think that I recognise the symptoms. Ha! did I not tell you?" As he spoke, the man, puffing and blowing, rushed at our door and pulled at our bell until the whole house resounded with the clanging.
"Yes; and he seemed to think, with me, that something had happened, and that I should hear of Hosmer again. As he said, what interest could anyone have in bringing me to the doors of the church, and then leaving me? Now, if he had borrowed my money, or if he had married me and got my money settled on him, there might be some reason, but Hosmer was very independent about money and never would look at a shilling of mine. And yet, what could have happened? And why could he not write? Oh, it drives me half-mad to think of it, and I can't sleep a wink at night." She pulled a little handkerchief out of her muff and began to sob heavily into it.
"Yes; it struck me as being a little out of the common."
"Yes; one of my natural enemies, or, shall I say, my natural prey. Briefly, Watson, I am in the midst of a very remarkable inquiry, and I have hoped to find a clue in the incoherent ramblings of these sots, as I have done before now. Had I been recognised in that den my life would not have been worth an hour's purchase; for I have used it before now for my own purposes, and the rascally Lascar who runs it has sworn to have vengeance upon me. There is a trap-door at the back of that building, near the corner of Paul's Wharf, which could tell some strange tales of what has passed through it upon the moonless nights."
"Yes; that is Mr. St. Clair's house. I am staying there while I conduct the inquiry."
"Yes; when I went to see if the door was fastened for the night I met her slipping in. I saw the man, too, in the gloom."
"Yesterday morning I was seated in my office at the bank when a card was brought in to me by one of the clerks. I started when I saw the name, for it was that of none other than--well, perhaps even to you I had better say no more than that it was a name which is a household word all over the earth--one of the highest, noblest, most exalted names in England. I was overwhelmed by the honour and attempted, when he entered, to say so, but he plunged at once into business with the air of a man who wishes to hurry quickly through a disagreeable task.
"Yesterday, however, just as I was thinking of leaving the office, my clerk entered to say there was a gentleman waiting who wished to see me upon business. He brought up a card, too, with the name of 'Colonel Lysander Stark' engraved upon it. Close at his heels came the colonel himself, a man rather over the middle size, but of an exceeding thinness. I do not think that I have ever seen so thin a man. His whole face sharpened away into nose and chin, and the skin of his cheeks was drawn quite tense over his outstanding bones. Yet this emaciation seemed to be his natural habit, and due to no disease, for his eye was bright, his step brisk, and his bearing assured. He was plainly but neatly dressed, and his age, I should judge, would be nearer forty than thirty.
"Yet if the lady is correct in saying that the flooring and walls are sound, and that the door, window, and chimney are impassable, then her sister must have been undoubtedly alone when she met her mysterious end."
"Yet you do not care to avail yourself of the privilege, Prince,"
"You always dance. I have a protegee, the young Rostova, here. Ask
"You always manage to do things at the wrong time," continued
"You are a colonel?" shouted the chief of staff with a German
"You are enchanting... from the moment I saw you I have never
"You are most welcome! I know, I know," said the count, kissing
"You are not very vulnerable from above," Holmes remarked as he held up the lantern and gazed about him.
"You are off to the war, Prince?" said Anna Pavlovna.
"You are right," said Holmes demurely; "you do find it very hard to tackle the facts."
"You are speaking of Buonaparte?" asked the general, smiling.
"You are speaking of the poor countess?" said Anna Pavlovna,
"You are still the same dreamer, I see," remarked Boris, shaking his
"You are sure of it! Then let us hurry to him at once to let him know that the truth is known."
"You are the commander of the Emperor Alexander's regiment of
"You are the first who have ever heard my story. My father was a schoolmaster in Chesterfield, where I received an excellent education. I travelled in my youth, took to the stage, and finally became a reporter on an evening paper in London. One day my editor wished to have a series of articles upon begging in the metropolis, and I volunteered to supply them. There was the point from which all my adventures started. It was only by trying begging as an amateur that I could get the facts upon which to base my articles. When an actor I had, of course, learned all the secrets of making up, and had been famous in the green-room for my skill. I took advantage now of my attainments. I painted my face, and to make myself as pitiable as possible I made a good scar and fixed one side of my lip in a twist by the aid of a small slip of flesh-coloured plaster. Then with a red head of hair, and an appropriate dress, I took my station in the business part of the city, ostensibly as a match-seller but really as a beggar. For seven hours I plied my trade, and when I returned home in the evening I found to my surprise that I had received no less than 26s. 4d.
"You are unhappy, my dear sir," the stranger continued. "You are
"You are wounded?" he asked, hardly able to master the trembling
"You can easily imagine, Mr. Holmes, how curious I became as to what the meaning of this extraordinary performance could possibly be. They were always very careful, I observed, to turn my face away from the window, so that I became consumed with the desire to see what was going on behind my back. At first it seemed to be impossible, but I soon devised a means. My hand-mirror had been broken, so a happy thought seized me, and I concealed a piece of the glass in my handkerchief. On the next occasion, in the midst of my laughter, I put my handkerchief up to my eyes, and was able with a little management to see all that there was behind me. I confess that I was disappointed. There was nothing. At least that was my first impression. At the second glance, however, I perceived that there was a man standing in the Southampton Road, a small bearded man in a grey suit, who seemed to be looking in my direction. The road is an important highway, and there are usually people there. This man, however, was leaning against the railings which bordered our field and was looking earnestly up. I lowered my handkerchief and glanced at Mrs. Rucastle to find her eyes fixed upon me with a most searching gaze. She said nothing, but I am convinced that she had divined that I had a mirror in my hand and had seen what was behind me. She rose at once.
"You can give the message to His Majesty," said Dolgorukov,
"You can imagine from what I say that my poor sister Julia and I had no great pleasure in our lives. No servant would stay with us, and for a long time we did all the work of the house. She was but thirty at the time of her death, and yet her hair had already begun to whiten, even as mine has."
"You can see the woman in her already," she said in French, pointing
"You can understand," said Holmes suavely, "that I extend to the affairs of my other clients the same secrecy which I promise to you in yours."
"You can't, Miss, we have tried to," said the butler's assistant.
"You did, Doctor, but none the less you must come round to my view, for otherwise I shall keep on piling fact upon fact on you until your reason breaks down under them and acknowledges me to be right. Now, Mr. Jabez Wilson here has been good enough to call upon me this morning, and to begin a narrative which promises to be one of the most singular which I have listened to for some time. You have heard me remark that the strangest and most unique things are very often connected not with the larger but with the smaller crimes, and occasionally, indeed, where there is room for doubt whether any positive crime has been committed. As far as I have heard, it is impossible for me to say whether the present case is an instance of crime or not, but the course of events is certainly among the most singular that I have ever listened to. Perhaps, Mr. Wilson, you would have the great kindness to recommence your narrative. I ask you not merely because my friend Dr. Watson has not heard the opening part but also because the peculiar nature of the story makes me anxious to have every possible detail from your lips. As a rule, when I have heard some slight indication of the course of events, I am able to guide myself by the thousands of other similar cases which occur to my memory. In the present instance I am forced to admit that the facts are, to the best of my belief, unique."
"You didn't know this dead man, McCarthy. He was a devil incarnate. I tell you that. God keep you out of the clutches of such a man as he. His grip has been upon me these twenty years, and he has blasted my life. I'll tell you first how I came to be in his power.
"You don't mind breaking the law?"
"You don't say so!" replied the countess.
"You don't seem to be used to riding, Count?" remarked the adjutant.
"You don't understand?" shouted the prince, "but I do! French spy,
"You drop this nonsense and tell the people to get ready to leave
"You fellows have no conscience," said he to the valet who was
"You fill me with interest," said Holmes. "Pray give us the essential facts from the commencement, and I can afterwards question you as to those details which seem to me to be most important."
"You flirt with him too," said the countess, laughing.
"You go to sleep, but I can't," said the first voice, coming
"You had better take care!" said the countess.
"You had my note?" he asked with a deep harsh voice and a strongly marked German accent. "I told you that I would call." He looked from one to the other of us, as if uncertain which to address.
"You have a grand gift of silence, Watson," said he. "It makes you quite invaluable as a companion. 'Pon my word, it is a great thing for me to have someone to talk to, for my own thoughts are not over-pleasant. I was wondering what I should say to this dear little woman to-night when she meets me at the door."
"You have an answer to everything. But how on earth do you deduce that the gas is not laid on in his house?"
"You have done well indeed!" cried Holmes with enthusiasm. "Now lead the way, and we shall soon see the end of this black business."
"You have earned the St. George's standards and will be worthy of
"You have erred, perhaps," he observed, taking up a glowing cinder with the tongs and lighting with it the long cherry-wood pipe which was wont to replace his clay when he was in a disputatious rather than a meditative mood--"you have erred perhaps in attempting to put colour and life into each of your statements instead of confining yourself to the task of placing upon record that severe reasoning from cause to effect which is really the only notable feature about the thing."
"You have only lately arrived?" the countess asked him.
"You have the photograph?"
"You haven't read the letter?" asked Sonya.
"You heard probably of the heroic exploit of Raevski, embracing
"You interest me extremely," said Holmes. "And since you draw so large a sum as a hundred a year, with what you earn into the bargain, you no doubt travel a little and indulge yourself in every way. I believe that a single lady can get on very nicely upon an income of about $60."
"You know N--N--received a snuffbox with the portrait last year?"
"You know my method. It is founded upon the observation of trifles."
"You know they've come, Marie?" said the little princess, waddling
"You know, Michael Ilarionovich, we are not on the
"You know," said Natasha, "you have read the Gospels a great deal-
"You know," said the princess in the same tone of voice and still in
"You live in the country and don't think the life terrible," he
"You may address me as the Count Von Kramm, a Bohemian nobleman. I understand that this gentleman, your friend, is a man of honour and discretion, whom I may trust with a matter of the most extreme importance. If not, I should much prefer to communicate with you alone."
"You may imagine, Mr. Holmes, that to me, destitute as I was, such an offer seemed almost too good to be true. The gentleman, however, seeing perhaps the look of incredulity upon my face, opened a pocket-book and took out a note.
"You may place considerable confidence in Mr. Holmes, sir," said the police agent loftily. "He has his own little methods, which are, if he won't mind my saying so, just a little too theoretical and fantastic, but he has the makings of a detective in him. It is not too much to say that once or twice, as in that business of the Sholto murder and the Agra treasure, he has been more nearly correct than the official force."
"You mean the left flank?" asked Kaysarov.
"You mean to imply that I have nothing to eat out of.... On the
"You might have taken some from the covering troops."
"You must confine yourself to your room, on pretence of a headache, when your stepfather comes back. Then when you hear him retire for the night, you must open the shutters of your window, undo the hasp, put your lamp there as a signal to us, and then withdraw quietly with everything which you are likely to want into the room which you used to occupy. I have no doubt that, in spite of the repairs, you could manage there for one night."
"You must excuse me, dear Vicomte," said Prince Vasili to the
"You must go away too, take away what you can and tell the serfs to go
"You must know that my grandfather had two sons--my uncle Elias and my father Joseph. My father had a small factory at Coventry, which he enlarged at the time of the invention of bicycling. He was a patentee of the Openshaw unbreakable tire, and his business met with such success that he was able to sell it and to retire upon a handsome competence.
"You must know," said he, "that I am an orphan and a bachelor, residing alone in lodgings in London. By profession I am a hydraulic engineer, and I have had considerable experience of my work during the seven years that I was apprenticed to Venner & Matheson, the well-known firm, of Greenwich. Two years ago, having served my time, and having also come into a fair sum of money through my poor father's death, I determined to start in business for myself and took professional chambers in Victoria Street.
"You need not have said that to me, Father," said the son with a
"You ought to have been there at seven in the morning."
"You saw the ventilator, too?"
"You say the demand now is that I am to withdraw beyond the Niemen
"You see yours is already an officer in the Guards, while my
"You see, Watson," he explained in the early hours of the morning as we sat over a glass of whisky and soda in Baker Street, "it was perfectly obvious from the first that the only possible object of this rather fantastic business of the advertisement of the League, and the copying of the Encyclopaedia, must be to get this not over-bright pawnbroker out of the way for a number of hours every day. It was a curious way of managing it, but, really, it would be difficult to suggest a better. The method was no doubt suggested to Clay's ingenious mind by the colour of his accomplice's hair. The $4 a week was a lure which must draw him, and what was it to them, who were playing for thousands? They put in the advertisement, one rogue has the temporary office, the other rogue incites the man to apply for it, and together they manage to secure his absence every morning in the week. From the time that I heard of the assistant having come for half wages, it was obvious to me that he had some strong motive for securing the situation."
"You see, brothers..." said he when the shouts had ceased... and all
"You see, he holds it up." (She meant the baby's head.) "But how
"You see," he suddenly said, "I am a kinsman of the count's and he
"You see," remarked Holmes, as we paced to and fro in front of the house, "this marriage rather simplifies matters. The photograph becomes a double-edged weapon now. The chances are that she would be as averse to its being seen by Mr. Godfrey Norton, as our client is to its coming to the eyes of his princess. Now the question is, Where are we to find the photograph?"
"You should wake the captain first."
"You shut up the windows and doors the night before. Did you fasten all the windows?"
"You spare no one," continued Julie to the young man without heeding
"You speak to the colonel about this nasty business before other
"You tell the colonel in the presence of other officers that an
"You then roused his anger by calling him names at a moment when he felt that he had deserved your warmest thanks. He could not explain the true state of affairs without betraying one who certainly deserved little enough consideration at his hands. He took the more chivalrous view, however, and preserved her secret."
"You think I'm an old man and don't understand the present state
"You thought!" shouted the prince, his words coming more and more
"You told me to remind you of the officer Dolokhov, reduced to the
"You want a coffeepot, don't you?" he asked the esaul. "I bought a
"You were at the battle, we heard."
"You were meaning to go out, weren't you, Mamma? Do you want the
"You were saying, Mr. Staff Officer..." continued the colonel in
"You were travelling in the States?"
"You were yourself struck by the nature of the injury as recorded by the surgeon at the inquest. The blow was struck from immediately behind, and yet was upon the left side. Now, how can that be unless it were by a left-handed man? He had stood behind that tree during the interview between the father and son. He had even smoked there. I found the ash of a cigar, which my special knowledge of tobacco ashes enables me to pronounce as an Indian cigar. I have, as you know, devoted some attention to this, and written a little monograph on the ashes of 140 different varieties of pipe, cigar, and cigarette tobacco. Having found the ash, I then looked round and discovered the stump among the moss where he had tossed it. It was an Indian cigar, of the variety which are rolled in Rotterdam."
"You will answer for it, Captain. It is mutiny--seizing the
"You will be treated as is fitting," said he and, putting the packet
"You will excuse me," said Holmes blandly, "but I could not help overhearing the questions which you put to the salesman just now. I think that I could be of assistance to you."
"You will excuse this mask," continued our strange visitor. "The august person who employs me wishes his agent to be unknown to you, and I may confess at once that the title by which I have just called myself is not exactly my own."
"You will find it rather disconnected, I fear, and there may prove to be little relation between the different incidents of which I speak. On the very first day that I was at the Copper Beeches, Mr. Rucastle took me to a small outhouse which stands near the kitchen door. As we approached it I heard the sharp rattling of a chain, and the sound as of a large animal moving about.
"You will find the beautiful Helene here, whom it is always delightful
"You will observe," said Holmes, laying down the volume, "that the sudden breaking up of the society was coincident with the disappearance of Openshaw from America with their papers. It may well have been cause and effect. It is no wonder that he and his family have some of the more implacable spirits upon their track. You can understand that this register and diary may implicate some of the first men in the South, and that there may be many who will not sleep easy at night until it is recovered."
"You will remember that I remarked the other day, just before we went into the very simple problem presented by Miss Mary Sutherland, that for strange effects and extraordinary combinations we must go to life itself, which is always far more daring than any effort of the imagination."
"You will see," said Anna Pavlovna, "that tomorrow, on the Emperor's
"You will tell me if you have any news to-morrow. No doubt you will go to the prison to see James. Oh, if you do, Mr. Holmes, do tell him that I know him to be innocent."
"You won't bear me a grudge, Prokhor Ignatych?" said the
"You won't do it again, eh?" said one of the soldiers, winking and
"You'll make a fine thing of it, deploying in sight of the enemy!
"You'll see your pal again presently," said Jones. "He's quicker at climbing down holes than I am. Just hold out while I fix the derbies."
"You're a clever fellow! From the cold indeed! Why, it was hot. If
"You're also waiting for the commander in chief?" said he. "They say
"You're not the same at all," he said.
"You're welcome, Yakov Alpatych. Folks are leaving the town, but you
"You've crushed the young gentleman!" said the clerk. "What are
"You've grown older, Tikhon," he said in passing to the old man, who
"You've let the wolf go!... What sportsmen!" and as if scorning to
"You've only just missed him," said the orderly.
"You've seen a lot of trouble, sir, eh?" the little man suddenly
"You, my little countess, are a notorious spendthrift," said the
"You? Who are you? How could you know anything of the matter?"
"Your Majesty is too kind!" replied de Beausset to the invitation to
"Your Majesty," replied Balashev, "my master, the Emperor, does
"Your boy, Arthur, went to bed after his interview with you but he slept badly on account of his uneasiness about his club debts. In the middle of the night he heard a soft tread pass his door, so he rose and, looking out, was surprised to see his cousin walking very stealthily along the passage until she disappeared into your dressing-room. Petrified with astonishment, the lad slipped on some clothes and waited there in the dark to see what would come of this strange affair. Presently she emerged from the room again, and in the light of the passage-lamp your son saw that she carried the precious coronet in her hands. She passed down the stairs, and he, thrilling with horror, ran along and slipped behind the curtain near your door, whence he could see what passed in the hall beneath. He saw her stealthily open the window, hand out the coronet to someone in the gloom, and then closing it once more hurry back to her room, passing quite close to where he stood hid behind the curtain.
"Your cases have indeed been of the greatest interest to me," I observed.
"Your excellency! Eh, Prince!" said the trembling voice of Timokhin,
"Your excellency!" Prince Andrew broke the silence with his abrupt
"Your excellency, it's the officer Dolokhov, who has been reduced to
"Your excellency, the Director of the Registrar's Department has
"Your excellency, the superintendent of the lunatic asylum has come:
"Your excellency, you gave him leave yourself, on the march."
"Your father, a man of the last century, evidently stands above
"Your father," said Holmes, "your stepfather, surely, since the name is different."
"Your hands, my dear sir. Your right hand is quite a size larger than your left. You have worked with it, and the muscles are more developed."
"Your honor, the generals!" said the sergeant, riding up to Rostov.
"Your honor, there he is!" cried one of the hussars behind him.
"Your honor, you're wanted by the general. He is in the hut here,"
"Your honor..." replied the shopman in the frieze coat, "your honor,
"Your own little income," he asked, "does it come out of the business?"
"Zakhar is shouting that I should turn to the left, but why to the
"a manifestation of an unfriendly disposition toward the United States."
"after four years of failure to restore the union by the experiment of
"air-hunger" ensue. On account of the small quantity of blood
"among them the road through Poltava, which Charles XII chose."
"aristocracy of wealth," bent upon the pursuit and attainment of
"assented to the popular but pernicious doctrine of gradual abolition."
"assumed upon himself authority and power not conferred by the
"assumed" by the United States government and placed on the same secure
"blocking" of the nerves by the injection of a 1 per cent. solution of
"bravo!"--there in the presence of that Helene it had all seemed clear
"business enterprise"--the tremendous, irresistible energy of a virile
"by the act of Mexico." Congress, in a burst of patriotic fervor,
"came back from the Tambov estate and told me they are already
"committees of safety and inspection," to be elected by the qualified
"conscription of wealth as well as men," meaning the support of the war
"cream of really good society" consisted of the fascinating Helene,
"cut off" the French and so on and so on.
"dangers of imperialism." Indeed at the time, the Senators passed a
"denied us the right to be neutral." Proof of that lay on every hand.
"depositary" of political power. They went back to the colonial
"dictatorship." The Bolsheviki, or majority faction of the socialists,
"drill-bone"; it is due to bruising of the muscle by the recoil of the
"drop-wrist"; the wrist is flexed and pronated, and the patient is
"easy money," if not paper currency, as an aid in the repayment of their
"era of good feeling" when the Jeffersonian Republicans adopted
"fair" return on the capital invested.
"father of the Constitution." They were not theorists but practical men,
"firm and deliberate conviction that the Harper's Ferry crime was the
"first American diplomat." Later in the year a form of treaty to be
"for the purposes of mutual protection and to secure peace and
"free thinking spreads almost as fast as the Church." North Carolina was
"has declared that he will leave it to the French people themselves to
"healing by first intention" of the older writers.
"housemaid's knee" (Fig. 113); the enlargement of the olecranon
"insurgent" Republicans who resented the dominance of the Speaker,
"interesting." "I wish to see the battle."
"intolerable acts." They were aimed at curing the unrest in America. The
"is the birthright of every man to whatever state he may belong." Though
"learned and godly ministers" for the Puritan churches of New England.
"many more than four-fifths of the people prefer a union with Great
"massacre," a mass meeting was held in the town and Samuel Adams was
"natiform skull." The bosses disappear in time, but the skull may remain
"necessary and proper" for carrying into effect any and all of the
"omit any word or any act necessary to the performance of its sacred
"our days" and that human characteristics change with the times--"in
"peaceful penetration," the authorities at Mexico City opened wide the
"perforating ulcer." The flexor tendons are sometimes destroyed, the toe
"piled upon one another in great cities" and the republic of small
"property," implies, the proprietor was a person to whom the king
"quasi-public" concerns, like the roads and ferries, and thus subject to
"quit rent." In Maryland, the proprietor sometimes collected as high as
"reads like the social register of the oldest and noblest families of
"reduce the power and greatness of England"--the empire that in 1763 had
"represented in a marked manner the talent, intelligence, and
"republican tendencies" of the age. Two colleges revealed a drift away
"restrictive upon the trade and dispersion of English manufactures
"rings and bosses." The United States Senate was called "a millionaires'
"sabre-blade" or other deformity of the tibiae.
"spoke great things and blasphemies," the same number 666 was
"squatter sovereignty" with the Dred Scott decision; how, in other
"squatter sovereignty;" that is, the right of the people of each
"squatting" on land purchased from the Indians or simply seized without
"submarine chasers" and "scout cruisers" to be sent to the danger zone.
"taking," as it is called, the transplanted tissue must retain its
"tennis-player's elbow," and the "sculler's sprain," affecting the
"that all the atrocities of the French army (I nearly said of the
"that letter was written, though it was not sent, and the Emperor knew
"that our name is one of the most ancient in France."
"that the countess, your wife, is preparing to go abroad. I expect
"the Court that made it has often overruled its own decisions and we
"the less government the better," what can be said of a large body of
"the most efficient possible instrument in helping the people of the
"the rapid expansion of the United States from a coast strip to a
"the rat") he said, rubbing his forehead and whole face with both
"the rule of the people," he was regarded by Jackson's followers as "an
"the straw which broke the camel's back." Southern leaders turned in
"the whole affair will be ruined," or "something absurd will come of
"to effect a mighty conquest even though it be like the last victory of
"underground railways," were laid out across the free states into
"waiting.") "Not all the columns have formed up yet, Your Majesty."
"war to end war." No slogan called forth a deeper response from the
"wasn't I telling you to fire the bridge, when inflammable material
"will now admit the 'six hundred well-born' immediately to establish
"with all the culture of his century." Monroe was a graduate of William
#Abdominal Aneurysm.#--Aneurysm is much less frequent in the abdominal
#Acute Abscesses of the Skin and Subcutaneous Tissue in Young
#Acute osteomyelitis# is a suppurative process beginning in the marrow
#Adenoma.#--An adenoma is a tumour constructed on the type of, and
#Adenoma.#--This is a comparatively rare tumour growing from the glands
#Aneurysm by Anastomosis# is the name applied to a vascular tumour in
#Arrest of Accidental Haemorrhage.#--The most efficient means of
#Arrest of Haemorrhage.#--_Ligature._--This is the best means of securing
#Arterial Angioma# or #Cirsoid Aneurysm#.--This is composed of the
#Artificial Hyperaemia.#--When such direct means as the above are
#Axillary Aneurysm.#--This is usually met with in the right arm of
#Bacterial Diseases.#--In most bacterial diseases the organisms are
#Blisters# result from the exudation of serous fluid beneath the horny
#Boils and Carbuncles.#--These result from infection with the
#Brachial Neuralgia.#--The pain is definitely located in the
#Brachial aneurysm# usually occurs at the bend of the elbow, is of
#Callosities# are prominent, indurated masses of the horny layer of the
#Cancer.#--There are several types of primary cancer of the skin, the
#Carotid Aneurysms.#--Aneurysm of the _common carotid_ is more frequent
#Changes in the Tissues following upon the successful Lodgment of
#Chronic Glanders.#--_In the horse_ the chronic form of glanders is
#Chronic Tetanus.#--The difference between this and acute tetanus is
#Circumscribed Abscess of Bone--"Brodie's Abscess."#--The most important
#Classification of Ulcers.#--The nomenclature of ulcers is much involved
#Clinical Features of Aneurysm.#--Surgically, the sacculated is by far
#Clinical Features of an Acute Circumscribed Abscess.#--In the initial
#Clinical Features--Local Phenomena.#--The most generally accepted
#Clinical Features.#--In _pharyngeal diphtheria_, on the first or
#Clinical Features.#--The insidious development of the tuberculous
#Clinical Features.#--The symptoms resulting from division and non-union
#Clinical Features.#--These vary with the different anatomical forms of
#Clinical Features.#--_Facial erysipelas_ is the commonest clinical
#Complications.#--_Diffuse suppurative cellulitis_ is the most serious
#Constitutional Disturbances.#--Under the term constitutional
#Constitutional Effects of Haemorrhage.#--The severity of the symptoms
#Contusion.#--An artery may be contused by a blow or crush, or by the
#Corns.#--A corn is a localised overgrowth of the horny layer of the
#Cysts of Bone.#--With the exception of hydatid cysts, cysts in the
#Definition of Terms.#--The term _synovitis_ is applied to any reaction
#Delayed Tetanus.#--During the European War acute tetanus occasionally
#Delirium Tremens# is seen in persons addicted to alcohol, who, as the
#Diagnosis.#--The finding of the Klebs-Loffler bacillus is the only
#Differential Diagnosis.#--The diagnosis is to be made from other
#Diffuse Tuberculous Osteomyelitis in the shaft of a long bone# is
#Diseases caused by the Staphylococcus Aureus.#--As the majority of
#Diseases of Bursae.#--The lining membrane of bursae resembles that of
#Diseases of Individual Bursae.#--The _olecranon bursa_ is frequently
#Disinfection of the Hands.#--It is now generally recognised that one of
#Dislocation of Nerves.#--This injury, which resembles the dislocation
#Dislocation of the ulnar nerve# at the elbow results from sudden and
#Embolic Gangrene# (Fig. 21).--This is the most typical form of gangrene
#Embolism.#--The term _embolus_ is applied to any body carried along in
#Endo-aneurysmorrhaphy.#--The operation devised by Rudolf Matas in 1888
#Endotheliomas# take origin from the endothelium of lymph vessels and
#Femoral Aneurysm.#--Aneurysm of the femoral artery beyond the origin of
#Fibroma# is met with chiefly as a periosteal growth in relation to the
#Gangrene following Ligation of Arteries.#--After the ligation of an
#Gangrene from Frost-bite.#--It is difficult to draw the line between
#Gangrene from Mechanical Constriction of the Vessels of the part.#--The
#General Phenomena.#--It is customary to divide the clinical history of
#General Principles of Treatment.#--The capacity of the inflammatory
#Gluteal Aneurysm.#--An aneurysm in the buttock may arise from the
#Gout.#--_Arthritis Urica._--One of the manifestations of gout is that
#Granulation Tissue.#--The essential and invariable medium of repair in
#Gunshot Wounds of Blood Vessels.#--In the majority of cases injuries of
#Healing by Primary Union.#--The most favourable conditions for the
#Hernia of Muscle.#--This is a rare condition, in which, owing to the
#Horns.#--The _sebaceous_ horn results from the accumulation of the
#Human and Bovine Tuberculosis.#--The frequency of the bovine bacillus
#Incomplete Division of a Mixed Nerve.#--The effects of partial division
#Inguinal Aneurysm# (_Aneurysm of the Iliac and Femoral
#Injuries produced by Exposure to X-Rays and Radium.#--In the routine
#Innominate aneurysm# may be of the fusiform or of the sacculated
#Inoculation Tubercle.#--The appearances vary with the conditions under
#Intermediate Stage.#--After the dying away of the secondary
#Intracranial aneurysm# involves the internal carotid and its branches,
#Later Lesions.#--In the skin and subcutaneous tissue, the later
#Lesions of Bone in Inherited Syphilis.#--_Craniotabes_, in which the
#Leucocythaemia.#--This is a disease of the blood and of the
#Local Tetanus.#--This term is applied to a form of the disease in which
#Lymphadenitis.#--Inflammation of lymph glands results from the advent
#Means adopted to combat Infection.#--As has already been indicated, the
#Means taken to Prevent Infection of Wounds.#--The avenues by which
#Methods of Infection.#--In marked contrast to what obtains in the
#Methods of Skin-Grafting.#--Two methods are employed: one in which the
#Modifications of the Process of Repair.#--The process of repair by
#Moist Gangrene# is an acute process, the dead part retaining its fluids
#Moles.#--The term mole is applied to a pigmented, and usually hairy,
#Morbid Anatomy.#--Tuberculous disease in the articular end of a long
#Myeloma.#--The myeloid tumour, which is sometimes classified with the
#Myositis.#--_Ischaemic Myositis._--Volkmann was the first to describe a
#Naevus.#--A naevus is a collection of dilated capillaries, the afferent
#Nerves divided in Amputation.#--In the case of nerves divided in an
#Neuropathic Atrophy of Bone.#--The conditions included under this
#New Growths in the Skin and Subcutaneous Tissue.#--The _Angioma_ has
#Orbital Aneurysm.#--The term pulsating exophthalmos is employed to
#Osteoma.#--The true osteoma is composed of bony tissue, and originates
#Osteomalacia.#--The term osteomalacia includes a group of conditions,
#Other Forms of Acute Osteomyelitis.#--Among the less severe forms of
#Paget's disease# of the nipple is an epithelioma occurring in women
#Papilloma.#--The _common wart_ or verruca is an outgrowth of the
#Periosteal tuberculosis# is met with in the ribs, sternum, vertebral
#Pneumococcal affections of joints#, the result of infection with the
#Popliteal Aneurysm.#--This is the most common surgical aneurysm, and is
#Preparation of the Skin of the Patient.#--In the purification of the
#Primary Haemorrhage.#--The term primary haemorrhage is applied to the
#Primary Suture.#--The reunion of a recently divided nerve is spoken of
#Primary Syphilis.#--_The period of incubation_ represents the interval
#Primary Tumours--Osteoma.#--When the tumour projects from the surface
#Pus.#--The fluid resulting from the process of suppuration is known
#Pyaemia# is a form of blood-poisoning characterised by the development
#Pyogenic Osteomyelitis due to Spread of Infection from the Soft
#Rate of Healing.#--While the rate at which wounds heal is remarkably
#Regeneration.#--_Process of Repair when the Ends are in Contact._--_If
#Relapsing Osteomyelitis.#--As the term indicates, the various forms of
#Repair of Veins.#--The process of repair in veins is the same as that
#Rodent Cancer# (Rodent Ulcer).--This is a cancer originating in the
#Sacculated Aneurysm.#--When a _limited area_ of the vessel wall is
#Sapraemia#, or septic intoxication, is the name applied to a form of
#Sarcoma# and #endothelioma# are the commonest tumours of bone, and
#Sarcoma# of various types is met with in the skin. The fibroma, after
#Secondary Cancer of the Skin.#--Cancer may spread to the skin from a
#Secondary Haemorrhage.#--The term secondary haemorrhage refers to
#Secondary Suture.#--The term secondary suture is applied to the
#Secondary Syphilis.#--The following description of secondary syphilis
#Secondary Tumours.#--Next to tuberculosis, _secondary cancer_ is the
#Senile Gangrene.#--Senile gangrene is the commonest example of local
#Septicaemia.#--This form of blood-poisoning is the result of the action
#Sequence of Changes in Bacterial Inflammation.#--As the form of
#Sporotrichosis# is a mycotic infection due to the sporothrix Shenkii.
#Stages or Periods of Syphilis.#--Following the teaching of Ricord, it
#Sterilisation by Chemical Agents.#--For the purification of the skin of
#Sterilisation by Heat.#--The most reliable, and at the same time the
#Structure of Skin.#--The skin is composed of a superficial cellular
#Surgical Anatomy.#--An _artery_ has three coats: an internal coat--the
#Surgical Anatomy.#--During the period of growth, a long bone such as
#Surgical Shock.#--The condition known as surgical shock may be looked
#Syncope or Fainting.#--Syncope is the result of a suddenly produced
#Syphilitic Affections of Tendon Sheaths.#--These closely resemble the
#Teno-synovitis.#--The toxic or infective agent is conveyed to the
#Tertiary Syphilis.#--While the manifestations of primary and secondary
#The Axillary (Circumflex) Nerve.#--In the majority of cases in which
#The Blood# lends itself in an ideal manner to transplantation, or, as
#The Brachial Plexus.#--Lesions of the brachial plexus may be divided
#The Common Peroneal (external popliteal) nerve# is exposed to injury
#The Contagiousness of Inherited Syphilis.#--In 1837, Colles of Dublin
#The Cranial nerves# are considered with affections of the head and neck
#The Healing Sore.#--If a portion of skin be excised aseptically, and no
#The Median Nerve# is most frequently injured in wounds made by broken
#The Sciatic Nerve.#--When this nerve is compressed, as by sitting on a
#The Skin.#--The skin was the first tissue to be used for grafting
#The Soft Sore, Soft Chancre, or Chancroid.#--The differential diagnosis
#The Tibial (internal popliteal) nerve# is rarely injured.
#The Ulnar Nerve.#--The most common injury of this nerve is its division
#The Virus of Syphilis.#--The cause of syphilis, whether acquired or
#The clinical features# of surgical tuberculosis will be described with
#The general treatment# consists in combating the adverse influences
#The long thoracic nerve# (nerve of Bell), which supplies the serratus
#Thoracic Aneurysm.#--All varieties of aneurysm occur in the aorta, the
#Thrombosis.#--The term _thrombus_ is applied to a clot of blood formed
#Traumatic Neuritis.#--This consists in an overgrowth of the
#Treatment in relation to the Cause of the Ulcer.#--_Traumatic
#Treatment in relation to the Condition of the Ulcer.#--_Ulcers in a
#Treatment of Acute Abscesses.#--The dictum of John Bell, "Where there
#Treatment of Divided Nerves.#--The treatment consists in approximating
#Treatment of Syphilis.#--In the treatment of syphilis the two main
#Treatment of the Bloodless State.#--The patient should be placed in a
#Treatment.#--An attempt may be made to destroy or to counteract the
#Treatment.#--Arsenical injections are as beneficial in the inherited as
#Treatment.#--In addition to the general treatment of tuberculosis,
#Treatment.#--In treating an aneurysm, the indications are to imitate
#Treatment.#--The _general treatment_ consists in combating the shock.
#Treatment.#--The first indication is to endeavour to arrest the spread
#Treatment.#--The tuberculous abscess may recede and disappear under
#Tuberculosis of the Skin.#--Interest attaches chiefly to the primary
#Tuberculous Lupus.#--This is an extremely chronic affection of the
#Tuberculous Osteomyelitis.#--Tuberculous lesions in the marrow occur as
#Tuberculous dactylitis# is the name applied to a diffuse form of the
#Tuberculous disease in the axillary glands# may be a result of
#Tuberculous disease in the cervical glands# is a common accompaniment
#Tuberculous disease in the glands of the groin# is comparatively rare.
#Tumours of Muscle.#--With the exception of congenital varieties, such
#Varieties of Gangrene essentially due to Interference with the
#Varieties of Tumours.#--In the following description, tumours are
#Varieties--Fusiform Aneurysm.#--When the _whole circumference_ of an
#Veldt Sore.#--This sore usually originates in an abrasion of the
#Wounds by Rifle Bullets.#--The vast majority of wounds inflicted by
#Wounds by Sporting Guns.#--In the common sporting or scatter gun, with
#Wounds of the Thoracic Duct.#--The thoracic duct usually opens at the
#Wounds# of veins--punctured and incised--frequently occur in the course
#scalds# may be followed by necrosis of tissue. So long as the parts are
$1,200,000; while in Idaho alone of this group of states did the wheat
$16,000,000. Begging letters were sent to the states asking them to
$2,208,000,000. The total cost of the war was many times the money value
$204,000,000. At the halfway point of the century, the capital invested
$241,000,000 of continental paper was printed, to which the several
$65,000,000; in the same year the Standard Oil Company with a capital of
'Boyars,' I will say to them, 'I do not desire war, I desire the peace
'Gentlemen,' says one of them, 'you know the Thabor Bridge is mined
'I am wounded and cannot ride and consequently cannot command the
'I don't recognize the world-famous Austrian discipline, if you
'Where is the old man who has been suffering innocently and in vain? A
'corner' and the stakes at cards meant, but carrying forward to
'store clothes' cost as much as a farm." In such circumstances, the
'the poor against the rich,' or interest against interest." Such was the
("Sirin Highness," said the tall fellow with a triumphant smile on his
(1) However we may increase our knowledge of the conditions of space
(1) Power is the relation of a given person to other individuals, in
(1) The _soft cellular tumours_ are composed mainly of spindle or round
(1) The preservation and study of the mystery. (2) The purification
(1) The relation to the external world of the man who commits the
(1) To whatever degree we may imagine a man to be exempt from the
(1) the _brain_, which, through certain special centres, regulates all
(1649-60) so engrossed the attention of Englishmen at home that they had
(1660-85), himself an easy-going person, the policy of regulating trade
(1662) and a place among the colonies. Half a century elapsed before the
(2) However much we approximate the time of judgment to the time
(2) However we may prolong the period of time between the action
(2) The commonest type is a _chronic synovitis_ or _hydrops_, in which
(2) The movement of nations is caused not by power, nor by
(2) The second group includes the _fibro-_, _osteo-_, and
(2) What force produces the movement of the nations?
(2) _By Inunction._--Inunction consists in rubbing into the pores of the
(2) the destruction of German military power; (3) reparations for
(3) His relation to the causes leading to the action.
(3) However accessible may be the chain of causation of any
(3) However much the difficulty of understanding the causes may be
(3) _By Intra-muscular Injection._--This consists in introducing the
(3) that the will of the people is delegated to the rulers
(3) to withdraw from worldliness, but not avoid (a) the service of the
(4) When the patient survives the shock, the presence or absence of
(72 o-104 o F.), and to appreciate as separate impressions the contact of
(American Nation Series), pp. 294-341; Elson, _History of the United
(At the mention of the chiffonier and dressing table Berg
(Bence-Jones) is referred to on p. 474. Myeloma occurs in the jaws,
(Borodino) and cross by its three bridges, advancing to the same
(Fig. 100). As a result of injury the cyst may undergo sudden
(Fig. 102). It is rare on the trunk or limbs. It commences as a small
(Fig. 120). The tibia is the bone most commonly affected, but the lower
(Fig. 138). Operative interference is only indicated when the tumour is
(Fig. 161). In the larger joints the subjective symptoms usually precede
(Fig. 17), especially around the knee-joint in women, and over the ribs
(Fig. 66). Sometimes the thrombus is _mixed_--a red thrombus being
(Fig. 78). They become adherent not only to one another, but also to the
(Fig. 81). Later, the glands in the groin become enlarged, and it is
(Fig. 86). The tumours resemble the solitary trunk-neuroma, are usually
(Fig. 9, a). This is commonly met with in the palm of the hand of
(Figs. 7 and 8). The edge of the bell is smeared with vaseline, and the
(He put one arm around Pierre and the other around his daughter.)--"My
(It seemed to Napoleon that the chief import of what was taking
(John Thomson). The curves at this stage depend on the attitude of the
(Kocher). (2) The gut is placed in a brass receiver and boiled for
(Schlosser); the needle is 8 cm. long, and 0.7 mm. in diameter. The
(She used the word "diplomat," which was just then much in vogue among
(The captain of whom the corporal spoke often had long chats with
(The regimental commander's face now that the inspection was happily
(The unusual site of the tumour is to be noted.)]
(_chylo-thorax_), or in the peritoneal cavity (_chylous ascites_). There
(_farcy buds_). The neighbouring glands soon become swollen and
(_lymphangiectasis_); and in lymphangiomas, of which the best-known
(_syphilitic alopoecia_). The hair is not re-formed in the scars which
(a) preventive measures, and (b) the arrest of the bleeding.
(absolute continuity) and thereby corrects the inevitable error
(according to the French historians) there were enough in Moscow to
(among whom was Rostov) moved nearer to the Emperor. Stopping beside
(and you!) can copy and distribute it in the United States without
(and you!) can copy and distribute it in the United States without
(anterior annular) ligament, it is not uncommon for the intercarpal and
(b) If an artery is only _partly cut across_, the divided fibres of
(c) When the injury merely takes the form of a _puncture_ or _small
(cries of "author! author!" were heard in the crowd), said that
(he imagined the Emperor to be always surrounded by
(indicating Rostov) "has connections on the staff. You won't find a
(looking from the Russian side) and transferred it to the plain
(malacia) of the bones, due to excessive absorption of osseous tissue,
(nicknamed in society, "the King of Prussia") ever since the Emperor
(now that the hunt was over and they were in the house, Nicholas no
(of whom the lad was also particularly fond), and especially
(or any other work associated in any way with the phrase "Project
(or any other work associated in any way with the phrase "Project
(pig's lemonade), and Morel spoke well of the limonade de cochon he
(she was to have two estates in Penza and the Nizhegorod forests).
(that is, the Smolensk) road acted simultaneously on him also.
(the commissariat did not always keep up with the troops)--they
(the family solicitor) "and he says the same."
(the historians do not accuse him of that)--had not the same
(the honours awarded to Prince Prozorovski, under whom he had served
(the reflection was still incomplete), he caught himself smiling and
(they were always the same), but most of all he liked to hear
(though he tried to hide it) he himself suffered from the
(what need had he for any more glory?). The one thing he wished for
(what seemed most important to the Cossacks) horses, saddles,
(where the actions of men are the subject of observation) the first
(which was theirs) and by the sound of their hurried footsteps going
(who too reason) also considered the position impossible and therefore
*"A little bit in love with the young man."
*"And hurrah for the whole world!"
*"Are you the master here?"
*"Bring the boyars to me."
*"But my dear fellow, with all my respect for the Orthodox Russian
*"But, my dear, you ought on the contrary to be grateful to me for
*"Child of the Don."
*"Don't see it that way, that's the trouble."
*"Forty thousand men massacred and the army of our allies destroyed,
*"From the sublime to the ridiculous is but a step."
*"He is all the rage just now.
*"I have acted the Emperor long enough; it is time to act the
*"If you regard the question from that point of view."
*"It is the talk of all Moscow. My word, I admire you!"
*"Lancers of the 6th Regiment."
*"Long live Henry the Fourth, that valiant king! That rowdy devil."
*"Long live the king."
*"Marlborough is going to the wars; God knows when he'll return."
*"Moscow, the Asiatic capital of this great empire, the sacred
*"Oh, yes, the only aim is to weaken the enemy, so of course one
*"Quarters, quarters, lodgings! The French are good fellows. What
*"That Asiatic city of the innumerable churches, holy Moscow! Here
*"That Russian army which has been brought from the ends of the
*"The principle of monarchies is honor seems to me incontestable.
*"The war must be extended widely. I cannot sufficiently commend
*"Think it over; get into the barque, and take care not to make it a
*"To shed (or not to shed) the blood of his peoples."
*"We must let him off the u!"
*** END OF THE PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK, THE ADVENTURES OF SHERLOCK HOLMES ***
*** END OF THE PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK, WAR AND PEACE ***
*** END OF THIS PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK HISTORY OF THE UNITED STATES ***
*** START OF THE PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK, THE ADVENTURES OF SHERLOCK HOLMES ***
*** START OF THE PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK, WAR AND PEACE ***
*** START OF THIS PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK HISTORY OF THE UNITED STATES ***
***START**THE SMALL PRINT!**FOR PUBLIC DOMAIN EBOOKS**START***
***START**THE SMALL PRINT!**FOR PUBLIC DOMAIN EBOOKS**START***
**The Legal Small Print**
**The Legal Small Print**
**Welcome To The World of Free Plain Vanilla Electronic Texts**
**Welcome To The World of Free Plain Vanilla Electronic Texts**
*Are the pretty women.
*Do you know the proverb?
*END THE SMALL PRINT! FOR PUBLIC DOMAIN EBOOKS*Ver.02/11/02*END*
*END THE SMALL PRINT! FOR PUBLIC DOMAIN EBOOKS*Ver.02/11/02*END*
*History of the year 1812. The character of Kutuzov and
*Lay member of the Society of Jesus.
*The French shawl dance.
*The Illuminati sought to substitute republican for monarchical
*The little one is charming.
*The marshalls.
*The most fascinating woman in Petersburg.
*To force the guard.
*You expect to make an income out of the government.
*[2] "Hurrah for the Austrians! Hurrah for the Russians! Hurrah
*[2] That suits us down to the ground.
- You pay a royalty fee of 20% of the gross profits you derive from
- You pay a royalty fee of 20% of the gross profits you derive from
... aided by stock jobbing and party dissensions has fed the hopes of
... and the wish, which constitutes the Emperor's sole and
1 per cent. solution of formalin. In operating upon hydatids the utmost
1,300,000. The Socialists, with Eugene V. Debs as their candidate again,
1. Account for the failure of the Articles of Confederation.
1. All debts contracted and engagements entered into, before the
1. By what devices was democracy limited in the first days of our
1. Compare the early career of Roosevelt with that of some other
1. Contrast the reception of secession in 1860 with that given to
1. Contrast the state of industry and commerce at the close of the Civil
1. Enumerate the chief financial measures of the Wilson administration.
1. Give some of the special features in the history of Missouri,
1. Give the three main subdivisions of the chapter.
1. How did the West come to play a role in the Revolution?
1. Is land in your community parceled out into small farms? Contrast the
1. Name the states west of the Mississippi in 1865.
1. Show how the character of George III made for trouble with the
1. Tell the story of the international crisis that developed soon after
1. Those which subserve _deep sensibility_ and conduct the impulses
1. Trace the decline of slavery in the North and explain it.
1. What are the striking features of the new economic age?
1. What proof have we that the political parties were not clearly
1. What was the leading feature of Jefferson's political theory?
1. What was the non-importation agreement? By what body was it adopted?
1. Who were some of the critics of abuses in American life?
1. Who were the leaders in the first administration under the
1. Why is leisure necessary for the production of art and literature?
1. Why were women involved in the reform movements of the new century?
1. _On the Field._--Haemorrhage is arrested in the limbs by an improvised
1.C.  The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation ("the Foundation"
1.C.  The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation ("the Foundation"
1.D.  The copyright laws of the place where you are located also govern
1.D.  The copyright laws of the place where you are located also govern
1.E.1.  The following sentence, with active links to, or other immediate
1.E.1.  The following sentence, with active links to, or other immediate
1.E.4.  Do not unlink or detach or remove the full Project Gutenberg-tm
1.E.4.  Do not unlink or detach or remove the full Project Gutenberg-tm
1.F.2.  LIMITED WARRANTY, DISCLAIMER OF DAMAGES - Except for the "Right
1.F.2.  LIMITED WARRANTY, DISCLAIMER OF DAMAGES - Except for the "Right
1.F.4.  Except for the limited right of replacement or refund set forth
1.F.4.  Except for the limited right of replacement or refund set forth
1.F.6.  INDEMNITY - You agree to indemnify and hold the Foundation, the
1.F.6.  INDEMNITY - You agree to indemnify and hold the Foundation, the
10 to 20 feet of highly drawn silver or other wire is passed into the
10. Compare the American "invasion" of California with the migration
10. Compare the fourteenth and fifteenth amendments with regard to the
10. Compare the work of women in the Revolutionary War with their labors
10. Contrast the causes of the War of 1812 with the results.
10. Describe the economic forces which were drawing the East and the
10. Do you think the English legislation was beneficial or injurious to
10. Explain the direct primary. Commission government. The city manager
10. Explain the nature of the contests between the governors and the
10. Explain why the blockade was such a deadly weapon.
10. How did the federal government aid in western agriculture?
10. How was the Spanish War viewed in England? On the Continent?
10. In what way did the North derive advantages from slavery?
10. In what way did the provisions for ratifying and amending the
10. Name some of the minor parties. Enumerate the reforms they
10. Relate the leading events connected with nullification in South
10. Show how the war in Europe affected American commerce and involved
10. To define and punish piracies and felonies committed on the high
10. What American rights were assailed in the submarine campaign?
10. What was the relation of the Federation to the extreme radicals? To
10. What were the startling events between 1850 and 1860?
10. Why is the year 1848 an important year in the woman movement?
10. Why were the Republicans especially strong immediately after the
100,000 copies were scattered broadcast over the country, patriots
1000). This is done some hours before the operation, and the part is
102 o, 103 o, or 104 o F., with morning remissions (Fig. 10). The heart's
103 o F., the pulse become small and rapid, and haemic murmurs are
105 o F. In the course of an hour it begins to fall again, and the
105 o F. The addition of 5 to 10 minims of adrenalin solution (1 in 1000)
11. Account for the rise of the Republican party. What party had used
11. Describe briefly the experiments of the farmers in politics.
11. Enumerate some of the early gains in civil liberty for women.
11. Explain the injunction.
11. Give Wilson's position on the _Lusitania_ affair.
11. Give the economic reasons for the attitude of New England.
11. Give the leading diplomatic events of the war.
11. How did the development of the West affect the East? The South?
11. How was the Revolution financed?
11. In what way was the South economically dependent upon the North?
11. State Jackson's views and tell the outcome of the controversy.
11. What illustrations can you give showing the influence of war in
11. What was the nature of the conflict over ratification?
12 State the national policies generally favored in the North and
12. Account for the Solid South. What was the situation before 1860?
12. Account for the strength of middle-western candidates.
12. Describe the early economic policy of the Mormons.
12. Give five "nationalist" measures of the Republicans. Discuss each in
12. How did the Dred Scott decision become a political issue?
12. How did the World War affect the presidential campaign of 1916?
12. Outline the domestic phases of Roosevelt's administrations.
12. Trace the growth of anti-slavery sentiment.
12. Trace the rise of the suffrage movement. Show the effect of the
12. What relation did the opening of the great grain areas of the West
12. What was the outcome of the Alien and Sedition Acts?
12. What were the leading towns? Did they compare in importance with
12. Why is diplomacy important in war? Describe the diplomatic triumph
12. Why was Jackson opposed to the bank? How did he finally destroy it?
13. Account for the dissensions under Taft.
13. Enumerate some of the abuses that appeared in American political
13. How did Germany finally drive the United States into war?
13. Outline the history of restrictions on immigration.
13. Review the history of the federal suffrage amendment.
13. Show how economic conditions in the South were unfavorable to
13. Sketch the career of John Marshall.
13. State some of the new problems of the West.
13. The Whigs complained of Jackson's "executive tyranny." What did they
13. What measures were taken to restrain criticism of the government?
13. What was the nature of the opposition in England to the war?
13. What were some of the points brought out in the Lincoln-Douglas
13. Why were conservative men disturbed in the early nineties?
14. Describe the party division in 1860.
14. Discuss the case of Marbury _vs._ Madison.
14. Discuss the significance of American expansion to the Pacific Ocean.
14. Explain the Republican position in 1896.
14. Explain the policy of the "open door."
14. Give some of the leading events in Clay's career.
14. Give the Southern explanation of the antagonism between the North
14. Give the events connected with the peace settlement; the terms of
14. Name the chief results of an "industrial revolution" in general. In
14. Sketch the rise and growth of the reform movement.
14. State the American war aims given by the President.
14. Summarize the history of the suffrage in the states.
14. To make rules for the government and regulation of the land and
14. Trace the rise of the Progressive movement.
14. What part did Lincoln play in all phases of the war?
14. What problems arise in connection with the assimilation of the alien
144). The surface is smooth or lobulated, and in consistence the tumour
15 parts--the gut can be kept permanently in the solution without
15, instructed its delegates at Philadelphia to propose the independence
15. Enumerate the measures taken by the government to win the war.
15. Give Mr. Bryan's doctrines in 1896. Enumerate the chief features of
15. How do you account for the triumph of Harrison in 1840?
15. How is the fluctuating state of public opinion reflected in the
15. State the principal results of the war.
15. To provide for calling forth the militia to execute the laws of the
15. What were the main planks in the Republican platform?
155,000 square miles--about seventy times the size of the state of
16. Give the main features in the economic and social status of the
16. Review Wilson's early career and explain the underlying theory of
16. Review the part of the navy in the war. The army.
16. To provide for organizing, arming, and disciplining the militia,
16. What were the leading measures adopted by the Republicans after
1606-1898, pp. 1-14. Analyze the first and second Massachusetts charters
1620. The Mayflower Compact, so famous in American history, was but a
1640, the period of arbitrary Stuart government, about twenty thousand
1663 required the colonies to export certain articles to Great Britain
1676) which is the clinical manifestation of diffuse thickening of the
17. Explain why the race question is national now, rather than
17. How were the terms of peace formulated?
17. What rights did Congress attempt to confer upon the former slaves?
170,000 inhabitants of the province were descendants of the original
1752-1754 Fort Le Boeuf near Lake Erie, Fort Venango on the upper
1755 and Wolfe's exploit in capturing Quebec four years later were the
1767, it expressly authorized the superior courts of the colonies to
1772 the purchases of the same colony amounted to $507,909. In short,
1774, at the instigation of Samuel Adams. The response to the summons
1776, declared their independence. Unable to conquer them alone, the
1778, and the second until the end of the struggle. During the first
1786 that a mob surrounded the legislature, demanding a repeal of the
1787, exclaimed that the contest was not between the large and the small
1787, three states had ratified the Constitution: Delaware and New
1790. Such was the financial significance of the railways.
1795, tiny settlements of families appeared on Lake Erie in the "Western
18. Enumerate the principal results of the war.
1801, was the great issue decided in his favor.[2]
1807, and 1809, gaining strength and growing. In 1811 the group of
1809 by a German student in Vienna, and knew that the student had been
1810 the population of lower Louisiana was over 75,000. The time had
1812 as in 1808 of the "great nation" and the "great man," and
1813) flow from the same sources--the circumstances of his birth,
1821 and the price of the land lowered to a cash price of $1.75 an acre,
1824, set to work with zeal to undo the results of the French
1829. But the triumph was illusory. Dissensions appeared in the labor
1830 while the subject was in the air, he had with laconic firmness
1834. In the South, the Chesapeake and Ohio Company, chartered in 1825,
1836 which required the purchasers of public lands to pay for them in
1844, the Democrats had coupled with the slogan, "The Reannexation of
1846, was ratified by the Senate after an acrimonious debate. "Oh!
1850, providing for the construction of the canal under joint
1859 he thus recorded the progress of civilization in his journal:
1859, had prophesied that the Pacific Railroad would work a revolution
1860, "that the slave-holding South is now the controlling power of the
1860, several aggressive steps were taken in the American labor
1860, took the oath of allegiance, they should be permitted to
1861, Captain Wilkes, commanding a union vessel, overhauled the British
1865, to construct a union army that outnumbered the Confederates two to
1876 the protest of American labor was loud and long and both the
1887, which created the Interstate Commerce Commission, forbade
1887; finally in 1896 on the admission of Utah to the union they
1896; under the constitution drafted two years later the registration
19. Describe the League of Nations.
1901 authorizing the United States to proceed alone, on condition that
1904 and it was said that the "financial and corporation interests" were
1904 proposed a second conference, yielding to the Czar the honor of
1905, declared themselves opposed to all capitalists, the wages system,
1913 joined the waters of the Atlantic and the Pacific. Nearly eight
1914-1918. It has been found also that the infective complications are
1917 at least thirty-two of the forty-eight were "dry." When the federal
1917, and the amending law, known as the Sedition act, passed in May of
2. Can you give any illustrations of the way that war promotes
2. Compare the Northern and Southern views of the union.
2. Compare the condition of the South in 1865 with that of the North.
2. Contrast the climate and soil of the Middle West and the Far West.
2. Contrast the work of the first and second Continental Congresses.
2. Describe the character of early opposition to slavery.
2. Each House may determine the rules of its proceedings, punish its
2. Each State shall appoint, in such manner as the legislature thereof
2. Enumerate the chief measures of his administration.
2. Enumerate the services rendered to the nation by the railways.
2. Every bill, which shall have passed the House of Representatives; and
2. Explain the domestic difficulties of the individual states.
2. Explain the position of the church in colonial life.
2. Explain why the party and parliamentary systems of England favored
2. Give the essential facts relating to the purchase of Alaska.
2. He shall have power, by and with the advice and consent of the
2. Immediately after they shall be assembled in consequence of the first
2. In what manner was the rest of the western region governed?
2. Name the chief foreign and domestic questions of the Roosevelt-Taft
2. No State shall, without the consent of the Congress, lay any imposts
2. No senator or representative shall, during the time for which he was
2. On what grounds were the limitations defended? Attacked?
2. The Congress shall assemble at least once in every year, and such
2. The Congress shall have power to declare the punishment of treason,
2. The Congress shall have power to dispose of and make all needful
2. The privilege of the writ of _habeas corpus_ shall not be suspended,
2. This Constitution and the laws of the United States which shall be
2. To borrow money on the credit of the United States;
2. What is history? What determines the topics that appear in written
2. What is the explanation of the extraordinary industrial progress of
2. What step was taken to appease the opposition?
2. What was the Wilson policy toward trusts? Toward labor?
2. Why were individuals unable to go alone to America in the beginning?
2. _At the Advanced Dressing Station_, after the patient has had a
20 c.c. being injected at one place. The serum may be introduced
20 to 70 milliamperes, is allowed to flow for about an hour. The hollow
20. Trace the fate of the treaty in American politics.
23 the Russian troops were crossing the river Enns. At midday the
2500 and over; in 1920 more than half of the population lived in towns
3. Compare the planting system with the factory system.
3. Contrast the enfranchisement of the slaves with the enfranchisement
3. Contrast the political roles of Puritanism and the Established
3. Describe the elements akin to feudalism which were introduced in the
3. Every order, resolution, or vote to which the concurrence of the
3. Explain the peculiar relation of railways to government.
3. Explain the theory that the quantity of money determines the prices
3. Give the principal provisions of the Northwest Ordinance.
3. How did the state of English finances affect English policy?
3. Make a table of the colonies, showing the methods employed in their
3. No State shall, without the consent of Congress, lay any duty of
3. No person held to service or labor in one State, under the laws
3. No person shall be a senator who shall not have attained to the age
3. Outline the efforts made by employers to establish closer relations
3. Outline the rise of political democracy in the United States.
3. Representatives and direct taxes[3] shall be apportioned among the
3. Review again the theory of states' rights. How has it fared in recent
3. Review the early history of our interest in the Caribbean.
3. State the position of women under the old common law.
3. The Congress may determine the time of choosing the electors, and the
3. The President shall have power to fill all vacancies that may happen
3. The senators and representatives before mentioned, and the members of
3. The trial of all crimes, except in cases of impeachment, shall be by
3. Those which subserve _epicritic_ sensibility, the most highly
3. To regulate commerce with foreign nations, and among the several
3. Were the Jeffersonians able to apply their theories? Give the
3. What international complications were involved in the Panama Canal
3. What was the effect of abolition agitation?
3. What were the peculiar features of the Confederate constitution?
3. Why did efforts at reform by the Congress come to naught?
3. _In the Field Ambulance or Casualty Clearing Station_ further
3/4 o F. higher than in the axilla.
30' was authorized by the federal Constitution or not. The Court might
342,000; Chicago from 109,000 to 1,698,000. The miles of city tenements
36 o 30'. During the debate on the subject an extreme view had been
3d, the German government declared war on France. The following day,
4. Amid what circumstances was the Monroe Doctrine applied in
4. Discuss the use of criticism as an aid to progress in a democracy.
4. Enumerate five important measures of the English government affecting
4. Explain how freehold land tenure happened to predominate in the West.
4. Explain the importance of the Mississippi River to Western farmers.
4. Explain the success of freehold tillage.
4. How was the Confederacy financed?
4. In what sections did industry flourish before the Civil War? Why?
4. Narrate the events leading up to the constitutional convention.
4. Neither House, during the session of Congress, shall, without the
4. No person except a natural born citizen, or a citizen of the United
4. Review the Monroe Doctrine. Discuss Roosevelt's applications of it.
4. Show the connection between the parts of Hamilton's system.
4. Sketch the rise and growth of the American Federation of Labor.
4. The Vice-President of the United States shall be President of the
4. Trace the growth of American independence from opinion to the sphere
4. What part did women play in the intellectual movement that preceded
4. What produced the revolution in Texas? Who led in it?
4. What sections of the country have been industrialized?
4. What steps were taken in colonial policies? In the Caribbean?
4. What was the condition of the planters as compared with that of the
4. What was the outcome of the final clash with the French?
4. What were the striking physical features of the West?
4. When vacancies happen in the representation from any State, the
4. Why did anti-slavery sentiment practically disappear in the South?
4. _In the Base Hospital or Hospital Ship_ various measures may be
497-500; Elson, _History of the United States_, pp. 799-805.
5. Compare the life of the planter with that of the farmer.
5. Compare the resources of the two sections.
5. Contrast the Presidents of the old and the new generations.
5. Contrast the general political views of Hamilton and Jefferson.
5. Describe American resistance to the Stamp Act. What was the outcome?
5. Enumerate the five chief results of the wars with the French and the
5. Explain the rise of the discussion of women's rights.
5. Explain what is meant by the "merit system" in the civil service.
5. Give the causes that led to the war with Spain.
5. How do you account for the rise and growth of the trusts? Explain
5. How does money capital contribute to prosperity? Describe the plight
5. How far back in our history does the labor movement extend?
5. In case of the removal of the President from office, or of his death,
5. Narrate some of the leading events in the struggle over annexation to
5. Show how events in Europe forced the Louisiana Purchase.
5. Show the connection between religion and learning in colonial times.
5. The House of Representatives shall choose their speaker and other
5. The Senate shall choose their other officers, and also a President
5. To coin money, regulate the value thereof, and of foreign coin, and
5. What is meant by the "melting pot"? What nationalities were
5. What is the strategic importance of the Caribbean to the United
5. Who were some of the leading men in the convention? What had been
5. Who were the early settlers in the West? What routes did they take?
5. Why is the Declaration of Independence an "immortal" document?
501(c)(3) educational corporation organized under the laws of the
501(c)(3) educational corporation organized under the laws of the
55-159, as the basis.
5th, the British prime minister announced that war had opened between
6. Account for the unpopularity of John Adams' administration.
6. Are the people in cities more or less independent than the farmers?
6. Compare the way immigrants come to-day with the way they came in
6. Describe some of the measures taken to raise the value of silver.
6. Describe the purposes and outcome of the National Labor Union and the
6. Explain the Eastern opposition to the admission of new Western
6. Explain why it was that the character of the English king mattered to
6. Give the chief steps in the restoration of white supremacy.
6. How did the World War break out in Europe?
6. How far had the western frontier advanced by 1776?
6. State the constitutional question involved in the Louisiana Purchase.
6. State the great problems before the convention.
6. Tell the leading events in that war.
6. The President shall, at stated times, receive for his services a
6. The Senate shall have the sole power to try all impeachments. When
6. To provide for the punishment of counterfeiting the securities and
6. What is meant by the sea power? Trace the voyage of the fleet around
6. What was the effect of the Revolution on colonial governments? On
6. What were some of the early writings about women?
6. What were the important results of the "peaceful" French Revolution
6. Why is the public service of increasing importance? Give some of its
6. Why was admission to the union so eagerly sought?
600,000 to 1,600,000; and the Dakotas from 5000 to 140,000.
64-73, 175-206; Wilson, _History of the American People_, Vol. IV, pp.
7. Account for the divided state of opinion in America.
7. Before he enter on the execution of his office, he shall take the
7. Contrast England under the Stuarts with England under the
7. Describe the Australian ballot and the abuses against which it is
7. Describe the attempts at a peaceful settlement.
7. Describe the contest between "Patriots" and "Tories."
7. Do you know of any other societies to compare with the Ku Klux Klan?
7. Explain how politics became involved in the creation of new states.
7. Explain the interaction of opinion between France and the United
7. Explain the relation between the tariff and the income tax in 1894.
7. Give the details of the peace settlement with Mexico.
7. In what respects were the planting and commercial states opposed?
7. No money shall be drawn from the Treasury, but in consequence of
7. Relate some of the troubles of early American publishers.
7. Show how American trade was affected by the European war.
7. State some of the problems raised by unrestricted immigration.
7. State the chief policies of the American Federation of Labor.
7. Summarize the events connected with American resistance.
7. Trace a connection between the economic system of the West and the
7. Trace the steps in the rise of organized labor before 1860.
7. What had been the career of Andrew Jackson before 1829?
7. What is meant by the question: "Does the Constitution follow the
7. What was the outcome as far as Cuba was concerned? The outcome for
7. Why was it impossible to keep the slavery issue out of national
8. Account for the anxiety of companies and proprietors to secure
8. Compare the policies of Jefferson and Madison.
8. Compare the raising of armies for the Civil War with the methods
8. Did the West rapidly become like the older sections of the country?
8. Discuss the attitude of the Filipinos toward American sovereignty in
8. Explain how the English Crown, Courts, and Parliament controlled the
8. Give the leading steps in the long controversy over slavery in the
8. Give the undemocratic features of provincial government.
8. How did it happen that the farmers led in regulating railway rates?
8. How did the "Reign of Terror" change American opinion?
8. No title of nobility shall be granted by the United States; and no
8. Review the events leading up to the War of 1812. Compare them with
8. Show how the "check and balance" system is embodied in our form of
8. Sketch the history of the protective tariff and explain the theory
8. To promote the progress of science and useful arts by securing for
8. Trace the history of self-government in Porto Rico. In the
8. What are the elements of direct government? Sketch their progress in
8. What is meant by the "joint occupation" of Oregon?
8. What was the theory of the relation of government to business in this
8. What were the centers for iron working? Ship building?
8. Who were among the early friends of Western development?
9. Compare the financial methods of the government in the two wars.
9. Contrast the American forces with the British forces and show how the
9. Describe the difficulties of trade between the East and the West.
9. Explain how the fisheries affected many branches of trade and
9. Explain the growth of Southern opposition to the tariff.
9. Give the terms of the Sherman Anti-Trust Act. What was its immediate
9. How did the colonial assemblies help to create an independent
9. How did the powers conferred upon the federal government help cure
9. How was the Oregon boundary dispute finally settled?
9. How were the "Force bills" overcome?
9. Name the three important classes of English legislation affecting the
9. Outline the rise of the socialist movement. How did it come into
9. Show how the rise of the factory affected the life and labor of
9. State the leading economic policies sponsored by the Republican
9. State the leading principles of international law involved and show
9. State the terms of the Compromise of 1850 and explain its failure.
9. To constitute tribunals inferior to the Supreme Court;
9. Trace the history of popular election of Senators.
9. What forces favored the heavy importation of slaves?
9. What is Cuba's relation to the United States?
9. What was the Burke-Paine controversy?
9. Why did the East and the South seek closer ties with the West?
9. Why did the United States become involved with England rather than
98.4 o F. (37 o C.) by the heat-regulating mechanism. It varies from hour
999 years. The rates charged and services rendered were left largely to
="The Muckrakers."=--Paxson, _The New Nation_ (Riverside Series), pp.
=A Contrast in the Far West and Southwest.=--As George Rogers Clark and
=A Government Founded on States or on People?--The
=A Liberal Immigration Policy.=--Linked with industry was the labor
=A National Convention Called (1787).=--The Congress, as tardy as ever,
=A Review of English Policy.=--Woodrow Wilson, _History of the American
=A Ruling Class Disfranchised.=--As the sovereignty of the planters had
=Abolition Agitation.=--McMaster, _History of the People of the United
=Abraham Lincoln.=--The services of Lincoln to the cause of union defy
=Aid in American Economic Independence.=--The effects of this economic
=Alarm over Dangers to the Republic.=--Leading American citizens,
=Alaska Purchased.=--The Mexican affair had not been brought to a close
=Alien and Sedition Laws.=--Flushed with success, the Federalists
=America Enters the War.=--Haworth, pp. 422-440; pp. 454-475. Ogg, pp.
=America on the Pacific.=--It has been said that the Mediterranean Sea
=American Interest in the Caribbean.=--Having achieved this diplomatic
=American Interests in the Caribbean.=--Ogg, pp. 246-265.
=American Interests in the Pacific.=--Ogg, pp. 304-324.
=American Power in the Caribbean.=--While extending more self-government
=American Principles.=--Prepare a table of them from the Resolutions of
=American Rights.=--Draw up a table showing all the principles laid down
=American War Aims.=--In many addresses at the beginning and during the
=Americanization.=--Intimately connected with the subject of immigration
=Amnesty for Confederates.=--Study carefully the provisions of the
=Amnesty for Southerners.=--The recovery of white supremacy in this way
=An English Historian's View of the Period.=--Green, _Short History of
=An English View of the Revolution.=--Green, _Short History of England_,
=An Opposition to Conciliate.=--The inauguration of Washington amid the
=Annexation.=--The politicians were disposed to walk very warily. Van
=Anti-slavery Agitation Continued.=--The promise was more difficult to
=Anti-trust Legislation.=--The tariff and currency laws were followed by
=Arkansas.=--Below Missouri lay the territory of Arkansas, which had
=Assumption and Funding of State Debts.=--Hamilton then turned to the
=Attacks on Abuses in American Life.=--The crisis precipitated by the
=Attacks on Republican "Imperialism."=--The Filipino insurrection,
=Attacks on the Restricted Suffrage.=--The changing circumstances of
=Banking and Finance.=--Out of commerce and manufactures and the
=Biographical Studies.=--Look up the history and services of the leaders
=Bloodshed at Lexington and Concord (April 19, 1775).=--Meanwhile the
=British Colonial Policy.=--Callender, _Economic History of the United
=British Opposition to the War.=--In measuring the forces that led to
=Bryan Nominated.=--In all the history of national conventions never had
=Burke Offers the Doctrine of Conciliation.=--The flooding tide of
=Burke Summons the World to War on France.=--In England, Edmund Burke
=Business Men and Republican Policies.=--Most of the leaders in industry
=Business Theories of Politics.=--As the statesmen of Hamilton's school
=California.=--With the growth of the northwestern empire, dedicated by
=Canals and Steamboats.=--A second epoch in the economic union of the
=Capital and Credit Destroyed.=--The fluid capital of the South, money
=Censorship and Restraints on the Press.=--The idea of printing,
=Changing Political Fortunes (1888-96).=--After the Democrats had
=Clay and the National Republicans.=--In this opposition movement,
=Clay's Home Market Theory of the Tariff.=--Callender, pp. 498-503.
=Cleveland and the Venezuela Affair.=--In the relations with South
=Commanding Officers.=--On the score of military leadership it is
=Commission Government for Cities.=--In the restless searching out of
=Company Unions.=--The changed economic life described by the three
=Congregations and Compacts for Self-government.=--A study of the
=Congress Attempts Some Reforms.=--The Congress was not indifferent to
=Congress and the War of 1812.=--Adams, Vol. VI, pp. 113-198; Elson, pp.
=Congress in Disrepute.=--With treaties set at naught by the states, the
=Conservation and the Land Problem.=--The disappearance of the frontier
=Control of the Crown over the Colonies.=--While no English ruler from
=Creditors and Falling Prices.=--To the bondholders or creditors, on the
=Criticism of the Old Parties.=--To this long program of measures the
=Cuban Relations.=--Within the sphere of colonial affairs, Cuba, though
=De Tocqueville's _Democracy in America_.=--In addition to the casual
=Debtors and the Fall in Prices.=--For many reasons the currency
=Defense of the Constitution.=--Moved by the tempest of opposition,
=Democracy in England and France.=--During the period of Jacksonian
=Diplomacy and the French Alliance.=--Hart, _American History Told by
=Diplomacy.=--The war had not advanced far before the federal government
=Dissent in the Solid South.=--Though every one grew accustomed to speak
=Drifting into War.=--Although the Congress had not given up all hope of
=Early American Opinion of the French Revolution.=--So close were the
=Early American Relations with Cuba.=--The year that brought Hawaii
=Early Federal Legislation.=--Coman, _Industrial History of the United
=Early French Interest.=--The great diplomatic triumph of the Revolution
=Early Life in the Middle West.=--Callender, _Economic History of the
=Early Relations with the French.=--During the first decades of French
=Early Southern Opposition to Slavery.=--In the South, the sentiment
=Eastern Agriculture Affected.=--In the East as well as abroad the
=Eastern Friends of the West.=--Fortunately for the nation, there were
=Economic Aspects of the War.=--Coman, _Industrial History of the United
=Economic Legislation.=--When President Roosevelt turned from the field
=Effect of the Laws in America.=--As compared with the strict monopoly
=Effects of French Aid.=--The French alliance brought ships of war,
=Efforts at Compromise.=--Republican leaders, on reviewing the same
=Efforts to Start Southern Industries Fail.=--A few of them, seeing the
=Emancipation.=--Among the extreme war measures adopted by the Northern
=English Opinion and the Revolution.=--Trevelyan, _The American
=English and French Opinion of the War.=--Rhodes, _History of the United
=European Interest in America.=--To the older and more settled
=Events Produce the Great Decision.=--The right way, indicated by Burke,
=Expansion and Land Hunger.=--The first of the great measures which
=Expansion of the United States=
=Experiments in Common Tillage.=--In the New World, with its broad
=Federal Legislative Measures.=--Prepare a table and brief digest of the
=Federal and State Relations.=--If the interference of the government
=Feudal Elements in the Colonies--Quit Rents, Manors, and
=Financial Aspects of the Bank Controversy.=--Dewey, _Financial History
=Financial Burdens and Commercial Disorder.=--While the provincials were
=Financial Condition of the United States.=--Fiske, _Critical Period of
=Financial and Commercial Disorders.=--In the field of public finance,
=Financing the Confederacy.=--No government ever set out upon its career
=Fishing.=--The greatest single economic resource of New England outside
=Fluctuation in Tariff Policy.=--As each of the old parties was divided
=Force, the British Answer.=--Just as the representatives of America
=Formation of the Constitution.=--(1) The plans before the convention,
=Free Land and Eastern Labor.=--It was not only the picturesque features
=Free Silver and the Campaign of 1896.=--Dewey, _National Problems_
=Freedom of Speech for Women.=--In the advancement of their causes, of
=French Intrigues in Mexico Blocked.=--Between the war for the union and
=Friends of the Constitution in Power.=--In the first Congress that
=Funding at Face Value.=--On the question of the terms of consolidation,
=Funding the National Debt.=--Paper declarations of rights, however,
=General Taylor Elected President.=--The ink was hardly dry upon the
=Germany Begins the Submarine Campaign.=--Germany now announced that, on
=Government Aid for Railways.=--Still the story is not ended. The
=Grain Supplants King Cotton.=--In the meantime a revolution was taking
=Great Riches and Taxation.=--Even the challenge of the radicals, such
=Greenbacks and Resumption.=--Dewey, _Financial History of the United
=Grenville and the War Debt.=--Within a year after the accession of
=Growing Dissensions.=--All in all, Taft's administration from the first
=Growth and Extension of Industry.=--In the field of manufacturing,
=Growth of Combinations.=--The years that followed the enactment of the
=Growth of Religious Toleration.=--Though neither the Anglicans of
=Hamilton and Washington Urge Reform.=--The attempts at reform by the
=Harrison and Tyler.=--The Hero of Tippecanoe was not long to enjoy the
=Historical Background.=--This was the culmination of a long and
=How the War Was Won.=--Then how did the American army win the war? For
=Immigrants Who Paid Their Own Way.=--Many of the immigrants to America
=Immigration.=--Coman, _Industrial History of the United States_ (2d
=Imperialism in the Presidential Campaign of 1900.=--It is not strange
=Independence Declared.=--The way was fully prepared, therefore, when,
=Indian Affairs.=--It is difficult to make general statements about the
=Indiana and Illinois.=--As in the neighboring state, the frontier in
=Industrial Distress Augments Unrest.=--The four years intervening
=Industry Outstrips Planting.=--The story of invention, that tribute to
=Inflation and Depreciation.=--As paper money flowed from the press, it
=Intercolonial Commerce.=--Although the bad roads of colonial times made
=Internal Improvements Checked.=--The bank had presented to Jackson a
=Intervention in China.=--Nothing but the arrival of armed forces, made
=Intimidation.=--In both politics and economics, the process of
=Iowa and Minnesota.=--To the southwest of Wisconsin beyond the
=Irrigation.=--In one respect agriculture in the Far West was unique. In
=Jackson's Criticisms of the Bank.=--Macdonald, _Documentary Source
=Jackson's View of the Union.=--See his proclamation on nullification in
=Jefferson Sees the Danger.=--Jefferson, the friend of France and sworn
=Jefferson and His Constitutional Scruples.=--When the news of this
=Jefferson's Policy.=--The President's dilemma was distressing. Both the
=John Brown's Raid.=--To the abolitionists the line of argument pursued
=John Marshall, the Nationalist.=--The Republicans in the lower ranges
=Judicial Control.=--Supplementing this administrative control over the
=Labor Legislation.=--By no mere coincidence, the Clayton Anti-trust law
=Labor and Politics.=--As for the political program of labor, the main
=Labor and the Great War.=--Carlton, pp. 282-306; Beard, _Short
=Labor and the War.=--In view of the restlessness of European labor
=Leadership in America.=--The origins of the American woman movement are
=Legislation Respecting the Territories.=--Ogg, pp. 236-245.
=Legislative Action against the Stamp Act.=--Leaders in the colonial
=Liberty Loans and Taxes.=--In order that the military and naval forces
=Limitation on Western Land Sales.=--Later in the same year (1763)
=Lord North Yields.=--As time wore on, events bore heavily on the side
=Lord North's "Olive Branch."=--When the news of the action of the
=Louisiana, Mississippi, and Alabama.=--Across the Mississippi to the
=Madison Accepts War as Inevitable.=--The conduct of the British
=Manufactures and the Tariff of 1816.=--Coman, _Industrial History of
=Mexican Relations.=--The extension of American enterprise southward
=Mexico Closes the Door.=--The government of Mexico, unaccustomed to
=Military Campaigns.=--The great battles are fully treated in Rhodes,
=Military Strategy--North and South.=--The broad outlines of military
=Mineral Resources.=--In another important particular the Far West
=Missouri.=--Far to the north in the Louisiana purchase, a new
=Missouri.=--When the middle of the nineteenth century had been reached,
=Mobilizing the Nation.=--Haworth, pp. 441-453.
=Monroe and the Florida Purchase.=--To the victor in that political
=Municipal Utilities.=--Similar problems arose in connection with the
=National Enfranchisement.=--After that, events moved rapidly. The great
=Northern Opposition to Annexation.=--All through the North the
=Nullification.=--McMaster, _History of the People of the United
=Oceanic Commerce and American Merchants.=--All through the eighteenth
=Ohio.=--The door of the union had hardly opened for Tennessee when
=Opening Railways to the Pacific.=--A decade before the Civil War the
=Opposition to Strong Central Government.=--Cherishing especially the
=Oregon.=--Closely associated in the popular mind with the contest about
=Organized Labor and the Public.=--Besides its relations to employers,
=Organized Labor and the Socialists.=--Beard, _Short History_, pp.
=Other Nationalities.=--Though the English, the Scotch-Irish, and the
=Our Insular Possessions.=--Elson, _History of the United States_, pp.
=Paine's "Commonsense."=--In the midst of this ferment of American
=Paine's Defense of the French Revolution.=--To counteract the campaign
=Patriot Writers Arouse the National Spirit.=--Stung by Tory taunts,
=Peace Negotiations.=--When the day for the first session of the
=Political Conditions in the South in 1868.=--Dunning, _Reconstruction,
=Political Parties and George III.=--The state of the political parties
=Popular Election of Federal Senators.=--While the movement for direct
=Popular Election of Presidential Electors.=--In a short time the spirit
=Popular Opposition.=--The Stamp Act was greeted in America by an
=Porto Rico.=--The government of Porto Rico was a relatively simple
=President Cleveland's Policy.=--Cleveland chose the way of peace. He
=President McKinley Negotiates.=--In the face of the swelling tide of
=President Taft's Policies.=--After the enactment of the tariff bill,
=President Wilson Urges Peace upon the Warring Nations.=--Apparently
=President Wilson's First Term.=--Elson, _History of the United States_,
=Problems Involved.=--The great problems before the convention were nine
=Proposals of the Hartford Convention.=--Macdonald, pp. 293-302.
=Prosecution of the Trusts.=--The party schism was even enlarged by what
=Protests of Colonial Women.=--The republican spirit which produced
=Provisions for Ratification and Amendment.=--When the frame of
=Puritanism in New England.=--If the established faith made for imperial
=Raising the Armies.=--The crisis at Fort Sumter, on April 12-14, 1861,
=Ranching in the Northwest.=--Theodore Roosevelt, _Ranch Life_, and
=Ratification of the Constitution.=--Hart, _History Told by
=Reception of the News of the Tea Riot.=--The news of the tea riot in
=Reclamation and Conservation.=--The open country--the deserts, the
=Religion and Higher Learning.=--Religious motives entered into the
=Religion and Local Schools.=--One of the first cares of each Protestant
=Religious and Intellectual Life.=--Lodge, _Short History of the English
=Repeal of the Missouri Compromise.=--To practical men, after all, the
=Republican Control of the South.=--To the strength enjoyed in the
=Republican Measures.=--The Republicans had complained of a great
=Republican Policies.=--The Republicans in 1897 found themselves in a
=Republican Simplicity.=--Every act of the Jeffersonian party during its
=Resistance in the South.=--The year following the Boston Massacre some
=Restraints on the States.=--Framing a government and endowing it with
=Restriction of Paper Money (1763).=--Among the many complaints filed
=Revision of the Articles or a New Government?=--The moment the first
=Revolutions in Cuba.=--For nearly twenty years afterwards the Cuban
=River and Lake Commerce.=--Callender, _Economic History of the United
=Roosevelt in the Field.=--After looking on for a while, ex-President
=Roosevelt's View of the Constitution.=--Equally significant was
=Rounding out the Continent.=--Three more territories now remained out
=Samoa.=--If the Senate had its doubts at first about the wisdom of
=Secession and the Theories of the Union.=--In severing their relations
=Secession.=--As arranged, the convention of South Carolina assembled in
=Selfish Conduct of the States.=--Callender, pp. 185-191.
=Settlement under the Homestead Act of 1862.=--Two factors gave a
=Shipbuilding.=--Of all the specialized industries in the colonies,
=Slave Owners Dominate Politics.=--The new doctrine of Calhoun was
=Slavery Defended as a Positive Good.=--As the abolition agitation
=Slavery and the Territories--the Missouri Compromise (1820).=--Though
=Slavery in the Southwest.=--Callender, pp. 641-652.
=Slavery.=--In Virginia, Lodge, _Short History_, pp. 67-69; in the
=Social Effects of Economic Activities.=--In many respects the social
=Social Effects of Land Tenure.=--Land tenure and the process of western
=Social Questions to the Front.=--From the day of his inauguration to
=Source Studies of the Townshend Acts.=--Hart, Vol. II, pp. 413-433.
=Source Studies on the Stamp Act.=--Hart, _American History Told by
=Source Study.=--Compare the Constitution and Articles of Confederation
=Sources of Republican Strength in the North.=--The Republican party was
=Southern Expectations.=--The answer to this question is to be found in
=Southern Plans for Union with the West.=--It was long the design of
=Southern Planters and Texas.=--While the farmers of the North found the
=Spanish Concessions.=--Still the State Department, under McKinley's
=State Constitutions Framed.=--With the rise of these new assemblies of
=State and National Action.=--Again the suffrage movement was in full
=Steps toward War.=--Three days after the receipt of the news that the
=Taxation and Great Fortunes.=--As a part of the campaign waged against
=Tenement House Control.=--Among the other pressing problems of the
=The Action of the State Conventions.=--Before the end of the year,
=The Acts of Parliament Respecting America.=--Macdonald, pp. 117-146.
=The Administration of Andros.=--Fiske, _Beginnings_, pp. 242-278.
=The Admission of Kentucky and Tennessee.=--When the eighteenth century
=The African Slaves.=--Rivaling in numbers, in the course of time, the
=The Agrarian West Turns to Industry.=--Nor was this vast enterprise
=The Albany Plan of Union.=--An attempt at a general colonial union was
=The Alien and Sedition Acts.=--Macdonald, _Documentary Source Book_,
=The American Federation of Labor--Organization and Policies.=--Beard,
=The American Federation of Labor.=--Meanwhile a powerful association of
=The American Navy in the War.=--As soon as Congress declared war the
=The American Policy of the "Open Door."=--In the autumn of 1899,
=The Annapolis Convention.=--Action finally came from the South. The
=The Annexation of Hawaii.=--While engaged in the dangerous Venezuela
=The Annexation of Texas.=--McMaster, Vol. VII. The passages on
=The Application of Tests of Allegiance.=--As the successive steps were
=The Aristocratic Features of the Old Order.=--The Revolutionary
=The Articles of Confederation.=--The formation of state constitutions
=The Attack on "Invisible Government."=--Some even maintained that the
=The Attitude of England.=--The Spanish war, while accomplishing the
=The Australian Ballot.=--A second line of attack on the political
=The Balance between the Planting and the Commercial States.=--After the
=The Banking Corporation.=--Very closely related to the growth of
=The Battle over the Greenbacks.=--The contest between these factions
=The Battles of the Revolution.=--Elson, pp. 235-317.
=The Beginnings of Organization.=--As women surmounted one obstacle
=The Blockade of Southern Ports.=--Four days after his call for
=The Boston Massacre.=--American opposition to the British authorities
=The Boston Tea Party.=--Although the British government, finding the
=The Boxer Rebellion in China.=--For a nation with a world-wide trade,
=The Break-up of the Great Estates.=--In the dissolution of chattel
=The British Offer Terms to America.=--Seeing the colonists about to be
=The British Parliamentary System.=--The peculiarities of the British
=The Burke-Paine Controversy.=--Make an analysis of Burke's _Reflections
=The Campaign of 1796--Adams Elected.=--On hearing of the retirement of
=The Campaign of 1908.=--Long before the end of his elective term,
=The Campaign of 1912.=--Haworth, pp. 360-379; Ogg, pp. 187-208.
=The Campaign of 1916.=--Haworth, pp. 412-418; Ogg, pp. 364-383.
=The Cause of Falling Prices.=--The fall in prices was due, no doubt, to
=The Changing Status of Women.=--While the suffrage movement was
=The Character of Jackson's Administration.=--Woodrow Wilson, _History
=The Character of the Loyalists.=--When General Howe evacuated Boston,
=The Character of the New King.=--The third George rudely broke the
=The Characteristics of the Western People.=--Travelers into the
=The Chartered Company.=--Compare the first and third charters of
=The Chinese Question.=--Sparks, _National Development_, pp. 229-250;
=The Church of England.=--Virginia was the stronghold of the English
=The City Manager Plan.=--A few years' experience with commission
=The Clash in the Ohio Valley.=--The second of these wars had hardly
=The Clash over American Trade.=--As in the time of the Napoleonic wars,
=The Club Movement among Women.=--All over the country women's societies
=The Colonial Assembly.=--Coincident with the drift toward
=The Colonial Press.=--Special Reference: G.H. Payne, _History of
=The Committees of Correspondence.=--As soon as debate had passed into
=The Compromise of 1850.=--Clay's speech in Harding, _Select Orations_,
=The Conclusion of the Russo-Japanese War.=--The applause which greeted
=The Condition of the State Governments.=--The legislative, executive,
=The Confederate Constitution.=--Compare with the federal Constitution
=The Conquest of California.=--Coman, Vol. II, pp. 297-319.
=The Conquest of the Desert.=--W.E. Smythe, _The Conquest of Arid
=The Constitutional Union Party.=--While the Democratic party was being
=The Contest in America over the Treaty of Peace.=--The publication of
=The Continental Congress.=--When the news of the "intolerable acts"
=The Corporation and Labor.=--In the development of the corporation
=The Course of the War.=--The war lasted for nearly three years without
=The Cowboy and Cattle Ranger.=--Between the frontier of farms and the
=The Crown of Thorns Speech.=--The champions of free silver replied in
=The Cumberland Road.=--A.B. Hulbert, _The Cumberland Road_.
=The De Lome and the _Maine_ Incidents.=--Such a policy was defeated by
=The Declaration of Independence.=--Fiske, _The American Revolution_,
=The Decline in the Value of Silver.=--Absorbed in the greenback
=The Decline of Slavery in the North.=--At the time of the adoption of
=The Defense of the Old Order.=--It must not be supposed that property
=The Demands of Dissenting Parties.=--From the election of 1872, when
=The Democratic Convention at Chicago.=--Never, save at the great
=The Democratic Platform.=--It was to the call from Chicago that the
=The Democrats Divided.=--When the Democratic convention met at
=The Desire to Effect Reforms.=--As they came to study their own history
=The Destruction of the Slave Power.=--Next to the vindication of
=The Development of the Small Freehold.=--The cheapness of land and the
=The Development of the Suffrage Movement.=--Porter, pp. 228-254; Ogg,
=The Difficulties of Early Transportation.=--Means of communication
=The Direct Primary.=--In connection with the uprising against machine
=The Disputed Election of 1876.=--Haworth, _The United States in Our Own
=The Disputed Election of 1876.=--While taking note of the long years of
=The Dissolution of Assemblies.=--The governor of Massachusetts, hearing
=The Diversification of Crops.=--No less significant was the concurrent
=The Diversity of Western Agriculture.=--In soil, produce, and
=The Doctrine of Implied Powers.=--While restraining Congress in the
=The Doctrine of Natural Rights.=--The dissolution of assemblies, the
=The Dred Scott Case.=--McMaster, Vol. VIII, pp. 278-282. Compare the
=The Dred Scott Decision (1857).=--In his inaugural, Buchanan vaguely
=The Drift of Events toward Independence.=--Official support for the
=The East Alarmed.=--A people so independent as the Westerners and so
=The East Forms Ties with the West.=--Eastern leaders were not blind to
=The Economic Development of the United States=
=The Effect of the French Revolution on American Politics.=--The course
=The Election of 1904.=--The views and measures which he advocated with
=The Election of John Quincy Adams (1824).=--The campaign of 1824 marked
=The Embargo and Non-Intercourse Acts.=--Macdonald, pp. 282-288; Adams,
=The Embargo and Non-intercourse Acts.=--In 1806, Congress passed and
=The Eminent Men of the Convention.=--On the roll of that memorable
=The End of the Old Generation.=--In the election of 1824, the
=The English and French Blockades.=--In addition to bringing Louisiana
=The English.=--In leadership and origin the thirteen colonies, except
=The Espionage and Sedition Acts.=--By the Espionage law of June 15,
=The European War Disturbs American Commerce.=--This battle of wits, or
=The Expansion of the American Market.=--Upon industry as well as
=The Expulsion of French Power from North America.=--The effects of the
=The Extension of Canals and Railways.=--As necessary to mechanical
=The Extension of Cotton Planting.=--Callender, _Economic History of the
=The Extreme Radicals.=--Some of the socialists, defeated in their
=The Failure of the Confederation.=--Elson, _History of the United
=The Federal Reserve System.=--Ogg, pp. 228-232.
=The Federal Suffrage Amendment.=--Their plans and activities, when the
=The Federalists Discredited.=--By a strange turn of fortune's wheel,
=The Federation and Political Issues.=--The hostility of the Federation
=The Filipino Revolt against American Rule.=--In the sphere of domestic
=The Final Phase--the French and Indian War.=--Thus it happened that the
=The Final Terms of Peace.=--The treaty of peace, as finally agreed
=The First Amendments--a Bill of Rights.=--To meet the opposition,
=The First Election.=--In the autumn of 1788, elections were held to
=The First Gains in Civil Liberty.=--The convention of 1848 did not make
=The First Phases of the European War.=--Haworth, pp. 395-412; Ogg, pp.
=The Five Intolerable Acts.=--Parliament, beginning on March 31, 1774,
=The Force Bills Attacked and Nullified.=--The granting of amnesty
=The Force Bills.=--Macdonald, pp. 547-551; 554-564.
=The Form of the Government.=--As to the details of the frame of
=The Formation of the Confederacy.=--Acting on the call of Mississippi,
=The Formation of the Progressive Party.=--The action of the Republicans
=The French Appeal for Help.=--At the same time the French Republic
=The French Revolution.=--In this exciting period, when all America was
=The French Revolution.=--Robinson and Beard, _Development of Modern
=The French and Indian Wars.=--Special reference: W.M. Sloane, _French
=The Futility of the Anti-Trust Law.=--Whether the Sherman law was
=The Geographical Aspects of the War.=--For the British the theater of
=The Germans.=--Third among the colonists in order of numerical
=The Gold Standard and the Tariff.=--Yet strange as it may seem, the
=The Government of a Proprietary Colony, Pennsylvania.=--Lodge, pp.
=The Government of a Royal Province, Virginia.=--Lodge, pp. 43-50.
=The Grangers and Populism.=--Paxson, _The New Nation_ (Riverside
=The Grangers and State Regulation.=--The same uncertainty about the
=The Grangers.=--This unsparing, not to say revolutionary, criticism of
=The Great Coal Strike.=--The Roosevelt theory that the President could
=The Great Debate of 1850.=--The temper of the country was white hot
=The Greenback Party.=--The first extensive activity of the Grangers was
=The Growth of Industry, 1815-1840.=--Callender, pp. 459-471. From 1850
=The Growth of Northern Sentiment against Slavery.=--In both sections of
=The Growth of Public Sentiment in Favor of Independence.=--Events were
=The Growth of the Industrial Population.=--A revolution of such
=The Hague Conference.=--The controversies over Latin-American relations
=The Heated Campaign.=--The campaign which ensued outrivaled in the
=The Homestead Act of 1862.=--In the immigration measure guaranteeing a
=The Impressment of Seamen.=--That was not all. Great Britain, in dire
=The Income Tax Amendment.=--The rift in party harmony was widened by
=The Income Tax of 1894.=--The advocates of tariff reduction usually
=The Independence of Texas Declared.=--Numbering only about one-fourth
=The Independence of Texas.=--McMaster, _History of the People of the
=The Indian Question.=--Sparks, _National Development_ (American Nation
=The Indifference of the First Two Georges.=--On the death in 1714 of
=The Industrial and Commercial Revolution.=--On top of the radical
=The Initiative and Referendum.=--As a corrective for the evils which
=The Interstate Commerce Act of 1887.=--Within a few years, the movement
=The Inventions.=--Assign one to each student. Satisfactory accounts are
=The Inventors.=--Watt and Boulton experimenting with steam in England,
=The Iron Industry.=--Almost equally widespread was the art of iron
=The Kentucky and Virginia Resolutions.=--Jefferson was quick to take
=The Knights of Labor.=--Beard, _Short History_, pp. 116-126; Dewey,
=The Labor Question.=--On the labor question, then pressing to the front
=The Land Companies, Speculators, and Western Land Tenure.=--As in the
=The Last of the Frontier.=--When Horace Greeley made his trip west in
=The Last of the Stuarts.=--The struggles between Charles I (1625-49)
=The Leadership and Doctrines of Jefferson.=--The party dispute had not
=The League of Nations in the Campaign of 1920.=--At this juncture the
=The League of Nations.=--High among the purposes which he had in mind
=The Lincoln-Douglas Debates.=--Analysis of original speeches in
=The Lincoln-Douglas Debates.=--The following year the interest of the
=The Literacy Test.=--Still the advocates of restriction were not
=The Losses in American Commerce.=--This high-handed conduct on the part
=The Louisiana Purchase.=--Text of Treaty in Macdonald, _Documentary
=The Massachusetts Circular (1768).=--Massachusetts, under the
=The Methods of Travel into the West.=--Many stories giving exact
=The Mexican War.=--The inevitable war with Mexico, foretold by the
=The Migration to Oregon.=--Schafer, pp. 105-172. Coman, _Economic
=The Military Education of the Colonists.=--The same wars that showed
=The Missouri Compromise.=--Respecting one other important measure of
=The Monroe Doctrine Applied to Germany.=--Less spectacular than the
=The Monroe Doctrine.=--Even more effective in fashioning the national
=The Monroe Message.=--Macdonald, pp. 318-320.
=The Mormon Migration.=--Coman, Vol. II, pp. 167-206.
=The Mugwumps and Cleveland Democracy in 1884.=--Though aided by
=The Nation Aroused.=--With the spirit of criticism came also the spirit
=The National Road.=--To far-sighted men, like Albert Gallatin, "the
=The New Economic Age.=--The spirit of criticism and the measures of
=The New England Confederation.=--Analyze the document in Macdonald,
=The New England Confederation.=--It was in their efforts to deal with
=The New England View of the Tariff.=--Callender, pp. 503-514.
=The New York Assembly Suspended.=--In the very month that Townshend's
=The Nominating Convention.=--As the suffrage was widened and the
=The Non-Importation Agreement.=--The Congress was not content, however,
=The North during the War.=--Rhodes, Vol. V, pp. 189-342.
=The Northwest Ordinance.=--The final problem which had to be solved
=The Number of Immigrants.=--There were no official stations on the
=The Opening of the Revolution.=--Elson, _History of the United States_,
=The Opposition.=--Storms of criticism at once descended upon the
=The Oregon Boundary Dispute.=--Schafer, _History of the Pacific
=The Outbreak of the War.=--In the opening days of August, 1914, the
=The Outcome of the War.=--The foregone conclusion was soon reached.
=The Outward Signs of Enterprise.=--It is difficult to comprehend all
=The Panama Canal.=--Haworth, pp. 300-309; Ogg, pp. 266-277; Paxson, pp.
=The Panama Canal.=--The most important foreign question confronting
=The Panic of 1857.=--In the midst of the acrimonious dispute over the
=The Passing of the Wild West.=--Haworth, _The United States in Our Own
=The Patriot Financiers.=--To the efforts of Congress in financing the
=The Patriots and Tories.=--Thus, by one process or another, those who
=The Peace Conference.=--On January 18, 1919, a conference of the Allied
=The Peace Protocol.=--Spain had already taken cognizance of stern
=The Peace Settlement.=--Haworth, pp. 475-497; Elson, pp. 971-982.
=The People in 1830.=--From contemporary writings in Hart, _American
=The People of the Colonies.=--Virginia, Lodge, _Short History_, pp.
=The People.=--With government established, federal arms victorious over
=The Personality and Early Career of Roosevelt.=--On September 14, 1901,
=The Philippine Insurrection.=--Latane, pp. 82-99.
=The Philippines and Porto Rico.=--Independence for the Philippines and
=The Philippines.=--The administration of the Philippines presented far
=The Policies of the American Federation.=--Unlike the Knights of Labor,
=The Powers of the Federal Government.=--On the question of the powers
=The Presidential Election of 1916.=--In the midst of this crisis came
=The Pro-slavery Triumph in the Election of 1852.=--The results of the
=The Problems of Immigration.=--From its very inception, the American
=The Proclamation of Neutrality and the Jay Treaty.=--Unmoved by the
=The Prohibition Amendment.=--A still more significant form of
=The Proprietary System.=--Analysis of Penn's charter of 1681, in
=The Proprietor.=--A third and very important colonial agency was the
=The Prosecution of the Trusts.=--As an executive, President Roosevelt
=The Protective Tariff of 1816.=--The Republicans supplemented the Bank
=The Protective Tariff.=--A third part of Hamilton's program was the
=The Public Service.=--It was a wise comprehension of the needs of
=The Quarrel with France.=--The French Directory, the executive
=The Quartering Act (1765).=--The ministers were aware that the Stamp
=The Question of Popular Election.=--The method of selecting federal
=The Question of the Suffrage.=--The battle over the suffrage was sharp
=The Race Question.=--B.T. Washington, _Up From Slavery_ (sympathetic
=The Railway Age.=--Schafer, _History of the Pacific Northwest_, pp.
=The Recall.=--Executive officers and judges, as well as legislatures,
=The Reform Movement in Republican Ranks.=--The sentiments expressed by
=The Regulation of Railways.=--The first attempts to use the government
=The Reign of Terror.=--While profuse congratulations were being
=The Religious Congregation.=--A second agency which figured largely in
=The Removal of the Indians.=--Unlike the frontier of New England in
=The Repeal of the Missouri Compromise.=--McMaster, Vol. VIII, pp.
=The Repeal of the Stamp Act and the Sugar Act.=--The effect of American
=The Republican Answer.=--To McKinley and his supporters, engaged in a
=The Republican Convention.=--With the Whigs definitely forced into a
=The Republican Triumph in 1800.=--Thus the way was prepared for the
=The Republican Victory.=--The verdict of the nation was decisive.
=The Republicans Come Out for the Gold Standard.=--It was among the
=The Resolution of Congress.=--There was no doubt of the outcome when
=The Restraint of Civil Liberty.=--As in all great wars, particularly
=The Restriction of Immigration.=--In all this there was, strictly
=The Revolution in the Slave System.=--Among the representatives of
=The Revolution in the Status of the Slaves.=--No part of Southern
=The Rise and Regulation of Trusts.=--Dewey, _National Problems_, pp.
=The Rise of Organized Labor.=--The changing conditions of American
=The Rise of Trade Unionism.=--Mary Beard, _Short History of the
=The Rise of the Newspaper.=--The evolution of American democracy into a
=The Rise of the Populist Party.=--Those leaders of the old parties who
=The Rise of the Progressive Republicans.=--Preparatory to the campaign
=The Rise of the Republican Party.=--Events of terrible significance,
=The Rise of the Woman Suffrage Movement.=--McMaster, _History of the
=The Romance of Western Exploration.=--J.G. Neihardt, _The Splendid
=The Royal Provinces.=--Of the thirteen English colonies eight were
=The Santa Fe Trail.=--Coman, _Economic Beginnings_, Vol. II, pp. 75-93.
=The Santo Domingo Affair.=--The same issue was involved in a
=The Scotch-Irish.=--Next to the English in numbers and influence were
=The Sea Power.=--The British made good use of their fleet in cutting
=The Second Continental Congress.=--Though blood had been shed and war
=The Second United States Bank.=--In driving the Federalists towards
=The Second United States Bank.=--Macdonald, pp. 302-306.
=The Selective Draft.=--The World War became a war of nations. The
=The Service of the Railway.=--All this is fitting in its way. Figures
=The Sharpness of the Partisan Conflict.=--As a result of the clash of
=The Sherman Anti-Trust Law of 1890.=--As in the case of the railways,
=The Sherman Silver Purchase Act and the Bond Sales.=--Republican
=The Significance of Land Tenure.=--The way in which land may be
=The Significance of the Corporation.=--The corporation, in fact, became
=The Significance of the Mississippi River.=--At all events the East,
=The Silver Purchase Act (1878).=--Even before the actual resumption of
=The Small Freehold.=--In the upland regions of the South, however, and
=The Social Effects of the Economic Changes.=--As long as the slave
=The Socialists.=--The trade unionism "pure and simple," espoused by the
=The Soldiers.=--As far as the British soldiers were concerned their
=The Solid South.=--Out of the thirty-year conflict against "carpet-bag
=The South Dependent on the North.=--While East and West were drawing
=The South Reckons the Cost of Economic Dependence.=--As Southern
=The South during the War.=--Rhodes, Vol. V, pp. 343-382.
=The Southern Theory of Sectionalism.=--In the opinion of the statesmen
=The Specie Problem--the Parity of Gold and Silver.=--Defeated in their
=The Spirit of America.=--Woodrow Wilson, _History of the American
=The Spirit of American Reform.=--The purification of the ballot, the
=The Spirit of Self-Government.=--The instinct of self-government was
=The Split in the Republican Party.=--The country then witnessed the
=The Spoils System and Rotation in Office.=--First of all they wanted
=The Spoils System.=--The staid and respectable society of Washington
=The Stamp Act (1765).=--The Grenville-Townshend combination moved
=The Stamp Act Congress.=--The Massachusetts Assembly answered the call
=The State Campaigns.=--Discouraged by the outcome of the national
=The State of American Opinion.=--Although President Wilson promptly
=The Status of the Freedmen.=--Even more intricate than the issues
=The Stir among European Women.=--Ferment in America, in the case of
=The Struggle for Education.=--Along with criticism, there was carried
=The Struggle for the Ballot Box.=--The effects of intimidation were
=The Subjects of the Criticism.=--In this outburst of invective, nothing
=The Suffrage Cause in Congress.=--In the midst of the meager gains
=The Suffrage Movement Checked by the Civil War.=--Advocates of woman
=The Sugar Act of 1764.=--King George's ministers next turned their
=The Supremacy of the Union.=--First and foremost, the war settled for
=The Supreme Council.=--The real work of the settlement was first
=The Supreme Court Refuses to Intervene.=--Numerous efforts were made to
=The Tariff Revision and Party Dissensions.=--At the very beginning of
=The Tariff and Nullification.=--Jackson had not been installed in power
=The Terms of Peace (1783).=--The general settlement at Paris in 1783
=The Terms of the Compromise of 1850.=--When the debates were closed,
=The Terms of the Settlement.=--The combined treaties make a huge
=The Territorial Question Reopened by the Wilmot Proviso.=--To the
=The Tories.=--Hart, _Contemporaries_, Vol. II, pp. 470-480.
=The Townshend Acts (1767).=--The triumph of the colonists was brief.
=The Trading Company.=--English pioneers in exploration found an
=The Transported--Involuntary Servitude.=--In their anxiety to secure
=The Treaty Ratified.=--This unusual transaction, so favorable to the
=The Treaty in the United States.=--When the treaty was presented to the
=The Treaty of Peace.=--Both countries were in truth sick of a war that
=The Trend of Events.=--Whatever difficulties Madison had in making up
=The Triumph of Industry.=--The wreck of the planting system was
=The Triumph of Jackson in 1828.=--Probably no candidate for the
=The Triumph of the Executive Branch.=--Jackson's reelection in 1832
=The Trust--an Instrument of Industrial Progress.=--Business enterprise,
=The Trusts and Railways.=--To the trust question, Roosevelt devoted
=The Twelfth Amendment.=--Contrast the provision in the original
=The Two Phases of the War.=--The war which opened with the battle of
=The Underwood Tariff Act.=--Ogg, _National Progress_ (The American
=The Uniformity of the Middle West.=--There was a certain monotony about
=The United States Bank.=--Encouraged by the success of his funding and
=The United States and International Entanglements.=--Whether America
=The Victory for the Protective Tariff.=--Moreover, it was henceforth to
=The War as a Campaign Issue.=--Even the repeal of force bills could not
=The War in France.=--Owing to the peculiar character of the warfare in
=The War on the United States Bank.=--If events forced the issue of
=The War with Mexico.=--Elson, pp. 526-538.
=The War with Spain.=--Elson, _History of the United States_, pp.
=The Wars of American History=
=The Weakness of the Articles of Confederation.=--The government under
=The Webster-Hayne Debate.=--Analyze the arguments. Extensive extracts
=The West and Manufactures.=--In addition to the commercial bonds
=The West and the American Revolution.=--The excessive attention devoted
=The West before the Revolution.=--Roosevelt, Vol. I.
=The West during the Revolution.=--Roosevelt, Vols. II and III.
=The Western Routes.=--Four main routes led into the country beyond the
=The Westward Advance of the People=
=The Westward Movement.=--Yeoman and planter nevertheless were alike in
=The Whigs and General Harrison.=--By this time, the National
=The Whisky Rebellion.=--The political agitation of the Anti-Federalists
=The Withdrawal of Federal Troops from the South.=--Sparks, _National
=The Woman's Rights Convention of 1848.=--The forces, moral and
=The World Shaken by Revolution.=--Such was the quickening of women's
=The World Tour of the Fleet.=--As if to assure the world then that the
=The _Alabama_ Claims Arbitrated.=--Indeed, it had in hand a far more
=The _Gaspee_ Affair and the Virginia Resolutions of 1773.=--On sea as
=The _Lusitania_ Notes.=--On May 14, the Department of State at
=Theories about the Position of the Seceded States.=--On the morning of
=Timber Resources.=--The forests of the great West, unlike those of the
=Tobacco Planting in Virginia.=--Callender, _Economic History of the
=Tories Assail the Patriots.=--The Tories who remained in America joined
=Troubles of the State Governments.=--The state governments, free to
=Uncompromising Abolition.=--In a little while the spirit of generosity
=Utah.=--Although Utah had long presented all the elements of a
=Utah.=--On the long road to California, in the midst of forbidding and
=Van Buren and the Panic of 1837.=--Nothing could shake the General's
=War Finance.=--In the financial sphere the North faced immense
=Was Secession Lawful?=--The Southern view by Jefferson Davis in
=Washington Retires from Politics.=--Such angry contests confirmed the
=Western Explorations.=--Having taken the fateful step, Jefferson wisely
=Western Industries.=--The peculiar conditions of the Far West
=Western Problems at the End of the Revolution.=--The treaty of peace,
=Western Railways Precede Settlement.=--In the Old World and on our
=White Supremacy Sealed by New State Constitutions.=--The impetus to
=Wisconsin.=--Across Lake Michigan to the west lay the territory of
=Women and the Factory System.=--Abbott, pp. 35-62.
=Women and the War.=--At no time were the women of America indifferent
=Women in Industry.=--The period of this ferment was also the age of the
=Women in Public Affairs.=--The social legislation enacted in response
=Women's Labor in the Colonial Period.=--E. Abbott, _Women in Industry_,
=Woodrow Wilson and the Election of 1912.=--With the Republicans
=Workmen's Compensation.=--No small part of the poverty in cities was
A #boil# results when the infection is located in a hair follicle or
A #false neuroma# is an overgrowth of the sheath of a nerve. This
A #fistula# is an abnormal canal passing from a mucous surface to the
A CORNER IN THE BETHLEHEM STEEL WORKS]
A Cossack dismounted, lifted the boy down, and took him to
A French official wearing a scarf came up to the right of the row of
A QUARREL BETWEEN A FEDERALIST AND A REPUBLICAN IN THE HOUSE OF
A TOWN ON THE PRAIRIE]
A _blood cyst_ or haematoma results from the encapsulation of
A _cervical rib_ may damage the plexus by direct pressure, the part
A _lymph cyst_ usually results from a contusion in which the skin is
A bed had been made on a bedstead for the countess only. Madame
A bee settling on a flower has stung a child. And the child is
A brief lull in Cuban disorders was followed in 1895 by a renewal of the
A broad staircase led straight up from the entry, and to the right
A cancer is a malignant tumour which originates in epithelium. The
A cannon ball struck the very end of the earth work by which he
A church procession was coming up the hill from Borodino. First
A circle soon formed round Speranski, and the old man who had talked
A comely, fresh-looking old man was conducting the service with that
A commander in chief is never dealing with the beginning of any event-
A comparison of the pulse in the artery beyond the seat of the aneurysm
A composite view of the platforms put forth by the dissenting parties
A condition known as _Trench feet_ was widely prevalent amongst the
A conference took place confined to the magnates sitting at the
A contusion or bruise is a laceration of the subcutaneous soft tissues,
A courier who galloped to the castle in advance, in a troyka with
A crowd gathered round the bloodstained smith.
A crowd had collected round the Uhlans. Nearest to Pierre stood
A deadlock, accompanied by the most surly feelings on both sides,
A definitely positive reaction can usually be obtained between the
A distinction may be made between the _soft fibroma_, which is
A door of one of the inner rooms opened and one of the princesses,
A dressing may be dispensed with altogether, the grafts being protected
A few days before the battle of Borodino, Nicholas received the
A few instants after the echo of the reports resounding over the
A few intimate friends were dining with the Rostovs that day, as
A few minutes later an officer came hurriedly out of the front door,
A few minutes later it reappeared brighter still from behind the top
A few minutes later the Governor received Alpatych and hurriedly
A few minutes later the footman returned with Dessalles, who brought
A few moments later he was in our room, still puffing, still gesticulating, but with so fixed a look of grief and despair in his eyes that our smiles were turned in an instant to horror and pity. For a while he could not get his words out, but swayed his body and plucked at his hair like one who has been driven to the extreme limits of his reason. Then, suddenly springing to his feet, he beat his head against the wall with such force that we both rushed upon him and tore him away to the centre of the room. Sherlock Holmes pushed him down into the easy-chair and, sitting beside him, patted his hand and chatted with him in the easy, soothing tones which he knew so well how to employ.
A fire was made up in the dilapidated brick stove. A board was
A flush sprang to the white cheeks of the stranger. "Well then," said he, "my real name is James Ryder."
A flush stole over Miss Sutherland's face, and she picked nervously at the fringe of her jacket. "I met him first at the gasfitters' ball," she said. "They used to send father tickets when he was alive, and then afterwards they remembered us, and sent them to mother. Mr. Windibank did not wish us to go. He never did wish us to go anywhere. He would get quite mad if I wanted so much as to join a Sunday-school treat. But this time I was set on going, and I would go; for what right had he to prevent? He said the folk were not fit for us to know, when all father's friends were to be there. And he said that I had nothing fit to wear, when I had my purple plush that I had never so much as taken out of the drawer. At last, when nothing else would do, he went off to France upon the business of the firm, but we went, mother and I, with Mr. Hardy, who used to be our foreman, and it was there I met Mr. Hosmer Angel."
A footman came in to summon Boris--the princess was going. Pierre,
A footman wanted to come in to clear away something in the room
A fortnight after the letter Prince Vasili's servants came one
A free incision is necessary to discover and isolate the ends of the
A fresh wave of the flying mob caught him and bore him back with it.
A further step in the concentration of authority was taken in Galveston,
A general with a brilliant suite galloped off at once to fetch the
A group of bareheaded peasants was approaching across the meadow
A heavily timbered park stretched up in a gentle slope, thickening into a grove at the highest point. From amid the branches there jutted out the grey gables and high roof-tree of a very old mansion.
A huge campfire was blazing brightly in the midst of the snow,
A knowledge of the possible avenues of infection is of clinical
A large and comfortable double-bedded room had been placed at our disposal, and I was quickly between the sheets, for I was weary after my night of adventure. Sherlock Holmes was a man, however, who, when he had an unsolved problem upon his mind, would go for days, and even for a week, without rest, turning it over, rearranging his facts, looking at it from every point of view until he had either fathomed it or convinced himself that his data were insufficient. It was soon evident to me that he was now preparing for an all-night sitting. He took off his coat and waistcoat, put on a large blue dressing-gown, and then wandered about the room collecting pillows from his bed and cushions from the sofa and armchairs. With these he constructed a sort of Eastern divan, upon which he perched himself cross-legged, with an ounce of shag tobacco and a box of matches laid out in front of him. In the dim light of the lamp I saw him sitting there, an old briar pipe between his lips, his eyes fixed vacantly upon the corner of the ceiling, the blue smoke curling up from him, silent, motionless, with the light shining upon his strong-set aquiline features. So he sat as I dropped off to sleep, and so he sat when a sudden ejaculation caused me to wake up, and I found the summer sun shining into the apartment. The pipe was still between his lips, the smoke still curled upward, and the room was full of a dense tobacco haze, but nothing remained of the heap of shag which I had seen upon the previous night.
A largish piece of the biscuit the Emperor was holding in his hand
A law of August 10, 1917, gave the President power to fix the prices of
A less aggressive form, confined to the maxilla on one side, is
A less common form of tuberculous disease is that in which the sheath
A little ahead of them walked a peasant guide, wet to the skin and
A little behind the hussars came Denisov, accompanied by two
A little later when he went up to the large circle, Anna Pavlovna
A little man in Russian civilian clothes rode out from the ranks,
A loud thudding noise came from somewhere downstairs. "That is Mrs. Toller in the cellar," said she. "Her husband lies snoring on the kitchen rug. Here are his keys, which are the duplicates of Mr. Rucastle's."
A man entered who could hardly have been less than six feet six inches in height, with the chest and limbs of a Hercules. His dress was rich with a richness which would, in England, be looked upon as akin to bad taste. Heavy bands of astrakhan were slashed across the sleeves and fronts of his double-breasted coat, while the deep blue cloak which was thrown over his shoulders was lined with flame-coloured silk and secured at the neck with a brooch which consisted of a single flaming beryl. Boots which extended halfway up his calves, and which were trimmed at the tops with rich brown fur, completed the impression of barbaric opulence which was suggested by his whole appearance. He carried a broad-brimmed hat in his hand, while he wore across the upper part of his face, extending down past the cheekbones, a black vizard mask, which he had apparently adjusted that very moment, for his hand was still raised to it as he entered. From the lower part of the face he appeared to be a man of strong character, with a thick, hanging lip, and a long, straight chin suggestive of resolution pushed to the length of obstinacy.
A member of the Hofkriegsrath from Vienna had come to Kutuzov the
A middle-aged man, handsome and virile, in the uniform of a
A minute later the marshal's adjutant, de Castres, came in and
A minute later the old man's large stout figure in full-dress
A modern branch of mathematics having achieved the art of dealing
A more advanced stage of the disease is known as _local asphyxia_. The
A more radical method of treatment consists in excising the whole
A murmur of approbation and satisfaction ran through the crowd.
A nerve also exerts a trophic influence on the tissues in which it is
A new phase of the revolution now opened. The working people, excluded
A new question arose in connection with American trade with the neutral
A number of fresh tumours may spring up around the original growth.
A painful doubt filled her soul. Could the joy of love, of earthly
A painstaking police officer, considering the presence of a corpse
A professional case of great gravity was engaging my own attention at the time, and the whole of next day I was busy at the bedside of the sufferer. It was not until close upon six o'clock that I found myself free and was able to spring into a hansom and drive to Baker Street, half afraid that I might be too late to assist at the denouement of the little mystery. I found Sherlock Holmes alone, however, half asleep, with his long, thin form curled up in the recesses of his armchair. A formidable array of bottles and test-tubes, with the pungent cleanly smell of hydrochloric acid, told me that he had spent his day in the chemical work which was so dear to him.
A promise of unity lay in the fact that the conventions of the
A reaction against this was unavoidable. To friends of "the plain
A remarkable feature of this disease is the frequent presence of a
A remarkable form of _unilateral hypertrophy and diffuse osteoma of the
A return to the first is impossible, the belief has been
A second line of reform appeared in the "model franchise" for utility
A shell tore up the earth two paces from Pierre and he looked around
A similar affection is met with in the _shoulder and arm_--_brachial
A similar moan of surprise and horror ran through the crowd. "O Lord!"
A similar ossification has been observed in relation to the insertion of
A similar type of elephantiasis may occur after extirpation of the lymph
A slight rise of temperature in the evening may be induced in quiescent
A slow and heavy step, which had been heard upon the stairs and in the passage, paused immediately outside the door. Then there was a loud and authoritative tap.
A small side door led into the whitewashed corridor from which the three bedrooms opened. Holmes refused to examine the third chamber, so we passed at once to the second, that in which Miss Stoner was now sleeping, and in which her sister had met with her fate. It was a homely little room, with a low ceiling and a gaping fireplace, after the fashion of old country-houses. A brown chest of drawers stood in one corner, a narrow white-counterpaned bed in another, and a dressing-table on the left-hand side of the window. These articles, with two small wicker-work chairs, made up all the furniture in the room save for a square of Wilton carpet in the centre. The boards round and the panelling of the walls were of brown, worm-eaten oak, so old and discoloured that it may have dated from the original building of the house. Holmes drew one of the chairs into a corner and sat silent, while his eyes travelled round and round and up and down, taking in every detail of the apartment.
A soldier on the march is hemmed in and borne along by his
A solemn meeting of the lodge of the second degree was convened,
A space like a street was left between each two lines of troops. The
A spiritual wound produced by a rending of the spiritual body is
A strain or other form of trauma is sometimes blamed for the onset of
A suitably arranged splint adds to the comfort of the patient; and the
A superior judicial power, towering above that of the colonies, as the
A thaw had set in, it was muddy and cold, the ice on the river
A third class of historians--the so-called historians of culture-
A third course open to freedmen was that of renting from the former
A third of the visitors had already arrived, but the Rostovs, who
A third, in the absence of opponents, between two councils would
A tradesman's wife standing beside Petya sobbed, and the tears ran
A trunk-neuroma is recognised clinically by its position in the line of
A tuberculous abscess results from the disintegration and liquefaction
A very pretty curly-headed boy with a look of the Christ in the
A week before the French had had boot leather and linen issued to
A week later Prince Andrew was a member of the Committee on Army
A week later, Pierre, having taken leave of his new friends, the
A well regulated militia, being necessary to the security of a free
A wound is a solution in the continuity of the skin or mucous membrane
A.B. Faust, _The German Element in the United States_ (2 vols.).
A.B. Hart, _The Southern South_ and R.S. Baker, _Following the Color
A.B. Hepburn, _History of Coinage and Currency in the United States_.
A.C. McLaughlin, _The Confederation and the Constitution_ (American
A.E. McKinley, _The Suffrage Franchise in the Thirteen English Colonies_
A.H. Stephens, _The War between the States_.
A.L. Cross, _The Anglican Episcopate and the American Colonies_ (Harvard
A.T. Mahan, _Interest of the United States in the Sea Power_.
ADVENTURE  II.  THE RED-HEADED LEAGUE
ADVENTURE  V.  THE FIVE ORANGE PIPS
ADVENTURE  VI.  THE MAN WITH THE TWISTED LIP
ADVENTURE IV. THE BOSCOMBE VALLEY MYSTERY
AFFECTION OF THE NAILS
AMERICAN POLICIES IN THE PHILIPPINES AND THE ORIENT
About 1910 there set in a decided movement in the direction of lifting
About 80,000 went in payments on all the estates to the Land Bank,
About midnight they heard the sound of steps in the snow of the
About nine o'clock the light among the trees was extinguished, and all was dark in the direction of the Manor House. Two hours passed slowly away, and then, suddenly, just at the stroke of eleven, a single bright light shone out right in front of us.
About ten o'clock Rostov went to the English Hotel straight from the
About the middle of the Arbat Street, near the Church of the
About the same time a popular revolution occurred in France. The Bourbon
About the same time, Ohio built a canal across the state, affording
Above Iowa, on the Mississippi, lay the territory of Minnesota--the home
Above the Kolocha, in Borodino and on both sides of it, especially
Above the dead area the limb may be the seat of excruciating pain. The
Abraham, were now ranged side by side in a war on the Empire that Pitt
Abscess. The specimen shows two separate abscesses in the centre of the
Absolute continuity of motion is not comprehensible to the human
Accepting the outcome of the election as a vindication of their
Access to the cords of the plexus is obtained by a dissection similar to
According as the cellulitic, the oedematous, or the gaseous
According to Head and his co-workers, Sherren and Rivers, the afferent
According to this view the power of historical personages,
Accordingly, he proposed, not the destruction of the trusts, but their
Accordingly, it was bound to face the problem of how far it was prepared
Accordingly, they did not favor the candidacy of Seward, the leading
Accustomed to take part in church meetings with men, the Quakers
Achilles could never overtake the tortoise) resulted from this: that
Achillo-bursitis. There is severe pain in the region of the insertion of
Across the paper was scrawled in pencil, without capital letters,
Act setting aside the general principles of the English common law as
Act, grew steadily all through the summer of 1765.
Act. Parliament therefore suspended the assembly until it promised to
Actinomycosis is a chronic disease due to the action of an organism
Acts were signed by the king, Parliament took a still more drastic step.
Acute Glanders is most commonly met with in the horse and in other
Adams in a letter to his wife. The answer was decisive. "The clergy of
Adams. The Republicans were now plunged into the hornets' nest. The
Adduction of the thumb is carried out, not by the paralysed adductor
Adenomas may be single or multiple, and they vary greatly in size. The
Adjutant General Wolzogen, the man who when riding past Prince
Adjutant-General Prince Volkonski, to hear from you the situation of
Affections of the _Spinal Cord_ are extremely rare, but paraplegia from
Africa a whole series of outrages are committed against the almost
Africa, others run the longitude and pursue their gigantic game along
After 1865, achievement and fortune no longer lay on the land alone. As
After Mass, when they had finished their coffee in the dining room
After Metivier's departure the old prince called his daughter in,
After Nicholas had gone things in the Rostov household were more
After Ostermann had gone, a command rang out to the Uhlans.
After a few minutes' bustle beside the high bedstead, those who
After a few more turns of the lathe he removed his foot from the
After a few words to Pierre about the awful roads from the Polish
After a severe haemorrhage into the cellular tissue or into a joint, the
After a time the government was prodded into action and the great dams
After a while he re-entered it as if to snuff the candles, and,
After all, the vague criticisms and proposals that found their way into
After an interval, measures should be adopted to promote the absorption
After arranging his clothes, he took the pistol and was about to
After birth the predisposition to fracture continues, the bones are
After dining and taking rather too much of the Hungarian wine,
After dinner Natasha, at Prince Andrew's request, went to the
After dinner the count settled himself comfortably in an easy
After dinner the whole Rostov household set to work with
After dinner, he went to see his daughter-in-law. The little
After exchanging the first greetings, they sat down.
After five o'clock it was only at the Augesd Dam that a hot
After fractures of costal cartilage or of the cartilages of the larynx
After giving the clerk orders about the work to be done, Alpatych,
After he had returned, voices were heard outside the shed. "Who's
After hearing the details of Anatole's marriage from Pierre, and
After hearing the matter, Kutuzov smacked his lips together and
After her life in the country, and in her present serious mood,
After her visit to the Rostovs and her unexpectedly chilly reception
After his interview with his wife Pierre left for Petersburg. At the
After his journey and the campaign during which he had been deprived
After listening a few moments in silence, the count and his
After living at the seat of the highest authority and power, after
After meeting Princess Mary, though the course of his life went on
After much trading and discussing, the convention came to the conclusion
After passing a chasseur regiment and in the lines of the Kiev
After passing some Austrian troops he noticed that the next part
After reading about the dangers that threatened Russia, the hopes
After reading the letter Natasha sat down at the writing table to
After receiving her visitors, the countess was so tired that she
After receiving this news late in the evening, when he was alone
After seven years of marriage Pierre had the joyous and firm
After short silence the countess spoke again but this time no one
After six rubbers the general got up, saying that it was no use
After some delay, Portsmouth, New Hampshire, was chosen as the meeting
After some minutes, the gentleman-in-waiting who was on duty came
After some skirmishing Spain yielded reluctantly to the ultimatum. On
After speaking to the senior French officer, who came out of the
After sunset the wind had dropped. The night was calm and fresh.
After supper Pierre with his partner followed the others into the
After taking a turn along the Podnovinski Boulevard, Balaga began to
After talking for some time with the esaul about next day's
After tea, Nicholas, Sonya, and Natasha went to the sitting room, to
After tea, the company went into the sitting room and Princess
After that Anna Pavlovna led up to the courage and firmness of the
After that Petya remained silent for a long time, listening to the
After that he avoided Dessalles and the countess who caressed him
After that the generals began to disperse with the solemnity and
After the Austerlitz campaign Prince Andrew had firmly resolved
After the Emperor had left Moscow, life flowed on there in its usual
After the French victory at Borodino there was no general engagement
After the acute symptoms have passed off, various localised
After the advance has begun in this manner, orders will be given
After the battle of Borodino the abandonment and burning of Moscow
After the bubo has been opened the wound may take on the characters of a
After the burning of Smolensk a war began which did not follow any
After the condescending surprise, nonrecognition, and praise, from
After the deaths of her son and husband in such rapid succession,
After the debate, the delegates, unable to agree on any property
After the definite refusal he had received, Petya went to his room
After the encounter at Vyazma, where Kutuzov had been unable to hold
After the execution Pierre was separated from the rest of the
After the fatigues and impressions of the journey, his reception,
After the first feeling of perplexity aroused in the parents by
After the first monologue the whole company rose and surrounded
After the hussars had come to the village and Rostov had gone to see
After the injection of iodoform there is usually considerable reaction,
After the junction with the army of the brilliant admiral and
After the last two days spent in solitude and unusual circumstances,
After the loss of the Shevardino Redoubt, we found ourselves on
After the organization of trade unions they collided with the courts of
After the rapture of meeting, and after that odd feeling of
After the return of Alpatych from Smolensk the old prince suddenly
After the rise of democracy, industry, and organized labor, the
After the roast, champagne was served. The guests rose to
After the second day's march Pierre, having examined his feet by the
After the sufferings he had been enduring, Prince Andrew enjoyed a
After the twenty-eighth of October when the frosts began, the flight
After these words, the Mason, as if tired by his long discourse,
After this Prince Andrew was conducted to the door and the officer
After this outburst the prince did not speak any more about the
After washing and dressing, Prince Andrew came into the diplomat's
Again Holmes raved in the air.
Again Pierre was overtaken by the depression he so dreaded. For
Again a startled look came over the somewhat vacuous face of Miss Mary Sutherland. "Yes, I did bang out of the house," she said, "for it made me angry to see the easy way in which Mr. Windibank--that is, my father--took it all. He would not go to the police, and he would not go to you, and so at last, as he would do nothing and kept on saying that there was no harm done, it made me mad, and I just on with my things and came right away to you."
Again and again it was impossible to secure a quorum for the transaction
Again he embraced and kissed Prince Andrew, but before the latter
Again he looked to the right and saw something running toward him
Again on all the bright faces of the squadron the serious expression
Again she paused. No one broke the silence.
Again the officer turned to Gerasim and asked him to show him the
Again the princess glanced round at her companion with even more
Again! It has hit...." He stopped and looked at the ranks. "No, it has
Again, as at the church in Khamovniki, a wave of general curiosity
Against sharp protests from conservative men, particularly among the
Against these extraordinary measures, the State Department at Washington
Against this powerful opposition, the government enlisted a whole army
Agents of the German imperial government had destroyed American lives
Agitated and flushed she paced the room, sending now for Michael
Akin to the kidnapped, at least in economic position, were convicts
Alabama, refused to palter with any plan not built on the proposition
Alamo, an old Spanish mission in the cottonwood trees in the town of San
Alaska out of the hands of England.
Alexander (on whom the event seemed to depend) should be carried
Alexander I was as necessary for the movement of the peoples from
Alexander I, the man who stood at the head of the countermovement from
Alexander I--the pacifier of Europe, the man who from his early
Alexander and Napoleon, with the long train of their suites,
Alexander and took a few hasty steps toward Prince Kozlovski, the
Alexander hurriedly to Kutuzov, glancing courteously at the same
Alexander's Guards," said the first one, indicating a Russian
Alexander's power into the components: Talleyrand, Chateaubriand,
Alexander's time or the ordinary uniform of the nobility, and the
Alexander, or in general of the persons they describe. The answers
Alexander, the mistakes of the diplomatists, and so on.
Alexander. Every detail of the interview was communicated to the
Alexeevich appearing at the open kitchen door with the pistol in his
Alexeevich, brandishing the pistol. "Board them!"
Alexeevich. I told my wife that I begged her to forget the past, to
All Pierre's daydreams now turned on the time when he would be free.
All at once the stranger closed the book, putting in a marker, and
All began to run and bustle, and Rostov saw coming up the road
All day I was engaged in my professional work, and it was late in the evening before I returned to Baker Street. Sherlock Holmes had not come back yet. It was nearly ten o'clock before he entered, looking pale and worn. He walked up to the sideboard, and tearing a piece from the loaf he devoured it voraciously, washing it down with a long draught of water.
All eyes were fixed on him. He looked at the crowd, and rendered
All eyes were gazing at her with one and the same expression. She
All four, like a flock of scared birds, got up and left the room.
All his men felt the same excitement.
All historians agree that the external activity of states and
All knowledge is merely a bringing of this essence of life under the
All night long troops were moving past the inn. Next morning
All such injuries are to be treated on the general principles governing
All such protests were without avail. The negro population grew by leaps
All that July the old prince was exceedingly active and even
All that Pierre saw was so indefinite that neither the left nor
All that day and the next his friends and comrades noticed that
All that day the hounds remained at home. It was frosty and the
All that is accessible to man is the relation of the life of the bee
All that the fondest mother could do for her son you have done and are
All that was done around her and to her at this time, all the
All that we know of the external world of nature is only a certain
All that we know of the life of man is merely a certain relation
All the Russians confined with Pierre were men of the lowest class
All the best moments of his life suddenly rose to his memory.
All the coats are thickened, chiefly by an increased development of
All the colonies became states, each with its own constitution or plan
All the commanders of columns were summoned to the commander in
All the domestic circle, tutors, governesses, and guests, were
All the evening Nicholas paid attention to a blue-eyed, plump and
All the faces bore the same expression of excitement and enthusiasm.
All the fear before action which he had experienced as previously, all
All the guns, without waiting for orders, were being fired in the
All the horrors of the reign of terror were based only on solicitude
All the hunt, who had been moving slowly, shouted, "Stop!" calling
All the interests of his life for more than thirty years had been
All the kings, except the Chinese, wear military uniforms, and he
All the manifestations of the modern labor movement had appeared, in
All the men of this party were fishing for rubles, decorations,
All the old methods that had been unfailingly crowned with
All the physical appearances and clinical symptoms associated with dry
All the plans Pierre had attempted on his estates--and constantly
All the profound plans about cutting off and capturing Napoleon
All the rest of that day Pierre spent alone in his benefactor's
All the suite drew back and Rostov saw the general talking for
All the time Boris was going through the figures of the mazurka,
All the unmarried ladies and even the married ones except the very
All the views he formed of men and circumstances at this time remained
All the way Petya had been preparing himself to behave with
All their rushing and galloping at one another did little harm, the
All these decisions aroused the legislatures of the states. They passed
All these nobles, whom Pierre met every day at the Club or in
All these things involved the use of the powers of government. Although
All this was the fruit of Anisya Fedorovna's housekeeping,
All this, like the other parts of the disposition, was not and could
All turned their attention to the glow.
All were silent, and the only sound audible was the heavy
All were silent, only the pilgrim woman went on in measured tones,
All were silent. On this fact relating to the Emperor personally, it
All were silent. The officers rose. Prince Andrew went out of the
All were silent. The old prince looked at Rostopchin with a smile
All were silent. Tushin appeared at the threshold and made his way
All were then more confident of victory than the winning of two
Allies. The regular army was enlarged and the troops of the national
Alms" went round to all the brothers. Pierre would have liked to
Along the Tverskaya Street rode the hussar with mustaches... I thought
Along the broad country road, edged on both sides by trees, came a
Alpatych and the coachman. The women, who had been silent till then,
Alpatych collected his parcels, handed them to the coachman who
Alpatych entered the innyard at a quicker pace than usual and went
Alpatych hurried to his inn. The paper handed to him by the Governor
Alpatych replied that the Governor had not told him anything
Alpatych swayed his head and went upstairs. In the waiting room were
Alpatych to the house, questioning him as to the state of affairs.
Alpatych turned to the peasants and ordered two of them by name to
Alpatych went back to the house, called the coachman, and told him
Alpatych went out. The prince again went to his bureau, glanced into
Alpatych went to the shops, to government offices, to the post office,
Alpatych with a melancholy smile, "as it is not convenient in the
Alpatych, arriving from the devastated Bald Hills estate, sent for
Alpatych, his coachman, Ferapontov's wife and children and the house
Alpatych, lifting his head and proudly thrusting his hand into the
Alpatych, understanding the question to refer to their departure for
Alpatych, who had reached Bogucharovo shortly before the old
Alpatych. "Still, as the prince is unwell my advice is that they
Already from his military experience and what he had seen in the
Already the Germans, Irish, and Scandinavians had found their way into
Already the people of King George's province knew how precious a thing
Already, at the beginning of this chase, Daniel, hearing the
Also, as we are masters of Ulm, we cannot be deprived of the advantage
Altgeld, dispatched troops to the scene of action. The United States
Although American troops did not take part on a large scale until the
Although Iogel did not acknowledge this to be the real mazurka,
Although formerly classified as a sarcoma, it is the exception for it to
Although in female society Anatole usually assumed the role of a man
Although it was well known that the Constitution did not contemplate the
Although many of the early capitalists of the great West, especially
Although no exact record was kept, it is reckoned that the Scotch-Irish
Although papillomas are primarily innocent, they may become the
Although that patience did come out, Pierre did not join the army,
Although the German submarines made it impossible for her battleships to
Although the hall porter saw someone's carriage standing at the
America but no common treasury, and from first to last the Congress was
America disliked the state and disowned the church of the mother
America during the Spanish War. But before the United States could act
America had become one of the first workshops of the world. It was, by
America than in preventing the rise and growth of democracy in Europe.
America the twelfth. In witness whereof we have hereunto subscribed our
America to resist the exercise of arbitrary power by royal officers.
America was instructed to be diligent in the execution of all trade and
America would be richer under the British flag, could not change the
America, as well as in those with the distant Pacific, the diplomacy of
America, foundations upon which the mechanical revolution was built. As
America, nothing seemed more reasonable to them than the proposition
America, the center to which industrial companies, railway promoters,
America, who first grasped the significance of the slowly converging
America--the law which denied married women their property, their wages,
America. All of it, based on the "mercantile" theory then prevalent in
America. Many of the victims of the practice were young children, for
America. Such was the view of all friends of the colonies on both sides
America. The Church, always a strong bulwark of the state, therefore had
America. The people represented every religious faith--members of the
America.... But one sentiment existed." The main key to the Bastille,
America_, the grand experiment as he saw it. On the whole he was
American Dominions in the Pacific (color map)        _Facing_      500
American Expeditionary Force upholding the American cause on the
American Protestants, the Quebec Act was the most offensive. That
American Revolution was carried out by people experienced in the arts of
American business men had been developing the fertile sugar plantations.
American colonies under its sway as well. Between the execution of
American commerce and business, the inability of Spain to bring about
American commerce. To the South the proposal was menacing because
American commissioner, Caleb Cushing, taking advantage of the British
American democracy that led the friends of reform to launch and to
American democracy were efforts to reverse the processes of nature. He
American doctrines" seems to have been raised at the time. The treaty
American dominions. Among the members of Parliament who thundered
American farmer was accustomed could not be grown at all. The Mormons
American forces from Morristown, New Jersey, up to West Point. In the
American giant, though quiet, was not sleeping in the midst of
American history. Issues were thrust into the background. The tariff,
American leaders, on the other hand, now that the soldiers of King Louis
American life and had "poured in upon the floor of Congress" such a long
American life, however, soon challenged the rule of those with property.
American marines to "supervise" the elections. Two years later, an
American markets; and, _secondly_, to enlarge in the manufacturing
American minister, offered a settlement which would fix the boundary at
American note added that the German imperial government would be held to
American people, as well as the constitutions of the states and the
American political life, appealed, it seems, mainly to farmers in the
American power on the Pacific.
American produce. About the same time a disturbing rumor, long current,
American progress from the days of Andrew Jackson to the latest hour.
American representative, had brought to the attention of the king the
American sea captains who, in fear of British vengeance, heeded the
American settlement was planted at Marina on the St. Croix, the outpost
American ship, _William P. Frye_, in the South Atlantic; on March 28, a
American sovereignty. This act of power, deemed by the Mexicans an
American sphere of protection was the work of a later generation. The
American spirit, repeal the obnoxious measures, and receive the colonies
American trade by blockades; they had insulted the American flag by
American troops in the island to quell a domestic dissension, they
American unit--the small farm tilled by the owner--appeared as usual;
American universities. "I would rather be, I think," said Mr. Hay, "the
American who ever was?... What fills me with doubt and dismay is the
American-made goods again. As the London _Times_ tersely observed of the
American. Born on the frontier of Virginia, reared in a log cabin,
Americans and the natives in Texas. Fear grew into consternation when
Americans favored independence and what share remained loyal to the
Americans from the slave states. Anticipating that the government of
Americans in exchange. To open the Pacific trade he bought two ocean
Americans not far behind them. John Jacob Astor, the resourceful New
Americans of mixed stocks led the way into the West, it was not long
Americans on the frontier did not forget it; when Indians were employed
Americans received their formal education. In several of the provinces
Americans took the first steps toward union. Though there were many
Americans, however, who peered beneath the surface of things, saw that
Amid the powder smoke, slowly dispersing over the whole space
Amid the smoke, deafened by the incessant reports which always
Amid the turmoil of his activities and distractions, however, Pierre
Amid the uncertainties of the position, with the menace of serious
Among the Russian prisoners rescued by Denisov and Dolokhov was
Among the _late manifestations_ are neuritis, telangiectasis, and a
Among the contributory causes of this crisis, no doubt, were the
Among the field guns on the brow of the hill the general in
Among the gentlemen of the suite, Rostov noticed Bolkonski,
Among the gentry of the province Nicholas was respected but not
Among the innumerable categories applicable to the phenomena of
Among the local factors concerned in the development of tumours,
Among the many young men who frequented her house every day, Boris
Among the opinions and voices in this immense, restless,
Among the railway promoters and builders in the West, James J. Hill,
Among the rarer and more serious lesions of the inherited disease may be
Among the theories suggested in explanation of these arthropathies the
Among the young men introduced by Rostov one of the first was
Among those who ventured to doubt the justifiability of the proposed
Amputation Stump. Osteomyelitis supervened on the amputation, and
Amputation of the limb is reserved for grave cases, in which life is
An _unhealthy or devitalised condition of the patient's tissues_ also
An abscess forming in the deeper planes is prevented from pointing
An adjutant came now to inform him that the fire of two hundred guns
An adjutant galloped up from the fleches with a pale and
An adventitious bursa forms over the _acromion_ process in porters and
An adventitious bursa may form over the _lateral malleolus_, especially
An alternative method of treating extensive burns is by immersing the
An alternative procedure consists in avulsing segments of the vein by
An aneurysm exerts pressure on the surrounding structures, which are
An aneurysm is said to be _diffused_ when the sac ruptures and the blood
An attempt should be made to close the wound in the duct by means of a
An attendant deferentially and quickly slipped before the ladies and
An awkward silence followed these words. Natasha was the first to
An elderly sergeant who had approached the officer while he was
An excessive and erratic growth of epithelium is the essential and
An hour and a half later most of the players were but little
An hour later Dunyasha came to tell the princess that Dron had come,
An hour later, Tikhon came to call Princess Mary to the old
An interpreter rode up to the group.
An old powdered manservant who was sitting in the antechamber rose
Anatole and Dolokhov went along the pavement. When they reached the
Anatole by the collar of his uniform with his big hand and shook him
Anatole had lately moved to Dolokhov's. The plan for Natalie
Anatole kissed the old man, and looked at him with curiosity and
Anatole lay on the sofa in the study leaning on his elbow and
Anatole lived, Pierre entered the lighted porch, ascended the
Anatole ran back seized him by the arm, pulled him through the wicket,
Anatole returned smiling to the ladies.
Anatole rose and went into the dining room. Balaga was a famous
Anatole smiled. The expression of that base and cringing smile,
Anatole turned to the Englishman and taking him by one of the
Anatole was at the door, evidently on the lookout for the Rostovs.
Anatole went into the back room.
Anatole went out of the room and returned a few minutes later
Anatole with his swaggering air strode up to the window. He wanted
And Berg related all that he remembered of the various tales he
And Bilibin repeated the actual words of the diplomatic dispatch,
And Bilibin unwrinkled his temple, feeling that the dilemma was
And Denisov told the esaul that the dispatch just delivered was a
And Denisov went to the bed to get the purse from under the pillow.
And Holmes' fears came to be realised, for from that day to this no word has ever been heard either of the beautiful woman, the sinister German, or the morose Englishman. Early that morning a peasant had met a cart containing several people and some very bulky boxes driving rapidly in the direction of Reading, but there all traces of the fugitives disappeared, and even Holmes' ingenuity failed ever to discover the least clue as to their whereabouts.
And Napoleon went quickly to the door. Everyone in the reception
And Natasha began rapidly taking out of the case dishes and plates
And Natasha rose and went out of the room on tiptoe, like a ballet
And Petya gave the Cossack a detailed account not only of his ride
And Pierre's soul was dimly but joyfully filled not by the story
And Platon shifted his seat on the straw.
And Prince Andrew, with others fatally wounded, was left to the care
And Prince Vasili repeated the words supposed to have been spoken by
And Rostov got up and went wandering among the campfires, dreaming
And Terenty would begin talking of the destruction of Moscow, and of
And a minute or two later the Frenchman, a black-eyed fellow with
And after chatting a while longer, the corporal went away. (The
And again all the faces in that crowd bore an identical
And as he waved his arms to impersonate the policeman, his portly
And as soon as the enemy drew near the wealthy classes went away
And as soon as the officer let go of the gate handle she turned and,
And as the undefinable essence of the force moving the heavenly
And at once, as a clock begins to strike and chime as soon as the
And before Rostov had time to make out what the black thing was that
And beginning with the French Revolution the old inadequately
And by old habit he asked himself the question: "Well, and what
And clutching the spare gray locks on his temples the count left the
And collecting the presents they went first to the nursery and
And embracing her daughter, the countess began to weep for the first
And flourishing his whip he rode off at a gallop for the first
And from the different ranks some twenty men ran to the front. A
And having entered on the path of definition, of which he was
And having kissed Denisov he ran out of the hut.
And having thus demolished the young man, Anna Pavlovna turned to
And he also passed on with the wagon. Then came some merry
And he caught the bear, took it in his arms, lifted it from the
And he handed him his clasp knife. The officer admired it.
And he left the room, followed by the low but ringing laughter of
And he left the room. The countess began to cry.
And he narrated his whole conversation with the French doctor and
And he smiled approvingly, evidently pleased with the cadet.
And he went on to inquiries about the Grand Duke and the state of
And if the House of Representatives shall not choose a President
And immediately Tushin, with a short pipe in the corner of his mouth
And in fact Toll, to whom he went to communicate the news,
And in fact the head in the nightcap was lifted at once. On
And in proof of the conclusiveness of his opinion all the wrinkles
And in the fifth verse of the same chapter:
And indeed everybody in the room looked with a smile of pleasure
And it is of this period of the campaign--when the army lacked boots
And it is well for a people who do not--as the French did in 1813-
And it was as if they had all only waited for this to realize the
And it was not Napoleon who directed the course of the battle, for
And lastly you too, peasants, come from the forests where you are
And lastly, the final departure of the great Emperor from his heroic
And like a practical Petersburg lady who knows how to make the
And no more words were needed. There was a rush, a clatter upon the stairs, the bang of a door, and the crisp rattle of running footfalls from the street.
And not for that day and hour alone were the mind and conscience
And not only externally was all in order, but had it pleased the
And on learning that tomorrow they were to attack the enemy, and
And one of the soldiers, his face all at once distorted with fury,
And passing people who looked after him with curiosity, he entered the
And patting Berg on the shoulder he got up, wishing to end the
And probably still more perturbed by the fact that he had uttered
And rapidly opening the door he went resolutely out onto the
And receiving the reply that there were more than two hundred
And scattered about through the Southwest were signs of an ancient
And several of the men went over to the Fifth Company.
And she burst into sobs with the despairing vehemence with which
And she set off at a run along the passage.
And she would go to the nursery to nurse Petya, her only boy. No one
And so for history, the insoluble mystery presented by the
And so the anecdote ended. Though it was unintelligible why he had
And so to imagine the action of a man entirely subject to the law of
And so without particularly analyzing all the contiguous sections of
And suddenly the sequence of these thoughts broke off, and Prince
And that is how power is understood by the science of jurisprudence,
And that was how a great scandal threatened to affect the kingdom of Bohemia, and how the best plans of Mr. Sherlock Holmes were beaten by a woman's wit. He used to make merry over the cleverness of women, but I have not heard him do it of late. And when he speaks of Irene Adler, or when he refers to her photograph, it is always under the honourable title of the woman.
And that's my last word on it. Mind, the last..." concluded the
And the Emperor paused, with a frown.
And the adjutant galloped through the forest after Grekov. When
And the birches with their light and shade, the curly clouds, the
And the cavalry, with spurs and sabers urging on horses that could
And the commander, turning to look at the adjutant, directed his
And the conversation again turned on the war, on Bonaparte, and
And the corporal leaned against the door and offered Pierre his
And the count gave a similar order to the major-domo and the
And the count stepped as briskly back into the room and slammed
And the count turned to the cook, who, with a shrewd and
And the countess bent over her reticule to hide her agitated face.
And the deeper she penetrated, not with her mind only but with her
And the feeling of energy with which the troops had started began to
And the horror that had seized her when she touched him and
And the hussars, passing along the line of troops on the left
And the latter--unconscious that he was being reflected in the
And the more he desired it the less he allowed himself to believe
And the officer gave them details of the Saltanov battle, which he
And the old cavalry captain, Kirsten, shouted enthusiastically and
And the old servant got down from the box and went up to the cart.
And the owner of the manly voice, evidently an infantry officer,
And the prince began explaining all the blunders which, according to
And the same mischievous smile lingered for a long time on her
And the sergeant, taking one of the men by the shoulders, gave him a
And the soldier, pushing away a little dog that was jumping up at
And the staff captain rose and turned away from Rostov.
And the talkative Dolgorukov, turning now to Boris, now to Prince
And the two friends told each other of their doings, the one of
And then the determination of the troops would be quite different.
And these are the three ways in which the historians do explain
And these simple words, her look, and the expression on her face
And they disappeared into the darkness with with their load.
And this simple reflection suddenly destroyed all the interest
And thus was solved the mystery of the sinister house with the copper beeches in front of the door. Mr. Rucastle survived, but was always a broken man, kept alive solely through the care of his devoted wife. They still live with their old servants, who probably know so much of Rucastle's past life that he finds it difficult to part from them. Mr. Fowler and Miss Rucastle were married, by special license, in Southampton the day after their flight, and he is now the holder of a government appointment in the island of Mauritius. As to Miss Violet Hunter, my friend Holmes, rather to my disappointment, manifested no further interest in her when once she had ceased to be the centre of one of his problems, and she is now the head of a private school at Walsall, where I believe that she has met with considerable success.
And try as Kutuzov might to restrain the troops, our men attacked,
And turning to his men he directed a party to go on to the halting
And twisting the ramrod he looked gloomily at Pierre, who turned
And we were sitting so quietly. Ha, ha, ha!... The hussar, the hussar!
And what was played was a fugue--though Petya had not the least
And while he was doing M. de Beausset the honor of breakfasting with
And with a Frenchman's easy and naive frankness the captain told
And with a complacent sigh he would return to the drawing room.
And with a furtive glance at his son's face, the count went out of
And with an eager face Nicholas began to speak of the possibility of
And with the decision and tenderness that often come at the moment
And with the familiarity and easy grace peculiar to him, he raised
And without a word to his wife he went to the little sitting room
And without waiting for an answer from the sentinel, who had stepped
And yet the former history continues to be studied side by side with
And, as if to make the Russian general still more conscious of his
And, having glanced round the room, Prince Andrew turned to
And, still rolling up his sleeve, he went out to the porch.
And, worst of all, I am growing old--that's the thing! There won't
Andreevich was baptized. The wet nurse supported the coverlet with her
Andrew and Pierre also went out into the porch.
Andrew arrived, the latter returned to Russia. In a new country,
Andrew could not make out distinctly what was in that tent. The
Andrew entered and paused facing her at the foot of the sofa on
Andrew entered the passage. Kutuzov himself, he was told, was in the
Andrew gone when the study door opened quickly and the stern figure of
Andrew had said, "the war should be extended widely," and whom
Andrew in the same tone.
Andrew knew and who had a strap round the calf of one leg, crossed
Andrew lay. It was dark in there. In the farthest corner, on a bench
Andrew listened attentively to Bagration's colloquies with the
Andrew most was his absolute and unshakable belief in the power and
Andrew out to him, and he told them to carry him into the tent.
Andrew ran to the door; the scream ceased and he heard the wail of
Andrew riding up to the officer.
Andrew shook himself as if waking up, and his face assumed the look it
Andrew was glad to hear this. His mind was occupied by the interests
Andrew was in the same yard as themselves and in a part of the hut
Andrew was just back from Turkey where the war had terminated so
Andrew went round the sofa and kissed her forehead.
Andrew's deeply loved affianced wife--the same Natasha Rostova who
Andrew's estate. Despite the indifference to the affairs of the
Andrew's eyes Speranski was the man he would himself have wished to
Andrew's story the condition Russia was in. "But give me time, give me
Andrew, beginning to understand that his news of the battle before
Andrew, from one to another. Now he would take up the position of a
Andrew, though he saw him now for the first time. There was about
Andrew, trying to drive that face from his imagination. But the face
Andrew, trying to extenuate his action so as not to irritate the old
Andrew. "Besides, in the actions of a statesman one has to distinguish
Andrew. "Let others--the young--yield afresh to that fraud, but we
Andrew. "Look here, my dear fellow, get from Kozlovski all the reports
Andrew. From the other side a battalion commander rode up.
Andrew. He said that Freemasonry is the teaching of Christianity freed
Andrusha--the slender mischievous boy who had been her playfellow in
Aneurysm near the origin has to be diagnosed from subclavian,
Aneurysm of the _profunda femoris_ is distinguished from that of the
Aneurysm of the descending aorta may, after eroding the bodies of the
Aneurysms of the vessels of the #forearm and hand# call for no special
Angeles. Thirteen years later Fremont made the first of his celebrated
Anglo-Saxon alliance." To the American ambassador he added
Ankle. The ankle-joint is ankylosed, and there is a large sequestrum in
Anna Mikhaylovna as she entered, and at the big stout figure of Pierre
Anna Mikhaylovna looked at Vera and paused. The countess pressed her
Anna Mikhaylovna regarded the refined sadness that united her son to
Anna Mikhaylovna was already embracing her and weeping. The countess
Anna Mikhaylovna whom I would not take for a housemaid... the
Anna Mikhaylovna's face expressed a consciousness that the
Anna Mikhaylovna, in a few words, told her the contents of the
Anna Mikhaylovna, who always knew everything that passed in the
Anna Mikhaylovna, who often visited the Karagins, while playing
Anna Mikhaylovna. She hurriedly ascended the narrow dimly lit stone
Anna Mikhaylovna. The two younger ones were embroidering: both were
Anna Pavlovna continued to give on free evenings the same kind of
Anna Pavlovna had already managed to speak to Lise about the match
Anna Pavlovna in dismay detained him with the words: "Do you know
Anna Pavlovna's "At Home" was like the former one, only the
Anna Pavlovna's alarm was justified, for Pierre turned away from the
Anna Pavlovna's circle on the contrary was enraptured by this
Anna Pavlovna's drawing room was gradually filling. The highest
Anna Pavlovna's reception was in full swing. The spindles hummed
Anna Pavlovna's, an unacknowledged sense of the guilt of that desire
Another company, a lucky one for not all the companies had vodka,
Another emissary rode to the Russian line to announce the peace
Another five days passed, and then the young Prince Nicholas
Another hussar also rushed toward the horse, but Bondarenko had
Another method is to incise the abscess, cleanse the cavity with gauze,
Another modification is to raise the flap but leave it connected at both
Another prodded his horse with the butt end of a musket, and Pierre,
Another smith tried to enter the doorway, pressing against the
Another still stronger wave flowed through the crowd and reaching
Another vital outcome of this revolution was the transference of a large
Anti-Federalists lay mainly among the debt-burdened farmers who feared
Anti-Trust law. The Sugar Trust was found guilty of cheating the New
Antichrist, the end of the world, and "pure freedom."
Antonio. Instead of obeying the order to blow up the mission and retire,
Any one or any combination of these influences may cause shock, but the
Any tissue of the body may be the seat of an acute abscess, and there
Any vein in the body may become varicose, but the condition is rare
Anyone looking at the disorganized rear of the Russian army would
Apart from the medical _treatment_, measures must be taken to prevent
Appalachians. The Genesee road, beginning at Albany, ran almost due west
Apraksins' I heard a lady asking, 'Is that the famous Prince
Arakcheev was a faithful custodian to enforce order and acted as the
Arakcheev, the ex-Minister of War; Count Bennigsen, the senior general
Arakcheev, uttering only the first words amiably and then--again
Arborescent lipoma has been found in the sheaths of tendons about the
Arbuthnot Lane to apply to it the term _traumatic_ or _trade arthritis_.
Archduke, inspected the allied army of eighty thousand men.
Architect of the Universe recognized by the Freemasons. He felt like a
Arkansas and Louisiana. From year to year the process of breaking up
Arkansas, Virginia, West Virginia, and North Carolina the proportion of
Arkansas--the combined vote against the representative of the extreme
Armenians and, saying something, immediately seized the old man by his
Armfeldt, a Swedish general; Pfuel, the chief author of the plan of
Arms, the last resort, must decide the contest; the appeal was the
Around him in the darkness men were standing and evidently something
Around the cannon the men moved still more briskly and busily. No
Around the seat of inoculation a diffuse red patch forms, varying in hue
Around the wounded stood crowds of soldier stretcher-bearers with
Aroused by the extensive use of the writ, organized labor demanded that
Arteries_).--Aneurysms appearing in the region of Poupart's ligament may
Arthur or Platt or by the names of men now living. The ruler of the
Articles in addition to, and amendment of, the Constitution of the
Articles of Confederation and ultimately under the Constitution of the
Articles of Confederation did but strengthen this national bond and the
Articles of Confederation, authorizing the levy of a moderate duty on
Articles of Confederation, the Southern Congress resorted to a direct
Articles of Confederation, was continued in force by the first Congress
Articles were overthrown, the equality and rights of the states would be
Articles" drafted in the same year. The pioneers on the Connecticut
Articles, the convention agreed upon a legislature of two houses. In the
Artificial respiration may be useful in tiding a patient over the
As Alpatych was driving out of the gate he saw some ten soldiers
As I dressed I glanced at my watch. It was no wonder that no one was stirring. It was twenty-five minutes past four. I had hardly finished when Holmes returned with the news that the boy was putting in the horse.
As I entered, a sallow Malay attendant had hurried up with a pipe for me and a supply of the drug, beckoning me to an empty berth.
As I waited, I lifted the unopened newspaper from the table and glanced my eye over it. It rested upon a heading which sent a chill to my heart.
As Pierre approached that street the smoke became denser and denser-
As Pierre passed through the fence gate, he was enveloped by hot air
As Pierre was entering the reception room a courier from the army
As Shinshin had remarked, from the time of his arrival Anatole had
As a complication of ophthalmia, the joint lesions are met with in
As a dressing for the grafted area and of that also from which the
As a matter of fact, moreover, the restrictive laws, especially those
As a remedy for such abuses, reformers, learning from the experience of
As a result President Wilson ordered the landing of American forces at
As a result of a wholesome reaction against the purely chronological
As a result of the hostility between Kutuzov and Bennigsen, his
As a rule a fusiform aneurysm contains fluid blood, but when the intima
As generally happens, Pierre did not feel the full effects of the
As he drove through the streets past the houses that had been burned
As he fell asleep he had still been thinking of the subject that now
As he looked at the matter in this way, he learned that he was being
As he passed through the forest Prince Andrew turned several times
As he spoke he drew the dog-whip swiftly from the dead man's lap, and throwing the noose round the reptile's neck he drew it from its horrid perch and, carrying it at arm's length, threw it into the iron safe, which he closed upon it.
As he spoke the door opened and a young lady entered the room. She was plainly but neatly dressed, with a bright, quick face, freckled like a plover's egg, and with the brisk manner of a woman who has had her own way to make in the world.
As he spoke the gleam of the sidelights of a carriage came round the curve of the avenue. It was a smart little landau which rattled up to the door of Briony Lodge. As it pulled up, one of the loafing men at the corner dashed forward to open the door in the hope of earning a copper, but was elbowed away by another loafer, who had rushed up with the same intention. A fierce quarrel broke out, which was increased by the two guardsmen, who took sides with one of the loungers, and by the scissors-grinder, who was equally hot upon the other side. A blow was struck, and in an instant the lady, who had stepped from her carriage, was the centre of a little knot of flushed and struggling men, who struck savagely at each other with their fists and sticks. Holmes dashed into the crowd to protect the lady; but, just as he reached her, he gave a cry and dropped to the ground, with the blood running freely down his face. At his fall the guardsmen took to their heels in one direction and the loungers in the other, while a number of better dressed people, who had watched the scuffle without taking part in it, crowded in to help the lady and to attend to the injured man. Irene Adler, as I will still call her, had hurried up the steps; but she stood at the top with her superb figure outlined against the lights of the hall, looking back into the street.
As he spoke there was a tap at the door, and the boy in buttons entered to announce Miss Mary Sutherland, while the lady herself loomed behind his small black figure like a full-sailed merchant-man behind a tiny pilot boat. Sherlock Holmes welcomed her with the easy courtesy for which he was remarkable, and, having closed the door and bowed her into an armchair, he looked her over in the minute and yet abstracted fashion which was peculiar to him.
As he spoke there was the sharp sound of horses' hoofs and grating wheels against the curb, followed by a sharp pull at the bell. Holmes whistled.
As he was leaving the battery, firing was heard on the left also,
As he went along he looked with pleasure at the year's splendid crop
As if measuring themselves and preparing for the coming movement,
As if responding to them but with a different sort of merriment, the
As if this action had some mysterious and menacing significance, the
As in all other parts of the world, the mechanical revolution was
As in the question of astronomy then, so in the question of
As is always the case at a departure, much had been forgotten or put
As is usually the case with people meeting after a prolonged
As it is impossible to predict how far the process will spread, it is
As it turned out, the Western forces accomplished their task first,
As regards the effects on the tissues at close range, that is, within a
As she became animated the prince looked at her more and more
As she entered the ballroom her father was hurriedly coming out of
As she named the Empress, Anna Pavlovna's face suddenly assumed an
As she read she glanced at the sleeping Natasha, trying to find in
As she said this the countess looked round at her daughter.
As soon as Natasha, sitting at the head of Prince Andrew's bed,
As soon as he learned that the Russian army was in such a hopeless
As soon as he noticed a French officer, who thrust his head out of the
As soon as it rose everyone in the boxes and stalls became silent,
As soon as she saw Pierre, the woman almost threw herself at his
As soon as the King began to speak loud and fast his royal dignity
As soon as the Uhlans descended the hill, the hussars were ordered
As soon as the aide-de-camp had said this, the old mustached
As soon as the men enrolled under the draft were ready, it became a
As soon as the prior withdrew, Natasha took her friend by the hand
As soon as the singing was over, another and another toast was
As soon as the sun appeared in a clear strip of sky beneath the
As soon as the ulcer assumes the characters of a healing sore, it should
As the Democrats were split, the party that had led a forlorn hope four
As the Knights were radical in spirit and their strikes, numerous and
As the Tsar rode up to one flank of the battalions, which
As the bearers, among whom was Anna Mikhaylovna, passed the young
As the condition tends to remain stationary, the support of an elastic
As the cysts increase in number and in size, the framework of the bone
As the farmers from the Northwest and planters from the Southwest poured
As the flames of the fire hidden within come more and more vividly
As the fluids in the tissues are lost by evaporation the part becomes
As the mazurka began, Boris saw that Adjutant General Balashev,
As the opposition hardened, the anti-slavery agitation gathered in force
As the presence of the reaction is an evidence of the activity of the
As the process is painful, a general anaesthetic is necessary. The
As the proportion of the negroes to the free white population steadily
As the requirements for other states are met, additions to this list
As the requirements for other states are met, additions to this list
As the sun and each atom of ether is a sphere complete in itself,
As the swelling of the joint is associated with wasting of the muscles,
As the thousands who were dependent upon their daily labor for their
As the war had caught him in the service, Nicholas Rostov took a
As there is little tendency to spontaneous cure, and as the aneurysm is
As they approached the watchhouse Denisov stopped, peering into
As they passed near a church in the Khamovniki (one of the few
As they were going round the Sukharev water tower Natasha, who was
As things now stand, the course of instruction in American history in
As this Apsheron battalion marched by, the red-faced Miloradovich,
As time goes on, the clonic exacerbations become more and more frequent,
As to the railways, the first firm and consistent demand for their
As to the theaters for the entertainment of the people and the
As we passed out he exchanged a few words with the landlord, explaining that we were going on a late visit to an acquaintance, and that it was possible that we might spend the night there. A moment later we were out on the dark road, a chill wind blowing in our faces, and one yellow light twinkling in front of us through the gloom to guide us on our sombre errand.
As when a window is opened a whiff of fresh air from the fields
As with astronomy the difficulty of recognizing the motion of the
Asia Minor, perhaps to the very confines of India. The Romans, supported
Aspect of the Toes in a woman who was also the subject of flat-foot.]
Assistance to runaway slaves, always more or less common in the North,
Assistance was given to the Cubans in their revolutionary struggle
Associated bone or joint lesions are dealt with at the same time. In the
Association, kept up a running fire upon the abuses of the spoils
At Anna Pavlovna's on the twenty-sixth of August, the very day of
At Bald Hills, Prince Nicholas Andreevich Bolkonski's estate, the
At Dorogobuzh while the soldiers of the convoy, after locking the
At Lexington, on the road to Concord, occurred "the little thing" that
At Smolensk the armies at last reunited, much as Bagration
At Waterloo we were fortunate in catching a train for Leatherhead, where we hired a trap at the station inn and drove for four or five miles through the lovely Surrey lanes. It was a perfect day, with a bright sun and a few fleecy clouds in the heavens. The trees and wayside hedges were just throwing out their first green shoots, and the air was full of the pleasant smell of the moist earth. To me at least there was a strange contrast between the sweet promise of the spring and this sinister quest upon which we were engaged. My companion sat in the front of the trap, his arms folded, his hat pulled down over his eyes, and his chin sunk upon his breast, buried in the deepest thought. Suddenly, however, he started, tapped me on the shoulder, and pointed over the meadows.
At a later stage, especially in children and in cases in which the
At a moment when all was quiet before the commencement of a song,
At a range of from twenty to thirty feet, although the scatter is
At any stage the disease may be arrested and the glands remain for long
At breakfast Pierre told the princess, his cousin, that he had
At dawn on the sixteenth of November, Denisov's squadron, in which
At dawn the two new batteries established during the night on the
At daybreak on the seventeenth, a French officer who had come with a
At dinner Anna Mikhaylovna talked the whole time about the war
At dinner Petya having returned home told them the news he had
At dinner that day, on Dessalles' mentioning that the French were
At dinner the conversation did not cease for a moment and seemed
At dinner the talk turned on the latest political news: Napoleon's
At dinner the talk turned on the war, the approach of which was
At dinner, at which champagne was drunk to the health of the new
At eight o'clock Kutuzov rode to Pratzen at the head of the fourth
At eleven o'clock they brought him news that the fleches captured by
At first he heard the sound of indifferent voices, then Anna
At first he spoke with the amused and mild irony now customary
At first it was but a lurid spark upon the stone pavement. Then it lengthened out until it became a yellow line, and then, without any warning or sound, a gash seemed to open and a hand appeared, a white, almost womanly hand, which felt about in the centre of the little area of light. For a minute or more the hand, with its writhing fingers, protruded out of the floor. Then it was withdrawn as suddenly as it appeared, and all was dark again save the single lurid spark which marked a chink between the stones.
At first the noise of the falling bombs and shells only aroused
At first while they were still moving along the Kaluga road,
At five in the morning it was still quite dark. The troops of the
At half-past five Napoleon rode to the village of Shevardino.
At her table there were extra dishes at dinner, and the servants had
At home, they had not yet gone to bed. The young people, after
At last the Emperor left the army, and as the most convenient and
At last the Emperor stopped beside his last partner (he had danced
At last the Emperor, tired of futile expectation, his actor's
At length Dron, the village Elder, entered the room and with a
At midday on the twenty-second of October Pierre was going uphill
At nine o'clock the countess woke up, and Matrena Timofeevna, who
At one of the post stations he overtook a convoy of Russian wounded.
At seven in the morning a French convoy in marching trim, wearing
At six in the evening, Kutuzov went to the Emperor's headquarters
At ten in the morning of the second of September this weather
At ten o'clock the infantry that had been among the bushes in
At that ball Pierre for the first time felt humiliated by the
At that instant the sun began to hide behind the clouds, and other
At that moment Nicholas and Countess Mary came in. Pierre with the
At that moment Nicholas noticed the presence of his nephew. His face
At that moment a maid sent by the countess, who had noticed her
At that moment the door opened.
At that moment the first smith got up and, scratching his bruised
At that moment the flames flared up and showed his young master's
At that moment the pitiful wailing of women was heard from different
At that moment they heard the sound of the door pulley and footsteps
At that moment, as the Horse Guards, having passed him,
At that moment, on the road from the town on which signalers had
At that moment, on the road leading from the big house, two women
At that moment, with noiseless footsteps and with the
At that moment, with soft steps, the countess came in shyly, in
At that time in the Rostovs' house there prevailed an amorous
At that time, as always happens, the highest society that met at
At that very time, at ten in the morning of the second of September,
At the Olmutz review he had seemed more majestic; here he seemed
At the Troitsa monastery the Rostovs first broke their journey for a
At the Troitsa monastery they had spoken of the past, and he had
At the ankle it affects the peronei, the extensor digitorum longus, or
At the appointed hour the prince, powdered and shaven, entered the
At the appointed hour, however, he entered the modest house
At the basis of the works of all the modern historians from Gibbon
At the battle of Borodino Napoleon shot at no one and killed no one.
At the bedside it is difficult, if not impossible, to distinguish it
At the beginning of July more and more disquieting reports about the
At the beginning of March, old Count Ilya Rostov was very busy
At the beginning of winter Prince Nicholas Bolkonski and his
At the beginning of winter Princess Mary came to Moscow. From
At the bridge they all halted, waiting for those in front to get
At the close of the Civil War, Kansas and Texas were sentinel states on
At the close of the century, Ohio, claiming a population of more than
At the corner of the Moroseyka, opposite a large house with closed
At the council at Fili the prevailing thought in the minds of the
At the end of August the Rostovs received another letter from
At the end of January Pierre went to Moscow and stayed in an annex
At the end of January Princess Mary left for Moscow, and the count
At the end of January old Count Rostov went to Moscow with Natasha
At the end of the first quarter of the nineteenth century, the white
At the end of the letter she informed him that in a few days she
At the end of the meeting the Grand Master with irony and ill-will
At the end of the week the prince reappeared and resumed his
At the entrance to Princess Mary's house Pierre felt doubtful
At the first glance, when Davout had only raised his head from the
At the first sound of trampling hoofs and shouting, Petya lashed his
At the fleches Bennigsen stopped and began looking at the Shevardino
At the front an altercation occurred between an Austrian guide and a
At the levee Prince Andrew stood among the Austrian officers as he
At the men's end of the table the talk grew more and more
At the moment the door opened and the stranger came in, Pierre
At the moment when Rostov and Ilyin were galloping along the road,
At the moment when Vereshchagin fell and the crowd closed in with
At the next review, they say, the Emperor did not once deign to
At the review next day the Emperor asked Prince Andrew where he
At the same time he proposed that "evil trusts" should be prevented from
At the same time his mother-in-law, Prince Vasili's wife, sent to
At the same time its products are very potent in destroying the tissues
At the same time the commander of the artillery of the 1st Corps,
At the same time, persons outside the labor movement began to be
At the same time, the Federation, far from deliberately antagonizing
At the sight of the letter red patches showed themselves on the
At the sight of the tortured Frenchman and the crowd surrounding the
At the sight of these newcomers our client had sprung from his seat and stood very erect, with his eyes cast down and his hand thrust into the breast of his frock-coat, a picture of offended dignity. The lady had taken a quick step forward and had held out her hand to him, but he still refused to raise his eyes. It was as well for his resolution, perhaps, for her pleading face was one which it was hard to resist.
At the sound of Weyrother's voice, he opened his one eye with an
At the summit of the hill they stopped with the icon; the men who
At the very beginning of the war our armies were divided, and our
At the very instant he did this and uttered those words, Pierre felt
At these sounds, long unheard, Rostov's spirits rose, as at the
At this a sudden change evidently took place in the princess' ideas;
At this point a far more serious crisis put the pacific relations of the
At this, the hostility of the Anti-Federalists knew no bounds. Jefferson
At three o'clock precisely I was at Baker Street, but Holmes had not yet returned. The landlady informed me that he had left the house shortly after eight o'clock in the morning. I sat down beside the fire, however, with the intention of awaiting him, however long he might be. I was already deeply interested in his inquiry, for, though it was surrounded by none of the grim and strange features which were associated with the two crimes which I have already recorded, still, the nature of the case and the exalted station of his client gave it a character of its own. Indeed, apart from the nature of the investigation which my friend had on hand, there was something in his masterly grasp of a situation, and his keen, incisive reasoning, which made it a pleasure to me to study his system of work, and to follow the quick, subtle methods by which he disentangled the most inextricable mysteries. So accustomed was I to his invariable success that the very possibility of his failing had ceased to enter into my head.
At two in the morning of the fourteenth of June, the Emperor, having
At two o'clock the six chosen guests assembled for dinner.
Atheromatous degeneration is most common in the large arterial trunks,
Atlantic Ocean to the Mississippi River, began its career among the
Atlantic Ocean. In a decade they had doubled the tonnage of American
Atlantic seaboard, railways followed population and markets. In the Far
Atlantic seaboard; the cowboy and the Indian were swept away before a
Atrophic conditions are also met with, the bones undergoing fatty
Attempted drives from east to west--similar to the contrary
Attempts have been made to interrupt the channel along which the
Attempts to immunise against the disease have so far proved negative,
Auersperg was defending, and the bridge was not blown up: so Murat
August 12, the preliminary peace protocol was signed, stipulating that
August 5 the Payne-Aldrich bill became a law, a breach had been made in
August 5. The assembly which duly met on that day was a unique political
August day, such bodies had filled the dirty pond beside the
August, 1918, it extended them to eighteen and forty-five. From the men
Austerlitz with the lofty heavens, his wife's dead reproachful face,
Austerlitz, led up the Emperor's horse, and the faint creak of a
Australia, urged the adoption of the "Australian ballot." That ballot,
Austria a Russian corps crossed the frontier to co-operate with our
Austria and Prussia without knowing why. War is not courtesy but the
Austria loses its rights, and the rights and the strength of France
Austria," said Mortemart. "The Emperor of Austria can never have
Austria-Hungary against Serbia might bring Russia upon the field and
Austria-Hungary and Serbia"; meaning that the small nation should be
Austria-Hungary increased, more than three-fourths of the entire number
Austrian General Schmidt, who was killed in the action. His horse
Austrian army of Ulm. They are the same battalions you broke at
Austrian campaign, he had come to the conclusion that in war the
Austrian defeat, there were many circumstances confirming the
Austrian general who had succeeded Schmidt. In the passage little
Austrian. Among them were grooms leading the Tsar's beautiful relay
Austrians let themselves be tricked at the crossing of the Vienna
Austro-Hungarian throne was assassinated at Serajevo, the capital of
Awoke late, read the Scriptures but was apathetic. Afterwards went
B.T. Washington, _The Negro Problem_; _The Story of the Negro_; _The
BASSETT, J.S. _A Short History of the United States_
BECKER, C.L. _Beginnings of the American People_
BUSINESS ENTERPRISE AND THE REPUBLICAN PARTY
BY THE MACMILLAN COMPANY.
Baccelli recommends the injection of 20 c.c. of a 1 in 100 solution of
Bache, while her father was pleading the American cause in France, set
Bagration a French column that was outflanking us. To the left the
Bagration appeared in the doorway of the anteroom without hat or
Bagration drove up in a carriage to to the house occupied by
Bagration had sent Zherkov to the general commanding that left flank
Bagration rode round the ranks that had marched past him and
Bagration was thanking the individual commanders and inquiring into
Bagration were convinced that the Shevardino Redoubt was the left
Bagration's detachment no one knew anything of the general position of
Bagration's exhausted troops some rest, and letting the transport
Bagration's fleches were, but where Pierre was the smoke of the firing
Bagration's orderly came with the news that the prince could not
Bagration. He now came to his former chief with an order from the
Baker that cystic swellings may result from the hernial protrusion of
Balaga was about to leave the room.
Balashev did not do so at once, but continued to advance along the
Balashev found Davout seated on a barrel in the shed of a
Balashev had seen at the court of the Emperor of Russia--were waiting.
Balashev in the very house in Vilna from which Alexander had
Balashev involuntarily flushed with pleasure at the aptitude of this
Balashev looked around him, awaiting the arrival of an officer
Balashev recovered himself and began to speak. He said that the
Balashev replied that there was "nothing offensive in the demand,
Balashev respectfully ventured to disagree with the French Emperor.
Balashev told him why he considered Napoleon to be the originator of
Balashev took out the packet containing the Emperor's letter and
Balashev was only two horses' length from the equestrian with the
Balashev, feeling it incumbent on him to reply, said that from the
Bald Hills he again came out on the road and overtook his regiment
Bald Hills in the whole world, it seems, is not accepted as a great
Bald Hills to help with the harvest or to dig ponds, and ditches,
Bald Hills to the last extremity and to defend it, leaving to the
Bald Hills. That's all the same to him! That's what I was saying to
Baltimore. When the delegates again assembled, their passions ran as
Bank in Andrew Jackson's day, they were suspicious of men from the East.
Barclay and condemned, as unsuitable from every point of view, the
Barclay at the beginning of the Russian campaign--to transfer the
Barclay is said to be the most capable of them all, but I cannot say
Barclay stood for caution. The Tsarevich hinted at treachery and
Barclay wished to have written confirmation of the order the field
Barclay, one day at dinner, informed Bolkonski that the sovereign
Baron Asch, the civil governor of Smolensk, 1812.)
Bartenstein, as the Pavlograds were at the outposts far beyond that
Bastille, an old royal prison, symbol of the king's absolutism, was
Battle Lines of the Various Years of the World War                 613
Bay in New England." In this case the law did but incorporate a group
Bazdeev's books and papers appeared to him the most necessary.
Be that as it may, it appears that the colonists felt little irritation
Beatified) was to have been razed to the ground, proved quite useless.
Beauharnais' train had not yet got out of Moscow and reached the
Beaumarchais, a man of wealth, a lover of music, and the author of two
Beausset could fail to grasp the meaning of what was happening.
Because it happened so! "Chance created the situation; genius
Because of its causing deformities of the bones and an undue liability
Before Anna Pavlovna and the others had time to smile their
Before Monroe arrived, the regular minister, Livingston, had already
Before Pierre left the room Princess Mary told him: "This is the
Before Rostov had had time to consider and determine the distance of
Before Shinshin had time to utter the joke he was ready to make on
Before any antiseptic is applied, the margin of the suspected sore is
Before applying any of these it is advisable to empty the limb of blood.
Before applying leeches the part must be thoroughly cleansed, and if
Before five in the evening the battle had been lost at all points.
Before he had reached the embankments that were being thrown up,
Before him, on the right, Rostov saw the front lines of his
Before joining the Western Army which was then, in May, encamped
Before partisan warfare had been officially recognized by the
Before the Declaration of Independence, the oncoming tide of
Before the battle of Borodino our strength in proportion to the
Before the beginning of the campaign, Rostov had received a letter
Before the countess could answer, Prince Andrew entered the room
Before the end of the fast of St. Peter, Agrafena Ivanovna Belova, a
Before the expiration of a year, Virginia, New Jersey, Pennsylvania,
Before the officer had finished speaking the orderly made the same
Before they had reached Bagration, the weighty tread of the mass of
Before they reached the room from which the sounds of the clavichord
Before two o'clock in the afternoon the Rostovs' four carriages,
Before two weeks had elapsed the controversy had become so intense that
Beginnings of the Far West_, Vol. II, pp. 113-166.
Behind Kutuzov was Bennigsen and the suite. Despite the presence of
Behind her in the doorway appeared a student with a crimson coat
Behind him stood the aide-de-camp, the doctors, and the menservants;
Behind him, where Karataev had been sitting, the dog began to
Behind them along the narrow, sodden, cutup forest road came hussars
Bekleshev and Theodore Uvarov, who had arrived with him, paused at the
Bekleshev, Naryshkin, Uvarov, Dolgorukov, Apraksin, Valuev, to the
Belaya Tserkov where that regiment was forming, the countess was
Belgium and the horrors that accompanied German occupation were odious
Belgium that they were preparing to violate the neutrality of his realm
Belliard. Having dismounted he went up to the Emperor with rapid
Bells rang, the stewards rushed forward, and--like rye shaken
Belova admired the presents and was delighted with her dress
Below, where the fight was beginning, there was still thick fog;
Beneath his smile Rostov saw in him the mood he had shown at the
Benefit has followed the injection into the nerve itself, or into the
Bennigsen and Barclay advised? What would have happened had the French
Bennigsen and the Tsarevich.
Bennigsen eventually. Let the others make mistakes now!" said they,
Bennigsen insisted on the position being defended and others still
Bennigsen opened the council with the question: "Are we to abandon
Bennigsen's note and the Cossack's information that the left flank
Bennigsen's. But at the critical moment the courier who carried the
Bennigsen, but only the one most essential thing--as much advantage
Bennigsen, who had chosen the position, warmly displayed his Russian
Berezina by the disorganized crowds of the French when it was
Berg and the countess looked at her, perplexed and frightened. The
Berg put on the cleanest of coats, without a spot or speck of
Berg related how the Grand Duke had ridden up to him in a violent
Berg smiled joyously. The count, by his guests, went into the
Berg took the opportunity to ask, with great politeness, whether, as
Berg was satisfied and happy. The smile of pleasure never left his
Berg was sitting beside the countess consoling her with the
Berg's proposal, the holiday tone of joyousness usual at such times
Berg, the Rostovs' son-in-law, was already a colonel wearing the
Berlin. The representative selected for St. Petersburg spent two
Berthier approached and suggested that they should ride along the line
Berthier, began pacing up and down the bank with him, giving him
Beside himself with terror Pierre jumped up and ran back to the
Besides the Bezukhov family, Nicholas' old friend the retired
Besides the common impulse which bound the whole crowd of French
Besides the plunderers, very various people, some drawn by
Besides this, the whole staff of the Russian army was now
Between 1850 and 1859, to use dollars and cents as the measure of
Between 1880 and the close of the century the value of its farm crops
Between four and five in the afternoon, having made all his calls,
Between the ages of three and six months, certain other phenomena may be
Between three and four o'clock in the afternoon Prince Andrew, who
Beyond Shamshevo, Dolokhov was to observe the road in the same
Beyond the mountains pioneers had already ventured, harbingers of an
Bezukhov and the owner of one of the largest fortunes in Russia, I
Bezukhov's household, despite all the search they made, saw Pierre
Bezukhov, and will then inherit everything under the will? And if
Bier belongs the credit of having put the treatment of inflammation on a
Bier's bandage for two or three hours twice daily while the symptoms are
Bilibin and the rest of "ours" burst out laughing in Hippolyte's
Bilibin smiled and the wrinkles on his face disappeared.
Bilibin was a man of thirty-five, a bachelor, and of the same circle
Bilibin wrinkled up the skin over his eyebrows and pondered, with
Bilibin, accompanying him to the hall.
Blood extravasated deeply in the tissues gives rise to a firm,
Bogdanovna advised Prince Andrew to leave the room.
Bogucharovo house. The peasants were briskly carrying out the
Bogucharovo lay in a flat uninteresting part of the country among
Bogucharovo, replied that they had left on the seventh and again
Boils are most frequently met with on the back of the neck and the
Boils may be differentiated from syphilitic lesions of the skin by
Bolkhovitinov gave a detailed account from the beginning of all he
Bolkhovitinov, entering the open door which he had found by feeling in
Bolkonski an object of particular respect to the Moscovites and the
Bolkonski and Denisov moved to the gate, at which a knot of soldiers
Bolkonski followed them unnoticed by his uncle and sat down at the
Bolkonski noticed the hussar's state of mind, and it amused him.
Bolkonski set off to rejoin the army, not knowing where he would
Bolkonski took the opportunity to go in to get some details of the
Bolkonski was already acquainted. Bilibin introduced him to the
Bolkonski, the little princess' husband. He was a very handsome
Bolkonski. In the midst of his explanation shouts were heard from
Bolshevism, I.W.W.-ism, and the irresponsible leadership that encourages
Bonaparte had stolen the sword of Frederick the Great.
Bonaparte meanwhile began taking the glove off his small white hand,
Bonaparte's address to his army at the beginning of the campaign,
Bonaparte's genius might outweigh all the courage of the Russian
Bonaparte's new triumph, tomorrow's levee and parade, and the audience
Bonaparte, and how badly the latter would fare now, especially if
Bonaparte, who also enjoyed the famous actress' favors, and that in
Bonaparte. He alone of all the Russians has disgraced the Russian
Bondmen without the asking and without preparation found themselves the
Bones formed entirely in cartilage are exempt, namely, the tarsal and
Bony ankylosis of the joints of a finger, whether the result of injury
Boone, John Sevier, and George Rogers Clark, who first understood the
Boris Drubetskoy, having left his wife in Moscow and being for the
Boris came a lady with the colonel, then the general himself, then the
Boris came to the Rostovs' box, received their congratulations
Boris had contrived to remain at headquarters after the changes. He
Boris had realized this the week before when the commander in chief in
Boris kissed Natasha's hand and said that he was astonished at the
Boris knew nothing about the Boulogne expedition; he did not read
Boris listened attentively to each of the speakers, awaiting his
Boris lodged with another adjutant, the Polish Count Zhilinski.
Boris paused in the middle of the room, looked round, brushed a
Boris quietly left the room and went in search of Natasha. The plump
Boris that it gave the Emperor pleasure to utter these words. He was
Boris was among the few present at the Niemen on the day the two
Boris was excited by the thought of being so close to the higher
Boris was thus the first to learn the news that the French army
Boris was to travel to join the army, and about whom Natasha had,
Boris with the happy smile seen on the faces of young men who have
Boris' uniform, spurs, tie, and the way his hair was brushed were
Boris, hearing a strange voice in the anteroom, came out to meet
Boris, in the accurate way characteristic of him, was building a
Boris, too, with his friend Zhilinski, came to see the Preobrazhensk
Borodino (the one where the battle was fought), far from being strong,
Borodino for the first time the hand of an opponent of stronger spirit
Borodino to the left of, and at a right angle to, the highroad (that
Borodino, and on their left flank Uvarov's cavalry had put the
Borodino, for all the generals who came to Moscow after that battle
Borodino. Below the village the road crossed the river by a bridge
Borodino. The direct consequence of the battle of Borodino was
Boston, should rise to a position of dominance both in concentrating the
Both avoided any allusion to the future. To admit the possibility of
Both fell silent, peering out through the darkness at the sound of
Both letters were written from Troitsa. The other, from the
Both the Department of State and the Navy Department were fully
Both the countess and Sonya understood that, naturally, neither
Bourienne with a radiant face that said: "I know nothing, I am the
Bourienne would do the honors of Bogucharovo for him. I should be
Bourienne, and even little Nicholas exchanged looks in silence. The
Bourienne, they quite understood one another as to the first part of
Bourienne, whose chattering voices had reached her from the
Bourienne. "You know--under the paperweight on the little table."
Bourienne. Though in the new reign he was free to return to the
Boxer uprising. "The policy of the Government of the United States," he
Braddock's memorable defeat, and had served with credit during the Seven
Bragg," became President of the United States.
Braunau) that he must retreat as quickly as possible behind the hollow
Break the armistice immediately and march on the enemy. Inform him
Breathless with joy, Pierre ran to the little girl and was going
Brigade? From the governor of the prison... from the superintendent of
Bring us nice news of a victory by the Archduke Karl or Ferdinand (one
Bristol, and Liverpool. Workingmen in the manufacturing towns of England
Britain agreed to withdraw her troops from the western forts where they
Britain upon constitutional principles to independence." At the same
Britain, the Declaration contained a long list of "abuses and
Britain, which meant the completion of the ruin already begun. In the
British (September, 1777), the invasion of New York by Burgoyne and his
British Parliament related to the sale of colonial produce. An act of
British colonial policy must be placed the navigation laws framed for
British docks and allowed them to escape to play havoc under the
British empire should be confined to agriculture and the production of
British imperial control over the American colonies.
British marine insurance, but they did not dethrone the mistress of the
British ministry, the Americans spoke of their "rights as Englishmen"
British monarchy there is no way of knowing. The question of revolution
British ports, to escape and prey upon the commerce of the Northern
British rule in Ireland; now Cavaliers who championed the king against
British ship, the _Falaba_, was sunk by a submarine and many on board,
British to return slaves carried off during the Revolution, the seizure
British towns of the same period?
British, were preying upon American commerce, enraged even the
Briton." Macaulay, the English historian, certainly of no liking for
Brother O. was very eloquent. In the evening the admission took place.
Brotherhood was known). Drawing nearer, he recognized in the Rhetor
Brothers from pride, to turn them toward the true path
Brothers. In the evening I went down to the countess and told a
Buffalo, had adopted it. Still the larger cities like New York and
Bull Run on July 21 revealed the serious character of the task before
Buonaparte was a great tactician? Here, he says the same thing."
Buren, at heart opposed to slavery extension, refused to press the issue
Burgoyne, to whom was given the task of penetrating New York from
Burke, said Paine, had been mourning about the glories of the French
Burning lips were pressed to hers, and at the same instant she
Burr, the Republican candidate for Vice President, had received the same
Business enterprise was thoroughly alarmed. The Republicans
But Dolokhov did not go away; he untied the handkerchief around
But Dolokhov restarted the conversation which had dropped and
But I saw nothing. At the moment when Holmes struck the light I heard a low, clear whistle, but the sudden glare flashing into my weary eyes made it impossible for me to tell what it was at which my friend lashed so savagely. I could, however, see that his face was deadly pale and filled with horror and loathing. He had ceased to strike and was gazing up at the ventilator when suddenly there broke from the silence of the night the most horrible cry to which I have ever listened. It swelled up louder and louder, a hoarse yell of pain and fear and anger all mingled in the one dreadful shriek. They say that away down in the village, and even in the distant parsonage, that cry raised the sleepers from their beds. It struck cold to our hearts, and I stood gazing at Holmes, and he at me, until the last echoes of it had died away into the silence from which it rose.
But Mavra Kuzminichna stood at the closed gate for some time with
But Napoleon nodded to the traveler, and de Beausset had to mount.
But Napoleon with his long experience of war well knew the meaning
But Pierre was not listening to the woman. He had for some seconds
But Rostov bowed himself away from the doctor and asked the
But Sonya, who had gone to look for the papers in the anteroom,
But a fortnight after his departure, to the surprise of those around
But after Bennigsen's departure, the Grand Duke Tsarevich
But after the exclamation of surprise that had escaped from
But after the night in Mytishchi when, half delirious, he had seen
But all he said was so prettily sedate, and the naivete of his
But all the same that night Natasha, now agitated and now
But as she passed the sitting room she noticed two couples
But as soon as the man had left the room Pierre took up his hat
But as soon as the necessity for a general European war presented
But at noon the adjutant of the regiment came into Rostov's and
But at that instant a tall Austrian general in a greatcoat, with the
But at the door she stopped as if her conscience reproached her for
But at the instant he died, Prince Andrew remembered that he was
But at the moment when he imagined himself calmed by such
But at the same moment an expression of warm gratitude on the
But before Pierre could decide what answer he would send, the
But before the whip could reply, the hare, scenting the frost coming
But before the words were well out of his mouth, his cap flew off
But behind the veil of smoke the sun was still high, and in front
But besides the fact that cutting off Napoleon with his army would
But besides this, even if, admitting the remaining minimum of
But besides this, since the exhaustion and enormous diminution of
But by the time this letter, which proved that the real relation
But dazed by the force of the movement, it was long before people
But enough of gossip. I am at the end of my second sheet of paper,
But even admitting as correct all the cunningly devised arguments
But even as he spoke he began to doubt whether this was the corporal
But for history, the state and power are merely phenomena, just as for
But for the "Right of Replacement or Refund" described below,
But for the "Right of Replacement or Refund" described below,
But hardly had the princess looked at Natasha's face before she
But he had no time to utter the decisive word which the expression
But he had not time to realize that the colonel had been killed,
But he sent an adjutant to take the news round the army.
But her voice was drowned by the voices of the crowd.
But how did that old man, alone, in opposition to the general
But however indubitable that conclusion and the officer's conviction
But in spite of much that was interesting and had to be discussed, the
But in that case the question arises whether all the activity of the
But in that case, if the force that moves nations lies not in the
But in the spring of that year, he received a letter from his
But instead of all that--here he was, the wealthy husband of an
But just as the force of gravitation, incomprehensible in itself but
But just as the subject of every science is the manifestation of
But next day no news arrived from the army and the public mood
But not to mention the historians' contradictions as to the nature
But not to speak of the fact that nothing prevented him from
But not to speak of the intrinsic quality of histories of this
But noticing the grieved expression on Princess Mary's face she
But on hearing the order Dron lowered his eyes and remained silent.
But our left--which consisted of the Azov and Podolsk infantry and the
But that man, so heedless of his words, did not once during the
But the Emperor and Balashev passed out into the illuminated
But the French did not make that effort. Some historians say that
But the Governor did not finish: a dusty perspiring officer ran into
But the adjutant turned his horse about and rode on.
But the attention of the crowd--officials, burghers, shopkeepers,
But the chief reason for not carrying out his intention to enter the
But the coachman could not stop, for from the Meshchanski Street
But the convoyman took no notice of the word "general" and shouted
But the count had already recovered from his excitement.
But the countess did not want the question put like that: she did
But the countess pushed her daughter away and went up to her
But the countess would not agree to his going; he had had a bad
But the doctor interrupted him and moved toward his gig.
But the first plunderers were followed by a second and a third
But the guns remained loaded, the loopholes in blockhouses and
But the happy day came, and on that memorable Sunday, when,
But the idea that he, L'russe Besuhof, was destined to set a limit
But the inspector was mistaken, for those criminals were not destined to fall into the hands of justice. As we rolled into Eyford Station we saw a gigantic column of smoke which streamed up from behind a small clump of trees in the neighbourhood and hung like an immense ostrich feather over the landscape.
But the man who says that the movement of the wheels is the cause
But the mind of man not only refuses to believe this explanation,
But the moment the door opened one feeling alone appeared on all
But the most amazing example of the ineffectiveness of the orders
But the officer thrashed him because he had to get on as quickly as
But the princess did not listen to him.
But the princess, if she did not again thank him in words, thanked
But the rams need only cease to suppose that all that happens to
But the smile did not enhance Vera's beauty as smiles generally
But the smooth sea again suddenly becomes disturbed. The
But the staff officer did not finish what he wanted to say. A cannon
But the talk in every group was chiefly about the Emperor Alexander.
But the word always seemed to her to imply: "Yes, I am angry but I
But then, in 1812, the French gain a victory near Moscow. Moscow
But there was no great difficulty in the first stage of my adventure. Upper Swandam Lane is a vile alley lurking behind the high wharves which line the north side of the river to the east of London Bridge. Between a slop-shop and a gin-shop, approached by a steep flight of steps leading down to a black gap like the mouth of a cave, I found the den of which I was in search. Ordering my cab to wait, I passed down the steps, worn hollow in the centre by the ceaseless tread of drunken feet; and by the light of a flickering oil-lamp above the door I found the latch and made my way into a long, low room, thick and heavy with the brown opium smoke, and terraced with wooden berths, like the forecastle of an emigrant ship.
But they did not cut off or overthrow anybody and the French army,
But they had to avoid carrying the man upstairs, and so they took
But this was not and could not be done, for during the whole battle
But though toward the end of the battle the men felt all the
But to make an attack the wish to do so is not sufficient, there
But to the generals, especially the foreign ones in the Russian
But tomorrow we shan't say it! You talk about our position, the left
But when Katie brought the required dress, Princess Mary remained
But when Volkonski said, with a frown, that it was in the
But when he mentioned the Rostovs, Princess Mary's face expressed
But when he returned to the house convinced that Moscow would not be
But when on Sunday after church the footman announced in the drawing
But when the guard was relieved next morning, Pierre felt that for
But while himself remaining, he gave instructions for the
But, just because the assistant evidently did not want him to go in,
Butte the miners began operations in 1864 and within five years had
Buxhowden, catches us and attacks. Both generals are angry, and the
Buxhowden. If Kutuzov decided to retreat along the road from Krems
By "what was due from the Ryazan estate" Prince Vasili meant several
By 1885, ten years after the national organization was established, it
By a single stroke, the original territory of the United States was more
By association of ideas, Pierre was at once carried back to the
By carrying out movements between the constituent parts, the fibrous
By degrees other steps were taken. The Woman's Medical College of
By dint of much labor the friends of a new form of government induced
By discarding a claim to knowledge of the ultimate purpose, we shall
By eleven o'clock the next day we were well upon our way to the old English capital. Holmes had been buried in the morning papers all the way down, but after we had passed the Hampshire border he threw them down and began to admire the scenery. It was an ideal spring day, a light blue sky, flecked with little fleecy white clouds drifting across from west to east. The sun was shining very brightly, and yet there was an exhilarating nip in the air, which set an edge to a man's energy. All over the countryside, away to the rolling hills around Aldershot, the little red and grey roofs of the farm-steadings peeped out from amid the light green of the new foliage.
By gently palpating with the finger-tips over the softened area, a fluid
By his age he should have belonged to the younger men, but by his
By impetus gained, the French army was still able to roll forward to
By means of splints, the interphalangeal, metacarpo-phalangeal, and
By refuting these new laws the former view of history might have
By some it is recommended that the local lesion should be freely
By ten o'clock in the morning of the second of September, only the
By the beginning of August Helene's affairs were clearly defined and
By the close of the seventeenth century, New England manufactured cloth
By the dim light, to which Pierre had already become accustomed,
By the light of the sparks Bolkhovitinov saw Shcherbinin's
By the new state constitutions the signs and symbols of royal power, of
By the side of the path, on the dusty dry grass, all sorts of
By the time the soldiers had dragged the wattle fence to its place
By the time they got near Mozhaysk and began ascending the steep
By the time they reached Bogucharovo, Dessalles and the little
By the wall of China-Town a smaller group of people were gathered
By their proclamations of faith the Republicans favored the states
By wholesale removals and the frank selection of officers on party
C.A. Duniway, _Freedom of the Press in Massachusetts_.
C.D. Wright, _Industrial Evolution of the United States_.
C.H. Shinn, _The Story of the Mine_.
C.L. Jones, _The Caribbean Interests of the United States_.
CHIGOE.--Chigoe or jigger results from the introduction of the
COLONIAL RELATIONS WITH THE BRITISH GOVERNMENT
COMMODORE PERRY'S MEN MAKING PRESENTS TO THE JAPANESE]
CONSTITUTION OF THE UNITED STATES
CONSTITUTIONAL DISEASES ATTENDED WITH LESIONS IN THE BONES
CUBA AND THE SPANISH WAR
Caesar through riot and sedition." His protests were idle. The Commons
Caesars, Alexanders, Luthers, or Voltaires, and not the histories of
Calhoun, spokesmen of the West and South, were not unmindful of what
California and Oregon were already in the union when there arose the
California denounced it as a law "to suppress the freedom of the press
California in 1848 was the signal for the great rush of prospectors,
California in the endowment of a large university. Colonel W.F. Cody,
California, on to China and around the world, trading as they went and
Callender, _Economic History of the United States_, pp. 159-168; Elson,
Cambridge to preach the gospel or to teach. Now and then the son of an
Campan's and Dessaix's, advanced from the French right, while
Can you fancy the figure he cut?..."
Canada to Mexico, and embracing the regions now included in Washington,
Canada, had likewise seen service in the French War both in America and
Canal, was a heritage from his predecessor. The idea of a water route
Cancer may arise on any surface covered by epithelium or in any of the
Capillary haemorrhages sometimes take place in the skin or mucous
Capital and in others parts of our realm for consultation, and for the
Captain von Toll chanced to ride to the same spot, and seeing the
Cards and supper were over, but the visitors had not yet
Carelessly holding in his stallion that was neighing and pawing the
Caries of the articular surface imparts a woolly appearance or irregular
Carlton J.H. Hayes, _A Brief History of the Great War_.
Carolina also built ships, Southern interest was mainly confined to the
Carolina laid a tax on peddlers, the council objected to it as
Carolina were still unconvinced. The former refused to abandon ownership
Carolina's resistance and the other to apply force if it was continued,
Carolina, in 1760, absolutely prohibited importation; but the measure
Carolina, two thousand pounds freehold. For members of the lower house
Carolina, where reposed the ashes of John C. Calhoun, went Republican in
Carolina: "Owing to the federative character of our government, the
Carolinas taking the lead by consuming more than one-third of their
Carpenter's Hall in Philadelphia. Many of the greatest men in America
Cartilaginous and partly ossified loose bodies may accumulate in the
Cartilaginous tumours in the parotid, submaxillary gland, and testicle
Cases have been met with in which certain parts of the skeleton--only
Cases have occurred in which the surgeon has carried the infection from
Cases of elephantiasis of the lower extremity are met with in this
Casting a rapid glance at all those in the room and noticing the
Casting aside the language of petition with which Americans had hitherto
Catherine Petrovna did actually play valses and the ecossaise, and
Catherine the Great and talking eagerly. As soon as they saw Pierre
Catholic in religion. Like their Scotch-Irish neighbors to the north,
Caulaincourt began speaking of the badness of the road from Petersburg
Cellulitis is an acute affection resulting from the introduction of some
Cellulitis of the _axilla_ may originate in suppuration in the lymph
Cellulitis of the _sole of the foot_ may follow whitlow of the toes.
Cellulitis of the scalp, orbit, neck, pelvis, and perineum will be
Celtic names in the records of various colonies.
Certain cases of _haemorrhage into the lateral ventricles_ of the brain
Certain destruction lay behind the French but in front there was
Certain of the vascular and cellular changes are now utilised to restore
Certain rights and privileges for the aristocracy appear to me a means
Champ Clark, Speaker of the House of Representatives, and Governor
Chance and genius give him the victory at Austerlitz; and by chance
Changes in the arterial walls closely resembling those of syphilitic
Changes in the blood vessels then ensue, the arteries becoming dilated
Changes of a similar kind sometimes occur in the middle coat, the lime
Changes were found in the endothelium of the blood vessels, the axis
Chaps. XII and XIII. Tabulate the economic measures of Congress in
Charcot's Disease. The medial part of the head of the tibia has
Charges were advanced by the farmers, particularly those organized into
Charles I and the accession of George III, there was enacted an immense
Charles Pinckney had been officers in the Revolutionary army. Seven of
Charles Sumner afterward boasted that he read the _Liberator_ two years
Charleston _Mercury_ unfurled the flag of his state amid wild cheers
Charleston in the spring of 1860, a few months after Brown's execution,
Charleston, administered a crushing defeat to the American forces under
Charleston. As soon as a firm foothold was secured on the shore line
Chateaubriand, and others. The historian evidently decomposes
Chateaubriand, and the rest, pass before their stern judgment seat and
Chernyshev and Prince Andrew went out into the porch, where the
Chernyshev was sitting at a window in the first room with a French
Chicago street railway settlement of 1906. The total capital of the
Chichagov, noted for the boldness with which he spoke to the
Chichagov, one of the most zealous "cutters-off" and
Chichagov, who knew of the accusations that were being directed
Chief Prince Nicholas Bolkonski who died on the fifteenth of this
Chief of Staff, the presence of confidential representatives of the
China, Japan, and the Suez Canal. This enterprise was not, as some
Chinese by carving out more territory. "The moment we acted," said Mr.
Chondroma may occur in a multiple form, especially in relation to the
Chondromas springing from the pelvic bones usually arise in the region
Christ the Lord!"
Christ's sake, eh?" said the peasants, smiling joyfully at him.
Christian Women of the South," went North to work against the slavery
Christian men professing the law of love of their fellows slew one
Christmas came and except for the ceremonial Mass, the solemn and
Church of England, that stanch defender of the British monarchy. Each
Circular Letter addressed to the assemblies of the other colonies
Civil War and immigrants from Ireland and Germany. In 1869 the two
Clerical parties; the President asked for authority to use American
Cleveland in his message of 1887 attacked the tariff as "vicious,
Cleveland's first administration. The suggestion evoked an immediate
Cleveland, against the protests of the governor of Illinois, John P.
Cleveland, they nominated candidates of their own and endorsed the gold
Cleveland. When the platform with its radical planks, including free
Clinically the temperature is estimated by means of a self-registering
Clinically, carious bone yields a soft grating sensation under the
Club and someone near and dear to him sat at the end of the table.
Club or to Apollon Nikolaevich's, to exchange the gossip of the town.
Club without him. As soon as he sank into his place on the sofa
Club, and Pierre, after giving the letters to Sonya, went to Marya
Club, beset the new arrivals. Count Ilya, again thrusting his way
College. The same was true of New York and Philadelphia; namely, that
Colonial governors and judges were to be paid by the Crown; they were to
Colt's method of wiring has been mainly used in the treatment of
Column will march" and so on, the infantry of the belated columns,
Coming abreast of the caleche he ran beside it.
Coming out of Kutuzov's room into the waiting room with the papers
Coming out of the hut into the damp, dark night Konovnitsyn frowned-
Coming out onto a field under the enemy's fire, this brave general
Coming out onto the highroad the French fled with surprising
Coming out onto the road Dolokhov did not ride back across the
Commander Meade, of the United States navy, alive to the importance of
Commission for the Revision of the Code of Laws, Speranski told him
Commodores Sloat and Stockton and General Kearney, planted the Stars and
Compare with the condition of the United States at the close of the
Compromise violated the Constitution and was null and void.
Compromise. The Democrats, with Franklin Pierce as their leader, swept
Compromise.=--Defeated in their attempt to limit the convention to a
Comte Pierre Besouhoff, but the sum of the numbers did not come right.
Confederacy back upon the device of paper money. In all approximately
Confederacy. Had it not been for their extreme caution, for the constant
Confederate Congress were added untold millions poured out by the states
Confederate flag with American commerce. One of them, the _Alabama_,
Confederate forces to the Southeast into Georgia. By the middle of 1863,
Confederate government secure even paper for the issue of money and
Confederate service. Many more lay in waste. In the wake of the armies
Confederates escaped without demoralization. Not until the beginning of
Confederates was widely advocated. Yet it must be said that the struggle
Confederation, the formation of the Constitution, the rise of political
Confederation. The New Jersey plan as well as the Virginia plan
Congress agreed not to allow the importation of British goods, it
Congress and the approval of three-fourths of the states. Such an
Congress and the legislatures would be to exceed their powers, they
Congress and the states for their approval.
Congress and the states to compel people to accept the notes at face
Congress answered by passing in 1787 the famous Northwest Ordinance
Congress by law decreed that the national army should be chosen from all
Congress by the Constitution, the advocates of a strong national
Congress declared that the authority of the British crown in America
Congress dedicated a part of the proceeds from the sale of lands to
Congress forbade interference with electors or going in disguise for the
Congress gave heed to the warning. Under the direction of Nelson P.
Congress he assailed the bank in vigorous language. He declared that its
Congress in 1900. The law assured to the Porto Ricans American
Congress in a special session. Until the midsummer of 1909, Republican
Congress instituted a systematic survey of the Ohio country, laying it
Congress of the United States fell into utter disrepute. It called upon
Congress of the United States, which shall consist of a Senate and House
Congress on this subject [the tariff].... Men confederated together upon
Congress over the admission of new states. The spell was broken in 1889
Congress passed the sixteenth amendment to the Constitution, authorizing
Congress provided for the free distribution of land in 160-acre lots
Congress struck out the $300 exemption clause, but still favored the
Congress the repeal of the Sherman Silver Purchase Act. For this he was
Congress to apply any reasonable rules required by the occasion.
Congress to make an upward revision of the tariff. The Act of 1828 known
Congress took the same position with regard to a similar settlement
Congress under the Articles of Confederation, and in official capacity
Congress was also conferred the power of admitting new states; whenever
Congress were busy with politics. The Democrats saw no good reason for
Congress, Macdonald, _Documentary Source Book_, pp. 162-166; (2) the
Congress, acting on the recommendations of President Jefferson, provided
Congress, however, was not prepared to use the public domain for the
Congress, in enacting a mintage law, discontinued the coinage of the
Congress, so centralized power over the acts of state and local
Congress, the last one in 1870. Even this grudging concession of the
Congress, while two important laws positively encouraged it; namely, the
Congress. At last in 1893, the year after the great Populist upheaval,
Congress. In the summer of 1918 the express, telephone, and telegraph
Conjectures as to Napoleon's awareness of the danger of extending
Conkling and Arthur and Cornell and Platt, from the days of David B.
Connecticut border, sensing their doom, fell upon the tiny settlements
Consciousness gives expression to the essence of freedom.
Consequently the latter metal was not brought in for coinage and silver
Conservative measures need not be considered, as the only satisfactory
Considerable interest attaches to the observations of Metchnikoff, Roux,
Considered from one side, colonization, whatever the motives of the
Considering the extraordinary frequency of localised forms of surgical
Constantine Pavlovich joined the army. He had taken part in the
Constitution and acting as the first citizen of the land, President
Constitution depart from the old system?
Constitution in the government of the United States, or in any
Constitution of the United States was to commit to Congress the power to
Constitution of the United States, no power is given to the federal
Constitution of the United States--and submitted to the states for
Constitution of the United States. "What enriches a part enriches the
Constitution of the United States."
Constitution or the laws." He went on to say that he acted "for the
Constitution sealed it forever. The federal government was not a
Constitution was not to be interpreted narrowly but in the full light of
Constitution which, in spite of any defects great or small, was the
Constitution with the terms of the Amendment. _See_ Appendix.
Constitution, as we have seen, bore the signs of this experience. States
Constitution, joined the new republic, influenced by the favorable
Constitution, laws, and treaties were made the supreme law of the land,
Constitution, nor prohibited by it to the states, are reserved to the
Constitution, the people's government; made for the people; made by the
Constitution, therefore, the selection of President passed to the House
Constitution," they said, "a certain balance of power among the original
Constitution. Slavery in the South he tolerated as a bitter fact;
Constitution. The tax which roused such party passions twenty years
Constitution; the admission of Texas is absolutely essential to the
Construction was started immediately under the terms of the law. Within
Continental Congress had neither the power nor the inclination to force
Continental System, the ambition of Napoleon, the firmness of
Continental." To make matters worse, several of the states were pouring
Continually turning round to look at the rows of loaded carts that
Contrary to Bilibin's forecast the news he had brought was
Contrary to the Emperor's wish Kutuzov detained the greater part
Convoys were provided to accompany the transports conveying soldiers to
Cookshops and taverns were opened in partially burned houses. The
Copenhagen, and now held a rather important post in Vienna. Both the
Copernicus and Newton, to Voltaire for example, it seemed that the
Copernicus the Ptolemaic worlds were still studied for a long time.
Copper Trust was incorporated under the laws of New Jersey, its par
Copyright laws are changing all over the world. Be sure to check the
Copyright laws are changing all over the world. Be sure to check the
Cornwallis at Princeton had been followed by the disaster at Brandywine,
Cornwallis surrendered at Yorktown. In 1783, by the formal treaty of
Corydon. "The majority of the members of the convention," we are told by
Cossack during the campaign, and he wore a crumpled hussar cap stuck
Cossack laughingly told his comrades how he had almost fallen into the
Cossack, judging by the uniform thrown down beside him. Four
Cossack, riding a little to their right and behind the accountant,
Cossacks and then the first and second squadrons of hussars and
Cossacks were crowding about a hut, busy with something. From the
Cossacks were galloping along the road in front of him. On the
Cossacks who were carrying the body of Petya Rostov to a hole that had
Cossacks"--he pointed to a spot in the forest beyond the village--"and
Cotton gloves may be worn by the surgeon when tying ligatures, or
Count Bezukhov he did not let go his hold of the lad. He had the air
Count Bezukhov, and his inheritance. Fancy! The three princesses
Count Ilya Rostov had resigned the position of Marshal of the
Count Kochubey did not finish. He rose, took Prince Andrew by the
Count Orlov felt distrustful of the adventure when he looked at the
Count Ostermann-Tolstoy met the returning hussars, sent for
Count Rostopchin still heard the insane despairing screams growing
Count Rostopchin suddenly grew pale as he had done when the crowd
Count Rostov at the back of the crowd was expressing approval;
Count Rostov took the girls to Countess Bezukhova's. There were a
Count Tolstoy, Prince Volkonski, Arakcheev, and others--the Emperor
Countess Apraksina..." and then, again rustling, pass into the
Countess Bezukhova asked her visitors into the ballroom.
Countess Bezukhova's visit and the invitation for that evening,
Countess Bezukhova, a brilliant position in the service thanks to
Countess Mary remained in the sitting room.
Countess Mary sat at the other end of the table. When her husband
Countess Rostova's carriage in which they were seated drove over the
Courage, my angel." She kissed Lise and was about to leave the room.
Court helped along the process of dissolution by declaring parts of the
Court is the proper tribunal to pass finally upon the validity of the
Court to answer in a case in which the validity of one of her laws was
Court. Proceedings were instituted against the American Tobacco Company
Court. Though many able men held that the judicial branch of the
Cowpens and King's Mountain. Then came the closing scenes. Cornwallis
Cramp-like pains in the muscles are often associated with varix of the
Crawford. The result of the election was a division of the electoral
Creating the works from public domain print editions means that no
Creating the works from public domain print editions means that no
Creator with certain unalienable rights including life, liberty, and the
Crockett, the noted frontiersman, bear hunter, and backwoods politician;
Cross of the Legion of Honor and Napoleon the Order of St. Andrew of
Cross to the bravest of the French Guards. It has to be done. He
Cruel as was the system in many ways, it gave thousands of people in the
Crusade--the deliverance of Jerusalem--had been clearly defined by
Crusades that event appeared as merely due to the will of certain
Cuba should be free, Porto Rico ceded to the United States, and Manila
Cuba. In the administration of President Fillmore they had united in
Cubans, he would lay the whole matter before Congress. This decision,
Cumberland Gap and brought back news of a wonderful country awaiting the
Cursing his temerity, his heart sinking at the thought of finding
Curtis went over to the new party and 1,341,264 votes were rolled up for
Custer had his fatal battle with the Sioux in 1876 and there were minor
Cy Warman, _The Story of the Railroad_.
Cysts are rounded sacs, the wall being composed of fibrous tissue lined
Czar had made to the Pacific coast, President Monroe warned the Old
Czartoryski, Novosiltsev, Prince Volkonsky, Strogonov, and the others,
DOMESTIC ISSUES BEFORE THE COUNTRY (1865-1897)
Dakota, and Michigan swung into line the following year; several other
Daniel Boone had stirred the snug Americans of the seaboard to seek
Daniel Webster, Senator from Massachusetts, who, spreading the mantle
Danube and the Rhine, poured into the empire of the Caesars and made the
David over Goliath. Preserve his army, put a bow of brass in the hands
Davis was inaugurated President of the Southern Confederacy, there were
Davout brightened up at the news the adjutant brought, and began
Davout did not know that he was adjutant general to the Emperor
Davout glanced at him silently and plainly derived pleasure from the
Davout's troops, in whose charge were the prisoners, were crossing
Davout's, and then Ney's--ran, as it were, the gauntlet of the Russian
Davout, spectacles on nose, sat bent over a table at the further end
Davydov, with his Russian instinct, was the first to recognize the
De Beausset bowed low, with that courtly French bow which only the
De Beausset's hands meanwhile were busily engaged arranging the
Dead tissue, on the other hand, can do neither of these things; it is
Deane were selected as American representatives at the court of "His
Dear and precious Friend, Your letter of the 13th has given me great
Death is usually impending when the skin becomes cold and clammy, the
December 2, 1823, a statement of principles now famous throughout the
December and without a dissenting voice passed the ordinance of
Declaration of Independence for the purpose of common defense. The
Declaration of Rights modeled after the Declaration of Independence. For
Declaration of the Causes and the Necessity of Taking Up Arms,
Declaration of the Rights of Man, proclaiming the sovereignty of the
Definitions--Clinical examination of an ulcer--The healing
Delaware gave the vote to all men who paid taxes. Maryland, reckoned one
Delaware, Connecticut, and New Mexico were the only states that had not
Delaware, although they retained their proprietary character until the
Delaware--the empire of Texas, one hundred and twenty times its area!
Delirium is a temporary disturbance of mind which occurs in the course
Democrat, was immediately charged by the Republicans with being too
Democratic allegiance; against principles that must drive out of the
Democratic organization, known as Tammany Hall, passed under the sway of
Democratic party "with being the same in character and spirit as when it
Democratic party since the campaign of 1900. President Wilson in his
Democratic party, was the subjection of every act of state, municipal,
Democratic platform that "our title to the whole territory of Oregon is
Democrats gave heed and the Republicans made answer. The platform on
Democrats of the Douglas type, there was a chasm which no appeals to
Democrats were prepared for a war on the trusts to the bitter end.
Democrats, Congress did insist, however, on conferring upon the freedmen
Democrats, enacted, in 1842, a new tariff law destroying the compromise
Democrats, endorsed the fugitive slave law and approved the Great
Democrats, inspired by Tilden's moderation, accepted the judgment in
Denisov also came back and stayed with them. The first half of the
Denisov and Petya rode up to him. From the spot where the peasant
Denisov and the esaul drew back. They were so near that they thought
Denisov came out of the watchman's hut and, having called Petya,
Denisov first went to the barrier and announced: "As the adve'sawies
Denisov had come to Pokrovsk at the beginning of his operations and
Denisov in a felt cloak and a sheepskin cap from which the rain
Denisov lay asleep on his bed with his head under the blanket,
Denisov patted him on the shoulder and began rapidly pacing the room
Denisov sat gloomily biting his mustache and listening to the
Denisov spoke contemptuously of the whole matter, but Rostov knew
Denisov threw both pillows on the floor. The purse was not there.
Denisov turned his horse on the officer.
Denisov was out of sorts both because of the rain and also from
Denisov was shown to the room prepared for him, and the Rostovs
Denisov's behalf. He could not himself go to the general in attendance
Denisov's case, when hasty steps and the jingling of spurs were
Denisov's cold tone and supposing that it was due to the condition
Denisov's horse swerved aside to avoid a pool in the track and
Denisov's short stature not noticeable and he looked the fine fellow
Denisov's voice from the next room.
Denisov, Petya, and the esaul, accompanied by some Cossacks and
Denisov, and seven years previously had listened to the discussion
Denisov, dissatisfied with the government on account of his own
Denisov, frowning, took the envelope and opened it.
Denisov, now a general on the retired list and much dissatisfied
Denisov, to Rostov's surprise, appeared in the drawing room with
Denisov, who had come into the room unnoticed by anyone, stood there
Denisov, who had come out of the study into the dancing room with
Denisov, who had settled down by the roadside with a flask and some
Denisov, whom the general knew. Having heard Rostov to the end, the
Denisov, without alluding to the offenses of the commissariat
Denisov. Pointing to the French troops, Denisov asked him what these
Department to the Department of Commerce and Labor, in order to provide
Dependent for their prosperity mainly upon the sale of tobacco, rice,
Depressed scars may be raised by the injection of paraffin into the
Despite news of the capture of the fleches, Napoleon saw that this
Despite the uneasy glances thrown at her by Princess Mary--who
Despite this destitution, the soldiers and officers went on living
Dessalles looked in amazement at the prince, who was talking of
Dessalles' voice was heard outside the door asking whether little
Dessalles; the rest of the day she spent over her books, with her
Detroit had stood to the New West fifty years before. The problems of
Diaz, however, stirred popular discontent. The peons, or serfs, demanded
Difficulty may occur in the diagnosis of primary syphilis from _herpes_,
Difficulty of swallowing may be met by the use of a stomach tube passed
Diffuse thickening of the shafts of the long bones, due to a deposit of
Dimmler began to play; Natasha went on tiptoe noiselessly to the
Dimmler, who had joined the young folk with a mildly condescending
Dimmler, who had seated himself beside the countess, listened with
Dingley law were, whatever the cause, the most prosperous the country
Dingley, whose name was given to the bill, a tariff measure levying the
Diphtheria is an acute infective disease due to the action of a specific
Diplomacy: of the Revolution, 127ff.
Directly Rostov entered the door he was enveloped by a smell of
Discuss the work of the Seneca Falls convention.
Discussions and questions of that kind, which are like the
Disillusionment swiftly followed. The terrible defeat of the Federals at
Dislocation of the _peronei tendons_ may occur, for example, from a
Division of the Median Nerve. The area of complete cutaneous
Dmitri! Gallop off to our Moscow estate," he said to the factotum
Dmitri, a man of good family who had been brought up in the
Dmitrievna had been playing cards with the majority of the more
Dmitrievna's courtyard in the old Konyusheny street. Marya
Dmitrievna's deep voice suddenly inquired from the other end of the
Dmitrievna, the count saw clearly that something had gone wrong during
Dnieper Alpatych's cart and that of the innkeeper's wife, which were
Do not break your ranks on the plea of removing the wounded! Let
Do not the very actions for which the historians praise Alexander
Dokhturov had under his command, besides Dorokhov's detachment, the
Dokhturov rode thither, and Borodino became the greatest glory of
Dolgorukov again and remained for a while with the Ismaylov regiment.
Dolgorukov out into the corridor and met--coming out of the door of
Dolgorukov to the Emperor.
Dolgorukov was still insisting that the French had retreated and had
Dolgorukov, one of the warmest advocates of an attack, had just
Dolgorukov, the victor at Wischau, was sent with Savary to negotiate
Dolgorukov. Everyone at headquarters was still under the spell of
Dolgorukov; and though you may not know it, the fact is that now
Dolokhov a few days before, and on the day that Sonya, after listening
Dolokhov banged down the or of his and turned to Anatole with an
Dolokhov did not answer the captain; he had been drawn into a hot
Dolokhov had come from the left flank where their regiment was
Dolokhov has been degraded to the ranks and Bezukhov's son sent back
Dolokhov looked round but did not say anything, nor did the
Dolokhov often dined at the Rostovs', never missed a performance
Dolokhov put away the money, called a footman whom he ordered to
Dolokhov remarked that the Cossacks were a danger only to stragglers
Dolokhov rode past the sentinel, who without saying a word paced
Dolokhov stayed by the gate. Anatole followed the maid into the
Dolokhov stood at the gate of the ruined house, letting a crowd of
Dolokhov was holding the Englishman's hand and clearly and
Dolokhov was serving as a private. But the command of the extreme left
Dolokhov who was in the midst of the crowd forced his way to the
Dolokhov with blood. The crowd, pushing forward desperately,
Dolokhov with his feet turned under him. "It's the very devil! What?
Dolokhov's and Petya's steps as they advanced to the fire leading
Dolokhov's clear, cold glance met Rostov as soon as he entered the
Dolokhov's home: on the third day he received a note from him:
Dolokhov, Pierre saw clearly that what was said in the letter might be
Dolokhov, after Anatole entered, had remained at the wicket gate and
Dolokhov, an officer of the Semenov regiment, a notorious gambler
Dolokhov, and the old countess were especially disturbed, and to a
Dolokhov, showing him the memorandum. "Is that right?"
Dolokhov, the bottle of rum still in his hand, jumped onto the
Dolokhov, whom everyone in the house liked except Natasha. She
Dolokhov, without answering, took the cloak, threw it over
Dolokhov--now an officer--wounded in the arm, and on foot, with
Domestic commerce was impeded by the jealousies of the states, which
Done in Convention by the unanimous consent of the States present the
Donets horse and galloped to intersect the path of the dragoons'
Doubtless the major portion of them had opposed the election of Jackson
Douglas of Illinois and Andrew Johnson of Tennessee, kept up the
Douglas, the Kansas-Nebraska Bill became a law on May 30, 1854. The
Dr. Bernhard Dernburg, the former colonial secretary of the German
Dr. Grimesby Roylott's chamber was larger than that of his step-daughter, but was as plainly furnished. A camp-bed, a small wooden shelf full of books, mostly of a technical character, an armchair beside the bed, a plain wooden chair against the wall, a round table, and a large iron safe were the principal things which met the eye. Holmes walked slowly round and examined each and all of them with the keenest interest.
Drawn on by the movement of his troops Napoleon rode with them as
Dreadful as the countess imagined it would be should Prince Andrew
Dred Scott decision, came one of the worst business panics which ever
Drissa camp, of the suitability of which serious doubts were beginning
Drissa, and thence again beyond Drissa, drawing near to the frontier
Drive past Tatarinova, a lot of digging is going on there. Go up the
Dron came and confirmed Dunyasha's words; the peasants had come by
Dron looked intently at the princess while she was speaking.
Dron replied that the horses of these peasants were away carting.
Dron to let them have the grain."
Drubetskoy, who had already achieved great success in the service, was
Duke in command of the Guards there was no reason why it should not
Dunyasha, the nurse, and Michael Ivanovich following her.
During Rostov's short stay in Moscow, before rejoining the army,
During his stay at Bald Hills all the family dined together, but
During that fortnight of anxiety Natasha resorted to the baby for
During that stay in Petersburg, Boris became an intimate in the
During the cannonade Prince Poniatowski is to advance through the
During the development of the disease the patient feels ill, complains
During the dull day, in the course of which he was entertained by
During the entr'acte a whiff of cold air came into Helene's box, the
During the first half of the journey--from Kremenchug to Kiev--all
During the first period of his service, hard as he tried and much as
During the first period of their acquaintance Bolkonski felt a
During the first weeks of his stay in Petersburg Prince Andrew
During the hours of solitude, suffering, and partial delirium he
During the last days of Pierre's stay in Orel his old Masonic
During the month that the French troops were pillaging in Moscow and
During the movement of the Russian army from Tarutino to Krasnoe
During the national war he was inactive because he was not needed.
During the process of phagocytosis, the polymorpho-nuclear leucocytes in
During the strenuous period between the establishment of American
During the struggle over ratification, they passed resolutions approving
During the third night the countess kept very quiet for a few
During the three days preceding the occupation of Moscow the whole
During the two days that elapsed before Rostov called, Princess Mary
During the two decades from 1870 to 1890 both the cattle men and the
During the whole of that entr'acte Kuragin stood with Dolokhov in
During the whole of that period Napoleon, who seems to us to have
During the whole of their march from Moscow no fresh orders had been
During the whole time of his convalescence in Orel Pierre had
During the whole time of his service Dron had never been drunk or ill,
During the whole week she spent in this way, that feeling grew every
During the winter Prince Andrew had come to Bald Hills and had
During this act every time Natasha looked toward the stalls she
During this halt the escort treated the prisoners even worse than
Duroc said that Napoleon would receive the Russian general before
Dusk had fallen, and the roar of guns died away. Pierre lay
Dusting powders and poultice dressings are best avoided in the treatment
Dusting the part with boracic acid powder not only keeps it dry, but
Dutch--still distinct enough to give a decided cast to the life and
Dwarfing of stature from interference with growth at the epiphysial
E. Channing, _History of the United States_, Vol. III.
E. Charming, _History of the United States_, Vols. I and II.
E. Engle, _Southern Sidelights_ (Sympathetic account of the Old South).
E.G. Dexter, _History of Education in the United States_.
E.G. Murphy, _Problems of the Present South_.
E.L. Bogart, _Economic History of the United States_.
E.L. Bogart, _Economic History of the United States_.
E.S. Meany, _History of the State of Washington_.
E.W. Bryce, _Progress of Invention in the Nineteenth Century_.
ELSON, H.W. _History of the United States of America_
Each dog knew its master and its call. Each man in the hunt knew his
Each time the fly touched his face it gave him a burning sensation and
Each visitor performed the ceremony of greeting this old aunt whom
Early in the morning of the sixth of October Pierre went out of
Early in the morning of the twelfth of June he came out of his tent,
Early in the year 1806 Nicholas Rostov returned home on leave.
East and South. In the region of arable and watered lands the typical
East and West was reached with the opening of the Erie Canal in 1825,
East and the Old World. To the northwest over against Iowa and to the
East, came to his rescue and in 1893 swept the troublesome sections of
East." It was the forest ranger who discovered the water power later
Eastern coast towns. Salt, iron, guns, powder, and the absolute
Edmund Burke, who quickly saw that attempts to restrain the rise of
Edward Stanwood, _A History of the Presidency_, Vol. I, for the
Efim, the old coachman, who was the only one the countess trusted to
Eh? I'll teach you to dress the men in fancy coats for a parade....
Either to assume (1) that the will of the people is always
Either variety may result from pathological causes, but in the majority
Ekonomov had stopped beside a bridge, letting the retreating companies
Elder, Dron, whom the old prince called by the diminutive "Dronushka."
Elisaveta, all our hearts you ravish quite..." The Emperor passed on
Embedded bodies may remain in the tissues for an indefinite period
Emerson Hough, _The Story of the Cowboy_.
Emperor Alexander's visit to Potsdam, and of how the two august
Emperor about that, and secondly, if the Russian nobility had that
Emperor and the whole army, especially while the smoke hung over the
Emperor honored by his presence. Kutuzov had received the Order of St.
Emperor looked smilingly down the room. A minute passed but no one had
Emperor or Kutuzov was. Some said the report that the Emperor was
Emperor rode through the streets to comfort the inhabitants, and,
Emperor said. From what he did hear he understood that the Emperor
Emperor to crush the contemptible detachment that stood before him.
Emperor to make him a German. The men of that party, remembering
Emperor to the people, and of his coming himself from the army to
Emperor's aide-de-camp, received Bolkonski and informed him that the
Emperor's attention to the devotion of the Poles to his person, the
Emperor's commands on the field of Austerlitz seven years before
Emperor's eyes to complete the show of prisoners, could not fail to
Emperor's eyes. The aide-de-camp replied that probably the Emperor
Emperor's headquarters. But on the afternoon of that day, this
Emperor's visit--a sense of the necessity of undertaking something and
Emperor) the following letter:
Emperor, an exception made, and Boris transferred into the regiment of
Emperor, but most of the gentry were strolling about the room.
Emperor, but to apply to the commander of the corps.... But in
Emperor, kings, and dukes--whose capture would have been in the
Emperor, who was spoken of as the "angel incarnate."
Emperors and had brought from there these connections with the
Emperors met. He saw the raft, decorated with monograms, saw
Emperors. All are struck by the justness of his views, but no one
Empewah? Ah we to take Smolensk as our patte'n? If the noble
Empire_. He had at first opposed the government; but, on being given a
Empires. The German language press, without exception it seems, the
Empress' Field where a parade does not begin till all the troops are
Empress' Field, not understanding the significance of the firing,
Encouraging results have also been obtained by the application of carbon
End of the Project Gutenberg EBook of History of the United States
End of the Project Gutenberg EBook of Manual of Surgery, by 
England alone. Not until the eve of the Revolution did other
England and France would have doubtless declared the Confederacy to be
England and Germany. The storm now broke in all its pitiless fury.
England and Prussia, on the one side, and France, Austria, Spain, and
England in spite of the law. Royal officers sometimes protested against
England or America, who, in the regular legal course, was aggrieved by
England said to her American colonies: 'You shall not trade with the
England to the Southern colonies, where they were traded for tobacco,
England was alarmed by the influx of foreigners into her overseas
England withdrew altogether, leaving to Germany all the islands except
England, France, and Italy. Labor was given representation on the
England, ran an extraordinary career and threatened to break the
England, urged the Senate to ratify the treaty. The weight of his
England, were shared by many men in his party. Very soon after the close
England. Genet therefore attempted to use the American ports as the base
England. In 1622 Opecacano, a brother of Powhatan, the friend of the
England. Nevertheless, the prompt payment by the British government
England. Private tutoring in the home was common. In still more families
England. The colonists came from every walk of life. They were men,
England. The other, leading toward democracy and self-government, was
England. There were Tories, however, in the colonies as in England--many
English Club were also sons of the Fatherland ready to sacrifice
English and the French occurred before their advancing frontiers met on
English creditors in return for goods and in payment of the interest and
English goods or they did not. In the spirit of the toast--"May Britain
English government, ever furious and irrepressible, was increased in the
English landlord on his estates more than he did the colonial farmer who
English markets, here was the germ of economic independence.
English merchants and manufacturers, Parliament sought to protect the
English park. Prince Andrew rode up to the hothouse; some of the glass
English version of the Bible remains the noblest example of the English
English, Irish, and Scotch-Irish descent came as usual from the Eastern
Englishman is self-assured, as being a citizen of the best-organized
Enlargement of the cervical glands from secondary cancer may simulate
Enlargement of the neighbouring lymph glands does not necessarily imply
Entering the house, Prince Andrew saw Nesvitski and another adjutant
Epithelial cells have the power of living for some time after being
Erb-Duchenne type. The injury is usually unilateral, it occurs with
Ermolov ought to be appointed chief of the artillery, Kutuzov replied:
Ermolov to deal with. A young officer of the Horse Guards, Kutuzov's
Ermolov was nowhere to be found and no one knew where he was. The
Ermolov, Miloradovich, Platov, and others in proximity to the French
Esaul Lovayski the Third was a tall man as straight as an arrow,
Established Church," says Lodge, "was one of the appendages of the
Eugene V. Debs in the Pullman strike of 1894.
Europe blockaded from Brest to the mouth of the Elbe River. Napoleon
Europe delivered from bondage glorify the name of Russia!"
Europe for converts, never failed to stress the economic advantages of
Europe looked to America as the great exemplar of their ideals. Events
Europe to intervene in order to get this essential staple. The crisis
Europe to strengthen the wavering ranks of trade unionists in war-worn
Europe!" they all understood that the war was not ended.
Europe. He had, however, a touch of the theatrical in his nature and
European affairs, into which we had been drawn by the Peace of Tilsit.
European goods could be brought to America save in the ships of the
European trade was built upon it. The better quality of the fish caught
Europeans, the democratic experiment in America was either a menace or
Even Pitt, Lord Chatham, was prepared to support the government in
Even a tax on incomes and gains by the year, the first in the history of
Even after the patient has come under professional care the risks of his
Even at a distance from the actual necrosis there is formation of new
Even at the end of the nineteenth century, after agriculture was well
Even before he gave that order the thing he did not desire, and
Even before the coming of steam and machinery, in the "good old days" of
Even in the best, most friendly and simplest relations of life,
Even philanthropy did not have the desired effect. The genuine as
Even the Civil Service Act of 1883, wrung from a reluctant Congress two
Even the farmers who furnished raw materials, like wool, flax, and hemp,
Even the wages she earned, if she worked for some one else, belonged to
Even when Connecticut was chartered, the parchment and sealing wax of
Events followed thick and fast. On June 17, the American militia, by
Ever active in their search for new fields as they exhausted the virgin
Every Russian might have predicted it, not by reasoning but by the
Every army is composed of lower grades of the service--the rank
Every day of the fateful August, 1914, was crowded with momentous
Every face, from Denisov's to that of the bugler, showed one common
Every house in Mozhaysk had soldiers quartered in it, and at the
Every inducement was offered to immigrants in the form of cheap land,
Every line of this document was clear and firm. The tariff, it opened,
Every state in the union, except Rhode Island, responded to this call.
Every ten seconds a cannon ball flew compressing the air around,
Everybody laughed a great deal. At the head of the table, where
Everyone again looked toward the door, which creaked as the second
Everyone in the house realized for whose sake Prince Andrew came,
Everyone in the house was dominated by the same feeling that
Everyone moved back, and the Emperor came smiling out of the drawing
Everything had been eaten up and the inhabitants had all fled--if
Everything is done to deprive him of the remains of his reason and
Everything seemed so futile and insignificant in comparison with the
Everything was excellent. With the second course, a gigantic sterlet
Everything was stone-still, like the moon and its light and the
Everything went on of itself. The killed were dragged from the
Everywhere Kutuzov retreated, but the enemy without waiting for
Everywhere he saw the stewards' accounts, according to which the
Everywhere in the grazing country he was a conspicuous and important
Everywhere on the bank, on the dam, and in the pond, there was
Everywhere one heard curses on Bonaparte, "the enemy of mankind."
Evidence of this lies in the fact that three conflicts between the
Evidently just before coming to the dinner he had had his hair and
Evidently the prince understood her, and also understood, as he
Examination with the X-rays shows the characteristic excavations of the
Examining only those expressions of the will of historical persons
Excellency," were decried as aristocratic and some of the more excited
Expecting the enemy from behind and not in front, the French
Experience soon demonstrated, however, that praise was not the ballot.
Exploding at the word intriguer, Nicholas, raising his voice, told
Explorations_, pp. 92-187. Schafer, _A History of the Pacific Northwest_
Exposure of the plantar nerves by an incision behind the medial
Extirpation of the sac is the operation of choice, but, if this is
Extra-genital chancres, _e.g._ sores on the fingers of doctors or
Extremely sensitive to American opinion, but ill informed about it, the
F. Parkman, _California and the Oregon Trail_.
F.E. Chadwick, _The Relations of the United States and Spain_.
F.J. Turner, _Rise of the New West_ (American Nation Series).
F.W. Taussig, _Tariff History of the United States_.
Fabvier, not entering the tent, remained at the entrance talking
Fahrenheit he threw open the bearskin cloak from his broad chest and
Failing in the Senate, advocates of popular election made a rear assault
Failing this, the introduction of saline solution at a temperature of
Fairbank was a good-sized square house of white stone, standing back a little from the road. A double carriage-sweep, with a snow-clad lawn, stretched down in front to two large iron gates which closed the entrance. On the right side was a small wooden thicket, which led into a narrow path between two neat hedges stretching from the road to the kitchen door, and forming the tradesmen's entrance. On the left ran a lane which led to the stables, and was not itself within the grounds at all, being a public, though little used, thoroughfare. Holmes left us standing at the door and walked slowly all round the house, across the front, down the tradesmen's path, and so round by the garden behind into the stable lane. So long was he that Mr. Holder and I went into the dining-room and waited by the fire until he should return. We were sitting there in silence when the door opened and a young lady came in. She was rather above the middle height, slim, with dark hair and eyes, which seemed the darker against the absolute pallor of her skin. I do not think that I have ever seen such deadly paleness in a woman's face. Her lips, too, were bloodless, but her eyes were flushed with crying. As she swept silently into the room she impressed me with a greater sense of grief than the banker had done in the morning, and it was the more striking in her as she was evidently a woman of strong character, with immense capacity for self-restraint. Disregarding my presence, she went straight to her uncle and passed her hand over his head with a sweet womanly caress.
Faith, the sling of the Russian David, shall suddenly smite his head
Falls, New York, in 1848, on the call of Lucretia Mott, Martha Wright,
Faster still the two troykas flew side by side, and faster moved the
Fat is usually to be detected in the urine, even in mild cases.
Father Akinfi, the monk, and he approved of her intention. Under guise
Faulty coalescence of the cutaneous covering of the back occurs most
February 27, 1782, in the House of Commons was carried an address to the
February, 1776, Gadsden, in the provincial convention of South Carolina,
Federal Industrial Relations Committee, appointed by the President,
Federalist judges and promptly fined and imprisoned. Although the
Federalist party after the election of 1816. There were four leading
Federalist policies; it flamed up in the contest between the Democrats
Federalist strength in the Senate where the trial was held. They had
Federalists and Anti-Federalists regarded the new constitution of France
Federalists and Anti-Federalists, the former led by Hamilton, the latter
Federalists in the judiciary and to enlarge the sphere of the national
Federation of Labor, President Wilson assured the trade unionists that
Federation of Labor, like the Knights of Labor before it, was confronted
Federation on the rock of politics, weaken it in its fight for higher
Federation, Samuel Gompers, on each occasion took the floor against
Fedorovich's return to the throne in seven years' time, when
Fedorovna came in and leaned her portly person against the doorpost.
Ferapontov, where he had been in the habit of putting up for the
Ferapontov. The cook began running hither and thither in the passage
Few negroes ever brought cases under the fourteenth amendment to the
Filipino he would not do exactly as the Filipinos are doing; that he
Fillmore, who had taken office two months before on the death of Zachary
Finally, a long-standing lupus, especially on the cheek, may become the
Finally, in cases in which the paralysis is permanent and incurable, the
Finally, the hands are rubbed with dry sterilised gauze.
Finally, the latest episode in Poland still fresh in the captain's
Finally, to the fourth category also a great many Brothers belonged,
Finding himself in the company of Napoleon, whose identity he had
Fingers, toes, or even considerable portions of limbs may in the same
Fires were lighted and the talk became more audible. Captain Tushin,
Firm as the American leaders were in the statement and defense of their
Firmly resolved, after putting his affairs in order in the regiment,
First and foremost among them was the uprush of mills managed by
First the man in the tight trousers sang alone, then she sang,
Fishing-gut and silver wire, as well as the needles, should be boiled
Fiske, pp. 236-249; (2) the great compromise, Fiske, pp. 250-255; (3)
Fistulae also occur between the bladder and vagina (_vesico-vaginal
Five colonies, Maryland, Pennsylvania, New Jersey, and the Carolinas,
Five minutes later Ilyin, splashing through the mud, came running
Five minutes later no one remained in the street. The cook, with her
Five minutes later, Denisov came into the hut, climbed with muddy
Flat bones, such as the skull or ilium, must be trephined and the pus
Fleeing from Moscow the soldiers took with them everything they
Florida, setting on foot a movement for occupation. The Florida swamps
Flourishing his arms in despair the count left the room without
Foka, the butler, was the most ill-tempered person in the house.
Follette of Wisconsin and launched an attack on the Taft measures and
Following Rostopchin's example the others also rose.
Following the superintendent of police and talking loudly the
Following this letter one of the Masonic Brothers whom Pierre
For a century the Department of State had kept an anxious eye upon this
For a long time Natasha listened attentively to the sounds that
For a long time that night Princess Mary sat by the open window of
For a moment he had staggered and nearly fallen, but the brandy brought a tinge of colour into his cheeks, and he sat staring with frightened eyes at his accuser.
For a moment the crowd stood still, but then it made another rush
For a reply to these questions the common sense of mankind turns
For a while the crowd was less dense, but suddenly all heads were
For all the preposterous hat and the vacuous face, there was something noble in the simple faith of our visitor which compelled our respect. She laid her little bundle of papers upon the table and went her way, with a promise to come again whenever she might be summoned.
For answer Holmes clapped the hat upon his head. It came right over the forehead and settled upon the bridge of his nose. "It is a question of cubic capacity," said he; "a man with so large a brain must have something in it."
For answer Holmes pushed back the frill of black lace which fringed the hand that lay upon our visitor's knee. Five little livid spots, the marks of four fingers and a thumb, were printed upon the white wrist.
For extensive ulcers on the limbs, the chest wall, or on other covered
For history, lines exist of the movement of human wills, one end
For purposes of contrast we may indicate the characters of an open sore
For purposes of diagnosis, attention should be paid to the terms in
For reasons known or unknown to us the French began to drown and
For refusing to obey the order, Debs was arrested and imprisoned. With
For several months, Andros gave the Northern colonies a taste of
For several seconds while the young man was taking his place on
For some days the weather had been calm and clear with slight frosts
For some thirty years Bogucharovo had been managed by the village
For ten days the Charleston convention wrangled over the platform and
For the French retreating along the old Smolensk road, the final
For the _irritable ulcer_ the most satisfactory treatment is complete
For the almost unbroken succession of achievements in the West by
For the ancients these questions were solved by a belief in the
For the authority of the Established Church was substituted the
For the first time for many days Natasha wept tears of gratitude and
For the king of France, however, this was more serious business. England
For the last three days Bogucharovo had lain between the two hostile
For the last two days, ever since leaving home, Pierre had been
For the purpose of meeting the issue raised by this state of affairs, it
For the rest, the text has been revised, condensed, and in places
For the solution of the question of free will or inevitability,
For thirty years after the Civil War the leading political parties,
For this purpose she arranged a meeting between the young people at
For three decades the West occupied the interest of the nation. Under
For three weeks the old prince lay stricken by paralysis in the
For us with the standard of good and evil given us by Christ, no
Foreign bodies encapsulated in the peritoneal cavity are specially
Forestry--a recommendation carried out in 1907 when the Forestry Service
Formerly he had feared the end. He had twice experienced that
Forminsk and stopped at the village of Aristovo, preparing
Fort Donelson on the Tennessee River, rallied wavering unionists in
Fortunately for him, Jackson escaped the odium of a disastrous panic
Forty or Fight." The last two slogans were founded on American
Four days before, sentinels of the Preobrazhensk regiment had
Four of the thirteen colonies in America owed their origins to the
Four years before, meeting a German comrade in the stalls of a
Four years later, Kentucky's neighbor to the south, Tennessee, followed
Fourthly and chiefly it was impossible, because never since the
Fourthly, it would have been senseless to wish to take captive the
France and in opposition to what they were pleased to call the
France by a secret treaty signed in 1800. "The scalers of the Alps and
France in the treaty of cession; namely, to grant to the inhabitants of
France on February 6, 1778, was confined mainly to the Middle states,
France to throw her sword into the balance. Three years later,
France under the old treaty of alliance he answered by proclaiming the
France with a battalion, and the French, who had been hating him,
France, Spain, or Portugal. The English law did not actually recognize
France, the balance of power in Europe, the diffusion of the ideas
France. Before the end of the war more than three hundred American
Franklin acquired by the diligent and repeated analysis of the
Franklin of Braddock's campaign, "gave us Americans the first suspicion
Franklin that assured the triumph of American arms in the War of the
Fraser, 60 per cent. of the cases of bone and joint tubercle in children
Frauds in the Post-office Department were uncovered and the offenders
Freedom is the content. Inevitability is the form.
Freedom is the thing examined. Inevitability is what examines.
Freedom not limited by anything is the essence of life, in man's
Freemasonry by not forgiving the penitent.
French Republic. A Massachusetts preacher roundly assailed "the
French adroitness and Italian play-acting! Do you know the tale
French advanced between our two armies; the angle became still more
French and Dutch if the law had been enforced. The duties, however, were
French and Indian conflict, which stretched all the way from Maine to
French and their uniforms and at the streets and houses where the
French army advanced of itself upon the Russians, carried forward by
French army melted away and perished at the same rate from Moscow to
French before Smolensk. A general was sent to survey the position.
French conservatives as playing with fire. "When we think of the false
French convoy officer, who said rapidly: "We must halt here: the
French fleet was thrown into the scale, were the British compelled to
French forestall him at Znaim meant the exposure of his whole army
French from different sides. The old prince did not evince the least
French governess, imbibed from the Russian air she breathed that
French greatcoats, and some with horsecloths over their heads. The
French guns. At the approach of the commander in chief the buzz of
French had not yet occupied that region, and the Russians--the
French in the same tone as those that had been addressed to her, and
French in the streets."
French in very bad language, came out of the drink shop, and, under
French involuntarily, so much so that the only thing left to do seemed
French moved on Petersburg?... In any of these eventualities the flank
French proclamations were circulating in the villages, and that if the
French propaganda and betraying America. "The editors, patrons, and
French side and the Russian, are advanced only because they fit in
French song in a hoarse broken voice, with an arm thrown round the
French strained its strength to the utmost and could not have done
French to outflank the Drissa camp.
French to the Austrian Emperor and smiled.
French troops Washington swept rapidly southward and penned the British
French troops amid the smoke of their campfires, the greater part of
French vengeance, for the French were vigorous in executing the Milan
French went to fight the Austrians?
French, and asked if no French had strayed that way, the elder replied
French, collecting booty, cared only for gold. Not only was the
French, hungry and freezing, surrendered in crowds, and when (as the
French, there would be great hope of saving the army; to let the
French--and even the Frenchmen in the Russian service--could do
French--through the very gate by which he had left it four days
French. However inconvenient the position, it was now necessary to
French. The beginning of this type of legislation was made in 1651 and
French. Wolzogen came to the assistance of his chief, who spoke French
French... He'll show you what law is!" the mob were saying as if
Frenchified Russian, "because I have a detestation for all the French,
Frenchman and, before the latter had time to draw his sword, knocked
Frenchman for the money and went on admiring his own work. The
Frenchman in a Spanish uniform. (This Frenchman and one of the
Frenchman insisted on having the pieces returned that were left over
Frenchman on the shoulder, saying something to him in a friendly
Frenchman who had brought a letter from his wife, the Countess Helene,
Frenchman's smile, pressed the hand held out to him.
Frenchman, Moreau," he said, alluding to the invitation made that year
Frenchman, holding him down by the sleeve in a friendly way to prevent
Frenchman, the tall marauder in the frieze gown was already tearing
Frenchmen were doing something near the pit, with pale faces and
Frenchmen who had just thrown out the drawer of a chest, filled with
Frenchmen who were again doing something by the post, their
Frenchmen, and consequently he was made the buffoon of all the
Frenchmen, with the politeness characteristic of his countrymen,
Friant's division disappeared as the others had done into the
Friedland, which I think the count well remembers, and which was...
Friedland--yet the terrible stroke of his arm had supernaturally
Friends and relations advised Nicholas to decline the inheritance.
Friends of the colored man insisted that his civil liberties would not
Friends, the, 5
Frightened by uprising, the English government drew back and repealed
From France came the Huguenots fleeing from the decree of the king which
From Gorki, Bennigsen descended the highroad to the bridge which,
From Moscow to Vyazma the French army of seventy-three thousand
From Orsha they fled farther along the road to Vilna, still
From Prince Shcherbatov's house the prisoners were led straight down
From Smolensk the troops continued to retreat, followed by the
From Vyazma onwards the French army, which had till then moved in
From a favorable point of vantage on Lake Michigan, the village of
From above on the left, bisecting that amphitheater, wound the
From all sides were heard the footsteps and talk of the infantry,
From all the windows of the streets through which he rode, rugs,
From among all these parties, just at the time Prince Andrew reached
From an unfinished house on the Varvarka, the ground floor of
From behind, where Karataev had been sitting, came the sound of a
From beyond the town firing had been heard since early morning. At
From broken remarks about Natasha and his father, from the emotion
From early morning the smart clean troops were on the move,
From one open shop came the sound of blows and vituperation, and
From outside came the occasional cry of a night-bird, and once at our very window a long drawn catlike whine, which told us that the cheetah was indeed at liberty. Far away we could hear the deep tones of the parish clock, which boomed out every quarter of an hour. How long they seemed, those quarters! Twelve struck, and one and two and three, and still we sat waiting silently for whatever might befall.
From that day Prince Andrew began to frequent the Rostovs' as
From that time till the end of the destruction of Moscow no one of
From that time, during all the rest of the Rostovs' journey, at
From the Shevardino Redoubt where Napoleon was standing the
From the anteroom Berg ran with smooth though impatient steps into
From the back porch came the sound of feet descending the steps, the
From the battlefield adjutants he had sent out, and orderlies from
From the close of the year 1811 intensified arming and concentrating
From the commander of the militia he drove to the governor. The
From the day his wife arrived in Moscow Pierre had been intending to
From the day when Pierre, after leaving the Rostovs' with
From the deafening sounds of his own guns around him, the whistle
From the direction of Olmutz in front of them, a group was seen
From the expression of his animated face the woman saw that this man
From the fact of its healing in the centre while it spreads at the
From the fleches they rode still farther to the left, along a road
From the habit of fifty years all this had a physically agitating
From the hall of the nobility the Emperor went to that of the
From the men enrolled were drawn by lot those destined to active
From the moment Pierre had recognized the appearance of the
From the moment Pierre had witnessed those terrible murders
From the moment she had been told that of Prince Andrew's wound
From the moment they were alone and Natasha came up to him with
From the nature of the disease, _treatment_ is for the most part
From the officer down to the lowest soldier they showed what
From the point of view of the British empire, the results of the war
From the point of view of the surgeon the most important varieties of
From the regimental commander's, Denisov rode straight to the
From the room in which Nicholas was sleeping came the sound of his
From the standpoint from which the science of history now regards
From the time he received this news to the end of the campaign all
From the time of his marriage Sonya had lived in his house. Before
From the time that Pierre began life as a family man on a footing
From the time the first person said and proved that the number of
From the time the law of Copernicus was discovered and proved, the
From the twenty-eighth till the thirty-first all Moscow was in a
From the very day Pierre had experienced this feeling for the
From the way the regimental commander saluted the commander in chief
From their point of vantage on the frontier, the pioneers pressed on
From this fundamental difference between the view held by history
From this point of origin the inflammation may spread all over the face
From thrilling stories of adventure along the underground railways came
Frowning with vexation at the effort necessary to divest himself
Fulton had made his famous trip on the Hudson. It took twenty men to
Further changes may take place, and result in the transformation of the
Further international complications were created in connection with the
Further, bacteria may gain access to devitalised tissues by way of the
Further, the pressure of a tourniquet has been shown to be a material
Further, the virulence of an organism is modified by the condition of
Furthermore it was stipulated that the rents paid by water users should
Future of the Negro_.
G.E. Howard, _Preliminaries of the Revolution_ (American Nation Series).
G.H. Montague, _Rise and Progress of the Standard Oil Company_
G.L. Beer, _Origin of the British Colonial System_ and _The Old Colonial
Gadsden, in the Stamp Act Congress, "no New Yorkers known on the
Galyl, luargol, and other preparations act in the same way as the "606"
Ganges, as on the banks of the St. Lawrence, British arms were
Gangrene or mortification is the process by which a portion of tissue
Garfield on the other hand were loyal party men. The former had served
Gazette that was lying on the table. 'Here it is! You did not write it
Gazing at the high starry sky, at the moon, at the comet, and at the
General Campan will move through the wood to seize the first
General Lee, on April 9, 1865, seeing the futility of further conflict,
General Merritt and Admiral Dewey carried Manila by storm. The war was
General Pershing, "a division of the first corps reached a point on the
General Scott, whom the Whigs, hoping to win by rousing the martial
General Sorbier must be ready at the first order to advance with all
General Taylor might have delivered the fatal thrust from northern
General Vasili Dmitrich Denisov was staying with the Rostovs this
General," he added, and rode into the yard past Prince Andrew and
General; you shall receive my letter to the Emperor."
Gentleman of the Bedchamber. The diplomatic career now lies open
George III, William Pitt was turned out of office, the king treating him
George of the First Class and the Emperor showed him the highest
George was to give "the rebels," as he called them, a taste of strong
George's navy, the British warship _Leopard_ opened fire, killing three
George. That section of the Declaration has passed into "ancient"
Georgia were to be found in the fields, kitchens, and workshops, men,
Georgia--the Adamses, Ellsworth, the Morrises, the Livingstons,
Gerasim and the porter let Makar Alexeevich go, and in the now
Gerasim and the porter, who had followed Makar Alexeevich, stopped
Gerasim gazed at the officer with an alarmed and inquiring look.
Gerasim looked cautiously into the study several times and saw
Gerasim opened one of the shutters and left the room on tiptoe.
German accent, "for the reasson zat ze Emperor knows zat. He
German ambassador to the White House and informed him in very precise
German emperor, seizing as a pretext a quarrel between his consul in the
German peasants, even if they had been tenants in the Old World, did not
German princes serving with the Russian army were discussing the siege
German princes were frightened at the loss of so many subjects and
German tradition of his family. He resented the imputation that he was a
German where the Emperor was. One could see that he wished to pass
German) patiently awaited the end of the service, which he
German, Pahlen, has been sent to New York in America, to fetch the
German--I congratulate him! I can't make out what the commander at
German." He sat down facing Pierre. "By the way, you know German,
Germans and the English. The spheres of authority being vague and open
Germans invaded the little duchy of Luxemburg and notified the King of
Germans made up the bulk of the colonial population, there were other
Germans who, after prolonged protests, signed on the last day of grace,
Germany and partly in the Covenant of the League of Nations. Exception
Germany and plotted an invasion of France to overthrow the new system of
Germany as the grizzly terror" that "frightened England into America's
Germany was reduced by the cession of Alsace-Lorraine to France and the
Germany, both mindful of the course of the sea power in history. The
Gervinus, refuting this opinion of the specialist historian, tries
Get along with you!' So he writes the famous order of the day to
Giemsa's method, and its recognition is greatly aided by the use of the
Gillies believes that tension of the graft favours its taking. These
Gillies has especially developed this method in the remedying of
Glancing indolently and indifferently at all the prisoners, he ordered
Glanders is due to the action of a specific bacterium, the _bacillus
Glinka, the editor of the Russian Messenger, who was recognized
Gobelin tapestries and Persian carpets in the house. When Natasha
God willing, are going to die in the regiment, we prize the honor of
God! The same faces, the same talk, Papa holding his cup and blowing
God!" And without noticing that he was singing, to strengthen the si
God!"--voices among the officers were heard saying.
God's name!" said Efim, putting on his hat. "Start!" The postilion
God, in the sight of nations, and adopt this atrocious policy? Sooner
God. What is sin, the conception of which arises from the
Going along the corridor, the assistant led Rostov to the
Going out into the yard she paused to consider where she should go
Golitsyn and he has refused. Be the kindhearted man you always
Gompers, while refusing to commit the Federation to Democratic politics,
Got up at eight, read the Scriptures, then went to my duties. [By
Gout, Malum Senile, Traumatic or Mechanical Arthritis_).--Under the term
Gouverneur Morris had vigorously condemned it and proposed that the
Government is not a gift. Free government is not to be given by all the
Governor Spotswood was called the "Tubal Cain" of the Old Dominion
Governor Wilson, to make a "progressive appeal" to the voters. It
Grabern could be seen, and in three places to left and right the
Grafts of _mucous membrane_ are used to cover defects in the lip, cheek,
Grand Duke when the latter made a tour of the regiments and was
Grand! Look at the smoke, the smoke!" exclaimed the artillerymen,
Granges, that the railways extorted the highest possible rates for
Grant's administrations, when the natives became engaged in a
Great Britain and France. To them the invasion of the little kingdom of
Great Britain or to other colonies the trials of officers or other
Great Lakes and the Pennsylvania chain linking Philadelphia with the
Great events followed in swift succession. On July 14, 1789, the
Great's wars, and all he came across in the history of more recent
Greek had met Greek. The convention was hopelessly deadlocked and on the
Greeley, though indorsed by the Democrats, was utterly routed and died
Green, _Short History of England_, on their policies, using the index.
Grekov off, returned, shivering from the freshness of the early dawn
Grekov returned, Count Orlov-Denisov, excited both by the abandoned
Gridneva), and as the Russian commanders did not wish, or were not
Group._--The _prophylaxis_ of these ulcers consists in excluding
Guard, stationed round it, might not be deprived of the pleasure of
Guards, renounced the throne and went into exile. Then the skillful
Guards. The Rostovs supposed that The Russian Guards, Abroad, was
Guided by some gift of insight, on taking up the management of the
Gummatous disease in glands is extremely rare; the affected gland
Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation, the owner of the Project
Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation, the owner of the Project
Gutenberg file.  Please do not remove it.  Do not change or edit the
Gutenberg file.  Please do not remove it.  Do not change or edit the
Gutenberg"), you agree to comply with all the terms of the Full Project
Gutenberg"), you agree to comply with all the terms of the Full Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic work and you do not agree to be bound by the
Gutenberg-tm electronic work and you do not agree to be bound by the
Gutenberg-tm electronic works if you follow the terms of this agreement
Gutenberg-tm electronic works if you follow the terms of this agreement
Gutenberg-tm electronic works.  Nearly all the individual works in the
Gutenberg-tm electronic works.  Nearly all the individual works in the
Gutenberg-tm work.  The Foundation makes no representations concerning
Gutenberg-tm work.  The Foundation makes no representations concerning
Guthrie and Oklahoma City. In ten days wooden houses rose on the plains.
H. Adams, _History of the United States, 1800-1817_ (9 vols.).
H.A. Herbert, _Why the Solid South_.
H.H. Bancroft is the author of many works on the West but his writings
HART, A.B. _Formation of the Union_
HISTORY OF THE UNITED STATES
Had Napoleon not ridden out on the evening of the twenty-fourth to
Had Napoleon not taken offense at the demand that he should withdraw
Had Van Buren been a captivating figure he might have lived down the
Had the Cossacks pursued the French, without heeding what was behind
Had the enactment of the scenes been confined to the high seas and
Had this man been endowed with the slightest capacity for perceiving
Haemorrhage from bone, for example the skull, may be arrested by means of
Haemorrhage is known as arterial, venous, or capillary, according to the
Haemorrhage is seldom a prominent feature, as the crushing or tearing of
Hague in 1907, the representatives of the United States proposed a plan
Hair-covered parts should be shaved and the surrounding skin painted
Haiti, where the disease had been endemic from time immemorial (Bloch).
Half an hour later he was driving with his fast horses across the
Half an hour later the squadron was lined up on the road. The
Half an hour later there appeared among the other mummers in the
Half an hour later, the Rhetor returned to inform the seeker of
Hamilton had never foreseen. Moreover it helped to expand far into the
Hamilton led the way, but he had not gone far before he encountered
Hamilton presented his cause in his state papers and despite the
Hamilton were thoroughly alarmed. Hearing of the extremity to which the
Hamilton, Franklin, Washington, Madison, Marshall, Henry, the Randolphs,
Hamilton, Madison, and Jay took up their pens in defense of the
Hamilton. The latter believed in a strong, active, "high-toned"
Hampshire, and a major in the local militia when duty summoned him to
Hampshire, the governor had to be worth five hundred pounds, one-half in
Hampshire, where property, not religious faith, was the test for the
Hampshire, where the sentiment was at first strong enough to defeat the
Handley argues against the embolic origin of the metastases in the bones
Handley has devised a method of treatment--_lymphangioplasty_--the
Hardly had Rostov handed him the letter and finished explaining
Hardly had he passed an angle of the wood before a stout gentleman
Harrison's successor, Cleveland, it was well known, had doubts about the
Harrison's successor, John Tyler, the Vice President, whom the Whigs had
Harrison. The Indians stood in the way of the advancing frontier, and it
Hart, the owner of the Project Gutenberg-tm trademark.  Contact the
Hart, the owner of the Project Gutenberg-tm trademark.  Contact the
Have we not witnessed it on this floor, sir? Who ever knew the tariff
Having abandoned the conception of the ancients as to the divine
Having baited the horses twice on the way, he arrived at the town
Having by a great effort got away to the left from that flood of
Having cleared the way Denisov stopped at the end of the bridge.
Having crossed over, by a forced march, to the Tula road beyond the
Having descended the hill the general after whom Pierre was
Having disposed of the tariff, Congress took up the old and vexatious
Having embarked upon the policy of restriction in 1882, Congress readily
Having entered his study Pierre closed the door and addressed
Having entered the courtyard of a large house where the Lodge had
Having finished his tale about the enchanting Polish lady, the
Having found what she was looking for in the reticule she handed
Having galloped safely through the French, he reached a field behind
Having glanced through the dispatch he laid it on the table and
Having gone a couple of miles along the Mozhaysk road, Pierre sat
Having gone round the corner of the hothouse to the ornamental garden,
Having growing industries and wool to sell it benefited from the
Having inspected the country opposite the Shevardino Redoubt,
Having interrupted one another they both stopped to let the other
Having left Lestrade at his rooms, we drove to our hotel, where we found lunch upon the table. Holmes was silent and buried in thought with a pained expression upon his face, as one who finds himself in a perplexing position.
Having left Petersburg on the seventh of December with his suite-
Having left that soldier who was evidently drunk, Rostov stopped the
Having once more entered into the definite conditions of this
Having passed the Guards and traversed an empty space, Rostov, to
Having prepared everything necessary for the party, the Bergs were
Having reached the Patriarch's Ponds Pierre found the Bazdeevs'
Having reached the knoll, Pierre sat down at one end of a trench
Having reached the left flank, instead of going to the front where
Having read thus far, Princess Mary sighed and glanced into the
Having received this information, the little princess and Mademoiselle
Having received this order the general passed by Pierre on his way
Having released Mavrushka, Natasha crossed the dancing hall and went
Having restored the condition of time under which all events
Having returned to the regiment and told the commander the state
Having returned to the watchman's hut, Petya found Denisov in the
Having ridden beyond the village, continually meeting and overtaking
Having ridden in the smoke past the Sixth Corps, behind the
Having ridden round the whole line from right flank to left,
Having ridden up the road, on both sides of which French talk
Having rolled like a ball in the direction of the impetus given by
Having said this she went up to the doctor.
Having set off in the small hours of the fourteenth, accompanied
Having skillfully drawn a platform to unite the North in opposition to
Having talked for a little while in the general circle, Speranski
Having thanked Anna Pavlovna for her charming soiree, the guests
Having thus summarily swept away the grounds of allegiance to the old
Having understood this Princess Mary sobbed still louder, and the
Having unwound the string that tied the band on one leg, he
Having uttered these words in an agitated voice the Emperor suddenly
Having written this and given the paper to Alpatych, he told him how
Hawaiian Islands should be controlled by the United States and no
Hawaiian Islands, China, and Japan. Two years before the adjustment of
Hay, "the rest of the world paused and finally came over to our ground;
Hayes, was actually the victor in 1876 or not. His Democratic opponent,
Hayne, Calhoun, and Jefferson Davis. In seceding, the Southern states
He accompanied them on foot as far as the bridge that could not be
He alone did not obey the law of immutability in the enchanted,
He and the other prisoners were taken to the right side of the
He attended party caucuses and conventions, ran for the state
He became still more absorbed in his task when the Russian general
He began pacing the room. The screaming ceased, and a few more
He broke the seal and glanced over the contents.
He called the Cossack with his horse, told him to put away the
He called the most important generals to him.
He came to the point at once, treating her ceremoniously.
He cannot endure the notion that Buonaparte is negotiating on equal
He cautiously released the shoulder she leaned on, looked into her
He checked himself in the middle of the sentence, lowered his eyes
He continued to pace the room, looking gloomily at Denisov and the
He could distinctly see the distraught yet angry expression on the
He could not finish, and ran out of the room.
He could not look calmly at the standards of the passing battalions.
He could not reconcile the charming impression he had of Natasha,
He could not rejoin the army where he would have been made colonel
He could not tell them what we say now: "Why fight, why block the
He descended the knoll and began walking up and down before it.
He determined to unite the Northern colonies and introduce a more
He did not drive into the town, but put up at an inn in the
He did not find Prince Andrew in Olmutz that day, but the appearance
He did not find the civil servant or his wife where he had left
He did not finish speaking. At one and the same moment came the
He did not finish. Just then there was a whistle in the air;
He did not know that the brick buildings, built to plan, were being
He did not repeat to himself with a sickening feeling of shame the
He did not say another word to Petya but rode in silence all the
He did not see and did not hear how they shot the prisoners who
He disappeared into his bedroom and returned in a few minutes in the character of an amiable and simple-minded Nonconformist clergyman. His broad black hat, his baggy trousers, his white tie, his sympathetic smile, and general look of peering and benevolent curiosity were such as Mr. John Hare alone could have equalled. It was not merely that Holmes changed his costume. His expression, his manner, his very soul seemed to vary with every fresh part that he assumed. The stage lost a fine actor, even as science lost an acute reasoner, when he became a specialist in crime.
He disliked having anything to do with the domestic serfs--the
He divided the Brothers he knew into four categories. In the first
He dreamed that he was lying in the room he really was in, but
He drove to the Karagins' with the firm intention of proposing.
He drove to their house in some agitation. The memory of Natasha was
He entered the dining room. The whole company were standing
He entered the drawing room with his usual alert step, glancing
He explained his wish to be present at the battle and to see the
He felt that the more he valued her the less he loved her. He had
He filled the girls' albums with verses and music, and having at
He flicked the horse with his whip, and we dashed away through the endless succession of sombre and deserted streets, which widened gradually, until we were flying across a broad balustraded bridge, with the murky river flowing sluggishly beneath us. Beyond lay another dull wilderness of bricks and mortar, its silence broken only by the heavy, regular footfall of the policeman, or the songs and shouts of some belated party of revellers. A dull wrack was drifting slowly across the sky, and a star or two twinkled dimly here and there through the rifts of the clouds. Holmes drove in silence, with his head sunk upon his breast, and the air of a man who is lost in thought, while I sat beside him, curious to learn what this new quest might be which seemed to tax his powers so sorely, and yet afraid to break in upon the current of his thoughts. We had driven several miles, and were beginning to get to the fringe of the belt of suburban villas, when he shook himself, shrugged his shoulders, and lit up his pipe with the air of a man who has satisfied himself that he is acting for the best.
He glanced at his cousin and the young lady visitor; and they were
He got up and went to the window to open it. As soon as he opened
He had all he wanted: the thought of his wife which had been a
He had an officer's sword in his hand. The soldier was pale, his
He had been going about the house all the morning finding fault with
He had hardly shut the door behind him when Holmes rose to put on his overcoat. "There is something in what the fellow says about outdoor work," he remarked, "so I think, Watson, that I must leave you to your papers for a little."
He had hardly spoken before there rushed into the room one of the most lovely young women that I have ever seen in my life. Her violet eyes shining, her lips parted, a pink flush upon her cheeks, all thought of her natural reserve lost in her overpowering excitement and concern.
He had heard that the Rostovs were at Kostroma but the thought of
He had in the highest degree a practical tenacity which Pierre
He had just heard particulars of that morning's sitting of the Council
He had just remembered his recent encounter with the doctor's wife
He had left home only to escape the intricate tangle of life's
He had long been thinking of entering the army and would have done
He had no plan, he was afraid of everything, but the parties
He had no time to realize who these men were. He saw the senior
He had none, but looked so unhappily and greedily at the others
He had not decided what it should mean when he heard the voice of
He had not finished the last verse before the young people began
He had received and given the orders for next day's battle and had
He had risen from his chair and was standing between the parted blinds gazing down into the dull neutral-tinted London street. Looking over his shoulder, I saw that on the pavement opposite there stood a large woman with a heavy fur boa round her neck, and a large curling red feather in a broad-brimmed hat which was tilted in a coquettish Duchess of Devonshire fashion over her ear. From under this great panoply she peeped up in a nervous, hesitating fashion at our windows, while her body oscillated backward and forward, and her fingers fidgeted with her glove buttons. Suddenly, with a plunge, as of the swimmer who leaves the bank, she hurried across the road, and we heard the sharp clang of the bell.
He had seen his comrades in arms starving and freezing because the
He had served in the first Congress as a friend of Hamilton's measures.
He had the letter taken from his pocket and the table--on which
He half rose, meaning to go round, but the aunt handed him the
He handed the horses over to the soldier who was stirring the pot
He heard the sound of a scuffle and Sonya's disapproving voice:
He held out his snuffbox of old gold, with a great amethyst in the centre of the lid. Its splendour was in such contrast to his homely ways and simple life that I could not help commenting upon it.
He held up a piece of white cardboard about the size of a sheet of note-paper. It read in this fashion:
He hired the first cab he met and told the driver to go to the
He imagined that the war with Russia came about by his will, and the
He is needed for the place that awaits him, and so almost apart from
He is pushed into a meeting of the legislature. In alarm he wishes
He jumped up at the sound of her light step.
He kept looking to either side of the road for familiar faces, but
He knew no more than the others what his words meant. During his
He lay down on the sofa meaning to fall asleep and forget all that
He leaned his elbows on the table with his pen in his hand and,
He left in order not to obstruct the commander in chief's
He left the room and went to the waiting room where Alpatych stood
He listened and heard the sound of approaching horses, and voices
He looked around, and in the direct, respectful, wondering gaze
He looked at her and was struck by the serious impassioned
He looked at the row of birches shining in the sunshine, with
He looked compassionately at Balashev, and as soon as the latter
He looked up at the sky. And the sky was a fairy realm like the
He looked with disdain at the endless confused mass of
He may, however, regain some power of flexing the forearm when it is
He might... not only might but should, have gone up to the
He moved as if to rise. The generals bowed and retired. It was
He not merely did nothing of the kind, but on the contrary he used
He noticed that they had not come to the front entrance but to the
He opened his eyes and looked up. The black canopy of night hung
He passed four days in the coach house near the Crimean bridge and
He passed into the next room, and the deep, querulous sounds of
He patted her on the shoulder and himself closed the door after her.
He paused and then suddenly seeing the pistol on the table seized it
He paused at the sight of Pierre. His face quivered and
He paused, his gaze still on Pierre, and moved aside on the sofa
He picked it up and gazed at it in the peculiar introspective fashion which was characteristic of him. "It is perhaps less suggestive than it might have been," he remarked, "and yet there are a few inferences which are very distinct, and a few others which represent at least a strong balance of probability. That the man was highly intellectual is of course obvious upon the face of it, and also that he was fairly well-to-do within the last three years, although he has now fallen upon evil days. He had foresight, but has less now than formerly, pointing to a moral retrogression, which, when taken with the decline of his fortunes, seems to indicate some evil influence, probably drink, at work upon him. This may account also for the obvious fact that his wife has ceased to love him."
He picked out from his bundle a copy of the local Herefordshire paper, and having turned down the sheet he pointed out the paragraph in which the unfortunate young man had given his own statement of what had occurred. I settled myself down in the corner of the carriage and read it very carefully. It ran in this way:
He pointed to the French guns, the limbers of which were being
He pressed her hand and released it, and she went back to the candle
He pulled off the quilt and shook it. The purse was not there.
He put the letter under the candlestick and closed his eyes. And
He quickly entered the small reception room with its
He remembered his honeymoon and blushed at the recollection.
He said a few words to Prince Andrew and Chernyshev about the
He said this because on his journey from Petersburg he had had the
He sat awhile in the hut joyfully recalling the details of his
He saw on the one hand that the military business in which he had
He saw the whips in their red caps galloping along the edge of the
He scattered the burning tobacco, smashed the pipe, and threw it
He seized his son by the hand with small bony fingers, shook it,
He shaved and scented himself with the care and elegance which had
He snatched it from her in his eagerness, and smoothing it out upon the table he drew over the lamp and examined it intently. I had left my chair and was gazing at it over his shoulder. The envelope was a very coarse one and was stamped with the Gravesend postmark and with the date of that very day, or rather of the day before, for it was considerably after midnight.
He sometimes noticed with dissatisfaction that he repeated the
He still had all the letters in his hand. Opening them
He stood at the back, and, though he had heard hardly anything,
He stood by the balcony door looking at the crowd.
He stopped in front of the Preobrazhensk regiment, sighed deeply,
He stretched out his hand to take hold of the purse. Rostov let go
He summoned, adjourned, and dissolved the popular assembly, or the lower
He therefore urged arbitration of the dispute, winning the assent of
He thought this, and at the same time remembered that people were
He threw the bottle to the Englishman, who caught it neatly.
He took a potato, drew out his clasp knife, cut the potato into
He took an orange from the cupboard, and tearing it to pieces he squeezed out the pips upon the table. Of these he took five and thrust them into an envelope. On the inside of the flap he wrote "S. H. for J. O." Then he sealed it and addressed it to "Captain James Calhoun, Barque Lone Star, Savannah, Georgia."
He took his seat beside the aide-de-camp on duty and drove into
He took some gold pieces from his trouser pocket and put them on the
He took the dispatch which was addressed to him and began to read it
He took the lighted pipe that was offered to him, gripped it in
He took the packet from the table and handed it to Pierre.
He took the pistol in his hand and began asking about the working of
He touched his horse and having called Miloradovich, the commander
He tried several times to join in the conversation, but his
He turned his head and saw that the adjutant was putting another
He turned round. Nesvitski's handsome face looked out of the
He unbuttoned his coat and sat down on a bench in the porch.
He understood it completely, and, leaving the room without crying,
He unwound the handkerchief and held out his hand. It gave even my hardened nerves a shudder to look at it. There were four protruding fingers and a horrid red, spongy surface where the thumb should have been. It had been hacked or torn right out from the roots.
He waited a moment to see whether the cornet would answer, but he
He walked swiftly round from one to the other, pausing only at the large one which looked from the hall onto the stable lane. This he opened and made a very careful examination of the sill with his powerful magnifying lens. "Now we shall go upstairs," said he at last.
He wanted to see me, and I was standing close by, outside the door. It
He was a large man with rounded shoulders, a massive head, and a broad, intelligent face, sloping down to a pointed beard of grizzled brown. A touch of red in nose and cheeks, with a slight tremor of his extended hand, recalled Holmes' surmise as to his habits. His rusty black frock-coat was buttoned right up in front, with the collar turned up, and his lank wrists protruded from his sleeves without a sign of cuff or shirt. He spoke in a slow staccato fashion, choosing his words with care, and gave the impression generally of a man of learning and letters who had had ill-usage at the hands of fortune.
He was a man of about fifty, tall, portly, and imposing, with a massive, strongly marked face and a commanding figure. He was dressed in a sombre yet rich style, in black frock-coat, shining hat, neat brown gaiters, and well-cut pearl-grey trousers. Yet his actions were in absurd contrast to the dignity of his dress and features, for he was running hard, with occasional little springs, such as a weary man gives who is little accustomed to set any tax upon his legs. As he ran he jerked his hands up and down, waggled his head, and writhed his face into the most extraordinary contortions.
He was as careful of the sowing and reaping of the peasants' hay and
He was being held by the arms and his horse was being led behind him.
He was evidently so busy that he even forgot to be polite to the
He was flushed and bathed in perspiration, though the room was not
He was himself carried away by the tone of magnanimity he intended
He was looking now at the cavalry regiment that had met the convoy
He was none too strong at best and he took a deep cold on the day of his
He was pleased at the gratitude he received, but felt abashed at
He was riding almost along the front line. A handful of men came
He was somewhat flushed with the wine and the drive. His eyes were
He was spared the necessity by a timely revolution. On November 3, 1903,
He was suffering physically. He, the commander in chief, a Serene
He was the bravest and most useful man in the party. No one found
He was the same as ever, but the feverish color of his face, his
He was thus a leader well fitted to gather the forces of opposition
He was told that the prince had gone to the nursery.
He was worried by the impending necessity of interfering in the stupid
He went in silence from one corner of the room to the other and
He went into Virginia in the autumn of 1859, hoping, as he explained,
He went out into the street: two men were running past toward the
He went to his bed, drew a purse from under the clean pillow, and
He went up the stairs, puffing and muttering something. His coachman
He went up to the map and speaking rapidly began proving that no
He would often say the exact opposite of what he had said on a
Healing does not take place until the sequestrum is extruded or removed
Healing occurs by a process of "peri-lymphatic fibrosis," but as the
Health._--Experience shows that the early stages of tuberculous joint
Hearing not so much the words as the angry tone of Rostopchin's
Hearing the yell the officer turned round, and at the same moment
Heave away, boys!..." but despite their united efforts the wattle
Helena). It naturally seemed to members of the English Parliament that
Helene asked to see the portrait of the aunt's husband on the box lid.
Helene had been at Erfurt during the famous meeting of the
Helene returned with Natasha to the drawing room. The Rostovs went
Helene seemed, as it were, hardened by a varnish left by the thousands
Helene smiled, with a look implying that she did not admit the
Helene turned to Pierre with the beautiful bright smile that she
Helene understood that the question was very simple and easy from
Helene's box was filled and surrounded from the stalls by the most
Helene, having returned with the court from Vilna to Petersburg,
Hence the primary haemorrhage following lacerated wounds is seldom
Hendrikhovna should stir the sugar for everyone in turn. Rostov
Henry Clay laid before the Senate a compromise tariff bill providing for
Henry, Thomas Jefferson--emphasizing the peculiar services of each.
Hepburn Railway Act of 1906 enlarged the interstate commerce commission;
Her brother Petya was upstairs too; with the man in attendance on
Her eyes grew dim. By the expression of her father's face, not sad,
Her persevering and patient love seemed completely to surround the
Her sister dropped the portfolio. Anna Mikhaylovna, stooping,
Her stirring tale set forth the worst features of slavery in vivid word
Her voice sounded so serious and so sad that the chirping of the
Her words were incoherent, but they attained the purpose at which
Here is something I have received from the chancellor. I asked him for
Here is the briefest record of our progress (* means estimated):
Here is the briefest record of our progress (* means estimated):
Here is wisdom. Let him that hath understanding count the number
Here!" exclaimed different voices; and the heavy breathing of the
Here, at the extreme left flank, Bennigsen talked a great deal and
Here, too, compromises had to be worked out. Some of the delegates
Highness could so the intentions of the French!"
Highness says he will defend Moscow to the last drop of blood and is
Highness," and pointing to the Grand Duke who with his high
Hildreth says of this provision: "It established the important
Hill down to the present time, the government of the state has presented
Hills. Partly because of the depressing memories associated with
Him to the greatest extent. And it grows, merges, disappears from
Hippolyte gazing round with importance at the others, "without
Hippolyte in the carriage, "your little princess is very nice, very
Hippolyte interrupted her with the words: "Le Roi de Prusse..." and
Hippolyte, of course the women."
His Majesty the Emperor derogates from the principle of our
His Majesty; but we think the present delay is depriving the
His adjutants galloped into the yard before him. Kutuzov was
His capers reminded him of dancing, and looking at the child's round
His comrades, the prisoner soldiers walking beside him, avoided
His conversation with Count Rostopchin and the latter's tone of
His daughter, Princess Helene, passed between the chairs, lightly
His despair was all the greater from feeling that his own weakness
His efforts had not been in vain. The dinner, both the Lenten and
His excellency Prince Andrew himself gave me orders to move all the
His face again resumed its former stiff and cold expression. But the
His face probably looked very terrible, for the officer said something
His intimate friend, James Madison, to whom he turned over the burdens
His life meanwhile continued as before, with the same infatuations
His manner was not effusive. It seldom was; but he was glad, I think, to see me. With hardly a word spoken, but with a kindly eye, he waved me to an armchair, threw across his case of cigars, and indicated a spirit case and a gasogene in the corner. Then he stood before the fire and looked me over in his singular introspective fashion.
His part is not yet ended. The man who ten years before and a year
His passion for the Emperor had cooled somewhat in Moscow. But
His physical strength and agility during the first days of his
His pseudo-orders during the battle were also no worse than
His remarks were suddenly cut short by a loud hubbub which broke out from the stall which we had just left. Turning round we saw a little rat-faced fellow standing in the centre of the circle of yellow light which was thrown by the swinging lamp, while Breckinridge, the salesman, framed in the door of his stall, was shaking his fists fiercely at the cringing figure.
His resolutions were passed by the Kentucky legislature late in 1798,
His response was an instant veto. The battle was on and it raged with
His room was on the first floor. Those in the rooms above were
His satellites--the senior clerk, a countinghouse clerk, a scullery
His servant handed him a half-cut novel, in the form of letters,
His servants too--Terenty and Vaska--in their own way noticed the
His smile was unlike the half-smile of other people. When he smiled,
His temperature rises to 100 o or 101 o F., and the pulse quickens to 100
His troops were the same, his generals the same, the same
His will." With this consoling thought (but yet with a hope for the
Historians of the third class assume that the will of the people
History examines the manifestations of man's free will in connection
History is the life of nations and of humanity. To seize and put
History of the United States_, Chaps. XXI, XXII, and XXIII.
History of the United States_, pp. 240-250.
History proves this at every turn. Is the ferment of the peoples
History, that is, the unconscious, general, hive life of mankind,
Hollabrunn and have pursued ever since to this place. The position
Holland nor the activity of France nor the dexterous and firm sagacity
Holland. The Hohenzollern dreams of empire were shattered. In the
Hollow viscera, like the oesophagus and urinary bladder, in so far
Holmes and I had listened spellbound to this extraordinary story. My friend rose now and paced up and down the room, his hands in his pockets, and an expression of the most profound gravity upon his face.
Holmes and I rushed out and round the angle of the house, with Toller hurrying behind us. There was the huge famished brute, its black muzzle buried in Rucastle's throat, while he writhed and screamed upon the ground. Running up, I blew its brains out, and it fell over with its keen white teeth still meeting in the great creases of his neck. With much labour we separated them and carried him, living but horribly mangled, into the house. We laid him upon the drawing-room sofa, and having dispatched the sobered Toller to bear the news to his wife, I did what I could to relieve his pain. We were all assembled round him when the door opened, and a tall, gaunt woman entered the room.
Holmes chuckled and wriggled in his chair, as was his habit when in high spirits. "It is a little off the beaten track, isn't it?" said he. "And now, Mr. Wilson, off you go at scratch and tell us all about yourself, your household, and the effect which this advertisement had upon your fortunes. You will first make a note, Doctor, of the paper and the date."
Holmes chuckled heartily. "Your conversation is most entertaining," said he. "When you go out close the door, for there is a decided draught."
Holmes grinned at the last item. "Well," he said, "I say now, as I said then, that a man should keep his little brain-attic stocked with all the furniture that he is likely to use, and the rest he can put away in the lumber-room of his library, where he can get it if he wants it. Now, for such a case as the one which has been submitted to us to-night, we need certainly to muster all our resources. Kindly hand me down the letter K of the American Encyclopaedia which stands upon the shelf beside you. Thank you. Now let us consider the situation and see what may be deduced from it. In the first place, we may start with a strong presumption that Colonel Openshaw had some very strong reason for leaving America. Men at his time of life do not change all their habits and exchange willingly the charming climate of Florida for the lonely life of an English provincial town. His extreme love of solitude in England suggests the idea that he was in fear of someone or something, so we may assume as a working hypothesis that it was fear of someone or something which drove him from America. As to what it was he feared, we can only deduce that by considering the formidable letters which were received by himself and his successors. Did you remark the postmarks of those letters?"
Holmes had brought up a long thin cane, and this he placed upon the bed beside him. By it he laid the box of matches and the stump of a candle. Then he turned down the lamp, and we were left in darkness.
Holmes had sat up upon the couch, and I saw him motion like a man who is in need of air. A maid rushed across and threw open the window. At the same instant I saw him raise his hand and at the signal I tossed my rocket into the room with a cry of "Fire!" The word was no sooner out of my mouth than the whole crowd of spectators, well dressed and ill--gentlemen, ostlers, and servant maids--joined in a general shriek of "Fire!" Thick clouds of smoke curled through the room and out at the open window. I caught a glimpse of rushing figures, and a moment later the voice of Holmes from within assuring them that it was a false alarm. Slipping through the shouting crowd I made my way to the corner of the street, and in ten minutes was rejoiced to find my friend's arm in mine, and to get away from the scene of uproar. He walked swiftly and in silence for some few minutes until we had turned down one of the quiet streets which lead towards the Edgeware Road.
Holmes laughed softly to himself and stretched himself out upon the cushioned seat. "Both you and the coroner have been at some pains," said he, "to single out the very strongest points in the young man's favour. Don't you see that you alternately give him credit for having too much imagination and too little? Too little, if he could not invent a cause of quarrel which would give him the sympathy of the jury; too much, if he evolved from his own inner consciousness anything so outre as a dying reference to a rat, and the incident of the vanishing cloth. No, sir, I shall approach this case from the point of view that what this young man says is true, and we shall see whither that hypothesis will lead us. And now here is my pocket Petrarch, and not another word shall I say of this case until we are on the scene of action. We lunch at Swindon, and I see that we shall be there in twenty minutes."
Holmes moved the lamp, and we both bent over the sheet of paper, which showed by its ragged edge that it had indeed been torn from a book. It was headed, "March, 1869," and beneath were the following enigmatical notices:
Holmes nodded his head. "The name is familiar to me," said he.
Holmes rose and sat down at the table with his pen in his hand and a bundle of paper before him. "Just tell us the truth," he said. "I shall jot down the facts. You will sign it, and Watson here can witness it. Then I could produce your confession at the last extremity to save young McCarthy. I promise you that I shall not use it unless it is absolutely needed."
Holmes sat in his big armchair with the weary, heavy-lidded expression which veiled his keen and eager nature, while I sat opposite to him, and we listened in silence to the strange story which our visitor detailed to us.
Holmes shook his clenched hands in the air. "Incredible imbecility!" he cried.
Holmes took a note of it. "One other question," said he. "Was the photograph a cabinet?"
Holmes turned over the leaves of the book upon his knee. "Here it is," said he presently:
Holmes turned to the page indicated. "Here you are, 'Mrs. Oakshott, 117, Brixton Road, egg and poultry supplier.' "
Holmes was for the moment as startled as I. His hand closed like a vice upon my wrist in his agitation. Then he broke into a low laugh and put his lips to my ear.
Horse Guards charged, followed the line of reserves, going far round
Horse Guards, advancing to attack the French cavalry that was coming
Hot-bottles are to be used with the utmost caution. As absolute dryness
House of Commons, changed all that. In the reign of Charles II
House of Representatives composed of men freshly elected in the stirring
House of Representatives in March, 1868, and his acquittal by the Senate
House of Representatives, the larger states were placated, for it was
House respectively. If any bill shall not be returned by the President
How deep was the impression made upon the country by this agitation for
How is it that we women don't want anything of the kind, don't need
How our hydraulic engineer had been conveyed from the garden to the spot where he recovered his senses might have remained forever a mystery were it not for the soft mould, which told us a very plain tale. He had evidently been carried down by two persons, one of whom had remarkably small feet and the other unusually large ones. On the whole, it was most probable that the silent Englishman, being less bold or less murderous than his companion, had assisted the woman to bear the unconscious man out of the way of danger.
How shall I ever forget that dreadful vigil? I could not hear a sound, not even the drawing of a breath, and yet I knew that my companion sat open-eyed, within a few feet of me, in the same state of nervous tension in which I was myself. The shutters cut off the least ray of light, and we waited in absolute darkness.
How was it that the Russian army, which when numerically weaker than
How you look at things! Send two men? And who then would give us the
How, therefore, could the Confederacy hope to sustain itself against
However often experiment and reasoning may show a man that under the
However tempting it might be for the French to blame Rostopchin's
However, I think the regiment is not a bad one, eh?"
However, at nine o'clock the prince, in his velvet coat with a sable
Huguenots combined. All the way down the coast from Massachusetts to
Hull to the British and the failure of the American invasion of Canada
Hume, the philosopher and historian, and Catherine Macaulay, an author
Hunter's canal, and Matas' operation of aneurysmo-arteriorrhaphy. The
Huntington, Putnam, and Sargent, and the list of counties from which
Hutchinson, who first described them. Affecting as they do the
Hydrophobia is an acute infective disease following on the bite of a
I (the liberal attempts at the beginning of his reign, his struggle
I am not a diplomatist. That's why I joined the hussars, thinking that
I am well and strong and still the same and in the same place. No,
I came to this table with the thought of winning a hundred rubles to
I carefully examined the writing, and the paper upon which it was written.
I could not help laughing at the ease with which he explained his process of deduction. "When I hear you give your reasons," I remarked, "the thing always appears to me to be so ridiculously simple that I could easily do it myself, though at each successive instance of your reasoning I am baffled until you explain your process. And yet I believe that my eyes are as good as yours."
I could see by his manner that he had stronger reasons for satisfaction than his words alone would imply. His eyes twinkled, and there was even a touch of colour upon his sallow cheeks. He hastened upstairs, and a few minutes later I heard the slam of the hall door, which told me that he was off once more upon his congenial hunt.
I could see that Holmes was favourably impressed by the manner and speech of his new client. He looked her over in his searching fashion, and then composed himself, with his lids drooping and his finger-tips together, to listen to her story.
I deem it my duty to report to Your Majesty the condition of the
I did not gain very much, however, by my inspection. Our visitor bore every mark of being an average commonplace British tradesman, obese, pompous, and slow. He wore rather baggy grey shepherd's check trousers, a not over-clean black frock-coat, unbuttoned in the front, and a drab waistcoat with a heavy brassy Albert chain, and a square pierced bit of metal dangling down as an ornament. A frayed top-hat and a faded brown overcoat with a wrinkled velvet collar lay upon a chair beside him. Altogether, look as I would, there was nothing remarkable about the man save his blazing red head, and the expression of extreme chagrin and discontent upon his features.
I did not tell you the whole truth. I think there is no sufficient
I did so, and saw a large "E" with a small "g," a "P," and a large "G" with a small "t" woven into the texture of the paper.
I dreamed that I was walking in the dark and was suddenly surrounded
I entered my consulting-room and found a gentleman seated by the table. He was quietly dressed in a suit of heather tweed with a soft cloth cap which he had laid down upon my books. Round one of his hands he had a handkerchief wrapped, which was mottled all over with bloodstains. He was young, not more than five-and-twenty, I should say, with a strong, masculine face; but he was exceedingly pale and gave me the impression of a man who was suffering from some strong agitation, which it took all his strength of mind to control.
I expect the Minister [Barclay de Tolly] has already reported the
I go?" thought she, as she went slowly along the passage.
I going?" he suddenly asked himself when he was already near the green
I had been delayed at a case, and it was a little after half-past six when I found myself in Baker Street once more. As I approached the house I saw a tall man in a Scotch bonnet with a coat which was buttoned up to his chin waiting outside in the bright semicircle which was thrown from the fanlight. Just as I arrived the door was opened, and we were shown up together to Holmes' room.
I had called upon my friend Sherlock Holmes upon the second morning after Christmas, with the intention of wishing him the compliments of the season. He was lounging upon the sofa in a purple dressing-gown, a pipe-rack within his reach upon the right, and a pile of crumpled morning papers, evidently newly studied, near at hand. Beside the couch was a wooden chair, and on the angle of the back hung a very seedy and disreputable hard-felt hat, much the worse for wear, and cracked in several places. A lens and a forceps lying upon the seat of the chair suggested that the hat had been suspended in this manner for the purpose of examination.
I had called upon my friend, Mr. Sherlock Holmes, one day in the autumn of last year and found him in deep conversation with a very stout, florid-faced, elderly gentleman with fiery red hair. With an apology for my intrusion, I was about to withdraw when Holmes pulled me abruptly into the room and closed the door behind me.
I had expected to see Sherlock Holmes impatient under this rambling and inconsequential narrative, but, on the contrary, he had listened with the greatest concentration of attention.
I had forgotten the strange pets which the doctor affected. There was a cheetah, too; perhaps we might find it upon our shoulders at any moment. I confess that I felt easier in my mind when, after following Holmes' example and slipping off my shoes, I found myself inside the bedroom. My companion noiselessly closed the shutters, moved the lamp onto the table, and cast his eyes round the room. All was as we had seen it in the daytime. Then creeping up to me and making a trumpet of his hand, he whispered into my ear again so gently that it was all that I could do to distinguish the words:
I had had so many reasons to believe in my friend's subtle powers of reasoning and extraordinary energy in action that I felt that he must have some solid grounds for the assured and easy demeanour with which he treated the singular mystery which he had been called upon to fathom. Once only had I known him to fail, in the case of the King of Bohemia and of the Irene Adler photograph; but when I looked back to the weird business of the Sign of Four, and the extraordinary circumstances connected with the Study in Scarlet, I felt that it would be a strange tangle indeed which he could not unravel.
I had never seen my friend's face so grim or his brow so dark as it was when we turned from the scene of this investigation. We had walked several times up and down the lawn, neither Miss Stoner nor myself liking to break in upon his thoughts before he roused himself from his reverie.
I had no keener pleasure than in following Holmes in his professional investigations, and in admiring the rapid deductions, as swift as intuitions, and yet always founded on a logical basis with which he unravelled the problems which were submitted to him. I rapidly threw on my clothes and was ready in a few minutes to accompany my friend down to the sitting-room. A lady dressed in black and heavily veiled, who had been sitting in the window, rose as we entered.
I had seen little of Holmes lately. My marriage had drifted us away from each other. My own complete happiness, and the home-centred interests which rise up around the man who first finds himself master of his own establishment, were sufficient to absorb all my attention, while Holmes, who loathed every form of society with his whole Bohemian soul, remained in our lodgings in Baker Street, buried among his old books, and alternating from week to week between cocaine and ambition, the drowsiness of the drug, and the fierce energy of his own keen nature. He was still, as ever, deeply attracted by the study of crime, and occupied his immense faculties and extraordinary powers of observation in following out those clues, and clearing up those mysteries which had been abandoned as hopeless by the official police. From time to time I heard some vague account of his doings: of his summons to Odessa in the case of the Trepoff murder, of his clearing up of the singular tragedy of the Atkinson brothers at Trincomalee, and finally of the mission which he had accomplished so delicately and successfully for the reigning family of Holland. Beyond these signs of his activity, however, which I merely shared with all the readers of the daily press, I knew little of my former friend and companion.
I have five hundred and thirty thousand men this side of the
I have frightened you--sit down and tell me all the news."
I have had a lucky escape this time," he added, pointing to the
I hear the bells of the neighboring church; but because the bells
I held the little printed slip to the light.
I left him then, still puffing at his black clay pipe, with the conviction that when I came again on the next evening I would find that he held in his hands all the clues which would lead up to the identity of the disappearing bridegroom of Miss Mary Sutherland.
I pity, and for their sake I should like to liberate the serfs. You
I placed my revolver, cocked, upon the top of the wooden case behind which I crouched. Holmes shot the slide across the front of his lantern and left us in pitch darkness--such an absolute darkness as I have never before experienced. The smell of hot metal remained to assure us that the light was still there, ready to flash out at a moment's notice. To me, with my nerves worked up to a pitch of expectancy, there was something depressing and subduing in the sudden gloom, and in the cold dank air of the vault.
I regret the misunderstandings that occurred between us and should
I rose to go, but Holmes caught me by the wrist and pushed me back into my chair. "It is both, or none," said he. "You may say before this gentleman anything which you may say to me."
I seated myself in his armchair and warmed my hands before his crackling fire, for a sharp frost had set in, and the windows were thick with the ice crystals. "I suppose," I remarked, "that, homely as it looks, this thing has some deadly story linked on to it--that it is the clue which will guide you in the solution of some mystery and the punishment of some crime."
I shall do my duty. I will come and spend the night. He must not be
I slept at Baker Street that night, and we were engaged upon our toast and coffee in the morning when the King of Bohemia rushed into the room.
I smiled and shook my head. "I can quite understand your thinking so." I said. "Of course, in your position of unofficial adviser and helper to everybody who is absolutely puzzled, throughout three continents, you are brought in contact with all that is strange and bizarre. But here"--I picked up the morning paper from the ground--"let us put it to a practical test. Here is the first heading upon which I come. 'A husband's cruelty to his wife.' There is half a column of print, but I know without reading it that it is all perfectly familiar to me. There is, of course, the other woman, the drink, the push, the blow, the bruise, the sympathetic sister or landlady. The crudest of writers could invent nothing more crude."
I speak bluntly--staining the honor of a soldier?"
I speak! You've disgraced yourself like the lowest of hussies. I'd
I sponged the wound, cleaned it, dressed it, and finally covered it over with cotton wadding and carbolised bandages. He lay back without wincing, though he bit his lip from time to time.
I took a step forward. In an instant his strange headgear began to move, and there reared itself from among his hair the squat diamond-shaped head and puffed neck of a loathsome serpent.
I took it up and glanced at it. "Mr. Victor Hatherley, hydraulic engineer, 16A, Victoria Street (3rd floor)." That was the name, style, and abode of my morning visitor. "I regret that I have kept you waiting," said I, sitting down in my library-chair. "You are fresh from a night journey, I understand, which is in itself a monotonous occupation."
I took out my revolver and laid it on the corner of the table.
I took the matter in hand: I left him alone and began with nurse's
I took the paper from him and read as follows:
I took the tattered object in my hands and turned it over rather ruefully. It was a very ordinary black hat of the usual round shape, hard and much the worse for wear. The lining had been of red silk, but was a good deal discoloured. There was no maker's name; but, as Holmes had remarked, the initials "H. B." were scrawled upon one side. It was pierced in the brim for a hat-securer, but the elastic was missing. For the rest, it was cracked, exceedingly dusty, and spotted in several places, although there seemed to have been some attempt to hide the discoloured patches by smearing them with ink.
I trust that I am not more dense than my neighbours, but I was always oppressed with a sense of my own stupidity in my dealings with Sherlock Holmes. Here I had heard what he had heard, I had seen what he had seen, and yet from his words it was evident that he saw clearly not only what had happened but what was about to happen, while to me the whole business was still confused and grotesque. As I drove home to my house in Kensington I thought over it all, from the extraordinary story of the red-headed copier of the Encyclopaedia down to the visit to Saxe-Coburg Square, and the ominous words with which he had parted from me. What was this nocturnal expedition, and why should I go armed? Where were we going, and what were we to do? I had the hint from Holmes that this smooth-faced pawnbroker's assistant was a formidable man--a man who might play a deep game. I tried to puzzle it out, but gave it up in despair and set the matter aside until night should bring an explanation.
I waited until midnight, but there was no sign of his return, so I retired to my room. It was no uncommon thing for him to be away for days and nights on end when he was hot upon a scent, so that his lateness caused me no surprise. I do not know at what hour he came in, but when I came down to breakfast in the morning there he was with a cup of coffee in one hand and the paper in the other, as fresh and trim as possible.
I walked down the narrow passage between the double row of sleepers, holding my breath to keep out the vile, stupefying fumes of the drug, and looking about for the manager. As I passed the tall man who sat by the brazier I felt a sudden pluck at my skirt, and a low voice whispered, "Walk past me, and then look back at me." The words fell quite distinctly upon my ear. I glanced down. They could only have come from the old man at my side, and yet he sat now as absorbed as ever, very thin, very wrinkled, bent with age, an opium pipe dangling down from between his knees, as though it had dropped in sheer lassitude from his fingers. I took two steps forward and looked back. It took all my self-control to prevent me from breaking out into a cry of astonishment. He had turned his back so that none could see him but I. His form had filled out, his wrinkles were gone, the dull eyes had regained their fire, and there, sitting by the fire and grinning at my surprise, was none other than Sherlock Holmes. He made a slight motion to me to approach him, and instantly, as he turned his face half round to the company once more, subsided into a doddering, loose-lipped senility.
I walked down to the station with them, and then wandered through the streets of the little town, finally returning to the hotel, where I lay upon the sofa and tried to interest myself in a yellow-backed novel. The puny plot of the story was so thin, however, when compared to the deep mystery through which we were groping, and I found my attention wander so continually from the action to the fact, that I at last flung it across the room and gave myself up entirely to a consideration of the events of the day. Supposing that this unhappy young man's story were absolutely true, then what hellish thing, what absolutely unforeseen and extraordinary calamity could have occurred between the time when he parted from his father, and the moment when, drawn back by his screams, he rushed into the glade? It was something terrible and deadly. What could it be? Might not the nature of the injuries reveal something to my medical instincts? I rang the bell and called for the weekly county paper, which contained a verbatim account of the inquest. In the surgeon's deposition it was stated that the posterior third of the left parietal bone and the left half of the occipital bone had been shattered by a heavy blow from a blunt weapon. I marked the spot upon my own head. Clearly such a blow must have been struck from behind. That was to some extent in favour of the accused, as when seen quarrelling he was face to face with his father. Still, it did not go for very much, for the older man might have turned his back before the blow fell. Still, it might be worth while to call Holmes' attention to it. Then there was the peculiar dying reference to a rat. What could that mean? It could not be delirium. A man dying from a sudden blow does not commonly become delirious. No, it was more likely to be an attempt to explain how he met his fate. But what could it indicate? I cudgelled my brains to find some possible explanation. And then the incident of the grey cloth seen by young McCarthy. If that were true the murderer must have dropped some part of his dress, presumably his overcoat, in his flight, and must have had the hardihood to return and to carry it away at the instant when the son was kneeling with his back turned not a dozen paces off. What a tissue of mysteries and improbabilities the whole thing was! I did not wonder at Lestrade's opinion, and yet I had so much faith in Sherlock Holmes' insight that I could not lose hope as long as every fresh fact seemed to strengthen his conviction of young McCarthy's innocence.
I was deemed worthy to partake of the holy and heavenly sacrament at
I will come directly," Pierre replied to the major-domo.
I with my hussars fwom here. And at the signal shot..."
I'll always thwash scoundwels... and I'll tell the Empewo'...
I'll go to the general and ask him." He readjusted himself in the
I'll warrant," said Shinshin, patting him on the shoulder and taking
I'll write to her myself, and we will kill the fatted calf."
I," and he raised his foot to the stirrup.
I." At dinner the prince usually spoke to the taciturn Michael
II.	The Red-Headed League
INCIDENTAL DAMAGES EVEN IF YOU GIVE NOTICE OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH
INCIDENTAL DAMAGES EVEN IF YOU GIVE NOTICE OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH
INDEPENDENCE TO THE COMMITTEE OF CONGRESS]
INFECTIONS THROUGH THE BLOOD-STREAM
IV.	The Boscombe Valley Mystery
IX.	The Adventure of the Engineer's Thumb
IX.  THE ADVENTURE OF THE ENGINEER'S THUMB
Ida Tarbell, _History of the Standard Oil Company_ (Critical).
Idaho, Wyoming, Montana, Utah, Arizona, New Mexico, the Dakotas, and
If British merchants had not discovered it in the ordinary course of
If Douglas fancied that the North would receive the overthrow of the
If I examine an act I performed a moment ago in approximately the
If Jefferson could have lived to see the Stars and Stripes planted on
If a constricting band is applied at this stage, the infection can
If a divided artery is _ligated at its cut end_, the tension of the
If a film of fresh pus is examined under the microscope, the pus cells
If a single phrase be chosen to characterize American life during the
If a soldier, he should be dressed in regulation uniform like the
If an abscess is prevented from healing--for example, by the presence of
If an exact diagnosis is made at an early stage of the disease--and this
If an incision is made, the periosteum is found to be raised from the
If an ulcer forms at the base of a horn, it may prove the starting-point
If any disclaimer or limitation set forth in this agreement violates the
If any disclaimer or limitation set forth in this agreement violates the
If at first the members of the council thought that Kutuzov was
If compression of the common carotid is found to arrest the pulsation,
If earth or street dirt has entered the wound, the surface may with
If he has lost much blood, the limbs should be wrapped in cotton wool
If history dealt only with external phenomena, the establishment
If history had retained the conception of the ancients it would have
If in the descriptions given by historians, especially French
If it found an act unsatisfactory, it recommended to the king the
If it had depended on Napoleon's will to fight or not to fight the
If it is decided to scrape away the granulations, the oozing must be
If it is desired to empty the joint, this is best done by open
If it is not let out by incision, the pus, travelling along the lines of
If leakage occurs into the tissues, the extravasated blood may occlude
If left to itself, the softened tubercle erupts through the capsule of
If men descended from the apes at an unknown period of time, that is
If no complications supervene, the swelling subsides, and recovery may
If operative interference is called for, the cysts may be tapped and
If power be the collective will of the people transferred to their
If severe pain calls for the use of morphin, 1/120th grain of atropin
If the Deity issues a command, expresses His will, as ancient
If the aim of the European wars at the beginning of the nineteenth
If the aim of the Russians consisted in cutting off and capturing
If the attempt to repel the invading organisms is successful, the
If the bacteria gain the upper hand, this process of liquefaction which
If the cause is a local one, it must be removed; if a constitutional
If the commanders had been guided by reason, it would seem that it
If the conception of freedom appears to reason to be a senseless
If the condition is believed to be innocent, the treatment is the same
If the consciousness of freedom were not a separate and
If the constricting band is correctly applied, the parts beyond
If the disease is localised, it may be removed by the knife or sharp
If the disease is not arrested, there follow the symptoms and signs of
If the haemorrhage is from a partly divided vessel, this should be
If the infection becomes generalised--_anthracaemia_--the temperature
If the infection involves all the joint structures--_acute
If the lesion is high up, as it is, for example, in crutch paralysis,
If the ophthalmic branch is not involved, neither it nor the ganglion
If the part is aseptic it shrivels, and presents the ordinary features
If the patient can retain fluids taken by the mouth--such as hot coffee,
If the patient is placed on a couch and the limb elevated, the veins are
If the patient's health is below par, good nourishing food, tonics, and
If the purpose of dinner is to nourish the body, a man who eats
If the purpose of food is nourishment and the purpose of marriage is
If the purpose of history be to give a description of the movement
If the purpose of marriage is the family, the person who wishes to
If the realm of human knowledge were confined to abstract reasoning,
If the source of power lies neither in the physical nor in the moral
If the tissues prevail, there ensues a process of repair. In the
If the tonsils are enlarged they should not be removed at the same time,
If the tuberculous abscess has burst and left a _sinus_, this is apt to
If the will of every man were free, that is, if each man could act
If the wound involves one of the extremities, it may be useful; and it
If the wound is aseptic, the fate of the foreign body varies with its
If there be a single law governing the actions of men, free will
If these precautions have been successful, the wound will heal under the
If they reach just 1-2% of the world's population then the total
If they reach just 1-2% of the world's population then the total
If to any shippers the broad current of the great river sweeping down to
If untreated, the morbid process may implicate the sheath of the sciatic
If warning failed, something more convincing was tried. Fright was the
If we admit that human life can be ruled by reason, the
If we assume as the historians do that great men lead humanity to
If we unite both these kinds of history, as is done by the newest
If you marry expecting anything from yourself in the future, you
If, during the period of reaction, the blood-pressure rises
If, however, at the inauguration of the tuberculous disease the bacilli
If, however, the Emperor of Russia ratifies that convention, I
If, however, the reaction induced by the infection is insufficient to
If, on the other hand, the disease exhibits aggressive tendencies, the
Ignat left off smiling, adjusted his belt, and went out of the
Ilagin indifferently, of the red-spotted bitch Erza, for which, a year
Illinois, and the occasion for the deed was the demand for the
Illinois, had laws authorizing the payment from public funds of definite
Illinois, in a fateful hour, called upon a bewildered people to meet the
Ilya Rostov, laughing and repeating the words, "Make way, dear boy!
Ilya Rostov, who was next to himself the most important guest. The old
Ilyin put a few drops of rum into the bucket of water and brought it
Immediately after greeting the count he went up to Natasha and
Immediately before the operation the skin is again purified in the same
Immediately on leaving the governor's, Nicholas hired post horses
In #acquired syphilis#, at an early stage and before the skin eruptions
In #inherited syphilis# the earliest joint affections are those in which
In #typhoid fever#, joint lesions result from infection with the typhoid
In 1806 Pfuel had been one of those responsible, for the plan of
In 1806 the old prince was made one of the eight commanders in chief
In 1808 the Emperor Alexander went to Erfurt for a fresh interview
In 1809 the intimacy between "the world's two arbiters," as Napoleon
In 1812 and 1813 Kutuzov was openly accused of blundering. The
In 1844 the total immigration into the United States was less than
In 1865 the foundations of the planting system were gone. It was
In 1867, however, there grew up among them an association known as the
In 1874 they captured the House of Representatives and declared war on
In 1910 the House of Representatives went to the Democrats and within
In 1916 a second break in amicable relations occurred. In the spring of
In April the troops were enlivened by news of the Emperor's arrival,
In April, 1782, Franklin received word from the English government that
In Brunn everybody attached to the court was packing up, and the
In February, 1848, the Mexicans came to terms, ceding to the victor
In June the battle of Friedland was fought, in which the
In June, after many balls and fetes given by the Polish magnates, by
In Kudrino, from the Nikitski, Presnya, and Podnovinsk Streets
In March, 1863, Lincoln signed the inevitable draft law; it enrolled in
In March, a permanent constitution of the Confederate states was
In Marya Dmitrievna's anteroom the footman who helped him off with
In Massachusetts, the voter for member of the assembly under the charter
In Massachusetts, the westward movement is recorded in the founding of
In Moscow as soon as he entered his huge house in which the faded
In New York, for example, the most illiterate farmer who had one hundred
In October, 1805, a Russian army was occupying the villages and
In Petersburg he now experienced the same feeling he had had on the
In Petersburg she had enjoyed the special protection of a grandee
In Petersburg, as in Moscow, Pierre found the same atmosphere of
In September, 1796, on the eve of the presidential election, Washington
In September, American troops, with French aid, "wiped out" the German
In _acute arthritis_, all the structures of the joint are involved; the
In _aneurysmal varix_ the higher blood pressure in the artery forces
In _arterial_ haemorrhage the blood is bright red in colour, and escapes
In _burns of the fifth degree_ the lesion extends through the
In _capillary_ haemorrhage, red blood escapes from numerous points on the
In _central sarcoma_ pain is the first symptom, and it is usually
In _concealed chancres_ with phimosis, the sac of the prepuce should be
In _locomotor ataxia_ the fractures affect especially the bones of the
In _lumbago_--_lumbo-sacral fibrositis_--the pain is usually located
In _painful stiff-neck_, or "rheumatic torticollis," the pain is located
In _periosteal sarcoma_ the presence of a swelling is usually the first
In _pigmented_ or _melanotic cancers_ of the skin, the glands are early
In _pleurodynia_--_intercostal fibrositis_--the pain is in the line of
In _ulcers of the leg due to interference with the venous return_, the
In a certain sense, Georgia may be included among the "company
In a considerable proportion of cases one of the multiple tumours takes
In a considerable proportion of cases, the disturbance of growth is
In a corner of the hut stood a standard captured from the French,
In a corner of the room something red and tiny gave a grunt and
In a few cases, amputation well above the seat of disease, by removing
In a few years the Granger spirit appeared in Congress. An investigation
In a limited number of cases, about the period of puberty there may
In a little while it was taken up in the streets and along the
In a moment the men came running gaily from their campfires and
In a rather low room lit by one candle sat the princess and with her
In a second note, made public on June 11, the position of the United
In abscesses deeply placed, as for example under the gluteal or pectoral
In abscesses treated by the open method, when the cavity has become
In addition to acting as channels for the conveyance of bacterial
In addition to increasing the resisting power of the patient, it is
In addition to the business and professional classes, the mechanics of
In advanced cases of general paralysis of the insane, a peculiar form of
In all criminal prosecutions, the accused shall enjoy the right to a
In all fairness it should be said that the conduct of the North
In all of these conditions, examination of the bones with the X-rays
In all the leading industries of the country labor was organized into
In all this the Republicans had not reckoned with destiny. In a few
In an hour's time the whole hunting party was at the porch.
In an hour, all the costumes were crumpled and disordered. The
In another form but along the same path of reflection the other
In answer to questions with which he was greeted, the courier made a
In answer to the charges, remedies were proposed and adopted. Civil
In answer to the count's inquiries she replied that things were all
In anticipation of such a step on the part of the federal government,
In any case it is necessary to disinfect the track, and, it may be, to
In applying the antiseptic principle to the treatment of wounds, our
In attempting to arrive at a conclusion as to the innocence or
In both England and France the governments pursued a policy of
In both cases his personal activity, having no more force than the
In both colonies the communistic experiments were failures. Angry at the
In both these adaptations the reference to spring (vesna) matched
In burned and devastated Moscow Pierre experienced almost the
In cases of _hysteria_ and other _functional affections of the
In cases of joint disease, the muscles acting on the joint become
In certain cases the symptoms of traumatic shock blend with those
In certain injuries of the semilunar menisci of the knee, also, the
In chapter 13, verse 18, of the Apocalypse, it is said:
In children, diphtheria may occur on the vulva, vagina, prepuce, or
In contrast to the acquired form, inherited syphilis is remarkable for
In contrast with the dread felt by the infantrymen placed in
In course of time the collateral branches of the vessel above and below
In course of time the leucocytes pass through the vessel
In dealing with humanity's inquiry, the science of history up to now
In dealing with this period they sternly condemn the historical
In dealing with war finances, the Republicans attacked this ancient
In deciding between the contestants the national committee, after the
In demanding the free coinage of silver, it recurred to the practice
In different races, localities, environment, and seasons, the pathogenic
In difficult cases the final appeal is to exploratory incision and
In doubtful cases, the diagnosis may be aided by the Wassermann test and
In early adult life, one of the tumours, instead of undergoing
In estimating the clinical importance of a leucocytosis, it is not
In every part of the country legislative action fluctuated violently.
In exceptional cases, blisters form over the seat of the effusion, or
In excluding spoilsmen from public office, the reformers were, in a
In extensive ulcers resulting from recent burns, if the granulations are
In fact, however, though now much farther off than before, the
In front of a landowner's house to the left of the road stood
In front of the Governor's house Alpatych found a large number of
In front of the patella and its ligament is the _prepatellar bursa_,
In general at Bald Hills the little princess lived in constant fear,
In general the head steward made out to Pierre that his project of
In general the trait of Speranski's mentality which struck Prince
In half an hour all was again in order, only the squares had
In his first message, also, President Roosevelt urged the transfer of
In his large study, the walls of which were hung to the ceiling with
In his veto message, Jackson attacked the bank as unconstitutional and
In historical works on the year 1812 French writers are very fond of
In inherited syphilis the spirochaete is present in enormous numbers
In interpreting the "blood count," it is to be kept in mind that a
In laryngeal diphtheria, the interference with respiration may call for
In line with American policy in the West Indian waters was the purchase
In line with the knoll on both sides stood other guns which also
In many cases the extent of the operation can only be decided after
In military affairs the strength of an army is the product of its
In most cases the symptoms begin to pass off in three or four days; the
In most of the states the suffrage or office holding or both were
In most parts of the body the arteries lie in a sheath of connective
In multiple chondromas of the hand in young subjects, it was formerly
In nearly all these gigantic undertakings, the same great leaders in
In obstinate and severe cases the nerve may be _forcibly stretched_.
In old and debilitated patients the septic absorption taking place from
In older children, a gummatous synovitis is met with of which the most
In order that the graft may survive and have a favourable chance of
In other cases the blood escapes beyond the sheath and collects in the
In other cases the disease is contracted through the inhalation of the
In other cases there is no history of injury, but whenever the foot is
In other forms of infection, vaccines are employed to increase the
In place of it there arose in 1831 a new device, the national nominating
In place of the former close dark circles formed by thousands of
In primary sarcoma the treatment consists in removing the muscle. In the
In providing for future changes in the Constitution itself the
In radiograms the appearance of syphilitic bones is usually
In railway enterprise the South took more interest than in canals, and
In rare instances the burned area becomes the seat of a peculiar
In rare instances the synovial membrane presents nodular masses or
In reality this was an immense gain for liberty. The area dedicated to
In recognition of this state of affairs, the tariff of 1816 was
In regard to philanthropy, the greatest virtue of crowned heads,
In regard to this question, history stands to the other sciences
In relation to the bones also there may be reactive changes, resulting
In reply to an inquiry about the convicts in the prison, Count
In reply to the count's anxious inquiries as to why she was so
In rescinding the Stamp Act, Parliament did not admit the contention of
In seeking the laws of historical movement just the same thing
In seven league boots this new giant strode ahead of the Southern giant.
In severe cases, and especially when the vomited matter resembles
In soft central tumours, there is disappearance of bone shadow in the
In some abscesses, such as those in the vicinity of the anus, the cavity
In some cases benefit has followed the prolonged internal administration
In some cases it is advisable to excise the carbuncle or to make
In some cases the blood-pressure gradually distends the injured segment
In some cases the general health is not disturbed; in others the patient
In spite of all that happened, however, the status of the negroes in the
In spite of the many pills she swallowed and the drops and powders
In spite of the obscurity of the soldier's words Pierre understood
In spite of the opposition, supporters of a liberal land policy made
In spite of the trampling of the French gendarmes' horses, which
In such cases one or more of the joints are usually implicated also, and
In suits at common law, where the value in controversy shall exceed
In surgical inflammations, as a rule, nothing is gained by lowering the
In surgical patients, the _thrombotic form_ is almost invariably met
In taking this position, the Secretary of State did but reflect the
In taking this step, the Democrats encountered opposition in their own
In ten minutes the table was ready and a napkin spread on it. On the
In tertiary lesions there is greater difficulty in demonstrating the
In that long contest in the United States for the balance of power
In the #infra-clavicular injuries#, the lesion most often results from
In the #supra-clavicular injuries#, the violence applied to the head or
In the Emperor's suite all exchanged rapid looks that expressed
In the Finnish war he also managed to distinguish himself. He had
In the Meuse-Argonne battle, our soldiers encountered some of the most
In the Rostovs' staid old-fashioned house the dissolution of
In the Senate, where they were stronger, their position had to be
In the South the westward march was equally swift. The seaboard was
In the _Bones_, lesions occur which assume the clinical features of an
In the _Brain_, in the later periods of secondary and in tertiary
In the _Joints_, a serous synovitis or hydrops may occur, chiefly in the
In the _brachial birth-paralysis_ met with in infants, the lesion is due
In the _limbs_, the prominent features are the deficient growth in
In the _region of the ankle_ cellulitis is not common; but _around the
In the _region of the elbow-joint_, cellulitis is common around the
In the _tertiary stage_ the joint lesions are persistent and
In the _treatment of chronic inflammations_, pending further knowledge
In the acute form, the health suffers, there is fever, and the glands
In the age of change, four important amendments to the federal
In the autumn of 1806 everybody had again begun talking of the war
In the autumn the Rostovs returned to Moscow. Early in the winter
In the ballroom guests stood crowding at the entrance doors awaiting
In the beginning of the winter of 1805-6 Pierre received one of Anna
In the case of an operation carried out through unbroken skin, organisms
In the colonies the laws were received with consternation. To the
In the corner room at the Club, members gathered to read these
In the count's room, which was full of tobacco smoke, they talked of
In the course of a few hours, there is usually some indisposition, with
In the course of many operations foreign substances are introduced into
In the course of operations also, portions of skin, fascia, or bone, or
In the course of the debate over this settlement, a number of
In the course of time the vote of the latter organization rose to
In the course of time this "Utopian" idea was abandoned, and another set
In the damp chill air and crowded closeness of the swaying carriage,
In the darkness of the night one of the servants noticed, above
In the darkness, it seemed as though a gloomy unseen river was
In the deathlike stillness only the tramp of horses was heard.
In the deep gaze that seemed to look not outwards but
In the dining room, which like all the rooms in the house was
In the disposition it is said first that the batteries placed on the
In the domain of jurisprudence, which consists of discussions of how
In the drawing room the conversation was still going on.
In the earliest stages of the disease, the induction of hyperaemia is
In the early days of October another envoy came to Kutuzov with a
In the early days of his marriage it had seemed strange to him that
In the early secondary period of _syphilis_, the muscles may be the seat
In the early stage a brisk mercurial purge is often of value. Alcohol
In the early years of the nineteenth century, the Yankees had bent their
In the economic sphere, the work of women was invaluable. They harvested
In the election Governor Wilson easily secured a majority of the
In the election which ensued President Wilson's popular vote exceeded
In the employment of X-rays and of radium in the treatment of cancer,
In the end, American financial, naval, and military assistance counted
In the epiphysial cartilages and at the ossifying junctions, all the
In the evening Andrew and Pierre got into the open carriage and
In the evening Michael Ivanovich, sent by the prince, came to
In the evening, after supper, when all were about to retire, Anatole
In the evening, when Prince Andrew had left, the countess went up to
In the evening, when Prince Andrew went to him and, trying to rouse
In the event of the wound becoming infected with pyogenic organisms, the
In the execution of this undertaking, geography, as usual, played a
In the experimental sciences what we know we call the laws of
In the eyes of the world Pierre was a great gentleman, the rather
In the face of the clamor for expressions of sympathy with one or the
In the female, the cauliflower-like masses are dissected from the labia;
In the field of business enterprise, progress was most marked. The
In the first case it was necessary to renounce the consciousness
In the first case, if inevitability were possible without freedom we
In the first place the historian describes the activity of
In the first place the marriage was not a brilliant one as regards
In the first place we see the steady rise of the small farmer. Even in
In the fourth act there was some sort of devil who sang waving his
In the fresh morning air were now heard, not two or three musket
In the hall she met her father, who had returned with bad news.
In the hall the porch door opened, and someone asked, "At home?" and
In the higher command there were two sharply defined parties:
In the highest spirits Nicholas arrived at night at a hotel in
In the house that poetic dullness and quiet reigned which always
In the human subject, multiplication in the blood-stream does not occur
In the hut which the men had passed, the chief officers had gathered
In the intellectual life of America, the churches assumed a role of high
In the large nerve-trunks of the limbs he has worked out the exact
In the last analysis we reach the circle of infinity--that final
In the later stages of acquired syphilis, _gummatous periostitis and
In the later stages there may occur a form of creeping or _spreading
In the letter from his parents was enclosed a letter of
In the long room, brightly lit up by the sun through the large
In the lower extremity, a large number of normal and adventitious bursae
In the lower extremity, the femoral is controlled by pressing in a
In the lower ranges of official life, the spoils system became more
In the lung the fat collects in the minute blood vessels and produces
In the majority of cases it is only when some exciting factor comes into
In the majority of cases the child recovers from these early
In the majority of cases, cysts in relation to joints give rise to
In the management of wounds and other diseased conditions the main
In the management of wounds and other surgical conditions it is
In the meantime, not only was it known in the maidservants' rooms
In the meantime, the South, though relatively poor, made relatively
In the middle of a sober conversation begun by Ilagin about the
In the middle of his story, just as he was saying: "You cannot
In the middle of the summer Princess Mary received an unexpected
In the middle of their talk in the sitting room, Dimmler came in and
In the middle of this fresh tale Pierre was summoned to the
In the midst of a conversation on political matters Anna Pavlovna
In the midst of a description of the last Petersburg fete she
In the midst of his doubts came the news that Napoleon might withdraw
In the midst of the third ecossaise there was a clatter of chairs
In the midst of this conversation, which was beginning to interest
In the miserable, sobbing, enfeebled man whose leg had just been
In the more enduring passages there are four fundamental ideas which,
In the more severe injuries associated with fracture of the humerus and
In the morning Anna Mikhaylovna said to Pierre:
In the morning all that was left of the night mist on the heights
In the morning, on an empty stomach, all the old questions
In the most acute cases the death of the affected part takes place so
In the neck, axilla, and pubes a diffuse overgrowth of the subcutaneous
In the neighborhood of Jefferson City the slaves numbered more than a
In the neighboring republic of Haiti, a similar state of affairs
In the next place we have omitted all descriptions of battles. Our
In the night he called his valet and told him to pack up to go to
In the old days he had been unable to find a way out of all these
In the one case as in the other, on both sides the struggle provokes
In the organism of states such men are necessary, as wolves are
In the other Middle colonies the number was doubtless not so large; but
In the passage Denisov, with a pipe, was squatting on the
In the past he had never been able to find that great inscrutable
In the period between the landing of the English at Jamestown, Virginia,
In the porch and in the yard the men whom Petya had armed with
In the presence of Tikhon and the doctor the women washed what had
In the progress of an aneurysm towards rupture, timely clotting may
In the rare cases in which the skin of the greater part of the body is
In the rearguard, Dokhturov and others rallying some battalions kept
In the refreshment room and the hall, footmen were bustling about with
In the room next their bedroom there was a confusion of sabers,
In the same way we can never imagine the action of a man quite
In the sciatica that results from neuritis and perineuritis, there is
In the second act there was scenery representing tombstones, there
In the second case, if freedom were possible without inevitability
In the second category Pierre reckoned himself and others like
In the second file from the right flank, beside which the carriage
In the second place, the reception accorded the newcomers differed from
In the second room of the inn the lieutenant was sitting over a dish
In the shafts of the long bones, owing to the excessive absorption of
In the shed everyone was ready, dressed, belted, shod, and only
In the silence that ensued, the snoring of those who had fallen
In the sphere of civil government, the results of the Revolution were
In the sphere of industry, equally great changes took place. The major
In the sphere of national politics, where the opportunities were
In the sphere of politics, the period witnessed the recovery of white
In the spring of 1807 he decided to return to Petersburg. On the way
In the spring of 1809 he went to visit the Ryazan estates which
In the spring of 1811, a British frigate held up an American ship near
In the study were four gentlemen of the diplomatic corps. With
In the summer of 1809 Pierre returned to Petersburg. Our
In the summer of 1914, the dictator resigned and fled from the capital,
In the sunshine the air was warm, and that warmth was particularly
In the syphilitic lesion, skiagrams usually show a more abundant
In the tavern, before which stood the doctor's covered cart, there
In the third category he included those Brothers (the majority)
In the third circle, Naryshkin was speaking of the meeting of the
In the total darkness the soldiers walked with Pierre to Mozhaysk.
In the treatment of _iritis_ the eyes are shaded from the light and
In the upper extremity, the sheath of the long tendon of the biceps may
In the upper extremity, the subclavian is pressed against the first rib
In the vast majority of cases the tubercle bacillus gains entrance to
In the vast majority of cases, infection takes place during the congress
In the vicinity of Bogucharovo were large villages belonging to
In the village of Hosjeradek there were Russian troops retiring from
In the village through which they passed there were red lights and a
In the village, outside the drink shop, another meeting was being
In the winter of 1813 Nicholas married Princess Mary and moved to
In the year 1812, when news of the war with Napoleon reached
In their appeal for votes, the socialists of every type turned first to
In their childlike glee, aroused by the fire and their luck in
In their exposition, an historic character is first the product of his
In their place rose the prosperous community--a community unlike the
In their rear, more than a mile from Mikulino where the forest
In these affections the bones present no histological or chemical
In these multiple forms of osteomyelitis the toxaemic symptoms
In this chapter we shall confine our attention to the process as it
In this contradiction lies the problem of free will, which from most
In time the slaves in the tier of counties against Louisiana ranged from
In time, the industrial North and the planting South evolved different
In town the earliest risers were just beginning to look sleepily from their windows as we drove through the streets of the Surrey side. Passing down the Waterloo Bridge Road we crossed over the river, and dashing up Wellington Street wheeled sharply to the right and found ourselves in Bow Street. Sherlock Holmes was well known to the force, and the two constables at the door saluted him. One of them held the horse's head while the other led us in.
In two important cases, the Supreme Court ordered the dissolution of the
In typhoid fever the bone marrow is liable to be invaded by _the typhoid
In what does the substance of those reproaches lie?
In whatever direction a ship moves, the flow of the waves it cuts
In young infants in whom multiple fractures occur the prognosis as to
Inasmuch as obliteration of the sac and the feeding artery is out of the
Indeed it is a far cry from the banishment of Anne Hutchinson from
Indeed it was the minerals rather than the land that attracted the
Indeed some of the states, having the Annapolis resolution before them,
Indeed the suffragists already had realized that a tedious contest lay
Indeed, he neglected no opportunity to increase the traffic on the
Indeed, they exaggerated its evils, for many of the "criminals" were
Independence of thought and action. They have felt the influence of
India, especially towards the end of the wet season. The disease occurs
Indian attacks were made on the railway construction gangs; General
Indiana advanced northward from the Ohio, mainly under the leadership,
Indians on the frontier. Nevertheless, we are told, the people "passed
Indians to attack American citizens on the frontier; they had ruined
Individual pellets striking the shafts of long bones become flattened or
Industries were paralyzed for the want of coal; cities were threatened
Infection is believed to be conveyed by the husks of cereals, especially
Infection with the _staphylococcus albus_, the _streptococcus_, or the
Inflammation at the ossifying junction is included under the term
Inflammation may be defined as the series of vital changes that occurs
Inhabitants of the city and villages, and you, workingmen and
Initiative, the, 543
Injuries which act abruptly or instantaneously are illustrated in the
Innumerable programs for assimilating the alien to American life were
Instead of helping the Federalist party, they made criticism of it more
Instead of making the decision himself, however, and drawing up a
Instead of the demand of four months earlier to withdraw from
Instead of the former divinely appointed aims of the Jewish, Greek, or
Instead of the homestead where the same family of masters kept the same
Instead of the new life he had hoped to lead he still lived the old
Instinctively guarding against the shock--for they had been running
Institutes of Justinian, he worked at formulating the section on
Interstate Commerce Commission. Thus private property to the value of
Into the insignificant, trifling, and artificial interests uniting
Into the labor papers and platforms there sometimes crept a note of
Into this stream of migration from the planting South flowed another
Intra-articular ligaments, such as the ligamentum teres in the hip, are
Intriguer!" she hissed viciously, and tugged with all her might at the
Intubation consists in introducing through the mouth into the larynx a
Investigations regarding the cause of cancer have been prosecuted with
Iogel's were the most enjoyable balls in Moscow. So said the mothers
Iowa, Wisconsin, and Illinois, enacted drastic laws prescribing the
Iowa--the mighty Rockies shouldering themselves high against the
Irish, and the Catholics of Maryland, fled from intolerant governments
Irish. It has been said with a touch of exaggeration that the American
Is a mother begging for the life of a son sentenced to be shot as a
Is ours a 'government of the people, by the people, for the people,' or
Is the movement of the Russian people eastward to Kazan and
Is the movement of the peoples at the time of the Crusades explained
Isa Whitney, brother of the late Elias Whitney, D.D., Principal of the Theological College of St. George's, was much addicted to opium. The habit grew upon him, as I understand, from some foolish freak when he was at college; for having read De Quincey's description of his dreams and sensations, he had drenched his tobacco with laudanum in an attempt to produce the same effects. He found, as so many more have done, that the practice is easier to attain than to get rid of, and for many years he continued to be a slave to the drug, an object of mingled horror and pity to his friends and relatives. I can see him now, with yellow, pasty face, drooping lids, and pin-point pupils, all huddled in a chair, the wreck and ruin of a noble man.
Island. There, under the leadership of Roger Williams, liberty in
Isn't that friendship?" remarked the count in an inquiring tone.
Isn't the road wide enough?" said he, turning to a man behind him
It appeared that the princess' offer of corn to the peasants the
It assumed the powers of a government and prepared to raise money, wage
It can't be helped!" said the count, shrugging his shoulders and
It cannot be emphasised too strongly that the induration of the primary
It cannot be the direct physical power of a strong man over a weak
It did not now occur to him to think of Russia, or the war, or
It frequently happens that, from the tearing of lymph vessels, serous
It had cleared in the morning, and the sun was shining with a subdued brightness through the dim veil which hangs over the great city. Sherlock Holmes was already at breakfast when I came down.
It has been shown that the presence of spectators increases the number
It has long been believed that _the function of the periosteum_ is to
It has the same characters and clinical features as the innocent
It having been decided to try and save the limb, the question is only
It is also known as _Ambrine_ and _Burnol_. After the burned area has
It is always the first thing that tells me all is well. When I was
It is by the vital changes they bring about in the parts where they
It is characteristic that the symptoms develop abruptly without
It is common to find that the patient has been troubled for a long time
It is convenient to describe the varieties of loose bodies under two
It is easy now to understand the significance of these events--if
It is found that the _staphylococci_, which cluster into groups, tend to
It is frequently met with on the face and head, but may occur on any
It is generally believed that the secondary growths in cancer that
It is important to remember that when the median nerve is divided at the
It is important, however, to exclude the hysterical form of neuralgia,
It is instructive to associate the period of survival of the different
It is met with as a congenital affection in the tongue and lips, or it
It is most pronounced in lesions of the motor nerve-trunks, probably
It is natural for a man who does not understand the workings of a
It is not Napoleon who prepares himself for the accomplishment of
It is not necessary here to do more than indicate the general characters
It is not necessary to isolate cases of erysipelas, provided the usual
It is one of the well-known facts of history that a people loosely
It is only necessary here to consider the effects of modern small-bore
It is probable that the beneficial influence of _counter-irritants_,
It is probable that the number of bond servants exceeded the original
It is situated over one of the intercarpal or other joints in this
It is the exception for a hard chancre to leave a visible scar, hence,
It is the most characteristic example of the dry type of gangrene. As
It is to be borne in mind that the object of amputation in these cases
It is to be noted that the Hunterian ligature does not aim at
It is true that in the provision for popular elections, the suffrage was
It is usually necessary to enlarge the wound, freely dividing injured
It is usually sufficient to incise the periosteum, but when the disease
It is, as a rule, widely distributed throughout the peripheral nerves,
It lies in the fact that an historic character like Alexander I,
It may lead to necrosis of a portion or even of the entire phalanx. This
It might really have been that the hussar came for water and went back
It must be observed, however, that burns met with at the bedside always
It need scarcely be pointed out that the use of powerful drugs like
It seemed to Natasha that even at the time she first saw Prince
It seemed to him that it was getting lighter. To the left he saw a
It seems that it was. She had the surest information that of late he had, when the fit was on him, made use of an opium den in the farthest east of the City. Hitherto his orgies had always been confined to one day, and he had come back, twitching and shattered, in the evening. But now the spell had been upon him eight-and-forty hours, and he lay there, doubtless among the dregs of the docks, breathing in the poison or sleeping off the effects. There he was to be found, she was sure of it, at the Bar of Gold, in Upper Swandam Lane. But what was she to do? How could she, a young and timid woman, make her way into such a place and pluck her husband out from among the ruffians who surrounded him?
It so happened, however, that the events which, it was thought, would
It still depends on Your Majesty to preserve humanity from the
It urged them to unite against the capitalists, to get possession of the
It was Kutuzov, who had been riding round the position and on his
It was Prince Andrew. The first thing he saw on riding up to the
It was St. Natalia's day and the name day of two of the Rostovs--the
It was a bitter night, so we drew on our ulsters and wrapped cravats about our throats. Outside, the stars were shining coldly in a cloudless sky, and the breath of the passers-by blew out into smoke like so many pistol shots. Our footfalls rang out crisply and loudly as we swung through the doctors' quarter, Wimpole Street, Harley Street, and so through Wigmore Street into Oxford Street. In a quarter of an hour we were in Bloomsbury at the Alpha Inn, which is a small public-house at the corner of one of the streets which runs down into Holborn. Holmes pushed open the door of the private bar and ordered two glasses of beer from the ruddy-faced, white-aproned landlord.
It was a cavalry general who had obtained the Emperor's special
It was a cold morning of the early spring, and we sat after breakfast on either side of a cheery fire in the old room at Baker Street. A thick fog rolled down between the lines of dun-coloured houses, and the opposing windows loomed like dark, shapeless blurs through the heavy yellow wreaths. Our gas was lit and shone on the white cloth and glimmer of china and metal, for the table had not been cleared yet. Sherlock Holmes had been silent all the morning, dipping continuously into the advertisement columns of a succession of papers until at last, having apparently given up his search, he had emerged in no very sweet temper to lecture me upon my literary shortcomings.
It was a few weeks before my own marriage, during the days when I was still sharing rooms with Holmes in Baker Street, that he came home from an afternoon stroll to find a letter on the table waiting for him. I had remained indoors all day, for the weather had taken a sudden turn to rain, with high autumnal winds, and the Jezail bullet which I had brought back in one of my limbs as a relic of my Afghan campaign throbbed with dull persistence. With my body in one easy-chair and my legs upon another, I had surrounded myself with a cloud of newspapers until at last, saturated with the news of the day, I tossed them all aside and lay listless, watching the huge crest and monogram upon the envelope upon the table and wondering lazily who my friend's noble correspondent could be.
It was a fine day, sunny after rain, and the air was unusually pure.
It was a long time before the dragoons could extricate the bleeding
It was a portrait, painted in bright colors by Gerard, of the son
It was a quarter past six when we left Baker Street, and it still wanted ten minutes to the hour when we found ourselves in Serpentine Avenue. It was already dusk, and the lamps were just being lighted as we paced up and down in front of Briony Lodge, waiting for the coming of its occupant. The house was just such as I had pictured it from Sherlock Holmes' succinct description, but the locality appeared to be less private than I expected. On the contrary, for a small street in a quiet neighbourhood, it was remarkably animated. There was a group of shabbily dressed men smoking and laughing in a corner, a scissors-grinder with his wheel, two guardsmen who were flirting with a nurse-girl, and several well-dressed young men who were lounging up and down with cigars in their mouths.
It was a quarter-past nine when I started from home and made my way across the Park, and so through Oxford Street to Baker Street. Two hansoms were standing at the door, and as I entered the passage I heard the sound of voices from above. On entering his room, I found Holmes in animated conversation with two men, one of whom I recognised as Peter Jones, the official police agent, while the other was a long, thin, sad-faced man, with a very shiny hat and oppressively respectable frock-coat.
It was a singular sight which met our eyes. On the table stood a dark-lantern with the shutter half open, throwing a brilliant beam of light upon the iron safe, the door of which was ajar. Beside this table, on the wooden chair, sat Dr. Grimesby Roylott clad in a long grey dressing-gown, his bare ankles protruding beneath, and his feet thrust into red heelless Turkish slippers. Across his lap lay the short stock with the long lash which we had noticed during the day. His chin was cocked upward and his eyes were fixed in a dreadful, rigid stare at the corner of the ceiling. Round his brow he had a peculiar yellow band, with brownish speckles, which seemed to be bound tightly round his head. As we entered he made neither sound nor motion.
It was a war for a great cause, the end of uncertainties and the
It was a warm rainy autumn day. The sky and the horizon were both
It was a warm, gray morning. Princess Mary stopped at the porch,
It was a warm, rainy, autumnal day. The wide expanse that opened out
It was about eleven o'clock. The sun shone somewhat to the left
It was about ten minutes before we regained our cab and drove back into Ross, Holmes still carrying with him the stone which he had picked up in the wood.
It was after five o'clock when Sherlock Holmes left me, but I had no time to be lonely, for within an hour there arrived a confectioner's man with a very large flat box. This he unpacked with the help of a youth whom he had brought with him, and presently, to my very great astonishment, a quite epicurean little cold supper began to be laid out upon our humble lodging-house mahogany. There were a couple of brace of cold woodcock, a pheasant, a pate de foie gras pie with a group of ancient and cobwebby bottles. Having laid out all these luxuries, my two visitors vanished away, like the genii of the Arabian Nights, with no explanation save that the things had been paid for and were ordered to this address.
It was all that they could do to get the guns up the rise aided by
It was already dark, and Pierre could not make out whether the
It was already growing dusk when Denisov, Petya, and the esaul
It was already late when he rose after sealing the letter. He wished
It was already quite dark when Prince Andrew rattled over the
It was already the beginning of June when on his return journey he
It was an old rickety door and gave at once before our united strength. Together we rushed into the room. It was empty. There was no furniture save a little pallet bed, a small table, and a basketful of linen. The skylight above was open, and the prisoner gone.
It was becoming dangerous to remain in Bogucharovo. News of the
It was by now late in the afternoon. Half the street was in
It was clear and frosty. Above the dirty, ill-lit streets, above the
It was close upon four before the door opened, and a drunken-looking groom, ill-kempt and side-whiskered, with an inflamed face and disreputable clothes, walked into the room. Accustomed as I was to my friend's amazing powers in the use of disguises, I had to look three times before I was certain that it was indeed he. With a nod he vanished into the bedroom, whence he emerged in five minutes tweed-suited and respectable, as of old. Putting his hands into his pockets, he stretched out his legs in front of the fire and laughed heartily for some minutes.
It was dated from Montague Place upon the preceding evening, and ran thus:
It was difficult to refuse any of Sherlock Holmes' requests, for they were always so exceedingly definite, and put forward with such a quiet air of mastery. I felt, however, that when Whitney was once confined in the cab my mission was practically accomplished; and for the rest, I could not wish anything better than to be associated with my friend in one of those singular adventures which were the normal condition of his existence. In a few minutes I had written my note, paid Whitney's bill, led him out to the cab, and seen him driven through the darkness. In a very short time a decrepit figure had emerged from the opium den, and I was walking down the street with Sherlock Holmes. For two streets he shuffled along with a bent back and an uncertain foot. Then, glancing quickly round, he straightened himself out and burst into a hearty fit of laughter.
It was early in April in the year '83 that I woke one morning to find Sherlock Holmes standing, fully dressed, by the side of my bed. He was a late riser, as a rule, and as the clock on the mantelpiece showed me that it was only a quarter-past seven, I blinked up at him in some surprise, and perhaps just a little resentment, for I was myself regular in my habits.
It was eleven by the clock, but it seemed peculiarly dark out of
It was estimated in 1860, on the basis of the census figures, that
It was evident that Prince Andrew's ironical tone toward the
It was evident that he did not like the vicomte and was aiming his
It was evident that this strange, strong man was under the
It was far from being the same words or the same order that
It was found by Beck of Chicago that the injection of bismuth paste is
It was getting dusk when Prince Andrew and Pierre drove up to the
It was growing dusk. On the narrow Augesd Dam where for so many
It was growing light, the sky was clearing, only a single cloud
It was in July, 1805, and the speaker was the well-known Anna
It was in the latter days of September, and the equinoctial gales had set in with exceptional violence. All day the wind had screamed and the rain had beaten against the windows, so that even here in the heart of great, hand-made London we were forced to raise our minds for the instant from the routine of life and to recognise the presence of those great elemental forces which shriek at mankind through the bars of his civilisation, like untamed beasts in a cage. As evening drew in, the storm grew higher and louder, and the wind cried and sobbed like a child in the chimney. Sherlock Holmes sat moodily at one side of the fireplace cross-indexing his records of crime, while I at the other was deep in one of Clark Russell's fine sea-stories until the howl of the gale from without seemed to blend with the text, and the splash of the rain to lengthen out into the long swash of the sea waves. My wife was on a visit to her mother's, and for a few days I was a dweller once more in my old quarters at Baker Street.
It was in the summer of '89, not long after my marriage, that the events occurred which I am now about to summarise. I had returned to civil practice and had finally abandoned Holmes in his Baker Street rooms, although I continually visited him and occasionally even persuaded him to forgo his Bohemian habits so far as to come and visit us. My practice had steadily increased, and as I happened to live at no very great distance from Paddington Station, I got a few patients from among the officials. One of these, whom I had cured of a painful and lingering disease, was never weary of advertising my virtues and of endeavouring to send me on every sufferer over whom he might have any influence.
It was indeed our visitor of the afternoon who came bustling in, dangling his glasses more vigorously than ever, and with a very perturbed expression upon his aristocratic features.
It was just the moment before a big dinner when the assembled
It was just when the count's affairs had become so involved that
It was late before Sherlock Holmes returned. He came back alone, for Lestrade was staying in lodgings in the town.
It was late in the evening when they entered the palace at Olmutz
It was long since the Rostovs had news of Nicholas. Not till
It was nearly four o'clock when we at last, after passing through the beautiful Stroud Valley, and over the broad gleaming Severn, found ourselves at the pretty little country-town of Ross. A lean, ferret-like man, furtive and sly-looking, was waiting for us upon the platform. In spite of the light brown dustcoat and leather-leggings which he wore in deference to his rustic surroundings, I had no difficulty in recognising Lestrade, of Scotland Yard. With him we drove to the Hereford Arms where a room had already been engaged for us.
It was nearly three o'clock but no one was yet asleep, when the
It was neither the Indian wars nor the French wars that finally brought
It was nine o'clock in the morning. The fog lay unbroken like a
It was no light matter for the English to cross three thousand miles of
It was not apparent, however, from the ensuing election that any
It was not the dress, but the face and whole figure of Princess Mary
It was not the first time that she had spoken to us of her husband's trouble, to me as a doctor, to my wife as an old friend and school companion. We soothed and comforted her by such words as we could find. Did she know where her husband was? Was it possible that we could bring him back to her?
It was not till nearly evening that the officer commanding the
It was not very long before my friend's prediction was fulfilled. A fortnight went by, during which I frequently found my thoughts turning in her direction and wondering what strange side-alley of human experience this lonely woman had strayed into. The unusual salary, the curious conditions, the light duties, all pointed to something abnormal, though whether a fad or a plot, or whether the man were a philanthropist or a villain, it was quite beyond my powers to determine. As to Holmes, I observed that he sat frequently for half an hour on end, with knitted brows and an abstracted air, but he swept the matter away with a wave of his hand when I mentioned it. "Data! data! data!" he cried impatiently. "I can't make bricks without clay." And yet he would always wind up by muttering that no sister of his should ever have accepted such a situation.
It was not what he had read that vexed him, but the fact that the life
It was now hot spring weather. The whole forest was already
It was obvious to me that my companion's mind was now made up about the case, although what his conclusions were was more than I could even dimly imagine. Several times during our homeward journey I endeavoured to sound him upon the point, but he always glided away to some other topic, until at last I gave it over in despair. It was not yet three when we found ourselves in our rooms once more. He hurried to his chamber and was down again in a few minutes dressed as a common loafer. With his collar turned up, his shiny, seedy coat, his red cravat, and his worn boots, he was a perfect sample of the class.
It was on the very fact of being so young that Petya counted for
It was only after a bitter contest that the states reached an agreement
It was only by the keener wind that met them and the jerks given
It was plain that l'amour which the Frenchman was so fond of was not
It was plain that the Russian nest was ruined and destroyed, but
It was quickly ratified by the states. The following year it was
It was quite impossible to understand these sounds. The doctor
It was so light that he could see the moonlight reflected from the
It was still quite dark outside. The rain was over, but drops were
It was the banks that undertook to sell the stocks and bonds issued by
It was the custom for Mitka to play the balalayka in the
It was the eve of St. Nicholas, the fifth of December, 1820. Natasha
It was the feeling that induces a volunteer recruit to spend his
It was the germ of a government which in time was to supersede the
It was the second night that neither of them had slept, watching the
It was the voice of the groom, trying to wake him. The sun shone
It was three o'clock in the morning. The footmen came in with sad
It was too late to talk about the excellence of the British
It was true that a view over nearly the whole Russian position and
It was two o'clock in the afternoon. The French had already
It was, in fact, only the commencement of the campaign that
It was, indeed, our friend the financier. I was shocked by the change which had come over him, for his face which was naturally of a broad and massive mould, was now pinched and fallen in, while his hair seemed to me at least a shade whiter. He entered with a weariness and lethargy which was even more painful than his violence of the morning before, and he dropped heavily into the armchair which I pushed forward for him.
It will be a history of change. The superior position which women enjoy
It will readily be understood that the less thoroughly or radically the
It would appear that most of the recorded cases of _cysts of bone_ owe
It would seem that having rejected the belief of the ancients in
It would take a dozen pages to enumerate all the reproaches the
It'll be worse if he fires the bridge. See, here's an officer jammed
It's not the same!"
Its disappearance, however, was but momentary. With a rending, tearing sound, one of the broad, white stones turned over upon its side and left a square, gaping hole, through which streamed the light of a lantern. Over the edge there peeped a clean-cut, boyish face, which looked keenly about it, and then, with a hand on either side of the aperture, drew itself shoulder-high and waist-high, until one knee rested upon the edge. In another instant he stood at the side of the hole and was hauling after him a companion, lithe and small like himself, with a pale face and a shock of very red hair.
Ivanovich and now for Tikhon or Dron. Dunyasha, the nurse, and the
Ivanovich, bringing the letter and a plan. These he put down beside
Ivanovich, the late prince's architect, who was living on in
Ivanovna, joyously playing with the word, called it, seemed to Natasha
Ivanovna, the buffoon. Something stood sentinel within her and forbade
J. Ropes, _History of the Civil War_ (best account of military
J.A. Woodburn (editor), _The American Revolution_ (Selections from the
J.B. McMaster, _The United States in the World War_.
J.F. Rhodes, _History of the United States, 1877-1896_, Vol. VIII.
J.F. Rhodes, _History of the United States_, Vols. I and II.
J.F. Rhodes, _History of the United States_, Vols. III, IV, and V.
J.K. Hosmer, _The Appeal to Arms_ and _The Outcome of the Civil War_
J.L. Laughlin, _Bimetallism in the United States_.
J.M. Swank, _History of the Manufacture of Iron_.
J.R. Commons and Associates, _History of Labor in the United States_ (2
J.R. Commons, _History of Labour in the United States_ (2 vols.).
JOINT DISEASES ASSOCIATED WITH LESIONS OF THE NERVOUS SYSTEM:
Jack, the French were still almost the only white men in the region.
Jackson a deep and exasperated opposition. The truth is the conduct of
Jackson on the same day, March 2. Looking upon the reduction of the
Jackson ordered the Secretary of the Treasury to withdraw the government
Jackson's famous attack on the Bank in 1832. It declared that tariff
Jackson's leadership, it destroyed the second United States Bank. When
Jackson, to take Washington's chair as chief executive of the
Jacksonian Democracy, they overtopped agriculture. By the end of the
Jacksonian epilepsy, or paralysis, the symptoms varying with the seat
Jacob Leisler, leader of a popular uprising against the provincial
James Bowie, the dexterous wielder of the knife that to this day bears
James Madison, the father of the federal Constitution, after he had
James McCarthy was acquitted at the Assizes on the strength of a number of objections which had been drawn out by Holmes and submitted to the defending counsel. Old Turner lived for seven months after our interview, but he is now dead; and there is every prospect that the son and daughter may come to live happily together in ignorance of the black cloud which rests upon their past.
James Russell Lowell ridiculed it; faithful servants of the government
Jamestown colony were of German descent. Peter Minuit, the famous
January 31, that the German ambassador at Washington had announced the
January, 1830, set forth clearly and cogently the doctrine that the
Japanese citizens in the United States, and the government at Tokyo
Jefferson Davis, _Rise and Fall of the Confederate Government_.
Jefferson and the Anti-Federalists, whom he charged with spreading false
Jefferson as their candidate for President against John Adams, the
Jefferson had entertained doubts about it and Monroe, destined to be the
Jefferson proposed and Congress adopted in December, 1807, the Embargo
Jefferson was not very well fitted for the strenuous life of political
Jefferson's followers, the Democrats supplemented the reserve law by the
Jefferson's friends accepted the medicine with a wry face as the only
Jefferson's hands. Not until the thirty-sixth ballot on February 17,
Jefferson; and, long after the author of the Declaration of Independence
Jeffersonian school, of whom there were many on occasion even in the
Jersey into Pennsylvania. He knew the effect of such reverses on the
John Adams and Josiah Quincy, who as lawyers thought even the worst
John Bright--and for the victories of Vicksburg and Gettysburg, both
John C. Calhoun of South Carolina. The former contended, in a flair of
John D. Rockefeller, Jr., on the side of the great captains of industry,
John Quincy Adams, formed a bridge between the old and the new in that
John Rutledge, of South Carolina, in the convention which framed the
Johnson, the Vice President, soon after taking office, proposed to
Johnston, Bragg, Pemberton, and Hood, the union forces in the East
Joints._--Hospital statistics show that joints are affected in the
Joseph Alexeevich came in from the drawing room. I seemed to know at
Joseph Alexeevich's advice Pierre had entered the service of the state
Joseph Chamberlain, the distinguished Liberal statesman, thinking no
Joseph G. Cannon, and other members of the "old guard," as they named
Joseph Schafer, _History of the Pacific Northwest_ (ed. 1918).
Joseph Smith of New York, the sect had suffered from many cruel buffets
Journalism in the United States_ (1920).
Julie Karagina, the daughter of excellent and virtuous parents, a girl
Julie on the contrary accepted his attentions readily, though in a
Julner, the French colonel, whispered respectfully: "The King of
July, 1863--checks reckoned as victories though in each instance the
Just about this time, however, there came a break in the uniformity of
Just as Pierre reached the door, the corporal who had offered him
Just as he was going to open it the sounds ceased, the door opened,
Just as he went in he saw that the nurse was hiding something from
Just as horses shy and snort and gather about a dead horse, so the
Just as in a clock, the result of the complicated motion of
Just as in the mechanism of a clock, so in the mechanism of the
Just as prolonged and stubborn is the struggle now proceeding
Just as the United States, under the impetus of Western enterprise,
Just as the mother and son, having reached the middle of the hall,
Just at the time Prince Andrew was living unoccupied at Drissa,
Just before nine o'clock Sherlock Holmes stepped briskly into the room. His features were gravely set, but there was a light in his eye which made me think that he had not been disappointed in his conclusions.
Just before the operation begins they are removed in the tray of the
Just like a boy! And the legs!... I can't look at him..." different
Just search by the first five letters of the filename you want,
Just search by the first five letters of the filename you want,
Just so it now seems as if we have only to admit the law of
Just then Petya came running in from the drawing room.
Just then Zherkov entered the room.
Just then another visitor entered the drawing room: Prince Andrew
Just then at a distance behind Kutuzov was heard the sound of
Just then the countess came in from the sitting room with a weary
Just then the lady companion who lived with Helene came in to
Just then the last chords of the overture were heard and the
Justice Marshall, was later construed to confer powers as wide as the
Justice White was at some pains to state that the law did not apply to
K. Coman, _Economic Beginnings of the Far West_ (2 vols.).
Kaluga road when the vanguard of Ney's army was already emerging
Kamenski the latter was preferred. The general comes to us,
Kamenski." This song had been composed in the Turkish campaign and now
Kammer-Kollezski rampart, awaiting the deputation.
Kansas, he favored regulation of the trusts, a graduated income tax
Karataev God was greater, more infinite and unfathomable than in the
Karataev at night; it sometimes made excursions into the town but
Karataev paused, smiling joyously as he gazed into the fire, and
Karataev smiled thoughtfully and was silent awhile looking at the
Karataev was still sitting at the side of the road under the birch
Karataev's advice he tied with string round the ankles for warmth, and
Karataev, on account of the warm weather and for convenience at
Kaysarov recited.... Kutuzov smilingly nodded his head to the rhythm
Keeping rascals out was no task at all compared with the problem of
Keloid frequently develops in such cicatrices. When situated in the
Kendall, this informal gathering of the faithful both gave and carried
Kentucky and Virginia Resolutions and for the members of the Hartford
Kentucky, as well as upper Georgia and Alabama, and all throughout the
Kentucky, forced the evacuation of Nashville, and opened the way for two
King George and another to the people of England, disavowing the idea of
King George's statue, and "crammed stamps down the throats of
King of Prussia, in order to draw Boris into the conversation.
Knights on the path to dissolution. They waged more strikes than they
Knowing that Denisov had a reputation even in Poland for the
Kochubey met to consider the progress of the war. This committee
Kochubey said a few words about the reception Arakcheev had given
Kolocha and Moskva rivers--was broken and hilly. Between the hollows
Kolocha--which crosses the highroad not at a right angle but at an
Konovnitsyn had understood at once that the news brought was of
Konovnitsyn, and Toll that the movement that had miscarried should
Korchevo--a certain Khandrikov--is up to; till now the additional
Kozlovski scanned the ranks resolutely and included Rostov in his
Kozlovski was squatting on his heels in front of a clerk. The clerk,
Krasnoe he checked the advance because on learning that Napoleon was
Kremlin and that tomorrow everyone would be sent out beyond the
Kremlin, the less he remembered to walk with the sedateness and
Kremlin, were thronging the Moskva and the Stone bridges, a great many
Krems was really of small importance in view of such events as the
Krems-Znaim to the Vienna-Znaim road. Bagration was to make this march
Kuragin asked her opinion of the performance and told her how at a
Kuragin!" whispered Shinshin. Countess Bezukhova turned smiling to the
Kuragin. During the first four days, while no duties were required
Kuragins'. All maintained a solemn silence, listening to the words
Kutuzov accepted the battle, while Napoleon, who was said to be a
Kutuzov and his suite were returning to the town. The commander in
Kutuzov as far as was in his power, instead of trying to check the
Kutuzov bowed with the same smile.
Kutuzov could not yet admit the possibility of retreating beyond
Kutuzov decided to abandon the road connecting him with the troops
Kutuzov did not understand what Europe, the balance of power, or
Kutuzov fell back toward Vienna, destroying behind him the bridges
Kutuzov felt and knew--not by reasoning or science but with the
Kutuzov had said, but the sense of his words spread everywhere because
Kutuzov here woke up, coughed heavily, and looked round at the
Kutuzov informing the prince of the fate that had befallen his son.
Kutuzov never talked of "forty centuries looking down from the
Kutuzov raised his head and looked for a long while into the eyes of
Kutuzov reached Petersburg with the official announcement of that
Kutuzov reproved him for it and feared to send him to the front, and
Kutuzov sat up with one leg hanging down from the bed and his big
Kutuzov seemed preoccupied and did not listen to what the general
Kutuzov to the Emperor. "I can neither punish him if he does wrong nor
Kutuzov turned away. The same smile of the eyes with which he had
Kutuzov walked through the ranks, sometimes stopping to say a few
Kutuzov was in Gorki, near the center of the Russian position. The
Kutuzov was more at ease as to the possibility of himself and his
Kutuzov went out into the porch with Bagration.
Kutuzov when he was in Vienna by the Austrian Hofkriegsrath, the
Kutuzov who had brought the army as far as the Sparrow Hills without
Kutuzov with the following rescript:
Kutuzov without replying, striking the table with his podgy fist.
Kutuzov's expectations that the proposals of capitulation (which
Kutuzov's face as he stood in the open doorway remained perfectly
Kutuzov's order to retreat through Moscow to the Ryazan road was
Kutuzov's party and that of Bennigsen, the chief of staff. Boris
Kutuzov's upper lip twitched unnaturally as he said the word
Kutuzov's words were hardly understood by the troops. No one could
Kutuzov's, collected in groups and began to talk about the awards,
Kutuzov, affecting the manners of an old soldier at the front, gave
Kutuzov, guessing by the sounds of the battle and by Scherbinin's
Kutuzov, his hands still pressed on the seat, glanced at him glumly.
Kutuzov, where he inquired for Bolkonski, all the adjutants and even
Kutuzov, without looking at Wolzogen, gave directions for the
Kutuzov. He found him reclining in an armchair, still in the same
Kutuzov. The plan was based on the fact that the French line of
Kuzmich, asking what the point of the story was as he had not heard it
Kuzminichna who had entered silently. "How he's grinning, the fat mug!
Kuzminichna, raising her arm threateningly. "Go and get the samovar to
LOUIS XVI IN THE HANDS OF THE MOB]
Labor accepted the modern industrial system and, by organization within
Labor disputes also filled the crowded record. A strike at the Pullman
Labor were socialistic, for they advocated public ownership of the
Labor, declared that "this is labor's war," and pledged the united
Larger ships carried the grain, live stock, cloth, and hardware of New
Lastly, Poncet and other members of the Lyons school regard arthritis
Lastly, attention must be directed to the remarkable variations observed
Lastly, the dissemination may be universal throughout the body, and this
Late in the evening, when Rostov was about to leave, he asked
Late one evening the Rostovs' four sleighs drove into Marya
Lateral arching of the body from excessive action of the muscles on one
Lavrushka turned all the bedding over, looked under the bed and
Lavrushka, having got drunk the day before and left his master
Lavrushka, however, ran up to Karp and seized him by the arms from
Laws were made one year only to be repealed the next and reenacted the
Lazarev sat in the place of honor. Russian and French officers
Leadership in the convention, quite properly, was taken by a man born in
Leading from the study was a passage in which a partition with
League of Nations and the clear definition of its objects must be a
Leavenworth the starting point. Along the trail, once surveyed, poured
Left alone, Pierre went on smiling in the same way. Once or twice he
Legal Code, and how painstakingly he had translated the articles of
Legion of Honor for the affair on the seventh of September," he
Leppich's balloon and other articles removed?" "To leave the town
Less frequently the maxilla becomes affected, and the disease may spread
Lesser lights than Franklin, educated by the same process, were found
Lestrade laughed indulgently. "You have, no doubt, already formed your conclusions from the newspapers," he said. "The case is as plain as a pikestaff, and the more one goes into it the plainer it becomes. Still, of course, one can't refuse a lady, and such a very positive one, too. She has heard of you, and would have your opinion, though I repeatedly told her that there was nothing which you could do which I had not already done. Why, bless my soul! here is her carriage at the door."
Lestrade rose in his triumph and bent his head to look. "Why," he shrieked, "you're looking at the wrong side!"
Lestrade shrugged his shoulders. "I am a practical man," he said, "and I really cannot undertake to go about the country looking for a left-handed gentleman with a game leg. I should become the laughing-stock of Scotland Yard."
Lewis and Clark; when published even in a short form, it invited the
Lexington, on April 19, 1775, and closed with the surrender of
Liberty operated in the streets and chose rougher measures. They stirred
Ligation of the hypogastric (internal iliac) by the trans-peritoneal
Lightly swaying on the flexible springs of his carriage and no
Like a somnambulist aroused from her sleep Natasha went out of the
Like all the others near the speaker, Prince Andrew looked at him
Like some huge many-limbed animal, the regiment began to prepare its
Like the Cherokee Indians, whom they had as neighbors, whose very
Like the gentle dove in the fable she was to pine apart from me....
Like the others, Anna Pavlovna Scherer showed Pierre the change of
Like the seaboard colonists before them, they too cherished the spirit
Likhachev got up, rummaged in his pack, and soon Petya heard the
Lincoln and Douglas, both candidates for the United States Senate. In
Lincoln attempted to mitigate the rigors of the law by paroling many
Lincoln empowered General Scott to suspend the writ of _habeas corpus_
Lincoln represented only a little more than one-third the voters of the
Lincoln's day, moved swiftly toward the time when it would be among the
Lincoln, Garfield, and McKinley, three of the gentlest of men, all risen
Lincoln, lifted into national fame by the debates, beat him in the
Listening to the captain's tales, Pierre--as often happens late in
Lister in 1867. In those days few wounds escaped the ravages of pyogenic
Lists of books dealing with the early history of Western states are
Literary Archive Foundation are tax deductible to the full extent
Literary Archive Foundation are tax deductible to the full extent
Loaded carts stood at the house next to Ferapontov's and women were
London and Paris respectively. This was a clear violation of the right
London during the Civil War, when his father was the American
Look at those cramped dead firs, ever the same, and at me too,
Looking down at the waters of the Enns under the bridge, Nesvitski
Lopukhin and the old general occasionally took part in the
Lord North's offer of conciliation, stating that the proposal was
Lord North, who had then for three years been the king's chief minister.
Lord St. Simon shrugged his shoulders and raised his eyebrows. "We have been on a friendly footing for some years--I may say on a very friendly footing. She used to be at the Allegro. I have not treated her ungenerously, and she had no just cause of complaint against me, but you know what women are, Mr. Holmes. Flora was a dear little thing, but exceedingly hot-headed and devotedly attached to me. She wrote me dreadful letters when she heard that I was about to be married, and, to tell the truth, the reason why I had the marriage celebrated so quietly was that I feared lest there might be a scandal in the church. She came to Mr. Doran's door just after we returned, and she endeavoured to push her way in, uttering very abusive expressions towards my wife, and even threatening her, but I had foreseen the possibility of something of the sort, and I had two police fellows there in private clothes, who soon pushed her out again. She was quiet when she saw that there was no good in making a row."
Lord," who planted their settlements in the wilderness. Not until many a
Lorrain from behind her back. The French doctor held no taper; he
Lorrain's instructions. The German doctor went up to Lorrain.
Louis was sent to the scaffold. To the war on Austria, already raging,
Louisiana plantation was so remote from the North that only the
Louisiana territory beyond the Mississippi. Here the process of
Louisiana. Frightened at such enterprises and fearing the dominance of
Louisville, St. Louis, Detroit, and Chicago in the West, naturally
Love of mankind.  5. Courage.  6. Generosity.  7. The love of death.
Lowell, looking upon the espousal of a great cause as the noblest aim of
Luzon, the chief of the Philippine group, with its harbor of Manila. It
Lymph glands are, for the most part, arranged in groups or chains, such
Lymph vessels are divided in all wounds, and the lymph that escapes from
Lymphangiomas are met with in the abdomen in the form of _omental
Lympho-sarcoma can usually be differentiated by the rapid assumption of
M. Beard, _Short History of the American Labor Movement_.
M. Cambon, the Madrid government approached President McKinley for a
M. Farrand, _The Framing of the Constitution of the United States_.
M. de Beausset, the man so fond of travel, having fasted since
M.C. Tyler, _History of American Literature during the Colonial Times_
M.C. Tyler, _Literary History of the American Revolution_ (2 vols.).
M.M. Kalaw, _Self-Government in the Philippines_.
M.T. Copeland, _The Cotton Manufacturing Industry in the United States_
MINING AND MANUFACTURING IN THE WEST
MR TAFT IN THE PHILIPPINES]
Macaulay write in after years that Pitt "was the first Englishman of his
Macdonald, p. 80. Reference: Lodge, _Short History of the English
Macdonald, pp. 176-183; and (3) the Declaration of Independence.
Mack's arrival... What's the matter, Rostov? You look as if you'd just
Mack, the news of his defeat, and the thought of what lay before the
Madame Aubert-Chalme (the center of the whole French colony in Moscow)
Madame Schoss, but perhaps it's not, and this Circassian with the
Madame Schoss, who had been out to visit her daughter, increased the
Madeira"... "Hungarian"... or "Rhine wine" as the case might be. Of
Mademoiselle Bourienne and had read the note to Princess Mary in which
Mademoiselle Bourienne and the little princess had to own to
Mademoiselle Bourienne flushed, and gave the princess a frightened
Mademoiselle Bourienne walked up and down the conservatory for a
Mademoiselle Bourienne was the first to recover herself after this
Mademoiselle Bourienne, the cause of her misery, but also to the man
Mademoiselle George looked sternly and gloomily at the audience
Mademoiselle George was standing in a corner of the drawing room
Mademoiselle Przazdziecka (out of rivalry to the Uhlans who had
Madison insisted that at least one part of the government should rest on
Madison proposed, and the first Congress adopted, a series of amendments
Madison set aside his scruples and signed the bill.
Madmoiselle Bourienne, and the architect; to the other Princess
Maine; he had a majority of the electors in New York and all of them in
Majesty's government disclaimed any responsibility for the losses and
Majesty," said an adjutant who had come from the batteries that were
Majesty--to let us know the number of our troops and the position in
Major Basov; the tipsy officers tossed, embraced, and dropped
Makar Alexeevich in the evening. I shall be there."
Make way, make way!" pushed through the crowd more energetically
Malasha's, and the expression of his eyes caused the little girl to
Malo-Yaroslavets, but Kutuzov lingered with the main army and gave
Malvintseva and, after discussing her plan with the aunt, remarked
Mamma darling, it's not the thing. Please forgive me, darling....
Man in connection with the general life of humanity appears
Man is the creation of an all-powerful, all-good, and all-seeing
Man's actions proceed from his innate character and the motives
Man's mind cannot grasp the causes of events in their
Manufacturers, frightened at the possibility of disordered public
Many advantages, Hamilton contended, would accrue to the government from
Many employers looked upon an increased labor supply as the means of
Many factors helped to enhance the power of the English Church in the
Many historians say that the French did not win the battle of
Many of the things which tended to unite them likewise tended to throw
Many persons withdrew from the circle, noticing the senator's
Marbury case and the state legislatures in a score of cases, Marshall
March 3, 1863, Congress, desiring to lay all doubts about the
March 30, 1867, added to the United States a domain of nearly six
March, 1857, a Democratic measure making drastic reductions in the rates
March, 1862, sealed the fate of the Confederacy. The exploits of the
Marquette, and La Salle had passed forever to the United States.
Marshal Kamenski, visited the English Club, and was on intimate
Marshall, who, as Chief Justice of the Supreme Court of the United
Martineau. She saw all parts of the country, the homes of the rich and
Mary Hendrikhovna assented and began looking for the spoon which
Mary Hendrikhovna was the wife of the regimental doctor, a pretty
Mary Hendrikhovna's hand, and that the "Booby" should go to refill and
Mary and the old prince, and a fear and anxiety of which she did not
Mary and, spreading out before him the plan of the new building and
Mary had turned toward her brother, and through her tears the
Mary says it is a trial sent from above. What is the trial for, when
Mary was asked to play on the clavichord. Anatole, laughing and in
Mary went up hurriedly to Natasha, took her by the hand, and said with
Mary! Say..." And the little princess began to cry capriciously like a
Mary, Dessalles, little Nicholas, and all the old nurses and maids.
Mary, forgetting the geographical position of the Niemen, thought that
Marya Dmitrievna and the countess burst out laughing, and all the
Marya Dmitrievna, having found Sonya weeping in the corridor, made
Maryland and South Carolina were "under the new roof." On June 21, New
Maryland, Virginia, and the distant Carolinas.
Massachusetts in 1637, for daring to dispute with the church fathers, to
Massachusetts in the annual value of manufacturing output.
Massachusetts multiplied and it became impossible for all the members of
Massachusetts took place in the constitutional convention of 1820. There
Massachusetts, by popular vote. For the provincial council there was
Massachusetts, he named the councilors who composed the upper house of
Massachusetts, mainly the daughters of New England farmers, published a
Massachusetts, the great Webster upheld the rights of property in
Massachusetts. Reinforcements were brought to the colonies, for now King
Matas' operation and ligation of the external iliac.
Matrena Matrevna and ask her for the sable cloak. I have heard what
Mautern himself. 'Dearest foe! Flower of the Austrian army, hero of
Mavra Kuzminichna flicked the dust off the clavichord and closed it,
Mavra Kuzminichna grew abashed and confused. The officer did not
Mavra Kuzminichna opened the gate and an officer of eighteen, with
Mavra Kuzminichna, and Vasilich came into the drawing room and, having
Mavra Kuzminichna, who was standing at the gate, had him brought
Mayflower Compact, the Fundamental Orders of Connecticut and the
McKinley chose first the way of diplomacy. A short time after his
McKinley received 271 of the 447 electoral votes, and 7,111,000 popular
Meantime, according to the dispositions which said that "the First
Meanwhile Kutuzov had reached the village and seated himself in
Meanwhile Morel was sitting in the best place by the fire,
Meanwhile Nesvitski, Zherkov, and the officer of the suite were
Meanwhile Prince Vasili had opened the door into the princess' room.
Meanwhile another column was to have attacked the French from the
Meanwhile the Continental Congress was alive to the course of events
Meanwhile the Gentile or non-Mormon population was steadily increasing
Meanwhile the process spreads inside the mouth, and the gums, the floor
Meanwhile the staff officer standing in front pointed out
Meanwhile the younger generation: Boris, the officer, Anna
Meanwhile, Petya, having found and seized the sabers in the outer
Meanwhile, the city itself was deserted. There was hardly anyone
Measured against the immense business of modern times, colonial commerce
Melanin pigment is formed in relation to the cells and stroma of certain
Melk; but despite the courage and endurance--acknowledged even by
Melyukovs joined the mummers.
Men in military uniforms and Hessian boots could be seen through the
Menard--were the first white men to paddle their frail barks through the
Mere to be inscribed on the charitable institutions, thereby combining
Metivier, who came in the morning with his felicitations, considered
Meuse opposite Sedan, twenty-five miles from our line of departure. The
Mexican officer; the Mexican government, although it immediately
Mexico and the United States by drawing a line from the mouth of the
Mexico now slid down the path to disorder. Revolutions and civil
Mexico to inquire into the situation. Although he declared a general
Mexico, the Red River, and the Spanish country. French boatmen and
Mexico. They crossed the trackless plain and desert, laying out trails
Michael Ivanovich rose and went to the study. But as soon as he
Michael Ivanovich went up to the plan, and the prince after speaking
Michael the youngest, at home. Father, he says, 'All my children are
Michaud had only waited for this to bring out the phrase he had
Michaud respectfully delivered the message Kutuzov had entrusted
Michigan in 1855; Baker University in Kansas in 1858; and the University
Michigan, and Maryland, the last approving the referendum only.
Michigan. The national census of 1830 gave 937,000 inhabitants to Ohio;
Microscopical examination of the muscles shows that, prior to the
Middle West and the South, responding to his call, went to the Western
Middle West. Always active in politics, they had, before the Civil War,
Midnight, Central Time, of the last day of the stated month.  A
Midnight, Central Time, of the last day of the stated month.  A
Mikhaylovich Volkonski and Baron Stein, and the door closed behind
Mikhaylovna Drubetskaya, who as a member of the household was also
Mikhaylovna Drubetskaya. Rostov, the father, is Ilya, and his son is
Mikhaylovna and snatching the portfolio from her.
Mikhaylovna enthusiastically, quite forgetting all the humiliation she
Mikhaylovna in passing instinctively glanced into the room, where
Mikhaylovna indicated by her attitude her consciousness of the
Mikhaylovna nodded approvingly. Again Pierre fell into the naively
Mikhaylovna on her left, the other lady visitors were farther down. At
Mikhaylovna returned to the Rostovs' and went to bed. On waking in the
Mikhaylovna with Shinshin. Berg gave his arm to Vera. The smiling
Mikhaylovna's son; Nicholas, the undergraduate, the count's eldest
Mikhaylovna. Though the latter held on tenaciously, her voice lost
Mikhaylovna?" said he. "Let us wait until evening. The doctors are
Milan?" asked Anna Pavlovna, "and of the comedy of the people of Genoa
Military science says that the more troops the greater the strength.
Military science, seeing in history innumerable instances of the
Militiamen and recruits were being enrolled in the villages, and
Milka would immediately pounce on the hare, but she overtook him and
Millions of acres of coal land, such as the government had been
Miloradovich, who said he did not want to know anything about the
Miloradoviches. Like Dokhturov he had the reputation of being a man of
Mindful of the agricultural interest, ever dear to the heart of
Minister of War and went to join the army in Moldavia. While in
Minnesingers has remained the history of Godfreys and Minnesingers,
Minnesota and the Eastern states, Scandinavians, Germans, and Canadians,
Minute nodules of cartilage sometimes form in the synovial membrane of
Miraculous Icon of St. Nicholas, Murat halted to await news from the
Miss Stoner did so, and Holmes, after a careful examination through the open window, endeavoured in every way to force the shutter open, but without success. There was no slit through which a knife could be passed to raise the bar. Then with his lens he tested the hinges, but they were of solid iron, built firmly into the massive masonry. "Hum!" said he, scratching his chin in some perplexity, "my theory certainly presents some difficulties. No one could pass these shutters if they were bolted. Well, we shall see if the inside throws any light upon the matter."
Mississippi Valley the industrial area once confined to the Northern
Mississippi Valley, it is true, the planter with his many slaves even
Mississippi and on both banks of the Missouri to the uttermost limits of
Mississippi current." Three years later the round trip from Louisville
Mississippi there was little to fear, for he had neither the army nor
Mississippi took the lead in 1890; South Carolina followed five years
Mississippi, above the falls of St. Anthony. Some had been still farther
Mississippi, driven out by the onrush of the planters buying and
Mississippi, where the tall grass of the prairies waved like the sea,
Mississippi. At the end of the first decade of the twentieth century,
Missouri Compromise in the same temper that it greeted Clay's
Missouri Valley and across the Great Divide to the Pacific. The story of
Missouri country. Peoples from the North and South flowed together,
Mitchell of Belfast advises exposing the varices at numerous points by
Mitenka flew headlong down the six steps and ran away into the
Modern history has rejected the beliefs of the ancients without
Moines, Iowa. The attention of all municipal reformers was drawn to it
Moist dressings favour the removal of bacteria by promoting the escape
Moist dressings should be employed while the suppuration lasts. Carbolic
Mokhavaya, or Kutafyev Street, nor the Troitsa Gate (places familiar
Momburg recommends an elastic cord wound round the body between the
Momentum (quantity of motion) is the product of mass and velocity.
Monday, July 13, 1863, was the signal for four days of rioting. In the
Money should be paid to the:
Money should be paid to the:
Monmouth, and the inclosure of the British in New York by deploying
Monroe Doctrine to the decision of an international tribunal. The
Monroe was the last of the Presidents belonging to the heroic epoch of
Monroe, on the occasion of an Indian outbreak, ordered General Jackson
Monroe, to France with the power to buy New Orleans and West Florida.
Monsieur Buonaparte sitting on a throne and granting the petitions
Montreal and Upper Canada at your feet." The latter with a light heart
Moore, pp. 163-208. Lodge, _Short History of the English Colonies_, pp.
Morally the wielder of power appears to cause the event;
More commonly, the bone exposed as a result of disappearance of the
More important still, Alpatych learned that on the morning of the
More men collected behind the wattle fence of the Eighth Company
More than a hundred cannon were already in the hands of the French.
More than anything else in Pierre's story the captain was
More than two hours passed and Gerasim took the liberty of making
Morel brought candles and a bottle of wine. The captain looked at
Moreover the migration to the North and West, which had formerly carried
Moreover, Great Britain held to the old rule--"Once an Englishman,
Moreover, during a large part of this period, the direction of affairs
Moreover, he was from the East and the frontiersmen of the West regarded
Moreover, the Western states produced some important raw materials for
Moreover, the assertion made by various writers that his cold was
Morgan group.... Viewed as a whole we find the dominating influences in
Mormon Church in case the practice of plural marriages was not stopped.
Mormons surmounted the most perplexing obstacles with astounding skill.
Morris, "the sheep, simple as they are, cannot be gulled as heretofore."
Mortier raised the spirits of the army considerably. Throughout the
Moscow (Moscou, la ville sainte), the capital of a realm such as the
Moscow and now repudiated the deed; now ordered the people to catch
Moscow and questioned Balashev about the Russian capital, not merely
Moscow and women with children who were with the French transport,
Moscow any day, the trousseau had to be ordered and the estate near
Moscow came to the prince's front door but he gave orders to admit
Moscow could not be missed. The Rostovs' Moscow house had not been
Moscow during the holidays to amuse himself. Nicholas guessed what his
Moscow had been received in Petersburg, a detailed plan of the whole
Moscow had now reached the utmost limit.
Moscow had to be sold, besides which the opportunity of presenting his
Moscow had worn a Persian costume, had now the appearance of a most
Moscow hospitality, did the honors to the prince.
Moscow in an unexpected direction--along the Kaluga road. Dokhturov
Moscow ladies are mad about him! It's 'Dolokhov the Persian' that does
Moscow nor the burning of Moscow nor anything else could seem of
Moscow property--and the countess' repeatedly expressed wish that
Moscow she had been disappointed in the two who had been nearest to
Moscow society, from the old women down to the children, received
Moscow to the Oder the Russian army also suffered from the severity of
Moscow walked on either side of the vehicles seeing the travelers off.
Moscow was burning. The count donned his dressing gown and went out to
Moscow was empty, that everyone had left it. The faces of those who
Moscow was in effect already abandoned. The other generals, however,
Moscow without a battle, or by accepting battle to risk losing the
Moscow, Kutuzov got out of his carriage and sat down on a bench by the
Moscow, Rostopchin, who is usually represented as being the instigator
Moscow, and of course in the Karagins' drawing room, and Julie,
Moscow, and that as the only remaining choice was between losing the
Moscow, and that he had abandoned everything and not left the city,
Moscow, and the Emperor Alexander, helped by the advice of Stein and
Moscow, and the most diverse people met at their suppers. Country
Moscow, and where fire had the same property of consuming what was set
Moscow, but lay at the bottom of the sleigh beside Rostov, who grew
Moscow, but there, without further effort on the part of the Russians,
Moscow, did not disconcert him. He did not lose sight either of the
Moscow, especially such false ones as that you write about--I mean the
Moscow. And as up to the eleventh of July no manifesto or appeal had
Moscow. And the troops retired one more, last, day's march, and
Moscow. As a result he could not go to the country with the rest of
Moscow. But this intrigue did not now occupy the old man's mind. One
Moscow. It was not necessary to entertain so freely as when the
Moscow. The second broadsheet stated that our headquarters were at
Moscow. They had started so late on the first of September, the road
Moscow. Though Petya would remain in the service, this transfer
Moscow?... How splendid!" the thought flashed into his mind that it
Mosetig-Moorhof, consists in disinfecting and drying the cavity by a
Moskva bridge and the officer ran out into the square.
Most Christian Majesty the King of France." John Jay of New York was
Most importance attaches to the fragility of the bones met with in
Most of the guests, uncertain how to regard this sally, looked at
Most people start at our Web site which has the main PG search facility:
Most people start at our Web site which has the main PG search facility:
Mother of God," and the priest and deacon chimed in: "For to Thee
Mother, the Holy Virgin Mother of God'...."
Mounting his horse again Prince Andrew lingered with the battery,
Mounting the steps to the knoll Pierre looked at the scene before
Mouton who, speaking last, said what they all felt: that the one thing
Moved by this frank hostility and anxious for the future, the bank
Moving the money forward he prepared to deal. Rostov sat down by his
Mozhaysk hill, the carts with the wounded, the ringing bells, the
Mr. Bryan took the stump himself, visiting all parts of the country in
Mr. Jabez Wilson started up in his chair, with his forefinger upon the paper, but his eyes upon my companion.
Mr. Klyucharev has been treated in the same way, and so have others
Mr. Platt. And the capital was not here [in Albany]; it was at 49
Mr. Windibank sprang out of his chair and picked up his hat. "I cannot waste time over this sort of fantastic talk, Mr. Holmes," he said. "If you can catch the man, catch him, and let me know when you have done it."
Much commoner is it to meet with localised areas of necrosis due to the
Mucius Scaevola burned his hand. Why should not the same sort of thing
Mugwump movement of the eighties was followed by continuous criticism of
Murat approached the interpreter and told him to ask where the
Murat had not lost sight of the Russians? If Napoleon had not remained
Murat was informed that the way had been cleared. The French entered
Murat's adjutant galloped up with an assurance that the Russians would
Murmurs arose among the wounded who were waiting.
Murphy has found benefit from the introduction into the joint, in the
My experience of camp life in Afghanistan had at least had the effect of making me a prompt and ready traveller. My wants were few and simple, so that in less than the time stated I was in a cab with my valise, rattling away to Paddington Station. Sherlock Holmes was pacing up and down the platform, his tall, gaunt figure made even gaunter and taller by his long grey travelling-cloak and close-fitting cloth cap.
My friend insisted upon my accompanying them in their expedition, which I was eager enough to do, for my curiosity and sympathy were deeply stirred by the story to which we had listened. I confess that the guilt of the banker's son appeared to me to be as obvious as it did to his unhappy father, but still I had such faith in Holmes' judgment that I felt that there must be some grounds for hope as long as he was dissatisfied with the accepted explanation. He hardly spoke a word the whole way out to the southern suburb, but sat with his chin upon his breast and his hat drawn over his eyes, sunk in the deepest thought. Our client appeared to have taken fresh heart at the little glimpse of hope which had been presented to him, and he even broke into a desultory chat with me over his business affairs. A short railway journey and a shorter walk brought us to Fairbank, the modest residence of the great financier.
My friend rose lazily from his armchair and stood with his hands in the pockets of his dressing-gown, looking over my shoulder. It was a bright, crisp February morning, and the snow of the day before still lay deep upon the ground, shimmering brightly in the wintry sun. Down the centre of Baker Street it had been ploughed into a brown crumbly band by the traffic, but at either side and on the heaped-up edges of the foot-paths it still lay as white as when it fell. The grey pavement had been cleaned and scraped, but was still dangerously slippery, so that there were fewer passengers than usual. Indeed, from the direction of the Metropolitan Station no one was coming save the single gentleman whose eccentric conduct had drawn my attention.
My friend was an enthusiastic musician, being himself not only a very capable performer but a composer of no ordinary merit. All the afternoon he sat in the stalls wrapped in the most perfect happiness, gently waving his long, thin fingers in time to the music, while his gently smiling face and his languid, dreamy eyes were as unlike those of Holmes the sleuth-hound, Holmes the relentless, keen-witted, ready-handed criminal agent, as it was possible to conceive. In his singular character the dual nature alternately asserted itself, and his extreme exactness and astuteness represented, as I have often thought, the reaction against the poetic and contemplative mood which occasionally predominated in him. The swing of his nature took him from extreme languor to devouring energy; and, as I knew well, he was never so truly formidable as when, for days on end, he had been lounging in his armchair amid his improvisations and his black-letter editions. Then it was that the lust of the chase would suddenly come upon him, and that his brilliant reasoning power would rise to the level of intuition, until those who were unacquainted with his methods would look askance at him as on a man whose knowledge was not that of other mortals. When I saw him that afternoon so enwrapped in the music at St. James's Hall I felt that an evil time might be coming upon those whom he had set himself to hunt down.
Mytishchi a mile and a half away, and through the night came the noise
Myxomatous tissue is also a prominent constituent of the "innocent
NEW ENGLAND JUMPING INTO THE HANDS OF GEORGE III]
Napoleon III. When explaining these rapid transfers of the people's
Napoleon advanced farther and we retired, thus arriving at the very
Napoleon also did all in his power. He caused the words Maison de ma
Napoleon and preyed upon American commerce, the United States made ready
Napoleon at the battle of Borodino fulfilled his office as
Napoleon began the war with Russia because he could not resist going
Napoleon circumstances changed and the news he brought was already
Napoleon enters Moscow after the brilliant victory de la Moskowa;
Napoleon felt this, and from the time he took up the correct fencing
Napoleon having cut our armies apart advanced far into the country
Napoleon himself had noticed her in the theater and said of her:
Napoleon himself was in Moscow as late as the twenty-fifth. In view of
Napoleon in a strategic trap at the Berezina River. Everyone assured
Napoleon looked up and down the river, dismounted, and sat down on a
Napoleon meant. He could not understand it. For the representative
Napoleon offered to sell the entire domain and get rid of the business
Napoleon pass before the French Guards on the farther bank of the
Napoleon pondered a little in silence and then indicated the spots
Napoleon promised to be in both the Russian capitals by the autumn,
Napoleon rode on, dreaming of the Moscow that so appealed to his
Napoleon rode over the plain and surveyed the locality with a
Napoleon sat at the foot of the knoll, drinking punch, when
Napoleon shifted the whole forthcoming battle from right to left
Napoleon silently shook his head in negation. Assuming the
Napoleon smiled and told them to give the Cossack a horse and
Napoleon smiled and, lifting his head absentmindedly, glanced to the
Napoleon that it all took place by his will. And so the question
Napoleon turned quickly and began to pace the room.
Napoleon turned to Berthier and said he wished to see how the news
Napoleon walked about in front of his tent, looked at the fires
Napoleon was beginning, Anna Pavlovna gave one of her soirees. The
Napoleon was conscious of. "The vibration of my left calf is a great
Napoleon was standing among his troops on the Poklonny Hill looking at
Napoleon who said it. He heard the speaker addressed as Sire. But he
Napoleon with his suite rode up to the Shevardino Redoubt where he
Napoleon's army was the rapidity of its movement, and a convincing
Napoleon's arrangements, the maneuvers, and his profound plans which
Napoleon's caprice. The ideas of the Revolution and the general temper
Napoleon's eyes Prince Andrew thought of the insignificance of
Napoleon's own. See what horses! And the monograms with a crown!
Napoleon's refusal to withdraw his troops beyond the Vistula and to
Napoleon's senseless flight from Moscow, his retreat along the old
Napoleon). So not one of the orders in the disposition was, or could
Napoleon, after making the Cossack a present, had him set free like
Napoleon, and above all this the lofty sky, formed the chief
Napoleon, predestined by Providence for the gloomy role of
Napoleon, riding to Valuevo on the twenty-fourth, did not see (as
Napoleon, standing on the knoll, looked through a field glass, and
Napoleon, the First Consul, who was beginning his remarkable career as
Napoleon, the man of genius, did this! But to say that he
Napoleon, under pressure from his whole army, did the same thing.
Napoleon; yet the historians who described the event later and the men
Napoleons, Louis-es, and authors, we ought to be shown the
Naryshkin. Rostopchin was describing how the Russians had been
Naryshkins' ball in fact, at which he had had the well-remembered
Natalie is very susceptible." This return to the subject of Natalie
Natasha Rostova. The whole letter breathed loving rapture for his
Natasha a Cossack) and she stroked the child's arm as she came up
Natasha and Pierre were living in Petersburg at the time and had
Natasha and Princess Mary looked at one another in silence, and the
Natasha and turned to leave the room, but Pierre held her hand.
Natasha began putting on the dress.
Natasha boldly as she took the letter, and her face expressed a cold
Natasha continued to lean out of the window for a long time, beaming
Natasha did not care for society in general, but prized the more the
Natasha did not follow the golden rule advocated by clever folk,
Natasha did not let her finish. She drew the countess' large hand to
Natasha did not like the visitor's tone of condescension to childish
Natasha did not remember how that day passed nor that night, nor the
Natasha did not speak to Sonya again and avoided her. With the
Natasha fell in love the very moment she entered the ballroom. She
Natasha from the thoughts he expressed in conversation supposed his
Natasha gave him her hand and went out. Princess Mary on the other
Natasha glanced with frightened eyes at the face of the wounded
Natasha got up and Nicholas sat down at the clavichord. Standing as
Natasha had countermanded an order of his, and the servants now came
Natasha had made a strong impression on Kuragin. At supper after the
Natasha had married in the early spring of 1813, and in 1820 already
Natasha kissed her on the hair.
Natasha knew by the sound of his voice.
Natasha knew why he mentioned Mitya's likeness to Nicholas: the
Natasha last saw him. He passed up to the front rows, not noticing
Natasha laughed, and the countess too smiled slightly.
Natasha lay on the bed and in the semidarkness of the room scanned
Natasha left the room with her father and, as if finding it
Natasha liked to test her power over him. He distrusted the order
Natasha lit the candles, one on each side of one of the looking
Natasha looked at the fat actress, but neither saw nor heard nor
Natasha looked from one to the other as a hunted and wounded
Natasha looked in the direction in which her father's eyes were
Natasha looked in the mirrors and could not distinguish her
Natasha looked joyfully at the familiar face of Pierre, "the
Natasha never remembered how she entered the drawing room. When
Natasha put one knee on the armchair, stooped over her mother,
Natasha raised her head and, kissing her friend on the lips, pressed
Natasha ran into the house and went on tiptoe through the
Natasha ran with light footsteps to the anteroom.
Natasha remained alone and, from the time Princess Mary began making
Natasha rose and curtsied to the splendid countess. She was so
Natasha smiled and was on the point of speaking.
Natasha softly closed the door and went with Sonya to the window,
Natasha stepped back to look at herself in the pier glass. The dress
Natasha stepped up to the window and pondered.
Natasha threw off the shawl from her shoulders, ran forward to
Natasha took the first note, her throat swelled, her chest rose, her
Natasha turned her pretty little head toward the elegant young
Natasha was evidently dismayed at the thought of what he might think
Natasha was lying looking steadily straight before her at one of the
Natasha was one of the first to meet him. She was wearing a
Natasha was sixteen and it was the year 1809, the very year to which
Natasha was standing in the middle of the drawing room, emaciated,
Natasha went back to her father in the other box, now quite submissive
Natasha went to the table and without a moment's reflection wrote
Natasha went up and asked him what was the matter. He did not answer
Natasha went up to the monk for his blessing, and advised her to
Natasha would have had no doubt as to the greatness of Pierre's
Natasha's engagement to Bolkonski, and that the wedding would be in
Natasha's face, leaning out of the window, beamed with quizzical
Natasha's grateful look fresh in his mind, had gazed at the comet that
Natasha's looks, as everyone told her, had improved in the
Natasha's occupations, the children's upbringing, were all selected
Natasha's wedding to Bezukhov, which took place in 1813, was the
Natasha, as with animated face she ran into the room.
Natasha, for whom he cared more than for anyone else in the family,
Natasha, pale, with a fixed look, was sitting on the bench under the
Natasha, seeing the impression the of her brother's wound produced
Natasha, that winter, had for the first time begun to sing
Natasha, the young Melyukovs' favorite, disappeared with them into
Natasha, who had borne the first period of separation from her
Natasha, who had come in during the conversation, looked joyfully at
Natasha, with the ardor characteristic of all she did suddenly set
Natasha. (Ramballe despised both these kinds of love equally: the
Natasha. In the whole narrative she saw only Pierre and his
Natasha. The same thought was meanwhile tormenting Princess Mary.
Natasha. Though with the intimacy now established between the
Natasha; but they are kindly folk and form the best possible setting
Nathaniel Bacon vainly attempted to stir the colonial governor to put up
Nation_ (Riverside Series), pp. 20-26, especially the map on p. 23, and
Nations. The United States had participated in a general European
Nativity of the Virgin. But there seemed to be no one to celebrate
Neapolitans. The Imperial army, strictly speaking, was one third
Near the altar of the church at Bald Hills there was a chapel over
Near the end of that month he read to his cabinet the draft of a
Nebraska bill: the Benedict Arnold of 1854." City after city burned him
Needling or acupuncture consists in piercing the nerve at intervals in
Neighbors_, Vol. II, pp. 174-269; Elson, _History of the United States_,
Neither Bennigsen nor the Emperor was there, but Chernyshev, the
Neither Pierre nor any of the others spoke of what they had seen
Neither army was broken up, but the Russian army retreated immediately
Neither the great civil conflict--the clash of two systems--nor the
Nesvitski rose, puffing, and went up to the general, smiling.
Nesvitski was there as an old member of the Club. Pierre, who at his
Nesvitski. "They've made up splendid packs for me--fit to cross the
Netherland in the valley of the Hudson. The founders of Massachusetts
Neuro-fibromatosis is frequently accompanied by _pigmentation of the
Nevada, the Reclamation Act of 1902 was passed, providing for the
Never had love been so much in the air, and never had the amorous
Never in my life have I seen such a sight. The man's face peeled off under the sponge like the bark from a tree. Gone was the coarse brown tint! Gone, too, was the horrid scar which had seamed it across, and the twisted lip which had given the repulsive sneer to the face! A twitch brought away the tangled red hair, and there, sitting up in his bed, was a pale, sad-faced, refined-looking man, black-haired and smooth-skinned, rubbing his eyes and staring about him with sleepy bewilderment. Then suddenly realising the exposure, he broke into a scream and threw himself down with his face to the pillow.
Nevertheless all these things left untouched the springs of power that
Nevertheless the victory of the Democrats was decisive. Their candidate,
Nevertheless, the Americans owed much of their prosperity to the
Nevertheless, the local societies continued their organization and
New England answered the challenge of Calhoun and Clay. Fortunately its
New England was almost purely English. During the years between 1629 and
New England weak and almost bankrupt. The French and Indian struggle was
New England, on the other hand, was strongly in favor of assumption;
New England. It was then that the daughters of the Puritans, outdone by
New Hampshire (1784), and Georgia (1798), gave the ballot to all who
New Hampshire legislature which infringed upon the charter received by
New Jersey, the battle of Trenton, the seizure of Philadelphia by the
New Orleans offered easier means of physical communication to the sea
New Orleans, Atlanta, Memphis, Nashville, and Houston stood in the same
New Orleans. His reputation as a military hero was enhanced by the
New York Anglicans, alarmed at the growth of religious dissent and the
New York and Delaware, were English. During the early days of all, save
New York and Virginia, where the question of ratification was still
New York and reared in Tennessee; and the constitution as finally
New York, Rhinebeck-on-the-Hudson became a similar center for
New York, the shipbuilders of New England, looking to the seaboard and
New York, turned the affair to good account. He secured the adoption of
New growths taking origin in the synovial membrane are rare, and are not
New growths which originate in the skeleton are spoken of as _primary
News was received at the Emperor's quarters that very day of a fresh
Next day Prince Andrew thought of the ball, but his mind did not
Next day Prince Vasili had arrived and settled in the count's house.
Next day he came early, dined, and stayed the whole evening.
Next day he woke late. Recalling his recent impressions, the first
Next day the Emperor arrived in Moscow, and several of the
Next day the Emperor left Moscow. The assembled nobles all took
Next day the French army did not renew their attack, and the remnant
Next day the countess called Boris aside and had a talk with him,
Next day the decrepit Kutuzov, having given orders to be called
Next day the field marshal gave a dinner and ball which the
Next day the following letter was sent to Napoleon:
Next day the imperial gentleman-in-waiting, the Comte de Turenne,
Next day the old count called his son aside and, with an embarrassed
Next day the prince did not say a word to his daughter, but she
Next day the troops assembled in their appointed places in the
Next day toward evening the princess set off, and Pierre's head
Next day, at eight in the morning, Pierre and Nesvitski drove to the
Next day, having been invited by the count, Prince Andrew dined with
Next day, overtaking the army, he went in a carriage to the
Next day, the army began its campaign, and up to the very battle
Next day, the third of March, soon after one o'clock, two hundred
Next day, with the sole idea of not sparing himself and not
Next morning Marya Dmitrievna took the young ladies to the Iberian
Next morning when the valet came into the room with his coffee,
Next morning, after the fatigues of their journey, the travelers
Next morning, having taken leave of no one but the count, and not
Next, bolts for the doors of the new building were wanted and had to
Ney, who came last, had been busying himself blowing up the walls of
Nicholas Bolkonski in order to arrange a match for him with the
Nicholas Rostov experienced this blissful condition to the full
Nicholas Rostov meanwhile remained at his post, waiting for the
Nicholas alone was in danger the countess imagined that she loved
Nicholas and Julie were saying to one another. The governess kept
Nicholas and Natasha always brought him back to the health of Prince
Nicholas began pacing up and down the room.
Nicholas came the crunching, whistling sound of Sonya's feet in her
Nicholas coughed and said no more. Countess Mary moved away from the
Nicholas did not go to Moscow, and the countess did not renew the
Nicholas did not reply and tried to avoid speaking of the princess
Nicholas disliked being waked. Then through the door she heard
Nicholas expressed his disapproval of the postponement of the
Nicholas gave the horses the rein, and Zakhar, stretching out his
Nicholas immediately recognized Princess Mary not so much by the
Nicholas looked at her face with surprise. It was the same face he
Nicholas looked into the radiant eyes that were gazing at him, and
Nicholas married to an heiress occupied the old countess' mind more
Nicholas neither saw nor heard Daniel until the chestnut,
Nicholas ordered the horses to be saddled. But just as Daniel was
Nicholas overtook the first sleigh. They were driving downhill and
Nicholas promised to come and blushed again as he bowed. At the
Nicholas put all his horses to a gallop and passed Zakhar. The
Nicholas put down the book and looked at his wife. The radiant
Nicholas refused the match she had found for him, she would have to
Nicholas sent the man to call Natasha and Petya to him, and rode
Nicholas set off, following the first sleigh; behind him the
Nicholas sighed, bit his mustache, and laid out the cards for a
Nicholas telling of his meeting with Princess Mary in Bogucharovo. The
Nicholas took the two letters, one of which was from his mother
Nicholas tried to keep silence when his mother spoke of the
Nicholas was present, was held in the cathedral for the Russian
Nicholas was spending the last of his leave at home. A fourth letter
Nicholas was the first to meet her, as the countess' room could only
Nicholas was with the Russian army in Paris when the news of his
Nicholas went out holding the child by the hand.
Nicholas would not hear of remaining in Moscow, and only awaited the
Nicholas would turn the broken ring on his finger and would drop his
Nicholas' animation vanished. He waited for the first pause in the
Nicholas' first feeling on hearing the news was one of anger with
Nicholas' position became worse and worse. The idea of putting
Nicholas, and running out from the porch he went round the corner of
Nicholas, not stopping to talk to the man, asked his sister and
Nicholas, scratching Milka behind the ears.
Nicholas, who when he heard that the war was being discussed had
Nicholas, who, as the roads were in splendid condition, wanted to
Nicholas--having exchanged kisses with the landowner, with whom he was
Nicholas. He wrote from the province of Voronezh where he had been
Nicholas. The old prince knew very well that he tormented his daughter
Niemen, and, changing into a Polish uniform, he drove to the riverbank
Night had come. There were stars in the sky and the new moon shone
Nine days after the abandonment of Moscow, a messenger from
No one in the house sent people about or gave them as much trouble
No one replied and Princess Mary, looking round at the crowd,
No residents were left in Moscow, and the soldiers--like water
No ulcerative process responds so readily to medicinal treatment as the
No, it was something, something in the drawing room. Princess Mary
Noguchi and Moore have discovered the spirochaete in the brain in a
None of the prisoners said a word.
None of them, not even the middle-aged Dimmler, wanted to break
Nor did the brilliant exploits of John Paul Jones and Captain John Barry
Nor did the latter, having risen and curtsied, know what to do.
Nor do words alone prove that only he understood the meaning of
North America according to the Treaty of 1783
North Carolina and Georgia denied the ballot to any one who was not a
North Carolina, clashed with him at Guilford Court House, retired to the
North West of the Ohio," protesting that "scarce a valuable spot within
North and South" required the admission of their state as a slave
North, closed their doors; stocks and bonds came down in a crash on the
North, on the other hand, supplemented agriculture by commerce, trade,
North, the Republicans for a long time added the advantages that came
North. Although minor additions were made from time to time, the greater
North. Finally, to cap the climax, they regretted that planters spent
North. In the development of mineral wealth, enormous strides were
Northern arms with victory. Is it in the field of diplomacy? Does
Northern commonwealths.... When the Republican party resolved to
Northern markets. Other lines struck inland from the coast, giving a
Northern members joined with Southern members in condemning the system
Northern states, Kentucky the following year reaffirmed its position and
Northwest during the early years of the nineteenth century were agreed
Northwest territory the small farmer reigned supreme. In this immense
Northwest, forever free; while the southern portion was left to slavery.
Northwest, running back into the heroic days when French hunters and
Northwest; but still they were relatively small compared with the
Nostitz, the Austrian general occupying the advanced posts, believed
Not expecting to come on the enemy down by the stream, and having
Not far from the artillery campfire, in a hut that had been prepared
Not finding the young prince in his study the valet went with the
Not letting the abbe and Pierre escape, Anna Pavlovna, the more
Not one of the plans Nicholas tried succeeded; the estate was sold
Not only Princess Mary, who had been won by his gentleness with the
Not only did the Russians not fortify the position on the field of
Not only on that day, as he rode over the battlefield strewn with
Not only was the Russian army on the twenty-sixth defended by
Not satisfied with his veto and his declaration against the bank,
Not to speak of the fact that no description of the collective
Nothing is so necessary for a young man as the society of clever
Nothing is the cause. All this is only the coincidence of conditions
Nothing more stirred behind the screens and the French infantry
Noticing him, an officer said: "The town is being abandoned. Get
Noticing the black outline of a man crossing the road, Dolokhov
Notwithstanding the tone of wearied assurance with which these words
November, 1917, some anxiety was early expressed as to the stand which
November, the last day of the Krasnoe battles, it was already
November; and the government under it went into effect the next year.
Now all these men were replaced by Speranski on the civil side,
Now the other sister, though they are the same family, is quite
Now why are you asking silly questions about the Fire Brigade? They
Nowhere could he see the battlefield he had expected to find, but only
Number One of the second gun's crew was "uncle"; Tushin looked at
Number Two with a trembling hand placed a charge in the cannon's
Number one jumped briskly aside. The gun rang out with a deafening
Nurse's dirty feather bed on the top of the chest, crumpling her gauzy
OF THE
ON TO THE PACIFIC--TEXAS AND THE MEXICAN WAR
OR INCIDENTAL DAMAGES, EVEN IF YOU GIVE NOTICE OF THE
OR INCIDENTAL DAMAGES, EVEN IF YOU GIVE NOTICE OF THE
Ober-Hofmarschal Count Tolstoy, who had ridden out to the
Objects so sterilised are dry when removed from the steriliser. This
Obolenski's Cossacks and went to Belaya Tserkov where the regiment
Observations show that the spirochaetes lose their capacity for movement
Observing the United States heavily involved in its own problems, the
Occasionally gases are evolved in the tissues, giving rise to emphysema.
Occasionally he stopped, listened to the firing, and gazed
October 1, the commissioners of the two countries met at Paris to bring
October began to occur. The superior officers all wanted to
October in a letter that reached Kutuzov after the battle at Tarutino)
October. Its first period had passed: when the partisans themselves,
Of a fourth opinion the most conspicuous representative was the
Of all the affairs awaiting Pierre that day the sorting of Joseph
Of all the combinations in which men unite for collective action one
Of all the problems which have been submitted to my friend, Mr. Sherlock Holmes, for solution during the years of our intimacy, there were only two which I was the means of introducing to his notice--that of Mr. Hatherley's thumb, and that of Colonel Warburton's madness. Of these the latter may have afforded a finer field for an acute and original observer, but the other was so strange in its inception and so dramatic in its details that it may be the more worthy of being placed upon record, even if it gave my friend fewer openings for those deductive methods of reasoning by which he achieved such remarkable results. The story has, I believe, been told more than once in the newspapers, but, like all such narratives, its effect is much less striking when set forth en bloc in a single half-column of print than when the facts slowly evolve before your own eyes, and the mystery clears gradually away as each new discovery furnishes a step which leads on to the complete truth. At the time the circumstances made a deep impression upon me, and the lapse of two years has hardly served to weaken the effect.
Of late, since the Emperor's return from the army, there had been
Of the Russian commanders Kutuzov alone understood this. When the
Of the activities that presented themselves to him, army service was
Of the artillery baggage train which had consisted of a hundred
Of the generals who served under him, none can really be said to have
Of the numerous bursae in the popliteal space, that _between the
Of the three precepts of Freemasonry Pierre realized that he did not
Of the war Princess Mary thought as women do think about wars. She
Of these four lines of travel, the Pittsburgh route offered the most
Of these, one of the most important is undue movement of the affected
Officer!" said Bagration to Rostov, "are the enemy's skirmishers still
Officious hands, Russian and French, immediately seized the cross
Often, listening to the pilgrims' tales, she was so stimulated by
Oh, no; not half the time or half way.... From the days of Fenton and
Ohio Valley, proved a boon to the pioneers rather than a foe to be
Ohio state constitutional convention in February, 1912, he indorsed the
Ohio to St. Louis. A fourth, the most famous of them all, passed through
Ohio, Indiana, and Illinois were flooded with the local bank notes of
Ohio. The little posts founded at Marietta and Cincinnati had grown into
Oka, which cannot be crossed early in winter. This was the first
Old Daniel Terentich, the count's valet (as he was called), came
Old Dominion began treaties of commerce and amity with New York and the
Old Gabriel brought in the wine.
Old Michael was asleep on the chest. Prokofy, the footman, who was
Old Prince Bolkonski heard all the rumors current in the town from
Old South Church in Boston; and he denied the writ of _habeas corpus_ to
Old World a chance to reach the New--an opportunity to wrestle with fate
Old World and from the Eastern states, impelled by curiosity, made their
Old World but stirred to its depths the young republic of the New World.
Oldenburg, that the cause of the war was the violence done to him;
Oldenburg," said Prince Bolkonski. "He shifts the Dukes about as I
Olga went out. Pierre stood looking at the sisters; then he bowed
Olmutz and, entering the house occupied by Kutuzov, asked for
Olmutz, was preparing to be reviewed next day by the two Emperors--the
On August 25, the eve of the battle of Borodino, M. de Beausset,
On December 6--St. Nicholas' Day and the prince's name day--all
On February 26, 1807, the old prince set off on one of his circuits.
On Friday the Rostovs were to return to the country, but on
On July 3, the Spanish fleet under Admiral Cervera, in attempting to
On Kutuzov's staff, among his fellow officers and in the army
On May 7, without warning, the ship was struck by two torpedoes and in a
On November 1 Kutuzov had received, through a spy, news that the
On October 11, 1805, one of the infantry regiments that had just
On October 11, the day when all was astir at headquarters over the
On October 22, Denisov (who was one of the irregulars) was with
On October 25, 1760, King George II died and the British crown passed to
On Saturday, the thirty-first of August, everything in the
On September 17, 1787, the Constitution, having been finally drafted in
On account of the relations of the artery and of its branches, treatment
On behalf of the loyalists, or Tories as they were popularly known,
On coming to a path in the forest along which he could see far to
On covered parts the clothing, by deflecting the shot, influences the
On economic matters, the opinions of the two leaders were also
On entering the earthwork he noticed that there were men doing
On entering the room now he crossed himself, turning toward the
On everything--far and near--lay the magic crystal glitter seen only
On examination the joint presents a normal appearance, but the skin
On exposing the wound it is found that the parts for some distance
On glancing over my notes of the seventy odd cases in which I have during the last eight years studied the methods of my friend Sherlock Holmes, I find many tragic, some comic, a large number merely strange, but none commonplace; for, working as he did rather for the love of his art than for the acquirement of wealth, he refused to associate himself with any investigation which did not tend towards the unusual, and even the fantastic. Of all these varied cases, however, I cannot recall any which presented more singular features than that which was associated with the well-known Surrey family of the Roylotts of Stoke Moran. The events in question occurred in the early days of my association with Holmes, when we were sharing rooms as bachelors in Baker Street. It is possible that I might have placed them upon record before, but a promise of secrecy was made at the time, from which I have only been freed during the last month by the untimely death of the lady to whom the pledge was given. It is perhaps as well that the facts should now come to light, for I have reasons to know that there are widespread rumours as to the death of Dr. Grimesby Roylott which tend to make the matter even more terrible than the truth.
On hearing that sound Natasha put down the stocking, leaned nearer
On her way past the butler's pantry she told them to set a
On him the bitter experience of the Revolution and of later days made a
On his return from Italy he finds the government in Paris in a
On his return to Moscow from the army, Nicholas Rostov was
On his way home from Vorontsovo, as he was passing the Bolotnoe
On his way to the house Pierre kept thinking of Prince Andrew, of
On longitudinal section of a long bone during the active stage of the
On moving to the drawing room he handed the letter to Princess
On one of his estates the three hundred serfs were liberated and
On one side of the ledger may be set innumerable generous records--of
On our right flank commanded by Bagration, at nine o'clock the
On parts of the body other than the face, the disease is even more
On post-mortem examination the lesions found in these cases are: (1)
On re-entering the shed Prince Andrew lay down on a rug, but he
On reaching Smolensk on the evening of the fourth of August he put
On reaching the vestibule Natasha saw a tall figure in a fur coat
On reaching the village he dismounted and went to the nearest house,
On receiving command of the armies Kutuzov remembered Prince
On receiving news of Natasha's illness, the countess, though not
On receiving this dispatch the Emperor sent Prince Volkonski to
On returning from a second inspection of the lines, Napoleon
On returning from the review, Kutuzov took the Austrian general into
On returning home in the evening he would jot down in his notebook
On returning late in the evening Sonya went to Natasha's room, and
On returning to France, to the bosom of the great, strong,
On section, the tumour is usually laminated, and is seen to consist
On section, the tumour tissue presents a brilliant orange or saffron
On seeing the Russian general he threw back his head, with its
On seeing the crowd and the bloodstained man the workman ceased
On stretching the skin the vessels can be seen to form a fine network,
On such feelings, more or less dimly shared by all, the unanimity
On that first evening Bolkonski spent with him, having mentioned the
On that third of March, all the rooms in the English Club were
On the 4th, McKinley, evidently convinced that promises did not mean
On the French side, amid the groups with cannon, a cloud of smoke
On the Poklonny Hill, four miles from the Dorogomilov gate of
On the Pratzen Heights, where he had fallen with the flagstaff in
On the Tverskoy Boulevard a familiar voice called to him.
On the appointed day Prince Andrew entered Count Arakcheev's waiting
On the assumption that the condition is the result of an
On the basis of the report of his agent, Cleveland came to the
On the contrary they looked upon property owners as the only safe
On the contrary, just because he happened to be there he thought
On the contrary, the army had never under the best material
On the contrary. We wanted liberty, but Buonaparte has destroyed it."
On the day the count left, Sonya and Natasha were invited to a big
On the eighteenth and nineteenth of November, the army advanced
On the eighth of September an officer--a very important one
On the eleventh of July, which was Saturday, the manifesto was
On the eve of his departure from Petersburg Prince Andrew brought
On the eve of the Sunday when the special prayer was read, Pierre
On the evening of October 11 Seslavin came to the Aristovo
On the evening of the first of September, after his interview with
On the evening of the last day's march an order had been received
On the evening of the twenty-fourth of June, Count Zhilinski
On the evening of the twenty-sixth of August, Kutuzov and the
On the face and neck, wounds heal rapidly, and stitches may be removed
On the faces of all the Russians and of the French soldiers and
On the first arrival of the news of the battle of Austerlitz, Moscow
On the first of September he had come to Moscow from the army.
On the first point, the mandate under which the convention was sitting
On the fourth day fires broke out on the Zubovski rampart.
On the high ground where the enemy was, the smoke of a cannon
On the inner surface of the skull, the formation of gummatous tissue may
On the morning of the day that the young couple were to arrive,
On the morning of the fourth of October Kutuzov signed the
On the morning of the twenty-fifth Pierre was leaving Mozhaysk. At
On the night of March 5, 1770, a crowd on the streets of Boston began to
On the night of the eleventh of October he lay leaning on his arm
On the ninth of August Prince Vasili at Anna Pavlovna's again met
On the one side reflection shows that the expression of a man's
On the one side, it involved the export of raw materials and
On the opposite side stood Dolokhov's Cossack, counting the
On the opposite side the enemy could be seen by the naked eye, and
On the other hand the dalliance with American democracy was regarded by
On the other hand, the formation of new bone may be _exaggerated_, the
On the other hand, the pioneers of Kentucky, Ohio, and Tennessee,
On the other hand, the toxaemia may be of a profound type associated with
On the other hand, there are conditions which retard the natural arrest.
On the other question, how the battle of Borodino and the
On the other side, American commerce involved the import trade,
On the rest of the way to Moscow, though the princess' position
On the right a single deep report of a cannon resounded and died
On the rug-covered bench where Pierre had seen him in the morning
On the same day the Chief of Police came to Pierre, inviting him
On the second of October a Cossack, Shapovalov, who was out
On the seventeenth of August Rostov and Ilyin, accompanied by
On the seventh of August Prince Bagration wrote as follows from
On the sixth, which was his name day when the house would be full of
On the tenth of October when Dokhturov had gone halfway to
On the third day after Christmas Nicholas dined at home, a thing
On the third day after Kutuzov's report a country gentleman
On the third day after his arrival he heard from the Drubetskoys
On the third day after leaving Moscow Karataev again fell ill with
On the third day of Christmas week, after the midday dinner, all the
On the third of September Pierre awoke late. His head was aching,
On the thirteenth of August Pierre reached Moscow. Close to the
On the thirteenth of July the Pavlograds took part in a serious
On the thirteenth of June a rather small, thoroughbred Arab horse
On the thirteenth of June the French and Russian Emperors arrived in
On the thirty-first of December, New Year's Eve, 1809 --10 an old
On the twelfth of July, on the eve of that action, there was a heavy
On the twelfth of November, Kutuzov's active army, in camp before
On the twenty-eighth of August he arrived. The passionate tenderness
On the twenty-eighth of October Kutuzov with his army crossed to the
On the twenty-fifth of August, so his historians tell us, Napoleon
On the twenty-fourth of August the battle of the Shevardino
On the twenty-fourth the weather cleared up after a spell of rain,
On the twenty-ninth of May Napoleon left Dresden, where he had spent
On the twenty-ninth of November Kutuzov entered Vilna--his "dear
On the way back Nicholas drove at a steady pace instead of racing
On the way home, Prince Andrew could not refrain from asking
On the way to his sister's room, in the passage which connected
On these three considerations alone is based the conception of
On this basis he then proposed the settlement that had to follow the
On two sides black curling clouds of smoke rose and spread from the
On waking she listened to what was going on behind the door and,
On what, then, was Count Rostopchin's fear for the tranquillity of
Once again, as in the days of the Napoleonic wars, the people seriously
Once in summer he had sent for the village elder from Bogucharovo, a
Once more the conversations concentrated, the ladies' at the one end
Once more the people of the earth began to explore the principles of
Once the infection has gained access to the sheath, it tends to spread,
Once, when in a room with a lamp dimly lit before the icon Theodosia
One army fled and the other pursued. Beyond Smolensk there were
One by one the carts with the wounded had moved out of the yard.
One cannon ball after another whistled by and struck the
One could already see the soldiers' shaggy caps, distinguish the
One day he took the countess to a Roman Catholic church, where she
One day in midwinter when sitting in the schoolroom attending to her
One day toward the end of December Natasha, pale and thin, dressed
One desperate, frightened yell from the first French soldier who saw
One fair-haired young soldier of the third company, whom Prince
One group of the French stood close to the road, and two of them,
One morning, at a little before seven o'clock, I was awakened by the maid tapping at the door to announce that two men had come from Paddington and were waiting in the consulting-room. I dressed hurriedly, for I knew by experience that railway cases were seldom trivial, and hastened downstairs. As I descended, my old ally, the guard, came out of the room and closed the door tightly behind him.
One must pity the animals too. Eh, the rascal! Now you've curled up
One night when the old countess, in nightcap and dressing jacket,
One night--it was in June, '89--there came a ring to my bell, about the hour when a man gives his first yawn and glances at the clock. I sat up in my chair, and my wife laid her needle-work down in her lap and made a little face of disappointment.
One night--it was on the twentieth of March, 1888--I was returning from a journey to a patient (for I had now returned to civil practice), when my way led me through Baker Street. As I passed the well-remembered door, which must always be associated in my mind with my wooing, and with the dark incidents of the Study in Scarlet, I was seized with a keen desire to see Holmes again, and to know how he was employing his extraordinary powers. His rooms were brilliantly lit, and, even as I looked up, I saw his tall, spare figure pass twice in a dark silhouette against the blind. He was pacing the room swiftly, eagerly, with his head sunk upon his chest and his hands clasped behind him. To me, who knew his every mood and habit, his attitude and manner told their own story. He was at work again. He had risen out of his drug-created dreams and was hot upon the scent of some new problem. I rang the bell and was shown up to the chamber which had formerly been in part my own.
One of the doctors came out of the tent in a bloodstained apron,
One of the generals rode up to Napoleon and ventured to offer to
One of the hindmost guns that was going onto the dam turned off onto
One of the men came out of the crowd and went up to Rostov.
One of the men got up and went over to the Fifth Company.
One of the most constant symptoms is a copious perspiration, the patient
One of the most obvious and advantageous departures from the
One of the most striking features of syphilis is that it may be
One of the next arrivals was a stout, heavily built young man with
One of the old men nearest to him looked round, but his attention
One of the players said he hoped he might be trusted.
One of the wounded, an old soldier with a bandaged arm who was
One of them was leading by the bridle a fine large French horse he
One of these was running to cross the path of Count Rostopchin's
One or more abscesses may form along the course of the vessels, or a
One person, better dressed than the rest, seemed to know everyone
One shot struck a French soldier's foot, and from behind the screens
One variety or another of _wool_, rendered absorbent by the extraction
One would have thought that under the almost incredibly wretched
One, holding a mop, his legs far apart, sprang to the wheel; while
Only Count Orlov-Denisov with his Cossacks (the least important
Only Countess Helene, considering the society of such people as
Only by following at some distance could one cut across the zigzag
Only by reducing this element of free will to the infinitesimal,
Only by separating the two sources of cognition, related to one
Only by taking infinitesimally small units for observation (the
Only by watching closely moment by moment the movement of that
Only in our self-confident day of the popularization of knowledge-
Only now did Pierre realize the full strength of life in man and the
Only now, on his visit to Bald Hills, did Pierre fully realize the
Only now, when he was confronted by the stern authorities, did his
Only some carts and carriages were passing by. From one of the drivers
Only the eldest princess, the one with the stony face and long
Only the expression of the will of the Deity, not dependent on time,
Only the lid of the case containing the carpets would not shut down. A
Only the really heartless, the stupid ones of that household, and
Only the recognition of the fact that he possessed this feeling
Only to the old countess at night in bed could Natasha have told all
Only two things indicated the social condition of Moscow--the
Only when Bennigsen had entered the hut did Kutuzov leave his corner
Only when the victim ceased to struggle and his cries changed to a
Open the door, there!" he shouted. "Why have you shut it?"
Operative interference is indicated also when the functional result will
Opium War on China, negotiated with the Celestial Empire a successful
Or in other words, the conception of a cause is inapplicable to
Order after order was issued by the French commanders that day
Orders in Council and paid the tax were almost certain to fall a prey to
Oregon port of Astoria. The next year a vessel from Hongkong brought
Organic Act for the Philippines passed in 1916. This measure provided
Orientals. Such proceedings placed the federal government in an
Orleans to the Eastern seaboard. The railways followed the same paths.
Orleans to the Rocky Mountains. While he controlled the mouth of the
Orlov-Denisov, still waiting for the other columns to arrive, advanced
Orphanage; now claimed the glory of having hinted that he would burn
Osseous ankylosis may occur, especially in the small joints of the hand
Ossification in the adductor longus was first described by Billroth
Ossification in the deltoid and pectoral muscles has been observed in
Osteomyelitis is rare in the bones of the carpus and tarsus, and the
Ostermann and Sedmoretzki, and all that the peasants had has been
Ostrogorski, _Democracy and the Organization of Political Parties_, Vol.
Other conditions being equal, the prospects of success are greatest with
Other detachments passed through the Kremlin and encamped along
Other lines to the Pacific were projected at the same time; but the
Other measures for combating the local sepsis, such as the irrigation
Other types of eruption are less common, and are met with from the third
Otis when the constitutional argument failed. "A time may come when
Otradnoe wood. The old count's horse, a sorrel gelding called
Oudinot's carriages. In April the Pavlograds were stationed
Our client of the morning had hurried forward to meet us with a face which spoke her joy. "I have been waiting so eagerly for you," she cried, shaking hands with us warmly. "All has turned out splendidly. Dr. Roylott has gone to town, and it is unlikely that he will be back before evening."
Our conception of the degree of freedom often varies according to
Our family life goes on in the old way except for my brother
Our visitor gave a rather shamefaced laugh. "Shillings have not been so plentiful with me as they once were," he remarked. "I had no doubt that the gang of roughs who assaulted me had carried off both my hat and the bird. I did not care to spend more money in a hopeless attempt at recovering them."
Our visitor glanced with some apparent surprise at the languid, lounging figure of the man who had been no doubt depicted to him as the most incisive reasoner and most energetic agent in Europe. Holmes slowly reopened his eyes and looked impatiently at his gigantic client.
Our visitor staggered to his feet and clutched the mantelpiece with his right hand. Holmes unlocked his strong-box and held up the blue carbuncle, which shone out like a star, with a cold, brilliant, many-pointed radiance. Ryder stood glaring with a drawn face, uncertain whether to claim or to disown it.
Out of this clash of opinion also came compromise. One branch, the House
Outside of New England the idea of compulsory education was not regarded
Outside, there was the same cold stillness and the same moon, but
Over the whole field, previously so gaily beautiful with the glitter
Over there, where the shouting came from, a fire flared up and went
Overtaking the battalions that continued to advance, he stopped
Owing to the count's customary carelessness nothing was ready for
Owing to the laxity of the tissues, it increases rapidly, and it may
Owing to the rapidity of the French flight and the Russian pursuit
Owing to the swelling and condensation of the parts around, the pus thus
Owing to the terrible uproar and the necessity for concentration and
Owing to the uncertainty in the results of cutis-grafting the
P.E. Chadwick, _Causes of the Civil War_ (American Nation Series).
P.F. Hall, _Immigration and Its Effects on the United States_.
P.L. Ford, _Essays on the Constitution of the United States_.
PART I. THE COLONIAL PERIOD
PART I. THE COLONIAL PERIOD
PART III. FOUNDATIONS OF THE UNION AND NATIONAL POLITICS
PART III. THE UNION AND NATIONAL POLITICS
PART IV. THE WEST AND JACKSONIAN DEMOCRACY
PART IV. THE WEST AND JACKSONIAN DEMOCRACY
PART VII. PROGRESSIVE DEMOCRACY AND THE WORLD WAR
PART VII. PROGRESSIVE DEMOCRACY AND THE WORLD WAR
POISONING BY INSECTS.--The bites of certain insects, such as
POPULATION OF THE OUTLYING POSSESSIONS: 1920 AND 1910
POPULATION OF THE UNITED STATES, BY STATES: 1920, 1910, 1900
PRESIDENT WILSON AND THE WORLD WAR
PROGRESSIVE INSURGENCY AND THE ELECTION OF 1912
PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH F3.  YOU AGREE THAT THE FOUNDATION, THE
PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH F3.  YOU AGREE THAT THE FOUNDATION, THE
Pacific Ocean where American emigrants had raised the Bear flag of
Pacific and the Orient was so enlarged as to be a factor of great weight
Pacific, starting at Omaha, was constructed mainly by veterans of the
Pacific, was laid out under the supervision of Leland Stanford. It was
Pacific, with their subsidiary and component lines, the estate of Peter
Paget. The "painful subcutaneous nodule" is a solitary fibroma related
Painful as that was it was not that which tormented Pierre at the
Pakhra, the Russian commanders intended to remain at Podolsk and had
Pale and agitated, Natasha ran into the drawing room.
Pale, with quivering lips, Pierre snatched the copy.
Pamphleteers, preachers, and publicists rose, however, to meet the needs
Panama renounced its allegiance to Colombia and three days later the
Paris and began preparations for the arrival of our troops. In June, the
Paris from the French. One of the provisions in this royal decree
Paris the just responsibility of our victories in the Spanish War the
Paris would have been the capital of the world, and the French the
Paris, and London respectively, held a conference and issued the
Paris, the ultimate goal, is reached. The Napoleonic government
Parliament applying to every colony, the rebound came in the Revolution.
Parliament at the time made smooth the way for the king and his allies
Parliament decided to relieve the British East India Company of the
Parliament in the old days; the states will be swallowed up; the rights
Parliament shall declare every American charter void, but the natural,
Parliament, in 1733, passed the famous Molasses Act imposing duties on
Particularly vivid, humiliating, and shameful was the recollection
Particularly was this true in the case of the Revolution. Only a small
Passing behind one of the lines of a regiment of Foot Guards he
Passing between the companies that had been eating porridge and
Passing by Kutuzov's carriage and the exhausted saddle horses of his
Paterson of New Jersey, were on their feet. They feared that, if the
Patriarch's Ponds, where the widow Bazdeev's house was.
Paul, asking permission, as a mark of their gratitude for the benefits
Paulucci was there because he was bold and decided in speech. The
Pavlovna Helene remained just as they had been--the one seven and
Pavlovna Scherer, maid of honor and favorite of the Empress Marya
Pavlovna Scherer. At the other end sat the younger and less
Pavlovna because he wanted to be appointed director of one of the
Pavlovna was the representative. And in Helene's salon, which
Pavlovna whispered the next words in advance, like an old woman
Pavlovna's was the first he had attended in Russia. He knew that all
Peasants having no clear idea of the cause of rain, say, according
Pelageya Danilovna, having given orders to clear the rooms for the
Penn to invite their colonists to share in the government as soon as any
Penn treating with them on his arrival in America. On the other side of
Pennsylvania and the growth of cities like Buffalo, Cincinnati,
Pennsylvania bought in English markets goods to the value of $11,459; in
Pennsylvania farmer and land surveyor who, on hearing the clash of arms,
Pennsylvania newspaper. "An iron-handed despotism will be the result,"
Pennsylvania was founded in 1850, and the Philadelphia School of Design
Pennsylvania, Maryland, Virginia, and the Carolinas. Coming late upon
Pennsylvania, and Massachusetts; and connections were formed among the
Pennsylvania, and the wool, flax, and hemp farms of the West had
Pennsylvania, as in New York, the waterways determined the main lines of
Pennsylvania, crossed the narrow neck of Virginia at Wheeling, and then
Pennsylvania, the suffrage was granted to freeholders owning fifty acres
Pennsylvania, the wool, hemp, and flax growers of Ohio, Kentucky, and
Pennsylvania; the philosophy of government in James Madison, called the
People of the United States_, Vol. VIII, pp. 116-121; K. Porter,
People were anxiously roaming about the streets.
People who turned so naturally to the organization of local
Perhaps I might have done the same!..." thought Princess Mary.
Perhaps I spoil her, but really that seems the best plan. With her
Perhaps most alarming of all was the discovery that thousands of alien
Perhaps the chief result of the whole affair was a clarification of the
Peronskaya a maid of honor, Pierre Bezukhov, and the son of their
Peronskaya was pointing out to the countess the most important
Perplexed by the storm they had raised, the ministers summoned to the
Pershing, chosen head of the American Expeditionary Forces, reached
Peter the footman made some remark to the coachman; the latter
Peter the valet, who was now wide awake, had roused the doctor.
Peter, and he turned on the box toward his master.
Petersburg he inquired for Kuragin but the latter had already left the
Petersburg hero Wittgenstein, this mood and the gossip of the staff
Petersburg is this: the Emperor does not look into anything. He has
Petersburg society, came into his room one evening in the official and
Petersburg to Moscow it is usually with the object of marrying an
Petersburg were Boris, Pierre whom the count had met in the street and
Petersburg) that both the prince and the magnate had proposed to her
Petersburg. The Guards had gone to the front; Dolokhov had been
Petersburg. The countess had long wished for such a box, but as she
Petersburg. The prospect was so splendid that she hardly believed it
Petersburg; tomorrow such and such decrees and orders to the army, the
Petit's tourniquet is loosely applied above the wound, which the nurse
Petya brightened up, blushed with pleasure, forgot the official manner
Petya came out, peered into the darkness, and went up to the wagons.
Petya directed things in the yard. Sonya, owing to the count's
Petya into the gateway of the courtyard. In the dense wavering smoke
Petya paced the room in silence for a time.
Petya pulled him by the arm to attract his attention.
Petya put his foot in the stirrup. His horse by habit made as if to
Petya replied that he wanted the French lad who had been captured
Petya soon came to himself, the color returned to his face, the pain
Petya thought of asking his help, but came to the conclusion that that
Petya to wait for him and rode to the spot where the enemy's,
Petya was carried out like a log and laid in the larger of the two
Petya was in the porch, engaged in giving out weapons to the
Petya was standing at the door when Denisov said this. He slipped in
Petya wiped his perspiring face with his hands and pulled up the
Petya wished to say "Good night" but could not utter a word. The
Petya, pacing the room with large, resolute strides. "Now I'm very
Petya, rapidly turning his head, looked now at the drummer boy,
Pfuel was evidently of that sort. He had a science--the theory of
Philadelphia Academy, forerunner of the University of Pennsylvania,
Philadelphia was offset by the treason of Benedict Arnold, the loss of
Philadelphia, New York, Boston, Chicago, or Milwaukee and in the hamlets
Philadelphia--two strategic ports--were in British hands; the Hudson
Philadelphia. By this time the tension of feeling was high, and the
Philadelphia. Harmless titles, such as "Sir," "the Honorable," and "His
Philip Freneau, flung taunts of cowardice at the Tories and celebrated
Philippine Islands, or of a desire to make known to the people of the
Philippines; and the determination of the status of the inhabitants of
Phillips saw in him "a more unlimited despot than the world knows this
Photius. He also acted badly by concerning himself with the active
Pictures of the near past--her father's illness and last moments-
Piedmontese, Swiss, Genevese, Tuscans, Romans, inhabitants of the
Pierce, the Democratic candidate for President, carried every state in
Pierre always sitting in the same attitude.
Pierre and proposed that he should ride with him along the line.
Pierre and thirteen others were moved to the coach house of a
Pierre and, hurrying along by the fence, he turned several times to
Pierre at the Club dinner.
Pierre at the age of ten had been sent abroad with an abbe as tutor,
Pierre at the ferry, that girl thrilled by the beauty of the night,
Pierre became silent. The raft had long since stopped and only the
Pierre began feeling in his pockets for the papers, but could not
Pierre began to say anything that did not fit in with that aim, the
Pierre by the candlelight and was evidently struck by the troubled
Pierre came up to him and caught him by the arm.
Pierre changed places several times during the game, sitting now
Pierre clutched his temples, and turning round went into the forest,
Pierre continued, in French, to persuade the officer not to hold
Pierre continued. When he spoke of the execution he wanted to pass
Pierre could not know their meaning but must keep them. The second
Pierre demanded that steps should be taken to liberate the serfs,
Pierre did not answer, but looked cordially into the Frenchman's
Pierre did not find his groom and rode along the hollow with the
Pierre did not look out at the battlefield and was not concerned
Pierre did not see the people as individuals but saw their movement.
Pierre did not stay for dinner, but left the room and went away at
Pierre did not understand a word, but the conviction that all this
Pierre dined at the club that day and heard on all sides gossip
Pierre dined with them and would have spent the whole evening there,
Pierre dressed hastily and ran out to the porch. Outside all was
Pierre drove to Marya Dmitrievna's to tell her of the fulfillment of
Pierre drove up to the house of the old prince in a most serious
Pierre felt confused and wished to avoid that look, but the bright
Pierre felt her eyes on him and tried not to look round. The
Pierre felt that he was the center of it all, and this both pleased
Pierre felt the different outlooks of these various worlds and
Pierre finished what he had begun. It was the sequel to his
Pierre first looked down the field across which vehicles and
Pierre flushed and, hurriedly putting his legs down from the bed,
Pierre found in one of them, in the lists of killed, wounded, and
Pierre gave her an inquiring look. She kissed the young man on his
Pierre gazed at the door through which she had disappeared and did
Pierre glanced into the pit and saw that the factory lad was lying
Pierre glanced round at the first cloud, which he had seen as a
Pierre glanced round at the speaker and saw that it was a soldier
Pierre got out and talked to the doctor, explaining his intention of
Pierre gradually began to recover himself and looked about at the
Pierre had evoked the passionate affection of the Italian merely
Pierre had none of the practical persistence that would have enabled
Pierre had not eaten all day and the smell of the potatoes seemed
Pierre had noticed on many of the faces he had met came into his face.
Pierre had often been in other days, and which, as he learned from the
Pierre had recognized in the corporal's words and in the roll of the
Pierre had rejoined Karataev and the gray-blue bandy-legged dog that
Pierre he muttered something angrily and went away along the passage.
Pierre heard the French consulting whether to shoot them
Pierre himself. Sonya told Pierre this as she led him along the
Pierre in his secret soul agreed with the steward that it would be
Pierre inquired what was being said about leaving, and the
Pierre knew all the details of the attempt on Bonaparte's life in
Pierre leaped up from the sofa and rushed staggering toward her.
Pierre left the room and went to the old prince and Princess Mary.
Pierre like the others was questioned as to who he was, where he had
Pierre listened to the colonel's speech and nodded approvingly.
Pierre listened with swelling heart, gazing into the Mason's face
Pierre looked again at the companion's pale, delicate face with
Pierre looked at Timokhin with the condescendingly interrogative
Pierre looked at his friend and, noticing that he did not like the
Pierre looked over the wall of the trench and was particularly
Pierre looked up and saw at a window of the large house some
Pierre made up his mind not to go to the Rostovs' any more.
Pierre met the old count, who seemed nervous and upset. That morning
Pierre nodded, and went on with what he had been saying when the
Pierre noticed that Prince Vasili left the chair on which he had
Pierre noticed that after every ball that hit the redoubt, and after
Pierre now understood the count's dissatisfaction with the wording
Pierre ran after him, avoiding the spot where the young officer
Pierre ran down the slope once more.
Pierre reaching the house first went into Prince Andrew's study like
Pierre refused without the least difficulty or effort, and was
Pierre remembered Ramballe, and named him and his regiment and the
Pierre replied that the child belonged to a woman in a black coat
Pierre rushed to the wing, but the heat was so great that he
Pierre sat down by the fire and began eating the mash, as they
Pierre sat up on the sofa, with his legs tucked under him.
Pierre saw that Boris wished to change the subject, and being of the
Pierre saw that Platon did not want to understand what the Frenchman
Pierre saw that the count was much upset and tried to change the
Pierre saw--covered to the waist by a bright green quilt--the
Pierre seemed disconcerted and embarrassed. He was talking to the
Pierre seized the crossbeam, tugged, and wrenched the oak frame
Pierre smiled, but his smile showed that he knew it was not the
Pierre spoke rapidly and with animation. He glanced once at the
Pierre stepped out of his carriage and, passing the toiling
Pierre stepped out of the gate the coachmen and the yard porter
Pierre still went into society, drank as much and led the same
Pierre stood there was a second staircase leading to the back
Pierre that it was his duty to conceal the whole affair and
Pierre that morning on the corporal's face when the drums were
Pierre the story of his ancestors, his childhood, youth, and
Pierre threw himself on the drunkard. Just when Pierre snatched at and
Pierre told her the price.
Pierre told him about the sick man.
Pierre too drew near the church where the thing was that evoked
Pierre too when she had gone almost ran into the anteroom,
Pierre took his feet off the table, stood up, and lay down on a
Pierre took his hands from his eyes. Dolokhov still sat in the same
Pierre took one of the glasses and emptied it. Ramballe emptied
Pierre took that letter, and Rostopchin also gave him the Emperor's
Pierre took the letter Anatole handed him and, pushing aside a table
Pierre took the packet. Prince Andrew, as if trying to remember
Pierre took them off, and his eyes, besides the strange look eyes
Pierre turned back, not to his companions by the campfire, but to an
Pierre turned his whole body, making the sofa creak. He lifted his
Pierre turned over heavily on the ottoman and opened his mouth,
Pierre walked up and down the drawing room, not listening to what
Pierre was as if intoxicated. His elation increased at the sight
Pierre was hungry and shared the dinner with pleasure. Morel, the
Pierre was just the husband needed for a brilliant society woman. He
Pierre was lying asleep on the ottoman with an open book in his hand.
Pierre was shown into the large, brightly lit dining room; a few
Pierre was sitting in the drawing-room where Shinshin had engaged
Pierre was so deep in thought that he did not hear the question.
Pierre was staying at Prince Vasili Kuragin's and sharing the
Pierre was struck by the modesty of the small though clean house
Pierre was the sixth to enter. He was conducted through a glass
Pierre was ungainly. Stout, about the average height, broad, with
Pierre went in at the door, stepping on the soft carpet, and noticed
Pierre went out into the yard and, covering himself up head and all,
Pierre went round the study, approached the cupboard in which the
Pierre went to the battery and the adjutant rode on. They did not
Pierre went to the children, and the shouting and laughter grew
Pierre went to the right, and unexpectedly encountered one of
Pierre went with rapid steps to the door and suddenly came face to
Pierre who has inherited all the property and has besides been
Pierre wished to say this to the Mason, but did not dare to. The
Pierre! Terrible in battle... gallant... with the fair" (he winked and
Pierre's arm and asked him into the room that had been assigned him. A
Pierre's assurances that he was not a Frenchman, the captain,
Pierre's attire by now consisted of a dirty torn shirt (the only
Pierre's coachman shouted angrily at the convoy of wounded to keep
Pierre's confusion had now almost vanished, but at the same time
Pierre's direction at a slight rustle made by the latter. "Why have
Pierre's eyes. Pierre moved away from the door.
Pierre's friendship with the father whom Nicholas could not
Pierre's gaiety vanished completely. He anxiously questioned the
Pierre's hand and said, "Come." Pierre went with her to the bed on
Pierre's head some pigeons, disturbed by the movement he had made in
Pierre's head was the bright August sunshine and the bells sounded
Pierre's heart with his love. At the gate stood Gerasim, the cook, and
Pierre's mind was in such a confused state that the word "stroke"
Pierre's one feeling at the moment was a desire to show that he
Pierre's physical condition, as is always the case, corresponded
Pierre's subjection consisted in the fact that he not only dared not
Pierre's way led through side streets to the Povarskoy and from
Pierre's words and, uttering some meaningless oaths, slammed the door.
Pierre, "is it true that the countess has fallen into the clutches
Pierre, accompanied by the maid, was advancing to the spot where the
Pierre, as one of the principal guests, had to sit down to boston
Pierre, asked the Italian how he stood Russian climate. The
Pierre, especially when he spoke with joyful animation of the past
Pierre, experiencing the joyful feeling of a boy escaping from school,
Pierre, snatching away the pistol and throwing it down, ran up to
Pierre, so softly that the Rhetor did not hear him and asked him
Pierre, swaying his stout body, advanced, making way through the
Pierre, through the door.
Pierre, when the Frenchman began to cry.
Pierre, who hat in hand and with a smile on his face was the last of
Pierre, with fame, with the girl at the window, the oak, and woman's
Pierre--there was something resembling what he had seen on the face of
Pierre. "What of it? It's the truth!" and he himself smiled his gentle
Pierre. (Pierre shuddered and shook himself free.) The lad was
Pierre. But when they had convinced themselves that this man in the
Pierre. He thought this, but still sat in the same place. A strange
Pierre. The curly-headed, delicate boy sat with shining eyes unnoticed
Pierre. The estates he had not before visited were each more
Pierre. The satisfaction of his hunger and the wine rendered the
Pigmentation of the Skin.]
Pike, explorer and pathfinder, by his expedition into the Southwest
Pilgrims brought across the sea with them.
Place Pierre, seeing a large crowd round the Lobnoe Place, stopped and
Placing the bottle on the window sill where he could reach it
Plantations," which continued, until the American Revolution, to
Plantations.=--At the other end of the scale were the feudal elements of
Platov's division was acting independently of the main army. Several
Plattsburgh. The triumph of Jackson at New Orleans helped to atone for
Please check the Project Gutenberg Web pages for current donation
Please check the Project Gutenberg Web pages for current donation
Please do not use the "PROJECT GUTENBERG" trademark to market
Please do not use the "PROJECT GUTENBERG" trademark to market
Please feel free to ask to check the status of your state.
Please feel free to ask to check the status of your state.
Please read the "legal small print," and other information about the
Please read the "legal small print," and other information about the
Pointing to the fields, he spoke of the improvements he was making
Poklonny Hill perceived the throb of life in the town and felt, as
Poland and the good old days. Denisov, flushed after the mazurka and
Poland came Pulaski and Kosciusko;--all acquainted with the arts of war
Poland; freedom of the seas; the reduction of armaments; and the
Pole, disputed with the commissariat officer, arguing that he was
Polish Count Golukhovski, who was bargaining for the horses Rostov had
Polish Uhlans stationed by the river.
Polk, already having the contest with Mexico on his hands, sought and
Pomerania, only a withdrawal beyond the Niemen was now demanded.
Popular passions ran high. The guilty soldiers were charged with murder.
Populists held the balance of power under the requirement of the
Portions of the _ovary_ and of the _thyreoid_ have been successfully
Portions of the softened thrombus are liable to become detached and to
Potemkin's and Suvorov's campaigns, or to legends of Alesha the Sly,
Povarskoy. He did not at first recognize the place from which he had
Povarskoy. The whole street was full of clouds of black smoke. Tongues
Power is the collective will of the people transferred, by expressed
Power, from the standpoint of experience, is merely the relation
Powers; Germany's total equipment for the future was limited to six
President Cleveland was so dissatisfied with the bill that he refused to
President Cleveland, in spite of the constant demand for harsh action
President Grant was not persuaded that the door of diplomacy, though
President Hayes vetoed the measure.
President McKinley, and as governor of the Empire state. Political
President Polk, not displeased with the turn of events, announced that
President Roosevelt countered vigorously. He rejected the idea that the
President Roosevelt on the day of his inauguration, that of the Panama
President Roosevelt's sympathies were mainly with the Japanese, although
President Roosevelt. It lasted until the new organic act of 1917.
President Taylor, though a Southern man, advised Congress to admit the
President Wilson and the Premiers, Lloyd George and Clemenceau, the
President Wilson elaborated the last point, namely, the formation of a
President Wilson in person took part in the peace council. He sought to
President Wilson laid down his famous "fourteen points" summarizing the
President Wilson repeatedly denounced them as the enemies of
President Wilson severed diplomatic relations with the German empire. At
President Wilson therefore called upon Congress to answer the German
President Wilson were without avail. Nothing could stay the hand of the
President alone, in the courts of law, or in the heads of departments.
President and Senate and, as soon as there was the requisite number of
President and Senate won the undoubted approval of the American people.
President elected in a manner not employed in the choice of either
President in his slowly maturing determination to retire at the end of
President of the Senate shall, in the presence of the Senate and House
President of the United States is tried, the chief justice shall
President of the United States, was filched from the mails and passed
President on the following day.
President through its power of ratifying treaties and appointments. "The
President was empowered to use force to the extent necessary to carry
President with the consent of the Senate and serving for life. Thus it
President's death, "to stand by the bier of three of my dearest friends,
President's exasperation. "You could no more make an agreement with the
President's power, authorized him to suspend the writ throughout the
President, as in the case of the death or other constitutional
President, if such number be a majority of the whole number of electors
President, the votes shall be taken by States, the representation from
President. He utterly repudiated the narrow construction of our national
President. In the meantime the suffrage battle at Washington grew
President. The assault, however, proved to be a futile gesture for it
Pressure on the thoracic veins and on the air-passage causes cyanosis
Pressure on the tibial and common peroneal nerves gives rise to severe
Primary suture should not be attempted so long as the wound shows signs
Primary tumours are of the connective-tissue type, and are usually
Prince Andrew a reliable correspondent to whom he could pour out the
Prince Andrew accompanied by Boris arrived at the palace to find
Prince Andrew approaching the crowd of soldiers. "It can't be an
Prince Andrew arrived at Tsarevo-Zaymishche on the very day and at
Prince Andrew arrived in Petersburg in August, 1809. It was the time
Prince Andrew at the same time as of the rest, and of how he would
Prince Andrew began to explain to her the reasons for this delay.
Prince Andrew caught him by the hand.
Prince Andrew did not reply. The carriage and horses had long
Prince Andrew did not see how and by whom it was replaced, but the
Prince Andrew during the battle had been in attendance on the
Prince Andrew entered a plain tidy room and saw at the table a man
Prince Andrew felt that either the actions of Kutuzov's army
Prince Andrew galloped off to execute the order.
Prince Andrew glanced again at the artillery officer's small figure.
Prince Andrew got up and went on tiptoe up to the little bed,
Prince Andrew had already heard from his wife in the presence of
Prince Andrew had arrived in the evening and Pierre came to see
Prince Andrew had felt in the impending reforms. He was going to
Prince Andrew had gone out into the hall, and, turning his shoulders
Prince Andrew had no time to answer. The servants came out to meet
Prince Andrew had spent two years continuously in the country.
Prince Andrew had to see the Marshal of the Nobility for the
Prince Andrew hesitated. The smoking shell spun like a top between
Prince Andrew in his childhood had often seen at the gate was
Prince Andrew in the house, Nicholas never imagined him in human
Prince Andrew kept looking with an amused smile from Pierre to the
Prince Andrew left the Rostovs' late in the evening. He went to
Prince Andrew listened to the account of the opening of the
Prince Andrew looked Anna Pavlovna straight in the face with a
Prince Andrew looked at his sister. In the dim shadow of the curtain
Prince Andrew looked at the laughing Speranski with astonishment,
Prince Andrew looked out of the shed and saw Pierre, who had tripped
Prince Andrew made his way up to the battery from which the staff
Prince Andrew moved toward the door from whence voices were heard.
Prince Andrew opened his eyes and looked up at the speaker from
Prince Andrew reached the general headquarters of the army at the
Prince Andrew rode up to the house. Several limes in the old
Prince Andrew rose hastily, listened to the business they had come
Prince Andrew saw by the cover that it was Les Chevaliers du Cygne
Prince Andrew saw clearly that the old man hoped that his
Prince Andrew saw that the officer was in that state of senseless,
Prince Andrew sighed and broke the seal of another envelope. It
Prince Andrew smiled involuntarily as he looked at the artillery
Prince Andrew smiled just perceptibly and for the first time, but
Prince Andrew stood leaning on the railing of the raft listening
Prince Andrew struck the high road along which the Russian army was
Prince Andrew the feeling he had experienced toward him at their first
Prince Andrew to lose consciousness. When he came to himself the
Prince Andrew to the point of tears and sympathized with his wounded
Prince Andrew was as glad to find the boy like that, as if he had
Prince Andrew was in command of a regiment, and the management of
Prince Andrew was on duty that day and in constant attendance on the
Prince Andrew was silent, but the princess noticed the ironical
Prince Andrew was somewhat refreshed by having ridden off the
Prince Andrew was to leave next evening. The old prince, not
Prince Andrew was watching these men abashed by the Emperor's
Prince Andrew went again to his wife and sat waiting in the room
Prince Andrew went up to Pierre, and the latter noticed a new and
Prince Andrew went up to the child and felt him. He was burning hot.
Prince Andrew when they had gone into the large room where the
Prince Andrew without joining in the conversation watched every
Prince Andrew without lifting his eyes rode hastily away from the
Prince Andrew's eyes were still following Pfuel out of the room when
Prince Andrew's head with the confident, accustomed look with which
Prince Andrew's mind when the dresser with sleeves rolled up began
Prince Andrew's regiment was among the reserves which till after one
Prince Andrew, depressed and preoccupied with the business about
Prince Andrew, especially after the abandonment of Smolensk on the
Prince Andrew, having reached the front line, rode along it. Our
Prince Andrew, in the white uniform of a cavalry colonel, wearing
Prince Andrew, leaning his arms on the raft railing, gazed
Prince Andrew, pale and gloomy like everyone in the regiment,
Prince Andrew, paying no more heed to the general who ran after him
Prince Andrew, the death of his wife, and the destruction of the
Prince Andrew, who had also been brought forward before the
Prince Andrew, who had evidently wished to tone down the awkwardness
Prince Andrew, who had thought it was all the same to him whether or
Prince Andrew, who remained in the porch and listened to the general's
Prince Andrew, whom Boris was expecting, entered the room. Prince
Prince Andrew, with the purest regrets and memories, but probably
Prince Andrew. "But where is it?" he again wondered, gazing at the
Prince Andrew. "The others, one's neighbors, le prochain, as you and
Prince Andrew. From the tone in which the courtiers addressed him
Prince Bagration turned to the officer and with his dull eyes looked
Prince Bagration's face at this moment. It expressed the
Prince Bagration, having reached the highest point of our right
Prince Bolkonski sat down in his usual place in the corner of the
Prince Gruzinski's house on the other, Pierre suddenly heard the
Prince Hippolyte Kuragin, who was a secretary to the embassy,
Prince Hippolyte approached the little princess and, bending his
Prince Hippolyte hurriedly put on his cloak, which in the latest
Prince Hippolyte, having brought the workbag, joined the circle
Prince Hippolyte, who had been gazing at the vicomte for some time
Prince Michael Ilarionovich! (wrote the Emperor on the second of
Prince Michael Ilarionovich! Since the twenty-ninth of August I have
Prince Nicholas grew more animated and expressed his views on the
Prince Peter Mikhaylovich Volkonski occupied the position, as it
Prince Vasili and the eldest princess were sitting close together
Prince Vasili arrived that evening. He was met in the avenue by
Prince Vasili came next. He staggered to the sofa on which Pierre
Prince Vasili did not reply, though, with the quickness of memory
Prince Vasili had come to the conclusion that it was necessary to
Prince Vasili in the anteroom. All the affectation of interest she had
Prince Vasili kept the promise he had given to Princess
Prince Vasili looked questioningly at the princess, but could not
Prince Vasili passed by, seeming not to hear the ladies, and sat
Prince Vasili saw the princess off. She held a handkerchief to her
Prince Vasili suddenly entered the room.
Prince Vasili's daughter, the beautiful Helene, came to take her
Prince Vasili, "but it is difficult for me to ask the Emperor. I
Prince Vasili, with one leg thrown high over the other and a
Prince Volkonski, who was in the chair, called on him to give his
Prince. And God only knows where your man Peter is," said the other
Princess Anna Mikhaylovna intervened in the conversation,
Princess Mary and Natasha met as usual in the bedroom. They talked
Princess Mary as she sat listening to the old men's talk and
Princess Mary asked the countess to let Natasha go with her to
Princess Mary call it, are the chief source of all error and evil.
Princess Mary could not understand the boldness of her brother's
Princess Mary did not listen to the end, but continuing her train of
Princess Mary entered the antechamber as usual at the time appointed
Princess Mary experienced as she sat in her room. But owing to the
Princess Mary for the first time, "to forget yourself again before her
Princess Mary grew quite unconscious of her face and coiffure. The
Princess Mary knelt down before her and hid her face in the folds of
Princess Mary noticed to her surprise that during this illness the
Princess Mary postponed her departure. Sonya and the count tried
Princess Mary pressed his hand. The pressure made him wince just
Princess Mary ran out to the porch, down the flower-bordered path,
Princess Mary read the paper, and her face began to quiver with
Princess Mary rose and moved to the door, then stopped and said:
Princess Mary sat alone in her room listening to the sounds in the
Princess Mary sat down with a book in the drawing room near the door
Princess Mary shrugged her shoulders but took the glass submissively
Princess Mary sighed deeply and thereby acknowledged the justice
Princess Mary sighed, and the expression on her face said: "Yes,
Princess Mary stayed on the veranda. The day had cleared, it was hot
Princess Mary that he was even glad that the family connection between
Princess Mary threw a shawl over her head and ran to meet the
Princess Mary took Pierre into the drawing room.
Princess Mary turned to Sonya and, trying to stifle the hostile
Princess Mary vividly pictured to herself the position of
Princess Mary walked up and down the room and stopped in front of
Princess Mary was sitting helpless and bewildered in the large
Princess Mary was still standing by the cot, gently rocking the
Princess Mary went back to her room with the sad, scared
Princess Mary went to the door of the study with special
Princess Mary wrote that she was in despair at the
Princess Mary, and the little princess. Prince Andrew had been
Princess Mary, despite the dissuasions of Alpatych, her nurse, and the
Princess Mary, with the paper in her hand, rose from the window
Princess Mary. "Go in heavens name! Go out into the frost... the
Princess Mary. With a softened, happy, timid look she watched the
Princess, I hold to the principle that a maiden has a full right to
Printed in the United States of America.
Probably a word of command was given and was followed by the reports
Produced by Curtis Weyant, M and the Online Distributed
Produced by Curtis Weyant, M and the Online Distributed
Produced by Jonathan Ingram, Laura Wisewell and the Online
Produced by Jonathan Ingram, Laura Wisewell and the Online
Professor Michael S. Hart is the originator of the Project Gutenberg-tm
Professor Michael S. Hart is the originator of the Project Gutenberg-tm
Progressive and Republican vote exceeded that of the Democrats by
Progressive party practically disappeared, and the Socialists suffered a
Progressives entered a vigorous campaign for the election of their
Project Gutenberg is dedicated to increasing the number of
Project Gutenberg is dedicated to increasing the number of
Project Gutenberg-tm is synonymous with the free distribution of
Project Gutenberg-tm is synonymous with the free distribution of
Proliferative changes in the synovial membrane are attended with
Prominent among the new forces were the rising mercantile and business
Protestant. Delaware withheld it from all who did not believe in the
Providence, Hartford, New York, Philadelphia, Charleston--among the
Providence, this land was to be purged of human slavery ... the
Proviso, advocated a strict enforcement of the fugitive slave law,
Proximal ligation in the case of high aneurysms, or distal ligation in
Prussia joins the Allies, Austria's hand will be forced and there will
Prussian arms to hold France at bay. In India, on the banks of the
Prussians without giving them time to finish the parade they had
Ptolemaic worlds. But even after the discovery of the law of
Public Credit_ under date of January 9, 1790, one of the first and
Pullman strike, the passions of which had not yet died away, the
Purchase Act, and the re-issue of Greenbacks cut away some of the
Puritan rule. The crown and church in England had long looked upon it
Puritan, thinking the sun had gone to rest, ventured forth on horseback
Puritans emigrated to America, settling in the colonies of the far
Puritans, essaying at first the task of reformers within the Church,
Pursued by the French army of a hundred thousand men under the
Pyramids," of the sacrifices he offered for the fatherland, or of what
Quebec and London.... The Southerners on their part wished for Florida
Queen Anne, the successor of King William, the throne passed to a
Questions and answers were heard. The publican, taking advantage
Quite lately, happening to meet a wounded French colonel on the
R. Frothingham, _Rise of the Republic_.
R.I. Dodge, _The Plains of the Great West_ (1877).
RECONSTRUCTION IN THE SOUTH
RELATIONS WITH THE INDIANS AND THE FRENCH
RETALIATION BY THE BRITISH GOVERNMENT
ROOSEVELT TALKING TO THE ENGINEER OF A RAILROAD TRAIN]
Radiograms show the rapid absorption of the new bone both on the surface
Radiograms usually furnish useful information as to the condition of the
Raevski reported that the troops were firmly holding their ground
Raevski's adjutants whom he knew. The adjutant looked angrily at
Raevski's knoll. "But the battle will hardly be there. His having
Raevski. He recounted how Raevski had led his two sons onto the dam
Railroads of the United States in 1918                             405
Ramballe, captain of the 13th Light Regiment--was undoubtedly a very
Randolph sought to oppose a "firm senate." To check the excesses of
Ranvier, and in each internode is a nucleus lying between the myelin and
Rapp replied that he had given the Emperor's order about the rice,
Reaching the large house near the Horse Guards' barracks, in which
Reactive changes in the vicinity of tuberculous joints are of common
Reason gives expression to the laws of inevitability.
Reason says: (1) space with all the forms of matter that give it
Reasons were found for the incredible, unheard-of, and impossible
Recklinghausen to be a soft fibroma related to the terminal filaments of
Recognizing the falsity of this view of history, another set of
Recovery begins in a few seconds, the patient sighing or gasping, or, it
Recovery takes place in about 50 per cent. of cases, but the
Redoubt opposite, which had been ours the day before and where several
Redoubt was fought, on the twenty-fifth not a shot was fired by either
Redoubt, the Russians fought the battle of Borodino on an open and
Reference may be made to the #relapsing false indurated chancre#,
Reference: J.R.H. Moore, _Industrial History of the American People_,
Referendum, the, 543
Referring in another part of his message to a recent claim which the
Reinstating the first condition omitted, that of time, we see that
Relapse may take place within a few months of the original attack, or
Religion, the common sense of mankind, the science of jurisprudence,
Religious freedom was guaranteed. The safeguards of trial by jury,
Reluctantly they yielded to the demand for federal courts, consenting at
Repeated and sudden raising of the arterial tension, as a result, for
Representatives shall choose immediately, by ballot, the President. But
Representatives, "that if this bill [to admit Louisiana] passes, the
Representatives, Robert Toombs of Georgia boldly declared: "In the
Republican Senator from New York, in a speech describing the power of
Republican and a Bonapartist will prove: the one that the Convention
Republican candidate" and appealed to the party for support. The
Republican control was made easy by the force bills described in a
Republican convention to be held at Chicago. When the convention
Republican dissensions, the Democrats were slow in making headway
Republican leaders grappled with it. In the platform of the Union party
Republican leadership, long in the direction marked out by the treaty,
Republican legislature "electing" a Democrat to represent the state in
Republican national convention assembled in 1896, the die was soon
Republican party every investor in government bonds could look for the
Republican party pledged to the prohibition of slavery in the
Republican party, had taken a view that the President could do nothing
Republican party; that any candidate named by it would be "the
Republican power throughout the country. "Nor is there the slightest
Republican ranks. Powerful Senators from the Middle West had spoken
Republican supremacy, it must be recorded that grave doubts exist in the
Republicans also who enacted the McKinley tariff bill of 1890, which
Republicans and Democrats determined upon shifting some of the burden of
Republicans and Progressives were held simultaneously in Chicago. The
Republicans and the Democrats gave heed to it. In 1882 Congress enacted
Republicans did not at once enact legislation making the gold dollar the
Republicans from the Middle West rejoiced in it. Pressure was coming
Republicans had carried the entire South and New York also and secured
Republicans nominated, had voted in Congress for the free coinage of
Republicans only as political oppressors. The passions of the war had
Republicans praised the women for their loyal devotion to freedom,
Republicans who had been loudest in the profession of their French
Republicans with Jefferson in the lead.
Republicans, after holding the office of President for sixteen years,
Republicans, anxious to heal the breach in American unity, sought to
Republicans, endorsed the federal amendment and a distinguished
Republicans, now known as Whigs--a title taken from the party of
Resolutions were soon introduced into the House of Representatives
Restoration of function is usually complete; but when the nerve
Restrictions like these undoubtedly excluded from the suffrage a very
Resumption was accomplished with no disturbance. By five o'clock the
Returning from his journey through South Russia in the happiest
Revenue Service.  The Foundation's EIN or federal tax identification
Revenue Service.  The Foundation's EIN or federal tax identification
Review the history of banks and currency and give the details of the
Review the rise of the spoils system.
Revolution exerted a profound influence on the course of political
Revolution, German soldiers from Pennsylvania fought in the patriot
Revolution, built up home industries to meet the unusual call for iron,
Revolution, namely, in 1772, English exports to the American colonies
Revolution, to stifle the press, restrict the suffrage, and restore the
Revolution, were in some respects like the royal colonies, for their
Revolution. Officers and soldiers, who had served in the American war,
Revolution. The words that had struck him in the Emperor's appeal-
Revolutionary War. At the close of the World War in 1918.
Revolutionary and Mexican wars had advanced in great numbers to the
Rhode Island, Massachusetts, Maine, New Hampshire, and Vermont. The
Rhode Island, had ratified. "The sloop Anarchy," wrote an ebullient
Rhodes, _History of the United States_, Vol. VIII, pp. 180-196.
Rhodes, _History of the United States_, Vol. VIII, pp. 240-327; Elson,
Richard Green, "war-song and psalm, state-roll and biography, the mighty
Rigors may occur, but the temperature is not necessarily raised--indeed,
Rio Grande; from the valleys of the Sabine and Red rivers to Montana and
Rioting again appeared: tea was dumped in the harbor of Boston and
River, loaded to the guards with produce, as far as the mouth of the
Rochester, New York. The discussion revealed a wide range of duties
Rodent cancer is liable to be mistaken for lupus, because it affects the
Roger Williams buying his lands from the friendly natives; or of William
Roman nations, which ancient historians regarded as representing the
Rontgen rays, or examination of the joint under anaesthesia, is helpful.
Roosevelt announced his faith in the Republican candidate and appealed
Roosevelt himself. "The country," he said, "would certainly decline to
Roosevelt made up his mind that the situation was intolerable. He
Roosevelt took a hand in the fray. Soon after his return in 1910 from a
Roosevelt took exactly the opposite position. It was his opinion that it
Roosevelt's attitude toward the Constitution and the office of
Roosevelt, Assistant Secretary of the Department, was ready for the
Roosevelt, the governor of New York and the hero of the Rough Riders, so
Rosenkampf had stuck labels on the corresponding paragraphs of the
Rostopchin (though the Senate had only condemned Vereshchagin to
Rostopchin shouted angrily at the governor:
Rostopchin went again to the balcony door.
Rostopchin's orders to burn the barges and had in connection with that
Rostopchin, took up a Cossack whip and went to the bridge where he
Rostopchin. "I am straight from the palace. Seeing the position we are
Rostopchine,* the Russians to the barbarity of the French. In reality,
Rostov also rode up and touched the wolf.
Rostov and Denisov drove away with the wounded Dolokhov.
Rostov and Ilyin both glanced under the wet and glistening leather
Rostov and Ilyin gave rein to their horses for a last race along the
Rostov and Ilyin were in the merriest of moods. On the way to
Rostov and the assistant went into the dark corridor. The smell
Rostov considered, and then went in the direction where they said he
Rostov did not listen to the soldier. He looked at the snowflakes
Rostov dismounted, gave his horse to the orderly, and followed
Rostov entered the soldiers' ward. The foul air, to which he had
Rostov explained that he wanted to see Major Denisov of the hussars,
Rostov family and the wounded traveling with them were all distributed
Rostov family was absorbed in various activities. The head of the
Rostov felt perfectly happy. Just then the commander appeared on the
Rostov felt that the elder hussar's luckless love for Natasha played a
Rostov felt that, under the influence of the warm rays of love, that
Rostov from amid the suites that surrounded the Emperors.
Rostov had been ordered to look for Kutuzov and the Emperor near the
Rostov had been out of humor from the moment he noticed the look
Rostov had come to Tilsit the day least suitable for a petition on
Rostov had done in 1805, and who saw in him not only all the virtues
Rostov had no idea that the village he was entering was the property
Rostov had not the courage to persuade Denisov, though he
Rostov let go of the horse and was about to ride on, when a
Rostov looked at the tipsy peasants and smiled.
Rostov meaninglessly, breathless with irrational animal fury and the
Rostov met Sonya in the drawing room, he reddened. He did not know how
Rostov ran after him with the crowd.
Rostov saw tears filling the Emperor's eyes and heard him, as he was
Rostov saw the prisoners being led away and galloped after them to
Rostov smilingly reassured the dragoon and gave him money.
Rostov stood at that corner for a long time, watching the feast from
Rostov submitted. He let the eight hundred remain and laid down a
Rostov that he had seen someone from headquarters behind the village
Rostov thrust the purse under the pillow and shook the damp little
Rostov took the letter and, throwing the money on the sofa, put both
Rostov took the money and, mechanically arranging the old and new
Rostov took the money, avoiding Telyanin's eyes, and went out of the
Rostov took the purse in his hand, examined it and the money in
Rostov turned and was about to go, but the man in the braces stopped
Rostov was displeased to see that the company consisted almost
Rostov was not far from the trumpeters, and with his keen sight
Rostov was particularly struck by the beauty of a small,
Rostov was very happy in the love they showed him; but the first
Rostov waved his cap above his head like the German and cried
Rostov went back into the hall and noticed that in the porch there
Rostov's hands and occasionally ran his eyes over the score against
Rostov's horse dashed its breast against the hindquarters of the
Rostov's horse was also getting restive: it pawed the frozen ground,
Rostov's inquiry as to how the matter stood, he at once produced
Rostov's share in Dolokhov's duel with Bezukhov was hushed up by the
Rostov, bowed slightly and wearily, and sat down languidly on the
Rostov, ever since he had overtaken the regiment in Poland, had
Rostov, flushing, drew Dolokhov into the next room.
Rostov, in common with the whole army from which he came, was far
Rostov, in dismay, began justifying himself, but seeing the
Rostov, knitting his brows, left the room with another low bow.
Rostov, smoking his pipe and turning his head about as the water
Rostov, standing in the front lines of Kutuzov's army which the Tsar
Rostov, still looking round toward the fires and the shouts, rode
Rostov, with his keen sportsman's eye, was one of the first to catch
Rostov, without knowing why, raised his saber and struck the Frenchman
Rostov; the other on a beautiful chestnut horse (which Rostov
Rostov; the soldiers of the third squadron tossed him too, and shouted
Rostova's abduction had been arranged and the preparations made by
Rostovs' and wounded men dragged themselves there from the Rostovs'
Rostovs' house seemed topsy-turvy. All the doors were open, all the
Rostovs' there were other hours he had to spend somehow, and the
Rostovs, and had now, as if purposely, sent his men to the very
Rostovs, and the party became unquestionably exactly like all other
Rostovs. The countess said she had been unable to close her eyes on
Round the peasant's deal table, on which lay maps, plans, pencils,
Row, across the river, in the Bazaar and the Povarskoy, as well as the
Rumyantsev, the Chancellor; Stein, a former Prussian minister;
Rupture of a muscle or tendon is usually the result of a sudden, and
Russia also, and the chief culprit was Alexander I, the same man who
Russia at the will of one man--Napoleon--to say that Russia remained a
Russia had gained. He tried to prove to the Emperor the
Russia rises to the defense of Russia!"
Russia was shaped by the will of one man--Peter the Great--and that
Russia, Germany, and France to forego the fruits of conquest.
Russia, and arrived too late to take part in the first actions of
Russia, but could only spoil and lower the glorious position that
Russia, to desecrate the tombs of our fathers, to carry off our
Russia, while on the French side, despite Napoleon's experience and
Russia. Despite the weakness of age, which had become particularly
Russia: legal, administrative, and financial, from the Council of
Russia; attempts were made to extend American influence in the Caribbean
Russian Empire by sticking a pin into the map at hazard.
Russian and French colors draped from side to side of the streets,
Russian and French voices and laughter filled the air round the tables
Russian and the Austrian. The Guards, just arrived from Russia,
Russian arms and the hope of future triumph. And he was not the only
Russian arms, or the prosperity of the Petersburg and other
Russian army from the Ryazana to the Kaluga road and to the Tarutino
Russian army was. Not only did no one see this, but on the Russian
Russian army was. One of the Russians understood what was asked and
Russian army, and the member of the Hofkriegsrath who had arrived
Russian baggage train, the artillery, and columns of troops were
Russian commanders was the one naturally suggesting itself, namely,
Russian defeats led to the total destruction of their enemy and the
Russian expressions with the choicest French phrases--which was a
Russian face, and by his walk and the first words he uttered
Russian general. The general shouted a demand that the cavalry
Russian infantry, neither moving forward to protect the battery nor
Russian monarch, and the war began...
Russian musketeer who had gone up to the picket line with an officer
Russian officers and generals after the Tarutino battle, letting it be
Russian position--at the Shevardino Redoubt--and unexpectedly for
Russian prisoners, who had come running from both sides of the road,
Russian sharpshooters showed themselves in the copse. It was
Russian soldier away was squatting by the fire, engaged in roasting
Russian troops and served as heralds of the advance. As soon as an
Russian voices and saw the dark figures of Russian prisoners round
Russian way till all the nonsense jumps out of them."
Russian wings, hoping before evening and before the arrival of the
Russians and might take it amiss that the mistress was being detained.
Russians by night by making semicircles to the right.
Russians had not surrendered but had beaten the French.
Russians there, naming Pierre as "the man who does not give his name."
Russians with Uvarov's cavalry at midday, and on the other side,
Russians, and Jews, who came from countries far removed from the
Russians, the regiment had just the appearance of any Russian regiment
Russians, was trying to prove that the Russians had surrendered and
Russians, were to operate in Italy and on the Rhine; how fifty
Russo-French wars from Austerlitz to the year 1813. At Austerlitz he
Ryazan he found the country dull; his former pursuits no longer
Ryazan road, and the Emperor's letter indicated to him the very
Ryder passed his tongue over his parched lips. "I will tell you it just as it happened, sir," said he. "When Horner had been arrested, it seemed to me that it would be best for me to get away with the stone at once, for I did not know at what moment the police might not take it into their heads to search me and my room. There was no place about the hotel where it would be safe. I went out, as if on some commission, and I made for my sister's house. She had married a man named Oakshott, and lived in Brixton Road, where she fattened fowls for the market. All the way there every man I met seemed to me to be a policeman or a detective; and, for all that it was a cold night, the sweat was pouring down my face before I came to the Brixton Road. My sister asked me what was the matter, and why I was so pale; but I told her that I had been upset by the jewel robbery at the hotel. Then I went into the back yard and smoked a pipe and wondered what it would be best to do.
Ryder threw himself down suddenly upon the rug and clutched at my companion's knees. "For God's sake, have mercy!" he shrieked. "Think of my father! Of my mother! It would break their hearts. I never went wrong before! I never will again. I swear it. I'll swear it on a Bible. Oh, don't bring it into court! For Christ's sake, don't!"
SECTION 1. 1. The executive power shall be vested in a President of the
SECTION 1. After one year from the ratification of this article the
SECTION 1. All persons born or naturalized in the United States, and
SECTION 1. Full faith and credit shall be given in each State to the
SECTION 1. The judicial power of the United States shall be vested in
SECTION 1. The right of citizens of the United States to vote shall not
SECTION 2. 1. The House of Representatives shall be composed of members
SECTION 2. 1. The President shall be commander-in-chief of the army and
SECTION 2. 1. The citizens of each State shall be entitled to all
SECTION 2. 1. The judicial power shall extend to all cases, in law and
SECTION 2. Representatives shall be apportioned among the several States
SECTION 2. The Congress and the several States shall have concurrent
SECTION 2. The Congress shall have power to enforce this article by
SECTION 3. 1. New States may be admitted by the Congress into this
SECTION 3. 1. The Senate of the United States shall be composed of two
SECTION 3. 1. Treason against the United States shall consist only in
SECTION 3. He shall from time to time give to the Congress information
SECTION 4. 1. The times, places, and manner of holding elections for
SECTION 4. The President, Vice-President, and all civil officers of the
SECTION 4. The United States shall guarantee to every State in this
SECTION 4. The validity of the public debt of the United States,
SECTION 5. 1. Each House shall be the judge of the elections, returns
SECTION 5. The Congress shall have power to enforce, by appropriate
SECTION 6. 1. The senators and representatives shall receive a
SECTION 7. 1. All bills for raising revenue shall originate in the House
SECTION 8. The Congress shall have power: 1. To lay and collect taxes,
SECTION 9. 1. The migration or importation of such persons as any of the
SEND DONATIONS or determine the status of compliance for any
SEND DONATIONS or determine the status of compliance for any
SNAKE-BITES.--We are here only concerned with the injuries
SUMMARY OF DEMOCRACY AND THE WORLD WAR
SUMMARY OF THE COLONIAL PERIOD
SUMMARY OF THE REVOLUTIONARY PERIOD
SUMMARY OF THE SECTIONAL CONFLICT
SUMMARY OF THE UNION AND NATIONAL POLITICS
SURGERY OF THE INDIVIDUAL NERVES[6]
Sabine River in a northwesterly direction to the Pacific. On this
Sacculated aneurysm, as compared with the fusiform variety, tends to
Sacred Heart, and of the consolations the one true Catholic religion
Saddled horses were standing before the house and the suite were
Sam Houston, Davy Crockett, and John C. Fremont were to lead the way
Samson Handley has sought to replace the blocked lymph vessels by
Samson." He seized the government armory at Harper's Ferry, declared
Samuel Gompers, _Labor and the Common Welfare_.
San Antonio, Tucson, and Santa Barbara! The little state of
San Francisco. The fondest hopes of railway promoters seemed to be
Sarah G. Bagley organized the Lowell Female Reform Association for the
Satisfied with the technical victory, the Democrats let the army bill
Savannah and Charleston (1780), and the defeat of Gates at Camden.
Savannah and Charleston. Wars, however, are seldom won by the conquest
Savishna in the late princess' rooms and Princess Mary spent most of
Saying this he again turned round, dropped his hands, took the
Scandinavian immigrants, fresh from the Old World. Between 1867 and
Scarcely a quarter of the soldiers remain with the standards of
Scarcely had Pierre laid his head on the pillow before he felt
Schlappanitz and Bellowitz which cover the enemy's front. For this
Schlappanitz and the Thuerassa forest, avoiding the defiles of
Schoss and the two girls were to sleep on some hay on the floor.
Schoss was much offended and the young ladies' summer dresses could
Schoss who asked her what she was saying, she went out of the room.
Scientific medicine was summoned to stamp out the tropical diseases
Scotch-Irish, Germans,--poor in possessions and thrown upon the labor of
Scythia into which Alexander the Great had marched--Napoleon
Secondary abscesses in the lymph glands, subcutaneous tissue, or joints
Secondary growths in the lymph glands, while not unknown, are extremely
Secondary infection of the parotid gland frequently occurs, and gives
Secondly it was attained by the guerrilla warfare which was destroying
Secondly it was impossible, because to paralyze the momentum with
Secondly, it would have been senseless to block the passage of men
Secretary of State, John Quincy Adams. They favored the plan. Jefferson
Section  2.  Information about the Mission of Project Gutenberg-tm
Section  2.  Information about the Mission of Project Gutenberg-tm
Section 3.  Information about the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive
Section 3.  Information about the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive
Section 4.  Information about Donations to the Project Gutenberg
Section 4.  Information about Donations to the Project Gutenberg
Seeing Anna Mikhaylovna and her son, Prince Vasili dismissed the
Seeing his gloomy face as he frowned at his wife, the officers
Seeing them he kept thinking, "That may be the very standard with
Seeing, on the other side, some Cossacks (les Cosaques) and the
Semenov Guards with the rank of cornet. He received, however, no
Semenovsk heights the artillery commander had proposed to him to bring
Senate for a ratification of the treaty. He still clung to his original
Senate of the United States. In 1902 a second arrangement was made, but
Senate shall choose the Vice-President; a quorum for the purpose shall
Senate, the aspirations of the small states were to be satisfied, for
Senate, to make treaties, provided two-thirds of the senators present
Senate," insisted the Greenbackers, "is a body composed largely of
Senate;--The President of the Senate shall, in presence of the Senate
Senator Hoar was more than usually caustic in his indictment of the new
Senator Platt of Connecticut, a careful statesman of the old school,
Senator Vest introduced in the Senate a resolution that "under the
Senators and Representatives wrangled over tariff schedules, the
Senators, led by Robert Morris, the financier, who had been delegates to
Senators, the initiative, referendum, and recall, commission and city
September 14, 1901, the Vice President, Theodore Roosevelt, took up the
September, and except for a mob in the governor's courtyard, assembled
September, orderlies and servants sent by wounded officers came to the
September, the severe check administered to Lee at Antietam seemed to
Servants with lanterns were bustling about in the porch. The immense
Seven Years' War, had fallen the Louisiana territory stretching from New
Seven days had passed since Prince Andrew found himself in the
Seven years had passed. The storm-tossed sea of European history had
Several men joined the first two.
Several of the men, with bright kindly faces, stopped beside Pierre.
Several shopkeepers crowded round the officer.
Several soldiers gathered by the wall of the trench, looking out
Several soldiers ran toward the cart from different sides: some beat
Several tens of thousands of the slain lay in diverse postures and
Several times during the march false alarms had been given and the
Several times he addressed a prayer to God that the wolf should come
Several times in the course of the morning Princess Mary began
Several times she repeated the same thing twice.
Several times the countess, with tears in her eyes, told her son
Several wounded men passed along the road, and words of abuse,
Seward, the Secretary of State, propose harsh and caustic measures
Shame of the Cities_. The critical spirit appeared in almost every form;
Shays and his followers protested against the conduct of creditors in
Shcherbaty--the gap-toothed). Denisov smiled, and Petya burst into a
Shcherbinin, rising and going up to the man in the nightcap who lay
She and Mavra Kuzminichna tried to get as many of the wounded as
She began asking Dron about the peasants' needs and what there was
She caught the young officer by his cuffs, and a look of solemnity
She could not have read the letter as she did not even know it had
She crossed herself, kissed the icon, and handed it to Andrew.
She did not know and would not have believed it, but beneath the
She did not talk about her brother, diverting the conversation as
She did the right thing with such precision, such complete
She felt all the time as if she might at any moment penetrate that
She finished her game of patience and only then examined the
She got up quickly just as Nicholas entered, almost ran to the
She grew confused, glanced round, and, seeing the doll she had
She had in fact seen nothing then but had mentioned the first
She had not yet gone to bed when the Rostovs arrived and the
She had the air of one who has suddenly lost faith in the whole
She heard the sound of quick footsteps in the quiet street.
She heard, or thought she heard, the names of Kuragin and Bolkonski.
She invited them to take the wounded man into the house.
She lay on the sofa with her face to the wall, fingering the buttons
She led him into the dark drawing room and Pierre was glad no one
She looked round and seeing that her friend was not in the room
She nodded to the dressmaker, whom she knew and who had curtsied
She now saw him from the commencement of that scene and relived what
She opened the door and stepped across the threshold and onto the
She passed into the sitting room, stood there thinking awhile, and
She paused, feeling that she was not telling the truth. Natasha
She pointed to a lady who was crossing the room followed by a very
She praised the Rostovs' toilets. They praised her taste and toilet,
She pushed the little dog off her lap and smoothed her dress.
She returned to the garden and sat down on the grass at the foot
She sat awhile, wondering what the meaning of it all having happened
She sat down at the table and listened to the conversation between
She shared with all her heart in the prayer for the spirit of
She sighed. "I have loved you like a son from the first. Trust
She spoke, mingling most trifling details with the intimate
She stopped, seeing in the forward thrust of her husband's head,
She took his arm and with a happy face went with him into the
She took the liberty of inquiring whether it was long since
She tried to pass Anna Mikhaylovna, but the latter sprang so as to
She turned away and gave her hand to the count, who could hardly
She vividly recalled the moment when he had his first stroke and was
She wanted to cry. Peronskaya had left them. The count was at the
She was gazing in the direction in which he had gone--to the other
She was no longer in the loose gown she generally wore in the
She was nursing her boy when the sound of Pierre's sleigh was
She was twenty-seven. After the death of her brothers she had become
She washed, dressed, said her prayers, and went out to the porch. In
She would begin to say something to her in a low tone from the other
Sherlock Holmes and I had no difficulty in engaging a bedroom and sitting-room at the Crown Inn. They were on the upper floor, and from our window we could command a view of the avenue gate, and of the inhabited wing of Stoke Moran Manor House. At dusk we saw Dr. Grimesby Roylott drive past, his huge form looming up beside the little figure of the lad who drove him. The boy had some slight difficulty in undoing the heavy iron gates, and we heard the hoarse roar of the doctor's voice and saw the fury with which he shook his clinched fists at him. The trap drove on, and a few minutes later we saw a sudden light spring up among the trees as the lamp was lit in one of the sitting-rooms.
Sherlock Holmes and I surveyed this curt announcement and the rueful face behind it, until the comical side of the affair so completely overtopped every other consideration that we both burst out into a roar of laughter.
Sherlock Holmes closed his eyes and placed his elbows upon the arms of his chair, with his finger-tips together. "The ideal reasoner," he remarked, "would, when he had once been shown a single fact in all its bearings, deduce from it not only all the chain of events which led up to it but also all the results which would follow from it. As Cuvier could correctly describe a whole animal by the contemplation of a single bone, so the observer who has thoroughly understood one link in a series of incidents should be able to accurately state all the other ones, both before and after. We have not yet grasped the results which the reason alone can attain to. Problems may be solved in the study which have baffled all those who have sought a solution by the aid of their senses. To carry the art, however, to its highest pitch, it is necessary that the reasoner should be able to utilise all the facts which have come to his knowledge; and this in itself implies, as you will readily see, a possession of all knowledge, which, even in these days of free education and encyclopaedias, is a somewhat rare accomplishment. It is not so impossible, however, that a man should possess all knowledge which is likely to be useful to him in his work, and this I have endeavoured in my case to do. If I remember rightly, you on one occasion, in the early days of our friendship, defined my limits in a very precise fashion."
Sherlock Holmes had opened his mouth to reply, when the door flew open, and Peterson, the commissionaire, rushed into the apartment with flushed cheeks and the face of a man who is dazed with astonishment.
Sherlock Holmes had sprung out and seized the intruder by the collar. The other dived down the hole, and I heard the sound of rending cloth as Jones clutched at his skirts. The light flashed upon the barrel of a revolver, but Holmes' hunting crop came down on the man's wrist, and the pistol clinked upon the stone floor.
Sherlock Holmes hailed a four-wheeler which was passing. "In that case we had better discuss it in a cosy room rather than in this wind-swept market-place," said he. "But pray tell me, before we go farther, who it is that I have the pleasure of assisting."
Sherlock Holmes laughed. "Here is the foresight," said he putting his finger upon the little disc and loop of the hat-securer. "They are never sold upon hats. If this man ordered one, it is a sign of a certain amount of foresight, since he went out of his way to take this precaution against the wind. But since we see that he has broken the elastic and has not troubled to replace it, it is obvious that he has less foresight now than formerly, which is a distinct proof of a weakening nature. On the other hand, he has endeavoured to conceal some of these stains upon the felt by daubing them with ink, which is a sign that he has not entirely lost his self-respect."
Sherlock Holmes looked deeply chagrined. He drew a sovereign from his pocket and threw it down upon the slab, turning away with the air of a man whose disgust is too deep for words. A few yards off he stopped under a lamp-post and laughed in the hearty, noiseless fashion which was peculiar to him.
Sherlock Holmes sat down beside him on the couch and patted him kindly on the shoulder.
Sherlock Holmes sat for some time in silence, with his head sunk forward and his eyes bent upon the red glow of the fire. Then he lit his pipe, and leaning back in his chair he watched the blue smoke-rings as they chased each other up to the ceiling.
Sherlock Holmes sat silent for a few minutes with his fingertips still pressed together, his legs stretched out in front of him, and his gaze directed upward to the ceiling. Then he took down from the rack the old and oily clay pipe, which was to him as a counsellor, and, having lit it, he leaned back in his chair, with the thick blue cloud-wreaths spinning up from him, and a look of infinite languor in his face.
Sherlock Holmes sat silent for some few minutes, with his brows knitted and his eyes fixed upon the fire.
Sherlock Holmes seemed to be embarrassed by the question. "Frankly, now!" she repeated, standing upon the rug and looking keenly down at him as he leaned back in a basket-chair.
Sherlock Holmes took a folded paper from his pocket and flattened it out on the table. "This is a map of the Colony of Victoria," he said. "I wired to Bristol for it last night." He put his hand over part of the map. "What do you read?"
Sherlock Holmes took it up and opened the bureau.
Sherlock Holmes was not very communicative during the long drive and lay back in the cab humming the tunes which he had heard in the afternoon. We rattled through an endless labyrinth of gas-lit streets until we emerged into Farrington Street.
Sherlock Holmes was transformed when he was hot upon such a scent as this. Men who had only known the quiet thinker and logician of Baker Street would have failed to recognise him. His face flushed and darkened. His brows were drawn into two hard black lines, while his eyes shone out from beneath them with a steely glitter. His face was bent downward, his shoulders bowed, his lips compressed, and the veins stood out like whipcord in his long, sinewy neck. His nostrils seemed to dilate with a purely animal lust for the chase, and his mind was so absolutely concentrated upon the matter before him that a question or remark fell unheeded upon his ears, or, at the most, only provoked a quick, impatient snarl in reply. Swiftly and silently he made his way along the track which ran through the meadows, and so by way of the woods to the Boscombe Pool. It was damp, marshy ground, as is all that district, and there were marks of many feet, both upon the path and amid the short grass which bounded it on either side. Sometimes Holmes would hurry on, sometimes stop dead, and once he made quite a little detour into the meadow. Lestrade and I walked behind him, the detective indifferent and contemptuous, while I watched my friend with the interest which sprang from the conviction that every one of his actions was directed towards a definite end.
Sherlock Holmes was wrong in his conjecture, however, for there came a step in the passage and a tapping at the door. He stretched out his long arm to turn the lamp away from himself and towards the vacant chair upon which a newcomer must sit.
Sherlock Holmes was, as I expected, lounging about his sitting-room in his dressing-gown, reading the agony column of The Times and smoking his before-breakfast pipe, which was composed of all the plugs and dottles left from his smokes of the day before, all carefully dried and collected on the corner of the mantelpiece. He received us in his quietly genial fashion, ordered fresh rashers and eggs, and joined us in a hearty meal. When it was concluded he settled our new acquaintance upon the sofa, placed a pillow beneath his head, and laid a glass of brandy and water within his reach.
Sherlock Holmes' quick eye took in my occupation, and he shook his head with a smile as he noticed my questioning glances. "Beyond the obvious facts that he has at some time done manual labour, that he takes snuff, that he is a Freemason, that he has been in China, and that he has done a considerable amount of writing lately, I can deduce nothing else."
Sherman's final stroke--the march from Atlanta to the sea--a maneuver
Shetland and Iceland than in countries where the association of dogs in
Shinshin and the other male visitors on his right. Midway down the
Shinshin in the drawing room. The old countess, waiting for the return
Shinshin, lowering his voice, began to tell the count of some
Shishkov, and told him to write an order to the troops and a
Shishkov, the Secretary of State and one of the chief
Shock is a prominent feature, but its degree, as well as the time of its
Should an ulcer form in spite of these precautions, the mildest
Should recovery take place, repair is usually attended with union of the
Should the part become oedematous, either from general causes, such as
Should varicose veins be present, the question of operative treatment
Shy and modest in manner, halting in speech, disliking the turmoil of
Siberia expressed by details of the morbid character of Ivan the
Sidorov, turning to the French, winked, and began to jabber
Sidorych..." Simon did not finish, for on the still air he had
Silence ensued. The countess looked at her callers, smiling affably,
Silesian linens and woolens, but, fearing England's command of the sea,
Similar abscesses are met with on the scalp in association with eczema,
Similar varieties of _osteomyelitis_ are met with that do not, like the
Similarly the _tibialis posterior_ may be displaced over the medial
Simon sighed and stooped to straighten the leash a young borzoi
Since Bennigsen, who corresponded with the Emperor and had more
Since Boris left Moscow in 1805 to join the army he had had not seen
Since September 2 Moscow has been in the hands of the enemy. Your last
Since early morning--despite an injunction not to approach the
Since he had begun to move in the highest circles Boris had made it
Since the ball he had felt the approach of a fit of nervous
Since the days of Celsus (first century A.D.), heat, redness, swelling,
Since the introduction of the methods of treatment described above, and
Since then Pierre had not been disturbed and had spent the whole
Sistine Madonna was depicted playing at stick and ball. The ball
Sitting at table with the officers and tearing the fat savory mutton
Sitting on the sofa with the little cushions on its arms, in what
Sitting silent and motionless on a heap of straw against the wall,
Six weeks after Anna Pavlovna's "At Home" and after the sleepless
Skin-grafting is sometimes useful in covering in the large raw surface
Slave and Free Soil on the Eve of the Civil War                    335
Slight variations in the size, shape, and weight of rifle bullets, for
Slight wounds of the feet in children who go about barefoot in towns
Slipping onto their haunches and sliding, the horses descended with
Slowly and solemnly he was borne into Briony Lodge and laid out in the principal room, while I still observed the proceedings from my post by the window. The lamps had been lit, but the blinds had not been drawn, so that I could see Holmes as he lay upon the couch. I do not know whether he was seized with compunction at that moment for the part he was playing, but I know that I never felt more heartily ashamed of myself in my life than when I saw the beautiful creature against whom I was conspiring, or the grace and kindliness with which she waited upon the injured man. And yet it would be the blackest treachery to Holmes to draw back now from the part which he had intrusted to me. I hardened my heart, and took the smoke-rocket from under my ulster. After all, I thought, we are not injuring her. We are but preventing her from injuring another.
Smith by the time they reach the high school, it is useless to tell the
Smolensk and Vyazma. Denisov came from those parts and knew the
Smolensk road, the destruction of the invading army of five hundred
Smolensk road. Yes, it was the same flesh, the same chair a canon, the
Smolensk was abandoned contrary to the wishes of the Emperor and
Smolensk which were in nobody's way, because despite the unfortunate
Smolensk, asking him to let her know the state of affairs and the
Smolensk--a calculation he had begun before the marshal went by. And
Smolensk. But we withdrew at an acute angle not only because the
Smolensk?" continued Rapp. "The wine is drawn and must be drunk."
So according to history it has been found from the most ancient
So great did the discontent of the farmers in New Hampshire become in
So great was the business before the Lords of Trade that the colonies
So he rattled on, telling all the gossip he had heard among the
So in the same way Moscow was empty when Napoleon, weary, uneasy,
So it came about that at the council at Malo-Yaroslavets, when the
So it was at Krasnoe, where they expected to find one of the three
So long as the tissues are in a healthy condition they are able to
So she decided that it was necessary to prepare the opinion of
So that examining the relation in time of the commands to the
So that if we examine the case of a man whose connection with the
So the countess remained in the country, and the count, taking Sonya
So the federal government, having destroyed chattel slavery, sought by
So the histories say, and it is all quite wrong, as anyone who cares
So the swishing sound of the strokes, and the desperate but
So thought Prince Andrew as he listened to the talking, and he
So thought the Emperor, and the Russian commanders and people were
So too, like Voltaire in his time, uninvited defenders of the law of
Soldiers and militiamen ran bareheaded past Pierre toward the
Soldiers were passing in a constant stream along the street blocking
Soldiers! The Russian army is advancing against you to avenge the
Soldiers! This is the battle you have so longed for. Victory depends
Some Americans of the old stock still held to the idea that the United
Some Americans, while resenting the hasty and often superficial
Some are normally present--for instance, that between the skin and the
Some beat and tore at Vereshchagin, others at the tall youth. And
Some fifteen men with merry shouts were shaking down the high wattle
Some five male domestic serfs, big and little, rushed out to the
Some forty Uhlans were drowned in the river, though boats were
Some ladies, with faces betraying complete forgetfulness of all the
Some of the North Carolinians, particularly the Quakers, came all the
Some of the generals, in low tones and in a strain very different
Some of the men bared their heads, others stared at the new arrivals
Some of the nearest relatives had not yet left. They were sitting in
Some of the soldiers were frightened and ran away, others went on
Some of them, he relates, had been hunters in the upper world of the
Some of these imply direct contact--such, for example, as kissing, the
Some other New England towns, refusing to profit by the experience of
Some swarthy men and women were really entering from the cold
Some three hours or so afterwards we were all in the train together, bound from Reading to the little Berkshire village. There were Sherlock Holmes, the hydraulic engineer, Inspector Bradstreet, of Scotland Yard, a plain-clothes man, and myself. Bradstreet had spread an ordnance map of the county out upon the seat and was busy with his compasses drawing a circle with Eyford for its centre.
Some twenty men of the Sixth Company who were on their way into
Someone mentioned that Captain Tushin was bivouacking close to the
Someone spoke her name in a soft and tender voice from the garden
Someone stopped at the gate, and the latch rattled as someone tried to
Someone, a very important personage judging by the haste with which
Someone? There is the future life. The Someone is--God."
Something cracked in the flames. The fire died down for a moment and
Something like fear sprang up in the young lady's expressive black eyes. "Why, you are like a magician," said she. "How do you know that?" She smiled, but there was no answering smile in Holmes' thin, eager face.
Something still more like the feudal system of the Old World appeared in
Sometimes Pierre, struck by the meaning of his words, would ask
Sometimes a dark-blue spot appears on the medial side of the great toe
Sometimes he consoled himself with the thought that he was only
Sometimes it seemed to her that this difference arose from the
Sometimes she fell into one of the mad, merry moods characteristic
Sometimes shouts were heard through the firing, but it was
Sometimes the best of the pupils, of whom Natasha, who was
Sometimes the disease is ushered in by a febrile attack attended with
Sometimes the dissemination involves the lymph vessels of the limb,
Sometimes the epidermis gives way, forming an ulcer with flabby
Sometimes the haemorrhage takes place apparently spontaneously from the
Sometimes the lymphadenitis is of an acute character, and the tendency
Sometimes the myeloma is met with in multiple form in the skeleton, in
Sometimes the old count would come up, kiss Prince Andrew, and ask
Sometimes the primary growth appears in the form of multiple nodules
Sometimes the tuberculous granulation tissue spreads in the marrow,
Sometimes vomiting ensues before the patient completely loses
Sometimes when, trying to understand him, she spoke of the good work
Sometimes, as she looked at the strange but amusing capers cut by
Sometimes--when there is not a coward at the front to shout, 'We are
Sonya among a minority of women who crowded near the wall, not
Sonya and Natasha slept in the sitting room without undressing.
Sonya and sat down, scanning the brilliant tiers of boxes opposite.
Sonya and the maids were holding her arms.
Sonya became thoughtful. The question of how to write to Nicholas,
Sonya did not succumb to the tender tone Natasha used toward her.
Sonya entered the room with an agitated face.
Sonya felt that this was true: that the only possibility of
Sonya jumped out of the coach and ran to the countess. The countess,
Sonya passed to the pantry with a glass in her hand. Natasha glanced
Sonya read painstakingly in her high-pitched voice. The count
Sonya sat down and Natasha pinned the ribbon on differently.
Sonya sat down before the glasses, got the right position, and began
Sonya sat up. The little kitten brightened, its eyes shone, and it
Sonya sighed and made no reply. The count, Petya, Madame Schoss,
Sonya slammed the door to. A minute later they let the count in.
Sonya struck the first chord of the prelude.
Sonya too was busy all this time, but the aim of her efforts was
Sonya was always the first excuse Countess Mary found for feeling
Sonya was not less agitated than her friend by the latter's fear and
Sonya was sitting at the clavichord, playing the prelude to
Sonya was sitting sobbing in the corridor. "Marya Dmitrievna, for
Sonya was unhappy at the separation from Nicholas and still more
Sonya went out into the passage to go to the barn. Nicholas went
Sonya went up to the countess and, kneeling down, kissed her hand.
Sonya's costume was the best of all. Her mustache and eyebrows
Sonya, Natasha, Petya, Anna Mikhaylovna, Vera, and the old count
Sonya, and being reminded by the smell of burnt cork of the
Sonya, shaking off some down which clung to her and tucking away the
Sonya--who sat weary but resolute at the samovar--and questioned
Sonya. The autumn in Otradnoe with the hunting, and the winter with
Sonya... She was right," he thought, remembering what the governor's
Soon after "Uncle's" reappearance the door was opened, evidently
Soon after Prince Andrew's return the old prince made over to him
Soon after his admission to the Masonic Brotherhood, Pierre went
Soon after the Christmas holidays Nicholas told his mother of his
Soon after the Emperor's return Prince Vasili in a conversation
Soon after the duke's departure--before he could possibly have
Soon after the migration to the "warm rivers," in which he had taken
Soon after this the children came in to say good night. They
Soon after this there came into the dark chamber to fetch Pierre,
Sophie, the rosy, laughter-loving, youngest princess with the
Sounds of crying and screaming came from somewhere in the distance
Sounds of hoofs and shouts were nearing the village.
Source Book_. Roosevelt, _Winning of the West_, Vol. V, pp. 5-57.
South Carolina and Georgia, however, the anti-slavery views of
South Carolina assemblies indorsed the Circular Letter and were also
South and largely in the North, they had the press, the schools, and the
South continued to give a peculiar character to that section of the
South could demand as the price of its consent a new slave state. No
South had long been rich in natural resources, but the slave system had
South was made in the provision for the return of runaway slaves--a
South, which sharply divided the whites and in many communities threw
South. Moreover, most of the Northern slaves were domestic servants, not
South. Not until the last Southern state was restored to the union, not
Southern coast, linking Richmond, Charleston, and Savannah with the
Southern leaders, the annexation of Texas and the conquest of Mexico
Southern members voted for assumption to pass the bill, and a majority
Southern novices, known as "Scalawags." The result was a carnival of
Southern states, with Texas in the lead.
Southern states. In 1880 they had one-fourth of the mills of the
Southern states." Seeing little objectionable in the public record of
Southern statesmen like Calhoun to hold the West and the South together
Southern statesmen wanted connections between the Gulf and the Pacific
Southerners, smarting under the reconstruction acts, could regard the
Spain if we possess the power." This startling proclamation to the world
Spain instructed the officials at New Orleans to close the port to
Spain won Florida and Minorca but not the coveted Gibraltar. France
Spaniards; and seriously did he urge the East not to neglect them, lest
Spanish fleet, marking the doom of Spanish dominion in the Philippines.
Spanish misdeeds; orators demanded that the Cubans be sustained "in
Speak!" Denisov blushed like a girl (it was strange to see the color
Speaker's sway by ousting him from the rules committee and depriving him
Speaking of the interaction of heat and electricity and of atoms, we
Speaking of the position of Prussia, Anna Pavlovna very naturally
Speaking so, the historians of culture involuntarily contradict
Specialist historians describing the campaign of 1813 or the
Speculators collected at once to fatten on the calamities of the
Speranski and participating in the work of the legislative commission,
Speranski owned in the Taurida Gardens. In the parqueted dining room
Speranski smiled and said he could not judge of the advantage or
Speranski's request he took the first part of the Civil Code that
Speranski, wearing a gray swallow-tail coat with a star on the breast,
Speranski--the news of whose sudden exile and alleged treachery had
Splints are to be avoided. In refractory cases, benefit may follow the
Springfield in 1636 and Great Barrington in 1725. By the opening of the
Springs, founded the town, and encouraged local improvements. Denver
Squanto and Samoset teaching the Pilgrims the ways of the wilds; of
St. Petersburg his famous note on the "open door" policy in China. In
St. Petersburg, used only by the elite.
Stael, read novels, liked the society of pretty women, jested with
Staggering amid the crush, Pierre looked about him.
Stamp Act when Parliament passed the Quartering Act ordering the
Standard Oil Company and the American Tobacco Company on the ground that
State down to the district tribunals. Now those vague liberal dreams
State with themselves. And they shall make a list of all the persons
State, being twenty-one years of age, and citizens of the United States,
State, had resigned because the drift of President Wilson's policy was
State, the right of the people to keep and bear arms shall not be
Statehood meant to the pioneers self-government, dignity, and the right
States and all territory subject to the jurisdiction thereof for
States and that the wrong should be righted by a restoration of the
States could not surrender any question coming under the terms of the
States from 1801 to 1835, lost no occasion to exalt the Constitution
States should continue to be an asylum for "the oppressed of the earth."
States sought no material rewards. "The world must be made safe for
States troops in supervising elections. The following year they again
States under this Constitution, as under the Confederation.
States was again affirmed. William Jennings Bryan, the Secretary of
States!" cried Chancellor Livingston as soon as the General had kissed
States, "whatever we may think of it has declared itself the inevitable
States, and a majority of all the States shall be necessary to a choice.
States, and with the Indian tribes;
States, at the time of the adoption of this Constitution, shall be
States, demanded "the immediate ratification of the treaty without
States, or by conventions in three-fourths thereof, as the one or the
States." The last resort of trade unions in labor disputes, the strike,
States; those who made false statements designed to interfere with the
States_, pp. 133-156; Elson, _History of the United States_, pp.
States_, pp. 279-301. Dewey, _Financial History of the United States_,
Steffens exposed the sordid character of politics in several
Steps must be taken to facilitate the venous return from the ulcerated
Still greater coherence and inevitability is seen in the life of
Still less does the history of authors and reformers explain to us
Still more extraordinary than the Seamen's Act was the Adamson law of
Still more senseless would have been the wish to capture army corps of
Still no extensive effort was made to solve by law the economic problems
Still others protested that the purchase would lead inevitably to the
Still smiling, the French officer spread out his hands before
Still that is somewhat beside the point, for mere economic advantage is
Still the Republicans on the whole stood firmly by the rates imposed
Still the cannon balls continued regularly to whistle and flop
Stopping in front of the Pavlograds, the Tsar said something in
Straining all her faculties Princess Mary looked at him. The comic
Strange as at first glance it may seem to suppose that the
Strange as may be the historical account of how some king or
Street they halted and drew in the Square. Several French officers
Streets. No masters of the houses being found anywhere, the French
Stripes on the Pacific slope.
Stripes were hoisted as a sign that the land of Coronado, De Soto,
Structurally, two main groups may be differentiated: (1) the soft,
Subcutaneous _rupture of the tendon of the extensor pollicis longus_ at
Success depends upon using the liniment of iodine (the tincture is not
Success has attended the use of a vaccine prepared from cultures of the
Such are the true facts of the death of Dr. Grimesby Roylott, of Stoke Moran. It is not necessary that I should prolong a narrative which has already run to too great a length by telling how we broke the sad news to the terrified girl, how we conveyed her by the morning train to the care of her good aunt at Harrow, of how the slow process of official inquiry came to the conclusion that the doctor met his fate while indiscreetly playing with a dangerous pet. The little which I had yet to learn of the case was told me by Sherlock Holmes as we travelled back next day.
Such enterprise could not escape the vigilant eyes of England and
Such is the fate not of great men (grands hommes) whom the Russian
Such was the hated writ that Townshend proposed to put into the hands of
Such was the settlement at Paris and such was the association of nations
Suddenly a gust of wind beat violently against the casement of the
Suddenly he heard Denisov shouting in a vibrating voice behind the
Suddenly he sniffed and put his face closer to the window.
Suddenly something happened: the young officer gave a gasp and
Suddenly the angry, squirrel-like expression of the princess' pretty
Suddenly the sound of a firing of cannon was heard from the
Suddenly there was the momentary gleam of a light up in the direction of the ventilator, which vanished immediately, but was succeeded by a strong smell of burning oil and heated metal. Someone in the next room had lit a dark-lantern. I heard a gentle sound of movement, and then all was silent once more, though the smell grew stronger. For half an hour I sat with straining ears. Then suddenly another sound became audible--a very gentle, soothing sound, like that of a small jet of steam escaping continually from a kettle. The instant that we heard it, Holmes sprang from the bed, struck a match, and lashed furiously with his cane at the bell-pull.
Suddenly, he did not know why, he felt a pang. The day was so
Sukharev market that he met the Rostovs.
Sunday. The church bells everywhere were ringing for service, just
Superior was connected with Puget Sound. The waters explored by Joliet
Supposing that by these words Anna Pavlovna was somewhat lifting the
Suppuration in the peri-articular soft parts or in one of the adjacent
Suppuration may occur in the track of a skin stitch, producing a _stitch
Suppuration spreads towards the surface, until, some days later, the
Suppuration, or the formation of pus, is one of the results of the
Supreme Court after the death of Marshall, began to charter banks under
Supreme Court at Washington now towers above the states, kept the
Supreme Court at Washington. Thus the old federation of "independent
Supreme Court had suggested. The Republicans responded in their platform
Supreme Court of the United States.
Susquehanna, and, in 1726, the first farmhouse was built on the bank
Sustained by their own labor, possessing the interior to which their
Suvorov's wars. Send it to the Academy. Here are some jottings for you
Suvorov, of the host's father and mother, and of himself in military
Sventsyani was remembered by the hussars only as the drunken camp, a
Swaying his head and smiling as if amused at himself, the officer
Switzerland, and after a long and careful review of the arguments on
Symmetrical bossing of the skull was present in the case shown in
Synod--a prayer for the deliverance of Russia from hostile invasion.
Synovial Membrane, from Shoulder-joint, the seat of arthritis deformans,
Syphilis is also to be diagnosed from _epithelioma_, the common form of
Syphilis is an infective disease due to the entrance into the body of a
Syphilis plays an important part in the production of aneurysm, probably
Syphilitic affections of bone may be met with at any period of the
Syphilitic lesions are liable to be mistaken for actinomycosis, all the
T.N. Page, _The Negro, the Southerner's Problem_.
THE ADMINISTRATION OF PRESIDENT TAFT
THE ADMISSION OF NEW STATES
THE ADVANCE OF THE MIDDLE BORDER
THE ADVENTURES OF
THE AGENCIES OF AMERICAN COLONIZATION
THE AMERICAN REVOLUTION
THE BLOOD VESSELS
THE BURSAE
THE CALLING OF A CONSTITUTIONAL CONVENTION
THE CANADIAN BUILDING AT THE PANAMA-CALIFORNIA INTERNATIONAL
THE CIVIL WAR AND RECONSTRUCTION
THE CLASH OF POLITICAL PARTIES
THE COLONIAL PEOPLES
THE COLONIAL PRESS
THE CURRENCY QUESTION
THE DEMOCRATIC MOVEMENT IN THE EAST
THE DEVELOPMENT OF COLONIAL NATIONALISM
THE DEVELOPMENT OF THE GREAT WEST
THE DIPLOMACY OF THE REVOLUTION
THE DRIFT OF EVENTS TOWARD THE IRREPRESSIBLE CONFLICT
THE ECONOMIC ADVANCE OF THE SOUTH
THE EFFECTS OF WARFARE ON THE COLONIES
THE ESTABLISHMENT OF GOVERNMENT AND THE NEW ALLEGIANCE
THE EVOLUTION IN POLITICAL INSTITUTIONS
THE EVOLUTION OF GRAZING AND AGRICULTURE
THE EVOLUTION OF REPUBLICAN POLICIES (1901-13)
THE FARMERS BEYOND THE APPALACHIANS
THE FEDERAL MILITARY HOSPITAL AT GETTYSBURG]
THE FINANCES OF THE REVOLUTION
THE FORMATION OF THE CONSTITUTION
THE FRAMING OF THE CONSTITUTION
THE FULL PROJECT GUTENBERG LICENSE
THE FULL PROJECT GUTENBERG LICENSE
THE GREAT MIGRATION TO AMERICA
THE GROWTH OF OPPOSITION TO REPUBLICAN RULE
THE INDUSTRIAL REVOLUTION
THE INDUSTRIAL REVOLUTION AND NATIONAL POLITICS
THE INFLUENCE OF THE FAR WEST ON NATIONAL LIFE
THE INTERACTION OF AMERICAN AND EUROPEAN OPINION
THE JEFFERSONIAN REPUBLICANS IN POWER
THE LAND AND THE WESTWARD MOVEMENT
THE LAUNCHING OF A SHIP AT THE GREAT NAVAL YARDS, NEWARK, N.J.]
THE LEADERSHIP OF THE CHURCHES
THE LYMPH VESSELS AND GLANDS
THE MACMILLAN COMPANY
THE MEN AND MEASURES OF THE NEW GOVERNMENT
THE MIDDLE BORDER AND THE GREAT WEST
THE MINOR PARTIES AND UNREST
THE MUSCLES, TENDONS, AND TENDON SHEATHS
THE NATIONAL DECISIONS OF CHIEF JUSTICE MARSHALL
THE NATIONAL STRUGGLE FOR WOMAN SUFFRAGE
THE NATURAL ARREST OF HAEMORRHAGE AND THE REPAIR OF BLOOD
THE NERVES
THE NEW COURSE IN BRITISH IMPERIAL POLICY
THE NEW DEMOCRACY AT WASHINGTON
THE NEW DEMOCRACY ENTERS THE ARENA
THE NEW POLITICAL DEMOCRACY
THE PACIFIC COAST AND UTAH
THE PLANTING SYSTEM AND NATIONAL POLITICS
THE POLITICAL AND ECONOMIC EVOLUTION OF THE SOUTH
THE PROCESS OF COLONIZATION
THE PROMISE AND THE DIFFICULTIES OF AMERICA
THE PROTECTIVE TARIFF AND TAXATION
THE RAILWAYS AND TRUSTS
THE RAILWAYS AS TRAIL BLAZERS
THE RED-HEADED LEAGUE
THE REPUBLICAN WAR FOR COMMERCIAL INDEPENDENCE
THE REPUBLICANS AND THE GREAT WEST
THE REPUBLICANS NATIONALIZED
THE RESTORATION OF WHITE SUPREMACY
THE RESULTS OF THE CIVIL WAR
THE RISE AND GROWTH OF ORGANIZED LABOR
THE RISE OF POLITICAL PARTIES
THE RISE OF THE INDUSTRIAL SYSTEM
THE RISE OF THE WHIGS
THE RISE OF THE WOMAN MOVEMENT
THE ROOSEVELT DAM, PHOENIX, ARIZONA]
THE ROOSEVELT DOMESTIC POLICIES
THE SETTLEMENT AT PARIS
THE SKIN AND SUBCUTANEOUS TISSUE
THE SOUND MONEY BATTLE OF 1896
THE SOUTH AT THE CLOSE OF THE WAR
THE SOUTHERN CONFEDERACY
THE SPIRIT OF REFORM IN AMERICA
THE SPIRIT OF THE FRONTIER
THE STRUGGLE OVER RATIFICATION
THE SUPREMACY OF THE REPUBLICAN PARTY (1861-85)
THE TRANSPLANTATION OR GRAFTING OF TISSUES
THE UNITED STATES AND THE EUROPEAN WAR
THE UNITED STATES AT WAR
THE WAR MEASURES OF THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT
THE WEST AND THE EAST MEET
THE WESTERN MIGRATION AND NEW STATES
THE WIDER RELATIONS OF ORGANIZED LABOR
THOMAS JEFFERSON READING HIS DRAFT OF THE DECLARATION OF
TO THE EBOOK OR ANY MEDIUM IT MAY BE ON, INCLUDING BUT NOT
TO THE EBOOK OR ANY MEDIUM IT MAY BE ON, INCLUDING BUT NOT
Taft, was selected by the President and charged with the government of
Take her to your room and I'll go to Father. How is he? Just the
Taking advantage of the restless spirit in the Southwest, Aaron Burr,
Taking the colonel's outburst as a challenge to his courage, the
Talk in general centered round three melancholy facts: the Emperor's
Talma, la Duchenois, Potier, the Sorbonne, the boulevards," and
Taney, before whom the case of a man arrested under the President's
Tarutino and Vyazma, to hastening it on while easing the movement of
Tarutino to Madame de Stael, the reading of novels, the distribution
Tarutino; the news of easy successes gained by peasants and
Tarutino; the reports coming in from all sides of the inactivity and
Tatarinova on the day of the battle. Kutuzov wrote that the Russians
Tattered, blue-purple clouds, reddening in the east, were scudding
Taylor. By these acts the boundaries of Texas were adjusted and the
Tea Act and the colonial boycott that followed. In 1773 it agreed to
Telling the groom to follow him with the horses, Pierre went down
Telyanin and Bogdanich. That affair was the same thing as this soldier
Telyanin was sitting in the same indolent pose in which Rostov had
Telyanin, and he went out to give the order.
Telyanin. Rostov, feeling that he was at the front and in the power of
Ten minutes later Lavrushka brought the coffee. "He's coming!"
Tendon sheaths have the same structure and function as the synovial
Tennessee they could find their way down the drifting flood to their
Tennessee, and the sugar planters of Louisiana developed into a
Terrible atrocities were committed on both sides in the name of liberty,
Territory of Utah was similarly organized with the same conditions as to
Tertiary lesions of the _bones and joints_, of the _muscles_, and of the
Tetanus_.--This variety is characterised by the shortness of the
Texas and the Territory in Dispute                                 282
Texas at the Nueces River and a line drawn thence in a northerly
Texas to the North by four thousand cowboys, supplied with 30,000
Texas, where the people, looking upon the ruin of their city wrought by
Texas," two other cries, "The Reoccupation of Oregon," and "Fifty-four
Texas. Within a decade some twenty thousand Americans had crossed the
Thanks to Anna Mikhaylovna's efforts, his own tastes, and the
Thanks to Denisov the conversation at table soon became general
Thanks to the delay caused by this crossing of the wolf's path,
Thanks to the schools, few and scattered as they were, and to the
Thanks to the strictness and assiduity of its commander the
That I, the daughter of Prince Nicholas Bolkonski, asked General
That Napoleon agreed with Mouton, and that the army retreated,
That Sunday, the Rostovs went to Mass at the Razumovskis' private
That aim was attained in the first place of itself, as the French
That amputation for senile gangrene performed between the ankle and the
That army could not recover anywhere. Since the battle of Borodino
That arousing of the people by their sovereign and his call to
That assumption would destroy the possibility of the existence of
That city is taken; the Russian army suffers heavier losses than the
That couch was dreadful to him, probably because of the oppressive
That day Countess Helene had a reception at her house. The French
That day he dined with the marshal, at the same board on the
That evening Marya Dmitrievna was going to the Akharovs' and
That evening the Rostovs went to the Opera, for which Marya
That evening, between issuing one order that the forged Russian
That hesitation lasted only an instant. The Tsar's foot, in the
That impulse was reasonable. The condition of fugitives and of
That inexorable, eternal, distant, and unknown the presence of which
That instant, when Nicholas saw the wolf struggling in the gully
That is the only reality in the world, all else is folly. It is the
That is, power is power: in other words, power is a word the meaning
That made the war inevitable.
That movement from the Nizhni to the Ryazan, Tula, and Kaluga
That must be either Mary Nikolievna's or the Ivanovs'!"
That night another wounded man was driven down the Povarskaya, and
That reply is the expression of a consciousness that is not
That same day a council of war had been held in which all the
That same evening Pierre went to the Rostovs' to fulfill the
That same evening there was an animated discussion among the
That same night, having taken leave of the Minister of War,
That there had been a real decline in silver was denied by the friends
That unknown quantity is the spirit of the army, that is to say, the
That was all done by the soldiers. Therefore it was not he who
That was not all. Untold wealth in the form of natural resources was
That was the only doubt often troubling Pierre. He did not now
That winter the Karagins' house was the most agreeable and
That would be the best way."
That's the sort of man he is, and nothing more," replied Dolgorukov,
That's the way."
That's what the government is for. You'd better listen to what
The "606" preparations may be introduced into the veins by injection or
The "914" preparations may be injected either into the subcutaneous
The "man of great merit," despite his desire to obtain the post of
The "man of great merit," who was still a novice in court circles,
The "rail splitter" from Illinois united the nationalism of Hamilton
The "rotten-boroughs," as they were called by reformers, were a public
The #Rhabdomyoma# is an extremely rare form of tumour, met with in the
The Alien law was not enforced; but it gave great offense to the Irish
The American people thought their worst fears confirmed when, in 1822, a
The Americans had a host in Washington himself. He had long been
The Americans, on the other hand, while they fought with grim
The Anti-Federalists, as a matter of fact, were generally favorable to
The Articles of Confederation very explicitly declared that "each state
The Austrian general looked dissatisfied, but had no option but to
The Austro-Prussian war appears to us undoubtedly the result of
The Battle of Borodino, with the occupation of Moscow that
The Bible legend tells us that the absence of labor--idleness--was a
The Black Swan is an inn of repute in the High Street, at no distance from the station, and there we found the young lady waiting for us. She had engaged a sitting-room, and our lunch awaited us upon the table.
The Boscombe Pool, which is a little reed-girt sheet of water some fifty yards across, is situated at the boundary between the Hatherley Farm and the private park of the wealthy Mr. Turner. Above the woods which lined it upon the farther side we could see the red, jutting pinnacles which marked the site of the rich landowner's dwelling. On the Hatherley side of the pool the woods grew very thick, and there was a narrow belt of sodden grass twenty paces across between the edge of the trees and the reeds which lined the lake. Lestrade showed us the exact spot at which the body had been found, and, indeed, so moist was the ground, that I could plainly see the traces which had been left by the fall of the stricken man. To Holmes, as I could see by his eager face and peering eyes, very many other things were to be read upon the trampled grass. He ran round, like a dog who is picking up a scent, and then turned upon my companion.
The Boston Massacre stirred the country from New Hampshire to Georgia.
The British also encouraged the Indian chief Tecumseh, who welded
The British were in fact battered and worn down by a guerrilla war and
The Caribbean Region (color map)                     _Facing_      592
The Church was also sanctioned by law and supported by taxes in the
The Civil War, lasting for four years, tested the strength of both North
The Clayton law was followed the next year by the Seamen's Act giving
The Colonies at the Time of the Declaration of Independence
The Comte de Turenne showed him into a big reception room where many
The Confederacy also sold bonds, the first issue bringing into the
The Confederate currency, inflated to the bursting point, had utterly
The Congress drew up a declaration of American rights and stated in
The Congress shall have power to enforce this article by appropriate
The Congress shall have power to lay and collect taxes on incomes, from
The Congress, whenever two-thirds of both Houses shall deem it
The Cossack bent forward from under the wagon to get a closer look
The Cossack raised his arm and a shot rang out. In an instant the
The Cossack was sent for and questioned. The Cossack officers wished
The Cossack's report, confirmed by horse patrols who were sent
The Cossacks carried off what they could to their camps, and the
The Cossacks sold the horse for two gold pieces, and Rostov, being
The Council of War began to assemble at two in the afternoon in
The Count shrugged his broad shoulders. "Then I must begin," said he, "by binding you both to absolute secrecy for two years; at the end of that time the matter will be of no importance. At present it is not too much to say that it is of such weight it may have an influence upon European history."
The Cumberland Road                                                233
The Democrats on their part were not all confirmed free traders or even
The Democrats, as expected, picked up the gauntlet thrown down with such
The Democrats, on their side, indignantly denied the charges, replying
The Democrats, who before 1860 definitely opposed protective tariffs,
The Emperor Napoleon had not yet left his bedroom and was
The Emperor at once received this messenger in his study at the
The Emperor began to breathe heavily and rapidly, his lower lip
The Emperor ceased speaking, the crowd began pressing round him, and
The Emperor drew level with Rostov and halted. Alexander's face
The Emperor entered the Cathedral of the Assumption. The crowd
The Emperor entered the hall through a broad path between two
The Emperor greeted the officers and the Semenov guard, and again
The Emperor interrupted him.
The Emperor knit his brows with dissatisfaction and, glancing
The Emperor listened in silence, not looking at Michaud.
The Emperor of Russia had, meanwhile, been in Vilna for more than
The Emperor rode to the square where, facing one another, a
The Emperor said a few words to him and took a step toward his
The Emperor thanked Prince Andrew and bowed. Prince Andrew
The Emperor turned with a smile to one of his followers and made a
The Emperor was in very good spirits after his ride through Vilna,
The Emperor was pale, his cheeks sunken and his eyes hollow, but the
The Emperor was with the army to encourage it, but his presence
The Emperor went in, and after that the greater part of the crowd
The Emperor went into the study. He was followed by Prince Peter
The Emperor with a rapid glance scanned Kutuzov from head to foot,
The Emperor without waiting for an answer turned away and said to
The Emperor's displeasure with Kutuzov was specially increased at
The Emperor's horse started at the sudden cry. This horse that had
The Emperor's manifesto was read, evoking enthusiasm, and then all
The Emperor's speech had been extraordinary. It had been a speech such
The Emperor, frowning slightly, bent his ear forward as if he had
The Emperor, with the agitation of one who has been personally
The Emperors remounted and rode away. The Preobrazhensk battalion,
The English have not understood and cannot understand the
The Englishman nodded, but gave no indication whether he intended to
The Englishman took out his purse and began counting out the
The Foundation is committed to complying with the laws regulating
The Foundation is committed to complying with the laws regulating
The Foundation's principal office is located at 4557 Melan Dr. S.
The Foundation's principal office is located at 4557 Melan Dr. S.
The French Emperor, it was well known, looked with jealousy upon the
The French alphabet, written out with the same numerical values as
The French army melted away at the uniform rate of a mathematical
The French attributed the Fire of Moscow au patriotisme feroce de
The French colonel with difficulty repressed a yawn, but was
The French dragoon was a young Alsatian who spoke French with a German
The French evacuation began on the night between the sixth and
The French found Moscow abandoned but with all the organizations
The French guns were hastily reloaded. The infantry in their blue
The French had attacked the Russian army in order to drive it from its
The French had attacked the battery and, seeing Kutuzov, were firing
The French had been repulsed for the last time. And again and
The French had time to fire three rounds of grapeshot before the
The French historians, describing the condition of the French army
The French line was wider than ours, and it was plain that they
The French onlookers and listeners laughed.
The French patrol was one of those sent out through the various
The French soldiers went to kill and be killed at the battle of
The French were already near. Prince Andrew, walking beside
The French were making a stand there behind a wattle fence in a garden
The French who had occupied the battery fled, and our troops
The French, not being farther pursued, began to recover
The French, retreating in 1812--though according to tactics they
The French, the spy reported, having crossed the Vienna bridge, were
The French, who had ceased firing at this field strewn with dead and
The French, with the memory of all their former victories during
The Frenchman expanded his chest and made a majestic gesture with
The Frenchman glanced around uneasily and then, as if overcoming his
The Frenchman looked at his guilty face and smiled.
The Frenchman's chatter which had previously amused Pierre now
The Frenchman, having pushed his head and hands through, without
The German closed his eyes, signifying that he did not understand.
The German laughed, came out of the cowshed, pulled off his cap, and
The Goal of Project Gutenberg is to Give Away 1 Trillion eBooks!
The Goal of Project Gutenberg is to Give Away 1 Trillion eBooks!
The Grand Master proposed that the last duty should be performed,
The Grand Master rapped with his mallet. All the Masons sat down
The Guards had made their whole march as if on a pleasure trip,
The Horse Guards were galloping, but still holding in their
The Italian seemed happy only when he could come to see Pierre, talk
The Jews, then as ever engaged in their age-long battle for religious
The King stared at him in amazement.
The King took a heavy chamois leather bag from under his cloak and laid it on the table.
The Lone Star Republic, with Houston at the head, then sought admission
The Lord St. Simon marriage, and its curious termination, have long ceased to be a subject of interest in those exalted circles in which the unfortunate bridegroom moves. Fresh scandals have eclipsed it, and their more piquant details have drawn the gossips away from this four-year-old drama. As I have reason to believe, however, that the full facts have never been revealed to the general public, and as my friend Sherlock Holmes had a considerable share in clearing the matter up, I feel that no memoir of him would be complete without some little sketch of this remarkable episode.
The Mason cleared his throat huskily, as old men do, and called
The Mason did not move and for a long time said nothing after this
The Mason looked intently at Pierre and smiled as a rich man with
The Mason remained silent for a long time, evidently considering.
The Mason smiled with his gentle fatherly smile.
The Missouri Compromise                                            326
The Moore-Corradi method has been successfully employed, access to the
The Navigation Acts, in effect, gave a monopoly of colonial commerce to
The New England Federalists, at the Hartford convention, prophesied that
The North had its way during the war. Congress, by legislation initiated
The Oregon Country and the Disputed Boundary                       285
The Original Grants (color map)                         _Facing_     4
The Overland Trails                                                287
The Pavlograd Hussars were stationed two miles from Braunau. The
The Pavlograd regiment had had only two men wounded in action, but
The Pavlograd regiment, belonging to that part of the army which had
The Philadelphia workmen, in issuing a call for a local convention,
The Populists favored them in their platform of 1896. Mr. Bryan, two
The Project Gutenberg EBook of History of the United States
The Project Gutenberg EBook of The Adventures of Sherlock Holmes
The Project Gutenberg EBook of War and Peace, by Leo Tolstoy
The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation has been approved by
The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation has been approved by
The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation has been created
The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation has been created
The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation is a non profit
The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation is a non profit
The Project gratefully accepts contributions of money, time,
The Project gratefully accepts contributions of money, time,
The Republicans thus hewed to the line of their general policy of
The Rhetor cleared his throat, crossed his gloved hands on his
The Rostov party spent the night at Mytishchi, fourteen miles from
The Rostovs knew everybody in Moscow. The old count had money enough
The Rostovs lived in the same hospitable way in Petersburg as in
The Rostovs remained in Moscow till the first of September, that is,
The Rostovs' monetary affairs had not improved during the two
The Russian Emperor's aide-de-camp is an impostor. Officers are
The Russian army had to act like a whip to a running animal. And the
The Russian army was commanded by Kutuzov and his staff, and also by
The Russian army, they say, in its retreat from Smolensk sought
The Russian expedition actually cost France less than fifty thousand
The Russian military historians in so far as they submit to claims
The Russian officer in charge of the transport lolled back in the
The Russian troops were passing through Moscow from two o'clock at
The Russian war should have been the most popular war of modern
The Russians did not make that effort because they were not
The Russians did not seek out the best position but, on the
The Russians retreated eighty miles--to beyond Moscow--and the
The Russians stood in serried ranks behind Semenovsk village and its
The Russians, half of whom died, did all that could and should
The Russians, they say, fortified this position in advance on the
The Senate of Massachusetts, while the war was in progress, resolved
The Senate of the United States shall be composed of two senators from
The Senate, more conservative on the question of annexation than the
The Socialist party, founded in 1900, with Eugene V. Debs, the leader of
The Sokolniki field was deserted. Only at the end of it, in front of
The South answered the challenge. Speaking in the House of
The Southern Revolution was unlike either of these cataclysms. It was
The Southern planter, on his broad acres tilled by slaves, resembled the
The Stamp Act Congress was more than an assembly of protest. It marked
The Stamp Act, like the Sugar Act, declared the purpose of the British
The Torzhok peddler woman, in a whining voice, went on offering
The Tsar addressed the officers also: "I thank you all, gentlemen, I
The Tsar heard but obviously did not like the reply; he shrugged his
The Tsar looked intently and observantly into Kutuzov's eye
The Tsar said something more which Rostov did not hear, and the
The Tsar stopped a few minutes in front of the hussars as if
The United States in 1805 (color map)                 _Facing_     193
The United States in 1861 (color map)                 _Facing_     345
The United States in 1870 (color map)                _Facing_      427
The United States in 1912 (color map)                _Facing_      443
The Wassermann test must not be relied upon for diagnosis in the early
The Weir-Mitchell treatment may have to be employed in obstinate cases,
The Whigs, flushed by victory, with the aid of a few protectionist
The X-ray appearances vary with the stage of the malady, not estimated
The X-ray picture is usually diagnostic chiefly because all the lesions
The _Moore-Corradi method_ consists in introducing through the wall of
The _X-ray appearances_ of the bones affected are of a striking
The _acute bed-sore_ is a rapidly progressing form of ulceration, often
The _acute_ bed-sore usually occurs over the sacrum or buttock. It
The _adductor longus_ may be ruptured, or torn from the pubes, by a
The _angioma racemosum venosum_ is probably also due to a congenital
The _ankylosing type_ of chronic arthritis is fortunately much rarer
The _appearances of the wound_ in cases complicated by secondary
The _bacillus anthracis_ (Fig. 27), the largest of the known pathogenic
The _cavernous lymphangioma_ appears as an ill-defined, soft swelling,
The _chronic_ bed-sore begins as a dusky reddish purple patch, which
The _clinical features_ are almost exclusively local. Pain, due to
The _clinical features_ are characteristic. There is a sudden onset of
The _clinical features_ are pain on movement, tenderness on pressure
The _clinical features_ are those of a pulsating tumour of slow
The _clinical features_ are those of a spindle-shaped swelling of a
The _clinical features_ are usually characteristic. The patient
The _clinical features_ associated with rupture are sudden and severe
The _clinical features_ depend chiefly on the direction in which the
The _clinical features_ in this group are mainly those of the disease
The _clinical features_ of hydatids vary so much with their situation
The _clinical features_ of osteomyelitis in _an amputation stump_ are
The _clinical features_ of this condition are practically the same as
The _clinical features_ resemble those of other pyogenic infections, and
The _clinical features_ resulting from the injection of the venom vary
The _clinical features_ vary in the different varieties of moist
The _clinical features_ vary with the extent of the infection. When
The _clinical features_ vary with the site of the aneurysm and with its
The _clinical features_ vary with the tendon sheath affected. In the
The _colour_ of pus also varies: when due to one or other of the
The _columnar epithelial cancer_ or _columnar epithelioma_ originates in
The _counteraction of the toxaemia_ and the _treatment of the bloodless
The _cystic lymphangioma_, _lymphatic cyst_, or _congenital cystic
The _deformities_ resulting from osteomyelitis are more marked the
The _diagnosis_ has to be made from solid or cystic tumours overlying
The _diagnosis_ is easy if the patient or his friends are aware of the
The _diagnosis_ is often a matter of considerable difficulty, and the
The _diagnosis_ is often missed because the possibility of gonorrhoea is
The _diagnosis_ is to be made from such other swellings in the groin as
The _diagnosis_ of Brodie's abscess from other affections met with at
The _diagnosis_ of hydatids will be considered with the individual
The _diagnosis_ of lupus is founded on the chronic progress and long
The _diagnosis_ of septic lymphadenitis is usually easy. The indolent
The _differential diagnosis_ is often difficult, especially in the
The _discharge_ as to quantity, consistence, colour, composition, and
The _epithelial odontoma_ is derived from persistent portions of the
The _etiology of tumours_ is imperfectly understood. Various factors,
The _external carotid_ and the cervical portion of the _internal
The _extrusion of a sequestrum_ may occur, provided there is a cloaca
The _fascia lata of the thigh_ is widely and successfully used as a
The _fibrous odontoma_ is the result of an overgrowth of fibrous tissue
The _follicular odontoma_, also known as a _dentigerous cyst_, is
The _fourth_ act legalized the quartering of troops in Massachusetts
The _function of the epiphysial cartilage_ is to provide for the growth
The _general character of tertiary manifestations_ may be stated as
The _general symptoms_ may come on at once if the snake is a
The _general symptoms_ of septic poisoning in cases of secondary
The _heat_ of the inflamed part is to be attributed to the increased
The _infection of the joint_ by tubercle originating in the adjacent
The _infective_ form usually begins as a peri-phlebitis arising in
The _iodine method_ of disinfecting the skin introduced by Grossich is
The _irritable condition_ is met with in ulcers which occur, as a rule,
The _ivory_ or _compact osteoma_ is composed of dense bone, and usually
The _local conditions_ which decide for or against operation are
The _local treatment_ consists chiefly in improving the nutrition of the
The _local_ manifestations are pain and swelling in the region of the
The _long tendon of the biceps_ may be dislocated laterally--or more
The _lower-arm type_ of paralysis, associated with the name of Klumpke,
The _musculo-cutaneous nerve_ is very rarely injured; when cut across,
The _nerves_ enter the marrow along with the arteries, and, being
The _normal_ number of leucocytes per cubic millimetre varies in
The _operation of Trendelenburg_ is especially appropriate to cases in
The _perforating ulcer of the foot_ is a peculiar type of sore which
The _perforating ulcer_ of the foot calls for special treatment. To
The _periosteal gumma_ appears as a smooth, circumscribed swelling which
The _periosteum_ is thick and vascular, and when detached carries with
The _peritoneum_ of hydrocele and hernial sacs and of the omentum
The _permanent arrest_ takes place by the transformation of the clot
The _phagedaenic condition_ is the result of an ulcer being infected with
The _phagedaenic ulcer_ calls for more energetic means of disinfection;
The _plantaris_ is not infrequently ruptured from trivial causes, such
The _pressure_ of improperly padded splints or other appliances may so
The _prognosis_ even after amputation is unfavourable. In many cases the
The _prognosis_ in burns depends on (1) the superficial extent, and, to
The _prognosis_ in hectic fever depends on the completeness with which
The _prognosis_ is always grave in the extreme, the main risks being
The _prognosis_ is always grave, and depends on the possibility of
The _prognosis_ varies widely. In general, it may be said that
The _prognosis_ varies with the type of the disease, with its
The _pulse_ is always increased in frequency, and usually varies
The _quadriceps femoris_ is usually ruptured close to its insertion into
The _risks_ incident to this class of wounds are: (1) the extreme
The _scorbutic ulcer_ occurs in patients suffering from scurvy, and is
The _second period_ begins when the shock passes off, and lasts till the
The _skin dermoid_, or _derma-cyst_ as it has been called by Askanazy,
The _special risks_ of incised wounds are: (1) division of large blood
The _special risks_ of these wounds are: (1) Sloughing of the bruised
The _spine_ may be curved backwards--_kyphosis_--throughout its
The _squamous epithelial cancer_ or _epithelioma_ originates from a
The _staphylococcus albus_ is much less common than the aureus, but has
The _sub-deltoid_ or _sub-acromial bursa_, which usually presents a
The _subcutaneous naevus_ is comparatively rare. It constitutes a
The _swelling_ is partly due to the increased amount of blood in the
The _syphilitic ulcer_ is usually formed by the breaking down of a
The _tarsal ganglion_ is situated on the dorsum of the foot over one or
The _tendo calcaneus_ (Achillis) is comparatively easily ruptured, and
The _terminations_ vary with the gravity of the infection and with the
The _third period_ begins when the sloughs separate, usually between
The _treatment_ consists in correcting the errors in diet. The infant
The _treatment_ consists in destroying the original papule by the actual
The _treatment_ consists in enlarging the external wound to permit of
The _treatment_ consists in inducing hyperaemia and making small
The _treatment_ consists in inducing passive hyperaemia by Bier's method,
The _treatment_ consists in putting the affected tendon at rest, and
The _treatment_ consists in remedying any nervous or uterine disorder
The _treatment_ consists in resting the muscle from the particular
The _treatment_ consists in the local application of dilute alkalies
The _treatment_ consists in the wearing of properly fitting boots and
The _treatment_ consists in thorough eradication of the parasite by
The _treatment_ consists in tiding the patient over the acute stage of
The _treatment_ is carried out on the same lines as for a ruptured
The _treatment_ is carried out on the same lines as in sapraemia, but it
The _treatment_ is carried out on the same lines as that of delirium
The _treatment_ is carried out on the same principles as in other
The _treatment_ is conducted on the same lines as for naevus. When
The _treatment_ is conducted on the same lines as sarcoma in other
The _treatment_ is directed towards the disease underlying the hydrops.
The _treatment_ is influenced by the nature of the original lesion, the
The _treatment_ is that applicable to all wounds, with, in addition, the
The _treatment_ is that of tuberculous lesions in general; if
The _treatment_ is to excise the cyst completely, or to inject into it a
The _treatment_ of callosities on the foot consists in removing pressure
The _treatment_ of the cutaneous naevus is unsatisfactory, owing to the
The _treatment_ of these various forms of fistula will be described in
The _treatment_ varies according to the variety and stage of the
The _treatment_ varies with the cause and nature of the lesion. When,
The _treatment_--besides that of the urethral disease or of the
The _tuberculous sinus_ is described under Tuberculosis.
The _tuberculous ulcer_ is described in the chapter on ulcers.
The _tuberculous ulcer_, so often seen in the neck, in the vicinity of
The _ulcer_ of the leg associated with varicose veins has already been
The _upper-arm type_--Erb-Duchenne paralysis--is that most frequently
The _veins_ are constructed on the same general plan as the arteries,
The abdominal aorta may be compressed against the bodies of the lumbar
The abolition of slavery altered this. Small farms spread out where
The absence of leucocytosis in some cases of virulent septic poisoning
The absorption of the French by Moscow, radiating starwise as it
The account Pierre gave of the incident with the child and the woman
The accumulation of an excessive amount of inflammatory exudate may
The actions of Napoleon and Alexander, on whose words the event
The actions of men are subject to general immutable laws expressed
The activity of Alexander or of Napoleon cannot be called useful
The activity of the epiphysial cartilage may be modified as a result of
The actors of 1812 have long since left the stage, their personal
The acute bacillary forms of gangrene all assume the moist type from the
The acute symptoms gradually subside, and the blood is slowly absorbed,
The adjacent joint may become filled at an early stage with a serous
The adjacent joint usually remains intact, although its movements may be
The adjutant bent his head affirmatively and began to report, but
The adjutant galloped to Claparede's division and a few minutes
The adjutant in attendance came into the tent.
The adjutant looked at Pierre as if puzzled what to do with him now.
The adjutant on duty, meeting Prince Andrew, asked him to wait,
The adjutant told them that the affair was likely to take a very bad
The adjutant, having obeyed this instruction, approached Prince
The administration is controlled by the systematic examination of the
The administration of chloroform is of value in conserving the strength
The administration of opiates may be necessary for the relief of pain.
The affected bone is not only thicker and heavier than normal, but may
The affected muscles show swellings which are rounded or oval, firm and
The affected vessels slowly increase in size, and become tortuous, with
The affection is in a marked degree hereditary, all the branches of an
The affianced couple, no longer alluding to trees that shed gloom
The agencies of the League of Nations were to be three in number: (1) a
The aide-de-camp was sent to confirm the order which had not been
The aide-de-camp, an adept in his art, grasping his partner firmly
The aim of cutting off Napoleon and his army never existed except in
The amount of discomfort bears no direct proportion to the extent of
The ancient historians all employed one and the same method to
The ancients have left us model heroic poems in which the heroes
The aneurysm is usually of the sacculated variety, and may spring from
The aneurysm usually forms soon after the injury is inflicted; the blood
The aneurysm usually springs from the third part of the artery, and
The angry borzois whined and getting free of the leash rushed past the
The annexation of Hawaii in 1898, the addition of the Philippines at the
The answer which they received was negative. The fourteenth amendment to
The anti-slavery sentiment of which these were the signs was
The antitoxic serum is our sheet-anchor in the treatment of diphtheria,
The appeal to labor voiced by Mr. Bryan in his "crown of thorns" speech
The appetite is lost, the tongue dry and covered with a thin
The application of an elastic bandage from above downward to empty the
The application of radium and the ingestion of radio-active waters have
The application of the X-rays has proved beneficial in synovial lesions
The approaching riders having descended a decline were no longer
The army turned more to the south, along the Ryazan road and nearer to
The army was moving from west to east, and relays of six horses
The arrangement adopted when they started, that the officer
The arrangement of the _blood vessels_ determines to some extent the
The arrangements for Natasha's marriage occupied him for a while. He
The arrival of Dolokhov diverted Petya's attention from the
The arteries are nourished by small vessels--the _vasa vasorum_--which
The assembly of New York, protesting against the "ruinous and
The assistant asked some further questions.
The assistant looked fagged out. He was evidently vexed and
The assistant, however, did not confirm the doctor's words.
The astounding industrial progress that characterized the period
The attack of the Sixth Chasseurs secured the retreat of our right
The attendant made a hopeless gesture.
The authors of these measures made no attempt to conceal their purposes.
The available methods of treatment are ligation of the right common
The banker recoiled in horror. "I should not dream of trying," said he.
The banker wrung his hands. "I shall never see them again!" he cried. "And my son? You give me hopes?"
The banker's dressing-room was a plainly furnished little chamber, with a grey carpet, a large bureau, and a long mirror. Holmes went to the bureau first and looked hard at the lock.
The battalion commander perceived the jovial irony and laughed.
The battle began on both sides with a cannonade from several hundred
The battle of Tarutino obviously did not attain the aim Toll had
The beast wounded at Borodino was lying where the fleeing hunter had
The beautiful Armenian still sat motionless and in the same
The beauty went to the aunt, but Anna Pavlovna detained Pierre,
The beekeeper opens the upper part of the hive and examines the
The bees circle round a queenless hive in the hot beams of the
The beginning of the drawings under the draft act in New York City, on
The bells in the Kremlin were ringing for vespers, and this sound
The beneficial effects of _hot fomentations and poultices_ depend on
The best defined group is that of the _granulomata_, which includes such
The best generals I have known were, on the contrary, stupid or
The best substitute for circulating steam is _boiling_. The articles are
The best way in which to treat such wounds is by the _open method_. This
The better we are acquainted with the physiological,
The black figure of a sentinel stood on the bridge.
The black, hairy, snub-nosed face of Vaska Denisov, and his whole
The blood may be emptied from the limbs into the vessels of the trunk,
The blood rushed to Natasha's face and her feet involuntarily moved,
The blood rushed to Petya's face and he grasped his pistol.
The blood therefore loses more and more of its oxygen, and so fails to
The blood vessels are usually represented by mere chinks or spaces
The bloodstained smith went beside them. The factory hands and
The bone lesions usually occur during the seventh or eighth week of the
The bones show a feeble shadow with the X-rays, and appear thin and
The bony outgrowth from the terminal phalanx of the great toe--known as
The booming cannonade and the fusillade of musketry were growing
The border states (in purple) remained loyal.]
The bottle of rum was brought. The window frame which prevented
The boy with the thin neck stretching out from the turn-down collar-
The brightness of the morning was magical. Moscow seen from the
The building was of grey, lichen-blotched stone, with a high central portion and two curving wings, like the claws of a crab, thrown out on each side. In one of these wings the windows were broken and blocked with wooden boards, while the roof was partly caved in, a picture of ruin. The central portion was in little better repair, but the right-hand block was comparatively modern, and the blinds in the windows, with the blue smoke curling up from the chimneys, showed that this was where the family resided. Some scaffolding had been erected against the end wall, and the stone-work had been broken into, but there were no signs of any workmen at the moment of our visit. Holmes walked slowly up and down the ill-trimmed lawn and examined with deep attention the outsides of the windows.
The buildings, begun under straitened circumstances, were more
The bursa _between the ligamentum patellae and the tibia_ is rarely the
The bursa _between the psoas muscle and the capsule of the hip-joint_
The bursa _between the tendo-calcaneus (Achillis) and the upper part of
The bursa beneath the quadriceps extensor--_subcrural bursa_--usually
The bursa is also liable to infective conditions, such as acute
The bursa that is sometimes met with on the under aspect of the
The bursa under the _tendon of insertion of the biceps_, when the seat
The bursa underneath the tendon of the _subscapularis_ muscle when
The bustle and terror of the Rostovs' last days in Moscow stifled
The cadet was Rostov. With one hand he supported the other; he was
The caleche in which Prince Andrew was being taken attracted Sonya's
The campaign began, the regiment was moved into Poland on double
The campaign which took place that year was one of the most savage in
The canals and railways were the physical signs of this economic union,
The cancers most liable to give rise to metastasis in bone are those of
The cannonade on the left flank will begin as soon as the guns of
The cannonade was dying down, but the rattle of musketry behind and on
The capital invested in these railways was enormous beyond the
The capsular ligament, except in hydrops, is the seat of
The captain gazed intently at him as he had done when he learned
The captain had their senior sergeant called in, and in a stern
The captain looked at Pierre. He had a habit of stopping short in
The captain made a gesture signifying that even if he did not
The captain returned to the room, limping slightly and whistling a
The captain was so naively and good-humoredly gay, so real, and so
The captain, on the other hand, seemed very cheerful. He paced up
The card tables were drawn out, sets made up for boston, and the
The cardinal signs of gangrene are: change in the colour of the part,
The carpets yielded and the lid closed; Natasha, clapping her hands,
The carriage door was opened. On the left there was water--a great
The cart in which the officer lay was turned into the Rostovs' yard,
The case is this: my father's health is growing noticeably worse, he
The case was evidently this: a position was selected along the river
The case, as represented by the offended parties, was that, after
The caseation of tuberculous granulation tissue and its liquefaction is
The cattle lowed from hunger, finding no food on the sun-parched
The cause of the confusion was that while the Austrian cavalry was
The cause of the delay was Natasha's skirt, which was too long.
The cause of the destruction of the French army in 1812 is clear
The cause of the disease and its true nature are as yet unknown. There
The change that took place in Natasha at first surprised Princess
The changes in the joints involve almost exclusively the synovial
The changes observed are those of intense engorgement of the marrow,
The changes subsequent to the formation of tuberculous granulation
The chanting of the service ceased, and the voice of the priest
The characters of the lymphadenitis vary with the nature of the
The characters of this type of loose body are remarkably constant. It is
The cheerful mood of their officers after the inspection infected
The chief action of the battle of Borodino was fought within the
The chief causes of death during this period are toxin absorption in any
The chief news, about which all Moscow gossips, is the death of old
The chief officer of the royal province was the governor, who enjoyed
The chief reason Princess Mary did not realize the full significance
The chief steward expressed great sympathy with Pierre's intentions,
The chief steward, a very stupid but cunning man who saw perfectly
The chief steward, who considered the young count's attempts
The child moved slightly in his sleep, smiled, and rubbed his
The children and their governesses were glad of Pierre's return
The children were playing at "going to Moscow" in a carriage made of
The chill that had been running down Pierre's back now seized his
The chloride and lactate of calcium, and extract of thymus gland have
The choice of operation lies between ligation of the femoral artery in
The chondroma is met with as a slowly growing tumour which is specially
The chondromas that are met with at the ends of the long bones in
The city police is established on its former footing, and better
The clear blue eyes looked at the commander in chief just as
The clergy became a powerful class, dominant through their learning and
The clerk glanced round, evidently hoping that his joke would be
The climate, the soil, the commerce, and the industry of the North were
The clinical features are those of a slowly growing indurated tumour,
The clinical features of the acquired disease in infants and young
The clinical features resemble those associated with varicose veins, but
The clinical features vary a good deal in different cases; the affection
The clinical significance of the blood count in individual diseases will
The clinical term whitlow is applied to an acute infection, usually
The cloak they spread under him was wet with blood which stained his
The coach with six horses was waiting at the porch. It was an autumn
The coexistence of diffuse myelomatosis of the skeleton and albumosuria
The coin was a new one. Rostov rose and went up to Telyanin.
The cold abscess which results from tuberculous glands is to be
The colonel deliberately stopped the regiment and turned to
The colonel looked silently at the officer of the suite, at the
The colonel rode to the front, angrily gave some reply to
The colonel was a stout, tall, plethoric German, evidently devoted
The colonial governors were generally surrounded by a body of
The colonists, who up to this moment had been wavering, had to choose
The combatants advanced along the trodden tracks, nearer and
The command of the left flank belonged by seniority to the commander
The command to form up rang out and the sabers whizzed as they were
The commander of the artillery of the 3rd Corps, General Fouche,
The commander of the company, with his eyes fixed on his superior,
The commander of the militia was a civilian general, an old man
The commander of the regiment turned to Prince Bagration, entreating
The commander of the regiment was an elderly, choleric, stout, and
The commander of the regiment, a thin, feeble-looking old man with a
The commander rode up to his hut. The regiment passed through the
The commanders are: Herr General Wimpfen, le Comte de Langeron, le
The commencement of his speech had obviously been made with the
The commoner pyogenic diseases are the result of infection of one or
The commonest form--hydrops--is that in which the synovial sheath is
The commonest variety--the _carpal ganglion_--popularly known as a
The complaint may be of vague pains, of occasional cracking on moving
The composition of the conventions thus authorized may be imagined.
The concentrated activity which had begun at the Emperor's
The condition begins by the formation in the skin and subcutaneous
The condition is frequently observed to follow, either directly or after
The condition is probably congenital in origin, though its appearance is
The condition may be treated by excision or by electrolysis. In excision
The condition of white bondmen in Virginia, according to Lodge, "was
The condition usually proves fatal, either by the aneurysm bursting into
The conditions most likely to be mistaken for it are a soft, rapidly
The conditions of the skull known as Parrot's nodes or bosses, and
The conditions vary widely in different cases, and the treatment should
The conduct of England likewise affected American affairs. In 1793 war
The conflagration, at which he had looked with so much
The conflict thus begun was followed by serious fighting which finally
The conjunctivae also may be yellow. In the latter stages of the disease
The connection, however, is not a close one, and the artery when divided
The connective-tissue framework of a nerve-trunk consists of the
The consciousness that this would be so and would always be so was
The constricting bandage should be applied at some distance above the
The contents of the sac consist of fluid blood and a varying amount of
The contrast between the grossly enlarged and misshapen tibia and the
The convention put an end to such practices by providing that no state
The convention was equally positive in dealing with the problem of the
The conversation at supper was not about politics or societies,
The conversation did not flag all evening and turned chiefly on
The conversation ended by the count, who wished to be generous and
The conversation flagged, and the soldiers began settling down to
The conversation turned on the contemporary gossip about those in
The conversation was cold and disconnected and continually broke
The conversation was hushed.
The convicts stopped when they reached the post and, while sacks
The cook and a shop assistant came to the gate. With lively
The corporal came, according to orders, to shut the door. The
The coughing up of blood from the lungs is known as _haemoptysis_;
The council of war, at which Prince Andrew had not been able to
The count and Simon galloped out of the wood and saw on their left a
The count and Simon were looking at him.
The count burst out laughing. The other guests seeing that
The count came waddling in to see his wife with a rather guilty look
The count considered.
The count danced well and knew it. But his partner could not and did
The count frowned and coughed.
The count frowned.
The count had devised this diplomatic ruse (as he afterwards told
The count jumped up and, swaying from side to side, spread his
The count moved in his affairs as in a huge net, trying not to
The count nodded affirmatively, and Natasha, at the rapid pace at
The count ordered his carriage that he might drive to Sokolniki, and
The count put his ear to the keyhole and listened.
The count remembered the wolf he had let slip and his encounter with
The count returned and lay down behind the partition. The countess
The count sat between them and listened attentively. His favorite
The count sobbed yet more.
The count spoke timidly, as he always did when talking of money
The count stood by the window and listened without turning round.
The count turned and saw on his right Mitka staring at him with eyes
The count walked up and down the hall in his dressing gown, giving
The count was about to say something, but evidently restrained
The count was delighted at Anna Mikhaylovna's taking upon herself
The count was the first to rise, and with a loud sigh crossed
The count went in first with Marya Dmitrievna, the countess followed
The count went into the house with him, repeating his order not to
The count wished to go home, but Helene entreated him not to spoil
The count, forgetting to smooth out the smile on his face, looked
The count, holding his cards fanwise, kept himself with difficulty
The count, laughing, nudged the blushing Sonya and pointed to her
The countess began to soothe Natasha, who after first listening to
The countess could not conceive of life without the luxurious
The countess did not believe her ears. Denisov had proposed. To
The countess exchanged glances with Anna Mikhaylovna. The latter
The countess glanced at her daughter, saw her face full of shame for
The countess glanced at her silent son.
The countess had a headache brought on by all the noise and turmoil
The countess had been prepared by Anna Mikhaylovna's hints at
The countess had written direct to Julie's mother in Moscow
The countess lifted her head and looked attentively at her daughter.
The countess looked round several times at her daughter's softened
The countess looked with timid horror at her son's eager, excited
The countess lowered her eyes, sighing deeply.
The countess opened her eyes in dismay and, seizing Sonya's arm,
The countess pressed her daughter's hand, closed her eyes, and
The countess put her arms around Sonya and began to cry.
The countess sent for her husband.
The countess shrugged her shoulders.
The countess took Princess Mary into the drawing room, where Sonya
The countess tried to frown, but could not. Marya Dmitrievna shook
The countess was a woman of about forty-five, with a thin Oriental
The countess was lying in an armchair in a strange and awkward
The countess was now over sixty, was quite gray, and wore a cap with
The countess was pleased with Natasha's zeal; after the poor results
The countess was sitting with her companion Belova, playing
The countess was upset by her friend's sorrow and humiliating
The countess watched the things being packed, was dissatisfied
The countess' eyes filled with tears and she pondered in silence.
The countess' face flushed hotly, but she said nothing.
The countess, Madame Schoss, and Sonya undressed hastily and lay
The countess, in dismay, looked up to heaven, clasped her hands, and
The countess, on hearing that Moscow was on fire, began to cry.
The countess, sobbing heavily, hid her face on her daughter's
The countess, who heard at once from the maids what had happened
The countess, with a cheerful expression on her face, looked down at
The countess, with a coldness her son had never seen in her
The country at large was indifferent, however, until 1893, when a
The country seat at Bald Hills had been rebuilt, though not on the
The coup de theatre had not come off.
The courier who had been sent on in advance to find out where the
The course of the Father Confessor's arguments ran as follows:
The crash, when it came, was not deliberately willed by any one. It was
The creditors who had so long been silent, restrained by a vague but
The crowd drew up to the large table, at which sat gray-haired or
The crowd halted, pressing around those who had heard what the
The crowd moved on again. Nesvitski realized that it was a cannon
The crowd ran after the Emperor, followed him to the palace, and
The crowd remained silent and only pressed closer and closer to
The crowd round the icon suddenly parted and pressed against Pierre.
The curtain rose again. Anatole left the box, serene and gay.
The damage done to the tissues by strong caustics, such as fuming nitric
The dancer stopped, pulled off the loose piece of leather, and threw
The dark shadow was Princess Mary, who had come up to the cot with
The day after Rostov had been to see Boris, a review was held of the
The day after he had been received into the Lodge, Pierre was
The day after her party the governor's wife came to see
The day after his interview with Count Arakcheev, Prince Andrew
The day after his son had left, Prince Nicholas sent for Princess
The day after the council at Malo-Yaroslavets Napoleon rode out
The day after the opera the Rostovs went nowhere and nobody came
The day after the review, Boris, in his best uniform and with his
The day after this conversation Natasha put on the old dress which
The day before the count was to return, Sonya noticed that Natasha
The day that France takes possession of New Orleans fixes the sentence
The day was clear and frosty. Kutuzov rode to Dobroe on his plump
The deacon came out onto the raised space before the altar screen
The dead bone having been removed, the lining granulations are scraped
The deadly effect of this paralysis of trade upon Southern war power may
The decision was a triumph for the South. It meant that Congress after
The deformity resulting from these necessarily heroic measures is not so
The degree of our conception of freedom or inevitability depends
The deliberations of the Seneca Falls convention resulted in a
The deltoid is wasted, and the acromion unduly prominent. In recent
The demand for slaves to till the swiftly expanding fields was enormous.
The demands of life, which had seemed to her annihilated by her
The denial of the disease by the patient is not always to be relied
The deposit of fibrin on the synovial membrane and on the articular
The despairing, dejected expression of Natasha's face caught his
The destruction of German military power was thorough. The entire navy,
The development of the cotton industry, in the meantime, was similarly
The device blazoned on its shield and written over its factory doors was
The devices worked effectively. Of the 147,000 negroes in Mississippi
The diagnosis is to be made by the slow growth of the tumour, its
The die was cast. The American Revolution had begun. Washington was made
The diet must be a liberal one, and should include those articles which
The differential diagnosis is to be made from abscess, bursal cyst,
The dilated and tortuous vein can be readily seen and felt when the
The din of many voices was too great; all he could hear was: "ahahah!"
The dinner was nearly over, and the Emperor, munching a biscuit,
The diplomatic corps and the Emperor himself were to be present.
The director of her conscience was astounded at having the case
The dirty maidservant stepped from behind the trunk, put up her
The disappearance of the free land, President Roosevelt went on to say,
The discharge is profuse, thin, acrid, and offensive, and consists of
The discoloration begins to fade within a few hours, and after the
The discussion began. Bennigsen did not yet consider his game
The discussion recommenced, but pauses frequently occurred and
The discussions continued a long time, and the longer they lasted
The disease is commonest in the nerves of the upper extremity, and the
The disease is generally poly-articular and may be met with in childhood
The disease is met with in boys who are otherwise healthy, and usually
The disease is most common and most severe among the children of the
The disease is often stationary for long periods. In progressive cases
The disease is widely distributed in the animal kingdom, both in
The disease lasts for from two or three days to as many weeks, and
The disease may become arrested or may go on to complete
The disease may extend to the synovial membrane and be attended with
The disease may last for an indefinite period, the general health
The disease may persist or may relapse, and the patient may be laid up
The disease may pursue an indolent course during months or years until
The disease probably originates before birth, although it may not make
The disease progresses slowly, healing in some places and spreading at
The disease runs a chronic course, and may slowly extend over a wide
The disease spreads throughout the capsule and synovial membrane, which
The disease tends to spread spasmodically and irregularly, and the
The dislocated nerve is easily replaced, but is difficult to retain in
The disposition of imported goods in the colonies, though in part
The disposition of the German colonies and the old Ottoman empire
The dispositions cited above are not at all worse, but are even
The dispositions drawn up by Toll were very good. As in the
The dispositions drawn up by Weyrother for the battle of
The dispositions were very complicated and difficult. They began
The distant roar of the yelling crowd was audible even there. He
The distension of these sinuses with blood closes the valve and
The distinction between a burn which results from the action of dry heat
The distinguishing features of the lipoma are the tacking down and
The distribution of the spasms varies in different cases: in some it is
The diversion of traffic to Eastern markets was also stimulated by
The division of the coats of the vessel being incomplete, the natural
The division was sectional, admittedly sectional--the old combination of
The doctor advised him to apply direct to Kutuzov.
The doctor came every day, felt her pulse, looked at her tongue, and
The doctor cast a rapid glance upwards and silently shrugged his
The doctor entered. Prince Andrew went out and, meeting Princess
The doctor glanced at his watch.
The doctor insisted on the necessity of moving the prince; the
The doctor promised to procure it for him and began to ask how he
The doctor said this restlessness did not mean anything and was
The doctor seemed tired and in a hurry.
The doctor tried to stop her. She pushed him aside and ran to her
The doctor went into the passage to wash his hands.
The doctor who attended Pierre and visited him every day, though
The doctor who came to see her that day ordered her to continue
The doctor who had been standing beside him, preventing Prince
The doctor, who was fetched that same night, bled him and said
The doctors were busily engaged with the wounded man the shape of
The door at the end of the passage led to the huntsmen's room, as
The door of Briony Lodge was open, and an elderly woman stood upon the steps. She watched us with a sardonic eye as we stepped from the brougham.
The door of the Governor's room opened and they all rose and moved
The door opened and the old prince, in a dress, ing gown and a white
The door opened, a gentleman-in-waiting, bending respectfully,
The dreadful news of the battle of Borodino, of our losses in killed
The dressing may be renewed at intervals, and care must be taken to
The dressings subsequently applied should meet the following
The driver's eyes sparkled at the sight of the wine. After
The duel between Pierre and Dolokhov was hushed up and, in spite
The duties imposed on the League and the obligations accepted by its
The earlier the wound is disinfected the greater is the possibility of
The early recognition of periosteal lesions in the articular ends of
The economic aspects of the period between 1865 and 1900 may be readily
The economic condition of the small farmer was totally different. His
The economic questions were all involved in a moral issue. The Northern
The effect of irrigation wherever introduced was amazing. Stretches of
The effect of the Civil War upon these divisions was immediate and
The effect of this act, as some had anticipated, was disappointing. It
The effect of this whole body of anti-trust legislation, in spite of
The effect on the tissues around the positive pole, therefore, is
The effects of the destruction of the bank were widespread. When its
The effects on the joint vary in severity. In the milder forms, there is
The eighth and largest group, which in its enormous numbers was to
The ejaculation had been drawn from my companion by the fact that our door had been suddenly dashed open, and that a huge man had framed himself in the aperture. His costume was a peculiar mixture of the professional and of the agricultural, having a black top-hat, a long frock-coat, and a pair of high gaiters, with a hunting-crop swinging in his hand. So tall was he that his hat actually brushed the cross bar of the doorway, and his breadth seemed to span it across from side to side. A large face, seared with a thousand wrinkles, burned yellow with the sun, and marked with every evil passion, was turned from one to the other of us, while his deep-set, bile-shot eyes, and his high, thin, fleshless nose, gave him somewhat the resemblance to a fierce old bird of prey.
The elderly lady was a Princess Drubetskaya, belonging to one of the
The elderly magnate was at first as much taken aback by this
The elders began talking about Bonaparte. Julie Karagina turned to
The eldest princess and Prince Vasili, recovering themselves, followed
The electors shall meet in their respective States, and vote by ballot
The electors thus enfranchised, numerous as they were, owing to the wide
The elimination of the toxins is promoted by securing free action of the
The embedded foreign body at first acts as an irritant, and induces a
The end of a stump, after spontaneous separation of the gangrenous
The enemy ceased firing, and that stern, threatening, inaccessible,
The enlargement associated with leucocythaemia is differentiated by the
The enlargement may affect only one gland, usually below the angle of
The enlargement of adventitious bursae over the head of the first
The enlargement spreads along the chain of glands to those above the
The enormous study was full of things evidently in constant use. The
The enormous swelling and its rapid development may suggest the growth
The entire household was governed according to Pierre's supposed
The enumeration in the Constitution, of certain rights, shall not be
The epiphysial cartilage usually continues its bone-forming functions,
The esaul looked in the direction Denisov indicated.
The esaul, screwing up his light-colored eyes, nodded approvingly.
The essential feature of a traumatic aneurysm is that it is produced by
The essential lesion is the absence or deficiency of valves, so that
The essential symptom is paroxysmal or continuous pain along the course
The events of the previous year: the burning of Moscow and the
The exact location of an abscess also may furnish a key to its source;
The exaggerated afferent impulses reaching the brain as a result of
The exaggerated pulsation sometimes observed in the abdominal aorta, the
The examination of a large series of children at different ages shows
The excessive use of moist dressings leads to a third variety of weak
The exhausted French officer was Ramballe and the man with his
The explanation of this strange fact given by Russian military
The extent of the gangrene depends upon the site of impaction of the
The extent of the wound influences the rate of healing; it is only
The extent to which bone which has been lost is reproduced varies in
The external investment--the _periosteum_--is thick and vascular during
The extremely foetid odour which pervades the room or even the house the
The exuberant masses on the nose known as "rhinophyma," "lipoma nasi,"
The eyes of the general and the soldier met. The general became
The face is flushed, and wears a drawn, anxious expression, and the eyes
The face of the little princess changed. She sighed and said:
The faces of officers and men brightened up at the sound. Everyone
The fact was accordingly conveyed to Lavrushka.
The factory hands followed him. These men, who under the
The facts clearly show that Napoleon did not foresee the danger of
The facts were that Ilagin, with whom the Rostovs had a quarrel
The failure of any nation to adopt humane conditions of labor is an
The famous flank movement merely consisted in this: after the
The fanciful idea of an electoral college of "good and wise men,"
The farther forward and nearer the enemy he went, the more orderly
The farther they fled the more wretched became the plight of the
The fascia and skin should be brought into accurate apposition by
The fat man cast his eyes round, and then up at the open skylight.
The father and mother came into the room and gave the betrothed
The father and mother did not speak of the matter to their son
The federal government, though pledged to the preservation of slavery,
The feeling, "It has begun! Here it is!" was seen even on Prince
The fencer who demanded a contest according to the rules of
The field of operation is surrounded by sterilised towels, clipped to
The fifth company was bivouacking at the very edge of the forest.
The fifth man was the factory lad in the loose cloak. The moment
The fifth of November was the first day of what is called the battle
The fifth party consisted of those who were adherents of Barclay
The fifth was a factory hand, a thin, sallow-faced lad of eighteen
The final phase of the war, opening with the treaty of alliance with
The finger becomes the seat of a swelling, which is more evident on the
The fire, fanned by the breeze, was rapidly spreading. The French
The firemen had been much perturbed at the strange arrangements which they had found within, and still more so by discovering a newly severed human thumb upon a window-sill of the second floor. About sunset, however, their efforts were at last successful, and they subdued the flames, but not before the roof had fallen in, and the whole place been reduced to such absolute ruin that, save some twisted cylinders and iron piping, not a trace remained of the machinery which had cost our unfortunate acquaintance so dearly. Large masses of nickel and of tin were discovered stored in an out-house, but no coins were to be found, which may have explained the presence of those bulky boxes which have been already referred to.
The fires and shouting in the enemy's army were occasioned by the
The first Russians to enter Moscow were the Cossacks of
The first act was over. In the stalls everyone began moving about,
The first consideration is the clearness of our perception of the
The first declared that the report that Count Rostopchin had
The first evidence is that the fingers become cold, white, and
The first evidence of the death of the part varies in different cases.
The first fifteen years of the nineteenth century in Europe
The first night after they left Moscow had been fairly warm and he had
The first of these measures empowered the President to expel from the
The first party consisted of Pfuel and his adherents--military
The first person he saw in the house was Natasha. Even before he saw
The first scene in this dramatic affair occurred in the spring of 1789,
The first shots had not yet ceased to reverberate before others rang
The first step in the disinfection of the hands is the mechanical
The first symptom is usually a swelling of the joint and its vicinity.
The first task after the conclusion of peace in 1763 was the adjustment
The first time Prince Andrew understood where he was and what was
The first time the young foreigner allowed himself to reproach
The first to speak was General Armfeldt who, to meet the
The first troops started at once, and during the night they
The first words he heard on coming to his senses were those of a
The fits may cease some time before death, or, on the other hand, death
The flood of nations begins to subside into its normal channels. The
The floor of the stage consisted of smooth boards, at the sides
The fog had begun to clear and enemy troops were already dimly
The fog had grown so dense that though it was growing light they
The followers of the General were enraged and demanded nothing short of
The following are the more important groups of glands, and the areas
The following day he saw Princess Mary off on her journey to
The following description of the injuries of arteries refers to the
The forces of a dozen European nations burst into Russia. The
The foreboding of evil that had suddenly come over Rostov was more
The formation of new bone by the osteoblasts may be _defective_ as a
The former housekeeper, old Mavra Kuzminichna, had stepped out of
The fourth order was: The vice-King will occupy the village
The friends were silent. Neither cared to begin talking. Pierre
The fruits and vegetables of California brought into existence
The full effect of the French alliance was not felt until 1781, when
The fundamental and essential significance of the European events of
The further stages--reddening, undermining of skin and external rupture,
The galvanic current is employed, using at first a mild current of not
The game continued; a waiter kept handing round champagne.
The gap in the muscle becomes filled with blood, and this in time is
The general bowed his head respectfully, and the monarch mounted and
The general condition of the patient is pitiful in the extreme. He is
The general frowned, turned away, and went on.
The general frowned. Though there was no definite news of an
The general had a fit of coughing as a result of shouting and of the
The general had so wished to do this and was so sorry he had not
The general in charge of the stores galloped after the carriage with
The general mounted a horse a Cossack had brought him. Pierre went
The general symptoms may be simulated by an attack of malaria.
The general treatment consists in attending to the emunctories, in
The general treatment consists in feeding and stimulating the patient as
The general treatment consists in free stimulation with whisky, brandy,
The general treatment is carried out on the same lines as for other
The general treatment is conducted on the same lines as on other forms
The general treatment of toxaemia must be carried out, and in cases due
The general's face clouded, his lips quivered and trembled. He
The generals seemed to listen reluctantly to the difficult
The generals were passing by, looking as if they wished to avoid
The generous terms secured by the American commission at Paris called
The gentlemen always made him sit down.
The gentlemen assembled at Bilibin's were young, wealthy, gay
The girl smiled and took it. Nesvitski like the rest of the men on
The girls sprang aside. Denisov hid his hairy legs under the
The glands are usually larger than in tuberculosis, and they remain
The glands of the _thorax_ and _abdomen_ will be considered with the
The gloves may be sterilised by steam, and are then put on dry, or by
The glow of the first fire that began on the second of September was
The goal is reached. After the final war of 1815 Alexander possesses
The gonococcus is carried to the joint in the blood-stream and is first
The good he has done to everybody here, from his peasants up to the
The government and faith of the dissenting denominations conspired with
The governor's wife led him up to a tall and very stout old lady
The governor's wife pressed his elbow gratefully.
The grandee's well-known mansion on the English Quay glittered
The granulating surface left on the separation of the slough tends to
The granulation tissue which forms as a result of the reaction of the
The gray-haired valet was sitting drowsily listening to the
The great contest was over. All the states, except North Carolina and
The great halls were full. In the first were the nobility and gentry
The great increase in later years was due in no small measure to the
The great natural forces lie outside us and we are not conscious
The great redoubt held out well, by my pipe!" continued the Frenchman.
The greatest crush during the movement of the troops took place at
The greatest difficulty is met with in the knee and hip, where the
The groom, the coachman, and the innkeeper told Pierre that an
The group of prisoners had melted away most of all. Of the three
The grown-up members of the family, not to mention his wife, were
The guests got up and took their leave, promising to return to
The guests welcomed Pierre because he always helped to enliven and
The guns emerged at a trot from the column following Murat and
The hall porter sullenly pulled a bell that rang upstairs, and
The handsome Anatole was smilingly talking to a partner on his arm and
The handsome Vera smiled contemptuously but did not seem at all
The handsome Vera, who produced such an irritating and unpleasant
The handsome boy adjutant with the long hair sighed deeply without
The handsome young Emperor Alexander, in the uniform of the Horse
The hard chancre is usually solitary, but sometimes there are two or
The hardest thing [Pierre went on thinking, or hearing, in his
The head is held stiffly on one side as in wry-neck, the patient
The head of the column had already descended into the hollow. The
The headquarters were situated two miles away from Salzeneck, and
The high-shouldered figure of Zherkov, familiar to the Pavlograds as
The higher the sun rose the higher rose that cloud of dust, and
The highest wisdom has but one science--the science of the whole-
The historians call this activity of the historical figures "the
The historians consider that, next to the battle of Borodino and the
The historians of culture are quite consistent in regard to their
The historians quite falsely represent Napoleon's faculties as
The historians tell us with naive assurance that its causes were the
The historians, in accord with the old habit of acknowledging divine
The historians, replying to this question, lay before us the sayings
The history of culture explains to us the impulses and conditions of
The homestead consisted of a threshing floor, outhouses, stables,
The horses also had been fed for a fortnight on straw from the
The horses stepped over the field as over a thick carpet, now and
The horses that had previously been invisible could now be seen to
The horses were brought.
The horses were brought. Denisov was angry with the Cossack
The horses' croups began to sway in the front line. Rook pulled at
The hospital was in a brick building with some of the window
The hospital was in a small Prussian town that had been twice
The hounds were joined into one pack, and "Uncle" and Nicholas
The house, with its bare, unplastered log walls, was not overclean--it
The housekeeper, the old nurse, the cooks, coachmen, maids, footmen,
The huge, endless bivouac that had previously resounded with the
The huntsman standing in the hollow moved and loosed his borzois,
The huntsman stood halfway up the knoll holding up his whip and
The huntsmen got the fox, but stayed there a long time without
The husband came up and sullenly asked his wife what she was talking
The husband smiled gloomily, the wife gaily. The governor's
The hussar did not reply.
The hussar only sighed without replying and coughed angrily. The
The hussar took the cup.
The hussars and Cossacks crowded round the prisoners; one offered
The hussars crowded round and responded heartily with loud shouts.
The hussars ran back to the men who held their horses; their
The hussars remained in the same place for about an hour. A
The hyaline cartilage composing the tumour frequently undergoes
The ice bore him but it swayed and creaked, and it was plain that it
The ice, that had held under those on foot, collapsed in a great mass,
The icon was carried further, accompanied by the throng. Pierre
The idea of being made a fool of and of having thrown away that
The idea of combination was applied in time to iron and steel, copper,
The idea of defeat and flight could not enter Rostov's head.
The ideal means of helping the tissues is by removing the focus of
The ignorance of his colleagues, the weakness and insignificance
The impairment of the blood supply of the skin may lead to the formation
The implication of the glands in other forms of cancer will be
The importance of taking precautions against further infection in
The importance of this enterprise to British economic life can hardly be
The imposing figure of Nesvitski followed by his Cossack, and the
The impression the princess made on Rostov was a very agreeable one.
The increase in the number of independent farmers was accompanied by the
The independence of the American colonies was foreseen by many European
The indirect element of this method of skin-grafting may be carried
The individual glands attain a considerable size, and they fuse together
The induction of hyperaemia is sometimes remarkably efficacious in
The infantry in front of them parted into platoons to allow the
The infantry regiments that had been caught unawares in the
The infantry who had been stopped crowded near the bridge in the
The infection is usually a mixed one in which anaerobic bacteria
The inflammation affects chiefly the walls of the vessels, and is
The influence of micro-organisms in the causation of disease, and the
The influence of the business was widespread. A large and lucrative
The influences which contribute to bring about this form of exhaustion
The initial local symptoms may be due to the presence of a focus in the
The initiative permits any one to draw up a proposed bill; and, on
The injury to the artery may be a subcutaneous one such as a tear by a
The instant he had done this, all Rostov's animation vanished. The
The instructions to Alpatych took over two hours and still the
The intention was to make a stand at the Drissa camp, but
The interpreter translated these words without the last phrase,
The intolerable acts went through Parliament with extraordinary
The introduction of a colony of micro-organisms is quickly followed by
The intrusion of Pierre's nonmilitary figure in a white hat made
The invaders flee, turn back, flee again, and all the chances are
The invasion pushes eastward and reaches its final goal--Moscow.
The irregulars destroyed the great army piecemeal. They gathered the
The irritation caused by infection with bacteria, on the other hand, is
The jaws are altered so that while the upper jaw is contracted into the
The joint lesions which accompany #acute rheumatism# or "rheumatic
The joint symptoms may count for little in the clinical picture, or, as
The joints most frequently affected are the knee, elbow, ankle, wrist,
The joints of the lower extremity are especially apt to suffer; the
The judicial power of the United States shall not be construed to extend
The keeper opens the two center partitions to examine the brood cells.
The knoll to which Pierre ascended was that famous one afterwards
The lad looked down and seemed now for the first time to notice what
The lad with the turned-up sleeve gave the smith a blow in the
The lady coloured deeply and covered over her injured wrist. "He is a hard man," she said, "and perhaps he hardly knows his own strength."
The lady gave a violent start and stared in bewilderment at my companion.
The landowner to whom Nicholas went was a bachelor, an old
The larger bell was muffled and the little bells on the harness
The largest measure of self-government consistent with their welfare and
The last days of her stay in Voronezh had been the happiest of her
The last medicine has done her a very great deal of good. She has
The last of the Horse Guards, a huge pockmarked fellow, frowned
The last of the infantry hurriedly crossed the bridge, squeezing
The last role is played. The actor is bidden to disrobe and wash off
The last words were read out in the midst of complete silence. The
The latter bowed his head respectfully.
The latter in Pierre's presence had ceased to be caustic, and his
The latter lay silent in the sleigh with closed eyes and did not
The latter was riding with a sullen expression on his face.
The law destroying the charter of Massachusetts passed the Commons by a
The layer at the bottom of the tube consists for the most part of
The layer of coagulated blood and lymph becomes liquefied and is thrown
The leaders, these historians tell us, express the will of the
The leading towns exercised an influence on colonial opinion all out of
The least desirable result of the Hunterian ligature is met with in
The legislature consisted of two houses, the members of which were to be
The legislatures under the dominance of these men had enacted paper
The lesions in the bones resulting from _actinomycosis_ and from
The lesions met with later correspond to those of the tertiary period of
The lesions of individual tissues--bones, nerves, blood vessels--are
The lesions--which vary from a slight superficial scorching to complete
The letter taken by Balashev was the last Napoleon sent to
The leucocytosis begins soon after the infection manifests itself--for
The lieutenant colonel of hussars smiled beneath his mustache at the
The lieutenant never looked the man he was speaking to straight in
The life of the nations is not contained in the lives of a few
The life-history of an untreated gumma varies with its environment. When
The limb becomes powerless. At the seat of rupture there is tenderness
The literature of dermoid cysts is full of accounts of puzzling tumours
The little and ring fingers can be flexed to a slight degree by the
The little kitten, feasting her eyes on him, seemed ready at any
The little man stood glancing from one to the other of us with half-frightened, half-hopeful eyes, as one who is not sure whether he is on the verge of a windfall or of a catastrophe. Then he stepped into the cab, and in half an hour we were back in the sitting-room at Baker Street. Nothing had been said during our drive, but the high, thin breathing of our new companion, and the claspings and unclaspings of his hands, spoke of the nervous tension within him.
The little princess and Mademoiselle Bourienne had already received
The little princess did not, or did not wish to, hear his words. She
The little princess during the whole discussion and the rest of
The little princess entered the room. The passage broke off in the
The little princess got up, rang for the maid, and hurriedly and
The little princess grumbled to her maid that her bed was badly
The little princess had also left the tea table and followed Helene.
The little princess had grown stouter during this time, but her eyes
The little princess lay in the armchair, Mademoiselle Bourienne
The little princess lay supported by pillows, with a white cap on
The little princess talked incessantly, her short, downy upper lip
The little princess went round the table with quick, short,
The little princess, like an old war horse that hears the trumpet,
The little princess, taking the dress from the maid, came up to
The lively song gave a special flavor to the tone of free and easy
The local _treatment_ consists in employing soothing applications and a
The local lesion is a puncture, surrounded by a zone of hyperaemia,
The local manifestations are pain and tenderness in relation to one of
The local manifestations vary with the relation of the seat of the
The local symptoms vary with the seat of the abscess. When it is
The local treatment of the _tuberculous ulcer_ calls for special
The localisation of the disease in a particular joint may be determined
The long bones are chiefly affected, and the commonest sites are: either
The long thoracic nerve may be cut across while clearing out the axilla
The longer the Emperor remained in Vilna the less did everybody-
The look of annoyance had already disappeared from Boris' face:
The looks of the plain Countess Mary always improved when she was in
The lump continues to increase in size and in three to four weeks the
The lymph glands behind the angle of the jaw enlarge and become tender,
The magnificent reception room was crowded. Everyone stood up
The main arteries are narrowed by hyperplastic endarteritis followed by
The main indication in _treatment_ is to secure sleep, and this is done
The major raised his hand to his cap with a smile.
The majority of cases seen in surgical practice suffer from the
The majority of them were Dissenters, critics, not friends, of the
The majority of them were Protestants from the Rhine region, and South
The man answered the question.
The man burst into a hearty laugh. "They might be useful to me as relics of my adventure," said he, "but beyond that I can hardly see what use the disjecta membra of my late acquaintance are going to be to me. No, sir, I think that, with your permission, I will confine my attentions to the excellent bird which I perceive upon the sideboard."
The man hesitated for an instant. "My name is John Robinson," he answered with a sidelong glance.
The man in the frieze coat raised his arms and shouted:
The man in the frieze coat was reading the broadsheet of August 31
The man sat for a minute or more with a heaving chest, fighting against his emotion. Then he passed his handkerchief over his brow, set his lips tight, and turned his face towards us.
The man sat huddled up in his chair, with his head sunk upon his breast, like one who is utterly crushed. Holmes stuck his feet up on the corner of the mantelpiece and, leaning back with his hands in his pockets, began talking, rather to himself, as it seemed, than to us.
The man sprang from his chair and paced up and down the room in uncontrollable agitation. Then, with a gesture of desperation, he tore the mask from his face and hurled it upon the ground. "You are right," he cried; "I am the King. Why should I attempt to conceal it?"
The man told him that arms were being distributed today at the
The man who entered was a strange and impressive figure. His slow, limping step and bowed shoulders gave the appearance of decrepitude, and yet his hard, deep-lined, craggy features, and his enormous limbs showed that he was possessed of unusual strength of body and of character. His tangled beard, grizzled hair, and outstanding, drooping eyebrows combined to give an air of dignity and power to his appearance, but his face was of an ashen white, while his lips and the corners of his nostrils were tinged with a shade of blue. It was clear to me at a glance that he was in the grip of some deadly and chronic disease.
The man who entered was a sturdy, middle-sized fellow, some thirty years of age, clean-shaven, and sallow-skinned, with a bland, insinuating manner, and a pair of wonderfully sharp and penetrating grey eyes. He shot a questioning glance at each of us, placed his shiny top-hat upon the sideboard, and with a slight bow sidled down into the nearest chair.
The man who entered was young, some two-and-twenty at the outside, well-groomed and trimly clad, with something of refinement and delicacy in his bearing. The streaming umbrella which he held in his hand, and his long shining waterproof told of the fierce weather through which he had come. He looked about him anxiously in the glare of the lamp, and I could see that his face was pale and his eyes heavy, like those of a man who is weighed down with some great anxiety.
The man who had been ordered to go for ammunition stumbled against
The man who had devastated France returns to France alone, without
The man who had wakened yawned and stretched himself.
The man whom they called Tikhon, having run to the stream, plunged
The management of the haemorrhage which accompanies an operation includes
The manager having brought the drama to a close and stripped the
The manifestations of the disease disappear with remarkable rapidity.
The manly voice again interrupted the artillery officer.
The manors of New York or Maryland were, however, of slight consequence
The march of events, he added, had imposed new duties on the country.
The margin, while in parts irregular, is typically represented by a
The marshals and generals, who were nearer to the field of battle
The matter of political rights was even more hotly contested; but the
The meeting was at an end, and on reaching home Pierre felt as if he
The melancholy silence that followed was broken by the sounds of the
The melting pot had begun its historic mission.
The member of the Hofkriegsrath looked at him severely but, seeing
The members of what had once been an army--Napoleon himself and
The men became silent. The soldier who had been struck groaned and
The men began to choose partners and take their places for the
The men crowded closer together, stirred, and rapidly took off their
The men in the Russian army were so worn out by this continuous
The men of this party said and thought that what was wrong
The men rapidly picked out their horses in the semidarkness,
The men remained at table over their port--English fashion. In the
The method of treatment that has met with most success is ligation of
The methods employed by this board were varied. All laws passed by
The methods of the Ku Klux and the White Camelia were similar. Solemn
The methods of treatment most generally applicable are the use of radium
The midwife was already on her way to meet her, rubbing her small,
The militiamen carried Prince Andrew to dressing station by the
The militiamen with stretchers who were called up stood behind the
The militiamen, both those who had been in the village and those who
The mind may remain clear to the end, or the patient may have delusions,
The mining activities which in many sections preceded agriculture called
The mining of the Kremlin only helped toward fulfilling Napoleon's
The moan of that wounded beast (the French army) which betrayed
The mobs of great cities, he said, are sores on the body politic;
The moment Nicholas took her hand she could no longer restrain
The moment he heard the firing and the cry from behind, the
The morbid changes in the joints present a remarkable combination of
The morbid processes met with in bone originate in the same way and lead
The more closely a man was engaged in the events then taking place
The more emotional and ingratiating the expression of Natasha's face
The more highly the injured part is endowed with sensory nerves the more
The more recent the syphilis in the parent, the greater is the risk of
The more severe forms are attended with _extravasation_, the
The more severe forms are attended with a considerable degree of shock,
The more superficial degrees of electrical burns differ from those
The more the Russian army retreated the more fiercely a spirit of
The more the plundering by the French continued, the more both the
The more this field of motion spreads out before our eyes, the
The morning after little Nicholas had left, the old prince donned
The morning was bright, he had a good horse under him, and his heart
The most common cause of venous thrombosis, however, is inflammation of
The most common form of capillary angioma is the naevus or congenital
The most common is an osteomyelitis commencing in the marrow exposed in
The most cunning man could not have crept into her confidence more
The most effective treatment is Bier's bandage applied for about six
The most important diseases in this group are the pyogenic, the
The most marked dilatation usually occurs on the medial side of the
The most prominent feature of tertiary syphilis consists in the
The most serious form of arterial _thrombosis_ is that met with _in the
The most suitable temperature for bacterial life is from 95 o to 102 o F.,
The mother smoothed the folds of her dyed silk dress before a
The mother's wounded spirit could not heal. Petya's
The motives of those who thronged from all sides to Moscow after
The motor symptoms predominate, the muscles affected being the extensors
The movement of peoples from west to east was to be succeeded by a
The movements of the Russian and French armies during the campaign
The mummers (some of the house serfs) dressed up as bears, Turks,
The muscular tissue may be largely replaced by fat.
The myeloma is most often met with between the ages of twenty-five and
The name was indeed well known to us as belonging to the senior partner in the second largest private banking concern in the City of London. What could have happened, then, to bring one of the foremost citizens of London to this most pitiable pass? We waited, all curiosity, until with another effort he braced himself to tell his story.
The national suffrage convention of 1850 was followed by an
The nationalism of Hamilton was undemocratic. The democracy of Jefferson
The natural process by which such haemorrhage is arrested varies with the
The naturalists and their followers, thinking they can solve this
The nature of the inflammatory and suppurative processes will be
The nature of these swellings is to be recognised by their situation, by
The nature of this disturbance and its etiology are imperfectly known.
The navy, as a result in no small measure of the alertness of Theodore
The necessary antidotes had been administered in time and she was
The necessity of immediate assistance it recognized by creating in 1865
The needles of hypodermic syringes sometimes break and a portion remains
The nerve slips forward, and may be felt lying on the medial aspect of
The new bone is laid down on the surface, in the Haversian canals, or
The new decoration of the Premises contributed much to the
The new government proceeded to fund the old debt of the nation, assume
The new nation, endowed with an imperial domain stretching from the
The new republic had hardly been started in 1783 before its troubles
The new skin is at first insensitive and is fixed to the underlying
The new state constitutions in their broad outlines followed colonial
The newcomer was a short, large-boned, yellow-faced, wrinkled old
The news of Count Bezukhov's death reached us before your letter and
The news of the day in Petersburg was the illness of Countess
The news that the Russians were attacking the left flank of the
The next day the Emperor stopped at Wischau, and Villier, his
The next day the regimental commander sent for Denisov, and
The next muscles to become stiff and painful are those of the neck,
The next year he suggested intervention to Great Britain, encountering
The next year the Supreme Court of the United States declared the income
The night he received the news, Kutuzov sent Bagration's vanguard,
The night was dark but starry, the road showed black in the snow
The night was foggy and through the fog the moonlight gleamed
The night was warm and light. To the left of the house on the Pokrovka
The nobleman swung his glasses a little faster and stared down into the fire. "You see, Mr. Holmes," said he, "my wife was twenty before her father became a rich man. During that time she ran free in a mining camp and wandered through woods or mountains, so that her education has come from Nature rather than from the schoolmaster. She is what we call in England a tomboy, with a strong nature, wild and free, unfettered by any sort of traditions. She is impetuous--volcanic, I was about to say. She is swift in making up her mind and fearless in carrying out her resolutions. On the other hand, I would not have given her the name which I have the honour to bear"--he gave a little stately cough--"had I not thought her to be at bottom a noble woman. I believe that she is capable of heroic self-sacrifice and that anything dishonourable would be repugnant to her."
The noncommissioned officer began talking with his comrades about
The noncommissioned officer frowned and, muttering words of abuse,
The normal process of repair may be interfered with by various
The note of defiance which ran through this message, greeted by shrill
The note was undated, and without either signature or address.
The novelty Anna Pavlovna was setting before her guests that evening
The number of bondmen rose from 700,000 in Washington's day to more than
The nurse lit the gilt candles before the icons and sat down by
The nurse with raised elbows was lifting the infant over the rail of
The oasis of the Otradnoe covert came in sight a few hundred yards
The object which had caught his eye was a small dog lash hung on one corner of the bed. The lash, however, was curled upon itself and tied so as to make a loop of whipcord.
The occurrence of _pathological dislocation_ is due to softening and
The occurrence of ankylosis in a joint before the skeleton has attained
The occurrence of joint lesions in _locomotor ataxia_ (tabes dorsalis)
The offer was too tempting to be refused. Everyone volunteered to go
The officer and soldiers who had arrested Pierre treated him with
The officer appeared abashed, as though he understood that one might
The officer came nearer and suddenly his face flushed crimson.
The officer felt that by arriving with important orders at such a
The officer flourished his arm and hastily rode away.
The officer glanced at him, and without replying turned again to the
The officer in the scarf dismounted, called up a drummer, and went
The officer mounted his horse and rode after him. When he reached
The officer of the Horse Guards went to a general with whom
The officer of the suite ventured to remark to the prince that if
The officer pointed with his hand to the smoke visible on the left
The officer pounced on the soldiers who were in the shops, but at that
The officer prisoners were separated from the soldiers and told to
The officer rode out beyond our lines to Echkino. While still at a
The officer stood perplexed and his face showed indecision.
The officer was Petya Rostov.
The officer went up to Makar Alexeevich and took him by the collar.
The officer who had been sent to inquire met Denisov on the way with
The officer's face was red and perspiring and his eyes glittered
The officer, evidently glad of an opportunity for a talk, moved up
The officer, mounting his horse, rode off to someone else.
The officer, without answering him, strode across to the opposite
The officers gathered round Denisov's canteen, eating and talking.
The officers got up and stood round the Cossacks and their prisoner.
The officers laughed.
The officers were about to take leave, but Prince Andrew, apparently
The officers who had been standing together rode off to their
The officers, as usual, lived in twos and threes in the roofless,
The officers, who had come from the other sheds, were all
The official detective was attired in a pea-jacket and cravat, which gave him a decidedly nautical appearance, and he carried a black canvas bag in his hand. With a short greeting he seated himself and lit the cigar which had been offered to him.
The official release date of all Project Gutenberg eBooks is at
The official release date of all Project Gutenberg eBooks is at
The old aunt received the two young people in her corner, but seemed
The old count cast down his eyes on hearing his son's words and
The old count pretended to be angry.
The old count went home, and Natasha and Petya promised to return
The old count's troyka, with Dimmler and his party, started forward,
The old count, knowing his son's ardor in the hunt, hurried so as
The old count, who had always kept up an enormous hunting
The old countess, not letting go of his hand and kissing it every
The old ladies were pleased with the presents he brought them, and
The old lady's condition was understood by the whole household
The old man at first stared fixedly at his son, and an unnatural
The old man continued to fold and seal his letter, snatching up and
The old man feels he is guilty, but cannot change himself. My boy is
The old man sank his face in his hands. "God help me!" he cried. "But I would not have let the young man come to harm. I give you my word that I would have spoken out if it went against him at the Assizes."
The old man seemed livelier than usual. Princess Mary was the same
The old man was already sitting barefoot. The little Frenchman had
The old man was in a good temper after his nap before dinner. (He
The old man was saying something in a voice broken by sobs, but Pierre
The old man was silent.
The old man was still sitting in the ornamental garden, like a fly
The old man, experienced in court as well as in military affairs-
The old prince came in to supper; this was evidently on Pierre's
The old prince did not sleep either. Tikhon, half asleep, heard
The old prince dressed leisurely in his study, frowning and
The old prince had gone to the town and was expected back any
The old prince knew that if he told his daughter she was making a
The old prince said that if he was ill it was only because of
The old prince stopped writing and, as if not understanding, fixed
The old prince was in a good temper and very gracious to Pierre.
The old prince was very affectionate and careful in his treatment of
The old princess came in and also wept. The elderly lady was using
The old princess did not reply, she was tormented by jealousy of her
The old princess rose respectfully and curtsied. The young man who
The old servant returned to the caleche, looked into it, shook his
The older the child, the less risk there is of its communicating the
The one thing he now desired with his whole soul was to get away
The one, exalting royal rights and aristocratic privileges, was the
The only conception that can explain the movement of the
The only conception that can explain the movement of the peoples
The only task that lay before the Southern leaders was to write in the
The only young people remaining in the drawing room, not counting
The onset and early stages of tuberculous disease, however, are more
The onset and progress of the affection are most insidious, and the
The onset may be referred to injury or exposure to cold, or may be
The open method is the only safe means of treating such wounds. The
The opening in the skin persists as a sinus, or develops into a typical
The operation is a difficult and serious one, but the results are
The opportune moment for them came in 1884 when a number of
The order was given to halt and down knapsacks.
The order was to find a ford and to cross the river. The colonel
The orderly had gone in before him and began waking somebody.
The orderly was striking a light and Shcherbinin was fumbling for
The ordinary life of the white servant was also severely restricted. A
The organism does not readily establish itself in the human body, and
The origin of these bodies is one of the most debated questions in
The original line of the Russian forces along the river Kolocha
The ossifying zone is increased in depth; the marrow is abnormally
The other lesions of the eye are much rarer, and can only be discovered
The outcome of the Civil War in the South was nothing short of a
The ovarian dermoid appears clinically as an abdominal or pelvic tumour
The overthrow of James, followed by the accession of William and Mary
The pain induced by the traction of muscles attached to the bone, or by
The part affected is enormously increased in size, and causes
The partisan warfare flamed up most fiercely in the latter days of
The parts around the ulcer are congested and of a dark brown colour.
The party of Hamilton and Clay lay in the dust.
The passions of the war by this time were evidently cooling. A new
The patches grew deeper on her forehead, neck, and cheeks. She tried
The patient complains of increasing disability of the limb, movements of
The patient gives a history of feverish attacks of the nature of
The patient is easily tired, complains of pain in the bones, and, unless
The patient is liable to sudden attacks of numbness, tingling and
The patient should be nourished well, and there need be no restriction
The patient's condition is one of profound shock with faintness,
The peasant is irrefutable. He has devised a complete explanation.
The peasants say that a cold wind blows in late spring because the
The peasants went up and took him by his shoulders and legs, but
The peasants, adjusting the stretcher to their shoulders, started
The peasants--even they have to go," said the soldier behind the cart,
The people had a single aim: to free their land from invasion.
The people of the west moved eastwards to slay their fellow men, and
The period of the campaign of 1812 from the battle of Borodino to
The phaeton was full of people and there was a doubt as to where
The phenomena which characterise the inflammatory reaction can be
The physiological effects of complete division are that the muscles
The pilgrim woman was appeased and, being encouraged to talk, gave a
The pioneer leaders stood waiting for the signal. It came. President
The platform endorsed such political reforms as woman suffrage, direct
The plight of the whole army resembled that of a wounded animal
The point of infection is usually on an uncovered part of the body, such
The poisons circulating in the blood produce _waxy degeneration_ in
The popular belief that there is some constitutional peculiarity
The popular character of the assemblies increased as they became engaged
The populations of later English colonies--the Carolinas, New York,
The portion of the diaphysis which has sustained the action of the
The portly client puffed out his chest with an appearance of some little pride and pulled a dirty and wrinkled newspaper from the inside pocket of his greatcoat. As he glanced down the advertisement column, with his head thrust forward and the paper flattened out upon his knee, I took a good look at the man and endeavoured, after the fashion of my companion, to read the indications which might be presented by his dress or appearance.
The position was the more awkward because the Emperor, meditating
The postilion and all the other servants did the same. "Off, in
The postilion started, the carriage wheels rattled. Prince Hippolyte
The postmaster came in and began obsequiously to beg his
The postmaster, his wife, the valet, and a peasant woman selling
The powers not delegated to the United States by the Constitution, nor
The presence of a metallic foreign body having been determined and its
The presence of the problem of man's free will, though
The presence of varicose veins is frequently associated with a
The pressure exerted on the nerves and veins of the lower extremity
The pressure of the articular surfaces against one another favours the
The priest's wife, flushing rosy red, caught up the dish she had
The primary cause of arterio-sclerosis is not definitely known, but its
The prince again laughed his frigid laugh.
The prince answered nothing, but she looked at him significantly,
The prince bowed his head and went up to the porch. "God be
The prince bowed to signify his respect and gratitude.
The prince had a list of things to be bought in Smolensk and,
The prince had aged very much that year. He showed marked signs of
The prince looked at his daughter's frightened face and snorted.
The prince stopped. He saw the effect these words had produced on
The prince tried to comfort her, but Helene, as if quite distraught,
The prince turned round to the overseer and fixed his eyes on him,
The prince was silent and looked indifferent. But, with the
The prince was surprised that so simple an idea had not occurred
The prince's house did not belong to what is known as fashionable
The prince's tone was so calm and confident that Princess Mary
The princess bent over the exercise book on the table.
The princess blushed, and raised her arms with a gesture of despair.
The princess continued to look at him without moving, and with the
The princess decided to leave on the fifteenth. The cares of
The princess did not fall down or faint. She was already pale, but
The princess did not reply. Their efforts in the struggle for the
The princess gave a wrong answer.
The princess gave no reply and did not even smile, but left the room
The princess glanced at her watch and, seeing that she was five
The princess let go.
The princess listened, smiling.
The princess looked at him, not grasping what he was saying, but
The princess looked in a scared way at her father's eyes
The princess pondered awhile with a thoughtful smile and her
The princess rested her bare round arm on a little table and
The princess rose quickly to meet him and held out her hand.
The princess said nothing, but suddenly her short downy lip
The princess sank helplessly into an armchair beside her father
The princess saw that her father regarded the matter with
The princess seemed to see nothing more extraordinary in that than
The princess smiled as people do who think they know more about
The princess smiled. She rose with the same unchanging smile with
The princess started. Evidently Pierre's words touched her to the
The princess stopped. Sighs were the only sound heard in the crowd.
The princess too had prepared provisions for Pierre's journey.
The princess understood what Natasha had meant by the words: "two
The princess was about to reply, but her father would not let her
The princess was apparently vexed at not having anyone to be angry
The princess was as untidy as her father was tidy. She put down the
The princess went up to the door, passed by it with a dignified
The princess wished to rise, but the prince held her by the hand.
The princess, holding her little dog on her lap with her thin bony
The princess, picking up her dress, was taking her seat in the
The princess, who had a straight, rigid body, abnormally long for
The princess, who had never liked Pierre and had been particularly
The prisoner turned with the reckless air of a man who abandons himself to his destiny. "Be it so," said he. "And pray what am I charged with?"
The prisoners were brought down from the battery and among them
The prisoners were placed in a certain order, according to the
The problem for the South was one of defense mainly, though even for
The problem is that regarding man as a subject of observation from
The procedure of C. H. Mayo is adapted to cases in which it is desirable
The process by which this restoration is effected is essentially the
The process may remain localised to the ossifying junction, but usually
The process of _ulceration_ may be defined as the molecular or cellular
The process of repair in living tissue depends upon an inherent power
The processes known as thrombosis and embolism are so intimately
The prognosis is favourable, but recovery is apt to be slow, and relapse
The prognosis is grave in the extreme, and the only hope is in early
The prognosis is more favourable than in any other tumour as it never
The progress of natural cure is indicated by the aneurysm becoming
The prolonged hyperaemia of the tissues in relation to a callous ulcer of
The promised land for the French during their advance had been
The proportion of freedom to inevitability decreases and increases
The proprieties were observed and the Emperor was the first to set
The prosperity of American industries depended to a considerable extent
The publican was fighting one of the smiths at the door, and when
The pulsation in the vessels beyond the seat of rupture is arrested--for
The pulse corresponds with the febrile condition. It is accelerated
The pulse is small, feeble, and compressible, and the temperature rises
The pus infiltrates the meshes of the cellular tissue, there is
The pus may form and collect within a circumscribed area, constituting a
The pus therefore tends to burrow along the line of the blood vessels
The quantity of toxin circulating in the blood is so small as to be
The question of removal of the foreign body must be decided according to
The question that had perturbed Pierre on the Mozhaysk hill and
The question was hardly out of my mouth, and Holmes had not yet opened his lips to reply, when we heard a heavy footfall in the passage and a tap at the door.
The question was whether he could ever bring himself to part from
The question: how did individuals make nations act as they wished
The quiet home life and peaceful happiness of Bald Hills presented
The radial pulse on the same side is small and delayed. Congestion and
The raid and its grim ending deeply moved the country. Abolitionists
The rain had stopped, and only the mist was falling and drops from
The ranks of the infantry disappeared amid the smoke but their
The rapidity of the Russian pursuit was just as destructive to our
The rapidity of the destructive changes in certain cases of tabes, and
The ratification of the conventions of nine States shall be sufficient
The raw surface is absolutely insensitive, so that the probe can be
The raw surface is first covered by a layer of coagulated blood and
The reaction of joy was as passionate as his grief had been, and he hugged his recovered gems to his bosom.
The recognition of man's free will as something capable of
The recognition of the characteristic elements, with or without
The recognition of the fungus is the crucial point in diagnosis.
The red-nosed Captain Timokhin, formerly Dolokhov's squadron
The reddish Lyubim rushed forward from behind Milka, sprang
The regiment broke up into companies, which went to their
The regimental adjutant came in and confirmed the news brought by
The regimental commander ran forward on each such occasion, fearing to
The regimental commander sought out Dolokhov in the ranks and,
The regimental commander was afraid he might be blamed for this
The regimental commander, flushing, ran to his horse, seized the
The regimental commander, going up to the line himself, ordered
The regimental doctor, when he came, said it was absolutely
The region of the mouth and jaws is one of the commonest sites of
The relief of tension which follows the bursting of an abscess, the
The remains of Langeron's and Dokhturov's mingled forces were
The remains of our regiment which had been in action rapidly
The repair of _Bone_, _Blood Vessels_, and _Peripheral Nerves_ is more
The repeal of the Stamp Act was moved in the House of Commons a few days
The repeal was greeted by the colonists with great popular
The replies this theory gives to historical questions are like the
The reply evoked from the British government by this strong statement
The report which had been circulated that the Austrians had been
The researches of Stoffel on the minute anatomy of the larger nerves,
The resolution, duly passed, was sent forth on March 4, 1861, with the
The respiration is affected in so far as the spasms of the respiratory
The response of the United States to the ominous German order was swift
The response of the colonists was a Continental Congress for defense. An
The result of the affair was a tripartite agreement by which the three
The result of the embargo was pathetic. England and France refused to
The result of this and related controversies was a debate on the merits
The result was the celebrated Jay treaty of 1794. By its terms Great
The results of the draft were in the end distinctly disappointing to the
The results of the series of debates were momentous. Lincoln clearly
The results of the war were revolutionary in character. Slavery was
The retreat from Malo-Yaroslavets when he had a free road into a
The returns of the electoral vote in 1828 revealed the sources of
The right of citizens of the United States to vote shall not be denied
The right of the people to be secure in their persons, houses, papers,
The right thing now was, if not to retire from the service, at any
The right to appropriate money for internal improvements was expressly
The rise of a young republic composed of thirteen states, each governed
The risk of infection from the _air_ is now known to be very small, so
The road along which they moved was bordered on both sides by dead
The road in which we found ourselves as we turned round the corner from the retired Saxe-Coburg Square presented as great a contrast to it as the front of a picture does to the back. It was one of the main arteries which conveyed the traffic of the City to the north and west. The roadway was blocked with the immense stream of commerce flowing in a double tide inward and outward, while the footpaths were black with the hurrying swarm of pedestrians. It was difficult to realise as we looked at the line of fine shops and stately business premises that they really abutted on the other side upon the faded and stagnant square which we had just quitted.
The road the French would take was unknown, and so the closer our
The road was clear again; Pierre descended the hill and drove on.
The roll of the convention bore such names as Abbot, Baldwin, Cutler,
The rules for amputation are the same as those governing the treatment
The rustle of a woman's dress was heard in the next room. Prince
The rustle of the battle of Tarutino frightened the beast, and it
The salesman chuckled grimly. "Bring me the books, Bill," said he.
The salesman nodded and shot a questioning glance at my companion.
The salutary effect of the reform in reducing the amount of cheating
The same applies to historical events. Why war and revolution occur we
The same conversation was repeated next day and the day after, and
The same evening that the prince gave his instructions to
The same happy, rapturous faces turned to the shaggy figure of
The same thing that took place in Moscow had happened in all the
The sanguine hopes of the leaders proved to be illusory. The quiet
The scantily clad Helene smiled at everyone in the same way, and
The scene of the third act represented a palace in which many
The scent of flowers came in at the window. Helene was wearing a white
The science of jurisprudence regards the state and power as the
The score against him reached the fateful sum of forty-three
The screw tourniquet of Petit is to be preferred when it is desired to
The sea of history was not driven spasmodically from shore to
The search for these laws has long been begun and the new methods of
The seats of the senators of the first class shall be vacated at the
The second George never saw England until he was a man. He spoke English
The second consideration is the more or less evident time relation
The second form occurs in children and adolescents; it may affect
The second method is to consider the actions of some one man--a king
The second of the measures, the Sedition Act, penalized not only those
The second of these objects has been achieved by the researches of
The second order was that Poniatowski, moving to the village through
The second party was directly opposed to the first; one extreme,
The second princess had just come from the sickroom with her eyes
The second type is met with in relation to _epithelioma occurring in a
The secretary was told to write down the resolution of the Moscow
The serfs all dispersed. "Uncle" lifted Natasha off her horse and
The sergeant ran up to the officer and in a frightened whisper
The servant brought back his tumbler turned upside down,* with an
The servant handed him a book which Pierre took to be a devotional
The servants gathered round Natasha, but could not believe the
The servants--the most reliable judges of their masters because they
The settlers of this vast empire were to be as diverse in their origins
The seventh party consisted of the sort of people who are always
The shaft is increased in girth as a result of its being surrounded by a
The sheath of the vessel or an adjacent fascia should be stitched
The shed became semidark, and the sharp rattle of the drums on two
The sick man was so surrounded by doctors, princesses, and
The sight of her father, the terribly wild cries of her mother that
The silence began to oppress the princess and she tried to catch
The silence lasted some time. Prince Bagration, apparently not
The silver and gold deposits of the Leadville and Cripple Creek regions
The sinuses may be so tortuous that a probe cannot be passed to the
The situation of a malignant tumour exercises considerable influence on
The situation, however, was by no means unchanging. On the contrary
The sixth party, the Bennigsenites, said, on the contrary, that at
The size of the abscess ranges from that of a cherry to that of a
The skiagram may also show separation and displacement of the adjacent
The skin and fascia are movable over the cyst. The cyst varies in size
The skin of the affected area may be glazed and red, or may be pale and
The skin should be disinfected and the blisters punctured. When
The skin, when it is closely peppered with shot, is liable to lose its
The skin--especially the skin of the buttock--is one of the favourite
The slave trade was abolished in the District of Columbia, but slavery
The slavery issue even more than temperance called women into public
The slow destruction of the affected tissue by suppuration, the absence
The small boy brought round a small thin volume and a great greasy-backed one, laying them out together beneath the hanging lamp.
The small group that assembled before dinner in the lofty
The small multiple tumours rarely call for interference.
The small veins of the skin of the ankle and foot often show as fine
The smell of the food the Preobrazhenskis were eating and a sense of
The smile vanished from Speranski's white face, which was much
The smoke did not hang low as on the day when Pierre had been taken
The so-called "compound palmar ganglion" is a tuberculous disease of the
The so-called _amputation neuroma_ has already been referred to (p. 344).
The so-called partisan war began with the entry of the French into
The socialistic idea, introduced into national politics in 1892, had
The society gathered together at the governor's was the best in
The soft parts over the tumour for a long time preserve their normal
The soldier fell, got up, and ran away. But his comrade, throwing
The soldier said no more and the talk went on.
The soldier to whom the laughers referred was Dolokhov. Prince
The soldier with the swollen cheek looked angrily at the cavalry
The soldiers crowded against one another with terrified faces, and
The soldiers dragged it awkwardly from the post and began pushing it
The soldiers forming the picket line, like showmen exhibiting a
The soldiers in the yard, hearing the shot, came into the passage
The soldiers laughed. A moment later, an adjutant arrived with the
The soldiers shook their heads disapprovingly as they looked at
The soldiers stopped.
The soldiers went out again, and the orderly, who had meanwhile
The soldiers who had carried Prince Andrew had noticed and taken the
The soldiers, of whom there are the most, form the lower section
The soldiers, swinging their arms and keeping time spontaneously,
The soldiers, who threw sidelong glances at Pierre, got the fire
The sole importance of the crossing of the Berezina lies in the fact
The sole organ of government was a Congress composed of from two to
The solemn Mr. Merryweather perched himself upon a crate, with a very injured expression upon his face, while Holmes fell upon his knees upon the floor and, with the lantern and a magnifying lens, began to examine minutely the cracks between the stones. A few seconds sufficed to satisfy him, for he sprang to his feet again and put his glass in his pocket.
The son sighed, thus admitting that his father had understood him.
The son, lowering his eyes, followed her quietly.
The sound of bare feet splashing through the mud was heard in the
The sound of three more shots came from the gate.
The sounds of crackling and the din of falling walls and ceilings,
The sounds, which he had not heard for so long, had an even more
The source of that extraordinary power of penetrating the meaning of
The source of this contradiction lies in the fact that the
The southern spring, the comfortable rapid traveling in a Vienna
The spaces between these loops are filled by cells of various kinds, the
The spasms rapidly spread to all the muscles of deglutition and
The spirit of an army is the factor which multiplied by the mass
The spirit of reform broke into both political parties. It appeared in
The spirit of reform was abroad in the land. The spoils system was
The spirit of the new age was, therefore, one of reform, not of
The spirit of the new order soon had a pronounced effect on the
The spirochaete has been demonstrated in every form of syphilitic lesion,
The spirochaete may be recognised in films made by scraping the deeper
The spot chosen for the duel was some eighty paces from the road,
The squadron crossed the bridge and drew out of range of fire
The squadron in which Rostov was serving had scarcely time to
The squadron overtook and passed the infantry and the battery--which
The staff captain, Kirsten, had twice been reduced to the ranks
The staff officer and Prince Andrew mounted their horses and rode
The staff officer joined in the colonel's appeals, but Bagration did
The staff officer remained behind and Prince Andrew rode on alone.
The station-master had not finished his speech before we were all hastening in the direction of the fire. The road topped a low hill, and there was a great widespread whitewashed building in front of us, spouting fire at every chink and window, while in the garden in front three fire-engines were vainly striving to keep the flames under.
The station-master laughed heartily. "No, sir, Dr. Becher is an Englishman, and there isn't a man in the parish who has a better-lined waistcoat. But he has a gentleman staying with him, a patient, as I understand, who is a foreigner, and he looks as if a little good Berkshire beef would do him no harm."
The steward did not say it was quite impossible, but suggested
The stirring deeds of the _Constitution_, the _United States_, and the
The stores, the prisoners, and the marshal's baggage train stopped
The stormcloud had come upon them, and in every face the fire
The story of this traffic in white servants is one of the most striking
The story was very pretty and interesting, especially at the point
The stout gentleman half rose from his chair and gave a bob of greeting, with a quick little questioning glance from his small fat-encircled eyes.
The strains of the polonaise, which had continued for a considerable
The strange thought that of the thousands of men, young and old, who
The strangeness and absurdity of these replies arise from the fact
The stranger's face was not genial, it was even cold and severe, but
The stretchers moved on. At every jolt he again felt unendurable
The strict terms of the Sugar Act were strengthened by administrative
The strips are obtained from the front and lateral aspects of the thigh
The strips of epidermis wrinkle up on the knife and are directly
The struggle between the old views and the new was long and
The stupid smile, which had left his face while he was speaking,
The subject for history is not man's will itself but our
The subject which wholly engrossed Natasha's attention was her
The success of such legislation induced some students of industrial
The successful candidate, Adams, was not fitted by training or opinion
The sum of human wills produced the Revolution and Napoleon, and
The summons was a brief and urgent one.
The sun had by now risen and shone gaily on the bright verdure.
The sun had reached the other side of the house, and its slanting
The sun had risen brightly and its slanting rays struck straight
The sun had set long since. Bright stars shone out here and there in
The sun was only just appearing from behind the clouds, the air
The superintendent of police turned round at that moment with a
The superintendent of police, who had that morning by Count
The superintendent of police, whom the crowd had stopped, went in to
The suppuration is strictly localised to the part of the wound where
The surgeon and his assistants, including the anaesthetist, wear
The surgeon is called upon to treat two distinct classes of wounds: (1)
The swarm of Bronnitskis and Wintzingerodes and their like still
The swelling appears earlier and is more definite in superficial bones
The symptoms are those common to all contusions, and the patient
The symptoms of Natasha's illness were that she ate little, slept
The system, however, had its defenders. Representatives from South
The tactical rule that an army should act in masses when
The tall lad, standing in the porch, turned his bleared eyes from
The tall youth, not noticing the disappearance of his foe, waved his
The tariff, the currency, and internal improvements, with a magnificent
The tears flowed faster still from the countess' eyes. She took
The technique for cutis-grafting must be without a flaw, and the asepsis
The telegram which we eventually received came late one night just as I was thinking of turning in and Holmes was settling down to one of those all-night chemical researches which he frequently indulged in, when I would leave him stooping over a retort and a test-tube at night and find him in the same position when I came down to breakfast in the morning. He opened the yellow envelope, and then, glancing at the message, threw it across to me.
The temperature is moderately raised (100 o to 102 o F.), or may remain
The temperature is more easily disturbed in children than in adults, and
The temperature is raised; the pulse is small, rapid, and intermittent;
The temperature shown by the political thermometer to the company
The tendency toward moderate holdings, so favored by Western conditions,
The term _anaphylaxis_ is applied to an allied condition of
The term _arthritis ossificans_ has been applied by Joseph Griffiths to
The term _caries_ is employed to indicate any diseased process
The term _dry caries_ (_caries sicca_) is applied to that variety which
The term _empyema_ is sometimes employed to indicate that the cavity of
The term _external haemorrhage_ is employed when the blood escapes on the
The term _lymphangio-sarcoma_ is applied when the cells of the tumour
The term _rarefying ostitis_ is applied to any process that is attended
The term _sepsis_ as now used in clinical surgery no longer retains its
The term _trade epithelioma_ has been applied to that form met with in
The term haemophilia is applied to an inherited disease which renders the
The term neuralgia is applied clinically to any pain which follows the
The term sarcoma is applied to any connective-tissue tumour which
The term varix is applied to a condition in which veins are so altered
The terms _hydrops_, _hydrarthrosis_, and _chronic serous synovitis_ are
The terrible spectacle of the battlefield covered with dead and
The theory of the transference of the collective will of the
The theory of the transference of the will of the people to historic
The theory seems irrefutable just because the act of transference of
The thickened synovial membrane is projected into the cavity of the
The thin, hollow-cheeked Chekmar, having got everything ready,
The third and most incomprehensible thing is that people studying
The third company was the last, and Kutuzov pondered, apparently
The third consideration is the degree to which we apprehend that
The third interruption came when Prince Andrew was finishing his
The third order was: General Campan will move through the wood to
The third thing--what else was it you talked about?" and Prince Andrew
The third time the Rhetor came back more quickly and asked Pierre
The third treaty brought an end to fifty years of bargaining and the
The three soldiers were eating and talking among themselves, taking no
The three voices, hers, Mademoiselle Bourienne's, and Katie's, who
The tide of migration that set in toward the shores of North America
The time will come!"
The toxin acts principally on the nerve centres in the spinal medulla,
The traditional practice is to wait until the dead bone is entirely
The trajectory is practically flat up to 675 yards. In destructive
The transition from the solid to the liquefied stage is attended with
The traumatic or strain factor in the production of the disease may be
The traveler was Joseph Alexeevich Bazdeev, as Pierre saw from the
The treatment consists in applying a constriction band and making an
The treatment consists in removing the tumour by laparotomy.
The treatment is governed by the same principles as apply to the
The treatment is to remove the cyst. When it is impossible to remove the
The treatment of a recent haemorrhage consists in securing absolute rest
The treatment of cancer by other than operative methods has received a
The treatment of inflammation in special tissues and organs will be
The treatment of the complications of varix has already been considered.
The treatment of ulcers caused by _burns and scalds_ will be described
The treatment varies with the conditions present, and must include
The trees were dripping. Quiet talking was heard. The horses neighed
The tribunal of arbitration thus authorized sat at Geneva in
The triumph over Burgoyne was the work of other men; and his crushing
The troops again began to move, and two battalions of the Novgorod
The troops of the vanguard were stationed before Wischau, within
The troops retired from Vilna for various complicated reasons of
The troops were moving on, leaving about ten thousand wounded behind
The troops were running in such a dense mass that once surrounded by
The tuberculous diseases of bone result from infection of the marrow or
The tumour tissue may undergo necrosis, and when the overlying skin or
The turn in Republican affairs now convinced Mr. Bryan that the signs
The two Pavlograd squadrons were bivouacking on a field of rye,
The two Pavlograd squadrons, having crossed the bridge, retired up
The two bound men were led off to the master's house. The two
The two first were convicts with shaven heads. One was tall and
The two generals and the adjutant took hold of the field glass,
The two girls in their white dresses, each with a rose in her
The two remarkably pretty girls, Natasha and Sonya, with Count
The two tall peasants had their say. As soon as Rostov, followed
The two types may occur in combination.
The two young men, the student and the officer, friends from
The types of people were as various as the nations they represented.
The ulcer that forms in relation to callosities on the sole of the foot
The undecided question as to whether the wound inflicted at Borodino
The unexpected news of the French having crossed the Niemen was
The uninterested and perplexed faces of the marshals showed that
The unknown general looked disdainfully down at Kozlovski, who was
The unsolved problem that tormented him was caused by hints given by
The use of Scott's dressing and of blisters and of the actual cautery
The usual after-treatment must be persisted in until recovery ensues,
The usual phenomena are that the child ceases to thrive, becomes thin
The usual route through Moscow could not be thought of, and the
The usual symptoms of aneurysm are present, and the pressure effects on
The vaccine treatment has been successfully employed in various
The valet brought a woman's fox-lined cloak.
The valet sat up and whispered something. Timokhin, kept awake by
The valet, returning to the cottage, informed the count that
The varieties of cancer are distinguished according to the character and
The various wars with the French and the Indians, trivial in detail as
The verdict of the voters would seem to indicate that for the time
The very day that Napoleon issued the order to cross the Niemen, and
The very question that had formerly tormented him, the thing he
The vestibule was filled with the discordant sounds of a struggle
The vice-King will occupy the village and cross by its three
The vicomte appreciated this silent praise and smiling gratefully
The vicomte bowed and smiled courteously in token of his willingness
The vicomte merely shrugged his shoulders. Pierre looked solemnly at
The vicomte told his tale very neatly. It was an anecdote, then
The vicomte was a nice-looking young man with soft features and
The vicomte who was meeting him for the first time saw clearly
The vicomte wished to begin his story and gave a subtle smile.
The victorious huntsman rode off to join the field, and there,
The victory gained did not bring the usual results because the
The view of the strange city with its peculiar architecture, such as
The village elder, a peasant delegate, and the village clerk, who were
The virulence of the organisms, the loose, open nature of the tissues in
The virus exercises an injurious influence on the foetus, which in many
The virus of syphilis exerts a special influence upon the _Blood
The visitor made a gesture with her hand.
The visitor was Bitski, who served on various committees, frequented
The visitor, compelled to look on at this family scene, thought it
The visitor, not knowing what to say, shook her head.
The voices and footsteps of the many servants and of the peasants
The voices of those who counseled delay and advised waiting for
The voters of England had long been accustomed to share in taxation and
The wad of the cartridge behaves erratically: so long as it remains flat
The wagons that had reached the hussars had been consigned to an
The wall of _capillaries_ consists of a single layer of endothelial
The wall of the abscess is lined with tuberculous granulation tissue,
The war 1812, besides its national significance dear to every
The war proved to be their opportunity. With the break-up of the
The war was flaming up and nearing the Russian frontier.
The watchword is, stick together, right or wrong upon every question
The wattle wall the men had brought was set up in a semicircle by
The way to Iligin's upland was across the fields. The hunt
The weather was already growing wintry and morning frosts
The whole French army, and even Napoleon himself with his staff,
The whole army--French, Italian, German, Polish, and Dutch--hungry,
The whole battle consisted in what Orlov-Denisov's Cossacks had
The whole day had been hot. Somewhere a storm was gathering, but
The whole household, as if to atone for not having done it sooner,
The whole interest was concentrated on Rostov. Instead of sixteen
The whole length of the vein may be affected, but as a rule the disease
The whole moving mass began pressing closer together and a report
The whole purport of his remarks now was evidently to exalt
The whole summer, from spring sowing to harvest, he was busy with
The whole tenor of his thoughts instantaneously changed; the battle
The wind had fallen and black clouds, merging with the powder smoke,
The windows of the room in which she was lying looked westward.
The wolf paused, turned its heavy forehead toward the dogs
The women's vehicles drove by. Behind them came more carts,
The word of command rang out, and again the regiment quivered, as
The words chance and genius do not denote any really existing
The words were hardly out of his mouth before a man appeared at the door of the room, a very fat and burly man, with a heavy stick in his hand. Miss Hunter screamed and shrunk against the wall at the sight of him, but Sherlock Holmes sprang forward and confronted him.
The work of the official agencies for suppression of opposition was
The world will soon expect maturity from them. Their achievements will
The worse everything became, especially his own affairs, the
The wound must be purified in the usual way, and all instruments and
The wound should be dressed the next day, and the tube shortened, in the
The wounded man was shown his amputated leg stained with clotted
The writ of assistance had been used in Massachusetts in 1755 to prevent
The writ of assistance, which was a general search warrant issued to
The writers of universal histories and of the history of culture are
The year '87 furnished us with a long series of cases of greater or less interest, of which I retain the records. Among my headings under this one twelve months I find an account of the adventure of the Paradol Chamber, of the Amateur Mendicant Society, who held a luxurious club in the lower vault of a furniture warehouse, of the facts connected with the loss of the British barque Sophy Anderson, of the singular adventures of the Grice Patersons in the island of Uffa, and finally of the Camberwell poisoning case. In the latter, as may be remembered, Sherlock Holmes was able, by winding up the dead man's watch, to prove that it had been wound up two hours before, and that therefore the deceased had gone to bed within that time--a deduction which was of the greatest importance in clearing up the case. All these I may sketch out at some future date, but none of them present such singular features as the strange train of circumstances which I have now taken up my pen to describe.
The young Princess Bolkonskaya had brought some work in a
The young count paid no heed to them, but, breathing hard, passed by
The young fellow on the box jumped down to hold the horses and
The young man in his clattering chains stepped clumsily to the
The young man in the fur-lined coat, stooping a little, stood in a
The young man pulled his chair up and pushed his wet feet out towards the blaze.
The young man took from his waistcoat a crumpled envelope, and turning to the table he shook out upon it five little dried orange pips.
The young man, flattered, sat down nearer to her with a coquettish
The young officer standing in the gateway, as if hesitating
The young officer was evidently exercising his duties for the
The younger Emperor could not restrain his wish to be present at the
Their challenge to America brought forth the Monroe Doctrine. The powers
Their conversation was interrupted by the cries of several voices at
Their conversation would probably have been different but for the
Their defense was undertaken, in spite of the wrath of the populace, by
Their sabers catching in the bridles and their spurs jingling, the
Then all at once she remembered the tortures of suspense she had
Then arose in America the questions which had long perplexed the
Then he changed the spelling, substituting a z for the s and adding de
Then he recalled the coarseness and bluntness of her thoughts and
Then in sheer desperation the convention adjourned to meet later at
Then it was that the great state of California, on the very border of
Then she slipped down among the flowerpots on the other side of
Then suddenly he realized the joyful significance of that wail;
Then the Russian ambassador took him by the shoulder, led him to the
Then the crowd hastily retired from the drawing-room door, at which
Then the voice said something more, Demyan replied, and the steps in
Then two pairs of Frenchmen approached the criminals and at the
Then we are told of the greatness of soul of the marshals,
Then when the whole field was covered with smoke, two divisions,
Then with no less fear and delight they saw how the young count, red
Then with the unerring official memory that characterized him he
Then you married, my dear sir--took on yourself responsibility for the
Then, unexpectedly, as often happens, the sound of the hunt suddenly
Theodore Roosevelt, _America and the World War_.
Theodore Roosevelt, of New York. Profiting by the experience of Greeley
There are certain details making for success that merit attention: the
There are other groups of chronic inflammation, the origin of which
There are two bursae over the _great trochanter_, one superficial to, the
There are two methods of _removing the body_; the first and simpler
There are two sides to the life of every man, his individual life,
There being no urgency for the removal of the bullet, time should be
There is a constant loud bruit in the tumour, which greatly troubles the
There is a degree of uncertainty about the graft retaining its vitality
There is a natural hesitation to excise keloid because of the fear of
There is a strong and natural tendency on the part of writers to stress
There is a well known, so-called sophism of the ancients consisting in
There is ever a flaw, however, in the best laid of human plans, and the murderers of John Openshaw were never to receive the orange pips which would show them that another, as cunning and as resolute as themselves, was upon their track. Very long and very severe were the equinoctial gales that year. We waited long for news of the Lone Star of Savannah, but none ever reached us. We did at last hear that somewhere far out in the Atlantic a shattered stern-post of a boat was seen swinging in the trough of a wave, with the letters "L. S." carved upon it, and that is all which we shall ever know of the fate of the Lone Star.
There is evidence that a _mixed infection_--that is, the introduction of
There is evidence that the tendency to bleed is greater at certain times
There is excessive tenderness at the points of emergence of the
There is frequently a condition known as _snuffles_, in which the nasal
There is general agreement that the subjects of inherited syphilis
There is no doubt that all the British commanders were men of experience
There is no indication for removing the tumours unless for the deformity
There is no means of arresting the disease, and surgical treatment is
There is no redness or heat and no pain on movement. The peri-articular
There is nothing certain, nothing at all except the unimportance of
There is on the globe one single spot, the possessor of which is our
There is reason to believe that the organisms may lie in a dormant
There is sudden pain at the site of impaction of the embolus, and the
There is symmetrical enlargement and deformity of the hands and feet;
There is, of course, a ready answer to the criticism advanced above. It
There was a general movement as the princess, smiling and talking
There was a long silence, broken only by his heavy breathing and by the measured tapping of Sherlock Holmes' finger-tips upon the edge of the table. Then my friend rose and threw open the door.
There was a long silence, during which Holmes leaned his chin upon his hands and stared into the crackling fire.
There was a momentary pause in the conversation; the old general
There was a movement and an exclamation from my right, and peering through the gloom, I saw Whitney, pale, haggard, and unkempt, staring out at me.
There was a rapid patter of bare feet, and an unseen hand opened the
There was a rustling among the crowd and it again subsided, so
There was a stir among the officers in the shadow beyond the fire,
There was a stir among the throng of officers and in the ranks of
There was a stir in the next room and he heard the steps of Toll,
There was little difficulty in entering the grounds, for unrepaired breaches gaped in the old park wall. Making our way among the trees, we reached the lawn, crossed it, and were about to enter through the window when out from a clump of laurel bushes there darted what seemed to be a hideous and distorted child, who threw itself upon the grass with writhing limbs and then ran swiftly across the lawn into the darkness.
There was no laughter in the maids' large hall. In the men servants'
There was no rain, as Holmes had foretold, and the morning broke bright and cloudless. At nine o'clock Lestrade called for us with the carriage, and we set off for Hatherley Farm and the Boscombe Pool.
There was no wind. As he crossed the dam Prince Andrew smelled the
There was not a room to be had at the inn, they were all occupied.
There was nothing for the king to do but to make the best of the
There was nothing terrible in the one small, distant fire in the
There was now no one in the reception room except Prince Vasili
There was only one hut available for the regimental commander.
There was so much good nature and nobility (in the French sense of
There was still no improvement in the countess' health, but it was
There was the case, and of course there was but one way out of it. Might I not escort her to this place? And then, as a second thought, why should she come at all? I was Isa Whitney's medical adviser, and as such I had influence over him. I could manage it better if I were alone. I promised her on my word that I would send him home in a cab within two hours if he were indeed at the address which she had given me. And so in ten minutes I had left my armchair and cheery sitting-room behind me, and was speeding eastward in a hansom on a strange errand, as it seemed to me at the time, though the future only could show how strange it was to be.
There was, in the North, a steadily growing moral sentiment against the
There was, of course, another side to the picture. Many of the
There were in the room a child's cot, two boxes, two armchairs, a
There were many things Petya wanted to say to the drummer boy, but
There were only three tumblers, the water was so muddy that one
There were other complications no less specific. The United States was
There were other grounds for confidence. Having seized all of the
There were other indications of the drift. Large sums of money were
There were several people on the pavement at the time, but the greeting appeared to come from a slim youth in an ulster who had hurried by.
There were several prisoners from the French army in Orel, and the
There were three operating tables in the tent. Two were occupied,
There were, in the second place, economic reasons why slavery was
There's not half of it left. Yes, I told you--the whole quarter beyond
These are known as _opsonins_ or _alexins_, and they act on the bacteria
These are the subjects which belong to a history for civilians. These
These bells reminded Pierre that it was Sunday and the feast of the
These changes are well brought out in skiagrams; instead of the
These changes cause serious interference with the nutrition of the parts
These conditions of life had been the same before, but then they
These conditions will be described with the tissues and organs in which
These debts he proposed to add to the national debt. They were to be
These descriptions apply to the larger arteries of the extremities. A
These devices were prescribed "to restore the government to the people."
These dispositions, of which the French historians write with
These drastic operations on the part of military authorities, so foreign
These events right at our door could not fail to involve the government
These facts furnish us with indications as to the seat and method of
These first days, before the eighth of September when the
These gentlemen ride onto the bridge alone and wave white
These guests--the famous Count Rostopchin, Prince Lopukhin with
These justifications release those who produce the events from moral
These laws and agreements, however, did not remove all grounds for the
These methods are not suitable when the veins are brittle, when there
These naevi occur on any part of the body, but they are most frequently
These preparations are the most efficient therapeutic agents that have
These procedures may be carried out at the same time as the sequestrum
These puffs of smoke and (strange to say) the sound of
These questions, like questions put at trials generally, left the
These sores are most common about the hands, arms, neck, and feet, and
These symptoms are due, in the majority of cases, to an aneurysmal varix
These three groups traveling together--the cavalry stores, the
These visits of Natasha's at night before the count returned from
These were two Frenchmen who had been hiding in the forest. They
They again took him by the shoulders and laid him on the stretcher.
They all grew silent. The stars, as if knowing that no one was
They all knew very well that the enchanting countess' illness
They all raised their heads to listen, and out of the forest into
They all stared in timid bewilderment at the strange, long-haired
They all stood despondent and silent. The tall youth moved his
They are frequently the seat of pyogenic, tuberculous, and cancerous
They are met with in the mamma and in the salivary glands. Sebaceous
They are usually excited by some trivial cause, such as moving the jaws
They began a new civilization just as the immigrants to Virginia or
They compromise him and throw on him the responsibility for all that
They could travel and attend conferences and conventions. Throughout the
They crossed the ferry where he had talked with Pierre the year
They described the activity of individuals who ruled the people, and
They did not answer but began to laugh. Dimmler from the sleigh
They dismounted and entered the tent. Several officers, with flushed
They drove up to the gloomy old house on the Vozdvizhenka and
They entered the elegant, newly decorated, and luxurious dining
They entered the large hall, from which one of the doors led to
They gave the name of "The Revolution" to their paper, edited by
They got into the carriage and drove for a few minutes in silence.
They had an opportunity that day to send letters to the army, and
They had considered the federal offices, civil and military, as sources
They had decided to be at the ball by half past ten, and Natasha had
They had hardly begun to play before the doctor's disheveled head
They had not met for nearly half a year and, being at the age when
They had savagely criticized the Sedition law and Jefferson refused to
They laid off the ten states--the whole Confederacy with the exception
They learned also that America would then be alienated, fretful, and the
They likewise differed from the negro slaves in that their servitude had
They marched very quickly, without resting, and halted only when the
They named the colonel, Prince Repnin.
They never give rise to the classical symptoms associated with impaction
They now seemed to rotate on one spot. The historical figures at the
They occur on the fingers and hand as a result of certain occupations
They praised their own good works, as of old, in saving the union, and
They rode at a footpace to the barn, where a large crowd of peasants
They rode through the village of Rykonty, past tethered French
They rode up the opposite hill. From there the French could
They rose from the table and sat down in the entrance porch which
They say and write and print that the soul and freedom do not exist,
They seized Makar Alexeevich by the arms and dragged him to the
They shut the door and all sat down.
They split up the wood, pressed it down on the fire, blew at it with
They spoke of the countess' health, of their mutual friends, of
They stood silent, facing one another. The old man's sharp eyes were
They surrounded Ramballe, lifted him on the crossed arms of two
They tend further to depress the resisting power of the tissues, and
They then crossed the hollow to Semenovsk, where the soldiers were
They thus kept their households decently clad and the surplus of their
They told her where the barn was and how she should stand and
They unloaded the wardrobe cart and sent it to take wounded men from
They usually take the form of unilocular or multilocular cysts, the
They want the whole nation to fall on them--in a word, it's Moscow!
They went into the little room where Boris slept. Rostov, without
They went into the reception room familiar to Pierre, with two Italian
They went out and walked about till dinnertime, talking of the
They went through the porch and into the stable. The lieutenant
They went up to the door of the sitting room from which came the
They were all waiting for Bennigsen, who on the pretext of
They were cut off from the line of retreat on the left by the
They were howling there." (This meant that the she-wolf, about whom
They were sitting in the twilight by a window in the drawing room.
They were taken to the entrance and led into the house one by one.
They were the third couple. Boris, coolly looking at Helene's dazzling
They were to call for her at her house in the Taurida Gardens at ten
They, in Pierre's mind, were the soldiers, those who had been at the
Thiers, "the Cossack, seized by amazement, did not utter another word,
Things were not cheerful in the Rostovs' home.
Thirdly it was impossible, because the military term "to cut off"
Thirst is best met by giving small quantities of warm water by the
Thirty carts could not save all the wounded and in the general
Thirty-six members of the House of Representatives sought to put on
This Charter of the Northwest, so well planned by the Congress under the
This accomplished, it was necessary to decide just where the canal
This action was so unlike her usual composure and the fear
This amazing incident was followed shortly by the signature of a treaty
This amendment shall not be so construed as to effect the election or
This arrangement with the East India Company was obnoxious to the
This battle, which consisted in the capture of a French squadron,
This being the field marshal's frame of mind he was naturally
This campaign consisted in a flight of the French during which
This conception is the one handle by means of which the material
This condition may alternate with a gonorrhoeal affection of one of the
This contradiction arises from the fact that military science
This detachment halted at the outskirts of a forest, on the path
This difference between the two sections, early noted by close
This disposition on the left flank increased Pierre's doubt of his own
This door led into a back anteroom. An old man, a servant of the
This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere at no cost and with
This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere at no cost and with
This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere at no cost and with
This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere at no cost and with
This edition of the _Manual_ appears in three volumes; the first being
This feature of direct government, tried out first in the city of Los
This form is therefore most frequently met with on the face and neck in
This header should be the first thing seen when viewing this Project
This header should be the first thing seen when viewing this Project
This insolent attack upon the Mexican republic, deeply resented in the
This insult, coupled with the fact that French privateers, like the
This is best done after the manner suggested by Lister: the limb is held
This is done after the manner of chiropodists by digging out the corn
This is outrageous! Half the men have dispersed."
This is what the army authorities were reporting:
This letter had not yet been presented to the Emperor when
This letter was brought to Pierre's house when he was on the field
This man is still needed to justify the final collective act.
This man, bent double, rushed past the tradesman and the officer.
This may be demonstrated by flexing the thigh on the abdomen, the knee
This may be done bloodlessly by placing the patient on his back with the
This may be used as a type with which to compare the ulcers seen at the
This meant that Tikhon was not handing him the waistcoat he
This method is based on the fact that the long incubation period of the
This method is suitable to sacculated aneurysm of the limbs, so long as
This method of studying ulcers has the practical advantage that it
This mode of origin is illustrated by the development of dermoids from
This modern branch of mathematics, unknown to the ancients, when
This modification of the reparative process can be best studied
This new constitution, in form, was very much like the famous instrument
This new tissue is arranged in two layers--the outer composed of fully
This officer began visiting Pierre, and the princess used to make
This operation of primary suture yields the most satisfactory results,
This problem seemed to the ancients insoluble. The absurd answer (that
This provision having failed to accomplish its purpose, the fifteenth
This rare disease results from the lodgment of the embryos of the taenia
This relation of the commander to those he commands is just what
This relation of the men who command to those they command is what
This reply is quite satisfactory if we believe that the power was
This reply of Balashev's, which hinted at the recent defeats of
This silence was broken by one of the brethren, who led Pierre up to
This spite increased still more when, on calling over the roll of
This stage may be reached at the end of twenty-four hours, or not for
This takes place so slowly, however, that it necessitates the patient
This unpleasant impression merely flitted over the young and happy
This view was very general in the upper army circles and found
This was Raevski, who had spent the whole day at the most
This was done by the guerrillas in Spain, by the mountain tribes in
This was exactly the concession that the silver party wanted.
This was hardly accomplished before the people of Colorado to the
This was quite correct on the twenty-fourth of July. But on the
This was quite true, but the count, the countess, and Natasha looked
This was said by the undersized Napoleon, looking up straight into
This was the American Federation of Labor, a nation-wide union of
This was the Emperors' suites. The Emperors rode up to the flank,
This was the count's favorite dance, which he had danced in his
This was the icon that had been brought from and had since accompanied
This was the signal for a change on the part of Democratic leaders. They
This was the signal for the advocates of woman suffrage. In March, 1869,
This was true. The architect had told him that it was necessary, and
Thomas Paine never let his pen rest. He had been with the forces of
Those dreadful moments he had lived through at the executions had as
Those he wrote about Gerakov: 'Lectures for the corps inditing'...
Those sent to fetch the deputation had returned with the news that
Those situated in the neck are most liable to suppurate, probably
Those who attacked the old system of class rule found a strong moral
Those who journeyed through the country about the same time reported
Those who refused were promptly branded as outlaws, while some of the
Those who tried to understand the general course of events and to
Those who were in the dimly lit reception room spoke in nervous
Thou art the Lord and we are Thy people. Show Thy mercy upon us this
Thou gavest Moses the victory over Amalek, Gideon over Midian, and
Though Balashev was used to imperial pomp, he was amazed at the
Though Countess Mary told Natasha that those words in the Gospel
Though Garrison complained that "the apathy of the people is enough to
Though Kutuzov had dismissed all unnecessary men from the staff,
Though Pitt, the friend of America, was once more prime minister, and
Though Rostov told the governeor's wife that he would not make any
Though assailed in many ways and compelled to resort to war, the United
Though baffled by the "levelling principles" of the colonial assemblies,
Though by the twentieth of August nearly all the Rostovs'
Though he did not see why it was necessary for him to go to the
Though he saw French cannon and French troops on the Pratzen Heights
Though in 1850 the slave owners were only about three hundred and fifty
Though in Moscow the Rostovs belonged to the best society without
Though it was not clear what the artist meant to express by
Though none of the column commanders rode up to the ranks or
Though shells and bullets did not whistle over the road along
Though the Albany union failed, the document is still worthy of study
Though the Democrats, especially in the North, resented this policy and
Though the German fleet failed to come out and challenge the sea power
Though the book was unfair to the South and was denounced as a hideous
Though the labor of the colonists was mainly spent in farming, there was
Though the most absent-minded and forgetful of men, Pierre, with the
Though the new economic questions had been vigorously debated in many
Though the position was now altered by his decision to pay his
Though the small Swedish colony in Delaware was quickly submerged
Though the source of M. Michaud's chagrin must have been different
Though the surface of the sea of history seemed motionless, the
Though the troops were ill-clad, exhausted, and had lost a third of
Though the words of the order were not clear to the regimental
Though there are things in it difficult for the feeble human mind to
Though this plan had been drawn up on the supposition that Moscow
Though victorious in the election, the Republicans refrained from
Three days later the little princess was buried, and Prince Andrew
Three large rooms were assigned to them in the monastery hostelry,
Three other colonies, all of which retained their identity until the eve
Three separate books are used. First, there is the primary book, which
Three weeks after the last evening he had spent with the Rostovs,
Three years before, there had come to the throne George III, a young,
Thrombosis of the deep veins--in the leg, for example--may induce marked
Through news from the fur traders and missionaries, Eastern farmers
Through the cross streets of the Khamovniki quarter the prisoners
Through the door came the regular hum of a lathe. The princess
Through the door came the sounds of Kutuzov's voice, excited and
Through the gloom one could dimly catch a glimpse of bodies lying in strange fantastic poses, bowed shoulders, bent knees, heads thrown back, and chins pointing upward, with here and there a dark, lack-lustre eye turned upon the newcomer. Out of the black shadows there glimmered little red circles of light, now bright, now faint, as the burning poison waxed or waned in the bowls of the metal pipes. The most lay silent, but some muttered to themselves, and others talked together in a strange, low, monotonous voice, their conversation coming in gushes, and then suddenly tailing off into silence, each mumbling out his own thoughts and paying little heed to the words of his neighbour. At the farther end was a small brazier of burning charcoal, beside which on a three-legged wooden stool there sat a tall, thin old man, with his jaw resting upon his two fists, and his elbows upon his knees, staring into the fire.
Through the openings by which the leucocytes have escaped from the
Through the study door came the sound of slippered feet and the cry:
Throughout the entire span of service, however, Lincoln was beset by
Throwing off that guise in due time, he made the Archduke Maximilian, a
Thus a more democratic tone was given to the white society of the South.
Thus doubly armed, the military authorities spared no one suspected of
Thus in a time of trouble ever memorable to him after the birth of
Thus in the morning--especially if she had eaten anything rich the
Thus the captain touchingly recounted the story of his love for a
Thus the far country was brought near. The timid no longer hesitated at
Thus there was begun an adventure in popular government such as the
Thus, as the Southern statesman would have it, the North, in matters
Thus, said the Southern people, the moral judgment was fulfilled and the
Tikhon Shcherbaty was one of the most indispensable men in their
Tikhon Shcherbaty was the only man who dealt with such matters.
Tikhon followed behind and Petya heard the Cossacks laughing with
Tikhon scratched his back with one hand and his head with the other,
Tikhon to ask Mary Bogdanovna what news.--"Say only that 'the prince
Tikhon went and told the prince.
Tikhon, at her husband, and at the footman who accompanied them.
Tikhon, like all good valets, instinctively knew the direction of
Tikhon, wearing a wig, put his head out of the door of the
Till midday on the nineteenth, the activity--the eager talk, running
Till the Tsar reached it, each regiment in its silence and
Tilsit. Boris Drubetskoy had asked the important personage on whom
Timokhin crept along the bench to him.
Timokhin to the subaltern beside him.
Timokhin's company, which alone had maintained its order in the wood
Timokhin, the red-nosed major of Prince Andrew's regiment, had
Timokhin, who had not slept at all because of the pain in his leg, had
Timokhin--was lying in a corner on the benches beneath the icons,
Timokhin. "Who would spare himself now? The soldiers in my
Tinel's sign is present before voluntary movement, muscular tone, or the
Title: History of the United States
Title: The Adventures of Sherlock Holmes
To Sherlock Holmes she is always the woman. I have seldom heard him mention her under any other name. In his eyes she eclipses and predominates the whole of her sex. It was not that he felt any emotion akin to love for Irene Adler. All emotions, and that one particularly, were abhorrent to his cold, precise but admirably balanced mind. He was, I take it, the most perfect reasoning and observing machine that the world has seen, but as a lover he would have placed himself in a false position. He never spoke of the softer passions, save with a gibe and a sneer. They were admirable things for the observer--excellent for drawing the veil from men's motives and actions. But for the trained reasoner to admit such intrusions into his own delicate and finely adjusted temperament was to introduce a distracting factor which might throw a doubt upon all his mental results. Grit in a sensitive instrument, or a crack in one of his own high-power lenses, would not be more disturbing than a strong emotion in a nature such as his. And yet there was but one woman to him, and that woman was the late Irene Adler, of dubious and questionable memory.
To a herd of rams, the ram the herdsman drives each evening into a
To all the other prisoners Platon Karataev seemed a most ordinary
To allow the pus to escape, it is necessary, under local anaesthesia, to
To anyone who looks at the field of Borodino without thinking of how
To avoid unpleasant encounters with the old man, the natural
To conserve the patient's strength by preventing or diminishing the
To console Pierre for these losses the head steward gave him an
To create these eBooks, the Project expends considerable
To create these eBooks, the Project expends considerable
To distract his thoughts he drove that day to the village of
To enforce these intolerable acts the military arm of the British
To expiate his huntsman's offense, Ilagin pressed the Rostovs to
To explain the conditions of that relationship we must first
To extirpate the disease it is necessary to excise the tumour, with a
To facilitate primary union, all haemorrhage should be arrested, and the
To find component forces equal to the composite or resultant
To get a better view, several officer prisoners climbed onto the
To have observed the strict letter of the law would have defeated the
To have one's ear pulled by the Emperor was considered the
To imagine a man perfectly free and not subject to the law of
To learn more about the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation
To learn more about the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation
To my surprise the question provoked a burst of anger from the salesman.
To neutralise the toxins that have already reached the spinal cord, 5000
To obtain a reasonable prospect of cure, the _diagnosis_ must be made at
To please you..." said Prince Andrew. But immediately, noticing the
To prevent the occurrence of gangrene from frost-bite it is necessary to
To prolong human life and to alleviate suffering are the ultimate
To protect the Project Gutenberg-tm mission of promoting the free
To protect the Project Gutenberg-tm mission of promoting the free
To realize the degree of exhaustion of the Russian army it is only
To relieve the pain, warm fomentations or lead and opium lotion should
To seal forever the proclamation of emancipation, and to extend freedom
To solve the question of how freedom and necessity are combined
To some documents is given immortality. The Declaration of Independence
To study the laws of history we must completely change the subject
To such an extent had Natasha let herself go that the way she
To the Republicans this sharp and cavalier disposal of their plans,
To the draft of his first speech to Parliament, he added the popular
To the end, the Whigs regarded Tyler as a traitor to their cause; but
To the far North, Dartmouth, chartered in 1769, was designed first as a
To the left down below in the mist, the musketry fire of unseen
To the men of both sides alike, worn out by want of food and rest,
To the men who fought against the rising truths of physical
To the opening of the Far West also the Lake region was indebted for a
To the third party--in which the Emperor had most confidence-
To their contentions, Randolph of Virginia replied: "When the salvation
To them the words of Miloradovich seem very interesting, and so do
To these preventive measures the term _anoci-association_ has been
To this permanent tonic contraction of the muscles there are soon added
To this semicouncil had been invited the Swedish General Armfeldt,
To understand the laws of this continuous movement is the aim of
To withstand the pressure the external coat becomes thickened, and as
Today was a great day for him--the anniversary of his coronation.
Together with that sound came a solitary human cry from the gateway
Toll wrote a disposition: "The first column will march to so and
Toll, who had just arrived, sat down on this bench. In the foremost
Torzhok embroidery came into the room offering their services. Without
Torzhok post station, either there were no horses or the postmaster
Toward dusk the cannonade began to subside. Alpatych left the cellar
Toward evening Dolgorukov came back, went straight to the Tsar,
Toward four o'clock in the afternoon Murat's troops were entering
Toward midnight the voices began to subside, a cock crowed, the full
Toward nine o'clock in the morning, when the troops were already
Toward ten o'clock the men servants rushed to the front door,
Toward the end of 1806, when all the sad details of Napoleon's
Toward the end of the battle of Borodino, Pierre, having run down
Toward three o'clock the French attacks ceased. On the faces of
Towards adult life the spaces in a subcutaneous naevus may become greatly
Townshend revenue act a failure, repealed in 1770 all the duties except
Trade union standards were accepted by the government and generally
Traitors!" he thought, without clearly defining who the villains and
Transition forms between adenoma and carcinoma are also met with in the
Transplanted bone retains its vitality when embedded in the soft parts,
Transportation kept pace with industry. In 1860, the South had about ten
Transylvania Company, emulating the merchant adventurers of earlier
Treason proceeding from our over lenity and want of foresight." The
Treatment is conducted on the same lines as in transverse fracture of
Treatment is to be directed towards the primary disease in the joint, as
Tried for treason, Brown was condemned to death. The governor of
Trinity and the inspiration of the Scriptures. Massachusetts and
Trollope, who thought the English system of church and state was ideal,
Troops were still crowding at the Yauza bridge. It was hot. Kutuzov,
Tsar and the country? It is wartime. Such a fine fellow must serve.
Tsar's personal presence in Moscow--was suggested to the Emperor,
Tubercle Bacilli.#--The action of the bacilli on the tissues results in
Tuberculous disease in the _mesenteric_ and _bronchial glands_ is
Tuberculous infection of the lymph glands of the limb is exceptional,
Tuchkov's corps were stationed to defend the left flank.
Tuchkov, Bagration, and Kutaysov. In the Petersburg world this sad
Tuesdays and Saturdays at such distances from the town as to protect
Tumours of blood vessels may be divided, according to the nature of the
Tumours of the thyreoid, enlarged lymph glands, and fatty and
Turks--the crowd outside spread out and hawkers appeared, selling
Turning her mother's head this way and that, she fastened on the cap
Turning the horse sharply, he again jumped the ditch, and
Tushin told them to give the man some water. Then a cheerful soldier
Tushin turned round in dismay. It was the staff officer who had
Tushin's battery had been forgotten and only at the very end of
Tushin's guns had been intended to cannonade the valley, he was firing
Tutuila, which was ceded outright to the United States. Thus one of the
Twelve sharpshooters with muskets stepped out of the ranks with a
Two clinical types are recognised, one in which the disease progresses
Two days later, on the fifteenth of July, an immense number of
Two footmen, the princess' and his own, stood holding a shawl and
Two governesses were sitting with the Vogels at a table, on which
Two hours later the carts were standing in the courtyard of the
Two hours passed. Napoleon had lunched and was again standing in the
Two maids were turning up the hem and hurriedly biting off the ends of
Two months had elapsed since the news of the battle of Austerlitz
Two months previously when Pierre was already staying with the
Two of the enemy's shots had already flown across the bridge,
Two of the gazers went round to the other side of the coach and
Two of the troykas were the usual household sleighs, the third was
Two officers were standing on the knoll, directing the men. On
Two troykas were standing before the porch and two young drivers
Two types are met with--the pathological and the traumatic. It is
Two valets rapidly dressed His Majesty, and wearing the blue uniform
Two witnesses for the mock marriage--Khvostikov, a retired petty
Two women ran out after them, and all four, looking round at the
Two years later, the pioneers of Illinois, also settled upward from the
Tyler, ran current to reassure the doubtful. Finally, and this point
Ultimately new lymph channels are formed, so that at the end of from
Unable to sit still he paced up and down the room holding the letter
Unconvinced by the experience with the Stamp Act, Townshend brought
Undaunted by the misadventure in Caribbean policies, President Grant
Under certain conditions the dead part may undergo changes resembling
Under the date "5" was entered:
Under the influence of the wine he had drunk, and after the days
Under the influence of this feeling Sonya, whose life of dependence
Under the old law, the workman or his family had to bear the loss unless
Under these various conditions the formation of a thrombus is not
Understandable and touching as the look with which Natasha gazed
Undoubtedly a very considerable number could do so, for we can trace the
Undoubtedly thousands of their passengers were Irish of the native
Unexpectedly, in the middle of the service, and not in the usual
Unfortunately for them, however, the fertile valleys of the Mississippi
Union Pacific Company alone secured from the federal government a free
Union follow its citizens and its banner protects them even within the
Union; but no new State shall be formed or erected within the
United States Bank established in that state. In the same year, in the
United States Bank was authorized by the Constitution. Marshall answered
United States Bank. The Democrats stormed at him for refusing, until
United States History, 1776-1761_". Research shows the document does
United States Senators, and the short ballot. It favored a program of
United States and before the same shall take effect, shall be approved
United States are insurrectionary or revolutionary. This was the system
United States had to make all needful rules for the government of the
United States in the City of New York in sums of not less than fifty
United States of America, proposed by Congress, and ratified by the
United States of America. He shall hold his office during the term of
United States or either House of Congress, or the President of the
United States placed little reliance upon the frail reed of peace
United States the truth of the case.... The catchwords, the cries, the
United States to cut a canal through its territory. The treaty was
United States were in some positive way dependent upon the operations of
United States, cut off from English manufactures as during the
United States, than according to the rules of the common law.
United States, which shall have been created, or the emoluments whereof
United States. As an agricultural country, the ruin of its commerce was
United States. Mexico then sought to close the flood gates. It stopped
United States. This was the revolutionary government set up within the
United States." He had belabored the Federalists for piling up a big
United States_, Vol. VI, pp. 251-270. Woodrow Wilson, _History of the
University, chartered by King George II in 1754, on an appeal from the
Unlike steamship companies stimulating immigration to get the fares,
Unlike the Scotch-Irish, the Germans did not speak the language of the
Unlike the other forms of naevi, the cutaneous variety shows little
Unobservant as was the little princess, these tears, the cause of
Until then the leadership by men of "wealth and talents" had been
Unwilling to obtrude himself on the princess, Rostov did not go back
Updated editions will replace the previous one--the old editions
Updated editions will replace the previous one--the old editions
Upon local organizations similar in character to the Boston committee
V.	The Five Orange Pips
VI.	The Man with the Twisted Lip
VII.	The Adventure of the Blue Carbuncle
VII.  THE ADVENTURE OF THE BLUE CARBUNCLE
VIII, pp. 1-55; Elson, _History of the United States_, pp. 540-548.
VIII.	The Adventure of the Speckled Band
VIII.  THE ADVENTURE OF THE SPECKLED BAND
VIRGINIANS DEFENDING THEMSELVES AGAINST THE INDIANS]
Vaccines may be given a trial. The diet should be liberal and easily
Valley did the king of England give Connecticut a charter of its own
Valley, and it became all the more precious when the opening of the
Van Buren braved the storm, offering no measure of reform or assistance
Vancouver Island. Polk speedily chose this way out of the dilemma.
Varicose veins in immediate relation to the base of a large chronic
Various degrees of the conditions are met with; in the severe forms,
Various forms of fibroma are met with in the mamma and are described
Various groups of people formed and dissolved, the coming formation
Vasili and the old count had turned upon the Italian, but the latter
Vasili's face, serious for an instant at the sight of her, but
Vasili's valet, who made her a low bow when she met him in the
Vasili's visit, he was in a bad temper, and in the morning Tikhon
Vasili, who had grown thinner and paler during the last few days,
Vasilyevich Rostopchin was sacrificing himself for the public good)
Veins are subject to the same forms of injury as arteries, and the
Vera Cruz and the occupation of the city. A clash of arms followed in
Vera. "You came rushing into the drawing room so that everyone felt
Vereshchagin were unable to kill him, for the crowd pressed from all
Vereshchagin, is the scoundrel by whose doing Moscow is perishing."
Vereshchagin. Perhaps you have heard of that affair with the
Vermont was held at Hartford, on the call of Massachusetts. The counsels
Very early regular traffic sprang up between the Pacific ports and the
Vessels_, exciting a proliferation of the endothelial lining which
Veterinary surgeons attach great importance to the mallein test as a
Vice-President of the United States, representatives in Congress, the
Vice-President, and of the number of votes for each, which lists they
Vienna bridge in the hands of the French without a fight led Murat
Viflyanka, was led by the groom in attendance on him, while the
Vilna by the fact that Kutuzov evidently could not or would not
Vincent, the boy's name, had already been changed by the Cossacks
Virgin illuminated by the candles burning before it and by the morning
Virginia aristocracy. They controlled the vestries and the ministers,
Virginia executing her deed of cession on March 1, 1784. In the fourth
Virginia nor the Puritans of Massachusetts believed in toleration for
Virginia turned a deaf ear to pleas for clemency based on the ground
Virginia which Congress admitted to the union in 1863. In May, North
Virginia, Connecticut, and Massachusetts had conflicting claims to the
Virginia, Delaware, and Rhode Island, clung firmly to the ancient
Virginia, it is true, had capital far in excess of the banks of the
Virginia, no less than Massachusetts, was aware of the importance of
Virginia. "How do the principles thus proclaimed," asked the
Virginia. The Eastern Federalists resented her intrusion; but they took
Vistula. The Turks will be of no use to you; they are worth nothing
Vitebsk with orders to advance at a trot along the road.
Vladimirovich Bezukhov's house. "My dear Boris," said the mother,
Vogel the dancing master and his family, Belova, an old maiden lady,
Vol. I, pp. 147-197. Elson, _History of the United States_, pp. 250-254.
Vol. II, pp. 195-299. Elson, _History of the United States_, pp.
Volunteers and financial support to provide volunteers with the
Volunteers and financial support to provide volunteers with the
Vorontsovo to see the great balloon Leppich was constructing to
Vyazma, from Vyazma to Smolensk, from Smolensk to the Berezina, and
Vyazma, nor the Krasnoe battles were necessary; that we must keep some
Vyazma, that Count Wittgenstein had defeated the French, but that as
Vyazmitinov, the new military governor general of Petersburg, had
W. Sumner, _The Financier and the Finances of the American Revolution_.
W.E. Dodd, _Statesmen of the Old South_.
W.F. Willoughby, _Territories and Dependencies of the United States_
W.H. Sylvis of the iron molders. The purpose of the National Labor Union
Wabash Valley on the west was fairly settled, a clamor went up for
War Department, and Edmund Randolph, the Attorney-General, were likewise
War and the Revolution_, Chaps. VI-IX. Parkman, _Montcalm and Wolfe_,
War engaged the energies and labors of the nation. Northern women became
War on both of them was out of the question. War on France was
War with its condition at the close of the Revolutionary War.
Warmed by the spring sunshine he sat in the caleche looking at the
Warsaw, all the world's capitals.... We are feared, but we are
Washington and Jefferson were by no means approved; and the drift of
Washington at Valley Forge, and day after day drilled and manoeuvered the
Washington had been able, by the exercise of great tact, to secure from
Washington in the form of demands for the federal regulation of
Washington made public the first of three famous notes on the
Washington under the auspices of the Department of the Interior. All
Washington was the soul of the American cause. Washington was the
Washington, "afford too many melancholy proofs of the decay of public
Washington, "requires time.... To expect the same service from raw and
Washington, civil service reformers carried their agitation into the
Washington, showing that the new America in the West was peopled and led
Washington, the Anti-Federalists cast off all restraints. In honor of
Washington, who was chosen president of the convention; diplomacy in
Washington. In the fine enthusiasm that accompanied the declaration of
Washington. The expected happened.
Water power sites on the public domain were leased for a term of years
We are constantly working on finishing the paperwork to legally
We are constantly working on finishing the paperwork to legally
We are here concerned with varix as it occurs in the veins of the lower
We are just going to the left flank. Then when we get back, do spend
We both put our eyes to the grating. The prisoner lay with his face towards us, in a very deep sleep, breathing slowly and heavily. He was a middle-sized man, coarsely clad as became his calling, with a coloured shirt protruding through the rent in his tattered coat. He was, as the inspector had said, extremely dirty, but the grime which covered his face could not conceal its repulsive ugliness. A broad wheal from an old scar ran right across it from eye to chin, and by its contraction had turned up one side of the upper lip, so that three teeth were exposed in a perpetual snarl. A shock of very bright red hair grew low over his eyes and forehead.
We both sat in silence for some little time after listening to this extraordinary narrative. Then Sherlock Holmes pulled down from the shelf one of the ponderous commonplace books in which he placed his cuttings.
We can understand that the matter seemed like that to
We got off, paid our fare, and the trap rattled back on its way to Leatherhead.
We had pulled up in front of a large villa which stood within its own grounds. A stable-boy had run out to the horse's head, and springing down, I followed Holmes up the small, winding gravel-drive which led to the house. As we approached, the door flew open, and a little blonde woman stood in the opening, clad in some sort of light mousseline de soie, with a touch of fluffy pink chiffon at her neck and wrists. She stood with her figure outlined against the flood of light, one hand upon the door, one half-raised in her eagerness, her body slightly bent, her head and face protruded, with eager eyes and parted lips, a standing question.
We had reached Baker Street and had stopped at the door. He was searching his pockets for the key when someone passing said:
We had reached the same crowded thoroughfare in which we had found ourselves in the morning. Our cabs were dismissed, and, following the guidance of Mr. Merryweather, we passed down a narrow passage and through a side door, which he opened for us. Within there was a small corridor, which ended in a very massive iron gate. This also was opened, and led down a flight of winding stone steps, which terminated at another formidable gate. Mr. Merryweather stopped to light a lantern, and then conducted us down a dark, earth-smelling passage, and so, after opening a third door, into a huge vault or cellar, which was piled all round with crates and massive boxes.
We had the carriage to ourselves save for an immense litter of papers which Holmes had brought with him. Among these he rummaged and read, with intervals of note-taking and of meditation, until we were past Reading. Then he suddenly rolled them all into a gigantic ball and tossed them up onto the rack.
We have chiefly observed it in the femoral glands as a result of
We have filed in all 50 states now, but these are the only ones
We have filed in all 50 states now, but these are the only ones
We have found the following method satisfactory in out-patient
We have here to consider under the terms Sapraemia, Septicaemia, and
We have once more to express our thanks to colleagues in the Edinburgh
We have retained the Basle anatomical nomenclature, as extended
We heard the door open, a few hurried words, and then quick steps upon the linoleum. Our own door flew open, and a lady, clad in some dark-coloured stuff, with a black veil, entered the room.
We know that man has the faculty of becoming completely absorbed
We made our way downstairs as quietly as possible, and out into the bright morning sunshine. In the road stood our horse and trap, with the half-clad stable-boy waiting at the head. We both sprang in, and away we dashed down the London Road. A few country carts were stirring, bearing in vegetables to the metropolis, but the lines of villas on either side were as silent and lifeless as some city in a dream.
We need only confess that we do not know the purpose of the European
We passed across Holborn, down Endell Street, and so through a zigzag of slums to Covent Garden Market. One of the largest stalls bore the name of Breckinridge upon it, and the proprietor a horsey-looking man, with a sharp face and trim side-whiskers was helping a boy to put up the shutters.
We passed up the stair, unlocked the door, followed on down a passage, and found ourselves in front of the barricade which Miss Hunter had described. Holmes cut the cord and removed the transverse bar. Then he tried the various keys in the lock, but without success. No sound came from within, and at the silence Holmes' face clouded over.
We produce about two million dollars for each hour we work.  The
We produce about two million dollars for each hour we work.  The
We see the same if we watch moment by moment the movement of
We the people of the United States, in order to form a more
We travelled by the Underground as far as Aldersgate; and a short walk took us to Saxe-Coburg Square, the scene of the singular story which we had listened to in the morning. It was a poky, little, shabby-genteel place, where four lines of dingy two-storied brick houses looked out into a small railed-in enclosure, where a lawn of weedy grass and a few clumps of faded laurel bushes made a hard fight against a smoke-laden and uncongenial atmosphere. Three gilt balls and a brown board with "JABEZ WILSON" in white letters, upon a corner house, announced the place where our red-headed client carried on his business. Sherlock Holmes stopped in front of it with his head on one side and looked it all over, with his eyes shining brightly between puckered lids. Then he walked slowly up the street, and then down again to the corner, still looking keenly at the houses. Finally he returned to the pawnbroker's, and, having thumped vigorously upon the pavement with his stick two or three times, he went up to the door and knocked. It was instantly opened by a bright-looking, clean-shaven young fellow, who asked him to step in.
We were as good as our word, for it was just seven when we reached the Copper Beeches, having put up our trap at a wayside public-house. The group of trees, with their dark leaves shining like burnished metal in the light of the setting sun, were sufficient to mark the house even had Miss Hunter not been standing smiling on the door-step.
We were seated at breakfast one morning, my wife and I, when the maid brought in a telegram. It was from Sherlock Holmes and ran in this way:
Weakness of the heart, as indicated by the condition of the pulse, is
Webster learned in the schools.
Webster might well have gasped with astonishment. After the war was over
Webster said on more than one occasion, "lay the true basis, most
Webster, in his notable "Seventh of March speech," condemned the Wilmot
Webster, in the prime of his manhood, and John Adams, in the closing
Wednesday the count went with the prospective purchaser to his
Well, are you off to the front?"
Well, you have cheered us up! Nikita and Vanya--clear away the tables!
West Show, he increased it to a fortune which he devoted mainly to the
West and South rather than to cut directly between the two parties.
West, George Rogers Clark, by his famous march into the Illinois
West, approved its spirit, and sought to bring the two sections together
West, aroused the ire of the seaboard Federalists. Some denounced it as
West, opened their doors to women, and women were received into the
West, railways usually preceded the people. Railway builders planned
West--wheat, corn, bacon, hemp, cattle, and tobacco--was bulky and the
West. At all events the Greenback vote fell to about 300,000 in the
West. Marquette and Joliet, who opened the Lake region, and La Salle,
Western immigrants. The forests fell before the ax like grain before the
Western lumber mills, for example, all the employees were invited to
Weyrother's name, or even the term "dispositions."
Weyrother, and the members of the council of war. They were drinking
Weyrother, hurriedly rising from his seat and going up to the table on
Weyrother, who was in full control of the proposed battle, by his
What "still the same" might mean Princess Mary did not ask, but with
What Pierre did not know was that the place where they presented him
What Russian, reading the account of the last part of the campaign
What a time it seemed! From comparing notes afterwards it was but an hour and a quarter, yet it appeared to me that the night must have almost gone, and the dawn be breaking above us. My limbs were weary and stiff, for I feared to change my position; yet my nerves were worked up to the highest pitch of tension, and my hearing was so acute that I could not only hear the gentle breathing of my companions, but I could distinguish the deeper, heavier in-breath of the bulky Jones from the thin, sighing note of the bank director. From my position I could look over the case in the direction of the floor. Suddenly my eyes caught the glint of a light.
What causes historical events? Power. What is power? Power is the
What does this mean? If it were an example taken from the history of
What exactitude, what minuteness, what knowledge of the locality, what
What force moves the nations?
What she drew from the guitar would have had no meaning for other
What was needed for him who, overshadowing others, stood at the head
What would Sonya and the count and countess have done, how would
What would Sonya have done without the glad consciousness that she
What?... Cut them down! What?..." said Rostov, waking up. At the
Whatever happens and whoever may stand at the head of affairs, the
Whatever he does succeeds. The plague does not touch him. The
Whatever presentation of the activity of many men or of an
Whatever the President's personal feelings may have been, he was aware
Whatever the motive for their coming, however, they managed to get
Whatever the nature of the weapon concerned, the wound is of the
Whatever we may say about the soul going to the sky... we know there
When Anna Mikhaylovna returned from Count Bezukhov's the money,
When Boris and Anna Pavlovna returned to the others Prince Hippolyte
When Boris, who was to be served up to the guests, entered the
When Ermolov, having been sent by Kutuzov to inspect the position,
When Eykhen, the officer of the general staff whom he had summoned,
When Gabriel came to inform her that the men who had come had run
When Hill got his people on the land, he took an interest in everything
When I glance over my notes and records of the Sherlock Holmes cases between the years '82 and '90, I am faced by so many which present strange and interesting features that it is no easy matter to know which to choose and which to leave. Some, however, have already gained publicity through the papers, and others have not offered a field for those peculiar qualities which my friend possessed in so high a degree, and which it is the object of these papers to illustrate. Some, too, have baffled his analytical skill, and would be, as narratives, beginnings without an ending, while others have been but partially cleared up, and have their explanations founded rather upon conjecture and surmise than on that absolute logical proof which was so dear to him. There is, however, one of these last which was so remarkable in its details and so startling in its results that I am tempted to give some account of it in spite of the fact that there are points in connection with it which never have been, and probably never will be, entirely cleared up.
When Jackson took the oath of office on March 4, 1829, the government of
When Kutuzov came out of the study and with lowered head was
When Kutuzov was informed that at the French rear--where according
When Michael Ivanovich returned to the study with the letter, the
When Michael Ivanovich went in there were tears in the prince's eyes
When Napoleon came out of the tent the shouting of the Guards before
When Napoleon, having finished speaking, looked inquiringly at the
When Natasha left the room Pierre's confusion and awkwardness
When Natasha ran out of the drawing room she only went as far as the
When Nicholas and his wife came to look for Pierre he was in the
When Pierre and his wife entered the drawing room the countess was
When Pierre had gone and the members of the household met
When Prince Andrew entered the study the old man in his old-age
When Prince Andrew left the palace he felt that all the interest and
When Prince Andrew reached the room prepared for him and lay down in
When Prince Vasili returned to the drawing room, the princess, his
When Princess Mary heard from Nicholas that her brother was with the
When Princess Mary returned from her father, the little princess sat
When Princess Mary went to him at the usual hour he was working at
When Rostov entered the room, the princess dropped her eyes for an
When Scherbinin came galloping from the left flank with news that
When _pathological fracture_ of the shaft occurs, as it may do, from
When a large arterial trunk, such as the external iliac, the femoral,
When a lesion of the plexus complicates a _fracture of the clavicle_,
When a nerve-trunk, such as the sciatic, is involved in cicatricial
When a vein is merely punctured, the bleeding may be arrested by
When all was ready, the sabers stuck in the snow to mark the
When alone with the field marshal the Emperor expressed his
When an _artery and vein are simultaneously wounded_, the features
When an _imperfect nerve supply_ is the main factor underlying ulcer
When aseptic, a thrombus may become detached and be carried off in the
When bony ankylosis has occurred with the joint in an undesirable
When campaigning, Rostov allowed himself the indulgence of riding
When conservative measures fail, excision of the affected sheath should
When convalescence is established, attention is directed to the
When dealing with the affairs and papers of his dead wife, her
When deformities are already present, the treatment depends upon whether
When digital compression is not available, the most convenient and
When everybody rose to go, Helene who had spoken very little all the
When extravasation has already taken place, massage is the most speedy
When foci of suppuration have been scattered up and down the medullary
When from neglect and want of cleanliness the ulcer becomes inflamed,
When gangrene occurs from such causes, it tends to be of the moist type.
When halfway home Nicholas handed the reins to the coachman and
When he awoke next morning the major-domo came to inform him that
When he came level with the Foot Guards he noticed that about them
When he came to himself he was sitting on the ground leaning on
When he entered the private room Count Rostopchin, puckering his
When he had ascended the hill and reached the little village street,
When he had dismissed the generals Kutuzov sat a long time with
When he had finished the Litany the deacon crossed the stole over
When he had gone less than half a mile in the rear of the column
When he had parted from Malvintseva Nicholas wished to return to the
When he had reached this point, Pierre asked the captain whether
When he had reported himself to the commander of the regiment and
When he heard these words and saw the expression of firm
When he met her again in Voronezh the impression she made on him was
When he noticed in Balashev's face the disagreeable impression
When he opened the ballroom door Pierre saw Natasha sitting at the
When he ran his mind over the whole of this strange Russian campaign
When he reached Kiev he sent for all his stewards to the head office
When he read that sentence, Pierre felt for the first time that some
When he received the news of the battle of Borodino and the
When he returned to the room Pierre was sitting in the same place as
When he woke up on the morning after his return to Moscow and his
When her carriage drove out of the house, he mounted and accompanied
When hyperostosis and sclerosis of the bone is attended with severe pain
When infected with pyogenic bacteria, the thrombus becomes converted
When intubation is impracticable, the operation of tracheotomy is
When it is decided to make the attempt to save the limb, the wound must
When it is impossible to stretch the very elastic threads of
When it is injured _at or above the elbow_, there is paralysis of the
When it occurs in the _limbs_, attention is usually directed to the fact
When it was late at night they went out together into the street.
When it was suggested to him that he should enter the civil service,
When les enfants du Don might so easily have taken the Emperor
When long continued it is liable to interfere with the development of
When on the first day he got up early, went out of the shed at dawn,
When on the following morning the Emperor said to the officers
When on the twenty-first of October his general expressed a wish
When pus has formed in deeper parts, and before it has reached the
When returning from his leave, Rostov felt, for the first time,
When she began to tell him that all this had happened the day
When she had completed the tour of the garden, which brought her
When she saw the count, she stretched out her arms to him,
When situated over one of the hernial openings, it closely simulates a
When suppuration occurs, the vessel wall becomes disintegrated and gives
When syphilis occurs in a _pregnant woman_, she should be given in the
When that door was opened and the prisoners, crowding against one
When the Emperor had passed nearly all the regiments, the troops
When the French officer went into the room with Pierre the latter
When the Germans launched their grand drives toward the Marne and Paris,
When the Military Governor had gone, Prince Vasili sat down all
When the Revolution opened, there were thirteen little treasuries in
When the _axillary artery_ is the seat of embolic impaction, and
When the _joint is infected through an external wound_, the anatomical
When the _supra-scapular nerve_ is contused or stretched in injuries of
When the abscess develops slowly, the condition resembles tuberculous
When the adjutant reminded him of the prisoner, he jerked his head
When the armed conflict was closed, one in diplomacy opened. The
When the blister forms near the tip of the finger, the pus burrows under
When the body, washed and dressed, lay in the coffin on a table,
When the boy had entered the hut, Petya sat down at a distance
When the bullet perforates, the exit wound is usually larger and more
When the charge impinges on one of the extremities at close range, we
When the charge impinges over one of the large cavities of the body, the
When the commissionaire had gone, Holmes took up the stone and held it against the light. "It's a bonny thing," said he. "Just see how it glints and sparkles. Of course it is a nucleus and focus of crime. Every good stone is. They are the devil's pet baits. In the larger and older jewels every facet may stand for a bloody deed. This stone is not yet twenty years old. It was found in the banks of the Amoy River in southern China and is remarkable in having every characteristic of the carbuncle, save that it is blue in shade instead of ruby red. In spite of its youth, it has already a sinister history. There have been two murders, a vitriol-throwing, a suicide, and several robberies brought about for the sake of this forty-grain weight of crystallised charcoal. Who would think that so pretty a toy would be a purveyor to the gallows and the prison? I'll lock it up in my strong box now and drop a line to the Countess to say that we have it."
When the condition has resulted from the prolonged use of moist
When the cotillion was over the old count in his blue coat came up
When the count came to see her she turned anxiously round at the
When the count returned, Natasha was impolitely pleased and hastened
When the crowd collected round him he seemed confused, but at the
When the deep veins--iliac, femoral, popliteal--are involved, there is
When the disease commences in the pre-auricular or submaxillary glands,
When the eager but misrepeated words had reached their destination
When the fat lodges in the capillaries of the brain, the pulse becomes
When the fit of laughter that had seized him at Tikhon's words and
When the flame of the sulphur splinters kindled by the tinder burned
When the full measure of honor is given to the soldiers and sailors and
When the gangrene is limited to the toes in old and feeble patients,
When the grafts have healed, it is well to protect them from injury and
When the hour for redemption arrived, the Treasury was prepared with a
When the injured person's mind is absorbed with other matters than his
When the injury proves fatal during this period, death is due to shock,
When the intra-venous method is not available, one or two pints of
When the joint is infected by extension from the surrounding cellular
When the land was all gone, American economic conditions inevitably
When the last convulsions of the body, which the spirit was leaving,
When the legs are affected the patient may be unable to walk, and the
When the limb is oedematous, the outline of the veins is obscured, but
When the main incidence of the infection affects the synovial membrane,
When the monotonous sound of Weyrother's voice ceased, Kutuzov
When the muscles of the back become spasmodically contracted, the body
When the music began Natasha came in and walking straight up to Pierre
When the mutton and an omelet had been served and a samovar and
When the necessary number of copies of the dispositions had been
When the nerve is _divided at the wrist_, the adjacent tendons are also
When the nerve is divided, the most obvious result is "drop-foot"; the
When the nerves in a stump have not been cut sufficiently short, they
When the neuralgia involves branches of two or of all three trunks, or
When the news reached him that the American flag had been substituted
When the officers had emptied and smashed their glasses, Kirsten
When the palm is invaded there may be marked oedema of the back of the
When the pit had been filled up a command was given. Pierre was
When the presidential campaign of 1856 began the Republicans entered the
When the princess came out of the countess' room Nicholas met her
When the prisoners again went forward Pierre looked round.
When the reading of Denisov's virulent reply, which took more than
When the reading which lasted more than an hour was over, Langeron
When the review was over, the newly arrived officers, and also
When the second act was over Countess Bezukhova rose, turned to
When the service was over, Kutuzov stepped up to the icon, sank
When the ship moves in one direction there is one and the same
When the shot have diverged so as to strike singly, they seldom do much
When the skin over the abscess is red, thin, and about to give way, as
When the slough is finally thrown off, a deep gap is left, which takes a
When the sun had entirely emerged from the fog, and fields and
When the tension caused by the extravasated blood threatens the vitality
When the thoracic muscles, including the diaphragm, are thrown into
When the tibial vessels can be felt pulsating at the ankle it may be
When the times comes to set to work I shall do it as no one else
When the treaty reached America the people were surprised to find that
When the troops reached their night's halting place on the eighth of
When the twenty minutes had elapsed and the time had come for the
When the ulcer has assumed the characters of a healing sore, skin-grafts
When the ulcer has healed it leaves a scar which is depressed, and if
When the voices subsided, the footmen cleared away the broken glass
When the war came down upon the country, women helped in every field. In
When the wound is healed and while waiting for the restoration of
When there is actual destruction of tissue and ulceration--the so-called
When there is any difficulty in bringing the edges of the wound into
When there is marked rarefaction of the bone at the ossifying junction,
When there is much connective tissue formed in relation to the synovial
When there is widespread suppuration in the marrow, and the shaft is
When these measures are successful, dry gangrene ensues. The raw surface
When they began to blindfold him he himself adjusted the knot
When they came out onto the beaten highroad--polished by sleigh
When they had all been brought for the night to a large house on the
When they had been announced a perturbation was noticeable among the
When they had crossed the Crimean bridge the prisoners moved a few
When they had emptied the samovar, Rostov took a pack of cards and
When they had gone by, the same stream of soldiers followed, with
When they prayed for the warriors, she thought of her brother and
When they reached a gravel path behind the house the Frenchman
When they reached the Myasnitski Street and could no longer hear the
When they went into the drawing room where coffee was served, the
When they were out of the village they began talking again as loud
When vacancies happen in the representation of any State in the Senate,
When victory crowned the arms of the powers united against Germany,
When was that done which settled the matter? And who was to blame
When we do not at all understand the cause of an action, whether a
When, a few years later, Mississippi and Alabama knocked at the doors of
When, a generation afterward, the Stars and Stripes supplanted the Union
When, at the end of three weeks, the danger of embolism is past,
When, for example, a vessel is only partly divided, the contraction and
When, having bought the coat merely with the object of taking part
When, however, the incision in the vessel wall is oblique or transverse,
When, on March 21, a commission of inquiry reported that the ill-fated
When, waking in a cold perspiration, he moved on the divan,
Whence came thy conception of the existence of such an
Whenever I see the movement of a locomotive I hear the whistle and
Whenever any employee had a grievance he took it up with the foreman
Where am I to go?" thought Nicholas, and went again into the dancing
Wherever the synovial tissue covers the cartilage it becomes adherent to
Whether he noticed the look of terror with which Pierre regarded
Whether it was the wine he had drunk, or an impulse of frankness, or
Whether the theory was sound or not, Southern statesmen believed it and
Whether they were playing the ring and string game or the ruble game
Whether we speak of the migration of the peoples and the
Whether we turn to the life of Franklin in the North or Washington in
Whig aristocrats as "seditious, factious and republican." Yet the
Whig," was put forward as the Whig candidate for President. He himself
Whigs of Massachusetts and Pennsylvania stare in wonderment. The demands
Whigs railed at him because he would not approve the founding of another
While Denisov was talking to the esaul, Petya--abashed by
While Kutuzov was talking to Raevski and dictating the order of
While Mavra Kuzminichna was running to her room the officer walked
While Pierre was running the few steps that separated him from the
While Pierre, standing in the middle of the room, was talking to
While Prince Andrew went to report about the purple-faced general,
While Sherlock Holmes had been detailing this singular series of events, we had been whirling through the outskirts of the great town until the last straggling houses had been left behind, and we rattled along with a country hedge upon either side of us. Just as he finished, however, we drove through two scattered villages, where a few lights still glimmered in the windows.
While a footman was lighting a candle, Toll communicated the
While declaring that employers and employees had much in common, the
While disputes and intrigues were going on about the future field of
While father and son were having their explanation, the mother and
While imprisoned in the shed Pierre had learned not with his
While in the Rostovs' ballroom the sixth anglaise was being
While it is true that in many of these patients the operation is borne
While listening to the officer's report Konovnitsyn broke the seal
While still a few steps from the officer she unfolded the kerchief and
While still in the anteroom Prince Andrew heard loud voices and a
While the Emperor had still been at Vilna, the forces had been
While the Emperor was dining, Valuev, looking out of the window,
While the Far West was developing this vigorous, aggressive leadership
While the aged frequently manifest but few signs of shock, they have a
While the count was being turned over, one of his arms fell back
While the country was engaged in a heated debate upon its domestic
While the couples were arranging themselves and the musicians tuning
While the disease is most common in childhood and youth, it may be met
While the guests were taking their leave Pierre remained for a
While the horses were being harnessed Alpatych and Ferapontov over
While the marshal was passing, the prisoners had huddled together in
While the merchants and Whig gentlemen confined their efforts chiefly to
While the occurrence of purely periosteal suppuration is regarded as
While the sea of history remains calm the ruler-administrator in his
While the service was proceeding in the Cathedral of the Assumption-
While the soldiers were shouting Kutuzov leaned forward in his
While the statesmen of the old generation were solving the problems of
While the troops, dividing into two parts when passing around the
While the varieties of gangrene included in this group depend primarily
While the virulence of these creatures varies widely, they are all
While these and similar methods have long been employed in the treatment
While these conversations were going on in the reception room and
While they were talking a maid thrust her head in at the other
While they were talking in undertones the crack of a shot sounded
While this was being given, Prince Andrew heard the whisper of a
While this was taking place in Petersburg the French had already
While this weakens the wall of the vessel, it has the advantage of
While waiting for the announcement of his appointment to the
While waiting for the young man to take his place on the step
While waiting in the reception room Pierre with weary eyes watched
Whitelaw Reid, one of the peace commissioners at Paris: "There is a wild
Whitman--were preaching the gospel to the Indians.
Whittier the poem, "Ichabod," deploring the fall of the mighty one whom
Whittier. In 1853 the first suffrage paper was founded by the wife of a
Whole states were polled in advance by the Republicans and the doubtful
Why and how were the battles of Shevardino and Borodino given and
Why did they come? The reasons are various. Some of them, the Pilgrims
Why take prisoners? It's chivalry! The French have destroyed my home
Why was the Russian army--which with inferior forces had withstood
Wide were the dissensions in the North during that year and the
Willarski was silent throughout the drive. To Pierre's inquiries
Willarski who continually deplored the ignorance and poverty of Russia
William Lloyd Garrison called for the secession of the Northern states
William Pitt, Earl of Chatham, though he deplored the idea of American
Wilson by acclamation, reviewed with pride the legislative achievements
Wilson that the measure was later repealed.
Wilson toured the country and aroused great enthusiasm by a series of
Wilson's leadership carried the colonial administration into its fourth
Wilson. In 1914 dissensions in the republic led to the landing of
Wintzingerode was not merely to agree to the truce but also to offer
Wintzingerode's detachment, peasants from the adjacent villages, and
Wintzingerode, who was in attendance on him, to the enemy camp.
Wisconsin, it had been explored early by the French scouts, and the
Wisconsin, which shared with Michigan the interesting history of the
Wishing to find out where the commander in chief was, he rode up
With Mademoiselle Bourienne's help the princess had maintained the
With Sonya's help and the maid's, Natasha got the glass she held
With a dazed face the banker made out the required check. Holmes walked over to his desk, took out a little triangular piece of gold with three gems in it, and threw it down upon the table.
With a grave face he lit the lamp and led the way down the corridor. Twice he struck at the chamber door without any reply from within. Then he turned the handle and entered, I at his heels, with the cocked pistol in my hand.
With a nod to Denisov he turned away and put out his hand for the
With a pale and frowning face Dron stepped out of the crowd.
With a solemn triumphal march there mingled a song, the drip from
With all calibres and at all ranges, except actual contact, the wound of
With all this power in its hands the administration was able by January,
With an inclination of the head the Emperor dismissed him.
With bated breath and beating heart he moved toward the Rhetor (by
With drooping head Princess Mary left the crowd and went back to the
With each injection of "914" after the first, throughout the whole
With few exceptions, tuberculous disease in the interior of a bone does
With happy, exhausted faces, they laid the old wolf, alive, on a
With hurried hands the soldiers blindfolded them, drawing the sacks
With reference to commerce, the proclamation to industrious
With reference to the military side--the plan of campaign--that work
With regard to administrative matters, the establishment of a
With regard to commerce and to provisioning the army, the
With regard to legal matters, after the execution of the supposed
With regard to legal matters, immediately after the fires he gave
With regard to religion, Napoleon ordered the priests to be
With regard to supplies for the army, Napoleon decreed that all
With regard to the further life-history of hydatids, the living elements
With screams squeals, and waving of whips that caused even the shaft
With sure instinct the Eastern manufacturer reached out for the markets
With the child in his arms his figure was now more conspicuous
With the developments what they are in industry to-day, there is sure to
With the enemy's approach to Moscow, the Moscovites' view of their
With the formation of pus the continuous burning or boring pain of
With the formation of pus the skin becomes soft and boggy at several
With the help of a footman Tikhon brought in the bedstead and
With the increase in population and the growth of agriculture came
With the issues clearly joined, the country rejected the Democratic
With the naive conviction of young men in a merry mood that other
With the naked eye Prince Andrew saw below them to the right, not
With the natural capacity of an Italian for changing the
With the object of raising the spirits of the troops and of the
With the passing years the conflict between the two sections increased
With the present complex forms of political and social life in
With the ruling classes it was far otherwise. Napoleon III, the Emperor
With the self-satisfaction of a man on parade, he stepped lightly
With the shrewdness befitting a good business man, he knew how to draw
With the soldier, an infantry officer with a bandaged cheek came
With this appliance the patient may continue to work, and the dressing
Within a short time one-third of the states had legislation of this
Within a week the peasants who came with empty carts to carry off
Without admitting divine intervention in the affairs of humanity
Without answering, Rostov shook the soldier's Cross of St. George
Without going home, Pierre took a cab and drove to see the Moscow
Without heeding the end of the Italian's remarks, and as though
Without looking at anyone, "Uncle" blew the dust off it and, tapping
Without money, without an army, without courts of law, the union under
Without moving from that spot or firing a single shot the regiment
Without replying, the sergeant, with a resolute air, mounted and
Without such justification there would be no reply to the simplest
Without taking leave of his new friend, Pierre left the gate with
Wollstonecraft published in England the _Vindication of the Rights of
Woman's Rights Convention in the history of America. It met at Seneca
Women_--a book that was destined to serve the cause of liberty among
Woodrow Wilson, of New Jersey, were the chief contestants. After tossing
Word and the Word was with God," Pierre went round the table and saw a
World Anti-Slavery Convention in London, much to the horror of the men,
World War who, with the regular army and the national guard, formed the
World War, wholly apart from the terms of peace or the League of
World that "the American continents, by the free and independent
Wostov," he cried noticing the cadet's bright face, "you've got it
Wounds from sporting guns are to be _treated_ on the usual lines, the
Wounds of certain parts of the body heal more quickly than others: those
Wounds produced by dynamite explosions and the bursting of boilers have
Writers of universal history who deal with all the nations seem to
Writing the words L'Empereur Napoleon in numbers, it appears that
Written in a "decent respect for the opinions of mankind," to set forth
Wyoming brought twice as much as the great wool clip; the minerals of
Wyoming, had followed this example. To the east of the Mississippi,
Wyoming. The farm lands that the friends of "a little America" on the
X-rays a dark shadow is seen corresponding to the sac. Pain is usually a
X-rays and to sunlight. Others again, influenced by the risk of
X-rays, by means of which the condition is at once recognised. A
X-rays, so that the process of its absorption can be followed in
X.	The Adventure of the Noble Bachelor
X.  THE ADVENTURE OF THE NOBLE BACHELOR
XI.	The Adventure of the Beryl Coronet
XI.  THE ADVENTURE OF THE BERYL CORONET
XII.	The Adventure of the Copper Beeches
XII.  THE ADVENTURE OF THE COPPER BEECHES
XIV. It will not be forgotten that the French rangers of the woods, the
XVI's foreign minister, Count de Vergennes, before the arrival of any
XVI? And what is the time limit for such reactions? To these questions
XVII, for the Queen, or for Madame Elizabeth? Nothing!" and he
XVIII.  THE DEVELOPMENT OF THE GREAT WEST                          425
XXIII.  THE NEW POLITICAL DEMOCRACY                                554
Yards at Albany and Poughkeepsie in New York built ships for the trade
Yaroslavl the thought of what might await her there--not after many
Yaroslavl with reports on the state of their affairs and with advice
Years' War; but he was the most conspicuous failure of the Revolution.
Yesterday I learned that, despite the loyalty which I have kept my
Yet it is due to historic truth to state that McKinley, whom the
Yet it is only necessary to abandon the false view (adopted to
Yet one need only discard the study of the reports and general plans
Yet subsequently, and for the rest of his life, he thought and spoke
Yet the ladies themselves could not help laughing.
York and Pennsylvania. Closely connected with it was the practice of
York and candidate for President in 1876, "that the paramount object and
York and widely celebrated as a man of "sterling honesty." At the same
York customs house and some of the minor officers were sent to prison.
York manors were in somewhat the same position as serfs on old European
York, and New Jersey. The charter of Massachusetts, annulled in the last
York, and Pennsylvania in 1860 had funds greater than the banks in all
York, the inland movement was directed by the Hudson River to Albany,
York. They were equally aware that a majority of the state conventions,
York. Thousands were black-listed and subjected to espionage. The
Yorktown, had seen service in the Seven Years' War and had undoubted
You can't wait a moment! Don't you see the general wants to pass?"
You know how fond the count is of her."
You weren't in the study. We began disputing--Pierre and I--and I lost
You will indemnify and hold Michael Hart, the Foundation,
You will indemnify and hold Michael Hart, the Foundation,
You're quick at taking offense, but you don't mind disgracing the
You're wrong to think that of me... I... for me... for the honor of
Young children stand the loss of blood badly, but they quickly recover,
Young statesmen of the North, in whose hands the destiny of frightful
Your misfortunes are cruel, but His Majesty the Emperor and King
Yuma to San Francisco, as a result of a union of the Texas Pacific with
Zavarzinsk thicket the other day! Leaped a fearful place; what a sight
Zdrzhinski, the officer with the long mustache, spoke
Zherkov touched his horse with the spurs; it pranced excitedly
Zherkov was followed by an officer of the suite who rode up to the
[1] Michael Hart and the Foundation (and any other party you may
[1] Michael Hart and the Foundation (and any other party you may
[20] Promoted from the vice-presidency on the death of the president.
[2]  Honor the eBook refund and replacement provisions of this
[2]  Honor the eBook refund and replacement provisions of this
[2] For the histology of tumours the reader is referred to a text-book
[2] To prevent a repetition of such an unfortunate affair, the twelfth
[2] alteration, modification, or addition to the eBook,
[2] alteration, modification, or addition to the eBook,
[3]  Pay a trademark license fee to the Foundation of 20% of the
[3]  Pay a trademark license fee to the Foundation of 20% of the
[3] Partly superseded by the 14th Amendment, p. 639.
[4] In the description of angiomas we have followed the teaching of the
[4] See the 17th Amendment, p. 641.
[5] We have followed the classification adopted by Alexis Thomson in his
[6] See the 16th Amendment, p. 640.
[7] The following paragraph was in force only from 1788 to 1803.
[8] Superseded by the 12th Amendment, p. 638.
[9] See the 11th Amendment, p. 638.
[Illustration: AMERICAN DOMINIONS IN THE PACIFIC]
[Illustration: CELEBRATING THE RATIFICATION]
[Illustration: DISTRIBUTION OF SLAVES IN THE SOUTHERN STATES]
[Illustration: FIG. 109.--Volkmann's Ischaemic Contracture. When the
[Illustration: FIG. 116.--Great Enlargement of the Ischial Bursa.
[Illustration: FIG. 117.--Gouty Disease of Bursae in a tailor. The bursal
[Illustration: FIG. 118.--Shaft of Femur after Acute Osteomyelitis. The
[Illustration: FIG. 129.--Shortening of Middle Finger of Adult, the
[Illustration: FIG. 134.--Changes in the Skull resulting from Ostitis
[Illustration: FIG. 135.--Cadaver, illustrating the alterations in the
[Illustration: FIG. 155.--Osseous Ankylosis of Knee in the flexed
[Illustration: FIG. 163.--Charcot's Disease of Left Knee. The joint is
[Illustration: FIG. 20.--Senile Gangrene of the Foot, showing line of
[Illustration: FIG. 31.--Actinomycosis of Maxilla. The disease spread to
[Illustration: FIG. 39.--Syphilitic Rupia, showing the limpet-shaped
[Illustration: FIG. 91.--To illustrate the Loss of Sensation produced by
[Illustration: FIG. 93.--Callosities and Corns on the Sole and Plantar
[Illustration: FIG. 99.--Multiple Sebaceous Cysts or Wens; the larger
[Illustration: JOHN WINTHROP, GOVERNOR OF THE MASSACHUSETTS BAY
[Illustration: MOBBING THE TORIES]
[Illustration: NORTH AMERICA ACCORDING TO THE TREATY OF 1783]
[Illustration: RAILROADS OF THE UNITED STATES IN 1918]
[Illustration: ROADS AND TRAILS INTO THE WESTERN TERRITORY]
[Illustration: TEXAS AND THE TERRITORY IN DISPUTE]
[Illustration: THE CARIBBEAN REGION]
[Illustration: THE COLONIES OF NORTH AMERICA AT THE TIME OF THE
[Illustration: THE CUMBERLAND ROAD]
[Illustration: THE DRAFT RIOTS IN NEW YORK CITY]
[Illustration: THE DUTCH WEST INDIA WAREHOUSE IN NEW AMSTERDAM
[Illustration: THE MISSOURI COMPROMISE]
[Illustration: THE OREGON COUNTRY AND THE DISPUTED BOUNDARY]
[Illustration: THE ORIGINAL GRANTS]
[Illustration: THE OVERLAND TRAILS]
[Illustration: THE ROYAL GOVERNOR'S PALACE AT NEW BERNE]
[Illustration: THE UNITED STATES IN 1805]
[Illustration: THE UNITED STATES IN 1861
[Illustration: THE UNITED STATES IN 1912]
[Illustration: WESTERN BATTLE LINES OF THE VARIOUS YEARS OF THE
[and thirty-eight members from all the States except Rhode Island.]
[ounce]j, and covered with oil-silk. Strain and over-use of the joint
[that is, from the farmers along the road]; and by having two or three
_A Compromise._--In his messages to Congress, however, Jackson spoke the
_Abnormal attitudes of the limb_ occur earlier, and are more pronounced
_Active hyperaemia_ is induced by the local application of heat,
_Acute Suppuration in a Wound._--If in the course of an operation
_Affections of the Bones._--Swellings at the ends of the long bones, due
_Affections of the Eyes._--At or near puberty there is frequently
_Affections of the Mucous Membranes._--The inflammation of the nasal
_Affections of the Skin._--Although all types of skin affection are met
_Affections of the Skin_ are among the most constant manifestations. An
_Ambulatory Treatment._--When the circumstances of the patient forbid
_Americans in California._--Why stop at Santa Fe? The question did not
_Amputation of the limb_ is indicated in cases complicated by
_Amputation_ for tuberculous joint disease has become one of the rare
_Amputation_ is the last resource, and should be decided upon if the
_Anel's ligature_ is only practised as part of the operation which deals
_Aneurysm_ in the #leg and foot# is rare. It is almost always traumatic,
_Aneurysmal varix_ is sometimes met with in the region of the popliteal
_Aneurysmal varix_ may occur in the neck as a result of stabs or bullet
_Angioma_, _lymphangioma_, and _neuroma_ are described with the disease
_Ankylosis_ is the term applied when impaired mobility results from
_Argus_ on the seas, the heroic death of Lawrence and the victories of a
_Arthritis_ is the term applied when not only the synovial membrane but
_Arthrolysis_, which consists in opening the joint and dividing the
_Artificial Hyperaemia._--As has been explained, the induction of
_Atrophy of Muscle._--Simple atrophy, in which the muscle elements are
_Avulsion of Tendons._--This is a rare injury, in which the tendons of a
_Bazin's Disease._--This term is applied to an affection of the skin and
_Brigham Young and His Economic System._--In Brigham Young the Mormons
_Burns of Fourth Degree--Total Destruction of the Skin._--These follow
_Burns of Second Degree--Vesication of the Skin._--These are
_Burns of Third Degree--Partial Destruction of the Skin._--The epidermis
_Burns of the first degree_ are associated with erythema of the skin,
_Caries of Articular Surfaces._--Tuberculous infiltration of the marrow
_Cartilage and bone_, next to skin, are the tissues most frequently
_Catgut._--The following methods of preparing catgut have proved
_Cautery._--The actual cautery or Paquelin's thermo-cautery is seldom
_Cellulitis of the forearm_ is usually a sequel to one of the deeper
_Central_ or _medullary tumours_ as they increase in size replace the
_Changes in Structure and Function._--The mere interruption of the
_Changes in the Permanent Teeth._--These affect specially the upper
_Changes in the Skeleton before the Child is able to walk._--The
_Changes in the Synovial Membrane._--In the majority of cases there is a
_Chesapeake_, the, 195
_Chronic dermatitis_ (_varicose eczema_) is often met with in the lower
_Chronic dermatitis_, which results from persistence of the acute form,
_Clinical Aspects._--So long as the process of repair is not complicated
_Clinical Features._--A red spot, resembling the mark of a mosquito
_Clinical Features._--As these are best illustrated in the different
_Clinical Features._--Both in the lower animals and in man the bacillus
_Clinical Features._--Immediately after the injury it is impossible to
_Clinical Features._--One of the characteristic features of an incised
_Clinical Features._--Sarcoma is usually met with before the age of
_Clinical Features._--The commonest seat of the disease is in the toes,
_Clinical Features._--The constitutional symptoms, which are due to the
_Clinical Features._--The delirium, which has been aptly described as
_Clinical Features._--The disease begins on the foot as an indurated
_Clinical Features._--The disease is usually met with in persons over
_Clinical Features._--The less severe forms of contusion are associated
_Clinical Features._--The most typical example of this form of phlebitis
_Clinical Features._--The onset of the disease is insidious, and
_Clinical Features._--The part undergoing mortification becomes colder
_Clinical Features._--The patient complains of deep-seated pains. In
_Clinical Features._--The patient is in a state of prostration. He is
_Clinical Features._--The reaction in cases of diffuse cellulitis is
_Clinical Features._--The symptoms of sapraemia seldom manifest
_Clinical Features._--There is almost always a history of the patient
_Clinical Features._--Two clinical varieties are met with--the acute
_Clinical Features._--We are not here concerned with the severe forms of
_Clinical Variations of Tuberculous Joint Disease._--The above
_Clinical features._--In man the disease may be met with in the skin,
_Clinically_ the disease is attended with the gradual and painless
_Clinically_, the osteoma forms a hard, indolent tumour attached to a
_Commerce and the Slave Trade._--Southern interests were also involved
_Complete Subcutaneous Rupture._--When the rupture is complete, all the
_Complications._--When the varix is of long standing, the skin in the
_Compression._--Digital compression of the feeding artery has been given
_Concealed chancre_ is the term applied when one or more chancres are
_Conditions which influence the Natural Arrest of Haemorrhage._--The
_Congenital fistulae_, such as occur in the neck from imperfect closure
_Conservative treatment_ is almost always to be employed in the first
_Constitution_, the, 200
_Constitutional treatment_ consists in taking measures to reduce the
_Continuous irrigation_ of the part by a slow, steady stream of lotion,
_Contracture_ is the term applied when the fixation is due to permanent
_Definition of Terms._--Any diseased process that affects the periosteum
_Diagnosis and X-ray Appearances of Myeloma._--The early diagnosis of
_Diagnosis._--Before the stage of cold abscess is reached, the localised
_Diagnosis._--Considerable difficulty attends the diagnosis of
_Diagnosis._--Lupus is the disease most often mistaken for rodent
_Diagnosis._--Pain referred along the course of the sciatic nerve on one
_Diagnosis._--The chief importance lies in differentiating tuberculous
_Diagnosis._--The conditions most liable to be mistaken for syphilitic
_Diagnosis._--There is seldom any difficulty in recognising the disease.
_Differential Diagnosis._--The conditions likely to be mistaken for
_Differential Diagnosis._--There is nothing characteristic in the site
_Differential Diagnosis._--When the malignant pustule is fully
_Dislocation_ of the adjacent joint has been chiefly observed at the
_Displacement of the menisci_ of the knee is referred to with injuries
_Distal Ligation._--The tying of the artery beyond the sac, or of its
_Economic History of the United States_, pp. 44-51. Special reference:
_Edinburgh Review_, was never tired of trying his caustic wit at the
_Electrolysis_ acts by decomposing the blood and tissues into their
_Elephantiasis from Lymphatic or Venous Obstruction._--Of this the
_Elephantiasis neuromatosa_ is the name applied by Virchow to a
_End of the Trail_, "has the white man fought a more courageous fight or
_Epidermis or Epithelial Grafting._--The method introduced by the late
_Epiphysitis or Syphilitic Perichondritis._--The first of these terms is
_Etiology and Morbid Anatomy._--The actinomyces, which has never been
_Etiology and Morbid Anatomy._--The tetanus bacillus, which is a perfect
_Etiology._--Considerable difference of opinion exists as to the
_Etiology._--Staphylococci gain access to the blood-stream in various
_Evacuation of the Abscess and Injection of Iodoform._--The iodoform is
_Evanescent periostitis_ is met with in acquired syphilis during the
_Exaggerated growth_ in the length of a bone is rare, and has been
_Extirpation of the Sac--The Old Operation._--The procedure which goes
_Extra-genital or Erratic Chancres_ (Fig. 38).--Erratic chancre is the
_Federalist_, the, 158
_Fifth._ By omitting the period of exploration, we have been able to
_Filarial disease in the lymphatics of the groin_ appears as a soft,
_Forci-pressure._--Bleeding from the smallest arteries and from
_Formation of Cicatricial Tissue._--The transformation of this temporary
_Formation of Granulation Tissue._--When a wound is made in the
_Fourth._ We have treated the causes and results of wars, the problems
_Ganglia in the region of the knee_ are usually situated over the
_Ganglia_ in the substance of _tendons_ are rare. The diagnosis rests on
_Gangrene_ may ensue if the blood supply is seriously interfered with,
_Gaspee_, the, 92
_Gastro-intestinal disturbances_ take the form of loss of appetite,
_General Treatment._--The patient should be kept at rest, preferably in
_Glandular carcinoma_ originates in organs such as the breast, and in
_Gluteal fibrositis_ usually follows exposure to wet, and affects the
_Gonorrhoeal Teno-synovitis._--This is met with especially in the tendon
_Gouty Teno-synovitis._--A deposit of urate of soda beneath the
_Grafts of the Cutis Vera._--Grafts consisting of the entire thickness
_Gummatous Infiltration of the Skin_ ("Syphilitic Lupus").--This is a
_Haemostatics_ or _Styptics_.--The local application of haemostatics is
_Healing of Epidermis._--While these changes are taking place in the
_Heat_ and _prolonged exposure to the Rontgen rays_ or _to radium
_History of Suffrage in the United States_, pp. 135-145.
_History of the Civil War_, and teachers desiring to emphasize military
_History of the United States_, Vol. II, pp. 25-115; Elson, _History of
_History of the United States_, Vol. VIII, pp. 97-101.
_History of the United States_, pp. 516-521, 526-527.
_Hunterian operation_ ensures that the ligature is applied to a part of
_Hydrops_ is most marked in the knee, and may affect also the adjacent
_If the wound becomes infected_ and suppuration occurs, the young nerve
_Immigration._--The more carefully the rapid growth of the industrial
_Impairment of the normal movements_ is one of the most valuable
_Imperfect Collateral Circulation._--While the development of the
_Implantation cysts_ are caused by the accidental transference of
_In Affections of the Spinal Medulla._--In myelitis, progressive
_In Children who have walked._--In these children the most important
_In Lesions of Peripheral Nerves._--In the hand, and more rarely in the
_In cancellous bones, such as those of the tarsus_, there is a similar
_In deeply seated bones_, such as the upper end of the femur, the
_In health_ the temperature of the body is maintained at a mean of about
_In lesions of the mouth and throat_, the teeth should be attended to;
_In man_ also the clinical features of the chronic variety of the
_In man_, acute glanders is commoner than the chronic variety. Infection
_In superficial bones_, such as the sternum, the formation of
_In the bones of the skull_, gummata may form in the peri-cranium,
_In the female_, the primary lesion is not so typical or so easily
_In the limbs_, for example, where the application of a constricting
_In the male_, the primary lesion specially affects certain
_In the septum of the nose, the nasal bones, and the hard palate_,
_Incomplete Subcutaneous Rupture._--In the majority of cases the rupture
_Industrial History of the United States_, pp. 216-225.
_Infection of the adjacent lymph glands_ is usually found to have taken
_Influence of Tuberculous Joint Disease on the General
_Initial Stage._--Attention is usually first attracted to the condition
_Injection of Iodoform._--This is carried out on the same lines as have
_Injuries of the tendons of the fingers_ are comparatively common. One
_Interference with the function_ of the inflamed part is always present
_Introduction of Fluids into the Circulation._--The most valuable
_Iodoform_ or _bismuth gauze_ is of special value for the packing of
_Jackson Firmly Upholds the Union._--The eyes of the country were turned
_Jefferson's Advice._--The proposal was rejected; but President Monroe
_Joint Occupation and Settlement._--Both England and the United States
_Klapp's Suction Bells._--In inflammatory conditions to which the
_Laryngeal Diphtheria._--The disease may arise in the larynx, although,
_Ligation of the Artery._--If the haemorrhage recurs in spite of packing
_Ligation of the Artery._--The object of tying the artery is to diminish
_Ligatures and Sutures._--To avoid the risk of implanting infective
_Lipoma in other Situations._--The _periosteal lipoma_ is usually
_Local Complications._--The adjacent joint may exhibit symptoms which
_Local Measures to arrest the Haemorrhage._--The occurrence of even
_Local Treatment._--The absorption of a subcutaneous gumma is often
_Local Treatment._--The local treatment must be carried out on
_Locally_ the snake inflicts a double wound, passing vertically into the
_Lusitania_ case. It solemnly informed the German government that "no
_Lusitania_, the, 601ff.
_Lymphatic Oedema._--When the lymphatic return from a limb has been
_Maine_, riding in the harbor of Havana, was blown up and sunk, carrying
_Maine_, the, 490
_Malignant disease_ in relation to the nails is rare. Squamous
_Malignant tumours_ usually show a marked departure from the structure
_Management of a Healing Sore._--Perhaps the best dressing for a healing
_Mechanics' Free Press_ in Philadelphia in 1828 and the establishment of
_Merrimac_, the, 353
_Methods of Administering Mercury._--(1) _By the Mouth._--This was for
_Minute puncture of arteries_ such as frequently occur in the hypodermic
_Mixed Naevus._--As its name indicates, the mixed naevus partakes of the
_Monitor_, the, 353
_Monroe's Statement of the Doctrine._--Acting on the advice of trusted
_Morbid Anatomy._--In the lower extremity the varicosity most commonly
_Morbid Anatomy._--The commonest type is that in which the articular
_Morbid Anatomy._[7]--The abscess is nearly always situated in the
_Multiple Chondromas and Osteomas of the Synovial Membrane._--In this
_Muscle and nerve_, on the other hand, do not retain their vitality when
_National Defense._--The necessity for national defense was realized,
_Necrosis without suppuration_, described by Paget under the name "quiet
_Necrosis_ is the term applied to the death of a tangible portion of
_Neuralgia of the sciatic nerve_--#sciatica#--is the most common form of
_Neuropathic atrophy_ is associated with lesions of the nervous system.
_Neuropathic_ forms occur in certain chronic diseases of the brain and
_New growths_ include the fibroma, the myxoma, the myeloma or
_Occlusion of the inferior vena cava_ as a result of infective
_On the Human Understanding_, and innumerable volumes dealing with
_Onychia_ is the term applied to an infection of the soft parts around
_Operative Treatment._--In aggravated cases, when the patient is
_Operative Treatment._--This consists in the removal of the affected
_Operative treatment_ may be called for in cases in which the bones are
_Osteomalacia associated with New Growths in the Skeleton._--When
_Ovarian Dermoids._--Dermoids are not uncommon in the ovary (Fig. 59).
_Parasitic cysts_ are produced by the growth within the tissues of
_Pathological Anatomy._--The most striking feature is the softness
_Pathological Anatomy._--The wall of the cyst is composed of fibrous
_Pathological fracture_ of the shaft may occur at the site of necrosis,
_Pathology of Burns._--Much discussion has taken place regarding the
_Pathology._--The disease commences and is most intense in the marrow of
_Peri-articular tubercle and abscess_ may result from the spread of
_Periosteal tumours_ are at first situated on one side of the bone, but
_Phagocytosis._--In the production of immunity the leucocytes and
_Pigmented or Discoloured Scars._--The best-known examples are the blue
_Polygamy Forbidden._--The hope of the Mormons that they might forever
_Post-anaesthetic paralysis_ occurs in patients in whom, during the
_Prevention of Bed-sores._--The first essential in the prevention of
_Prevention of Operation Shock._--In the preparation of a patient for
_Prevention._--In operations in the "dangerous area"--as the region of
_Prognosis._--Spontaneous cure rarely occurs. When the disease
_Prognosis._--The condition does not appear to affect the general
_Prognosis._--The occurrence of _septicaemia_ is the most serious risk,
_Prognosis._--The prognosis in acute pyaemia is much less hopeless than
_Prognosis._--The rate of growth of the subcutaneous and mixed forms of
_Prophylaxis._--Experience in the European War has established the
_Prophylaxis._--The bite of an animal suspected of being rabid should be
_Prophylaxis._--The toes and feet of old people, the condition of whose
_Proximal Ligation._--The ligature may be applied immediately above the
_Pyogenic._--Non-suppurative inflammation of the coats of an artery may
_Redness_, similarly, is due to the increased afflux of blood to the
_Relief of Symptoms._--For the relief of _pain_, rest is essential. The
_Repair after Loss or Destruction of Tissue._--When the edges of a wound
_Representation and Taxation._--The Southern members of the convention
_Residual abscess_ is the name given to an abscess that makes its
_Retention and Exudation Cysts._--_Retention cysts_ develop when the
_Reunion of Parts entirely Separated from the Body._--Small portions of
_Rodent cancer_ originates in the glands of the skin, and presents a
_Rupture of the biceps of the arm_ may involve the long or the short
_Rupture_ may take place through the skin, on a mucous or serous
_Secondary sarcoma_ is seldom met with in the lymph glands except when
_Secondary sarcoma_, whether derived from a primary growth in the bone
_Secondary tumours derived from the thyreoid gland_ require special
_Secretory Glands._--The regeneration of secretory glands is usually
_Separation and displacement of the epiphysis_ usually reveals itself by
_Sequelae of Acute Suppurative Osteomyelitis._--The commonest sequel is
_Seventh._ We have deliberately aimed at standards of maturity. The
_Skin and Connective Tissue._--The mode of regeneration of these tissues
_South Carolina Nullifies the Tariff._--The legislature of that state,
_Southern States Condemn Nullification._--The answer of the country to
_Staphylococcus Aureus._--This is the commonest organism found in
_Stomach and Intestine._--Provided the peritoneal surfaces are
_Subcutaneous Whitlow._--In this variety the infection manifests itself
_Subcutaneous rupture of the thoracic duct_ may result from a crush of
_Subcutaneous rupture_ of one or other _of the digital tendons_ in the
_Subperiosteal Whitlow._--This form is usually an extension of the
_Subungual exostosis_ is an osteoma growing from the terminal phalanx of
_Suppuration_ may occur in the vicinity of an aneurysm, and the aneurysm
_Syphilitic disease of the tibia_ may be taken as the type of the
_Syphilitic disease_ is rarely recognised except in the form of bursal
_Syphilitic osteo-arthritis_ results from a gumma in the periosteum or
_Syphilitic._--The inflammation associated with syphilis results in
_Syphilitic_ affections of the nails assume various aspects. A primary
_Temperature._--A marked rise of temperature is one of the most constant
_Teno-synovitis Crepitans._--In the simple or traumatic form of
_Terminations of Contusions._--The usual termination is a complete
_Tertiary Lesions of the Skin and Subcutaneous Cellular Tissue._--The
_Tertiary lesions of mucous membrane and of the submucous cellular
_The "Necessary and Proper" Clause._--To the specified power vested in
_The Acts against Manufactures._--The second group of laws was
_The Administration of Mercury._--The success of the arsenical
_The Affections of the Eyes_, although fortunately rare, are of great
_The Alleged Increase of Cancer._--Regarding the alleged increase of
_The Antiseptic System of Surgery._--Those who only know the surgical
_The Appendages of the Skin._--The _hair_ loses its gloss, becomes dry
_The Coming of the Irish._--The opposition of the Irish people to the
_The Development of the Policy of "Protection."_--The war of 1812 and
_The Discovery of Gold._--As if to clinch the hold on California already
_The General Health._--The patient must lead a regular life and
_The Growth of Industries._--Though farming long remained the major
_The Healing Condition._--The process of healing in an ulcer has already
_The Injection of Alcohol into the Nerve._--The alcohol acts by
_The Iodine or Glycogen Reaction._--The leucocyte count may be
_The Judiciary._--The need for federal courts to carry out the law was
_The Jungle_. It became so savage and so wanton that the opening years
_The Knights of Labor._--While the National Labor Union was
_The Labor of Women and Children._--If the industries, canals, and
_The Legislative Branch--Congress._--After the convention had made the
_The Loyalists in the American Revolution_.
_The Molasses Act._--Not content with laws enacted in the interest of
_The Mucous Membranes_, and especially those of the _mouth_ and
_The National Labor Union._--The plan which failed in 1834 was tried
_The Navigation Acts._--In the first rank among these measures of
_The Overland Trails._--Not to be outdone by the mariners of the deep,
_The Planting States Oppose the Tariff._--In the meantime, the cotton
_The Position of England._--Unfortunately, too, for the Holy Alliance,
_The Primary Lesion._--The incubation period having elapsed, there
_The Purulent Blister._--In the most superficial variety, pus forms
_The Relations of Syphilis to Marriage._--Before the introduction of the
_The System of Checks and Balances._--It is thus apparent that the
_The Trade Laws._--The third group of restrictive measures passed by the
_The Webster-Hayne Debate._--Where the actual victory lay in this
_The X-ray appearances of arthritis deformans_ necessarily vary with the
_The alimentary mucous membrane_, especially that of the lower ileum and
_The appearance of the glands on section_ varies with the stage of the
_The circumscribed or solitary tumour_ grows from the sheath of a nerve
_The dry form of arthritis deformans_, although specially common in the
_The induction of hyperaemia_ is often helpful, the rubber bandage or the
_The local treatment_ of the primary sore consists in attempting to
_The malignant neuroma_ is a sarcoma growing from the sheath of a nerve.
_The operation_ for the removal of the dead bone (_sequestrectomy_)
_The plexiform neuroma_ (Fig. 87) is a fibromatosis confined to the
_The primary period_ embraces the interval that elapses between the
_The prognosis_ largely depends on the variety of cancer and on its
_The superficial branch of the radial_ (radial nerve) _and the deep
_The tertiary period_ has no time-limit except that it follows upon the
_Third._ We have dwelt fully upon the social and economic aspects of our
_Treatment by rest_ implies the immobilisation of the diseased limb
_Treatment of the Local Manifestations._--_The skin lesions_ are treated
_Treatment._--A broad ligature should be tied tightly round the limb
_Treatment._--A patient suffering from shock should be placed in the
_Treatment._--As a rule the ordinary means of arresting haemorrhage are
_Treatment._--At best the treatment of varicose veins is only
_Treatment._--Attention must be directed towards the condition with
_Treatment._--Before having recourse to the measures described below, it
_Treatment._--Digital compression of the vessel against the transverse
_Treatment._--Electrical burns are treated on the same lines as ordinary
_Treatment._--Excision of the primary nodule, followed by the
_Treatment._--If the patient is seen immediately after the accident,
_Treatment._--If the tumour causes suffering it should be removed,
_Treatment._--In cases of thickening of the bone with persistent and
_Treatment._--In early cases the cortex is opened up to give free access
_Treatment._--In severe wounds of this class implicating the
_Treatment._--In the acute form of lymphadenoma, treatment is of little
_Treatment._--In the common flexor sheath of the palm, an attempt may be
_Treatment._--In the multiple warts of children the health should be
_Treatment._--In view of the frequency with which subcutaneous and mixed
_Treatment._--In view of the unstable quality of the chondroma,
_Treatment._--It is necessary to remove the whole tumour, and in
_Treatment._--Limited areas of disease should be completely excised. The
_Treatment._--Little can be done after the air has actually entered the
_Treatment._--Removal by surgical means affords the best prospect of
_Treatment._--The best results hitherto obtained have followed the use
_Treatment._--The ends are approximated by placing the limb in an
_Treatment._--The first indication is the immediate and complete removal
_Treatment._--The first indication is to discover and deal with the
_Treatment._--The first indication is to exclude bacteria by purifying
_Treatment._--The first indication is to purify the whole extent of the
_Treatment._--The general health is to be improved by open air, by
_Treatment._--The general treatment is concerned with the diet,
_Treatment._--The general treatment of embolic gangrene is the same as
_Treatment._--The head should at once be lowered--in imitation of
_Treatment._--The most valuable drugs for the treatment of the
_Treatment._--The only satisfactory treatment is thorough removal under
_Treatment._--The patient must be placed at absolute rest, with the foot
_Treatment._--The primary source of infection is dealt with on the usual
_Treatment._--The quickest way to get rid of a mole is to excise it; if
_Treatment._--The removal of the tumour by operation is the most
_Treatment._--The removal of wens is to be recommended while they are
_Treatment._--The skin of the affected area should be painted with
_Treatment._--The slighter forms of injury by compression recover under
_Treatment._--The solid varieties of odontoma can usually be shelled out
_Treatment._--The surgical treatment is early and free removal of the
_Treatment._--The treatment of diffuse cellulitis depends to a large
_Treatment._--The treatment of secondary haemorrhage includes the use of
_Treatment._--The treatment of the disease consists in regulating the
_Treatment._--The treatment of wounds of the soft parts consists in
_Treatment._--There is considerable difference of opinion regarding the
_Treatment._--This is carried out on the same lines as in other pyogenic
_Treatment._--Treatment is for the most part limited to the relief of
_Treatment._--When an artery has been contused or ruptured, the limb
_Treatment._--When one of the bones of a limb is involved, the usual
_Treatment._--When tetanus has developed the main indications are to
_Treatment._--When the disease is confined to a limited area, the most
_Treatment._--When the disease is limited to the groin or scrotum,
_Treatment._--When the symptoms have once developed they can only be
_Treatment._--When there is evidence that gangrene has occurred, the
_Treatment_ is carried out on lines similar to those recommended in the
_Treatment_ is carried out on the lines already laid down for nerve
_Treatment_ is carried out on the same lines as for similar injuries due
_Treatment_ is confined to protecting the affected bone--usually the
_Treatment_, in addition to that of the nerve lesion underlying the
_Trophic Changes._--The growth of the nails may be interfered with in
_Trophic Phenomena._--Owing to the disappearance of the subcutaneous
_Ulceration and Necrosis of Cartilage._--The synovial tissue covering
_Ulceration of cartilage_ and _caries of the articular surfaces_ are
_Ulcers due to Traumatism._--Traumatism in the form of a _crush_ or
_Vaccine Treatment._--The vaccine treatment elaborated by A. E. Wright
_Vaso-motor Phenomena._--In the majority of cases there is an initial
_Venereal warts_ occur on the genitals of either sex, and may form large
_Wet-cupping_ has almost entirely been superseded by the use of Klapp's
_When the ends are not in contact_, reunion of the divided nerve fibres
_When the skin is broken_ and caseous tuberculous tissue is exposed,
_When the whole plexus is involved_, sensibility is lost over the entire
_Whitlow at the Nail Fold._--This variety, which is met with among those
_Whitlow of the Tendon Sheaths._--In this form the main incidence of the
_X-ray appearances in periosteal tubercle_: the surface of the cortical
_aching_. When inflammation is passing on to suppuration the pain
_arresting_ the flow of blood through the sac, but is designed so to
_arthritis_; of the blood vessels--chronic forms of _endarteritis_ and
_autoplastic_ grafts, that is those derived from the same individual;
_bifurcation of the popliteal_, if gangrene ensues it usually spreads
_bursal haematoma_. Such a haematoma may mask a fracture of the bone
_bursitis_; of the fibrous tissues of joints--chronic forms of
_calcaneus_ to conserve the stability of the heel. When several bones
_cantharides plaster_, or by painting with _liquor epispasticus_. The
_chronic prostatitis_, having analogies with the chronic interstitial
_completely_ divided, the circular fibres of the muscular coat contract,
_crateriform ulcer_, commences on the face as a small red pimple which
_diagnostic features of the skin affections_ the following may be
_diaphysial aclasis_ has been employed by Arthur Keith at the suggestion
_diffuse thickening of the synovial membrane_, due to the formation of
_elephantiasis Graecorum_--a form of leprosy in which the skin of the
_empyema_ in which the joint is filled with pus. More common than either
_endoneurium_, a delicate connective tissue separating the individual
_epidermis_ growing in from the margins. Within twelve hours the cells
_epineurium_, surrounding individual groups of bundles; and the
_epiphyses_. So long as growth continues there intervenes between the
_fatty hernia_. A _subsynovial lipoma_ grows from the fat surrounding
_fibroma_, and _myxoma_, are rare. Special mention should be made of the
_first_ of them was a bill absolutely shutting the port of Boston to
_haematoma_ or _blood cyst_, more often met with in the scalp than in
_homoplastic_ grafts, derived from another animal of the same species;
_imperator_--whichever you like; but how vain to have the power of a
_incision of the abscess and removal of the tuberculous tissue in its
_internal organs_, will be described under these heads. The part played
_involucrum_ (Fig. 118). Where the periosteum has been perforated by pus
_iritis_ in addition. The cornea, or parts of it, may become of a deep
_iritis_, in one or in both eyes, and enlargement of the spleen and
_lymphocytosis_ is applied when there is an increase in the number of
_microphages_, which are the polymorpho-nuclear leucocytes of the blood;
_mixed-celled_ sarcoma. The _lympho-sarcoma_ presents a structure
_myeloma_ which is met with at the wrist or ankle as an elongated
_myxo-adenoma_, and when the gland spaces of the tumour become distended
_naso-pharyngeal polypus_ being the most common examples. We have met
_node_, and sometimes in the form of spicules, spoken of as
_osteo-sarcoma_ is characterised by the formation in the tumour of bone,
_osteophytes_. When the new bone is laid down in the Haversian canals,
_perineurium_, or general sheath, which surrounds all the bundles; the
_phagocytosis_, and he recognised two forms of _phagocytes_: (1) the
_polymorpho-nuclear leucocytes_, which have wandered from the vessels,
_pro tempore_, in the absence of the Vice-President, or when he shall
_rays_, is to be attributed in part to the increased flow of blood to
_reminders_. These usually consist of relapses of certain of the
_secondary cancer_ is widely distributed throughout the skeleton, it is
_serous_ variety, in which an effusion of serous fluid forms under the
_serum treatment_ is designed to furnish the patient with a sufficiency
_situations_, and the appearances vary with these: (1) On the inner
_sixth degree_ it passes still more deeply and implicates the bones.
_streptococcus pyogenes_ being the commonest organism found. The primary
_syphilis_ the shadow of the bone is denser as a result of sclerosis,
_syphilitic ulcer_ does to the intra-venous administration of arsenical
_third_ measure, after denouncing the "utter subversion of all lawful
_throat_, suffer from lesions similar to those met with on the skin. On
_true skin_ consists of connective tissue, in which ramify the blood
_trunk-neuroma_. It is usually less sensitive than the "subcutaneous
_tubercle_. It is chiefly met with about the ankle, and most often in
_venous return_ that is defective. This is best illustrated in the
_vs._ Maryland, he construed generously the words "necessary and proper"
_vs._ Peck, he annulled an act of the Georgia legislature, informing the
_warts_--the covering consists of epidermis; in those growing from
a Catherine serve to express the life of the nation, which is
a Hungarian?" said the commander with an austere gibe.
a Kakistocracy [a government of the worst], rather for the benefit of
a Polish lady. Having finished speaking to her, the Emperor looked
a back gate; now declared that he would not survive the fall of
a bit cut off, you see..." he went on with a smile, pointing to the
a black one. These were the two Emperors followed by their suites.
a bone, the so-called _enchondroma_.
a broken leg, that lay screaming piteously beside the harnessed
a burden that in other days fell heavily upon the shoulders of the
a case in which the gangrene extended up to the junction of the middle
a certain extent at least, master of his own hours of labor. The final
a certain period of time (in the first case the unknown quantity is
a certainty. And from the height of this perception all that had
a chance of entry into the lymph vessels, in which they are carried to
a class equipped to rule. The leading planters were almost to a man
a clause of superb ambiguity they announced that it was "the established
a clean shirt on the feather bed with its warmed and fragrant pillows,
a cloak, waiting for the conversation to finish. They listened to
a coalition of powers against the North, only to meet a firm refusal.
a cold abscess forms, but if there is a mixed infection, the pyogenic
a commander in chief. As it was considered that the Austerlitz success
a common complication of machinery and railway accidents. The violence
a complete stranger, yet nearer to him through the brotherhood of man.
a condition in which the articular surfaces become fused without evident
a condition simulating tuberculous disease of the spine. When it
a cone and of the ranks of an army, or the ranks and positions in
a congress of delegates from the seceded states met at Montgomery,
a considerable extent of a long bone. The pain varies in intensity, and
a considerable size (Fig. 76); less frequent situations are the groin,
a constant state of change.  If you are outside the United States, check
a constant state of change.  If you are outside the United States, check
a constitution legalizing the ownership of slaves. He favored the
a contract between the state and the college, which the legislature
a controversy over the seizure of an American ship by Cuban authorities.
a corner of the door.
a corps commander, or even the commander in chief, did not know in
a corridor to the cabinet where the Minister of War was at work. The
a couple of feet by all the borzois, who did not get any closer to
a course of vaccines should precede the operation.
a court lackey and an idiot!... But what's the good?..." and he
a crack in the wall. A cock crowed far off and another replied near
a cribriform appearance; these openings exude pus. The different
a cricket ball or in falling. The terminal phalanx is flexed towards the
a crowd of soldiers some of whom were unwounded. The soldiers were
a cyst, and from lipoma and other soft tumours. The differential
a definite promise of final independence. The result was the Jones
a deserter from the French army being brought to him. This was a
a different one from that which he had ridden at the review, and
a dinner is the nourishment it affords; and the purpose of marriage is
a direct retreat by the Nizhni road. In proof of this there is the
a dislocation or the incision of a whitlow; or in those who have rapidly
a distant relative of the Rostovs', a man of small means, and their
a door leading to the stalls on the side nearest the Rostovs' box
a dose, and this is injected into the muscles above and behind the great
a doubt by the shipping records that have come down to us. The great
a dull-red or purple colour. The swollen vein may be felt as a firm
a fair way to nullify the law in whole districts when Washington called
a few acres of ground the corn and potatoes, they had filtered into the
a few clung to the ancient doctrine that the government should not
a few days after Washington was inaugurated. The king of France, Louis
a fire glowed--the first of those that were beginning in Moscow. To
a fluctuating swelling may form beneath the scar; in course of time it
a folding table and red chairs, then into the drawing room with a
a foot of the body, the skin surrounding the wound is usually stained
a foothold was secured on the Atlantic coast, the current of migration
a fortnight twenty-five thousand, and so on. By the autumn of 1813 the
a foul, purulent or bloody discharge. The glands break down in the same
a frightful war of extermination had begun. In the month of June nearly
a full-grown hare would cross the field now I'd show you what sort
a garter, which constricts the limb, and any obvious cause of direct
a generation of constitution-makers whose mission it was to begin the
a good example, yet here you are without your boots! The alarm will be
a good while, told me his view of the matter, which at once lit up for
a government transport, had returned with news that the Cossacks
a grave and laborious man who for years had groaned over the increasing
a great deal from the deceased," said Prince Vasili to him, handing
a great number of years: we have known it to last as many as fifty. The
a greenish-yellow ring at the margin of the growth. The bacillus mallei
a group of politicians headed by "Boss" Tweed. He plundered the city
a half miles from Tarutino) to the place where the attacking columns
a handsome officer of the Horse Guards who passed by them with head
a hazel-nut, and being ovoid, firm, and painless. More commonly the
a head. At the same time, in connection with the regulation of foreign
a high rate of interest; and the tariff was a tax on land and labor for
a horse's teeth, or in machinery. It is usually the terminal phalanx
a horse, he begged to be allowed to swim across the river before the
a house two doors off. The whole household, servants included, was
a hypocrite, a rascal who has himself roused the people to riot.
a joint stock association, in which those who contribute most direct the
a knife, the conical scissors of Mayo are employed. When the glands are
a la grecque looked tenderly and gaily at him out of the gilt frame.
a large fluctuating swelling may form and acquire the characters of a
a large gilt frame, new to him, containing the genealogical tree of
a last desperate effort Dolokhov pushed the porter aside, and when
a law prohibiting the admission of Chinese laborers to the United States
a letter has been written to the Emperor in which the count asks for
a level on which the question itself cannot exist. In our time the
a limb this interferes with the functions of the muscle; in the
a limit to the power of the beast that spoke great and blasphemous
a log floating down the river, an officers' or company's baggage
a loss merely to get rid of her. Marya Dmitrievna ordered almost the
a majority of the whole number of electors appointed, and if no person
a male flower to a pistil fertilizes the latter, and sees in this
a man forfeited his land through failure to pay the final installment;
a man he knew, Smolyaninov, and it mortified him to think that the
a man recommended to the Empress) and at the same time to console him,
a man who could justify to himself and to them the deceptions,
a match... and Soyna...?" And on taking leave of the governor's
a mere shell, and may break on the slightest pressure; the urine
a mighty effort to solve the slavery problem. On January 29, 1850, Clay
a million and a half more votes than did Judge Parker in 1904, the palm
a million members. By the opening of 1920 the total strength of
a mole covers half the face. In addition to being unsightly, they bleed
a monk's cassock, sat on the sofa beside her, behind a samovar. Near
a moral superiority over those sovereigns of the day who co-operated
a much less degree, the depth of the injury. When more than one-third of
a mucous surface the papular eruption assumes the form of _mucous
a napkin, from behind the next man's shoulders and whispered: "Dry
a nerve, by the fact that it is movable in the transverse axis of the
a network of trade routes that covered well-nigh half the world." This
a neuro-fibromatosis of the cutaneous nerves, is described with the
a new phase in the struggle. In the early days of the contest with the
a number of ships that it was a rare captain who ventured to run the
a number of streets the patrol arrested five more Russian suspects:
a paroxysm of fever before he was awakened by the bombardment of the
a particular limb, usually the arm, as the humerus, radius, and ulna are
a pipe the day before came up to it with two soldiers. The corporal
a pitiful, weary, and distracted air, though at the same time he was
a plan for extending the Missouri Compromise line to the Pacific.
a platform asserting the rights of slave owners in the territories and
a population of 150,000, asked for admission to the union. In 1858 the
a portion only of the shaft of a long bone and be sharply defined from
a position in the Thuerassa, he merely saves us a great deal of
a possible wife, adapting her in his imagination to all the conditions
a preacher who denounced taxation without representation. In the middle
a present from the prince--and carrying a stick as the prince did,
a probe can be passed for some distance between the floor of the ulcer
a prosperous center of trade. By 1875 it was reckoned that the
a purely topical handling of the subject. The topical method, however,
a qu'un pas,"* said he. And the whole world for fifty years has been
a rattle on the bridge as if nuts were being spilt, and the hussar
a refund of the money (if any) you paid for this eBook by
a refund of the money (if any) you paid for this eBook by
a regular board was established, known as the "Lords of Trade and
a removal to Kazan of the court and the girls' educational
a resolution of Congress in favor of giving to the Cubans the rights of
a resolution, calling upon the Congress itself to summon another
a result of irritation or pressure. The scars resulting from severe
a result of the contradiction, will they see that they are both wrong.
a result of the protective tariff, Southern planters were compelled to
a rich and ugly heiress in the same way. All this might, he thought,
a road. The wounded, bandaged with rags, with pale cheeks,
a rule, the nature of the lesion is only recognised when chyle is
a sarcoma. Although the tissue elements in this disease resemble those
a series of observations should be made, the blood being examined about
a serious expression, but with a smile lurking at the corners of his
a severe burn into three periods; but it is to be observed that the
a short time the practice of nominating by a "congressional caucus"
a show of hands or by the enrollment of the voters under names of their
a sixth stroke. The doctors pronounced recovery impossible. After a
a slight noise at the door to attract his attention, but Pierre did
a slow and insidious process, and is unattended with the classical signs
a sly, sarcastic glance toward the militia officer.
a society for promoting the abolition of slavery, under the presidency
a soldier, whom they met on the way. He felt it in the merry sounds of
a solution of the problem.
a sound of artillery fire near by. Having forced his way out of the
a special estrangement from the members of her own family. All of
a spokesman of his party. He served in the New York legislature, as head
a squeaky and unsteady voice, raising himself at the other side of the
a star-shaped light. At one side of the table was a small carpet
a state when it gave promise of adding new congressmen of the "right
a statesman as the Hon. Elihu Root lent the weight of his great name to
a steady growth in industrial and commercial pursuits. Most of the
a steep incline and saw several men lying on the ground; they also met
a stern face as if wishing to make the visitor feel that the absence
a stout, dark, red-faced peasant in the forties, with thick lips, a
a stranger. This was the Marshal of the Nobility of the district,
a successful shot and the cry of "stretchers!" was heard. Most of
a sufficient number of troops will be stationed along the highroads on
a summons to dinner, the maid's inquiry what dress to prepare, or
a system of policy and action which they thought could bring the
a talk explaining the future arrangements of the house, he interrupted
a taste of this?..." said the huntsman, pointing to his dagger and
a team in which each man shall play the part for which he is best
a tendency to spread, to increase in size, or to approach the skin or a
a tendency to subvert their rights and liberties; that the recent trade
a territory asked for admission, the issue could be raised as to whether
a thin slice of bone should be removed, and if foci in the marrow are
a thing. He, the sensitive, tender Prince Andrew, how could he say
a third line was opened to the Pacific by way of the Atchison, Topeka
a third physical things, and the fourth a combination of these. Now
a time at least--owing to the occlusion of the vessel, and the limb
a toy, seeing the effect these prearranged receptions had on Pierre,
a trembling voice. When Pierre saw the Emperor he was coming out
a trot. All the officers and men of Denisov's squadron, though they
a trust approached the position of a monopoly, it acquired a dominion
a tubular organ such as the stomach or intestine. The absence of
a tumbler with tea for himself and one for the beardless old man to
a victory--for at Malo-Yaroslavets the field of conflict again
a vigorous execution of the new revenue law.
a week old. Infection takes place through the umbilicus, and manifests
a week or ten days as the cavity heals from the bottom.
a week or two a swelling appears at the site of injury, and becomes
a woman, a lady, and on horseback--raised the curiosity of the serfs
a world of strenuous and free activity, quite opposed to the spiritual
a year for this art.) Everybody in the stalls, boxes, and galleries
a year's time because the old prince made difficulties. This letter
abandon Drissa. The only reasonable thing left to do is to conclude
abandon Moscow or defend it; whereas, with the Russian army less
abandon definitely," said Roosevelt, "the _laissez-faire_ theory of
abandon the hope of ever getting matters right. This match was with
abandoned Moscow to the enemy.
abandoned and the command entrusted to Barclay. But as Barclay did not
abandoned by Jacksonian Democracy, was adroitly adopted to cover the
abandoned in 1873. The income tax came next on the program. The platform
abandoned in the center?" he inquired, searching with his eyes for
abandoned, rushed to places where valuables were to be had for the
abandoned. All who could walk went together, and after the third stage
abandoned. When Arakcheev, coming to him from the Emperor, said that
abandoning Moscow, and the commander in chief's rival, the man who
abandoning the attempt. "I can't prove it to you. You say that
abandoning their property, while the poorer remained and burned and
abandonment of Smolensk to the enemy. It is pitiable and sad, and
abandonment of the city and the ruin of Russia (as Rostopchin regarded
abdomen may be affected, the most common seats are in the aorta itself,
abdomen, the thorax, or the buttock, and the skin should be purified at
abdomens threateningly compressed, and producing by the rapid
abdominal aneurysm; gilt wire in the form of a wisp is introduced
abdominal aorta and compresses it against the vertebral column.
abdominal aorta_, which is attended with violent pains in the lower
abdominal wall the scar tissue may stretch, and so favour the
abducting the arm and rotating it laterally.
abducting the arm. In recurrent cases the patient may be able to
abettors of such traitorous designs." It closed with the usual prayer:
ability and had so long contested with the industrial and commercial
able to demonstrate any communication between the cavity of the cyst
able to refrain from laughing, stooped as if trying to make out the
able to resist the action of any organisms that may remain in them. All
able to tear the censure from the records. When Chief Justice Marshall
abnormal attitude and with shortening of the limb. It may be possible to
abnormal mobility and grating of the articular surfaces, or by
abnormal pressure--for example, over the tarsal bones in cases of
abnormally rapid even when the temperature falls nearly to normal.
abnormally vascular, and coloured brown from the deposit of blood
abolish slavery north of the Missouri Compromise line, and they spread
abolished and the freedmen given the ballot. The Southern planters who
abolished the old scheme of mayor and council and vested all power in
abolished the rule limiting the suffrage to church members, substituting
abolished, they still remained the staples, but far-sighted
abolished; and in order that the mayor could be held to account, he was
abolishing slavery in the territories. The precedent of the Northwest
abolition growing upon the horizon. It formed, as they viewed matters, a
abolition of entangling alliances. The whole world was discussing the
abolitionists and feared by Henry Clay, ensued, the ostensible cause
abolitionists. An issue was set even for the moderate and timid who had
about 100 (Fig. 25). The tongue is foul, the breath heavy, and, as a
about 100 o F., are injected into the subcutaneous tissue of the abdomen
about 105 o F. into a vein or into the subcutaneous tissue is useful
about 1890 most of the desirable land available under the Homestead act
about 30,000 went for the upkeep of the estate near Moscow, the town
about Arakcheev, and then about the Bible Society. Once or twice
about Speranski which was still going on between the two old men.
about a dozen of the serf mummers and drive to "Uncle's."
about a week. Lactation has no appreciable effect on the number of
about an hour in the dense fog, the greater part of the men had to
about and if others did not understand him it was so much the worse
about and that the little washing wharf, torn from its place and
about at one and the same time. This simultaneous discussion of many
about by the action of one or other of the organisms that we have now to
about him and Count Markov? Count Markov was the only man who knew how
about him with surprise. This was the French drummer boy captured that
about him; or, "No, don't, we'd better wait!" He listened to the
about his arms and baring his chest in the vain attempt to breath more
about laws that excluded them from the ballot. Two women at least left
about one-fifth of the inhabitants were from Africa. To the North, the
about packing for the journey.
about something and made a change in the dressings, turning the
about that the sons and daughters of Virginia and the Carolinas mingled
about the Austrians and their uniforms, about their lines, about
about the French, the elder, as though shielding himself, had replied,
about the Prussian army, Helene had suddenly found it necessary to see
about the army leaving Moscow, a thin, sallow, tattered French soldier
about the attempted abduction of Rostova. He resolutely denied these
about the balance of power, and the latter, evidently interested by
about the confusion of their affairs, and Nicholas again put it off.
about the final settlement.
about the first room in a nightcap and hospital dressing gown, with
about the joint, or lie snugly in one of its recesses until disturbed by
about the laws of human life.
about the meaning of the mutations of power in time it can answer
about the old prince and planning something, and this disquieted and
about the practical conduct of campaigns. All along, the British were
about the same question, and beg you to choose a good moment to hand
about the war at Anna Pavlovna's severely condemned Barclay de
about the welfare of his peoples--at the time when Napoleon in exile
about the yard gazing at his worn-out boots with lowered head and a
about the yard, and still they went on searching for and finding
about three-quarters of an hour. The pus is allowed to escape by a small
about to get rid of stiffness, and the sounds were always
about to the music on wet boards, and young girls and old men, and the
about tomorrow's undertaking, that he might not be unworthy of the
about which experts differ widely. In the field of military and naval
about whom she used to have quarrels with the too indulgent count,
about with Germans all day. We went with Weyrother to survey the
about with uncertainty at the Continental Congress, his wife was writing
about, chairs scraped, the band struck up in the gallery, and the
about, their superiors, located in the background, re-formed them
above 12,000 is considered abnormal. When leucocytosis is present, the
above all quite forgetting the danger and all regard for
above all there is the well-known conversation after the council,
above all, the French will be here any day now, so what are we waiting
above is fairly good. The separation of the dead part is always attended
above the Prechistenka Boulevard, surrounded and sprinkled on all
above the age of twenty-one, only about 8600 registered under the
above the claims of the provinces. No differences of opinion as to his
above the clavicle, and winging of the scapula; the patient is unable to
above the disease is the best line of treatment. Unlike actinomycosis,
above the elbow, and it must not cause pain either where it is applied
above the elbow. Agitated and flushed she turned round. He was looking
above the hyoid bone, and receives lymph from the tongue. _The
above the level of the surrounding skin, as may readily be recognised by
above the sac.
above the seat of infection, to prevent the poison passing into the
above the very middle of it, some strange airy structure was being
above the wrist. Passive movements and massage must be commenced as
above their head. Thousands of crows rose above the walls and
above us both...." He lifted his head and again the thick vein in
abrasions of the skin prevents this being done. When this is the case,
abroad, but there was still the same bewitching combination of majesty
abrupt and uncontrolled movements of the limbs may play a part in their
abscess cavity, dangerous bleeding may occur when the abscess bursts or
abscess fills up again, the procedure should be repeated; in doing so,
abscess has already infected the skin, each focus should be scraped and
abscess in the overlying soft parts. When situated in the articular ends
abscess increases these become shorter, until the patient is hardly ever
abscess is one of its characteristic features. The swelling may attain a
abscess or the density of the bone surrounding it, the pus is not
abscess the pus usually works its way towards the surface, and "points,"
abscess to permit of absorption; this is shown also by the fact that
abscess, an infected compound fracture, or an infection of the cavity of
abscess, and give rise to sinuses. The best treatment is to excise the
abscess, as is often the case, in the neck and axilla, the opening may
abscess, at once escapes on the surface.
abscess. In the quiescent stage the lesion is represented by a small
abscess. When this is incised the necrosed glands may be found lying in
abscess_. The infection may arise from the material used, especially
abscesses and ulcers; the nearest group of glands become infected at an
abscesses in the neck are sometimes more difficult to differentiate on
abscesses should be opened, and the further spread of infection
abscesses, the skin being its normal habitat.
absence of citizens and of a deputation, and even the burning of
absence of freedom, by so doing we should destroy the very
absence of functionating valves in the veins of the head and neck, so
absence of pain, of tenderness, and of common sensibility. The freedom
absence. Little Nicholas had been unwell for four days. The coachman
absent or little marked, however, the amount of suffering may be great.
absent-minded men. Bagration was the best, Napoleon himself admitted
absent-mindedly not at the map, but at Prince Andrew's face.
absent. The size, shape, and level of the cicatrix depend upon the
absolutely disbelieved both the princess' hints and the letter, but he
absorb the very best a man shows of himself. Natasha without knowing
absorbed and leave in its place a fibrous cicatrix. In the interior of a
absorbed in a map laid out on the logs. Without lifting his head he
absorbed in his mastery of the matter.
absorbed in the role he had created for himself. As is often the
absorbed in the struggle to preserve the union. They held no suffrage
absorption is superadded to the loss of fluid.
absorption of toxic products from the tumour. They ultimately destroy
abundance in the North and South. "Every farm house," says Coman, the
abundant exudate of clear lymph. From neglect of cleanliness, the skin
abundant supply of free labor kept the Northern wheels turning.
abundant that it forms a thick crust on the surface, and in the flat
abuse flew from side to side, and all the faces bore the same
abuses and designed to accomplish tangible results in the name of public
abuses that existed under the former order of things--threatening to
academic interest, but one that may raise important issues in the law
acceding to her proposition we detach her from the bands, bring her
accent, spoke particularly slowly, as if to impress the fact that
accept as the regular thing in the capital though new to them in the
accept for himself, he kept in touch with the circle which confers
accept it and fixed the stake himself. Nicholas submitted to him,
accept the popular nominee and the country witnessed the spectacle of a
accept. On April 30, they signed the treaty of cession, agreeing to pay
acceptance of that solution of the question, and historic
accepted at face value, the Greenbackers believed that the entire
accepted in spite of the alleged occurrence of occasional exceptions.
accepted that the only possible attitude toward them was one of good
accepted the idea of manhood suffrage. Even then he was unable to
accepted the inevitable with such good grace as they could command. All
accepted the inheritance together with the obligation to pay the
accepted the new government as lawful, the United States steadily
accepted the ownership of other things as well as land in fulfillment of
accepted the wise reasoning contained in the Mason's words, or
accepted? Why was the battle of Borodino fought? There was not the
access to a mucous membrane, such as that of the bladder, urethra, or
access to the interior of the abscess, so that outlying pockets or
access to, the full Project Gutenberg-tm License must appear prominently
access to, the full Project Gutenberg-tm License must appear prominently
accession of George III the coveted opportunity came to them to rally
accidentally lowered the French eagle he was holding before the
accidentally under the Emperor's eye. A fifth, to achieve his
accompanied Paulucci, whom he had known in Turkey, into the drawing
accompanied by a hissing or gurgling sound, and with the next expiration
accompanied by a judicious selection of the candidate for Vice
accompanied by a loud-sounding hiccough, likened by the laity to the
accompanied by a mighty upswing of Northern industry which made the old
accompanied by a warning to the effect that the United States could not
accompanied by aerobic organisms, which, by using up the oxygen in the
accompanied by twitching of the facial muscles, it is called _spasmodic
accompanied by two hussars. The officer, the soldiers, and their
accompanied the repeal with a Declaratory Act. It announced that the
accompanied the rise of the textile industry in New England. In 1910,
accompanies the presence of a betrothed couple. Often when all sitting
accompaniment of arthritis. On account of the involvement of the
accompaniments of a severe sprain. On some particular movement, the
accompany the Emperor; he wanted to sleep, did not know how to ride
accompany the pulsation, but careful examination usually enables this to
accompanying ankylosis, it usually depends on changes in the ossifying
accomplished and belonged to the past.
accomplished by the improper use of the armed forces of the United
accomplished much for the welfare of mankind."
accomplished of itself better than we could desire; that the enemy
accomplished that much better than warfare. If the aim was the
accomplished that purpose, independently of anything the Russian
accomplished that will always remain the greatest glory of the Russian
accomplished; and at the same time he began to be conscious of the
accord with the accepted tone of the moment. But the general opinion
accord with the historic facts.
accorded them the rights of people at war--a measure which aroused anger
according to any coherent or uniform plan by the British government,
according to merit, was careful to fill most of the vacancies as they
according to our greater or lesser knowledge of the circumstances in
according to the causes at work in producing or maintaining them--for
according to the chance promptings of the throng.
according to the degree of irritation required. A mustard leaf or
according to the discipline prescribed by Congress.
according to the nature, virulence, and location of the organisms
according to the point of view from which the action is regarded,
according to the program his present accusers would have given him--of
according to the seat of the aneurysm.
according to the written code, but under this unwritten law. He felt
according to their respective numbers, counting the whole number of
according to their respective populations, but the returns were
according to them was the chief cause of the liberal movement at the
according to whether it is progressive or undergoing repair. The shadow
accordingly cut off the trade and business of the hostile member and
accordingly, until the disability be removed, or a President shall be
account changing public sentiment, blew hot and cold, losing the state
account for the submission of millions. And therefore to explain how
account of his meeting with Princess Mary. The countess did not
account of the Standard Oil Company, revealing the ruthless methods of
account of the apparently expansile character of the pulsation
account of the escape of the Russian. To the noncommissioned officer's
account of the liability to lesions of the mouth and throat, he should
account of the tendency to visceral complications, the tenure of life is
account of the wide area of contusion which surrounds the actual wound
account of the words that had been set to it, beginning: "Alexander,
account, failed because it could not find a single informer. The very
account. And during the two days of the young man's visit he was
account. In the midst of this action England and Spain, discovering the
accountant who had asked permission to be present at the battle out of
accounts for the condition being occasionally confused with the
accounts for the frequency with which diseases of bacterial origin
accounts of battles, involuntarily pictured to himself the course of
accounts to settle, so I have received what was due from the Ryazan
accumulate, the respiration becomes shallow and laboured, the face of a
accumulates, and the gland and its duct become distended into a cyst.
accumulation of all powers, legislative, executive, and judicial, in the
accumulation of fluid in the wound prevented. When much oozing is
accumulation of great fortunes, the increase of poverty in the
accumulation of riches and the growth of a large urban working class.
accumulations of capital to carry on such business; (3) the possibility
accurate conclusion regarding the range at which the gun was discharged,
accurately apposed, wounds of the stomach and intestine heal with great
accurately with the extent of the lesion in the marrow.
accused him of having "stolen Mr. Bryan's thunder," by harrying the
accustom ourselves to the fact that for our epoch histories of that
accustom the old prince to her.
accustomed to that he decided to go. The thought immediately
accustomed to that idea and have become so used to it that the
accustomed to, or some pretty young Polish lady. If the thought that
achieved miracles of valor. The soldiers, officers, and generals were
achievements of diplomacy. The importance of this field of activity was
acid, after the patient is anaesthetised.
acid, may also induce local tissue necrosis, the general appearances of
acid, or, when the odour of iodoform is objected to, of equal parts of
acknowledge it to himself, his faith in the right ordering of the
acknowledging Mary's superiority, but at the same time by saying it
acknowledgment of the impossibility of changing a man's convictions by
acquaintance Count Willarski, who had introduced him to the lodge in
acquaintance at the ball. Apart from considerations of politeness
acquaintance with any one of the three before; of how, realizing the
acquaintance," said Pierre. And again, glancing at the stranger's
acquaintances near her. From habit she scrutinized the ladies'
acquaintances, but there were no men who could at all vie with the
acquaintances, struck her that summer for the first time with cruel
acquaintances, told him there was a place left for him in the small
acquaintances, were at the Razumovskis' chapel, for, as if expecting
acquaintances, while they were talking about the weather, asked if
acquainted she asked that one of the young ladies should come into her
acquiesce with satisfaction; confident that the good sense of our
acquiesced in the action, evidently regarding it as a distinct warning
acquire the characters of _condylomata_, also at the angles of the
acquired a mixed infection_ with the virus of soft chancre, which will
acquired depends upon the fact that as a result of the reaction between
acquired disease. When curving of the tibia causes disability in
acquiring a trotter of his own, very stylish riding breeches of the
acquiring strategic points for naval power in distant seas, the same
acquisition of Louisiana let the Mississippi flow "unvexed to the sea";
acquisition of the disease.
acres lower down where the city of Cincinnati was founded. Other
across his path. Rostov put his horse to full gallop to get out of the
across his puffy face, and bowing low and respectfully he took the
across the deserted field. "No, it can't be!" thought Rostov, taking a
across the field setting the borzois on the hare. The tranquil Ilagin,
across the isthmus, long a dream of navigators, had become a living
across the passage; but this dreadful incessant moaning made her
across the plains and over the buffalo trails. In a single year, 1884,
across the rich wheat fields of Ohio, Indiana, and Illinois. Baltimore,
across the river. The troops, knowing of the Emperor's presence,
across the sea. The immigrants set to work with a will. They cut down
across the snow-covered road, did not once wake up on the way to
across, blocking the way for everyone. The countess tried to make
across. From the bridge they had a view of endless lines of moving
act for the king when he was incapacitated.
act in the name of the United States; it limits the powers of Congress
act of 1918 provided that the Sherman law should not apply to companies
act of the Maryland legislature designed to paralyze the branches of the
act on Natasha. Flushed and agitated she went about the house all that
act on the column of blood in the veins of the lower limbs, is also an
act took the contest from the realm of opinion. As John Adams said:
acted toward them, and feeling all the strength of her love for
acting upon him. What is conscience and the perception of right and
acting: there is war in Russia! The enemy is advancing to destroy
action and management of the concern.... The slaveholders, contributing
action began he had withdrawn from the wood, mustered the men who were
action by the political branches of the federal government as the
action decides the fate of the capital and of your empire! Russia will
action evoked protests from the colonists. They held a Stamp Act
action for the first time.
action he followed up by an open charge that the bank had used money
action is markedly depressed, and the pulse is soft and compressible.
action itself less frequently than the soldiers, but they already give
action itself, but only gives general orders concerning the movement
action itself, the more they command and the fewer of them there
action of a man subject solely to the law of inevitability without any
action of bacteria on the tissues. The invading organism is usually one
action of certain chemical agents of which carbolic acid, the
action of the _X-rays_ as soon as the wound has healed. The employment
action of the associated organisms and the combined effects of their
action of the organisms and their toxins on the adjacent tissues leads
action of the same forms of bacteria. They may occur separately or in
action of the threads is to convert the cyst wall into granulation
action on the federal amendment. Between 1878 and 1896 the Senate
action they had been wounded. "Day before yesterday, on the Danube,"
action was taken by Congress on April 19, 1898, and approved by the
action would be considered an act of war against the League, which would
action, and in the company of well-known, elderly, and respected
action, could be heard briskly exchanging shots with the enemy in
action, the relation between those taking part in it is always the
action, we shall never know the whole chain since it is endless, and
action--action!" So spoke John Brown of New York. During the sanguinary
action. It is not referred to the line of the sciatic nerve, nor is
action; and in March, 1773, the House of Burgesses passed a resolution
actions had been the peoples' welfare and that he could control the
actions of the mass but is itself continually controlled. It may
actions were not as rash as its words. The Hartford convention merely
active and independent spirits among the farmers and gathering to itself
active during the progress of an inflammation; and bronchial catarrh is
active in a movement to improve the navigation of the Potomac. He
active in converting the natives to the Christian faith and enterprising
active in this way, the tuberculous tissue undergoes softening and
active links or immediate access to the full terms of the Project
active links or immediate access to the full terms of the Project
active long afterwards, when some depression of the patient's health
active sympathy with the Southern cause. Editors were arrested and
actively flexed and extended, the fringes may be felt moving under the
activities, in turn, stimulated shipbuilding, steadily enlarging the
activities--the idea that there is not and cannot be any science of
activity is inconceivable without the physical, the cause of the event
activity of an historical leader which serves to express the
activity of men can do without the conception of power, the
activity of the general mass of men who take part in it--to be
activity reached Kutuzov's headquarters and the staffs of the
activity, Tushin did not experience the slightest unpleasant sense
actresses! The police tried to interfere, and what did the young men
actresses--with the chief of whom, Mademoiselle George, he was said to
acts of Parliament. Having its seat of power in the English monarchy, it
acts were burdensome and grievous; and that the right to petition the
acts, records, and proceedings shall be proved, and the effect thereof.
actual gangrene of the distal part, or even of the whole finger. There
actual pain, from which relief is at once obtained by raising the limb.
actual phrase used by the Vienna cabinet," said the Danish charge
actual ulcers of the skin, especially in winter. In aggravated cases the
actually had so bad an effect that Dron had finally given up the
actually harmful, to him in the world he had lived in--his strength,
actually passed such a law in 1920. Congress in the Esch-Cummins railway
acute abscess take place, modified, however, by the fact that the pus
acute angle--so that the left flank was at Shevardino, the right flank
acute bed-sore beginning as a blister, and passing on to the formation
acute cases the disease proves fatal in ten days or a fortnight, death
acute symptoms have passed off, and by feeling bare bone with the probe.
acutely the more he tried to conceal its effects--the surroundings
added an equally bitter quarrel over the location of the national
added in Russian--but pronouncing the word with a French accent-
added the unpleasant recollection of her interview with Princess
added to the base the horn increases in length (Fig. 100). The _wart_
added, addressing the men with a rapid movement of his chin.
added, however, that the contagiousness of inherited syphilis is denied
added, stopping at the door, "why I'm especially fond of that music?
added, taking Pierre's hand in a friendly manner, "We are on the eve
addition of forty or fifty thousand words. Finally, there is the high
addition produce chemical poisons (toxins) which aggravate the
addition to our therapeutic measures, and the simplicity of its
addition to sharing every hardship of pioneering, often the heavy labor
addition to the features of the disease with which they are associated.
addition to the powers exercised by the governors in the royal
addition, is described as the "sabre-blade" deformity. Among lesions of
addition, the nearest chain of lymph glands must also be removed, even
address Dolokhov. Suddenly a cannon ball hissed so low above the crowd
address him. "They call me 'little falcon' in the regiment. How is one
addressed George III, Paine went to the other extreme and assailed him
addressed the obstinately taciturn Rostov, saying that the latter
addressed the soldiers.
addressed to any political assembly in the world." Mr. Justice Field in
addressed to him. We search, but none are to be found. The field
addressed to others. 'Ah! So that's the way they treat me! No
addresses later published under the title of _The New Freedom_. He
addressing Natasha. "You know it happened the very day we were
addressing another, "ride along the line and that tomorrow we attack."
addressing her with the careless tone of habitual tenderness natural
addressing the Austrian general, "I have the honor to congratulate
addressing the Englishman.
addressing the black-mustached Denisov with servile deference.
addressing the mother.
addressing the rain, he repeated: "Now then, now then, go on! Pelt
adds to the horrors of the disease.
adhere to the cause of Union. In the Confederacy itself nearly all
adhere to the vessel wall, where they may accumulate in large numbers.
adherent, it should be removed along with the tumour.
adherents demanded a retirement into the depths of the country in
adherents of the Established Church displeased Dissenters. The
adhering and starting the bleeding afresh when it is removed.
adhering to the policy of "watchful waiting." One of them, a high Tory,
adhesions have formed and that these interfere with the recovery of
adhesions which obliterate the cavity of the joint or divide it into
adhesions. If there is much pain, a blister may be applied to the
adhesions; while in more acute cases the tendon sloughs. The pus may
adjacent lymph vessels and glands. The occupation of the patient may
adjacent nerve centres and nerve tracts, and is liable to become the
adjacent portion of healthy skin. It is readily found in the mucous
adjacent structures, and the function of the associated muscle is
adjacent tissues, is sometimes the result of a primary infection through
adjacent vessels the seat of thrombosis. Immediately there is intense
adjoining the epidermis is known as the papillary portion, and contains
adjunct to business, became the leaders in business.
adjusted himself on his seat, lowered his hands, moved a little to the
adjusting a fold of the dress with her little hand, now arranging
adjutant reproached him for not having stayed at the palace, and
adjutant to Raevski's Redoubt. His horse lagged behind the
adjutant to the commander in chief--a post his father had procured for
adjutant was also there and sat dozing on the rolled-up bedding,
adjutants galloped off, and an hour later, Lavrushka, the serf Denisov
adjutants general remained with the army to keep the commander in
adjutants general were there because they always accompanied the
administer nourishment or drugs either through a stomach tube or by the
administered before there is any destruction of tissue, the benefit
administered, over-stimulation being avoided. The inhalation of oxygen
administering the drug.
administration by the mouth of sal-volatile, whisky or brandy, and the
administration had to tap every available source of income. The duties
administration of New York, was a German from Frankfort-on-Main. The
administration of drugs and in the use of exploring needles, are not
administration of justice, of affording facilities for the payment of
administration of the federal government, the President obtained from
administration of the national domain. The science of forestry was
administration they did attack the protective system in the House, where
administration through royal governors was the second and opposite
administration were equally eager for admission to the union as soon as
administration, the union had been saved. To it the veterans of the war
admiration at the very oak he sought. The old oak, quite transfigured,
admires the bee sucking from the chalice of a flower and says it
admission of Missouri stripped of slavery; and the North, powerful in
admission to the union, a boon granted in 1836.
admit an unexplained force acting on the resultant. And that is just
admit--he had almost been jealous on his wife's account, was the
admitted her to the union, wearing "every jewel of sovereignty," as a
admitted. I nominated him and was the Rhetor. A strange feeling
adolescence; in the latter, union of the epiphyses at the ends of the
adolescent rickets plays an important part in the production of the
adopt toward the government?"
adopted and sent to the colonies and the crown for approval. The
adopted in 1864 it was declared "that foreign immigration, which in the
adopted the famous Ordinance of Nullification after a few days' debate.
adopted the practice of depositing huge amounts of government funds in
adopted the town-meeting plan of self-government after the fashion of
adopted them liable to the operations of the fourteenth amendment. The
adopted, in 1633. The river towns of Connecticut formed a representative
adopted. The convention, after nearly four months of debate in secret
adoption of this Constitution, shall be as valid against the United
adoption or rejection, Congress itself to transmit the document
adoring eyes off him. His brother and sisters struggled for the places
adroitly turned the conversation to insignificant matters. Natasha,
adult, causing expansion of the bone with decided increase in girth and
adults, being met with up to the age of fifty or sixty, and is
adults, on the scalp (Fig. 99), face, neck, back, and external genitals.
advance and never coincides with the direction of any one force.
advance if but one stage nearer Znaim. The offer of a truce gave the
advance of the French had ceased, the Russian army, which had been
advance, an exposure of the weakness of the French, and the
advance. Pioneers, pushing up through the valley of the Schuylkill,
advance. The French were putting out the fire which the wind was
advanced against the fresh forces he raised. The Allies defeated
advanced detachment as to the condition in which they had found the
advanced for a long time, always in the same fog, descending and
advanced to the table. Pressed by the throng against the high backs of
advanced up the Arbat. When they reached the end of the Vozdvizhenka
advanced. But fate cut short his designs. In the September following his
advancing frontier the leading features of cities in the old East; nor
advancing into those southern provinces (for the Russian army did
advancing straight toward the inner door.
advancing, were engaged in discussion with the sole object of
advantage of the Masonic cause in Russia. The Petersburg Freemasons
advantage of the discontent. He drafted a set of resolutions declaring
advantage of the privilege. I began the service from the lower grade."
advantage of their unguarded moments and repealed the law giving the
advantage to anyone, tormented her incessantly. His letters for the
advantage. He was merely a man of the world who had got on and to whom
advantageous in so far as these bring the deep surfaces of the skin into
advantages of any suggestions can be seen only at the moment of trial.
advantages of business on a national scale while preventing the evils
advantages of the new government, will draw thither farmers and artisans
advantages of the unwritten code of subordination--looked so fixedly
advantages to compensate for that expenditure, the intoxicating honors
adventure appealed to the restless and the lure of profits to the
adventure. The West was ablaze with excitement. A call for war ran
adventurers, settlers, and artisans. By 1847, more than one-fifth of the
adventures. His coming vexed me from the first, and I said something
advertisement, signed by the German Imperial Embassy, warning travelers
advertisements. The drag net was closely knit, for scarcely anything
advice, had bought a wood from the prince, had begun to trade, and now
advice; but no, you go and blurt it all straight out before the
advisable to wait for the formation of a line of demarcation before
advisable, but it is to be remembered that ulceration may recur in the
advisers and plans, destroyed the first army's energy and it retired.
advises the use of Esmarch's tourniquet, and that the curetting be
advocate remedies for the evils they discovered. By 1912 they were a
advocated a new constitution for the colony and absolute independence
advocated strengthening the ties of commerce. "Smooth the roads," he
affair of the Thabor Bridge, at Vienna.... They have crossed without
affair of the inlaid portfolio. Pierre signed the deed and after
affair reached the Tsar. After a while the Tsar's decree came: to
affair with the purchaser was going on satisfactorily, and there was
affair. It seemed to him essential to see Natasha. In the evening he
affairs and of Pierre himself in those early days. From the death of
affairs in the immense importance of which she firmly believed.
affairs may assign campaigns to members of the class for study and
affairs was profoundly altered by the growth of the huge corporations
affairs without delay; in the event of the nerve being torn, the ends
affairs, "ma pauvre mere" playing of course an important part in the
affairs, including the right to admit new members. The company was in
affairs. Many artisans, as well as all the women, were excluded from the
affairs. The restoration of the monarchy in 1660, accompanied by
affairs. This was the culmination of forces that had long been
affect chiefly the hands and fingers, and yield to medicinal treatment.
affect the size and tension of these fluid swellings is useful in
affectation of doing so against his will. The races, the English Club,
affectation, pride, and contemptuous irony, and acquired the
affectation. Princess Mary ran out of the room to fetch Mary
affected adjutant, or really let the matter drop, was the question
affected and when the cord lesion is such as will permit of the patient
affected area while the disease continues to extend at the margin.
affected chatter. Jests fell flat, news was not interesting, and the
affected cords being exposed and stretched through an incision in the
affected limb the nerve bundles supplying the spastic muscles, and, by
affected more often than girls, in the proportion of three to one,
affected part and to the accumulation of leucocytes and proliferated
affected part, but this is seldom feasible except in the case of the
affected tissues, after which the wound is cauterised by the actual
affected, amputation is the best treatment, but in the case of a finger
affected, the nodules rarely appear below the level of the deltoid or
affected. After a number of such attacks, the lymph vessels appear to
affected. The disease is of slow progress and may become arrested; life
affected. The secondary suppurations are liable to be overlooked unless
affected; ankylosis of the temporo-maxillary joints, however, greatly
affecting the common cause. Such, sir, is the concert and vigilance and
affection amongst apes would appear to be in proportion to the nearness
affection and gratitude. The princess heard her, not heeding her words
affection as it occurs _in the long bones_. Gummatous disease in the
affection for the government they left behind and sacred fire from the
affection for the king's person and government, firmly spread on record
affection is sometimes painful, but with the formation of the ulcer the
affection makes its appearance a few days after the commencement of a
affection met with chiefly in the knee-joint of boys who are the
affection persists or relapses, it is best to excise the bursa. The
affection the swelling is nodular and uneven, and the subjective
affection, and is analogous to tuberculous disease of the synovial
affection, particularly phthisis. The treatment is restricted to
affection. In recent cases the symptoms subside under rest and the
affectionate to him, especially the youngest, the pretty one with
affectionately. Princess Mary flushed and ran out of the room. A few
affections from a fall on the shoulder, pressure, or over-use of the
affections of the Chinese people and, in the long run, as he remarked
affections of the boisterous West. Farmers of Ohio, Indiana, and
affections of the skin, mouth, or throat, already described. In the
affects the air-passages. The diphtheritic process may spread from the
affects the gums, the teeth may become loose and fall out.
affects the limbs and superficial parts, leaving gangrene of the viscera
affects the vessels of the great saphena system; less frequently those
afferent lymph vessels. These vessels may share in the inflammation and
affianced lover: he did not use the familiar thou, but said you to
affiliated with the National Manufacturers' Association or with similar
affirmatively.) "When you hear a knock at the door, you will uncover
affirmed, moreover, the main contention of the silver faction that a
afflicted the country. In the spring and summer of 1857, fourteen
afford them proper protection. She handed this to the princess.
afforded by the tearing of the middle meningeal artery caused by the
afforded him pleasure, and he went quickly up to the prisoners, who
afforded only bringing misery more sharply to the foreground. Those who
affording an outlet for stock, there sprang up to the westward cattle
affording them ground for discontent akin to that which had moved the
affords in this world and the next. Helene was touched, and more
afraid lest Your Majesty, in the goodness of your heart, should
afraid that the majority might lay an unfair burden of taxes upon them.
after Napoleon was overthrown and sent into exile at Elba in the spring
after Natasha as if she had been a sick child. The last weeks passed
after Natasha down the passage into the sitting room with flushed face
after a Russian bath. The movement of these wrinkles formed the
after a fortnight's retreat, the Russian troops had halted and after a
after a line of demarcation has formed. The dying part loses sensibility
after a sharp night frost, and the cheerful glitter of that autumn day
after a short pause. "Besides, would the princess have me? And
after a sufficient interval, evidence of having been eroded, in the
after all not managed to present at the right moment, though she had
after an interval, to prevent relapse of disease in the glands.
after another greeting the Tsar with the strains of the march, and
after another, the agitation for equal suffrage came to the front. If
after birth. When the tumour is made up of a meshwork of caverns and
after dinner I shall take the Iberian icon of the Mother of God to the
after dividing the overlying soft parts. In the follicular variety, it
after her meal. "What are you saying about the government? I don't
after him (the most insulting expression a cavalryman can address to a
after him. On the way he came upon a bush, his gallant horse cleared
after himself and, in passing through to the drawing room, stopped a
after his marriage--when the marriageable daughters and their
after it was over, the adjutant he had seen the previous day
after plunder, leaving the men. Disregarding Napoleon they rushed
after reading the letter she replied by asking him to go, but to fix a
after that there was not a single battle. The French did not move.
after that. These were temptations of the devil and Princess Mary knew
after the Reformation the peoples massacred one another, nor why
after the Senate was won over, a Democratic President, James Buchanan,
after the adjutant comes the commissary general asking where the
after the adoption of the Constitution. In short, he was of the age that
after the battle of Borodino, when the surrender of Moscow became
after the brilliant surroundings in which he had last met his friend
after the collapse of his plans and the surrender of his army in 1777,
after the collision as inevitably as a ball recoils after colliding
after the discharge has ceased. There is no connection between the
after the doctor. Perhaps he'll take pity on me someday, when it comes
after the excited nobleman, and all in the same tone. Many spoke
after the finances of the embarrassed debtor, they would resort to armed
after the first.
after the healing of a sinus, the treatment is to excise the scar.
after the lapse of some time turn out to be mistaken in his view of
after the memorable campaign of 1896.
after the murder of the duc there was one martyr more in heaven and
after the new.
after the old count's death, now after staying a short time in Orel-
after the plunder and Napoleon managed to escape.
after the review I shall expect you, Drubetskoy. Au revoir!" exclaimed
after the soup the prince became more genial.
after the unmarried girls, especially the rich heiresses who were most
after the war as absolutely necessary to prevent the former leaders in
after their active service, were stationed near Olmutz and the camp
after they were over. After his liberation he reached Orel, and on the
after troops and begged for seats on the gun carriages. The jaunty
after which he ceased coming to the Rostovs'.
after year, the machinery for political and judicial control over
after-treatment the functions of the tendons must be preserved by
after? The commander in chief is expected and you leave your place?
afterwards became known as the Raevski Redoubt, or the Knoll
afterwards light gleamed from the east and the sun's rim appeared
again as a partner, and the old men began smilingly to talk about
again be unable to remember--yet they sat at tea round the samovar
again began kissing each other on the face, and then to Prince
again broken open, the padlocks smashed, the books mutilated, and
again every time she shook herself and moved toward the wood where she
again for the pleasure of telling you the truth. For Gallicisms I
again from the same point as before--Paris. The last backwash of the
again his blue eyes grew moist. "Hurrah!" cried the three hundred
again in the complete darkness Tushin's guns moved forward, surrounded
again in the sixties. During the war, industries and railways had
again inquired whether everything was going well on the farm. Her
again into scar tissue that will be strong enough to stand the strain on
again it passed the House; but the Senate itself was obdurate. Able
again leaned his arms on the back of the sofa and closed his eyes.
again looked at Pierre with the unconscious coquetry that had returned
again on the sofa. They were silent for a while.
again slept as he had done at Mozhaysk after the battle of Borodino.
again struck up, the count and countess kissed, and the guests,
again swam to the surface of his mind with peculiar clearness and
again the horses jostled one another and neighed, not disturbing the
again the next night. More than once he had enabled Dolokhov to escape
again to the house, she saw Mademoiselle Bourienne--who had remained
again vigorously advanced, preparatory to the next presidential
again without attempting to break through and take the road Kutuzov
again, and let this always be a reminder to me," and he pointed to the
again, and standing still in the middle of the room he raised his
again, and with his hand at the salute rode up to the general.
again, but a few days later the countess sent for Sonya and, with a
again, leaning with his arms on the back of the sofa, sat in his
again. He looked and recognizing in her both the old and the new
again. The infantry moved in the same way, sometimes running to
against "monopolies." It was patent that neither the Republicans nor the
against American sovereignty in the Philippines. The leader of the
against Britain the right of local trial by jury and with what
against European competition; it could not stop the continual issues of
against Spain and thus there was precipitated a war which ended in the
against Spain. On Washington's birthday, 1819, the treaty was signed. It
against all the walls of the room: it was her own heart, sinking
against an extension of slavery into the territories by act of Congress;
against candidates according to their stand on the demands of organized
against external aggression the political independence and territorial
against external aggression the territorial integrity and existing
against him, or to outflank him. He thought too of the possibility
against in applying this test clinically. When, for example, the walls
against invasion; and on application of the legislature, or of the
against slavery and poured them in upon Congress. The flood of them was
against taxation without their consent, as the Whigs had done in old
against the Alien and Sedition laws. He induced the legislature to pass
against the French?"
against the Manna Seekers, and fuss about an authentic Scotch carpet
against the ambitions of the few. "As I see it," he said in his address
against the competition of immigrants. In 1917 it won a thirty-year
against the epiphysial cartilage. This arrangement favours the lodgment
against the fleches could only be seen till they had entered the
against the foe made him forget his own sorrow. He was entirely
against the foreigners and an increase in patriotic zeal.
against the free state of Maine; but at the same time they assented to
against the government were the first statesmen and orators of the land.
against the growing Populist defection in Democratic ranks. When the
against the imperial arms of Britain. It was here that the British flag
against the inevitable or with anguish of heart they left as refugees
against the legislature and the people of the United States." Hamilton,
against the masses,' section against section, labor against capital,
against the mother country on account of the trade and navigation laws
against the pale-yellow stubble of the spring buckwheat. The wooded
against the political current. They were deprived of the energetic and
against the power once appointed, should be absolutely regarded as
against the railings. He looked back laughing to the Cossack who stood
against the redoubt and come into line with the rest of the forces.
against the refusal of the legislature to issue paper money. They seized
against the restoration of Spanish sovereignty, which meant a renewal of
against the same, or given aid or comfort to the enemies thereof. But
against the sentiment of the country was futile. At last in 1896 Utah
against the sovereign's wishes and who had removed the Grand Duke
against the walls of the hive in their flight. Here and there among
against the wattle.
against violations on the part of any state authorities.
age of the patient; it may be said to range from two or three drams in
age. In the House of Representatives there developed a group of young
aged voice, as he pulled together the shirt which gaped open on his
agencies were duly formed by the choice of men favoring the scheme, all
agent applied to the raw surface to promote the growth of healthy
agents. The axis cylinder depends for its nutrition on the central
aggravated also by any movement which tends to put the nerve on the
aggravated the open wound left by the war. Any number of political
aggravation of the disease and persistent suppuration, but there is a
aggregations of capital had been the leading feature in American
aggregations. The fluid in the dilated vessels is either clear or
aggrieved look on her face, hastily got into the coach to rearrange
agile hands in the same way. When did it happen and what has happened?
agility at convenient moments between the words, shouting, "Be off!
agitated by the encounter to be able to talk of the affair calmly.
agitated me all the time I was alone with him in the dark chamber. I
agitation of the subject. They were difficult to enforce and it was
agitation spread. The South was thoroughly frightened. It demanded
agitation. Though its vote was never large, the cause for which it
agitator. For mild speculation on the evils of the system was
ago have joined the archduke. And believe me on my honour that to me
ago the demand was that I should withdraw beyond the Vistula and the
agonising. In the early stages the paroxysms occur at wide intervals,
agonizing, sleepless night. But now, in the solitude of the journey,
agrarian civilization of the old Northwest and reaching out to the very
agree to be bound by the terms of this agreement.  There are a few
agree to be bound by the terms of this agreement.  There are a few
agreeable for them to think that the activity of their class
agreeable post of assistant to the head of the staff of the
agreeably ending Pierre's unpleasant and unamiable outburst. After the
agreed that the members of that chamber were to be apportioned among the
agreed to the repeal on February 22, 1766, amid the cheers of the
agreed with Mouton and issued orders--as the historians tell us--to
agreed with him less than ever. By the Emperor's orders Bagration
agreed, though the so-called Duke of Elchingen (Ney) ventured to
agreement co-operate to confirm that power. Chance forms the
agreement was carried by a vote of eight to one. The Republican party,
agreement with Canada, however, he forced through Congress in the face
agreement, providing among other things for our use of the harbor of
agricultural economy of that part of the country was changed in many
agricultural interest, as Jefferson said, the Republicans were in the
agricultural produce. The Southern colonies produced for shipping,
agriculture and industry, Hill was an active participant. His was the
agriculture cut off from its accustomed markets, the surplus of the
agriculture, except in the planting states of the Gulf. Even the lands
agriculture, the opening of vast food-producing regions told in a
agriculturists saw the dangers of depending upon a few crops. The mild
ahead of others, and the strokes of his whip fell on the apron of
aid and comfort. No person shall be convicted of treason unless on the
aid and repaid them by urging the enfranchisement of women.
aid of bounties, directly or indirectly given, either by the general
aid of the Confederate cause "illegal and void." Millions of dollars
aid the American military governor; but it resigned the next year after
aide-de-camp picked up and returned a glove Pierre had dropped; the
aides-de-camp passionately devoted to the Emperor, not merely as a
aiding the organisms and handicapping the tissues, such as the presence
aim now was to test the cadet's courage, so he drew himself up and
aim of our order, which is to obtain for virtue the victory over vice.
aim of the movement of humanity, he might have arranged matters
aim toward which he moved throughout the whole war. Obviously in spite
aim was the dissemination of ideas, the printing press could have
aims at closing the opening between the sac and its feeding artery, and
aims, to further the accomplishment of a stupendous result no one of
air was sharp, but toward evening the sky became overcast and it began
air was still, warm, and silent. Occasionally the whistle of a
air, as he pointed at the old men with his free hand.
air-guns are of frequent occurrence in civil practice, the weapon being
air-men. A rectangular flap of skin is marked out in the neck and chest,
air-passage, and on the oesophagus, giving rise to symptoms referable to
air. Mr. McKinley chose the older and more formal plan. He received
airplane dropped bombs on the American steamer _Cushing_. On the morning
alarm could be felt, but the nearer Prince Andrew came to the French
alarmed by the fact that Moscow had been abandoned by its
alcohol, plays an important part in the causation of aneurysm. These
alcohol; a rod of bone is inserted to fill the gap. In advanced cases
alike!" he said to himself, reflecting that he was not the only man
alike--were all disposed to treat the young heir in the most
alimentary canal. In cystitis, pyelitis, abscess of the kidney,
all American colonization schemes, canceled many of the land grants, put
all about it at the court-martial." Then he turned to Pierre. "Do
all administrators) that he controlled the external actions of
all are conscious sounds in the moral atmosphere of an army,
all as (in an effort to conceal our commanders' mistakes even at the
all at once, did not know how to do it. But again the sense that she
all branches of the government at a single popular election. As Hamilton
all comme il faut and in the latest fashion. This Natasha noticed at
all communication with such men as Klyucharev. And I will knock the
all control over national forests to trained men in the Bureau of
all countries of Europe, was designed to control the overseas
all criminals. And so thinks Timokhin and the whole army. They
all day, but he did not come. On the second and third day it was the
all die. Once in the regiment I had not gone to some merrymaking where
all directions from the Kremlin into which they had first marched. The
all discussions of the subject the creditors attempt to brush aside the
all else. He rose and went to the door to bolt and lock it. Everything
all ends and parts of the army, and in the night from the nineteenth
all feel awkward. Involuntarily feeling this at dinner on the first
all gathered round Nicholas in the sitting room.
all geniuses, who the historians declare had control of the army, took
all had no power to abolish slavery in the territories. Under the decree
all his debts," said the militia officer, speaking of Rostov.
all his time. Sonya alone directed the practical side of matters by
all hope of restoring to the throne the direct Stuart line; but they
all in clean notes, was lying ready under a handkerchief on the
all in his power to carry out the count's wishes, seeing clearly
all interests or desires, and the whole secret lies in the terrible
all is that into sarcoma, the so-called _malignant chondroma_ or
all its joys, is open to me?" said he to himself. And for the first
all kinds of syphilitic lesions, including even the blood in the
all like the conduct of a great man!"
all men, not only the French but all Europe--except England which does
all mingled into the same sweet and solemn hymn. "Oh, this is
all national matters; but others, frightened by the specter of
all nonsense, there's nothing of the kind. But what awaits us
all of them to the union. Men of more conservative views held that, as
all of war, even here amid fieldwork and the calm of nature--which
all others. "Well, you old sinner," she went on, turning to the
all over!" What might have been done without the French alliance lies
all parts of the Chinese empire." This was a friendly warning to the
all parts of the country and among all classes, the question of the hour
all practical purposes, it seemed, the sovereignty of Santo Domingo had
all ranks--the force of circumstances compelled it to retire beyond
all ridden by, Denisov touched his horse and rode down the hill.
all riding round the wolf, crying "ulyulyu!" shouting and preparing to
all rushed out of the village again, but Tushin's guns could not move,
all sides, Congress, in the closing days of Jefferson's administration,
all stood out in the transparent air in most delicate outline and with
all that grows does so by sprouting into two leaves, and that the
all that is required of them: the same is true of the skin and its
all that was required of him, but when they told him to bless the boy,
all that. The extraordinary military expenditures, requiring heavy taxes
all the Moscow ladies have conspired to give him all their sons as
all the Russians had put their whole strength must have been mortal.
all the Southwestern, Mountain, and Pacific states, except Texas and
all the armies and the whole region--powers no commander in chief ever
all the bales of cotton picked on Southern plantations. Iron, boots and
all the chains in front of, beneath, and behind this muscle are
all the children's property! You said yourself that we have a
all the depth of their national feeling, then the role chosen by
all the details of the victory and his own calm courage during the
all the dishes, wines, and kinds of dessert, in order to send a full
all the elements of royal prerogative against which Hampden had
all the enjoyment of that day was over. He did not go straight home
all the experience of old Cunctators."
all the interossei, the two medial lumbricals, and the adductors of the
all the lands down to the Rio Grande. The Mexicans placed the border of
all the law courts of the world, but which those who committed them
all the means at my command, I shall let my beard grow to here" (he
all the men he knew there was none he would so much like to have for a
all the other prisoners were exactly the ones they wanted and that
all the people at the ball alike were good, kind, and splendid people,
all the pleasanter for him, because, after his loss to Dolokhov (for
all the powers of her soul were intent on serving that husband and
all the present! Quicker, quicker--and that they should leave me in
all the revenue from the Penza estates which he had already mentally
all the rules of art. One can imagine what confusion and obscurity
all the rules--as if there were any rules for killing people. In spite
all the same an incompetent who was unable to do anything in 1807
all the same now?" thought he. "And what will be there, and what has
all the same the governor's wife went on with her matchmaking, passing
all the same, to the next house which seemed to them better. Many of
all the societies in Petersburg, and a passionate devotee of the new
all the strange new facts he had learned; but on reaching Orel he
all the uselessness of freeing the serfs, who were quite happy as it
all the wage-earners of the country lived and worked."
all the women with gems on their bare flesh, turned their whole
all the wrongs she had done him. When they prayed for those who love
all their own people who had settled down in the house almost as
all these cases the conception of freedom is increased or diminished
all things to His will; but tell me, Michaud, how did you leave the
all things to the Parliament at London, in which their small minority of
all this end?" thought Rostov, looking at the changing shadows
all this information, when the enemy has scattered his forces in large
all this, the soldiers of Denisov's squadron fed chiefly on
all time the long dispute as to the nature of the federal system. The
all to the fact.
all unfavorable to the growth of a servile population. Still, slavery,
all upon the consumption of the people." In this spirit the sponsors of
all who came from the field of battle, and of those who stood around
all--with his greatcoat as if it were a vestment, telling the soldiers
all-forgiving expression on her face, stood by the door near the
all-important. At least once a day, the sacrum, buttocks,
all. A few, unable to endure the thought of voting the Republican
allay pain the most useful local applications are ichthyol ointment (1
allay the sectional feelings engendered by the war. The Republicans
alleged abuses on the part of trusts; but it could hardly be said that
alleged insanity of the Swedes, Balashev wished to reply that when
alleged that the law of 1894, passed by a Democratic Congress, was "in
allegories of the toils of his pilgrimage, of holy friendship, of
alleviating the resulting deformities. In children suffering from
alleviating the severity of the spasms, but does not appear to have a
alliance with him, it means that that is the right thing to do. If
allies--the Poles. There are eighty thousand of them and they fight
allotted two apiece. The remaining states of New Zealand, Bolivia, Cuba,
allow for subsequent swelling. The fragments of fractured bones are
allow of the necessary purification.
allow of the removal of all the dead bone, including the most minute
allow yourself to be persuaded to make peace. They are burning for the
allowed her to share her sorrow, that all the old misunderstandings
allowed to retract, and especially if the wound suppurates, they become
allowed to vote for many years on the same terms as men.
allowing each the privilege of admiring her beautiful figure and
allowing the family groups to divide into separate households. He
allows oneself to regard the arrangements without religious awe of his
allusion to the name of the sovereign. Three hundred persons took
ally. We shall therefore confidently await the moment when the
almanacs that streamed from the types, the people could follow the
almost across the middle of the passage on the bare floor, lay a
almost all the historians are: freedom, equality, enlightenment,
almost any other form of external aneurysm. The available operative
almost as soon in fact as the adjutant had left Borodino--the bridge
almost constant occurrence, to a greater or less degree, in the aged
almost entirely deprived of bactericidal substances. In the case of
almost equal frequency in breech and in vertex presentations, and the
almost fatal to Dutch shipping in America, fell with severity upon the
almost insane--unprofitable to himself, to the count, and to the
almost straight at the wolf. There was still hope. A long, yellowish
almost the very words he had used to Alexander himself at Tilsit. "All
almost to his horse's mane and pulled up beside the hussar. He was
almost unentrenched position, with forces only half as numerous as the
alone amounted to $6,024,000; in other words, almost as much as the
alone in a hollow behind a hazel bush. The hounds had scarcely been
alone in the country."
alone on a chair in the ballroom, crossing one leg high over the
alone suffer from the affection in its typical form, while the tendency
alone together, Prince Vasili announced his hopes and wishes to the
alone took no part in the conversation which again became general. The
alone understood the Revolution and quelled it, and so for the general
alone was more than ten times the total national debt which the apostles
alone was of course sufficient. The novelty of Truth endowed her
alone with the old man he will talk things over and then come on to
alone, but also a love of strife that had moved him in the dispute.
alone..." came from various sides of the crowd.
along by two soldiers who supported him under the arms. There was a
along the dusty road came the infantry in ranks, bareheaded and with
along the frontier that was not checked even when, in November,
along the ground. The gory, dust-stained, half-shaven head with its
along the line of march between Philadelphia and Washington and thus to
along the lines of least resistance, partly under the influence of
along the lines of least resistance. In the case of a subcutaneous
along the lumen of the segment to be dealt with, and a ligature applied
along the lymph vessels of the arm. Pathologists, too, whose hands,
along the milk ducts opening on the nipple, or along the lymphatics
along the muddy, slippery road, looking at his feet and at the
along the nerve, which are exaggerated by movement and by pressure. The
along the path, Miss. Only, don't look back."
along the road and field leading to the Otradnoe covert.
along the road to the bridge. Petya, his heart in his mouth with
along the shafts of the phalanges.
along the southern border of Arizona and New Mexico was secured on
along the vein, and the solution is then slowly introduced; before
along with the instruments. Horse-hair and fishing-gut may be sterilised
along with the tumours with which they are associated. Rodent ulcer,
along with the wall of the associated abscess or sinus. If all the
along..." said he, glancing wearily round, and he stepped onto the
alongside the sac.
already abroad, the other is with the Guards, who are starting on
already at the tea table. The servants stood round the table--but
already attacking the town, everybody was asking what should be
already be seen. Prince Andrew stopped and began examining the
already been sold, and the other was mortgaged and the interest so
already been taken by the French as a trophy.)
already begun to get used in the corridor, was still stronger here. It
already descended into the valley toward the ponds and lakes and
already drunk enough, at the end of the feast proposed the Emperor's
already endured by the people, of the possibility of failure and so
already heard that story more than once and were tired of it. Only the
already in any case dishonored by being unable to fulfill the great
already marked out. President McKinley had defined the principles that
already on the friendliest terms--galloped back over abominable roads,
already on; the hairdressing was almost done. Sonya was finishing
already passed? To convince myself of this I do not lift it the next
already referred to--in their simplicity failing to understand the
already risen above the general who at the front had the power to
already seen the young master, and, before he had reached the
already so close that the expression of his face could be seen. And
already struck him by her beauty on the preceding day. Today, when
already thrown the reins of the snaffle bridle over the horse's
already urged upon the king secret aid for America before Deane appeared
already, Count? Well then, good-by! Oh, but the cushion for the
also Franklin was a member drafted the Constitution of the United
also a good way to get them instantly upon announcement, as the
also a good way to get them instantly upon announcement, as the
also be curved or otherwise deformed as a result of the original attack
also be found projecting from the epithelial lining of the cyst.
also brought new and serious problems to the governments of the states
also by honest opinion and matured conviction the exact opposite of
also cooperated with the British in the assault on the Hindenburg line.
also cut through. The failure to recognise this form of sensibility has
also from the pressure of an abscess or an aneurysm either inside the
also had to be placated. At last a plan of government was drafted--the
also happy because she had someone to adore her: the adoration of
also in the subcutaneous and intermuscular cellular tissue, and in the
also increased in length, so that they become convoluted. The adjacent
also laid the judicial foundation for a broad and liberal view of the
also met with in the larynx, in the ducts of the breast, and in the
also on the iliac veins, causing oedema of the legs. They are liable to
also produced "a crass inequality in the bargaining relation of the
also profoundly impressed the brilliant English writer, Harriet
also risen and was moving through the crowd toward the actress.
also simulate tetanus, but an analysis of the symptoms will prevent
also the steel skewers used by Spence and Wyeth, or a special clamp or
also there. She had been married during the previous winter, and being
also this man with the white forehead, black eyebrows, and red lips.
also, the damage done by a full charge of shot is much more extensive
also, to order the battery to retire as quickly as possible. When
altar of the parent city; but thousands of the immigrants who came to
alter such regulations, except as to the places of choosing senators.
alteration in the structure of the vessels, and is allied to tumours of
alterations in the colour of the effused blood take place as a result of
alterations, and the X-ray shadow does not differ from the normal. It is
alterations, the muscle elements first undergoing fatty degeneration,
altered blood, forms (Fig. 29). Meanwhile the induration extends, fresh
altering his routine, retired as usual after dinner. The little
although cases are occasionally met with in which it lies nearer the
although it did not reestablish the United States Bank so hated by
although less rapidly obtained results follow the introduction of saline
although many circumstances prepared the way for his success. Louis
although sometimes beneficial, seldom arrests the progress of the
although the difficulty of securing revenue made necessary a lower rate
although the methods employed to put them into practice have been
although the muscles are irresponsive to ordinary physiological stimuli,
although these drugs may relieve pain. The conclusive point is the
although they may appear to be circumscribed by condensation of the
although they very rarely acquire the disease _de novo_, it is possible
altogether, a thing which seemed so difficult out in the world, but so
altogether. Though staggered by the proposal, he and Monroe decided to
always accompanied any reference of hers to the Imperial family,
always an Englishman"--a doctrine rejected by the United States in
always be the chief desire of everyone else.
always comes as a surprise, when the sun hangs low and gives more heat
always commences in the upper third of the shaft, which harmonises with
always ends in the same way, he feels as certainly convinced as before
always goes on to suppuration with the formation of sinuses.
always had before his mind's eye the estate as a whole and not any
always has it, especially so the general, who admired the apartment,
always hide it?" said the voice of the man who was stretching himself,
always in the public interest.
always looked as clean and well washed as the tips of one's fingers
always plenty of room to avoid capture and there is the night when
always seemed to me to have an excellent heart, and that is the
always seen at the evening parties he wished to imitate. They had
always so many conjectures as to the issue of any event that however
always stopped, or was stopped, at the point beyond which his
always strove toward the infinite, the eternal, and the absolute,
always takes place through an abraded surface, and usually on one of the
always the most stubborn who remain victors," replied Raevski, "and in
always the same life that is no life, and the same surroundings in
always will be," he continued, returning to the talk in the study
always winning, suddenly just when he has calculated all the chances
am I to do?" thought she, recalling all the signs that clearly
am much amused to watch the change in the tone and manners of the
am now going to the war, the greatest war there ever was, and I know
ambassador in London, "is the best I have ever known. From every quarter
ambassador was there, and a foreign prince of the blood who had of
ambassador, coolly remarked that it was "the sudden appearance of
ambiguous in the controversy. Especially was this true, because the
ambitions of Napoleon III. During the administration of Buchanan, Mexico
ambitions, broke out in another general conflict such as had shaken the
ambulance station on the field of Borodino. His feverish state and the
amendment declaring "Louisiana, as ceded by France,--a part of the
amendment forbade the United States or any state to pay any debts
amendment of the Constitution was adopted in 1804, changing slightly the
amendment of the Constitution?
amendment to the Constitution which required a two-thirds vote in
amendment to the federal Constitution as a price of restoration to the
amendment to the federal Constitution establishing national prohibition
amendment was obviously impossible--the Southern states were too
amendment was submitted for approval, the ratification was surprisingly
amendment was written in the same spirit as the first ten, after a
amendment which gave citizenship to the freedmen, assured them of the
amendment which worked the sweeping disabilities we have just described.
amendment, abolishing slavery throughout the United States. By the end
amendment, coming from many directions, led the suffragists to believe
amiably into his face, evidently wishing to soften the rudeness of his
amid the ranks of infantry to the right of the battery came the
ammonium. The dose is usually a matter of experiment in each individual
among "the most vital internal problems" of the age, and forcibly
among all the people--the crudest kind of communism.
among the colonies in resistance to British measures.
among the extreme radicals were foreign in birth and citizenship.
among the flower tubs and hid there.
among the mass of readers who have a taste for what they call "serious
among the mighty nations of the earth.
among the opponents of the Constitution in the days of its adoption.
among the people in the defense of Moscow, Pierre had met the
among the states there were occasional flurries of hope for immediate
among the suite and said in French:
among the troops near by the news spread that the Emperor was
among the troops. Beside the cannon a cart was standing to which two
among the women!"
among them skilled artisans who contributed to the rapid growth of
among them) were to be tried for incendiarism. On the third day he was
among them, grudging and stingy no doubt, but still cooperation. The
among them, of generous aid from sympathetic men in the long agitation
among them--remained for a while without any definite opinion on the
among whom was Pierre. On the twenty-second of October that party
amount of the drug. It should be taken after meals, with abundant water
amount of the principal alone, returning a percentage of value greater
amounted by this time to more than fifty million dollars; the commerce
amounted to cruelty. Had he forced her to prostrate herself to the
amounted to double the value of the property.
amounting in 1772 to almost the entire export trade of England to the
amounting in effect to a "nullification of the treaty." As a deadlock
amounts according to the nature of the case, no matter how the accident
ampoule of iodine carried by the wounded man is broken, and its contents
amputating in the region of the knee, care being taken to perform the
amputation has been the means of saving life.
amputation may be the best course.
amputation of the limb may be the only means of preventing further
amputation of the thigh.
amputation. Experience has proved that in senile gangrene of the lower
amputations at the hip or shoulder--the haemorrhage may be controlled by
amuse the public. One of them, Gilbert Imlay, an English traveler, has
amusement--a law later declared unconstitutional by the Supreme Court.
amusing himself, but rather gave zest to his pleasures. He spent the
an absence of cause. However inaccessible to us may be the cause of
an action in which at least half of them would be left on the field.
an action without a cause is the cause of my action.
an adjacent joint. Sometimes the first manifestation is a fracture of
an aide-de-camp, had subscribed a large sum toward the expenses. Boris
an allowance of ten thousand rubles. He had a dim perception of the
an alteration in the attitude of the limb; it is nearly always
an alternative, he presented "the New Jersey plan" calling for a
an anaesthetic of all the sloughy tissue, with the surrounding zone in
an angioma or a lymphangioma. The _subserous lipoma_ arises from the
an anthrax pustule, the infected area may be completely excised. When
an approaching huntsman. One crossed himself continually, the other
an approaching whistle in the hidden region of smoke. "One, another!
an army enters Russia. Alexander I gives a command and the French
an attitude which relaxes it. If the sheath of the muscle also is torn,
an early stage the diaphragm and the muscles of the anterior abdominal
an empty and deserted village again ascended. The horses began to
an end to the use of money for military control of elections. The
an enemy corps of ten thousand men is moving on the Petersburg road.
an engagement that day or the next, and giving him full liberty to
an enormous size. The tumour is ill-defined, and varies in consistence.
an entirely new life quite unlike the old one, he expected
an episode in which the husband played the part of the lover, and
an event. But speaking of commands that are the expression of the will
an explanation, but meeting the latter's impressive but meaningless
an heiress and choosing the dowerless Sonya. On this occasion, he
an hour, was over, Rostov said nothing, and he spent the rest of the
an ill-defined margin; a sclerosed focus gives a denser shadow than the
an immense impetus to cattle raising and sheep farming. So the meat of
an imperceptible lesion of the skin.
an important agent in the causation of many of the tumours met with in
an increase in the size of the swelling, which may extend along the
an inexplicable chance occurs. The allies detest Napoleon whom they
an inflammation of the skin is usually described as of a _burning_ or
an inflammatory process in two distinct situations--namely, the
an infringement of the real power; or (2) that the will of the
an injury of the part in which it grows, but it does not necessarily
an inmate of the house, and many others such as Petya's tutors, the
an inn in the village which the officers frequented. Rostov rode up to
an innocent public. Still others professed to see in the accumulations
an insignificant chip fallen among the wheels of a machine whose
an instance in history of the aim of an historical personage being
an insurrection ever occur when the enemy entered a town. More than
an interval, upon a lesion which involves gross injury of the joint or
an island, and a castle with a park surrounded by the waters of the
an object, or the violence may be more severe, as in attempting to catch
an officer of the French army; and Nicholas felt that the presence
an old man, taking her into society and dancing the mazurka with her
an old uniform. He made friends with and sought the acquaintance of
an open and resolute friend, and a virtuous supporter of the rights of
an unbroken system of freehold farms. In the Gulf states and the lower
an unheard-of result. The French generals lost touch with the
an unpleasant impression at first. The soldiers looked askance at
anaemia of the brain from temporary weakening or arrest of the heart's
anaemia of the nerves, to neuritis, or to the irritation of the exposed
anaesthesia. Puncture with a tenotomy knife and scraping the interior,
anaesthesia. With the lapse of time they not only become exaggerated, but
anaesthetic, however, the central nervous system is protected from these
analyzing the properties of manure, before entering into the debit and
anarchists with their bombs are all instructing the people in the ...
anastomosed with the common extensor of the fingers. The extensors of
anastomosis between the superficial and deep veins of the leg is less
anatomical distribution of the blocked arteries, and is arrested as soon
anatomy and physiology of the body and with the various pathological
ancestors, in the days of Cromwell, had settled in the north of Ireland
ancient dominion in the far Pacific.
ancient times has occupied the best human minds and from most
ancients met by recognizing a divinity which subjected the nations
and "Anglo-man." Had it not been for the conduct of the French
and "sovereign assemblies of the people" set aside the Constitution in
and "ti-ti" once more. At the same time he felt that above his face,
and (2) the _macrophages_, which include the larger hyaline leucocytes,
and 103). It almost never infects the lymph glands.
and 1893, the Democrats held the House of Representatives for fourteen
and Alabama, in 1819, took their places among the United States of
and American property on the high seas. They had filled our communities
and Arakcheev on the military. Soon after his arrival Prince Andrew,
and Arkansas were well adapted to the cultivation of cotton and tobacco
and Associated Powers assembled to pronounce judgment upon the German
and Atlanta the Chicago of the South.
and Bonaparte smiled. "The young Cossack made his mighty
and Bonaparte were mere infringers of the true power, while a
and Boris were alone, Rostov felt for the first time that he could not
and Boris, escape from the drawing room.
and Boris, even had he wished to, could not have done so on the
and Carteret, in 1664, passed under the direct government of the crown
and Catholics, who clung to the religion of their fathers.
and Connecticut. The carriage of slaves from Africa to the Southern
and Count Rostov, glancing angrily at the author who went on reading
and Davis's Straits, while we are looking for them beneath the arctic
and Democrats were divided, the line being drawn between the East on the
and Dmitri, and several acquaintances, and the countess reread the
and French whose activities against the American government's policy
and Frenchmen with an air not of the city but of the camp, walking
and Frenchmen, in a variety of uniforms. To the right and left of
and Georgia will sprinkle the whole composition with sawdust. Such an
and Georgia--the slaves nearly equalled or actually exceeded the whites
and Helene sat silently side by side almost at the bottom of the
and House of Representatives, open all the certificates and the votes
and Indian War, was fired in the wilds of Pennsylvania. There began the
and John Rutledge of South Carolina. Eight had been signers of the
and Kutuzov appeared in the doorway. The general with the bandaged
and Kutuzov with his eagle nose and puffy face appeared in the
and Madame Kwudener, and wead Ecka'tshausen and the bwethwen. Oh, they
and Mamma has sent for me to go and dine at the Apraksins'. Read the
and Marquette were joined to the waters plowed by Sir Francis Drake
and Mary, a gentleman of the old school. Jefferson and his three
and Michael Ivanovich are the two people to whom he is always gentle
and Natasha were talking about. She heard the sound of their voices
and Natasha with him, went to Moscow at the end of January.
and Neisser, who have succeeded in conveying syphilis to the chimpanzee
and Nicholas did not think it the proper thing to visit her again; but
and Pennsylvania, some settling on the northern bank of the Ohio but
and Peronskaya in the same manner.
and Petya thought the officers were beginning to look at him and
and Pierre beside Boris; and on the other side, the children,
and Prince Andrew began telling him the story of Bluebeard, but fell
and Prince Andrew--spoke of this: the unsettled question of life and
and Puritans of New England, the French Huguenots, Scotch-Irish and
and Russia have a right to expect from you all the zeal, firmness, and
and Slidell, sent by President Davis to represent the Confederacy at
and Sonya passing with a glass in her hand. "Yes it was exactly the
and Sonya. The countess was still unwell and unable to travel but it
and Sophia the granddaughter of James I, was a thorough German who never
and South it would strengthen the links of union and add to political
and Tikhon, understanding him, wiped away the tears.
and West. The prophecy of the Hartford convention had been fulfilled.
and Whigs. Finally it raged in the angry political quarrel which
and Wirt of Virginia, all presumably adherents to the Jeffersonian
and Yorktown there were the defeats of Bunker Hill, Long Island, White
and a Council consisting of representatives of the United States, Great
and a House of Representatives along almost identical lines. In the
and a center of culture not despised even by the pioneer, grew apace. In
and a charter that nobody needs, and the meaning of which the very man
and a granulating surface forms, the ordinary treatment for a healing
and a hard swelling appears in front of the lower end of the humerus.
and a healthy granulating surface is formed. The protective dressing
and a letter; it is a premium for the man who writes a history of
and a man in a white hat were seen coming toward the officers.
and a portion of Minnesota, settlements were mainly confined to the
and a process of repair sets in. The walls of the abscess fall in;
and a pyogenic staphylococcus--increases the severity of the resulting
and a shaggy cap, shouted to the approaching Balashev to halt.
and a successful expedition against the Indians. As the Virginia
and a third cannon ball flew past. Evidently they were firing at the
and a treaty was drawn up placing the management of Haitian finances and
and a very weak galvanic current, he has been able to differentiate the
and a water cart, painted green, stood in a shed; the paths were
and abolish the last of the disabilities imposed on the Confederates.
and about the Emperor, angrily twitching his brows and raising his
and absorption of the intervening septa, as transition forms between the
and abuse. Pierre stood pressed against the wall of a charred house,
and accept all the terms of this license and intellectual property
and accept all the terms of this license and intellectual property
and accepted by him, as a pretext for quitting the army.
and according to that it is we who lost the battle of Pultusk. In
and across and along them a network of shadows from the bare old
and addressing Natasha. "Let him tell you whether I have told the
and admits the public to appreciate his skill.
and affectionate. The angry eldest princess, with the long waist and
and after February 18, 1915, the whole of the English Channel and the
and after staying but a short time with the Tsar went to see the grand
and after this the dressing need not be repeated oftener than every
and again from Smolensk to Borodino. The French army pushed on to
and again it turned uselessly in the same place.
and again proceeded to gallop along the line, penetrating farther
and again the votes in Congress showed that no clear line separated all
and against the Constitution; but he had been out of the country acting
and albumen. Sometimes the skin shows erythematous and purpuric rashes,
and alders too are coming out.... But the oaks show no sign yet. Ah,
and all eyes were raised to the count.
and all the men, old and young, in uniform and evening dress, and
and all the peasants had assembled at the barn by the princess'
and along the road, trying not to miss anything of importance.
and also because they would all receive handsome presents for the
and always expects the law that he has learned to be fulfilled.
and amid the smoke appeared the figure of a bareheaded man in a
and amusing about them. The family separated on the most friendly
and an alteration of the character, of the leucocytes present in the
and an ardent advocate of freedom of the press, freedom of speech, and
and an old servant, bending over from behind the chair, held it in
and an unbroken series of blunders. "The more mistakes that are made
and applied the match, though only one artilleryman survived out of
and applying elastic compression. The introduction of blood-serum (10-15
and are met with chiefly in the great toe of elderly bedridden patients.
and arms the course of international affairs. And it should be said also
and arrangement of the normal tissues of the body. Although the cells of
and as a result of pressure by splints. After _division at the elbow_,
and as a rule there is profuse sweating. The digestion is markedly
and as is always the case, not a single column reached its place at
and as it is present in the dust of the air and on all objects upon
and as it was too far to the left flank for him to have time to go
and as time goes on it becomes more marked. During the secondary period
and ask the princesses; and from there go on to the Rasgulyay--the
and asked him to tell the Emperor. What do you think he replied? 'But,
and asked whether the samovar was really wanted.
and at a ball. On first receiving the news, under the influence of
and at each word saw her bright smile and the constant gleam of her
and at last Anna Mikhaylovna, still with the same expression, pale but
and at one moment prayed to God as he had done on the battlefield at
and at the feeble, round-shouldered figure of Tushin who was sitting
and at the hip (coxa vara), will be described in the volume dealing with
and at the next glanced round in alarm.
and at the red, broad, and happy though uneasy face of Pierre. It
and at the sun. How beautiful the sky looked; how blue, how calm,
and at the word thwee begin to advance.
and attaining to the art of integrating them (that is, finding the sum
and backward did not improve or alter the position of the troops.
and be absorbed, but a repetition of the injection has in several cases
and be cast off, after which the patient gradually recovers. Death may
and be supplanted by a monarchy? The fate of whole continents hung upon
and becomes implicated in the destructive process--hence the term
and before going down she went into the room where the icons hung and,
and began rapidly adding up the total of Rostov's debt, breaking the
and began to kiss the boy with good natured playfulness.
and behind him and brightly lit up the enormous panorama which, rising
and bitter were the contests between the royal and proprietary governors
and blue cap behind him on the crupper of his horse. The boy held on
and blue riding breeches, who were swarming near the bridge, and
and boils on his own forearm by rubbing in a culture of the
and boldly made their request for inclusion among the United States.
and bonds exceeding in value the whole national debt of Hamilton's
and bones have a richer blood supply than the integument, the death of
and borrowed or furnished the funds necessary to pay the way. In other
and bounds in all the industrial towns. For another, there was
and bounds, until on the eve of the Revolution it amounted to more than
and boys and girls that laid the foundations of the textile industry in
and brittle, and readily falls out, either as an exaggeration of the
and brought them under discipline and under the influence of that
and bulge out the sides so as to give the organisms a spindle-shaped
and by assured parliamentary supremacy, had an immediate effect in the
and by the peculiar glow that came into Prince Andrew's eyes and by
and by the wonderful classic beauty of her figure, his face on the
and by what was the will of these individuals themselves guided? the
and call directly upon all able-bodied males if the nature of a crisis
and called into being the Republican party. While that bill was pending
and calling the nurse began giving the medicine. The child screamed
and came once more in touch with the bachelor sets, leading such a
and carbonate of zinc. A gauze dressing is applied, and the penis and
and care must be taken that the paralysed muscles do not become
and cattlemen at regular wages. At the same time there appeared other
and cause, which by the fact of its being unconditioned and
and celebrated in the name given to the present capital of the state of
and cells from the adjacent blood vessels exude into the cavity, and
and character but alike in the social circle to which they belonged.
and checked his horse, supposing the affair to be over. But when he
and cheerful were the troops. The greatest disorder and depression had
and children from the streets of English cities. In 1680 it was
and children of the New England textile districts. Spinning and weaving,
and chimney stacks still standing, and here and there the blackened
and china. Natasha was sitting on the floor of her dismantled room
and clatter among the audience, and with rapturous faces everyone
and cleaning all night long without closing their eyes, while the
and clearly expresses his opinion to Kutuzov, to Weyrother, and to the
and closed his eyes. One of his suite beckoned to the soldiers
and closeness of the carriage. She understood all that awaited her
and coincide with expiration. The injury may, however, not be observed
and cold. Sometimes the hyperaemia resulting from vaso-motor paralysis is
and cold. These also endow the hairs with sensibility to pain. They are
and commission, appointed by the President and Senate, and a
and common facial veins. It is commonly enlarged in affections of the
and company officers were counting the men, poking the last man in
and condemned the acts of Parliament as unlawful, as violating the
and conditions of work or to maintain the gains already won. It leaned
and conjunctiva. The technique is similar to that employed in
and connective-tissue cells, and new blood vessels permeate the mass,
and consequent freedom in the choice of one's occupation, that is,
and consider the movement of those hundreds of thousands of men who
and consisting of colonies of the fungus. On account of their yellow
and constipation. Diarrhoea is sometimes present. The _urine_ is usually
and constitute a power, then honest folk must do the same. Now
and continue the use of the suction bell.
and continuous trade with Great Britain--the exchange of cotton for war
and contrasts cannot, however, tell the whole story. Take, for example,
and contributed to the campaign funds of both leading parties. Wherever
and could therefore never be at peace. A stern expression of the
and county authorities to possible annulment by the Supreme Court at
and craft unions. They asserted that the "working class and the
and cramps. In the orbit it displaces the eyeball; in the nasal fossae
and credit, was in the same prostrate condition as the material capital.
and crowding on the dam that was being attacked that if Raevski did
and crying," continued the woman. "It's she. Here, this way!"
and custom cleaning out the brood cells, with efforts beyond their
and dangerous." As an outcome of their deliberations, the Republicans
and darker and duskier when the blood flow is slowed or when stasis has
and dealt with. In suppuration in the Fallopian tube (pyosalpynx), for
and death. Kutuzov noticed Pierre's figure and the group gathered
and decidedly, the presumption is that the circulation in the parts
and decreed. Wherever the ship may go, the rush of water which neither
and defines the rights of citizens. If Congress can ignore its
and depressed. Without greeting the officers, he scratched himself and
and derision from the Republicans and polled less than one-fourth the
and despair, showing the possibility of consolation."
and destroyed Napoleon. In the first place it is hard to understand
and deviated from its original principles. And so toward the end of
and did not admit anyone. A maid came to the door to say that Alpatych
and did not answer. The hussar at that moment noticed the face of
and did not evince the least surprise at seeing them there.
and difficulty in flexing the knee. A skiagram shows the extent of the
and disability, and it may prove the starting-point of lymphangitis.
and discharge the public debt. When once the dispute over the
and dismissed the young men, possible suitors, who sometimes
and displace the adjacent viscera, and so interfere with their
and dispose of them for settlement. A second provision in the same
and disposition. They were called steppe peasants. The old prince used
and distinctive head, but the instant he turned to Prince Andrew the
and distributed to anyone in the United States without paying any fees
and distributed to anyone in the United States without paying any fees
and divided North. It knew that the abolitionists and the Southern
and do not lose sight of the essential connection of historical
and does not exceed 110 or even 120, while the temperature is moderately
and doings of a few dozen men in a building in the city of Paris,
and don't forget to give him the Rostovs' invitation. They ask him
and don't move. Shouldn't we put a cordon round to prevent the rest
and douched, and protected from cold and other injurious influences. The
and down the room in silence, and then, suddenly and unexpectedly,
and down the room twice. His eyes shone and his mustache twitched as
and dozens of carts with wounded men began at the invitation of the
and draw toward the table, but not near enough for the candles that
and drawing conclusions) only the capacity calmly to contemplate the
and drawing the produce of the Ohio Valley to Philadelphia and New York.
and drawn by six horses at a smart trot. Behind the caleche galloped
and driven through the House of Representatives. The opposition
and dropping his head he sat down on the cold ground by the wheel of
and dukes; but the process of the flight and disintegration of the
and dyspnoea. When the oesophagus is pressed upon, the patient may have
and earnestness, or the tremor of the speaker's voice--which sometimes
and ears washed, perfumed, and powdered, as befits a ball; the
and economic toleration, found in the American colonies, not complete
and efficacious means of dispersing the effused blood. The part should
and emaciated, probably as a result of chronic poisoning from the
and empowered the Postmaster General to close the mails to persons
and enlighteners of humanity is only based on the arbitrary assumption
and erysipelas, and certain of the pyogenic bacteria, show little
and especially in the humerus. In some cases of _epilepsy_ the bones
and especially into the hands of that idiot Anatole, pained Boris.
and especially to catch the incendiaries who, according to the general
and especially to the left, near Semenovsk, something seemed to be
and especially when they are fat, the loss of blood is badly borne, and
and even a dull boy of thirteen could have guessed that the best
and even an emperor. Before leaving, Napoleon showed favor to the
and even every footstep in that house since the terrible news had
and even less unity resulted. Preparations were made to fight the
and everybody advised making the attempt. After much disputing and
and everybody sat down again, smiling at the noise they had made and
and evidently still the same waistcoat and high white stock he had
and exhausted by means of a suction-pump, the rarefaction of the air in
and expected peace only "yonder." She adopted the tone of one who
and expedite the departure of the inhabitants. If one accepts this
and explain further why the wheels go round; and till he has reached
and extend the principles of confederate and republican government.
and extent of the disease. The cranial nerves may be pressed upon at the
and fails to collapse on account of the rigidity of its walls, its
and famine is everywhere. Twice the marauders even attack our
and farther into the region where the army was already in action.
and fastened it to the uniform. Lazarev glanced morosely at the little
and feathers were freely applied; the whip was sometimes laid on
and felt boots, he went to the little princess' apartment.
and fifty members of the English Club and fifty guests were awaiting
and file--of whom there are always the greatest number; of the next
and fill the gap with skin-grafts.
and filled those ditches with water brought from deep in the earth or
and finally against the futile struggle to retain a hold upon the
and finally," the father said, looking ironically at his son, "I beg
and fired" (the wretches) "at the French. Some of them were sabered
and firmly bandaged from below upwards, to conserve as much of the
and fits in with their theory, say that power is the result of events,
and flabby, projecting beyond the level of the skin and overlapping the
and flies clear of the shot. It may make a separate wound.
and floor of the mouth they are infected at an early stage of the
and flour to be contraband, defending the action on the ground that the
and fluctuates readily, later it becomes larger and more tense. The
and flung wide the doors for immigrants eager to fill the factories, man
and foot, and transmit it to the inguinal glands. _The femoral glands_
and for governing such part of them as may be employed in the service
and for some years the whole course of life is altered and presents an
and for the issue of the whole battle. "But be that what it may," he
and foreign Orders, and the Star of St. George on his left breast.
and foreign commerce. To the manufacturing and trading states this was
and form a complete covering to the parts. In the pharynx the false
and four from free states. The opinions and bias of each of them were
and four times the price of the wheat. The interest of Nevada was also
and frantic attack now going on in the press against the whole
and fraud and falsehood termed military craft. The habits of the
and free movement of the joint, may be preserved.
and freight through the narrows. In all, according to the census, there
and fro from the room where the witnesses were sitting, through the
and from habit began with the princess, the prince suddenly grew
and fused with it. The morbid process may be arrested at this stage, and
and fussily in the easy chair, "how is it Annette never got married?
and galloped into the river. He gave an angry thrust to his horse,
and gathered his army of bondmen about him, there rose in the North a
and gave it to Karataev. "But give me the pieces that are over."
and gave it to Likhachev; then he flourished the saber, tested it, and
and gazed at the ruins of Moscow, loudly announcing his observations
and gentlemen. Pierre, who had come downstairs, walked through the
and give battle to Bonaparte. The council of war was just over when
and gives rise to great confusion, chiefly for the reason that no one
and giving orders, engrossed him. The burning of Smolensk and its
and giving rise later to metastases in the lungs.
and glad he is taking this trip abroad which the doctors recommended
and globular (Sheen). If ligation is found to be impracticable, the
and good-humored laughter from the soldiers that it infected the
and got used to the idea that no one would oblige him to go anywhere
and got warm, you daughter of a bitch!" said Karataev, touching the
and guard--if it has any worth has so only by reason the joy with
and habits as those of the colonies on the coast had been. Americans of
and had a plausible claim to a majority of the electoral vote. At all
and had any effect on the people is another question) had been
and had deliberately taken their lives into their own hands; but the
and had grown accustomed to him. Metivier came to see the prince about
and had passed the last of the Russian troops, he saw, near a
and half the inhabitants had left the city with Rostopchin's own
and handed direct to the surgeon. The assistant who attends to the swabs
and harassing criticism by English friends of the United States--like
and has been isolated from the blood--with difficulty--and from lymph
and haste, like something dreadful and alien to him, for, after the
and haste, trying to escape notice, closed the door, and began to read
and have found the sum of this progression to infinity, do we reach
and have shown it by making peace with you. As for the Swedes--it is
and he finally betrayed to the French people his true sentiments by
and he flirted with a few of them at the balls. But he did not run
and he had there seen the same pettiness, worldliness, and
and he insisted that the United States was in honor bound to help France
and he is often on the verge of suicide.
and he led him into the room where the supper table was laid and
and he sat down at the nearest table.
and he screamed. When they got him to the post he grew quiet, as if he
and he told her she was still the same crybaby as ever. Princess
and he was young and interesting. That day everyone met with the
and heard the details of his disaster he understood that half the
and heavy convoys (whose movements were concealed from the French)
and heir--apparent from the army--who on his own authority and
and her hair was done the same way as the day before, yet she was
and her handsome eldest daughter were in the drawing-room with the
and her sons were all in the service.
and her soul was not visible at all. All that struck the eye was a
and her vexation that at the moment when all she wanted was to see him
and highly valued. The old count came up to them and pressed
and himself moving, naturally imagines that his efforts move the
and his army were like the plan of a market gardener who, when driving
and his companion they became silent, and Pierre thought he saw the
and his excitement. At the same moment Natasha, without drawing
and his family's, and his friends', and the enemy's intention to
and his first message to Congress he reiterated the claim of the
and his kind, intelligent face rather pale, rushed out of the shed
and his knowledge of men, Kutuzov--having taken into consideration the
and his own most recent bulletin. Glancing through the army orders,
and his part in bringing the Russo-Japanese War to a close naturally
and his son, who was still in the care of nurses. The other half he
and his strength increased tenfold. He rushed at the barefooted
and his wife's delight, now they ran out into the porch and reported
and his worthy son," said she. Of the behavior of the eldest
and hope were given her by God's folk--the half-witted and other
and hopelessly split over the money question in 1896.
and horror he did not himself understand, aroused by the sight of that
and horse ranches, their life and customs handed down from the Spanish
and housewives their baking to hear "Honest Abe" and "the Little Giant."
and how deep! How bright and glorious was the setting sun! With what
and ichthyol or other soothing applications may be used to allay the
and ignorance of what steps to take, and the enormous number of
and imagines that the devil is no match for him. That's the sort of
and immediately the sound of axes and swords, the crashing of
and importance. The tubercle bacilli usually gain access to the gland
and important body of American merchants like the Willings and Morrises
and important concomitants of acute inflammatory conditions, and the
and in 1798 to the Mississippi territory, once held by Georgia. Thus it
and in February of the next year, just before Tyler gave way to Polk,
and in Moscow their house was always full of visitors. The night after
and in a child who lies on its back with the lower limbs everted, the
and in a friendly way that the commander and the officers were
and in number--as a result of which the superiority had passed to
and in scars, and probably results from the displacement and
and in the connective-tissue septa, till it either finds a weak spot or
and in the expression on their faces--one of them glanced timidly at
and in the expression with which he frowned and looked away Pierre
and in the external auditory meatus it causes obstruction, which may be
and in the external organs of generation.
and in the garden was a large and beautiful building. I woke up. O
and in the marrow, and are of value in establishing the therapeutic
and in the meadow, among the rows of new-mown hay which he had taken
and in the name of monarchy. To Americans of conservative temper it now
and in the other the letter, and pressing them alternately to her
and in the peripheral nerves--_neuro-fibromatosis_; in the submucous
and in the provinces at a distance from Moscow, ladies, and
and in the serous blebs which sometimes form on the surface.
and in the stomach and colon to narrowing of the lumen. When the cells
and in their desperation they fell back upon the doctrine of
and in their method of growth; there is no tendency to erupt through the
and in uterine fibroids. The alteration in character may take place
and indeed a few mills were built on Southern soil. The results were
and indicating the Rostovs' box. On seeing Natasha Pierre grew
and indifferent air, and glanced into the little drawing room.
and indurated, and over the indurated area there appear a number of
and industry in the North and the planting system of the South. There
and inherited syphilis. The virus is carried by the blood-stream to all
and insidious in its progress, and it never reaches the same degree of
and insidiously developed, but when the loose connective tissue of the
and intangible line which separates two hostile armies was all the
and intensity. Whittier blew his blast from the New England hills:
and intently at him with her deep, radiant eyes. The weariness she had
and interesting person to the visitors and that nowhere else was the
and internal organs as well as the skin and mucous membranes.
and into a birch forest growing on both sides of the road. In the
and into the avenue. A large crowd of militiamen and domestics were
and intriguing; in the body of the army they did not ask themselves
and invade the bone. The deposit of urates in the synovial membrane is
and involuntarily noticed the carefully washed seams of the scar
and is associated with induration and enlargement of the adjacent
and is best appreciated by gently stroking the bone from the middle of
and is completed by the weight of the hand. After _division at the
and is covered over by epithelium growing in from the edges.
and is known as _the primary lesion_. Those who have thus acquired the
and is most successful when it is done within five or six days of the
and is not caused by anything, for the Divinity is not controlled by
and is present in the heart of every Russian. And a consciousness of
and is treated by excision of the sac.
and is usually sacrificed. When removal of the tumour is incomplete, a
and it became necessary to substitute patriot authorities. The appeal to
and it is thought intends to expose his precious person to the chances
and it is usually possible to move the bones freely upon one another and
and it looks as if he planned this in order not to come under the
and it may be added to by effusion into the synovial cavity. The baby,
and it may be fatal haemorrhage. The mechanical pressure of a fragment of
and it may occur either by itself or along with multiple tumours of the
and it seemed to Pierre that the French officer's head had been torn
and it seldom begins within a week of the primary infection. The first
and it undoubtedly has a still greater significance for the future.
and it usually extends as far as the nearest collateral branch. These
and it was given to Alpatych with instructions to hand it to the
and it was hailed as the guarantee of a better day. By 1920, more than
and it was not until late in 1777 that Congress presented to the states
and it was then so warm that the officers, of whom there were always
and it's nasty work! An attack's pleasant work! Hacking away at the
and its destruction become necessary, the head and spinal cord should be
and its subsequent caseation and liquefaction, is attended by the
and jolting the stretcher.
and judicial branches of the state governments thus passed into the
and labor, giving a distinct color to the labor movement in whole
and laterally; the bones of the leg laterally as in bow-leg, or
and lay down on the sofa.
and lead to the formation of an abscess as a result of direct infection
and left in. This is repeated as often as the cavity refills. It is
and left the hut.
and left the room.
and left traces of their work in the names of portages and little
and length of the shaft of the bone, which, when it is curved in
and let Princess Mary pass into the room before her, the princess felt
and letting the force of her anger run to waste, she turned and rushed
and lies against the unyielding bone. It may be compressed by a
and lies in the long axis of the medullary canal (Fig. 125). Finally,
and lies when the justification is no longer needed, and displaying to
and light, joyous steps. At the visitors' request the young people
and listening for any sound of firing on the right as an indication
and little tables. During balls given at the house Pierre, who did not
and live stock. In the ten years that followed, 100,000 people from the
and lively, and she did not talk to her husband. When they left the
and looked about him, but above the level of the wounded men. He
and looked in the direction the old man indicated, he recognized
and looked inquiringly at the French colonel. The colonel respectfully
and looking to the left and then to the right and listening to the
and looks for that mistake in the opening, but forgets that at each
and love welled up in Pierre. He felt the tears trickle under his
and lower thirds of the thigh, and in which recovery followed upon
and made a show of firing at the bridge. The crowd, crushing one
and made him neglect the game.
and made me sit down on the bed on which he lay. I made the sign of
and maintain competition as the only effective instrument of business
and making pencil notes on them, and for the first two or three
and malignant growths; there is an indefinite transition from one to the
and mammae may be enlarged; the glandular swellings press on important
and many other commodities imported into the colonies. The enforcement
and marines, prevented the destruction of the beleaguered aliens. When
and masses of population"; that it would "overthrow the whole scheme of
and may attain an enormous size; sometimes they grow in the interior of
and may be passed involuntarily. The temperature is remittent and
and may be so severe as to prevent sleep, and the patient may feel
and may become impacted between the articular surfaces. These changes in
and may become stationary. The swelling is rounded or oval, there is no
and may prove obstinate and lead to shedding of the nails. They also
and may reach the palm or even the forearm, being then associated with
and me in the eyes of society, and even of the court," he added,
and melancholy upon them, planned the arrangements of a splendid house
and men crowded closer and closer together. They advanced the few
and men's esteem? Death, wounds, the loss of family--I fear nothing.
and mentioned by name the greatest dignitaries of the day.
and merchants, by mechanics and planters, by the fishermen along the
and migrated leucocytes from the adjacent blood vessels destroy the red
and mildness in his fine gray eyes, and on his delicate lips the
and more confirmed the farther he rode into the region behind the
and more powerful than himself and he had rare skill in seizing the
and more ready with promises of reform in the island. Early in April,
and more severely affected than those of the upper extremity, but the
and more. She knew that Sonya was the chief obstacle to this
and morose, paced up and down in front of the Kammer-Kollezski
and most of the larger joints the disease arises in the bone and in the
and most primitive approximation to present itself was the will of the
and most unimportant matters; he admired her shy grace. In the
and mother by the news of this loss, he knew what a relief it would be
and moved, limping, to the door at which Pierre was standing. Pierre
and munitions, began his irresistible hammering at Lee's army, did the
and murders as in whole centuries are not recorded in the annals of
and muscular cramps, followed by paralysis from destruction of the
and muttering angrily, came in at the other door. Natasha checked
and nails may be completely regenerated if a sufficient amount of the
and narrow beard. Both were weeping. Tears filled the thin man's eyes,
and national honor." They were coldly received in the Senate and so
and new growths, is made by a consideration of the previous history,
and no answer came from Berlin. Not baffled, the President again took
and no longer resemble two leaves, are deviations from the theory.
and no means are taken to arrest the haemorrhage. The bleeding may be
and no one could publish anything without previous approval of the
and noiselessly over the baize at the entrance.
and non-irritating diuretics. The skin may be stimulated by Dover's
and none other." In Newcastle county, Delaware, the association of
and not dressed. His eyes, prominent from the emaciation of his
and not the serfs' backs and foreheads, which, beat and shave as you
and not the shaving which merely harms and hinders the working.
and not without some groans gave orders to their stewards about the
and nourishing the tissues, it is collected by lymph vessels, which
and now a vast domain had been dumped into the lap of the nation. He was
and now she sat in the same way on the bench where she had seated
and nudged the others to make them look at the wag.
and nullification this seemed the only remedy for the growing disparity
and number of the bodies vary widely. Single specimens have been known
and obedience to law previously established by the congregations. The
and occasionally become the starting-point of melanotic cancer. Rodent
and oedema of the limb beyond. The interference with the circulation, and
and of Kuragin mingled with her thoughts. The question again presented
and of all the infected area around it, so as to leave a healthy surface
and of his cruelty to the French, so from the moment he entered the
and of humanity be regarded--as the result of the free, or as the
and of its own force compelled the cutting of the forests and the
and of making similar statements to show that the danger of the
and of mutual respect, an equality of rights before the law, and at
and of the French, and that he had exposed himself to terrible and
and of the State wherein they reside. No State shall make or enforce any
and of the X-rays, and one or other should be employed as a routine
and of the adhesions to surrounding structures. The skin incision must
and of the biceps in sudden movements of the arm. Sometimes the effort
and of the overlying soft parts is illustrated by the fact that in one
and of the sturdy young fellow seated on the box was all that could be
and of the underlying tissues, caused by violence.
and of the way in which the surface wound closes on the withdrawal of
and of truth." The Secretary of State saw in it "a recognition of the
and of two cannon shots were heard simultaneously. The gate again
and on his bare legs and arms which were still red, the veins stood
and on the Russian side merely because in Petersburg--far from the
and on the other an immense case containing icons, was brightly
and on the third they placed Prince Andrew. For a little while he
and one of the Apsheron regiment went forward past the Emperor.
and one of the coachmen helped him into the vehicle.
and one of the women with thick bare legs and thin arms, separating
and one of these sisters, exiled from Charleston for her "Appeal to the
and one tall, long-necked officer, walking round the fire, came up
and one wretched inn to house judges, lawyers, and litigants during the
and one's own guilt suddenly becomes terribly serious when the other
and only wanted to get more money from the traveler.
and opened the door for him.
and orbital muscles, less frequently the lower limbs.
and ordered the regulars away.
and other bacteria, with the result that suppuration ensued after most
and other friends of the colonies voted in the affirmative. Lord North
and other members of the ape tribe, obtaining primary and secondary
and other women. They all drew back from the bed, making way for
and others according to the condition in which they happen to be when
and others regard ganglia as entirely new formations in the
and others, drowned as usual by the buzzing of the court drones. But
and overtook him. A sergeant of the battalion ran up and took the flag
and overtook the next one.
and paced up and down the large hall. I wished to meditate, but
and paid the eldest daughter, Countess Vera, the attentions a young
and paid their own passage. What proportion of the colonists were able
and pains in the parts to be affected, and is of the dry variety.
and papers, so many people gathered that the orderlies brought in
and particularly after the opening of the railway construction era, a
and parts of the tumour may be carried off in the blood-stream and give
and passenger rates was taken out of the hands of the owners of the
and patient pressure would have resulted in the final surrender of Cuba
and pausing. "The only question is what will come of the meeting
and pearls on their bare shoulders, looked at themselves in the
and peculiar form of beauty. Everyone brightened at the sight of
and perception befitting a man of the world, he indicated by a
and peri-bursal gummata in front of the knee-joint.
and perishes in the absence of moisture. It has been proved
and permanent control over public opinion in all the tariff states."
and pleasure for themselves as possible. In the troubled waters of
and pointed to the carriage. Pierre, evidently engrossed in thought,
and popular election of Senators, and condemned the use of federal
and possibly to some extent by gravity, and the abscess may reach the
and pouring them all into the channels of business and manufacturing.
and power, and by coldness of the limb beyond; a tense and excessively
and prescribed their duty as the enforcement of the law against
and present a shreddy appearance; the outer layers consist of
and pressure on the phrenic nerve may induce hiccough. The aneurysm is
and pressure. The contents may ooze from the orifice of the duct and dry
and pricking its ears at the sound of shots just as it had done on the
and proceeded to the work of drawing up a new constitution, "laying its
and produce effects in direct proportion to the amount absorbed. As the
and professional men assumed the leadership.
and promise of a reward should therefore have struck him all the
and promoter, who helped to break the virgin soil of the prairies, lived
and promotions, and in this pursuit watched only the weathercock of
and pronated; the deltoid, spinati, biceps, brachialis, and supinators
and protrusion of the eyes, sometimes followed by loss of sight. The
and prove my devotion to His Majesty the Emperor and to Russia!"
and provision of the proposed plan. These papers, afterwards collected
and published in a volume known as _The Federalist_, form the finest
and puffing, the major grumbled and growled at everybody because he
and pulled the buckle of his bandolier, while another smoothed and
and put their horses to a trot to escape from the poisoned
and ran back with him to the troyka.
and ran for safety, Daniel set his chestnut galloping, not at the wolf
and ran on. The French who had been pursuing him stopped.
and read the dispatch. Hardly had he done so before he lowered his
and ready ways of doing things, approved the transaction. Through an
and realized it especially from the list of prisoners the French
and recommending improved devices and practices. The chief result of
and reformation of oneself for its reception, and (3) The
and regarded as the key to the position. He saw over the mist that
and remembered everything. "The Egyptians believed that our souls have
and repay all that the family had done for her by breaking off her
and replaced by fibrous tissue. Fibrous tissue takes the place of the
and reported that the gates of the citadel had been barricaded and
and representatives to which the State may be entitled in the Congress;
and republican governments on an imposing scale presented for the first
and resembled Natasha. He was preparing to enter the university, but
and restoration of function made possible by the transference of a
and results in stiffness of the affected joints and permanent crippling
and retraction of the divided artery and by clotting.
and returned to power a large number of men once prominent in the
and ride round the whole position."
and rode to the bushy edge of the road where he was to stand, arranged
and rougher instruments the edges of the wound are more or less contused
and run an exceedingly rapid course. In malignant oedema, however, the
and sad expression in his eyes. The brighter Prince Andrew's lot
and safety in a thousand ways; to climb the mountains to fight forest
and sallow, and suffers from eruptions on the skin and mucous membranes.
and salt--or the meaning of the square and all the various figures
and sarcoma; and the diagnosis is to be made by the history and progress
and satires flowed from the press in an unending stream. Fast days,
and satisfied with the outer man to desire spiritual improvement, I
and saw Daniel lying on the wolf's back among the dogs, trying to
and saw the cupolas and crosses of the New Convent of the Virgin still
and says senseless things that should have ruined him. But the once
and scalp as far back as the nape of the neck. It stops, however, at the
and scarlet fever. The most acute suppurations result from infection
and seeing that the elder visitor was not listening, he turned to
and self-confident limitations of this man raise him to the head of
and sent representatives. The delegates, while professing the warmest
and served on one of the committees.] Returned home for dinner and
and settle the business there in the commissariat department and if
and severity, until at length the patient becomes asphyxiated. The
and shaggy, with his cap on the back of his black head and a cloak
and shall also have the pleasure of a more detailed chat with you."
and she turned away from the glass, making an effort not to cry.
and sheep raising on an immense scale. The far-famed American cowboy was
and shops of the seacoast towns to the uttermost frontiers of Wisconsin
and should always be applied while the patient is in the recumbent
and shouts of the gentlemen around.
and show her over, and they'll talk nineteen to the dozen. That's
and shrinking, he tried to pass unnoticed between the rows of
and sidled out of the room.
and silently stared at him with frightened eyes; the second assumed
and silver legal tender in the payment of debts. It evidently
and since then the government property had been removed every night,
and singing the air the actress was singing, then she wished to
and size, that they are best discussed with the individual organs. In
and slashed the face of the desert with canals and irrigating ditches,
and small articles of manufacture. The variety of products was in fact
and snatched up the cudgel was the Russian people; those who try to
and snorted with satisfaction as he poured the water over his head
and so affording a favourable soil for the development of bacteria. The
and so on, the farther movement of the fleeing French, and of the
and so on. But if the aim of the battle was what actually resulted and
and so on. The officer sends for Auersperg; these gentlemen embrace
and so on. Then a place was assigned to Pierre, he was shown the signs
and soldiers, called the soviet, and inaugurated a radical regime. They
and sole of the foot. _The superficial inguinal glands_ lie along the
and solemn interest and silent approval. The aunt spoke to each of
and solemn tone. "On the eve of a day when God alone knows who of us
and some of them, deeming labor unrest the sour fruit of manhood
and sometimes extending down the lateral aspect of the thigh. The pain
and sometimes weaker than a company. The relative strength of bodies
and speaking rapidly just as the prince did, and he climbed into the
and special efforts were made to increase the population by importing
and spending whole days at the Rostovs'. It seemed to him that he
and spirit of this proposal the Democrats and Populists took exception.
and splints and tight bandages are applied. The muscles acquire a
and sports, but are most common under the balls of the toes or heel. A
and squatted down on his heels by the fire beside the officer with the
and started a lively quarrel with Ohio over the southern boundary. The
and stern faces to change the candles, but no one noticed them.
and still didn't finish carting the dead away. And as for the
and still is written about the Berezina, on the French side this is
and still more excited by the danger of being crushed, he rushed at
and stopped in the doorway. The evening sky that had been so clear was
and stores, and Murat had only begged leave to loose the cavalry to
and stream with the aid of science; they built cities according to the
and strict economy frequently supported the whole domestic circle,
and stroked the animal. It was plain that he did not quite grasp where
and subject to government regulation in the common interest.
and sudden changes of temperature are to be avoided. The induction of
and suddenly two old women began spinning round on the carpet? Was
and suggestions that they should return to Moscow to the house on
and summoned a convention. Following in the footsteps of their
and sustain a plantation beyond the seas. Sometimes the proprietor
and swamps bought at seventy-five cents an acre were sold to the state
and swelling, and there may be ecchymosis. As the swelling subsides, a
and take Mademoiselle Bourienne into the bargain. She'll be the
and taken the management from the hands of the lawful trustees; and they
and talk about the nursery was all he saw and heard from his former
and talked of self-sacrifice and so on; but in the army which
and talked successfully, of what he had thought while in the country.
and taxes on luxuries, occupations, and the earnings of corporations
and teeth are covered with sordes, the motions are loose and offensive,
and tenants that existed across the sea. So it happened that almost
and tender. When the primary focus is in the deeper tissues, the
and tenderness are always in the same spot. As the body usually contains
and tenderness in the sole of the foot. This affection may be associated
and tending to spread to the periosteum. The disease is common in
and territories. Thus by a single blow the very heart of the continent,
and that as a direct result of greater or less success in war the
and that he should go through the door on the left into the
and that however they might change the setting and adornment of that
and that night itself and the moon, and.... all this rushed suddenly
and that no one but the Emperor of Russia has that right.
and that she again met Anatole in the little sitting room. Helene
and that terrible work which was not done by the will of a man but
and that the French no longer ventured to attack.
and that the advantage was now on our side. There was a substantial
and that the colonists could not, from the nature of the case, be
and that the cure is speedy and certain. The operation is attended with
and that the force and rapidity of the tidal wave are diminished.
and that the great standing armies should be reduced henceforth to
and that the high death rate in the rice swamps made continuous
and that the princess was a good match. It was very bitter for her.
and that these are identical, whatever be the cause that leads to the
and that to maintain the French troupe was costing the government as
and the 'back country' of the Blue Ridge and the Shenandoah was fully
and the Austrian general were talking in low voices and Kutuzov smiled
and the East meeting." Louisville and St. Louis were already famous for
and the English Club, he felt himself at home in a quiet haven. In
and the Foundation web page at http://www.pglaf.org.
and the Foundation web page at http://www.pglaf.org.
and the French dragoons who galloped after them. The dragoons were now
and the French go to Mexico. The King of Prussia and Bismarck issue
and the French were still regarded with mingled feelings of anger,
and the French, also through the Catholic clergy, offer praise because
and the German government, which is generally brutal but seldom silly,
and the Kentucky country.
and the Kremlin was purged of their presence."
and the Mexican republic to which it belonged extended to them a more
and the Moscovites who took their opinions from others--Ilya Rostov
and the Pinckneys--without coming to the conclusion that there was
and the Republicans. For ten years they filled the country with
and the Scotch who came directly from Scotland, composed one-sixth of
and the South.
and the Standard Oil Company as monopolies in violation of the Sherman
and the abundance of it in the other--a spirituality he himself lacked
and the accountant with the naive face was feeling its texture,
and the action at the Goldbach Stream began.
and the advantages that might accrue. He took the seat indicated to
and the affected portion is not only dilated but is also increased in
and the age of thirty, and the sexes appear to suffer about equally.
and the article le, still without obtaining the desired result. Then
and the artillerymen, Tushin, and the cadet exchanged silent glances
and the bending, and occasional greenstick fracture, of the shafts. The
and the brain torn up; and in the abdomen, the hollow viscera may be
and the breaking off of her engagement to Prince Andrew (which they
and the bureau of immigration was transferred from the Treasury
and the buyers of manufactured goods. The planters were heavy purchasers
and the changes are most marked at the arch of the aorta, opposite the
and the chronic bed-sore.
and the cicatrix undergoes a certain amount of contraction--_cicatricial
and the clot carefully extracted with the aid of forceps; it is
and the colonial assemblies. Franklin relates an amusing story of how
and the colonies independent.
and the comforts of life. Others consisted solely of Cossack
and the common, infinitesimally small elements by which the masses are
and the conception of compulsion is correspondingly decreased or
and the consciousness of the impotence of his once mighty arm,
and the consequent exhaustion of the horses, the chief means of
and the contents of turbid fluid containing desquamated epithelium, fat
and the convoy officer.
and the count moved to go out of the room, taking the papers, probably
and the court, carefully abstaining from expressing an opinion of
and the cysts may escape through perforations into the surrounding
and the damage to subcutaneous parts is usually greater than that to the
and the day before..."
and the disease rapidly yields to anti-syphilitic treatment.
and the disease usually occurs on the feet of adult males who work
and the disposition in them of the bundles of nerve fibres supplying
and the distinguished dignitary who bore the title of "Collector of
and the diversity of race among these people--this eighth and
and the division is completed with the chisel.
and the eldest princess, who were sitting under the portrait of
and the employees.
and the enemy which he has conquered has been the most stubborn of all
and the enemy.
and the enforcement of this agreement it placed in the hands of local
and the event was accompanied by phrases about the glory of France,
and the examination of the accounts with Mitenka did not last long.
and the expenditure on those preparations and the need of obtaining
and the external genitals; less frequently in the gall-bladder, larynx,
and the fat otkupshchik sobbed outright like a child and kept
and the first blades of green grass were pushing up and lifting last
and the first haemorrhage, this time being required for the extension of
and the floor of the mouth, where it constitutes one form of ranula.
and the formation of an imperfectly calcified tissue at the sites of
and the functions of the liver regulated. Severe forms of muscular
and the general desire to show that they were ready to go to all
and the generals, from memoirs, reports, projects, and so forth,
and the good-natured expression still more apparent, and gazed at
and the gully with its water-worn side and "Uncle's" cap just
and the harvest, and asked himself whether he had not forgotten any of
and the inevitable small talk, instead of turning on the weather and
and the infection be diffused into the surrounding tissues.
and the infection which begins at this point then spreads to the rest of
and the inhabitants of the district pray to be defended, and an
and the initial complaint is limitation of movement.
and the injection of irritants, are alternative, but less satisfactory,
and the insane. Three years later, mainly owing to the pressure of the
and the internal jugular vein. The resulting interference with the
and the judges.
and the keener grew the passions of the Russian commanders, blamed one
and the kinaesthetic sense, which recognises that active contraction of
and the labor system of the country gone. About forty miles of the track
and the last of the inhabitants who were leaving.
and the last potatoes received had sprouted and frozen.
and the leaders in the Church became convinced that the battle
and the ligaments are softened, and the surface of the membrane presents
and the limb is immobilised by suitable splints.
and the limitation of its action. If the natural protective effort is
and the little princess also drew Anatole, whom she hardly knew,
and the loneliness of his daughter amid the general conversation. "Got
and the loss of Prince Andrew had reached Bald Hills, and in spite
and the love of death. He consoled himself with the thought that he
and the maneuvers suggested for tomorrow. It was proposed to make a
and the marked tendency to early and progressive septic infection,
and the maxillary and frontal sinuses become filled up with bone, which
and the men's at the other.
and the method of removal are considered with the diseases of bone.
and the more inevitability the less freedom.
and the nail is usually shed.
and the nation. The people of the whole United States suddenly were
and the navy and in the enforcement of the laws.
and the neighbor on his right quickly turned in alarm to Bezukhov.
and the new words they had not heard before, others simply enjoyed
and the old countess, who felt jealous and would have liked them to
and the operation is therefore performed through tissues with an
and the organism of acute osteomyelitis--although frequently remaining
and the other associates of Germany were also laid under heavy
and the other from Sonya. He recognized them by the handwriting and
and the other that the Empire was the real power, and that all the
and the others appreciated Prince Hippolyte's social tact in so
and the others who did not approve of the plan of attack, were
and the papers sent off in due form. The place was a long way off, and
and the parish church stood not infrequently on the estate of the
and the parliamentary party and the turmoil of the Puritan regime
and the patient may be unable to walk. There is a tender swelling on
and the patient may cry out as in meningitis. The post-mortem
and the pillage of Moscow it had borne within itself, as it were,
and the planters of Calhoun's had their theories of government and
and the policy of "watchful waiting" was continued.
and the portrait, and in order to press them again to her lips, she
and the possibility of the young axis cylinders bridging the gap.
and the power pass to Bennigsen, or even if Kutuzov won the battle
and the presence of the good-natured Iogel, flying about like a
and the priests and deacons and some servants also went in at the
and the profits gleaned, the commerce of European nations. A modern
and the pulse feeble and rapid.
and the rate of the current in them being for a time increased--_active
and the recipients of bounties in English markets.
and the redundant nail-fold.
and the rest--but the sum of the components, that is, the interactions
and the results, commercial and political, were soon evident. By the
and the rewards sent to the army are innumerable. Though he is a
and the rich could refrain from helping the poor. She had heard
and the ring of something heavy falling close beside him.
and the rough draft of his answer to it. He became animated when he
and the sale of produce were carried on through a cooperative store, the
and the same for their language which I cannot support to hear
and the same instant of time, or of an effect without a cause, that
and the same look. In the middle of a dull and halting conversation,
and the scouts all say the same thing."
and the scratching or rubbing of the part is liable to cause a breach of
and the secondary manifestations are about to begin. The practice of
and the sheaths of nerves may be involved by the cicatricial changes in
and the side that fights more fiercely and spares itself least will
and the simplicity of the character and intelligence in question, we
and the skin is tense and shiny. In more severe cases the burning and
and the slightest external stimulus, such as the feeling of the pulse, a
and the small white hand holding the Order touched one of Lazarev's
and the smaller number a less direct share, in the collective action
and the smoke? That's Semenovsk, yes, there," he pointed to
and the spinal nerves may also be pressed upon. When the aneurysm is on
and the still-green, thickly growing oats, and at other quite black
and the strange morose look of suffering in his face and whole figure,
and the streets were crowded with them. In the streets, around carts
and the subsequent dosage will be regulated by the effect produced. If
and the surface is covered by the ingrowth of epithelium from the edges.
and the talk of the Emperor's being expected to arrive next day--all
and the tariff of 1857 had failed to produce an income sufficient to
and the tariff. The conflict between the parties grew steadily in
and the teeth do not oppose one another. In the _thorax_, the chief
and the tendon replaced. If there is a bony projection from the
and the thinned-out edges. Thin, devitalised tags of skin often stretch
and the thought that he, an exemplary officer of many years' service
and the time quicker and when, here and there, as he ran his fingers
and the troops advanced noiselessly, only occasionally a jingling of
and the trumpets of the first cavalry regiment played the general
and the tympanum. When they are infected with pyogenic organisms or
and the urine may contain sugar and albumen.
and the water is running on my seat! I'll go and look for shelter. The
and the way Paulucci had allowed himself to speak of him to the
and the west), that on reaching Bald Hills it struck him as strange
and the whole effort has been to get some bill headed: 'A bill to punish
and the whole meaning of her life. And for the first time she felt
and the whole throng hurried to the entrance.
and the whole weight of his wrath fell on her. She was to blame that a
and the wooded banks above the winding river vanishing in the purple
and the word angina was repeated with great satisfaction.
and the words and looks of those who had seen them together. He
and the wound may have been healed for some time before the inflammation
and theaters. Natasha felt offended by the hesitation she had
and their coming to Petersburg, and the likeness between Natasha and
and their endings mainly to the intrigues and rivalries of European
and their sylvan peace was soon broken by an invasion of planters. The
and their time of utterance are related as commands to the events.
and then his attention wandered from the book and the Square and he
and then instead of seeking causes, history will take the discovery of
and then on the other.
and then to mean too much. More than anything she feared lest the
and then, suddenly spread out in the sunlight, far-distant objects
and there is usually more new bone on the surface--hyperostosis; in
and there results a relapse or recrudescence of the disease. This
and there seemed no end to it. All around the quarters occupied by the
and these in turn may be the starting-point of new emboli which give
and these present features closely resembling the tropical variety, and
and they announce a victory, supposing that the more people they
and they awoke in him astonishment at the genius of his hero, a
and they received money for it and had spent the best years of their
and they thought that the conquest of Canada would obviate some Northern
and thin, and eventually sloughs, allowing the pus to escape.
and third years, and two courses during the fourth year (Lambkin).
and this may be the starting-point of lymphangitis or cellulitis.
and this may have an important bearing on the question of accident,
and those freshly formed to defeat him wherever he may appear. May the
and those of them were. The boy, thrusting his cold hands into his
and those who had been campaigning under Kutuzov. The two Emperors,
and thrashing the laboring sides of his chestnut horse with his whip
and through the smoke saw ranks of men in uniforms of a color
and thud of the enemy's cannon balls, from the flushed and
and to a pale young officer with a bandaged arm. On seeing the count
and to become translucent when the brilliant sun appeared and
and to cut off showed itself particularly whenever the Russians
and to have the assistance of counsel for his defence.
and to hear a human voice. The satisfaction of one's needs--good food,
and to restrict their field of action. Within the area thus
and to some factor causing displacement, which may be the accumulation
and to suffer with you is the greatest happiness for me," and he
and to the Governor's. In the offices and shops and at the post office
and to the Rontgen rays than the normal cells of the body, and are more
and to the X-rays is often beneficial in these cases.
and to the influence of advisers and other people introduced by the
and to the outer side of the sterno-mastoid muscle. It occasionally
and told her he had long wished to have this happiness--ever since the
and told her she was bewitching and that he loved her. During the
and told him that he had been pardoned and would now go to the
and told the count such vile, disgraceful things about us,
and traders were murdered in the provinces; foreign legations were
and tried by the same system of using letters as numbers and adding
and tried to assume the majestic air she considered indispensable
and tried to compromise. Finding Adams relentless, the governor yielded
and trimming the mutilated finger so as to provide a useful stump.
and turning away hurriedly he entered the shed.
and twenty wagons, not more than sixty now remained; the rest had been
and twisting the sinews and scorching the flesh of his sprained arm
and two others--the doctor and a valet--lay on the floor.
and typical _main en griffe_ ensue. The loss of sensibility after
and under varying circumstances. The actual number of organisms
and undertaken something new. But after a four days' halt the mob,
and unexpected to find the way of life there unchanged and still the
and unworthy. Then our talk turned to the interpretation of the
and upper part of the spine are bent forwards; the legs are held apart,
and usually contains sarcomatous elements. The consistence of the tumour
and vein. In former times the most common situation was at the bend of
and venomously retorted on the inexperienced young man, "but I know on
and villages of the wide-stretching farm lands of the North was another
and violence: why because the Duke was wronged, thousands of men
and void; its enforcement in South Carolina is unlawful; if the federal
and wait for her, she went silently toward the door that everyone
and walked away from the sergeant major with brightened expressions,
and was about to cross the space between the barriers, when Dolokhov
and was about to run on, thinking that the farther he went to the
and was bringing back with him much that might conduce to the
and was hated by the commune, must be hesitating between the two
and was lying down in the new sitting room with a vinegar compress
and was not done, because Poniatowski, advancing on the village
and waxy degeneration in the viscera may ultimately be induced.
and weary faces, were sitting at the table eating and drinking.
and welcome for the approaching chief.
and well calculated to accomplish the purposes of the authors.
and well-bred Count Rostov. Among the men was an Italian prisoner,
and went away again having ordered the infantry supports behind the
and went in to the Minister of War. Five minutes later he returned and
and went out to pay visits, and then only to the most important
and went straight to the house.
and went to the carriage.
and went to the lodging occupied by Boris and Zhilinski.
and went with her into the unoccupied room.
and wept. She saw her brother now as he had been at the moment when he
and were at law, hunted over places that belonged by custom to the
and were in animated talk over their tea about the events of the day
and were talking patriotism, he somehow felt ashamed to take the step.
and western Jersey, it had drawn within its borders, just before the
and what constitutes the essence of these two conceptions, the
and when she felt a need to speak spitefully, the pretext would be
and when the cavities of the skull, the thorax, or the abdomen are
and when the original wound had completely healed. It usually followed
and when they divide in such a way that the resulting cells remain in
and which he knew would not stand the sight of these unfortunates.
and which shall be established by law: but the Congress may by law vest
and who made use of "carpet-bagging" in the South to win the spoils that
and who should awaken terrible memories in the Emperor Alexander's
and who will vindicate them, if ever they should be violated." The
and why?" And at the sight the old man turned angrily away.
and will to the best of my ability, preserve, protect, and defend the
and wiped his eyes at the sight.
and wit, they could vie with the sons of Harvard or William and Mary or
and with a deep sigh left the drawing room and locked its main door.
and with a pale face went out of the room and into what had been
and with a sense of antipathy to the old prince which she did not
and with dignity, and the deacon is the same. What holiness is there
and with galoshes on his bare feet, stood in the anteroom. On seeing
and with great rapidity, during the period of extreme debility which
and with the continuous effort at reconstruction of the bone by Nature's
and with the edges. The resulting cicatrix may be slightly depressed,
and with various lesions of the brain and spinal cord, such as general
and without awaiting a reply, Prince Andrew rose and left the table.
and without obvious cause, a rush of blood occurs from the mouth or the
and women danced with bare legs. Then the king again shouted to the
and women." Paine laid his lash fiercely on the Tories, branding every
and working the screws himself.
and workshops. So the first task Pierre had to face was one for
and would never know that the newly erected buildings were standing
and wounded, and the still more terrible news of the loss of Moscow
and wrinkled; he waved his arm at Toll and turned to the opposite side
and yet at the same time only a part of a whole too immense for man to
and yet could not cease to ask himself. It was as if the thread of the
and yielding a sensation like that of a sponge; the skin over it is
and yields a purulent discharge. The primary lesion may persist until
and your capital!' The one general whom we all loved, Schmidt, you
and youth, the shoulder and wrist in adults; the knee, ankle, and elbow
and, as a rule, also the pectorals and spinati, but the rhomboids and
and, as a rule, do not appear for seven or eight days after the
and, at the very moment when the Emperor, having alighted from the
and, having closed the door behind him and satisfied himself that
and, having lain in ambush in a ditch, now attacked the French
and, hearing that they wished to see the count, said his excellency
and, his face glowing from exposure to the wind and with nothing on
and, hurriedly kissing her gray hair, ran back to the maids who were
and, if it was not settled to his satisfaction, he brought it before the
and, if possible, the removal of infected tissues. The resulting wound
and, in general, food for the men. The younger ones occupied
and, in women, about the labia minora or fourchette; they probably
and, instead of going to the back entrance where his carriage
and, looking at the ground flying beneath him and at the sparkling
and, on running the fingers along the course of the vessel, a firm
and, passing three houses, turned into a yard on the right.
and, seeing the knot in it, pondered, shaking his head sadly and
and, thoroughly soured, he left the White House in 1845 not to appear in
and, to use Jefferson's phrase, dependent upon "the caprices and
and, when it joined the army in the field in the second half of the
and, when merry and laughing, quite unconsciously lifted the upper lip
and, winding down and up, rose higher and higher to the village of
anecdote the conversation broke up into insignificant small talk about
anecdotes. Second, there is the advanced text for the seventh or eighth
aneurysm enlarges, and are not always well marked even when the sac is
aneurysm is said to become _diffused_, and the extravasated blood
aneurysm on the vertebrae or the sternum, causing erosion of these bones.
aneurysm results. The internal and middle coats being already damaged,
aneurysm, and through its outer wall. The needles are made to touch the
aneurysm, however, by compressing the vein and the articular branches,
aneurysm, the clinical manifestations are chiefly referable to pressure
aneurysm, the sac becoming adherent to an adjacent vein, and ultimately
aneurysm. When medical treatment fails, the nerve-trunks may be injected
aneurysmal varix, and at the same time incising the sac, turning out the
angiomatous tumours, aneurysms, and the bruises that occur in
angle being more prominent, the spine is more horizontal and the lower
angle formed by the junction of the left internal jugular and subclavian
angle nearer the middle line. The majority of these cases recover if the
angle to it, from Borodino to Utitsa, at the very place where the
angrier at having blushed, and looked at the princess with a bold
angrily against many of the high rates imposed by the bill. They had
angry and write to Bennigsen (who reported separately to the
angry look and hurried away. It was when Pierre (wearing the
animal force, and so on, but we are conscious of the force of life
animal looks at the approaching dogs and sportsmen.
animal moans came through the door. Prince Andrew got up, went to
animal off. As a result of this, he galloped up to the wolf just
animal, and to show a marked affinity for nerve tissues; and the disease
animals moving on all sides of the herd." So say the third class of
animals. If causing disfigurement, the mass of fat may be removed by
animate it the crowd needed a tangible object to love and a tangible
animated and happy when, after getting up at daybreak and spending the
animated and, hastily passing between the rows, came toward their box.
animated face with which he talked to Pierre), the old man was sitting
animated, delighted, exhausted faces of the spectators.
animated, the husband's became more and more melancholy and solemn, as
animated. He planned another garden and began a new building for the
animated. The colonel told them that the declaration of war had
animation was evidently forced. Not only the guests but even the
animation, but the new wrinkle on his forehead deepened. "Yes, I am
ankle--blisters often form on the surface and constitute a possible
ankle-joints. Skiagrams of the hands and feet show a deposit of new bone
ankylosis is desired, they must be removed. Localised disease of the
ankylosis the shadow of the two bones is a continuous one. In fibrous as
ankylosis with deformity, the patient becoming a helpless cripple. On
ankylosis, it may be necessary to anaesthetise the patient. The nature
ankylosis, or contracture of the peri-articular structures. Caseous foci
ankylosis. In this way the fingers are seriously crippled and deformed.
ankylosis. The changes progress slowly and, before they result in
ankylosis_ implies the fusion of two apposed cartilaginous surfaces. It
annals are short and simple. The regulars from the standing army who
annexation of Porto Rico and the Philippines. American influence in the
annexation was concluded with its president. The document Grant
annexation. Cautious as well as impetuous, Jackson did not press the
annexation. In the same campaign, the Democrats boldly demanded the
annihilate him, a lieutenant of the Guards. Prince Andrew came up to
announce that His Highness was in the ballroom and wished to see her.
announce the old Federalist principles from the Supreme Bench.
announced that dinner was ready! The door opened, and from the
announced that it was the purpose of the Democrats "to destroy monopoly
announcement declared that the colonists, "misled by dangerous and
announcement goes out in the Project Gutenberg Newsletter.
announcement goes out in the Project Gutenberg Newsletter.
announcing the approach of something decisive and solemn, and
annoyed at the irregularity of a movement. With a pleasant smile
annual messages urged upon Congress more autonomy for the Filipinos and
another alone. When Princess Mary went to her father's room at the
another and Kutuzov most of all. Anticipation that the failure of
another and soon the whole battalion ran forward shouting "Hurrah!"
another and spent most of their time together. When one went out the
another and talking to himself. And he spent the night on a bed made
another appeal was made to Congress, this time from the pioneers in
another as form to content, do we get the mutually exclusive and
another at Alexandria. A third main route wound through the mountains
another at the same time they both began to speak. Pierre began with
another battle after Borodino at which the French had been routed,
another bench and put it beside the table. Ermolov, Kaysarov, and
another by contact infection, the discharge from a syphilitic lesion
another cannot be understood without an explanation of the causal
another customary remark: "It's not the gift that's precious, my dear,
another down the hillsides, and clouds of cannon smoke rolling,
another group where Bilibin was talking about the Austrians: having
another group whose center was the abbe.
another has been beaten too--they say he's nearly done for.... Oh, the
another in his imagination, particularly of the battle of Borodino and
another in such and such ways, why not explain them by the fact that
another in that they are differently defined by reason. Just so the
another in the crowd. The interpreter addressed an old porter and
another in the darkness.
another in the large hall and they whispered to one another. Then a
another in the path of virtue, and that is how Freemasonry presented
another individual, and the incubation period is a short one of from two
another instrument that began almost the same air, and then with a
another like a flock of sheep, squeezed into the exit, Pierre pushed
another military hero for the Whigs to nominate for President, decided
another of unheard-of losses, of the loss of half the army, and a
another person dressed in black. Pierre remembered that the princess
another place the women with infants in arms met him to thank him
another prohibited the exercise of their religious worship. Newport,
another rang out from the French, smoke appeared all along their
another reason for slackening the pace and delaying presented itself
another serious difference of opinion. During the debate on the tariff
another spread a jacket under her little feet to keep them from the
another tube should be placed on the overlying skin.
another very important result. It turned the capital and enterprise of
another vote for the fifteenth amendment abolishing slavery. Between the
another were heard saying as they gazed on the charred ruins. "All
another's legs and drawing out the wax, with a ceaseless hum of labor-
another, according to whether the animal is or is not leading them
another, and in her heart she sided with "Granddad." In the midst of
another, and this event was accompanied by its justification in the
another, arm us with unity of spirit in the righteous defense of the
another, gave expression to his thoughts, and even to the same
another, on the right, to the study. Through the first door came the
another, reminded him of the Rhine and the Colosseum. The cabmen he
another, the Middle colonies were thus early characterized by diversity
another, the banks formed a perfect network of agencies gathering up the
another, the princess anxious and inquiring, the nurse encouraging.
another, unite to defeat the intentions of the evil-minded, obey the
another, which causes sudden reflex contraction of the muscles, and the
another, which is like the safety valve of a boiler that allows
another. "How evidently he belongs to the best society," said she to a
another. All became silent and turned to look at the pale tear-worn
another. I'd sleep a bit and then again go and kiss the relics, and
another. The shot rattled against the stone of the gate and upon the
another. They killed the king and many other people. At that time
another... very sorry the prince is still ailing," and after a few
another; some blunt instrument is used to straighten out the strips,
answer a word to the questions addressed to him. But on entering
answer of the ministry to a prophecy of force was a threat of force.
answer such a question. Pierre put the same question to Prince Andrew.
answer the chief."
answer the congratulations and greetings from acquaintances that met
answer the questions put--which, in fact, his plan did not answer-
answer to his doubts and to confirm the fact that now he understood
answer to the demand of Great Britain for the release of the two men,
answer, "Not a minute," given nearly a hundred years before to the
answer, is sufficient to determine an attack. The movements are so
answer. At last he moved up to Pierre and, taking the kerchief that
answered by eager families. In 1894 the vanguard of home seekers left
answered by the Masonic knock with mallets, the doors opened before
answered her, as he had the countess, only in monosyllables. The other
answered his question by saying that, on the contrary, she
answered the Frenchwoman very readily and, looking at her with a
answered the countess sharply and sarcastically.
answered the general.
answered the princess joyfully.
answered the soldier. Prince Andrew took out his purse and gave the
answering the Austrian adjutant, he addressed Bolkonski.
answering these questions fell to Great Britain as mistress of the seas.
antagonism; which of them is to gain and keep the upper hand in the
antecedent gummatous disease--for example, nodular thickenings of the
antecedent keratitis; alterations in the fundus oculi from choroiditis;
antecedent ulcers. The edges are sharply cut, as if punched out; the
antechamber, reported in a whisper that the prince was sleeping, and
anteroom he would pass through the conservatory and pantry into the
anteroom, put on cloaks or mantles, and drive away. The conversation
anthrax act upon the bacteria--_anti-bacterial serums_.
anti-bacterial substances, so that the bacilli are able to thrive and
anti-syphilitic treatment and immobilisation of the limb.
anti-syphilitic treatment must be supplemented by operation for the
anti-syphilitic treatment, and complete recovery is the rule.
anti-tetanic act by neutralising the specific toxins of the
antibodies which neutralise the toxins. The polymorph leucocytes are the
anticipated any danger of invasion of the Russian provinces, and no
antiseptic tooth powder or wash. The mouth and throat should be rinsed
antiseptic, such as "bipp," so that, if the bleeding does not recur, it
antrum and middle ear. It also occurs in relation to the peripheral
anus, it is safer to treat it by the open method, packing the cavity
anxiety to find something to say, the effect is bad. But Anatole was
anxiety to the person bitten and to his friends would be avoided if
anxiety, supported the Democrats. The country was flooded with
anxious for its triumph." Late in 1862 the British ministers, thus
anxious hurry, the meeting with the courier who talked casually of how
anxious than King Charles or the Archbishop of London to shut out from
anxious watch on him when he approached the group round Mortemart to
anxiously about him; The sword cut on his arm could scarcely be called
any administrative or public business whatever from the lowest to
any avail, and the sooner this is done, the greater is the hope of
any direct part in the reparative process. These young capillary loops,
any disturbance of the general health. In nerve lesions, such as a
any doubt remains, one of the glands should be removed and submitted to
any given moment and because many of the adjutants did not go to the
any moment, when everyone is expecting the inevitable catastrophe,
any more. But after her visit the old countess spoke of her several
any of the fingers or toes, but is commonest in the first phalanx of the
any of the known forms of organic disease. In some cases the only
any one of the organisms present, but to the combined effect of a
any one of which the event could not have taken place. It was
any one was inclined to be indifferent to the Cuban war for
any orders being given. Stores of wood were brought for the night,
any palpable evidence of disease, the patient complaining of stiffness,
any part of it might be admitted to the union "with or without slavery
any portion of tissue examined for diagnostic purposes. The recognition
any positive results. Most benefit has resulted from the use of radium
any pressure to bear upon a single citizen in the whole country. It
any question shall, at the desire of one-fifth of those present, be
any single plan, had committed the choice of presidential electors to
any the worse off. In Siberia they lead the same animal life, and
any time during his term, to go before the people at a new election.
any violence to the inhabitants or any looting, and announcing a
any year is to be fixed as the date of its beginning, it may very well
any. I from the one side and Prince Bagration from the other are
anybody. The princess told the count that she would be delighted,
anyone and even advantageously, as long as no one asks what is the
anyone from sitting on the outer sill was being forced out by two
anyone had anything to say to the contrary. But no one said
anyone went up to Denisov and began questioning him about the matter
anyone who wanted to see him could come the hundred miles from
anyone's head today to suppose that the renovation of the European
anyone, but because he knew that the enemy was beaten, as everyone who
anyone, military or not, that it was here the French should attack. It
anyone. They wished to administer the sacrament of unction."
anything about it," said the countess.
anything about it. That, he said, was the fatal error--the cause of all
anything else, though he was not partisan enough to please anybody. The
anything harmful, he was prepared to run into some expense for the
anything in the world; and for the French its immediate result was
anything that went on that evening. They danced the ecossaise and
anything, since he does not believe that anything can be known. The
anything. "Moscow, our ancient capital, the New Jerusalem, receives
anything. Do you know I have sent for Pierre? The count," pointing
aortic aneurysm, occur. The pulses in the right upper extremity and in
apart from necessity, that is, apart from the laws of reason that
apart from the Spanish upper class. For a time after military occupation
apart from the ever-quickening music, being the rhythmic click of
apex of the stamp.]
apologizing for the state of his gun.
apoplexy. The glioma of the retina tends to grow into the vitreous
appalled by the terrible pallor of the princess' face that looked
apparatus is so arranged that the steam circulates under a pressure of
apparatus--such as the application of weights to the limb. It may be
apparent cause, a haemorrhage takes place into the joint. The joint is
apparent reason, ran back and disappeared from the outskirts, and
apparent triumph of the national spirit over sectionalism.
apparently insuperable diplomatic difficulties and ends the military
apparently suffering more than the dying soldier, and he rode away.
apparition and began speaking about the prince's indisposition.
appeal to Moscow, which had just been printed, the last army orders,
appeal to his countrymen in his pamphlet, "The Crisis," the first part
appeal to the hearts of the American people, there were thus added
appeals and consigned them to the waste basket. Not until the Whigs were
appear a grown-up man. But the farther he went and the more his
appear before there is any evidence of tabes. The onset is frequently
appear on the skin and mucous membranes, and the patient may suffer from
appear so insurmountably difficult. At the same time that he refused
appear that the most marked changes take place in the submucous tissue,
appear to be mainly nourished from the synovia.
appear to notice the constraint the newcomer produced and, with the
appear, as well as by the proximity of the enemy, resolved to advance.
appear, compared to the lofty, equitable, and kindly sky which he
appear, one of the large joints, such as the shoulder or knee, may be
appear. Further, it is seen from pathological specimens that the spread
appearance among the hussars, Cossacks, and adjutants, in his camlet
appearance as I had fondly painted in my mind. The prejudices,
appearance at different parts of the joint. This feature serves to
appearance is brought about; with further use of the joint, the bone is
appearance is that of brownish-yellow or pink nodules in the skin, about
appearance months, or even years, after the apparent cure of tuberculous
appearance of women on the platform was new and strange. Naturally it
appearance; or they become oedematous, and the subcutaneous venous
appearances of the pus may not supply the desired information, and it
appeared from behind the corner of the house with a frightened yet
appeared in the stalls. The Rostovs had not seen him since their
appeared on his face and the other turned away and went down the
appeared the figure of Makar Alexeevich, always so timid before but
appeared to be the successful prosecution of several great combinations.
appeared to him, the gloomier seemed his own.
appeared under the curtain of the cot. He did not look round, but
appeared, Kutuzov went purple in the face, not because that officer
appearing on his own horizon--from that day the problem of the
appearing on the front. The pus may be under such tension that
appearing ridiculous--that he had been awaiting the boyars so long
appearing unduly prominent. The term _craniotabes_ is applied when the
appears as a livid or red swelling at the root of the nail and spreading
appears as a tense, rounded, pulsatile swelling just above the clavicle
appears at the site of inoculation a circumscribed area of infiltration
appears denser and broader than normal, and the contour is uneven or
appears greater to the eye than is borne out by measurement, being
appears in people's belief that this was necessary for the welfare
appears in the early years of life, sometimes in relation to a pigmented
appears on the outer aspect of the cheek, and rapidly increases in size;
appears on the surface.
appears that we are within sight of the enemy and must give battle.
appears the lieutenant general, our dear Prince Auersperg von
appellate powers over all judicial tribunals in the empire. The right
appendages, the mucous membranes, and the lymph glands.
appendicitis, tuberculous peritonitis, and other conditions. In the
appendix and amputated through the thigh in haemophilic subjects without
applause and tears of his devotees, to the Hermitage, his home in
apple, also half smiling as he looked at the handsome girl.
applicable to all the plants of a given industry, even if subject to
application of a pad of gauze soaked in the blood of a normal person
application of blisters or of Corrigan's button. The general condition
application of blunt violence to the skull; and of the arteries of the
application of essential oils to the feet acts as a preventive.
application of the Wilmot Proviso at any and all hazards." A conference,
application of the legislatures of two-thirds of the several States,
application of the test is highly complicated and can only be carried
application of the thermo-cautery and sponging with pure carbolic acid,
application. Congress, deeply impressed by his leadership, passed the
applications, preparations of mercury are usually selected, notably the
applications, such as belladonna, ichthyol, or menthol, by the use of
applied all round the ulcer, speedily disperses the inflammatory
applied at intervals to different parts of the naevus, the duration and
applied himself to the bottle of Bordeaux. He wrapped the bottle up to
applied in industry. The Department of Labor became one of the powerful
applied the direct primary in some form to the choice of Senators. Men
applied to a condition which results when the thorax is so forcibly
applied to it, may be the means of conveying bacterial infection. Should
applied to the payment of the public debt. This more limited proposal,
applied to the wound.
applied to women and giving them many of the "rights of man." California
applied. In extensive wounds, the "shell-dressing" carried by the
applied. The endothelium over these plates often disappears, leaving
applied; the repeated use of a suction bell is of great service.
applying a strong solution of iodine around the affected area is based
applying the steam engine to navigation, Stevens and Peter Cooper trying
appointed Clay to the office of Secretary of State; and they set up a
appointed a few new men to the higher posts, continued in office the
appointed by the Emperor himself, and this fresh opportunity for
appointed places. As always happens the men, starting cheerfully,
appointed position. Not only the generals in full parade uniforms,
appointed the civil and military officers. He granted pardons and
appointed to the different wards of the city. You will recognize
appointment as Gentleman of the Bedchamber, which at that time
appointment in the army, their position gave them influence, and often
appointment of such a commission aroused the patriots of Virginia to
appointment of the governor and other officers was controlled by
appointment of the officers, and the authority of training the militia
appointments until the next meeting of the legislature, which shall then
apportioned among the states, in proportion not to their wealth but to
apportioned and put to proper use fall into the hands of another,
apportionment of direct taxes among the slave states was settled, it was
apposed, as in the region of the scrotum or labium, under pendulous
appreciated on comparison with the normal joint of the other limb.
appreciated the enjoyment of eating when he wanted to eat, drinking
appreciation for the work thus inaugurated. It inspired a leading
appreciation of the vicomte's epigram, Pierre again broke into the
appreciation. "The French battalion rushes to the bridgehead, spikes
appreciative according to the way the joke was received. Everybody
apprehension and distrust--but the expression on all the faces was
apprehensive as they contemplated the undoubted evil, as well as the
apprentices wrought by hand, they offer the giant factory where ten
approach a solution of the problem, but never reach it. Only when we
approach of the French came from all sides, and in one village, ten
approach. He felt it not only from the sound of the hoofs of the
approached and he felt a nervous shudder run down his spine. But the
approached first, experienced the same feeling as every other man in
approached him coming from the copse. Suddenly the wolf's whole
approached him, and repressing the terror that seized her, she pressed
approached his sister, laid his well gloved hand on the edge of her
approached respectfully to hear the voices of well-known men. The
approached the door of the minister's room. He felt offended, and
approached the right flank of the Preobrazhensk battalion and came
approached, as if the hounds in full cry and Daniel ulyulyuing were
approaching. And at that moment, though the day was still, a light
approaching. At the approach of danger there are always two voices
approbation of the public was forthcoming when the lawyer for the
appropriate for use against the privileged classes of Massachusetts or
appropriated by Congress in 1916 to assist the states in building and
appropriately, occurred to him at the moment.
appropriation by Great Britain of any lands or the exercise of
appropriations made by law; and a regular statement and account of the
approval of Lincoln; it was actually ratified by three states before the
approval of two-thirds of the Senators required for a treaty of
approval when she told him that the wax with the baby's hair had not
approval, as he always did, to what the speaker was saying. The
approved the amendment, making three-fourths of the states as required
approved the reduction of the volume of currency. They wished to see the
approved the resistance to British measures offered by Massachusetts and
approved, on March 6, 1820, the bill establishing freedom north of the
approving Hamilton's measures and policies. The Federalists, divided in
approximate the ends satisfactorily, the muscle or tendon is exposed by
approximately ascertaining the enemy's position--by cavalry
approximation of the skin edges, stitches of horse-hair, fishing-gut, or
apt to be persistent or to relapse after apparent cure. In the _gouty_
aptitude. Whatever may be the truth, the fact remained that at the
aptly compared to watered silk. The soft variety grows much more rapidly
arable land was practically exhausted by 1890 under the terms of the
arbitrary government. To use the familiar phrase, they had learned
arbitrate, Admiral Dewey would be ordered to the scene with instructions
arborescent appearance. In other cases the injured skin becomes dry and
arch of the Sukharev tower accompanied by a small, sallow-faced,
architect, gardener, or Princess Mary did, till the prince appeared
ardor of the voters, had nominated. On looking at the election returns,
are accompanied by a fall in the number of leucocytes, while the
are affected; the crippling resembles that resulting from arthritis
are also liable to be injured. The dissection is rendered easier and is
are also present in the spaces. These act as phagocytes, their function
are arranged loosely; and the _hard fibroma_, which is composed of
are associated with, and probably result from, a fibromatosis of the
are at the same time easily digested and nourishing, especially proteids
are broken up so as to form masses or chains of _cocci_; and around the
are brought together by sutures, or the raw surface is covered with
are chiefly met with in the main cords or abdominal plexuses of the
are childwen of the dust... but one falls in love and one is a God,
are clonic in character, affect chiefly the muscles of respiration and
are coming to us of their own accord," incautiously remarked the
are crowned with success. The enemy's fleet, which subsequently did
are derived from the endothelium of lymph spaces and vessels. The
are destroyed, leaving only the bones covered by tightly stretched scar
are due to the bovine bacillus, 37 per cent. to the human variety, and
are employed--empirically--a number of procedures such as the induction
are forcing us to exterminate them. So much the worse for the
are formed in which float the diplomatists, who imagine that they have
are four hundred? Eh?" he asked, turning to the assistant.
are free of organisms, but equally in the management of wounds and other
are given twice daily (A. Campbell). The presence of albumen in the
are harmful, especially the women. Yes, dear boy," he continued, "I
are imperfectly reproduced; hence the scar remains smooth, dry, and
are in abeyance, and it is only after the inflammation has been allayed,
are in flat contradiction to such conjectures. During the whole period
are innocent cavernous tumours dating from a congenital angioma. The
are involved, the pressure is not so high and there is comparatively
are its unsightliness and its probable increase in size in the course of
are known as gouty ulcers, and these may extend through the cartilage
are liable to break down and lead to the formation of ulcers which may
are made at fortnightly intervals, and on account of the cicatricial
are many routes by which the bacteria may gain access to the affected
are met with and may be the seat of bursitis. That over the _tuberosity
are met, and on how and by whom the whole matter is handled. To
are most careful not to break the rules of strict neutrality, but even
are most frequently situated in the lungs, except when the primary
are most intense in the immediate vicinity of the wound, the edges of
are never to blame," were the last words he heard from his sister when
are not infrequent when there are adhesions to the chest wall and
are not. The regiments would not be what they are if the would-be
are paralysed, and in some cases the radial extensors of the wrist and
are particularly useful. The most rational treatment, when it is
are partly embedded in the substance of the parotid gland; they drain
are persons and entitled to all the rights and privileges of human
are poured over and around the wound, after which the field dressing is
are present. The presence of an ulcer does not contra-indicate
are red. It is a good omen when the tongue becomes moist again. Thirst
are removed and the minute punctures are sealed with collodion. The
are removed.  Of course, we hope that you will support the Project
are removed.  Of course, we hope that you will support the Project
are reproduced, but if the reaction is excessive permanent alopecia may
are restricted by the amount of fluid in the joint. It usually subsides
are ruining a whole life for the sake of amusing yourself! Amuse
are sending ambassadors to compliment the usurper."
are simple. They do not talk, but act. The spoken word is silver but
are small in size and have prominent granulations, and by the aid of a
are so important that the science of applied bacteriology has now come
are softer and more sensitive. The glands in nearest relation to the
are sometimes employed in the form of mustard leaves or blisters,
are somewhat similar to those obtained by needling, but the clot formed
are taken to the field marshal's room, for he likes to do everything
are the _antitoxins_. From the study of the processes by which immunity
are the best. Both poles are introduced into the naevus, the positive
are the enlargement of the prepatellar bursa met with in housemaids--the
are the forces.
are the most powerful.
are the seat of burning pain and tenderness. The associated glands are
are there," said the officer, pointing to the village of Hosjeradek,
are thus formed. In the pus are found yellow particles likened to
are thus introduced into the blood, not only at the primary seat of
are tight, and the deep ones may be cutting into the tissues. There is
are unfavourable for the formation of an occluding clot. Even if a clot
are unknown and cannot be defined, especially when the strength of the
are within sight of the enemy and he wishes to profit by the
are you hindering us?" Another in the same place turned round and
are young women from seventeen to twenty-four years of age, the
are, owing to the conditions of the venous circulation, more readily
are, with the old man among them. And they began telling what each was
are; rising in this way from the lowest ranks to the man at the top,
area in spite of the usual methods of treatment. After lasting for some
area is hot, the redness of inflammation gives place to a dusky purple
area of the tumour, while above and below or around this, the shadow is
area sufficiently tightly to obstruct the venous return from the distal
area supplied by branches from the same segment of the cord as that
area the more readily is the local increase of temperature detected by
area, or, it may be, to remove the nail entirely. If only a small
area--at the junction of the brow with the hairy scalp, and where the
area. For example: an abscess in the integument or subcutaneous
area. Such islets may also be due to the accidental transference of
area. The roar of guns, that had not ceased for ten hours, wearied the
argued, and to betray the trust reposed in them by their countrymen.
arguments. An American opinion was in the process of making--an
arguments. Moreover, the war, which sprang out of an effort to relieve
arid regions in 1894 by granting lands to the states to be used for
arise from the distension of cavities which are not provided with
arise, every one of us will go, for our father the Tsar!" he
arising in the bone-marrow reach their destination through the
aristocracy and the rich merchants of England.
aristocracy of talents and wealth"--an offense which the Republicans
aristocrat." He was not a son of the soil. Neither was he acquainted at
aristocratic French family. That same day, Rostov, profiting by the
arm about, till the boards were withdrawn from under him and he
arm and forearm, and there is paralysis of the sympathetic.
arm following one another uninterruptedly, the man hung the leg
arm for haemorrhage from the deep palmar arch, and of the posterior
arm in every direction, I see that I raised it in the direction in
arm. Ganglia are also met with on the dorsum of the metacarpus and on
arm. Gangrene following the blocking of the _brachial_ at its
armaments, likewise proposed in the conference, was again deferred. In
armchair or of the sofa for his dear guest, but being apparently
armchair placed sideways, screening the light of the candle from
armed neutrals formed in protest against British searches on the high
armed rebellion was avoided. In Massachusetts the malcontents, under the
armed resistance, the patriots found it necessary to consolidate their
armed settlement of the dispute as inevitable. Congress created the
armies and over the whole region occupied by them.
armies could readily retreat, supplied mainly from native resources, the
armies side by side with soldiers from the English and Scotch-Irish
armies surrounded them in superior numbers, when the disordered
armies to Russia, is generalized into one event in accord with the
armies, so that it was as easy for the Russian rearguard to get to
arms are limited. The disease progresses by fits and starts, until all
arms from behind the door. Ten minutes later, all the young
arms hanging lifelessly just in the pose she used to stand in when she
arms of its rightful king," she concluded, trying to be amiable to the
arms on the table and began to read. After reading a few lines, he
arms piled and the soldiers, only partly dressed, eating their rye
arms reversed. From behind them came the sound of church singing.
arms was followed by another and another until the long contest was
arms wide and threw them round the little girl who had run in.
arms"; but the net result in keeping the field free for an easy triumph
arms, gave them offices, and bought them seats in the House of Commons.
army against another is the cause, or at least an essential
army and disbanding the Semenov regiment."
army and the wealthy city.
army as the flight of the French was to theirs. The only difference
army as well as Moscow, or losing Moscow alone, the field marshal
army as well as Moscow? That is the question on which I want your
army as well as on the public. In December, 1776, he made a second great
army by Kutuzov. Now having come to the army, he informed Kutuzov of
army demanded--namely, simply to follow the enemy up. The French crowd
army he commanded was in an almost hopeless position. The spy reported
army is presented to us by the historians as something great and
army lay in the vague idea that he was L'russe Besuhof who had the
army of the Revolution was the brave officer who had "spurned the
army of the glory of complete victory over the French.*
army were unknown to the Russians, as soon as that change occurred the
army! The enemy is beaten, and tomorrow we shall drive him from the
army's position, and vividly imagined what awaited it and the part
army, none of the movements of the crowd had any sense. So one might
army, the Russian army, everyone declared, was extraordinary and had
army, the plans suggested, the situation of Moscow, and military
army--and methodically to collect the provisions, of which
army--which they feared more than anything in the world. What the
army. "Nothing but the supineness or folly of the enemy could have saved
army. In Smolensk, at the Malakhov Gate, he had hardly dozed off in
army. In the morning, when he went to call at Rostopchin's he met
army. Sonya was in the ballroom looking after the packing of the glass
army. The army was made up of white slanting lines that filled the air
army. The letter was old, having been written before the battle at
army. They crowded into Republican councils, for the Republicans, being
army. To be able to crush it absolutely he awaited the arrival of
army; but to help England and Austria against the greatest man in
arose from those sounds. She sat behind the bookcase with her eyes
arose in connection with the application of a customs officer to a
arose mainly on the frontiers, where the restless and pushing pioneers
around are red, glazed, and oedematous. The discoloration and swelling
around him a fragrance of perfume and wine, and had uttered the
around him allowed, immersed himself in the quiet life to which he had
around him and then again at his feet. The former and the latter
around its margins. The epidermis, which is thin and shiny, gives way,
around me or from the construction of my own body. I chose one out
around the Horn. Daring skippers had sailed out of New England harbors
around the blood vessels. The cut surface of the soft fibroma presents a
around the fireside and at the taverns. When the day of resistance to
around the throne again. George received his Tory friends with open
around the vein above the bulbous end of the stylet enables nearly the
around them they saw chaos in finance and in industry and perils for the
around to the opposite view. Its spokesmen came to regard most of these
around. But the men in the battery seemed not to notice this, and
arouse him and conversation would be resumed, to the accompaniment
arouse the slumbering resistance of the thirteen colonies across the
arouses a desire in the latter by means of which it attracts
arranged a supper for his French friends. The guest of honor was an
arranged to have the federal troops, if necessary, take possession of
arrangement of the epithelial cells.
arrangement of the festival in honor of Bagration, for few men knew so
arrangement of the tissues. The size of the abscess affords no
arrangement of the veins showing great variety (Fig. 67).
arrangements it made for crossing as by what took place at the
arranging a dinner in honor of Prince Bagration at the English Club.
arranging the breech-band on his little horse.
arranging with his right hand the cleanest of gloves that fitted his
arrest completely the arterial flow, otherwise the veins only are
arrest may be effected by elevation of the bleeding part, particularly
arrest or only diminish the flow of blood through the sac. It is less
arrested and exiled for no particular offense; now assembled the
arrested at once by elevating the limb, or by applying pressure directly
arrested by making firm pressure over the wound with a pad; but this
arrested by the coming together of bony outgrowths around the joint. It
arrested in the capillaries and give rise to secondary growths. These
arrested. It seemed not to matter whether all or only half the
arrival and of thanksgiving for the conclusion of peace with the
arrival the morning had passed off safely. After admitting the doctor,
arrival went to his father's part of the house. Entering the drawing
arrival. From that day, as the doctor expressed it, the wasting
arrive at absurdity, while by admitting our dependence on the external
arrive; and slowly turning her eyes from the visitor to her aunt, Anna
arrived and Pierre with thirteen others was led to the Virgin's Field.
arrived at their places at the appointed time and destroyed the enemy.
arrived from Moscow, and news of the surrender of Moscow to the French
arrived he was not in and hardly any of the staff were there--they had
arriving from Russia were settling near the fortress of Braunau and
art of being stronger than the enemy at a given moment. That's all."
arterial blood into the vein, which near the point of communication with
arterial tension and to diminish the force of the heart's action. The
arteries, may be so profuse as to prove dangerous. When the associated
arteries, with degeneration of the heart muscle; in affections of the
arterio-sclerosis occur. The walls of varicose veins are often
arterio-sclerosis. In some cases the vessel wall is softened by
arterio-venous aneurysm. Two varieties are recognised--one in which the
arterioles and the efferent venules of which often share in the
arteritis--especially the embolic form--so that it yields before the
artery (p. 261), it being remembered, however, that the artery is
artery above and below the point of communication.
artery concerned, and the relations of the erosion to the surrounding
artery has been weakened, the tension of the blood causes the walls to
artery in its continuity--for example, in the treatment of aneurysm--the
artery, the carotid and subclavian arteries are tied at the seat of
artery_ is obstructed, the veins remaining pervious, the anastomosis
arthritis_--the general and local phenomena are intensified, the
arthropathy, consists in supporting and protecting the joint by means of
article in the "Westminster Review," which deeply interested the
articles which seemed to him valuable or useful. The aim of each man
articles" which seriously concerned the American colonies, the rest
articles, "awl, soap, and all," as the soldiers say. There was only
articular aspect of the epiphysis is invested with a thick layer of
articular cartilage is invaded by granulation tissue derived from the
articular cartilage long resists destruction. The ossifying sarcoma is
articular cartilage on the convex aspect and a variable thickness of
articular cartilage, or, in the case of adolescent bones, up to the
articular rheumatism are, that the gonorrhoeal affection is more often
articular surface of the bone undergoes disintegration, a condition
articulated the French proverb deliberately.
artifice when leaving Orel, to induce the Italian officer to accept
artificial media, the colonies assume an orange-yellow colour--hence the
artificial smile on her lips, she got up and left the room. All
artificiality, and a feeling of horror at renouncing the possibility
artificially raised on lesions of the skin or on the immediately
artillery fire. Toward two o'clock the regiment, having already lost
artilleryman, wiping away the blood with his coat sleeve, as if
artisans are usually the dangerous element that make revolutions;
artisans, mechanics, and laborers; and the latter, patriotic women. Both
arts are built upon leisure; the African slave, kindly treated by his
arts of warfare, and to practice, if in a small theater, the science of
arts, and sciences, he ran counter to the current which had set in
arts, self-government on a grand scale. The absence of a leisure class,
as "sleeping" of the limb, but these phenomena are evanescent. _Injuries
as "the Tariff of Abominations," though slightly modified in 1832, was
as "treason to the party"; but the Republicans, especially from the
as Anna Mikhaylovna took off her gloves and, occupying the position
as Franklin's tale implies. On the contrary, the legislatures, like
as Jefferson phrased it. The favorite expedient of compromise with
as Pierre knew by the smell, and he was told that he would now see the
as President called upon to apply in one of the most perplexing moments
as _diffuse lipoma_. As this is not, strictly speaking, a tumour, the
as _eburnation_ of the articular surfaces (Fig. 158). In hinge-joints
as _keloid_ and _molluscum fibrosum_, and those met with in the _sheaths
as _melaena_; and the passage of bloody urine, as _haematuria_.
as a _medullary_ or _encephaloid cancer_. If the alveoli are small and
as a cellulitis of the pulp of the finger (Fig. 9, c), which sometimes
as a coalition against the very principles of republicanism; and the
as a flap, the bursa is dissected out, and the projection of bone, if
as a friend that frees the soul grown weary in the labors of virtue
as a gentleman of the chamber, presented himself at court and at a
as a hard lump and increases in size until the epidermis gives way and
as a lacrymal fistula; near the ear, as a mastoid fistula; or close to
as a matter of fact, it is often discovered accidentally. The absence of
as a nodule in the substance of an organ, or as a diffuse thickening of
as a result of prolonged irritation by the urine in cases in which the
as a result of rupture of the confining sheath. This injury is met with
as a result of the _deposit of blood pigment_ in the tissues, and this
as a result of the uniform or from some other cause Pierre saw
as a rule, it spreads thence from the pharynx. It first manifests itself
as a tribute laid upon them for the benefit of Northern industries. As
as against the North growing with incredible swiftness in wealth and
as always happens, was met by representatives of the other. The
as an autocratic power wielded in the interest of an ambitious military
as an evidence of some infective process going on in the tissues in
as an old friend, simply and cordially. The whole family, whom he
as asking the leave of any government, territorial or national, they
as before, interlarding their talk with the same aimless expletives.
as being the center of our position and where rows of fragrant
as bring out the movements of the vertebral column and hip-joints.
as chronic phthisis, empyema, bronchiectasis, or sarcoma of the lung.
as compared with the vast plantations of the Southern seaboard--huge
as designed and established by the framers of the Constitution and the
as events proved, it was the fortunate French alliance negotiated by
as far as he could the collection of alms, in regard to which the
as far as the Proclamation was concerned, remained lawful.
as for aneurysm--preferably by ligation of the main artery; if
as free, it is necessary to imagine it in the present, on the boundary
as he began to watch the produce markets of New York and Philadelphia
as he called it, the "great revolution," Jackson's inauguration was a
as he called the Grand Master.
as he closed them he saw before him the dreadful face of the factory
as he expected he was appointed an adjutant to the governor general of
as he had been and his health was poor (the old man laid special
as he had left the room all the officers burst into loud laughter
as he had thought of all the young ladies without exception whom he
as he was uncomfortable and in great pain. The doctor and valet lifted
as he went along, and the appearance of the troops in their disorderly
as he went up to the window of the first house, when a familiar
as himself, Pierre remembered the Masonic vow in which each Brother
as if astonished at the word. "Well, you see, I'm building. I mean
as if considering in how far the thing was possible--replied in the
as if continuing a conversation the subject of which had often been
as if everything she said and everything the others said was very
as if flinging something to the ground, the drummer--a lean,
as if hewn out of some precious stone, sparkled in the moonlight. A
as if not understand what was said to him. Wolzogen, noticing "the old
as if the very fact that it had happened so quickly proved that it had
as if the whole world had gone crazy."
as if there had never existed the millions of human beings who grew up
as if to fill the cup to the brim, the task of reconstruction was
as if to increase the confusion, backward states enacted laws hindering
as if trying to comprehend the difficult problem of what was taking
as in the depth of his heart it had always seemed to him that he
as in the malacia of women. The shaft of the femur is curved forwards
as is always the case in an artillery company, a head and shoulders
as is often seen after injuries in the region of the shoulder.
as it does the risk of suffocation.
as it is called. Where it approaches the surface the skin becomes soft
as it not only contracts the arterioles supplying the part, but also
as it occasionally does, the fungus is transmitted by the blood vessels,
as it passes round the neck of the humerus is most liable to be injured
as it reaches an area rich in anastomotic vessels. The dead portion is
as large as many a baronial domain in the Old World. Under a Republican
as manhood suffrage. Their protests were futile. The property test was
as may be disfranchised for participation in the rebellion or for felony
as much in love with her betrothed, found the same comfort in that
as myelin. This medullated sheath is interrupted at the nodes of
as necessarily as any other cause by the laws of nature brings on its
as necrosis of the tissue elements takes place in the centre, it becomes
as not being free, for it is irrevocably linked to the moment at which
as not to allow of your taking the offensive? On the contrary, he is
as not to be under any active and protecting branch of the central
as occur after an ordinary bruise. The patients seldom manifest the
as of every soldier there, were unconsciously bent on avoiding the
as old as America but new elements now entered the situation. In the
as one has to listen to the chanting of a service of prayer. All
as one of the delegates remarked. A crash was averted only by a
as only constitutional monarchs deliver. "The Sovereign plainly said
as portions of the articular surface which have been detached by a
as presented to him in the form of his love for Natasha, and a last,
as primary suture, and for its success asepsis is essential. As the
as recommended by Bier, the skin edges are brought together by sutures
as separate the points of a pair of compasses 2 cms. apart. These are
as sharp conflicts over land aroused angry passions. To the south and
as she overtook her in the sitting room.
as something generally known. But it the first time he had heard
as soon as the last figure of the ecossaise was ended, he clapped
as such, became the subject of a popular outcry against the President
as the "citadel of conservatism." The prescription in this case was
as the "rickety rosary."
as the Lake states and twice as much as the vast forests of Washington
as the Populists, who alleged that "the toil of millions is boldly
as the _metaphysis_ or _epiphysial junction_. The shaft is a cylinder of
as the attack on our left flank took place in the evening after the
as the beginning of his "American system" of protection. Calhoun
as the cheek, tongue, and soft palate. The swelling is rounded or
as the day was mapped out, the prince rested and the princess played
as the demand was booked against an infantry regiment, there will be a
as the disease is commonest during the winter months. The digits of both
as the face, hands, arms, or back of the neck, and the wound may be
as the goal is approached.
as the goal of the movement of humanity, the historians study the
as the initiator of a settlement of any sort. Such is the present
as the intestine or liver. The question of the removal of the tumour
as the knee, ankle, elbow, and wrist. The swelling, which is the first
as the latter affection spreads more rapidly, involves the lymph glands
as the legitimate son."
as the malleoli, the condyles of the femur or humerus, the head of the
as the minister at Paris when the Constitution was drafted and ratified.
as the nerve is divided below the level at which it gives off the dorsal
as the obstruction to the flow of lymph increases there is a
as the others did till they all stopped and he stopped too. The only
as the periosteum has been separated, and the infected marrow is removed
as the pickets of the vanguard had done, and an adjutant of the
as the prince was not very well and was taking no steps to secure
as the radial, the temporal or the femoral--may be felt as firm,
as the regeneration of blood takes place rapidly. In old people also,
as the result of the distension of lymph spaces and vessels
as the rhabdomyoma, tumours of muscle grow from the connective-tissue
as the smoke and mist spread out over the whole space. Just as in
as the tortoise. By the time Achilles has covered the distance that
as the war, temporarily stopped by the peace of Amiens, was once more
as the wife's share increased the husband's diminished.
as the wolves were kept off by the passing men the dog could eat all
as their constitution may provide at the time of their admission." The
as they are liable to lower the vitality of the damaged tissues and lead
as they awaited their fate. The firing died down and soldiers, talking
as they emerge from under cover of the scalenus anterior, and are then
as they pass across the root of the neck. There is complaint of pain
as they passed along the Sadovaya Street the carriages and carts
as they seemed of them, one could feel by the occasional glances
as they were called, poured in upon the scene to aid in
as this is in its turn absorbed, further bone is formed beneath the
as those in the axilla, neck, and groin. In any given situation they
as to avail himself of the opportunity to air it. It was one of the
as to favour the circulation in the affected area.
as to implicate the surrounding tissues, and it is liable to give rise
as to the cause of death.
as to the delegates seemed "most likely to affect their safety and
as to what had been burned down and what this or that part of the city
as to where and when to move the guns, when to send infantry to
as usual on Sundays. Nobody seemed yet to realize what awaited the
as was his wont, as if intentionally contrasting the briskness of
as we recognize it as a force not subject to law, the existence of law
as we sought alliances with the Germans and thrust ourselves into
as well as political, although I had only partially formulated the
as well as the Northern and Middle states chose this route; so it came
as well as the trade. Later, colonization societies were formed to
as well as to Europe as an outlet for the surplus of the farms. He sent
as will give ample protection and encouragement to the industries and
as, by so doing, there is a risk of pyogenic infection from the throat
ascending the hill breathing heavily, and despite the general's
ascites, or withdrawing fluid from the pleural cavity. Syncope sometimes
ascribe a greater amount of freedom to it. In the case of a crime we
ascribe the glory of that achievement of genius to different men and
ascribed to the "Democratic assault on business." So an old issue was
aseptic, the grafts may be placed on them directly.
asepticity should it do so. In the event of the skin giving way, the
ashamed to wear the uniform. If it has come to this--we must fight
aside and artisans had been given the ballot.
aside from the affairs of the Petersburg lodges, and lived almost
aside the provision of the Articles of Confederation which required
aside the question of cause, they seek for laws. History stands on the
aside, Dolokhov rode up the incline at a walk.
ask himself whether the news was good or bad. That did not interest
ask you to put the money on your cards," replied Dolokhov. "Don't
asked and answered at the same instant. He was alone in the middle
asked for reinforcements and all said that the Russians were holding
asked himself as he rode back from the general. "Ilyin? No, he's safe.
asked himself with a sinking heart--watching the bridge and the
asked if it was far to the Kremlin. The porter, listening in
asked the French government to recall him. This act he followed up by
asked the prince's permission to ride round the position to see the
asked to be allowed to pass as they were blocking the way. As soon
asked to be carried into the hut after his caleche had stopped at
asked to be taken out and given some tea. The pain caused by his
asked what was the matter, he only uttered some incoherent oaths and
asked you to?" shouted Natasha, raising herself on the sofa and
asked, noticing the French drummer boy. "A prisoner? You've already
asking for information.... What are your orders about the Fire
asleep on his bed, ran all disheveled out of the mud hut to embrace
asleep, and at the very instant he died, having made an effort, he
asleep. Weyrother, with the gesture of a man too busy to lose a
aspect of the cheek is a deeply ulcerated surface, with sloughy shreds
aspect of the prepuce, and in the fold between the prepuce and the
aspect, which is unaltered. Ultimately the dead bone becomes loose and
assemble conventions, chosen "by that portion of the people of the said
assemble for the usual silent prayer with closed doors before
assemble, and to petition the government for a redress of grievances.
assembled after the adoption of the Constitution, there were eleven
assembled at Jackson, Mississippi, in the autumn of 1849, called a
assembled in Chicago, however, the opposition disappeared and Roosevelt
assembled, about one-fourth of the seats were contested, the delegates
assembled," said the Tsar with another glance at the Emperor
assemblies at the palace of the Tsars, at which Russian notables and
assemblies for adoption, and to hear memorials and petitions from the
assemblies, accustomed to battle against British policies, supported the
assembling, evidently preparing for the Emperor to come out.
assembly amid great excitement. A few days later came the famous
assembly, was continued virtually without change. The old property
assembly. It had been discussed in every part of the country by farmers
assembly. This stirred the country to its depths.
assented. But apparently the coachman's sympathy was not enough for
assert that the battle of Borodino had been a victory, he alone--who
assiduous and modest mien, and stooping over the outspread map
assigned to cavalry-captain Denisov, the squadron commander, known
assigned to him. After inspecting the carriage himself and seeing
assigned to it, in the manner most beneficial to the people." In short,
assigned to the office of "mayor president." In 1908, the commission
assigned, on the bank of the Drissa. As there was not a single town or
assistance of the government that irritated them. It was the protection
assistant and Petya--whom she had drawn into the business of
assistant commander of the first division of the Second Army.
assistant to show him the way.
assistant, standing on a stool, applies his closed fist over the
assistants. On the square in front of the Bazaar were drummers beating
assisted in their education by a Federalist from the Old Dominion, John
associated joints are usually infected from the outset. In flat bones,
associated with a carious tooth--the sinus should be excised and the raw
associated with child-bed. It occurs in peripheral parts, such as the
associated with crumbling away of the trabecular framework of a bone. It
associated with flexion. Contracture may result from disease of the
associated with fractures of the humerus, especially those from direct
associated with keloid may be relieved by the application of salicylic
associated with pyrexia and great pain in the joint. The part is hot and
associated with softening of the bones, as a result of which they
associated with some disturbance of the emotions or of the generative
associated with stagnation of blood in the peripheral veins. Any
associated with suppuration in the adjacent joint.
associated with the degenerative changes in nerve cells described by
associated with the diseases of blood vessels that it is convenient to
associated with their proposal a tax on incomes. The argument which
associated with those less deep, and the clinical picture is made up of
associated with various forms of irritation about the external genitals,
associates in the recent war were heavily indebted to our government.
associating these words with vague yet joyful ideas. The door opened
association of nations must be formed to guard the peace and protect all
association with an unusual form of protein in the urine (Bence Jones).
association with epithelioma of the lip, tongue, or fauces. The glands
association with other deformities. The pectoralis major, for example,
assume a pose en quarte or en tierce according to all the rules, and
assume the shape of melon-seed bodies. More rarely the joint contains
assumed in disease of the hip. They are due to reflex or involuntary
assumes a _throbbing_ character, and as the pus reaches the surface, or
assumes a throbbing character, particularly when the hand is dependent,
assumes gigantic proportions. In certain cases the lymph trunks have
assumes the form of multiple linear ulcers or fissures, and as each of
assumes the strength of an army to be identical with its numbers.
assuming the characters of a diffuse infiltration--diffuse tuberculous
assurance exasperating to Rostov, he ran his eyes over the Russian
assured himself from the way Rostov looked at it that his coat had
assured popular election of Senators. The eighteenth made prohibition
assured with all his being that the terrible blow into which he and
astonished, frightened, bloodstained face of "the traitor" in the
astonishment in their eyes chiefly because Pierre, unlike all the
astonishment of the footmen, coachmen, and ferrymen, still stood on
astounding. A sarcastic writer, while sneering at the idea of an
astounding. In 1865 cotton spinning was a negligible matter in the
astronomy, physics, chemistry, botany, zoology, and so on, just in the
astute or the Duke of Oldenburg wronged. We cannot grasp what
at Bald Hills, so near the theater of war and on the army's direct
at Dolokhov or answering him. The footman, who was distributing
at Fili was impossible, but imbued with Russian patriotism and the
at Hollabrunn a few hours ahead of the French who were approaching
at Jamestown. It was under the auspices of their West India Company,
at Laguna and Roosevelt are the result. Then the people, organizing
at Rostov, "you'll win it back all the sooner. I lose to the others
at Schon Grabern, what shall we not do now when he is at the front? We
at Tula, and especially the advantages of drawing nearer to its
at Ulm... it is..."--he seemed to be trying to find the right
at Valuevo with Colonel Fabvier, the former from Paris and the
at Washington that "the state of Connecticut is a free, sovereign, and
at a distance, but the timid, feeble face she had seen for the first
at a footpace to the place where the whips were getting the hounds
at a gallop and as if by agreement all said the same thing. They all
at a good dinner he brought the opposing leaders together; and thus once
at a steady trot along the narrow road. While they drove past the
at a table as if tying the cover of the small box, and assumed his
at a walk to the right and sent an adjutant to the dragoons with
at a young girl who stood panting, having just run in through the cold
at all. The cause of this is my egotism. I set myself above him and so
at an alarming rate, reaching in January, 1863, the astounding figure of
at an opinion as to the cause of a given ulcer, and placed it in one or
at any moment on the ryefield opposite.
at common law." This was the death knell to the idea that the leaders of
at dinner. On that same evening there was to be one of the balls
at each other, the candidates agreed to meet face to face and discuss
at ease. Knowing that one son was out of danger she became the more
at eight o'clock in the morning
at every step, but the universal historians' accounts are all made
at everyone in the drawing room.
at first for the most part savage and brutal. One motive only they all
at five times the cost. In the years between 1868 and 1873, the debt of
at for being in the way. The senior officer moved with big, rapid
at her and at the crack in the pantry door, and it seemed to her
at her reproachfully. "And who is it she takes after?" thought the
at her table began to watch her hands arranging the cards. From the
at him in silence. It seemed to Prince Andrew that the officer's
at him. After this volley the regimental commander clutched at his
at home. They had not as many visitors as before, but the old habits
at irregular intervals along their course the connective-tissue
at irregular intervals, and grapeshot cracked and rattled onto the
at its halting place by the dam of a small pond. It was past one
at last decided in February, 1787, to issue the call. Fearing drastic
at least four of them were known advocates of free silver, the
at least or of other property to the value of forty pounds sterling. In
at lessons, was always breaking things in the house and making himself
at once his voice and the expression of his face changed. It was no
at once presented to the Emperor. At the chief entrance to the palace,
at one part while they spread at another, the affected area assumes a
at regeneration, which results in the formation of bulbous swellings at
at regular intervals for several years, the tendency, however, being for
at right angles to the part, it tends to produce localised lesions which
at slave markets. She tried to view the country impartially and the
at someone unseen. "Mr. Pitt, as a traitor to the nation and to the
at stake is the honor of the French infantry, so necessary to the
at that instant the galling thought occurred to him that he might have
at that moment an adjutant galloped up with a message from the
at that time autumn. The Sparrow Hills were visible in the distance,
at the Austerlitz council of war. He evidently listened only because
at the Gates of the Temple.
at the Razumovski's ball... and Countess Apraksina... I was so
at the Rostovs' had jocularly assumed the role of Natasha's knight.
at the adjutant--a handsome lad with long black curls arranged like
at the aide-de-camp.
at the altar with her. How and when this would be he did not know,
at the attachment of the capsular and other ligaments; these are only
at the body temperature, such as eusol, or Dakin's solution, or boracic
at the bottom of the scale. For the farmer, it must be remembered, wheat
at the convention of 1920.
at the dead eyes, and hastened to close them. She closed them but
at the door Prince Andrew and the figure of the old man in a white
at the door with a look of impatience. Konovnitsyn's firm, handsome,
at the door, steps so rapid that they could hardly be his mother's.
at the door," and Natasha ran across the drawing room to the dancing
at the door. The princess looked round and saw Natasha coming in,
at the drink store, having received orders to do so.
at the edge of the earth wall. The red-faced man was still
at the end of a year began to feel that the more firmly he tried to
at the end of this chapter.
at the end of those thousand miles. One must have the prospect of a
at the entrance. The prince was working at the lathe and after
at the envoy hurrying past them.
at the expense of the powers and dignity of the states. They were all of
at the fleches. The smoke spread out before them, and at times it
at the foot of the hill, jostled and overtook one another, waving
at the full stop. "I hope you will find him sympathetic and ready to
at the great battle of la Moskowa. Sacre Dieu! It was splendid! That
at the gypsies', and more than one thousand rubles of their money
at the half-open door of the corridor, intending to conceal himself as
at the icons with a sigh. This might have been taken as an
at the jovial old gentleman, who standing beside his tall and stout
at the knee, play an important part in its formation. In former times it
at the lodge, was calmed by the thought that now their affairs would
at the maturity of their respective debts, though nominally paying no
at the movements of Napoleon's stout legs and trying to avoid
at the next vacancy, for his mother now clung to him as her one hold
at the ossifying junction in a series of capillary loops projected
at the patches appearing on the skyline, which they knew to be the
at the polls should have the right to reverse the decision of a judge
at the porch. Carriages kept driving away and fresh ones arriving,
at the presumptuous lieutenant who had prevented his finishing what he
at the same time it always seemed to him that the really heroic
at the same time, a large proportion of human error comes from the
at the same time, aglow with excitement, recalled every detail of
at the same time.
at the same time. Only the skeleton of life remained: his house, a
at the second date, it was considerably more than one-third. In 1704,
at the shrines of the Moscow saints. She suggested that Natasha should
at the sight of the fire he felt himself suddenly freed from the ideas
at the soldiers who were blocking his way. "Hi there, boys! Keep to
at the sound, like the yelp of a dog, with which Denisov turned
at the spot from which he had fired. He swayed like a drunken man,
at the spot where Pierre's face had been before he sat down. Anna
at the squadron commander, awaiting the word of command. A second
at the tea table, on which stood exactly the same kind of cakes in a
at the termination of the small saphenous vein, and several deeper ones
at the thought of the punishment that overtakes men for their sins,
at the thought that little Nicholas would be left without a father.
at the time of operation, but later through the dressings being soaked
at the time. Indeed, the New York legislature of that very year, as the
at the tipsy guests who were again crowding round the window, and
at the village of Rykonty, on the Russian side of the Niemen, by dawn.
at the village of Shamshevo. The men crowded together round the
at the way he danced that evening. He had never danced like that in
at the wharves; bankruptcy threatened hundreds of merchants in London,
at the will of Him who governs men and worlds continued.
at them. She looked at the faces of the audience, seeking in them
at these periods. The onset of natural cure is recognised by the tumour
at this and went to fight the French once more. And they defeated
at this last ball only the ecossaise, the anglaise, and the mazurka,
at three o'clock in the morning, loudly blowing his nose. He asked
at various periods during the European War. It follows infection of
at what had happened and at the way her brother had taken the news
at which Pierre promised to communicate to the Petersburg Brothers
ataxia; it is more likely to occur in the bones of the upper extremity,
atheistical, anarchical, and in other respects immoral principles of the
atmosphere made itself so strongly felt in the Rostovs' house as at
atmosphere that the eyes smart, when the lungs are strengthened and
atmosphere. In many instances, but not in all, the onset of the process
atrophied; the medullary canal is increased at the expense of the
atrophy and degeneration on the one hand and overgrowth on the other,
atrophy of muscles, which show the reaction of degeneration from the
attached at one part as a rule to the coronoid process. During the next
attached to itself the free farmers of the West through channels of
attached to local self-government gave the conservative East many a rude
attached to the upper jaw, and connected by a duct with poison-secreting
attaching them to our Brotherhood. Only then will our order have the
attachment to adjacent aponeurosis or bone. The biceps in the arm, and
attachment to, the community.... It is upon this foundation I wish to
attack commence on the right wing.
attack the French right wing.
attack the fleches) to lead his division through the woods, Napoleon
attack the walls of the adjacent veins and spread into their interior at
attack would be ruined by the absence of those two regiments, which he
attack, which now, seeing how near they were to the French, he
attack--employed his whole strength to restrain the Russian army
attacked the Russians while they were marching beyond the Pakhra? What
attacked the Russians with but a tenth of the energy he had shown when
attacked. In Ohio and Indiana, for example, the frontier line of
attacked. It was alleged that the political parties were dominated by
attacking the French. At the beginning of the battle they stood
attacks may recur only once a year or they may be more frequent; the
attacks of phlebitis, or when there are large pouches on the veins,
attacks upon the trusts were first made in state legislatures, where it
attacks, the caucus came to an ignominious end.
attacks, the vessels are obliterated by the formation of new connective
attain maturity until continuity with the central end has been
attain peace, but which only wounded the self-love of both sides,
attempt and by vainly awaiting the infantry columns that still did not
attempt at familiarity on the part of the Russian messenger.
attempt made to close the wound, the raw surface left is soon covered
attempt to enlist French Canadians on the side of Great Britain. The
attempt to find the cause in the will of some one man, just as the
attempted a similar experiment, laying out the fields in common and
attempted a war of extermination. In 1675 the whole frontier was ablaze.
attempted to give social equality to negroes by the second civil rights
attempting to abduct the arm, and there may be localised tenderness in
attempts made to reduce the dislocation by the heel-in-the-axilla
attempts to do so. On account of the anatomical arrangement of the
attempts to justify it with the plea that it will pay, but even this
attend to the business. I am old. I..."
attend. Prince Andrew came in to inform the commander in chief of this
attendant convinced themselves that the hounds had separated into
attended by the formation of vascular and porous bone on the surface,
attended by the growth of a population of industrial workers dependent
attended the inauguration of Van Buren and then retired, amid the
attended with a brown or black discoloration of the vomit and of the
attended with an audible crack; and the procedure is often followed by
attended with any escape of blood, chiefly because of the elastic recoil
attended with clotting of the lymph. There is also some degree of
attended with effusion into the joint and the formation of adhesions,
attended with great pain, which is increased on moving the arm, and
attended with just that amount of return stream which favours the
attended with less risk of injury to the nerves, if the patient is
attended with pyrexia. The application of soda fomentations, turpentine
attended with stinking discharge (ozoena), the extrusion of portions of
attended with suppuration, the condition has been mistaken for disease
attended with the formation of fibrous tissue, and, in the case of bone,
attended with the reaction of degeneration, it is necessary to cut down
attended with troublesome haemorrhage from the numerous veins that
attended with ulceration and discharge. In the skull it may project
attends this form of injury, in that the intra-vascular tension may in
attention as it passed the front porch. With the help of a maid she
attention be given to the emancipation of "those unhappy men who alone
attention is usually first directed to it by the occurrence of fracture
attention may be first attracted by the occurrence of vague pains in the
attention of Douglas, who was making his campaign on the doctrine of
attention of So-and-so, but she did not even see the Emperor, and only
attention of the courts; but thousands of state laws, municipal
attention on the part of the surgeon to guard them all. It is only by
attention that was being paid to her, read the last words:
attention to her nephew who had entered the room.
attention to measures of taxation and trade. Since the heavy debt under
attention to such trifles!' The Emperor did not condescend to reply.
attention to the sound of the prince's footsteps. "Stepping flat on
attention to the stomach, bowels, and kidneys and with the correction
attention was diverted by the ever-increasing crowds moving toward the
attention was engrossed by watching the family circle--separated
attention with eager curiosity to the stage. Natasha too began to look
attention. He looked now at the Pratzen Heights, now at the sun
attention. The peasant seemed to him not merely a tool, but also a
attenuated forms of pyogenic infection affecting especially the lymph
attitude into the deliberations of the nobility. Pierre stepped
attitude toward her. She did not even notice the special attentions
attitude which relaxes the muscle, and the position is maintained by
attitude, with one leg crossed high above the other. His cheeks, which
attitude--for example flexion at the hip or knee--it can sometimes be
attracted the support of the progressives in both parties. With grim
attracted to the ruling circles where the future, on which the fate of
attracted wide interest, but it had little vitality. Nearly all the
attracting to it, as the first movement had done, the nations of
attribute the pain and stiffness to exposure to cold or rheumatism. At
audible the whole length of the table.
audible. The melody grew and passed from one instrument to another.
audience lasted a long time. Then suddenly the grating sound of a
auditoriums of the cities to the "red schoolhouses" on the countryside,
auricular and occipital glands are first involved, the spread is to
auricular glands and from the auricle. _The sterno-mastoid
auscultation yield a blowing murmur like an aneurysm. The
authorities had provided excellent dinners for the officers at every
authorities. After the establishment of the State Church in England in
authority derived from any source save "the people," were swept aside
authority in the colonies as well as at home, continued the policy thus
authority of reason. It was evident that the thought could never occur
authority of the Scriptures. The Puritans devised a catechism based upon
authority of the United States and of the states were closed to every
authority of the federal government many contentions in the railway
authority of the states by means of a prohibitive tax. In this way, by
authority over the polls, but their strength had been shorn by the
authority to the Emperor himself, thus cutting the ground from under
authority, was the packing of the carpets. The count had valuable
authority. In the Middle colonies, particularly, the multiplication of
authority. To put an end to this, the king forbade all further purchases
authorize expenditures but had to rely upon the states for the payment
authorized by it was long continued. The cheapness of the passage
authorizing paper money or extending the life of outstanding bills. This
authorizing the President to employ armed force in securing peace and
authorizing the abolition of or interference with slavery in any state.
authorizing the purchase of more territory and so he drafted an
authors).--This is a rare disease, the origin of which is as yet
auto-intoxication from the intestinal tract, saline purges and
auto-intoxication, the toxins being absorbed from the gastro-intestinal
autoclave under a pressure of two atmospheres destroys even the most
autumn night. He had spent the first night in the same yard as the
autumn of 1806, was set down with skill and pains in the journal of
autumn of 1898 no decided opinion as to what should be done with the
autumn of that year the Democrats won a clear majority in the House of
autumn, the hunting, "Uncle," and the Christmas holidays spent with
avail. Arsenic may be given in full doses either by the mouth or by
available, is the use of the _antivenin_ introduced by Fraser and
available, tracheotomy is the safer of the two procedures.
avenge the blood of the just one.... Whom, I ask you, can we rely
avenged on the French, but they thought about their next pay, their
avenue from the house at Bald Hills. "She, poor innocent creature,
avenue of infection. When deeply situated, the blood tends to spread
avenue to freedom and prosperity. Some of the best citizens of America
average duration being from fifteen to twenty minutes. If pallor of the
averred: "The questions of whether the bill would be operative, of how
avert death for the moment, but while extension in one direction has
avoid again getting in front of the first line as he had done when the
avoid any rough handling of the sore. Any discharge that lies on the
avoid discharge from the already gangrenous area reaching the operation
avoid opening the tendon sheath lest the infection be conveyed to it.
avoid pressure on the sole of the foot, the patient must be confined to
avoid the axillary vessels and nerves. If the pus spreads on to the
avoid the sudden application of heat. The patient should be placed in a
avoided the direct word. A few more weeks elapsed. At last, on May 10,
avoided, the vein should not be ligated.
avoided. Any part liable to pressure, from the position of the patient
avowed that they were loyal to the king when protesting in the strongest
awaited the order to start. The sick soldier, Sokolov, pale and thin
awaiting him. For Moscow society Pierre was the nicest, kindest,
awaiting peaceful encampment, and not within sight of the enemy before
awaiting their turn outside the tents groaned, sighed, wept, screamed,
awakening in the men an unusual curiosity. On the day of battle the
awakening!" And all at once it grew light in his soul and the veil
awarded the Grand Cross of Maria Theresa, and the whole army
awarded. The paper arrived and they began to look for the old man.
aware not only of the existence of the loose body, but of its erratic
aware of his existence. At the quarters of the commander in chief,
away and carry her off to the ends of the earth.
away and gazed into the darkness. A prisoner, the Russian soldier
away and replaces the bone in contact with it. The subsequent
away and waited impatiently for Prince Andrew's return from the
away by the process of research and can therefore regard the event
away from Galilee. "And the multitude of them that believed were of one
away from her. "Destroying the army, destroying the men! And why?
away from him. The alliance with Prussia, Austria's treachery,
away from the boy.
away from the doctor to Pierre. To him, in a particularly respectful
away from the inquisitive man, and looked around him.
away in front of them, and that the columns moving near Pratzen
away in the prevailing silence. Some minutes passed. A second and a
away into the dancing hall, whirled round it at full speed with her
away of the trabecular framework of the portion of bone affected.
away saw Anatole embracing the Frenchwoman and whispering something to
away the Indians and the cattle rangers. The first was the policy of the
away the capsule along with the tumour, and the patient should be kept
away the maiden who had been in white and was now in light blue.
away the men advancing on him, and snatching his cap from his head
away the raised epidermis, and if necessary the nail, the pus is allowed
away the unhealthy bone, on the same lines as in tuberculous disease.
away to his estates. His new brethren gave him letters to the Kiev and
away until the subjacent bone is exposed. If the bone is rarefied, the
away with a spoon, and the cavity is disinfected.
away with scissors, the surface rubbed with silver nitrate or sulphate
away, and the curtain dropped. Once more there was a terrible noise
away, and the women in the house began to wail.
away, and thirty get there. The rest either starve or get killed. So
away, but the official who had questioned him opened the door, and
away, get away!" and then, turning to the soldiers, shouted:
away, refusing to let her see them off. The diplomatist preserved a
away, walked to the wattle fence, and seized hold of it.
away--caries. When there is an absence of caseation and suppuration, the
away. At the foot of the hill lay wasteland over which a few groups of
away; and all at once she felt cheerful. "What's the good of making so
awistocwacy of the pwovince of Moscow thinks fit, it can show its
awkwardly, like a man suffering from the quinsy, and, still slightly
awoke in his soul. He now remembered the connection that existed
axillary glands as a result of infected wounds of the fingers; in the
axillary or brachial artery with fracture of the humerus or dislocation
axis cylinders begin to grow in the proximal end-bulb, local tingling is
axis cylinders by the dead and dying tissues around them. This pain soon
baby with the little cap on its unsteady head evidently absorbed all
bacilli, to which the disease for which advice is sought owes its
bacillus and the marrow interact upon one another. The granulation
bacillus pyocyaneus, which is found in green and blue pus, the
bacillus, and the tubercle bacillus. Most of these will receive further
bacillus, with a single large spore at one end giving it the shape of a
bacillus. The ulcerated lesions of farcy have to be distinguished from
back and sometimes forward, and the cavalry dashed without orders in
back beyond the dark trees a roof glittered with dew, to the right was
back door. Alarmed at the vicious circle thus created, he urged upon
back door. While he was getting down from the carriage steps two
back her ears and tried to rise, but the borzois stuck to her.
back his troops in their anxiety to overwhelm and cut off the enemy
back into the shed.
back intolerably through his black coat. The dust always hung
back or limbs; by the enlargement and bending of such bones as the tibia
back room across the passage. Only Malasha, Andrew's six-year-old
back rooms, from which they had dashed out so impetuously, the
back to Mozhaysk from the one army and back to Valuevo from the other.
back to the house.
back to the shanty.
back upon them. Normally the valves in the femoral and iliac veins and
back, and his musket resting on the ground, still stood near the pit
back--a condition known as _syphilitic phimosis_. (3) On the glans penis
back--the police in front were pushing back those who had pressed
back. Rostov looked at the young soldier and a cold chill ran down his
back. That part of the line was not entrenched and in front of it
background of green treetops and bluish gorges. The turrets of a
backward and medially against the transverse process (carotid tubercle)
backward pressure in the veins may be greatly increased by straining, a
backward with the fleeing crowd. A mounted general separated himself
backward, as the needle to the pole, toward the principle of protection
backwards down from the oven, her bare little feet catching at its
backwards in the saddle, he galloped to the other flank of the
backwards; of the gastrocnemius, plantaris, or tendo-calcaneus in
bacteria and toxins, allow the tissues once more to assert themselves,
bacteria have now been differentiated, the best known being the
bacteria of a given species, but when that number is exceeded, the
bacteria they produce certain ferments which enter the blood serum.
bacteria, and if these gain access, the gangrene assumes the characters
bacteria, and that from the surgical point of view they should be
bacteria, and the great majority of spores. Steam applied in an
bacterial diseases originating in the marrow, if the epiphysial junction
bactericidal agents in the tissues and fluids.
bacteriological examination is impossible, or when the clinical features
bacterium, the _bacillus diphtheriae_ or _Klebs-Loffler bacillus_. The
bad health in the general community that can be attributed to inherited
bad-looking either! Yes, I dare say, that's the way they'll let you
badge, at another because his line was not straight, he reached the
badly painted portrait (evidently by the hand of the artist
badly things were going in the army, the rumors of the discovery of
badly--all this debauchery, dissipation, and the rest of it!"
badly; that is all I have to say to you. The count is very, very
baggage train, convoyed by Westphalians. Behind the prisoners came a
baggage trains before and behind them. To the right, where the
bailiff's accounts of the village in Ryazan which belonged to his
balalayka ceased. Mitka tuned up afresh, and recommenced thrumming the
balalayka on which someone, who was evidently a master of the art, was
balalayka to the air of My Lady, with trills and variations. "Uncle"
balcony. The talking instantly ceased, hats and caps were doffed,
ball struck the ground in front of them.
ballot for reasons of color alone; they demanded the enforcement in
ballot had been thrust, was ordinarily loath to risk his head by the
ballot strengthened the party machine.
ballot the Vice-President.[8]
balloted for the nomination of a candidate. Douglas, though in the lead,
ballots the person voted for as President, and in distinct ballots the
ballroom in Bezukhov's house, and the ball, as everyone said, was a
balls. The two pretty young Princesses Gorchakov met suitors there and
band to the heel of a slipper, and securing the other to the lower third
band, came up and in angry tones asked the artillerymen for water.
band. He was a peasant from Pokrovsk, near the river Gzhat. When
bandage and hot-air baths; if the joint is greatly distended, the fluid
bandage is all that is required; but when the condition progresses and
bandage. The bandage should extend from the toes to well above the knee,
bandages causing compression of the blood vessels. There is considerable
bandages, or ill-fitting splints; or by chemical agents in the form of
bandages, splints, and other apparatus. In the lower extremity, the use
bands may be divided and the parts stretched, the raw surface left being
bands or mending boots or overcoats and crowding round the boilers and
bands, and the way he did it aroused Pierre's interest.
banged against the wall, and the second of the three sisters rushed
banished. But the point is that the count was much annoyed. 'How could
bank in various cities would make easy the exchange of funds so vital to
bank, also not mentioned in the Constitution. Others urged that, if "the
bank, and broke it up. In this action for the first time trophies were
banking system giving strict national control over the currency as a
bankrupt shopkeepers, outlawed smugglers, etc." The people and their
banks founded on the credit of government bonds and empowered to issue
banks of the four industrial states of Massachusetts, Connecticut, New
banquet. At that toast, the count took out his handkerchief and,
banquet. On his way back, he noticed Rostov standing by the corner
bar of the House of Commons, Benjamin Franklin, the agent for
bare body with the sheet as he huddled up on his bench.
bare body, but no shirt. He was evidently afraid the prisoners looking
bared heads walked, ran, and bowed to the ground.
barefooted in the fields.
barges on the Moskva River and the timber yards by the Dorogomilov
barking in front of the harnessed horses.
barking of a dog. Difficulty in swallowing fluids may be the first
barley water, or soda water--these should be freely given, unless the
barley; and the organism has been found adhering to particles of grain
barn and sent word that they would not let her leave the village: that
barn. The log walls of the barn and its snow-covered roof, that looked
barracks for the prisoners of war. Without understanding what was said
barred door of Japan was forced open by Commodore Perry. The commerce
barren descent hidden by dense mist. Having given orders in the
barren wastes, a religious sect, the Mormons, had planted a colony
barrier in the way of the poor who wanted to go to America was the cost
barrier to the further progress of surgery. To the genius of Lister we
barriers, and the pistols loaded, Nesvitski went up to Pierre.
base of supplies. As soon as the British got away from Charleston, they
based his argument on the broadest national grounds: the protective
based nothing on them. The longer he thought the more contingencies
based on his trickery and deception of the people. So the historians
basin of North America." The produce of the West and the manufactures of
basis for classification; and yet many of the terms are so descriptive
bath of greenish-yellow pus. As the process spreads these purulent foci
bath." This is due to spasm of the diaphragm, and is frequently
bathed in stagnant lymph--which possibly contains the products of
baths are of service; the underclothing should be frequently changed,
battalion came onto the bridge. Only Denisov's squadron of hussars
battalion commanders to present the regiment in parade order, on the
battalion gets to the bridge unobserved, flings the bags of incendiary
battalion of the French Guards in their bearskin caps on the left.
battalion of the Preobrazhensk regiment stood on the right and a
battalion, believe me, wouldn't drink their vodka! 'It's not the day
battalion. The Emperors were to be present at that banquet.
battalions from the center to be sent to reinforce the right flank.
batteries firing at the Augesd Dam and was looking at the killed and
battery and the heroic endurance of Captain Tushin and his company,"
battery to their left. The smoke above it had not yet dispersed. Two
battery, and after speaking to the colonel gave Pierre an angry look
battery, as to the only refuge from the horrors that surrounded him.
battery, but it was impossible to see it clearly with the naked eye.
battery. Tushin's companion officer had been killed at the beginning
battle and checking the enemy's advance, and by this effort to unite
battle and the victory that would certainly result from it--no
battle and, in spite of the remonstrances of his courtiers, at
battle as at the beginning. But even had the aim of the Russians
battle for the privilege of using them. The mere show of force, the mere
battle in the Mexican War, in public office, and as a member of
battle in the passage of a bill excluding "all aliens over sixteen years
battle is better known to me, the commander in chief, than to him."
battle more famous than important, "Tippecanoe"--a brush with the
battle of Borodino were written at leisure, that the incorrect and
battle of Tarutino. The news of that battle of Tarutino,
battle played the part of Weyrother at Austerlitz, galloped
battle that has been lost, and the very worst dispositions and
battle the day before. A crowd of military men was assembled there,
battle was lost. No one whom Rostov asked could tell him where the
battle were not given, to clear himself of the crime of abandoning
battle, and feeling reassured he dozed off.... The dark starry night
battle, and that word infected the whole crowd with a feeling of
battle, and while we were looking for the French--having lost touch
battle--the questions present themselves: Why did Kutuzov during the
battle. The flight was so rapid that the Russian army pursuing the
battlefield and returned to the Shevardino knoll, where he sat on
battlefield extended before him. The French had advanced nearest on
battlefield with others in the Emperor's suite. One officer told
battlefield, believed that the French had been defeated and were
battlefields of Europe. "The whole nation," said the President, "must be
battles he had only considered the possibilities of success, but now
battles. He did nothing harmful to the progress of the battle; he
battleships on a tour around the globe. On his own authority, he ordered
bayonet charge with two battalions and had broken up the French
bayonets moved and halted at the officers' command, turned with
be "grumous." The _odour_ of pus varies with the different bacteria
be 1850, when the suffragists of Ohio urged the state constitutional
be Dolokhov's second, and after dinner he discussed the arrangements
be a French salesman from one of the Moscow shops.
be a large sac occupying the venter ilii, and a smaller one in the
be a violation of the federal Constitution. This blow, effected in 1915
be able to walk with a little support, and although the hamstrings are
be accidentally divided in the operation for excising the elbow-joint.
be accidentally inflicted in the course of an operation.
be accidentally wounded in dissections at the root of the neck; jets of
be adapted to the individual requirements. If the disease remains
be admitted that this practice is calculated to aggravate the condition
be affected, but the condition is most common in the tendons about the
be allowed to spread without interference, thereby placing the free
be an appearance of this from wasting of the muscles above and below. If
be announced had passed straight through the glass porch between the
be applied on the cardiac side of the aneurysm--proximal ligation, or to
be applied over several layers of gauze or lint to protect the skin, and
be arrested. In certain situations, also, the arteries are so intimately
be associated with any of the acute pyogenic infections; with
be beneficent like the Tsars. And in order finally to touch the hearts
be borne from the political arena forever. Clay and Webster had but two
be bridged by a graft taken from the superficial branch of the radial
be brought into actual contact with the leaking point in the vessel, and
be called for later if the limb is likely to be useless, as, for
be carried as emboli in the circulation to distant parts, where they
be cast in the false mold of a European hero--the supposed ruler of
be closed with sutures--_arteriorrhaphy_. The circulation being
be complete in six or eight weeks. If the extravasation is great and the
be condescending to his companion. The latter, a fresh, rosy officer
be contracted from cats, fowls, or through the milk of infected cows.
be contused, along with the radial, in crutch paralysis; in the region
be counted the Woolen Act of 1699, forbidding the exportation of woolen
be counted. The person having the greatest number of votes shall be the
be delivered up on claim of the party to whom such service or labor may
be denied or abridged by the United States or by any State on account of
be destroyed. The Southern states will first avail themselves of their
be differentiated by observing that the infiltration is on a larger
be diffused over the whole world without destroying the bonds of
be displaced by muscular action or by some movement of the limb, or it
be distinguished from the true expansion of an aneurysm. Compression of
be distributed among the American claimants. The damages thus allowed
be divided and injected into different parts of the body, not more than
be divided as it passes through the supinator in operations on old
be divided within the skull, and the foramen rotundum and foramen ovale
be done to the inhabitants, and if they remained they would be paid
be dried, and at once began helping the officers to fix up the
be due to an excessive output and rapid formation of leucocytes by the
be due to the median nerve having been injured at the same time.
be elicited in ascites and in other abdominal cysts. Pressure of the
be expressed as to the prospects of survival. The possibility of the
be false) had been received during the night of a movement by the
be fed by hand. In infants at the breast, the drug may be given to the
be filled with a flap of bone and periosteum raised from the vicinity,
be filled! And it is all so simple, pale, and crude in the cold
be formed on comparatively slight stimulus, and disappear when the
be free for a while from the distraction caused by the thought of
be given to the practice among European governments of using armed force
be had spread to the neighboring houses, from which wounded men
be had to the injection of Coley's fluid, a preparation containing the
be heard above the three hundred others. He nearly wept. "To the
be heard from all sides. A carriage that followed the escort ran
be heard with the stethoscope. It is to be borne in mind that
be held in New York to discuss the situation. Nine colonies responded
be impaired, and the other continuing its normal growth becomes
be included in the operation. The organ from which the original growth
be instructed to take every possible opportunity of placing the limb in
be it but an hour.... Tell me all you know about the will, and above
be king in fact as well as in name. About the same time England brought
be laid down. During the disintegration of the effused blood the
be left behind and the goods carted away but that had seemed the
be massaged several times a day, unless the presence of blebs or
be named by the royal governor, and that town meetings (except to elect
be obliterated by buried sutures, or by so adjusting the dressing as to
be observed. The infant cries when the part is touched; and as it does
be of a special shape the prince had himself designed, and a leather
be overlooked. The limb should be put up with the knee flexed and the
be performed; the whole of the diseased area being exposed by free
be present above or below the part exposed. It may be advisable to
be present at the council, he remained in the room.
be present. The pulse becomes feeble and rapid, the respiratory nerve
be presented to the Emperor would most likely be satisfied
be purplish, or even black, if the respiration is interfered with. When
be put upon the children. The German tutor was trying to remember
be quite superficial, or it may be deeply placed beneath the strong
be reckoned with; and it was not until after the establishment of the
be removed from the bottle with aseptic forceps and passed direct to the
be repeated on many occasions at different points up and down the nerve.
be resorted to for the purpose of determining whether the persons to be
be safe unless he was granted the right to vote. The woman suffragists
be satisfactorily tested before the child is three months old, but if it
be seen from the hill on the opposite bank but was not yet visible
be seen in a shabby equipage or appear in the streets of Petersburg in
be sent that the general could not refuse. But when dispatching him he
be so construed as to prejudice any claims, of the United States, or of
be so severe as to render him helpless for the moment. The pain is most
be so severe as to rupture muscles or even to fracture one of the long
be so, Nicholas Rostov, as was natural to him, felt contented with the
be stronger than his opponent at the moment of conflict.
be such inconsistency and perfidiousness in his conduct! It is but the
be sufficient to diminish the amount of blood entering the part.
be sufficiently extensive to give access to the whole of the affected
be supported by a standing army of twenty regiments; and all the
be sutured, however, as soon as the wound is aseptic or has healed.
be the adorer and courtier of anyone but himself, Napoleon. "Are the
be the seat of lymphangitis, or they may show no evidence of the passage
be the very last time.
be tolerated where reason is left free to combat it." After reciting the
be traced by tapping over the distal segment of the nerve, the tingling
be war. If not it is merely a question of settling where the
be well protected. For many years before the war the friends of
be wise and America be free"--the first Continental Congress adjourned
be within the prohibited degrees of affinity. Despite all the terror
be wrested from him at any moment by the British sea power, especially
be your husband." (He rose and kissed Vera's hand, and on the way to
be, and she went in. The sobs rose higher and higher in her throat
be, executed. But in the disposition it is said that, after the
be, re-establish public confidence, the source of the welfare of a
be, to avoid or attack the enemy, but solely to avoid General
be--one who explained all the facts of life reasonably, considered
be. I'm only tormented by the wrong I have done him. Tell him only
beak of a parrot. There is also enlargement of the lower ends of the
beams into another yard across the street, while others carried
bear the sight of tears and was ready to cry himself.
bear the whole burden on his shoulders. Fancy what he had to go
bear to the growth of America's commercial and financial power?
bearers and the shuffling of their feet grew more hurried, as if the
bearers, stepping over the wounded who had not yet been bandaged, took
bearing the Americans away from their old position under the British
beat of the heart--a clinical phenomena known as the "tracheal tug."
beaten and that the whole army had surrendered at Ulm proved to be
beautiful Princess Helene, Prince Vasili's daughter, and the little
beautiful now, in the clear, motionless brilliance.
beautiful words and sentiments of various generals, and not the
beautiful young princess who was sitting some way off, the center of
beautiful, expressionless face. Amid the scattered property and the
beautiful, the sun so bright, everything around so gay, but that
beautiful. They heard the sound of voices behind them.
beauty. The Emperor noticed her and honored her with a dance.
became a province when he took the title of James II in 1685. New
became a recognized institution. The election still remained with the
became alive, its thunder joining the roar of the whole line along
became almost as intimate with the princess as if they were relations.
became common for the sons of white farmers to enter the professions,
became foolish as soon as he uttered them, while on the contrary
became free agricultural laborers--this being one of the first
became infected, while those sustained in the highly manured fields of
became involved in many perplexing problems of diplomacy in Europe. The
became more and more a physical and also a moral necessity. Though the
became more animated. "And believe me, they are reaping the reward
became restless, especially in Paris. Assembling on the Champs de Mars,
became silent. At first Kutuzov stood still while the regiment
became silent. Boris inquired what news there might be on the staff,
became the cherished unit of American farmers. The people who tilled the
became the fashion to provide severe penalties for those who formed
became the party of provincialism and nullification. New England,
became, the more serious and stern grew Sonya's.
because Nicholas was to go with him to the regiment; then came Anna
because Uncle Pierre as he called him was the object of his
because after entering the field of analysis the universal
because by liberating his serfs he had obtained the reputation of
because he had entered the British army as a youth, had been wounded at
because he liked the things they liked. With others Balaga
because he placed the industry on a firm foundation. Indeed it seems
because he rose superior to the Revolution, suppressed its abuses,
because he still had no news from Dolokhov and the man sent to capture
because he was no more. The old count cried because he felt that
because he was there. To the one camp belonged the old prince,
because he would not and not because he could not. In the middle of
because he's Russian, despite the novel by Genlis and the French
because in it a weaker phenomenon is taken as the cause of a stronger.
because it forecast many of the perplexing problems that were not solved
because it was laid on from all sides over the figure cut in the
because no one else drew them into the social life of the household as
because of pyogenic organisms being brought to them by the lymphatics
because of the efforts of hundreds of volunteers and donations from
because of the efforts of hundreds of volunteers and donations from
because of the number and deep situation of the glands to be removed,
because of the rarity of these in the bones of the distal parts of the
because of the sclerosis and surrounding endarteritis, is exceedingly
because of the smoke but not moving back from the fire. "And you,
because on the first day of their arrival at that small town he
because only Germans are self-confident on the basis of an abstract
because the caucus never favored him with the nomination. More
because the collective will was transferred to him.
because the color was laid on from this side or in that way, but
because the popular demand for a battle had not yet expressed itself
because the saddle girths were too slack, reproved him, and mounted.
because the state could not fix the rates for transporting goods and
because there was a vague feeling that in the main it was going badly.
because they satisfied a mental need of the invalid and of those who
become an independent farmer. People from the cities and immigrants from
become associated with branches from the musculo-cutaneous is followed
become clear to all what could be ventured against the French and what
become emphysematous and crepitant and produce an offensive odour. The
become engrained should be cut away with knife or scissors. The raw
become enlarged and slightly tender. The hair comes out, eruptions
become fissured and superficially ulcerated, and the discharge then
become gray instead of black. The regimental commander walked with his
become hollow and are filled with blood from the vessels that gave them
become impossible. Within three hundred years from the founding of the
become injected and porous, and the bones, as a whole, are thickened. In
become obliterated, and the skin and subcutaneous cellular tissue, being
become swollen and extremely sensitive, so that the sufferer lies in bed
become the possessor of wealth. How have you used it? What have you
become the seat of ossification. It affects almost exclusively the male
become widely known in public life. As the governor of New Jersey he had
becomes a prominent feature, the prepuce is oedematous and inflamed, and
becomes abundant and may crust on the surface, forming yellow scabs. At
becomes active, the contents of the cavity are transformed into a
becomes blood-stained (Fig. 28). Coincidently the subcutaneous tissue
becomes cold and powerless. The pulsation seldom returns within five or
becomes completely kind and good and does not believe in the
becomes dark and leathery. On account of the anaesthetic action of
becomes infiltrated and swollen, and the skin ultimately gives way and
becomes manifest. The cellulitis, also, may develop at some distance
becomes my belief in the freedom of my action.
becomes necessary for one portion of the family of man to assume among
becomes necessary for the surgeon to aid the natural defensive
becomes pale and sick, and a free flow of saliva takes place into the
becomes rapidly and markedly emaciated, even although in some cases the
becomes restricted, and crackings occur. This stage of the disease may
becomes the seat of _a diffuse tuberculous thickening_, not unlike the
becomes the seat of eczema or even of ulceration attended with foul
becoming brittle. To avoid contamination from the hands, catgut should
becoming characteristically flushed. In the early morning the
becoming dangerous. He had told her that after the sixteenth he
becoming firmer and less compressible, and, in the mixed variety, by the
becoming papular and increasing to the size of a pea, desquamation takes
becoming smooth as a sign that the conversation was at an end.
bed both Prince Vasili and the princess passed out by a back door, but
bed that had been got ready for him, glancing now and then at the
bed, to diminish the general tissue waste; and the diet should be
bed-sores is the regular changing of the patient's position, so that no
bed. As the main local obstacle to healing is the down-growth of
bed. He realized from the first that he would not get up again,
bedroom. When they had undressed, but without washing off the cork
bee is not exhausted by the first, the second, or any of the processes
beekeeper's tap on the wall of the sick hive, instead of the former
been a militiaman and having had rather too much at the pub--heard
been a successful engagement. The men and officers returning spoke
been a victory. And at once, without leaving the church, thanks were
been about? Eh? The peasants are rioting, and you can't manage them?
been accomplished without all the preceding wars and without the
been accustomed to answer the old prince without expressing views of
been achieved in the East." Well could the merchants of London declare
been approved in the great states of Massachusetts, Virginia, and New
been attacked by French cavalry and that, though the attack had been
been attained without the Revolution and without the Empire. If the
been bitten by a rabid animal is usually forthcoming; the spasms, which
been carted away. The hay and the spring corn, of which Alpatych
been cleansed and thoroughly dried, it is sponged or painted with the
been completely destroyed. These latter appear on the surface of the
been concentrated in the cities. The families that in the time of
been confined, was standing in the yard directing the men.
been demonstrated as long as sixteen years after the original
been described as occurring in the medulla of the tibia or ulna, and
been described for tuberculous abscess. After the fluid contents of the
been destroyed are hurrying: some from the heap dragging bits of
been destroyed by the Cossacks and the peasants, who killed them off
been doing that morning. Among other things he spoke of the
been dug in the garden.
been employed to increase the coagulability of the blood. The patient
been equally clear to Kutuzov that by accepting battle and risking the
been experienced military men when the war opened. Benedict Arnold, the
been flattered by his notice, and here too at the governor's party
been for the salvation and glory of Russia.
been forced on me. Even now" (he emphasized the word) "I am ready to
been forgotten, as we have forgotten the thousands and millions of
been formulated. If the patient survives, the tendency to fracture
been found to be blocked with the parent worms of the filaria Bancrofti.
been generals in the union army. Grant, next to Lincoln, was regarded as
been given for everyone to go armed to the Three Hills tomorrow, and
been given not to let them in, so that must be right. And the peasants
been hit--a large crowd had gathered near the second battalion.
been in command) and on the other an ever-increasing indignation
been in the baggage train he had passed that morning on the Znaim road
been in the middle of the line that had seemed so terrible--and now he
been in the regiment next to no time, my lad, you're here today and
been in this condition of stupor since the morning, when Sonya, to the
been inspected at Braunau was informing the prince that as soon as the
been issued by the Austrian commissariat, and the regiment had marched
been largely responsible for the conflicting statements as to the
been left in the shops, and generals flocked there to select
been lent to farmers, the heaviest borrowing being in nine Western and
been likened to the track of a snail. In the _larynx_ the presence of
been long and sharp. The Americans chafed at restrictions on
been long in germination. Before the Civil War, a number of reformers,
been lowered by injury or disease furnishes a favourable nidus for the
been made a gentleman of the bedchamber, and from that time he had
been members of Congress just before the war, or had served in other
been misleading us all the week and now that he's brought us to this
been noticed, left the room with a pleasant smile.
been occasioned by the sausage eaters.
been opened into, the difficulty of thoroughly getting rid of all
been organized as a territory by the famous Kansas-Nebraska bill which
been overlooked in the distribution of rewards comes to complain,
been overtaken by the rain, entered Rostov's shelter.
been performed. The farther I go back in memory, or what is the same
been periphlebitis binding the coils together.
been preserved. The country was hardly opened before visitors from the
been previously ascertained by law, and to be informed of the nature and
been put there, and two musket shots rang out from under the gate as
been quartered, and had marched all the way, with Berg who was already
been recurrent attacks of locking, the ligaments become slack, the joint
been rejected, the valuable ones really did all go into the two cases.
been reprimanded on account of the blue greatcoat.
been running very long before the government of Massachusetts suppressed
been shot by the marshal's own order because a silver spoon
been studied, and we have learned that it takes place by the formation
been taken out of the cases, they recommenced packing, and it turned
been talking to the priests, rose and offered him her seat; an
been the leader of all these movements--as the figurehead of a ship
been the prince, tied his head up with a handkerchief that the mouth
been the striking feature of the old regime, so their ruin was the
been there at seven in the morning," returned Bilibin with a smile.
been to drive the French from their positions, they could not have
been to see Princess Mary the day before and had there met--"Whom do
been too strong; the distress too deep to be soon forgotten. The
been transferred to the United States.
been unable to pass because of a drunken crowd rioting in front of the
been under fire for the first time.
been unmoved by the agitation over slavery in the Far South. That issue
been very unwell the day before and that they had sent for the doctor,
been watching a dispute between England and Venezuela over the western
been watching from the forest that skirted the highroad a large French
been well founded." It was no mere accident that the Virginia colonel
been widely recognised. An open-air life, even in the centre of a city,
been written. He took the letter from Michael Ivanovich's hand, put it
bees sitting back to back and guarding the high mystery of generation,
before Moscow, when the whole population streamed out of Moscow as one
before Wendell Phillips, the young Boston lawyer who cast aside his
before a blister is raised. The preliminary removal of the natural
before abandoning the capital or guided by other, personal
before and around him. An infantryman came to the fire, squatted on
before and the path to the hothouse, along which the prince was in the
before can be had for ready money. It is another addition to the value
before commencing negotiations, but in just the same way two months
before commencing the treatment, to test his urine and record his
before decided that the deed should should be done. The gates of
before he became her husband. Natasha on the contrary had at once
before he felt her presence with his whole being by the loss of his
before her, evidently prepared for the height of joy or misery. She
before him in the same attitude of submission to fate, Napoleon
before him, and he looked at the fallow field, the bushes, and the
before him, or perhaps for that very reason, the prince, though he
before him, while in the North, the alternative of a homestead on
before him. The pain in his arm became more and more intense.
before his audience, which produced an effect unfavorable to the
before his mind's eye the great stretches of unoccupied lands between
before his shop which opened onto the street. On seeing Alpatych he
before immigrants direct from Europe, under the stimulus of company
before it had not seemed strange to anyone that the wounded should
before it left Moscow, affirm that all was in order in the Grand Army,
before long, he, too, must take the same terrible step.
before met at balls, amiably smiling in the society of the most
before parting with her money insisted that the various operations
before reaching Fili? Why did he not retire at once by the Kaluga
before secession and equal in number to one-tenth the votes cast in
before so far as the form of government was concerned. South Carolina,
before taking them to the marshal. An hour later a squad of soldiers
before the Department of State was busy with negotiations which resulted
before the French could get them.
before the Jews."
before the battle of Schon Grabern than you do now," said his son with
before the board of trade were vigorous protests against the issuance of
before the days of rubber gloves, were frequently exposed to the contact
before the doors of the sanctuary screen. The priest came out with his
before the enactment of the Northwest Ordinance, squatters in that
before the expiration of its life. Clay, with his eye upon the
before the fire.
before the glass, smiled, and walked toward the other door. Natasha
before the heights on which the Russian batteries stood guarding the
before the icon. Softened by memories of Princess Mary he began to
before the icons and there was a pleasant scent of flowers and burnt
before the master arrived. Everywhere preparations were made not for
before the most sagacious leaders began to urge the desirability of a
before the old countess. Denisov, not being a member of the family,
before the onset of definite signs of gangrene, with cold feet, with
before the operation commences, and again after it is completed. The
before the palace while the Emperor dined--looking in at the palace
before the patient leaves his bed in the morning, and should only be
before the serious business which, he considered, awaited him next
before the sleigh stopped, and ran into the hall. The house stood cold
before the soup. Countess Mary well knew that mood of his, and when
before the usual term and has proposed to me to be your sponsor. I
before the wedding, but the count had not yet decided in his own
before the wind, and may Thy mighty Angel confound them and put them
before the wind. It was growing lighter and lighter. That curly
before their eyes. A lady entering the next box shot a glance of
before then. "It may be a mistake," thought the old commander in
before there arose two other political specters in the agrarian
before there ran all down the coast the thrilling story that Washington
before they resented the monopoly of the presidency by the East. In 1829
before yesterday during my daily walk through the village I
before, American rights upon the high seas became involved at once. They
before, after defeating China on the field of battle, had been forced by
before, and among them at the Rostovs' with whom he had renewed
before, and would dispute and shout at the council, beating his breast
before, as far as ear could reach, there were the rattle of wheels,
before, for now all was thick, shady, and dense, and the young firs
before. "One only wonders at the long-suffering or blindness of the
before. At the same time the feeling he had noticed between his
before. At the time of its establishment it had approximately 150,000
before. Firmly convinced as he was of the truths revealed to him by
before. The peasant drivers, shouting and lashing their horses, kept
before. They went through the muddy village, past threshing floors and
before. With fifteen thousand men I held the enemy at bay for
before?" Natasha rejoined with conviction. "The soul is immortal--well
began arranging the chairs and taking their seats. Anatole moved a
began clapping and shouting with all their might, and the man
began clapping and shouting, while the man and woman on the stage--who
began dressing her with perfect sincerity, and with the naive and firm
began hugging and kissing him. Another and yet another creature of the
began in 1660, when there was created by royal order a committee of the
began looking at the enemy camp, now just visible in the deceptive
began looking at the faces, some strange and some familiar, in the
began pacing up and down in front of the shed.
began putting direct questions as to how many men there were in the
began reading his paper and specially drew Rostov's attention to the
began repeating the terms of the wager to him in English.
began the last of his operations. He pursued General Greene far into
began the rescript again and again, but as soon as he uttered 'Sergey'
began to come into the Rostovs' yard. Many of the wounded asked them
began to decline until in the worst fortunes of 1864 one dollar in gold
began to demonstrate the defects of the latter and the merits of his
began to die away in the distance, the other pack rushed by the wood
began to improve and she no longer aroused in him the former feeling
began to interest him so keenly that the question of the army
began to make the most of it. He prepared for the opening of the new
began to rise, and stillness reigned over the village and the house.
began to rival those of Pennsylvania. Birmingham became the Pittsburgh
began to rival, in the number of their residents, the farm homesteads of
began to see eye to eye with the manufacturers. So the textile interests
began to speed along the road, one after the other.
began walking up and down the room, not stepping simply on the
began with shouts to drive on the carts that blocked the way.
began, had an opposite effect: the longer it continued and the greater
began. "They'll be announcing that the gentlemen are in the drawing
began. The government could not raise money to pay its debts or running
begin the action, but were on this side, so close to our own forces
begin the action--he drew the glove from his shapely white hand,
begin to atrophy from loss of the trophic influence.
begin to ring when the hands of the clock reach ten, I have no right
begin. The marshals, accompanied by adjutants, galloped off in
begin? What marked the change? I sat all the time in this same place
beginning but the end of the American conquest of California--a conquest
beginning of the campaign but had subsequently been removed from the
beginning to feel for the pretty and provocative Mademoiselle
beginning to pace up and down the room. "I always thought it....
beginning to stir in the French camp, and his keen-sighted adjutant
begins as an ulcerative stomatitis, more especially affecting the gums
begins later in life, however, the margin of the ulcer is more sharply
begins to creak and joins in the common motion the result and aim of
begins to heave and the ship to move, such a delusion is no longer
begins to show evidence of the syphilitic taint.
begun talking, and the more he talked the less could he control his
begun the chantry long before, but that nine tenths of the peasants in
begun to think of the last station and was still pondering on the same
begun, and in two twists of the hand he breaks them to smithereens and
begun. Trains of peasant carts came to Moscow to carry off to the
behind a corner of the shed and approached Pierre with a friendly
behind each chair--stood waiting for the prince to enter. The head
behind her. Rostov and Ilyin, on entering the room, were welcomed with
behind him as if to take something. The members of his suite, guessing
behind the bars until the government, in its good pleasure, saw fit to
behind the cavalry. He was armed with a musketoon (which he carried
behind the door I heard how he lay down on his bed groaning and loudly
behind the oven. He sat, sunk deep in a folding armchair, and
behind the sterno-mastoid muscle. It may attain a large size, the
behold "the number of steamers that now descend the upper Mississippi
behold them penetrating into the deepest frozen recesses of Hudson's Bay
being a dispute over the boundaries of the new state. The Texans claimed
being a favorite with the populace. Though a man of many talents, he
being a liberal. The party of the old and dissatisfied, who censured
being always near the commander in chief, closely following the mass
being appendages to or parts of the greater groups which are themselves
being broken up into droplets and absorbed, while the axis cylinders
being carried by. She looked out. The men servants were carrying the
being carried to the wound in the neck, but they should be removed,
being circulated, that as a great favor he had petitioned the
being discussed there by a society of which Pierre was one of the
being dorsiflexed by the unopposed extensors. The depth of the track
being dragged along by his armpits through the garden at Bald Hills,
being driven into the bone. It is worst at night, preventing sleep, and
being due to the toxins produced in the wound of infection acting upon
being equal, much more dangerous than burns of the limbs. The risk of
being first among the states to offer troops to Lincoln in the hour of
being forestalled on that road by the French who had crossed the
being held and the bells were ringing, Pierre got out of his vehicle
being implicated in a fracture involving the articular end of a bone, it
being jolted over the stony road. Some of them were talking (he
being kept extended; there is no pain if the same manoeuvre is repeated
being kept fixed at one spot, while the negative is moved about so as to
being laid up for many weeks, or even months; and we agree with the
being literally bathed in sweat. The urine is diminished in quantity,
being merged in the general infective process from which it takes
being pushed back in the sitting room where the count and Marya
being reflected in the shape of a horse-shoe flap or being removed along
being said to him and slipped behind the others.
being scattered through the superficial layers of the skin, which is
being set up and preparations made for the dinner; he saw the
being shifted from time to time, the projecting ends being surrounded
being so disproportionate to its superficial area, the condition closely
being sung in Austria, the only change being that the words "Father
being taken not to break it up. The puncture is then cauterised. The
being the area of spread. When black powder is used, the embedded grains
being the fruits of their necessities. The answer to the enigma is to be
being the medium through which the virus is transmitted, and the seat of
being those most liable to suffer. Sometimes the traction is exerted
being thrust through a pane of glass. It is essential that the ends
being to remove the red corpuscles and fibrin of the original clot, and
being unable to flex the finger, and by the pain being increased when he
beings in whom the Deity--the Supreme Power if you prefer the term--is
beings. Such was the clarion call which went forth to the world in
belfry of Ivan the Great. The domes of the New Convent of the Virgin
believe either in friendship or in love, or any of the joys of life,
believe it." He remembered the expression Dolokhov's face assumed in
believe that Russia was really in danger and that the members of the
believe, then to determine which side of the activity of a leader
believed as a child believes, in the speaker's tone of conviction
believed to be a metastasis from the throat; it may be acute and
believed to be the last means of arousing him.
believes that the dissemination is accomplished in a more subtle way,
believes that the pigmentation and overgrowth of the epidermis in moles
believing in it there would have been nothing unintelligible in the
believing with his whole soul what the stranger said. Whether he
bell is employed. The cup is applied for five minutes at a time and then
bellicose section of the London press, deplored the incident,
belligerents in the summer of 1905 to join in a peace conference. The
belligerents. Anxious to bring order to the distracted island, he
belong entirely to her and to the home, and the children whom she
belonged his conversations with the staff, the letters he wrote from
belonged the courtiers who tried to arrange compromises between the
belonged to the latter and no one else, while showing servile
belonged to women. Indeed it was the dexterous housewives, spinsters,
belonging to members of the family, there were about a hundred and
belonging to that escort, but when they reached the supply stores they
belonging to the United States; and nothing in this Constitution shall
belonging to the estate) of a ruling prince, in a crown--an alleged
belonging to the marshal had been found in his possession.
belonging to these institutions had already been packed up. The
belongings did not arrive till the thirtieth.
beloved by everybody. And for the first time Sonya felt that out of
below the bend of the elbow; there is pain and difficulty in effecting
below the hill.
below the opening, and divided between the ligatures.
below, on the left, the firing became more distinct. Kutuzov had
below, the little town could be seen with its white, red-roofed
below, the swelling is spindle-shaped. Subacute exacerbations occur from
below. If the small saphena system also is involved, and if
benches, and fencing from the village.
bend under the weight of the body and other mechanical influences, with
bending double sat down on the ground like a bird shot on the wing.
bendings and thickenings of the bones. Large areas of the cranial vault
beneath and around, and the subcutaneous lesions are much wider than
beneath investigated. If the articular surface is extensively diseased,
beneath it, and the nail is usually shed, a new one growing in its
beneath the periosteum. To indicate this abnormality the name
beneath the tide of English migration, the Dutch in New York continued
beneath--for example, fracture of the olecranon.
benefactor and sovereign, I submit. Only I am sorry for the Emperor
benefactor at Torzhok. And now a picture of a solemn meeting of the
benign character. If causing symptoms, it is removed by dividing the
bent forward toward the old man with a forced and timid smile.
bent in children who paddle about the floor with the aid of their arms;
bent on finding out what manner of nation this was springing up in the
bent to the left, was listening with a dissatisfied air. The Emperor
bent under him, the other had been amputated above the knee. His
bent under the weight of the body, by the traction of muscles, and by
beside Natasha, and heard for the first time the story of those last
beside Prince Nesvitski. Count Ilya Rostov with the other members of
beside Sonya while the china was being packed and tried to help, but
beside him, he touched his horse and rode down the side street.
beside him. "That must be the enemy's camp!"
beside the commanding officer. The young officer, his hand to his
beside the gun, he had heard the voices of the officers distinctly,
beside the old prince.
beside the samovar. The children with their tutors and governesses had
besides Pierre and himself was in the room, and addressed her in a
besieged in the British quarters in Peking under constant fire of
besought by the French government, promised the aid of the British navy
best gown, was in the highest spirits. "They can't help liking me,"
best of it. The orders were not to let them in. So we're in force,
best place to apply a tourniquet is the middle third of the thigh; in
best society. There was talk of his intrigues with some of the ladies,
bestowed on me.' I saw it myself, master, the star is fixed into the
betrays a consciousness of the impropriety of such silence and an
better executed. It brightens the glory that must accompany your name to
better luck in a newer country and pioneers from the far frontiers of
better than conquest, and the slighter the wounds the quicker the
better than he did, he found that this was the body of a man, set
better than men, and in them the blood is more rapidly re-formed. A few
better that day and Natasha was sitting with him. In the next room sat
better to make a fresh wound down to the bone on that aspect of the
better was Pierre pleased and the more evident was it that the
between England and France, then raging. The English, having command of
between Panama and the United States in which the latter secured the
between Spain and the United States alone.
between a State, or the citizens thereof, and foreign States, citizens,
between a legitimate sovereign and the criminal Bonaparte. Rostov
between adjacent incisions. The edges of the incisions are sutured; and
between capital and labor are avoided. The advantages of slavery in this
between her son and the portionless Sonya. Though she blamed herself
between him and the European market stood the merchant. His community
between his palms, polished his bayonet; another fingered the strap
between operations, and by the anaesthetist during operations on the
between ourselves, was very far gone in the land of tenderness..."
between the East and the West there was growing up a common interest in
between the Emperor Alexander and the King of Prussia in Berlin? If
between the North and South, leaders in the latter section often thought
between the bones.
between the campaign of 1892 and the next presidential election brought
between the cells. This peculiarity accounts for the facility with which
between the commander in chief and Lanskoy, who was in charge of the
between the divided ends of the vessel and in the cellular tissue
between the fibrous bundles of connective tissue. This is what was
between the infection and the first manifestation of acute septicaemia.
between the intellectual activity of men and their historical
between the manufacturing East and the agrarian country to the West.
between the officers, came close to Denisov, and said:
between the old and the new conception of history, and theology in the
between the past and the future--that is, outside time, which is
between the prisoners and the French soldiers, in which Pierre had
between the rectum and sacrum, give rise to difficulty in diagnosis,
between the rete Malpighii and the stratum corneum of the skin, the
between the thought of the New World and the Old. In England, the
between the toes, and at the angles of the mouth, and in these
between the two camps became confused and said at Helene's what he
between the two contending English parties. To the constant political
between the two countries.
between the two flanks was more than six miles, even if the
between the two men. At that moment an immense number of things passed
between the two richest heiresses, Julie and Princess Mary. Though
between the two sides. Each bud begins in the wall of the capillary as a
between the wagon wheels, men disfigured by fear of death now
between them is, that while the evil effects of innocent tumours are
between them there was no longer any barrier except the barrier of his
between traders and an Indian, a jug of whisky, a keg of gunpowder, the
between two candles. On the table was a pile of gold and paper
bewitching smiles: "But I think that having espoused the true religion
beyond human power. It petitioned the king to interpose on behalf of the
beyond is cold. If at the same time important nerve-trunks are
beyond the Niemen--only the Niemen?" repeated Napoleon, looking
beyond the Vistula, and not ordered his troops to advance, there would
beyond the mountains.
beyond the mountains. He pressed upon the governor of Virginia a project
beyond the reach of any individual, no matter how rich. It eliminated
beyond the reach of outside intervention.
beyond the river, and Zubova, and in the Kremlin.... Just look!
beyond the river, and the same stern and serious expression that
beyond the scope of ordinary human agencies; I do not understand why
beyond the sea, so these men with their wives and children streamed to
beyond the village similar masses of cavalry came up and disappeared
beyond those forests and fields, the bright, oscillating, limitless
beyond which the vessel and its tributaries are distended and tortuous.
bifurcation of the common trunk. In addition to the ordinary signs of
bifurcation usually extends as far as the junction of the lower and
bilateral, and may assume the form of gummatous ulcers and sinuses. In
bile he had accumulated at the sight of all that was being done in the
bill granting the new charter, and sent the open defiance to Jackson.
bill of 1846 striking an effective blow at the principle of protection
bill of 1875 which promised to them, among other things, the full and
bill of the same year created a federal board of nine members to which
biology. Though only forty-three years old he was well versed in the art
birches, also wet, swayed in the wind and flung down bright drops of
bird. Burke had denied the right of the French people to choose their
birds was silenced at once. They looked at the beautiful, large,
birthday, Prince Volkonski was called out of the church and received a
biscuits, fodder, and whatnot! The stores are empty, the roads
bishop. The clerk several times used the word "plenary" (of the
bismuth gauze, and treated by the open method.
bismuth or iodoform gauze and encouraged to heal from the bottom. As the
bit," said the old man, and showed Pierre a globe. This globe was
bitch (daughter of the first Milka), with a quite gray face and
bite, appears on the affected part, and is attended with itching. After
bitter hostility. Meetings of protest were held throughout the country.
bitterly that in spite of repeated orders, the soldiers continue to
bitterness, despite the conciliatory and engaging manner in which
bitterness. The contest resulted in the impeachment of Johnson by the
black eyebrows and the extraordinarily soft, bright color of her long,
black eyes looked at the crowd without seeking anyone, and her
black eyes, a Jesuit a robe courte* was presented to her, and in the
black hair, both curtsied in the same way, but the hostess' eye
black horse with trappings that glittered in the sun, rode a tall
black lace walked--as women can walk--with the more repose and
black ones. The caleche stopped in front of the regiment. Kutuzov
black roofs, stretched the dark starry sky. Only looking up at the sky
black--probably men--and at times the glint of bayonets. But whether
black-coloured stools due to the presence of blood altered by digestion,
black-list of Pennsylvania contained the names of nearly five hundred
black-robed priests, prepared for sacrifice, even to death, the trappers
blackmailed employers. Some critics specialized in descriptions of the
bladder and rectum, and on the sciatic and obturator nerves; sometimes
blame for everything, the colonel moved forward and ordered the second
blame for this incident on the government of Serbia and made humiliating
blame, suffered the same fate.
blamed," he said, "both for that war and the peace... but everything
bland fluids by the mouth or normal salt solution by the rectum.
blandly smiling with the same expression, which seemed to say that
blanket, looking with a scared face at his comrade for help. The door,
blankets and furs for powder and whisky had passed farther on. The
bleeders, even higher--a form of aseptic fever. The degree of shock is
bleeding is profuse, however, the parts beyond the aneurysm become
bleeding may not take place until the period of reaction. Rupture of the
bleeding occurs into the cellular tissue under the skin or mucous
bleeding takes place as on the amount of blood lost. The sudden loss of
bleeding which follows immediately on the wounding of a blood vessel.
blending into a dull roar that set the windows rattling.
blessed with religious toleration by the act of 1649, flourished under
blindfolded like the others, and like a wounded animal looked around
blindman's buff the French ran into our vanguard. Seeing their enemy
blisters, the thickened periosteum should be incised, and the bone
blockade. The course followed by the British government, against the
blockading the ports of the Southern Confederacy. Later the blockade was
blocked in the Senate where Southern interests were intrenched. Then,
blocked in the Senate where the necessary two-thirds vote could not be
blocking the way to Moscow and they still did so at the end of the
blocking their road to Moscow that the wine was drawn and must be
blood (_Op. Surg._, p. 37). If this is not immediately available the
blood and with the boot still on.
blood has been considerable, the treatment of the bloodless state.
blood in an extension or pouching of the sac, which, making its way
blood in the joint is slowly re-absorbed, and by the end of a fortnight
blood out of the infected portion of the limb has been recommended. The
blood rapidly rushes into the varicose vessels from above; this is known
blood retained within it may ultimately arrest the haemorrhage. A clot
blood showed itself in two places, how the ropes slackened under the
blood spaces which are usually derived from the dilatation of the
blood supply of the brain.
blood to the brain. His bed should be placed near a large fire, and the
blood vessels of the part, which at first is pale and soft, but later
blood vessels. Giant cells are not uncommon, but the endothelioid cells,
blood vessels. The view that varix is congenital in origin, as was first
blood when the bandage is re-applied. As the inflammation subsides, the
blood, he moved toward the door.
blood, the same soldiers' overcoats, the same sounds of firing
blood-clot, discharge, or necrosed tissue removed, and the area
blood-forming organs, in which there is a great increase in the number,
blood-letting from the median basilic vein. Arterio-venous aneurysm is a
blood-poisoning assumes its most aggravated forms. The toxins of the
blood-stained. If the tumour projects in a polypoidal manner into the
blood-stream and deposited in other parts of the body, where they give
blood-stream from some primary focus about the mouth, such as a gumboil
blood. A careful watch must be kept on the state of nutrition of the
blood. It may simulate lymphadenoma, because, in certain forms of the
blood. On allowing the blood again to flow through the artery, the
blood." He did more than attack the writ itself. He said that Parliament
blotch to the right was the watchman's hut, and the red blotch below
blows could be heard. Pierre offered the use of his carriage, which
blue colour. As the more severe forms of the disease may prove dangerous
blue eyes looked impudently into the commander's face, and his lips
blue-black. The affected area is sharply defined, and on close
blue-gray dog in the least. Its furry tail stood up firm and round
blue-gray dog, sitting beside the soldier, wagging its tail.
bluish-brown colour; the epidermis gradually thins and gives way,
bluntly put, was as bluntly answered. "Gentlemen of the South,"
blushed when he entered the drawing room. He evidently tried to find
blushing--"of asking the commander in chief. He has had a letter
board in the roof at the farther end, with a piece of (broken but
board-like hardness and no longer contract under the will, and passive
boasted a membership of over 700,000. In philosophy, the Knights of
bobtailed chestnut horse, the other who was in a white uniform rode
bodies of the vertebrae. Bones formed entirely in membrane, that is,
bodies, the undefinable essence of the forces of heat and electricity,
bodies. Mercury is a fluid, volatile, spiritual essence. Christ, the
body by an attack from a foreign power. The imperative call to common
body forward.) "Such a question cannot be put; it is senseless! The
body had not been found nor was he on the list of prisoners. What
body in the tissues, unless it has been accurately located, a general
body is disengaged, the locking disappears, and recovery takes place.
body of legislation regulating the shipping, trade, and manufactures of
body of trained soldiers to the aid of the Americans. Timely as was this
body politic. Chief among them was the idea of simplifying the city
body to infection, and this would appear to be due to the viscid
body with comparatively little loss of blood. The risk in such cases is
body, a convention to frame a new plan of government. In 1780, the
body-weight. The small amount of mercury given at the outset is
body. Both felt this so strongly that the outward and terrible side of
body. One of the soldiers, evidently suffering, shouted gruffly and
body. Organisms circulating in the blood are prone to lodge on the
boil" is applied. Usually, however, the skin becomes red, and after a
boiling, in which case they are put on wet. The gauntlet of the glove
boldly as they had looked at the regimental commander, seeming by
boldly sent to continental ports without even so much as a bow to the
boldly. It is clear that the man who advocates the conclusion of a
bondage, were transformed into enemies of the law. They helped slaves to
bondmen who had played no part in the struggle. Moreover it struck down
bonds of this Union are virtually dissolved ... that as it will be the
bonds. Publishers, in despair at the loss of supplies, were finally
bone be seriously interfered with. On the other hand, if it is not
bone becomes heavier and denser--sclerosis; and the new bone which is
bone by the marrow; the medullary canal is often obliterated, and the
bone caused by the cysts. The disease is liable to be mistaken for
bone disintegrates and exhibits the condition known as _syphilitic
bone in the area of disease is roughened and irregular by erosion, and
bone is exaggerated, and it becomes the longer of the two. In either
bone is seen in the position of the original shaft which it represents;
bone lesions as necessarily proving that the disease commenced in the
bone marrow, and it probably has as its object the arrest and
bone may give rise to _reactive changes_ in the adjacent joint,
bone may take place at the periphery, the osseous focus reaching the
bone of the great toe and may be the cause of considerable suffering; it
bone or of a rubber drainage tube upon the vessel may aid the septic
bone round about, and partly from the density of the sequestrum. In
bone there will be suppuration from the granulations lining the cavity
bone, and are worst at night. There is redness and oedema of the
bone, and the dead portion when separated is called a _sequestrum_. The
bone, and the general who had served blamelessly for twenty-two years,
bone, both as it is altered by the original attack and by the changes
bone, both the tumour and its capsule should be removed. If in the
bone, the cortex becomes porous, the spongy bone is rarefied, and the
bone, with the result that the stump left after spontaneous separation
bone-like hardness; in time they soften, liquefy, and burst through the
bone. In bony ankylosis the shadow of the two bones is a continuous one,
bone. On removing the splint, the skin of the part pressed upon is found
bone. The symptoms to which it gives rise depend on its situation. In
bone. They are pearly white in colour, pitted and nodular on the
bone; the extent of the bare bone will be found to correspond fairly
bones and ligaments of the joint, and it has been known to rupture into
bones as a result of absorption of the articular cartilage, and
bones bounding the nasal and oral cavities, may disappear, so that on
bones entering into the knee joint.
bones is of importance, as the disease, if left to itself, is liable to
bones of a joint--if the articular cartilage has been destroyed--to
bones of the forearm and leg, and effusion into the wrist and
bones of the skull present greater difficulties; if it is necessary to
bones of the skull this may be heaped up in the form of bosses or ridges
bones readily bend or break under mechanical influences. When the
bones, if the growth of one is arrested the continued growth of the
bones, palate, sternum, femur, tibia, and the bones of the forearm.
bones, such as the tibia, ulna, clavicle, mandible, or phalanges, that
bones, the bodies of the vertebrae, and the pelvis.
bones--as in the leg, for example--the growth of the diseased bone may
bones. It may also take place in the regeneration of lost portions of
bonfire the soldiers had kindled on the road. Rostov, too, dragged
bonus to all privates who served until the end of the war. Even this
bony outgrowths or osteophytes not unlike those met with in the
book. "It is a ray of light in the darkness, a shade between sadness
bookcases with keys in the locks, the high desk for writing while
books, but a disease consisting of one of the innumerable combinations
boots and sheepskin coats, without a roof over their heads, in the
boots and the clinking of spurs that came to a stop, and a
boots between the dining and drawing rooms, hastily greeting the
boots on the bed, lit his pipe, furiously scattered his things
boots. The little barefooted Frenchman in the blue coat went up to the
boracic acid and carbonate of zinc. Immersion of the penis in a bath of
boracic acid with 5 per cent. salicylic acid, may be rubbed into the
boracic lotion kept at the body temperature, the lotion being frequently
boracic ointment (one-quarter the strength of the pharmacopoeial
boracic poultice, after which a piece of lint or gauze cut to the size
borders of the country, could not fail to bring in its train
bore all the prisoners forward onto the road, and Pierre, thanks to
bore the stamp of his theories, though it could hardly be said that he
bore with his father's ridicule of the new men, and drew him on and
born, despite the opposition of her mother, the doctors, and even of
borne in mind, however, that the condition of the radial artery may fail
borne in mind, there is a danger of failing to recognise the primary
borne to Napoleon by the daughter of the Emperor of Austria, the boy
borrow. Besides this the chief steward wrote every year telling him of
borrowed money secured by farm mortgages; and they counted upon the sale
borrowings in Europe, and the impressment of supplies, the Congress
borzoi that was pushing forward out of the wood. The count started and
borzois surrounded him. A moment later everyone had drawn up round the
borzois that were not on leash darted after the hounds and the hare.
borzois, set off across the threshing ground to a field leading to the
bosom of his coat as he always did when he mentioned the prince....
botanist who finds that the apple falls because the cellular tissue
both fall on his flank and pursue him over the plain between
both motor hyper-tonus and hyper-excitability, which accounts for the
both of the United States and of the several States, shall be bound by
both of the platform and the appeal for votes, was on the "imperialistic
both of them might be killed like the three sons of one of her
both old and young. The old men, dim-eyed, toothless, bald, sallow,
both sides awarded to the United States the lump sum of $15,500,000 to
both sides from among citizens outside the mill. Thus the employees were
both sides of the Kolocha.
both the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation and Michael
both the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation and Michael
both the dry ground and the water disappear and mud results; and in
both the quality and the defect of frankness in their opinions. They
both town and peasant lads and will raise the cry a day or two
both voices began speaking at the same time, the door was flung
both with merry countenances. The count, with playful ceremony
bottom of the hill before their pace instinctively changed to a
bought up at low prices the Southern bonds and other promises to pay.
bougies are inserted into the urethra, and the urine should be rendered
bound in one narrow, unchanging frame, he experienced the same sense
bound to come strength and prosperity for the new government at home,
boundaries of the affected organ, moreover, are frequently transgressed
boundary claims. The British government, deaf to the clamor of the
bounded by the will of the prince, and he never went beyond that
bounded off yet more swiftly. From behind Erza rushed the
bounds, and the leaders made ready for the approaching presidential
bounds," said the countess, "so that it even becomes absurd."
bounties, ship subsidies, banking, and kindred matters. The planters of
bowed till he touched the ground with his hand. The other generals
bowed to the storm. Still the results were disappointing and at that
bowels. The kidneys are flushed by such diluent drinks as equal parts of
bowing to the ground in prayer, her door creaked and Natasha, also
box for the rest of the performance, and Natasha moved over to it.
boy she loved in the arms of the man she loved. Nicholas also
boy we resected the shaft and inserted his fibula ten years ago, and he
boy, and the old count came in and welcomed the princess. He had
boy, seeing Prince Andrew, ran into the house. Alpatych, having sent
boy... the countess... promoted to be an officer... thank God... How
boyhood at confession; he felt himself in the presence of one socially
brace himself, and to question the esaul with an air of importance
braced up by a change to the seaside. A dusting-powder, consisting of
brachialis supplied by the radial nerve. Supination is feebly performed
brachialis, but no movements are abolished, the forearm being flexed, in
brain and at that moment afforded him pleasure. The enemy's guns
brain diseases. The part affected becomes red and congested, while the
brain is the only thing left me--not singing!" his thoughts ran on.
brain-spun. And there was the former agitation and obscurity. He
branch is given off, the sensory paralysis is much less marked, and the
branch of the legislature, serving for four years, and subject to
branch_ (posterior interosseous), apart from suffering in lesions of the
branched off to the iliac and inguinal groups.
branches of an artery--usually the temporal--and may spread to the main
branches, causing congestion and oedema of the leg, and lead to gangrene.
brandishing the slab.
brazen bribery and corruption, and dark hints besides. The Senate was
breach of the surface, although this may be superficial and
bread contaminated with the _claviceps purpurea_ and containing the
bread it has earned. This is the sum of good government; and this is
break down and form ulcers, on the leg for example, or of a spreading
break the silence, asked him how he liked Moscow. She asked the
break when the patient falls in a fit, and there is usually an
breakers to the West were native Americans of the second and third
breaking down and destruction of the tissue in which it is formed.
breaking down glands in the axilla.
breaking rank, mingled with the French Guards and sat down at the
breaking the sickle under the reaper--these men and a thousand more were
breaking-down of the tissues at its margins. The surrounding parts are
breaking: "It's horrible, vile, inhuman, to take advantage of the
breaks down in the centre. Epithelioma may develop anywhere on the body
breast and in the prostate, with the waning of sexual life there may
breast or in muscles, and it rarely affects the ovary, the pancreas, the
breast, while Nicholas rose, clutching his head, and left the room.
breast,--a condition of lymphatic oedema may result, the arm becoming
breath, looked round at the borzois. They stood or lay not seeing
breathing and labored transitions, was sounding, even the connoisseurs
breathing heavily, panted past him, and he heard the fall of a body
breathing of the panting old general.
breathing. And the bright glow of some inner fire that had been
breathless--to the Tsar-cannon. Several people were sorry for Petya,
breathlessly, like a boy, up the steps of his home.
bridge Nesvitski found the colonel to whom he had to deliver the
bridge of the nose; in the palate, it is common to have a perforation,
bridge the gap and form a firmer, but still temporary, connection
bridge the gulf which industry and the corporation had created. Among
bridge, and the whole crowd had to wait.
bridge, but with the feeling of a hare fleeing from the hounds. One
bridge, there was nothing between the squadron and the enemy, and
bridge, was about to fire, but Lannes stayed his hand. The sergeant,
bridge," about the impossibility of crossing the frontier with a crowd
bridge. From different sides came whistling sounds and the thud of
bridges, advancing to the same heights as Morand's and Gibrard's
bridges. When the bridges broke down, unarmed soldiers, people from
brief account of the whole campaign, enclosed for them a plan he had
brief description of the campaign and the two battles in which he
brief moment got the better of the artificial phantasm of life he
bright, fresh, dewy, and cheerful. The sun, just bursting forth from
bright, hot day in town. All the Moscow notabilities, all the Rostovs'
bright-red islands amid the green winter rye. The hares had already
brighter and brighter with an old man's mild smile, which drew the
brilliant career on which he had entered. When the Rostovs came to
brilliant engagements the Russians had had to retreat and had made
brilliant light. It was evident that the more lifeless he seemed at
brilliant plan for a future campaign over the whole map of Russia.
brilliant wife who now enjoyed the favors of a very important
brilliant, and proud sphere, Prince Andrew noticed the following
brindled cow with a large udder was attached to the cart behind. A
bring down the two battalions of the Sixth Chasseurs whom they had
bring her share and a husband his. I have my position in the
bring it into the condition of a healing sore. When this has been
bring something for them to eat and drink before the journey, and went
bring the man to him. He wished to talk to him himself. Several
bring together the seaboard and the frontier. The produce of the
bringing through the blockade any supplies purchased by foreign bond
bringing victory to either side. The surrender of Detroit by General
briskly ascended the carpeted stairs.
broad acres of the Western prairies stretching on before them apparently
broad bench in the front corner. Her husband, the doctor, lay asleep
broad benches in the corner under the icons. "Granddad" himself, as
broad face with its toothless open mouth. The storm was long since
broad-haunched, black-spotted Milka and began rapidly gaining on the
broadsheets, and some liked the way Karpushka jeered at the French,
broadsheets, or because of them or independently of them, the
broadsheets. Evidently the terrible stormcloud he had desired with the
broke into the conversation and began excitedly talking of the
broke off, fell on the balcony parapet, and then to the ground. A
broke up. The small farm became the unit of cultivation in the South as
broke, and the roads became impassable. For days neither provisions
broken crockery," said he, and rising slowly he moved to the table.
broken roof. In the village, in the house, in the garden, by the well,
broken wall he could see, beside the wooden fence, a row of thirty
broken; how she had aged during the five years he had known her, and
bronchial glands or elsewhere. According to the observations of John
brother Masons swear by the blood that they are ready to sacrifice
brother Petya. She liked to be with him better than with the others,
brother it was of course out of the question for me to think of
brother of the ruler of Austria, emperor in Mexico, and surrounded his
brother would have taken the icon, but she stopped him. Andrew
brother, and forgetting that it was unbecoming for the girls to see
brother. That feeling was so strong at the moment of leaving
brothers led Pierre up to the altar, placed his feet at right
brought Idaho and Wyoming into the union, the latter with woman
brought a turn in affairs that destroyed the foundations under their
brought about improvement by short-circuiting or by resecting the colon.
brought about. Outside the body, bacteria may be killed by starvation,
brought as prizes to the nearest convenient port. To make the order
brought back and services to be again performed in the churches.
brought directly under the king in 1702. Maryland, Pennsylvania, and
brought for the Emperor to be carried before him and entered the first
brought from the Emperor Alexander and am very glad to see you." He
brought into Wischau from our outposts. This officer was Savary. The
brought into the union with freedom and Missouri with bondage. At the
brought into the union without slavery and Missouri with slavery. At the
brought the letter from the countess was very anxious to see him if
brought there only to witness the execution. With ever-growing horror,
brought to the doors of the Lodge. Willarski coughed, he was
brought. The soldier groaned.
brow and the happy complacent smile that slightly puckered his lips
brown, but finally of a black colour, from the dissemination of blood
brown; sordes collect on the teeth; and a low muttering form of delirium
brownish fluid. On removing the raised epidermis, the congested and
brownish strips of winter rye trodden down by the cattle, and
brownish-red fur, so that it has the appearance of "dried beef." The
brushed aside the protests of those who deplored the conduct of the
brushed on the temples and sticking up in tufts behind. Though he
brushed up into a huge shock. He stood in full view of the audience,
brushes; but they were all of relatively slight consequence. The former
brutal; and to succor the suffering, especially the widows and orphans
bubo in the groin, or a boil on the neck, the affected area may be
buffaloes, of which he had heard weird reports, passed through the
build, broad in the hips, and with prominent shoulder blades. His face
builders in the Far West had little difficulty with warlike natives.
building highways from the headwaters of the navigable waters emptying
building of a new gallery or conservatory, the inauguration of a
buildings, but even here, while on the scaffolding, in the midst of
buildings--schools, hospitals, and asylums--on all the estates
built log cabins, laid out farms, and cut roads through the wilderness.
built the Continental Congress, the precursor of union under the
built, to the multitudes that could be employed in conquering a
bullae form on the surface. Putrefactive gases may be evolved in the
bullet fired by a French sharpshooter hit him in the fleshy part of
bullet. As a mark of the commander in chief's special favor he was
bullet. Spent shot may merely cause bruising of the surface, or they may
bullets. They reached the front, several bullets sped over them, and
burden upon the accumulated wealth of the country instead of placing it
burdening the inhabitants on whom they were quartered. Braunau was the
buried themselves in the soft mud. Rostov joined them. In the middle
burn houses and slay their fellow men? What were the causes of these
burned in effigy. Even Washington was not spared. The House of
burned-out quarters of the town, stretching out and concealing one
burning and itching, the part becomes swollen, of a dusky red colour,
burning itself out. The flames now died down and were lost in the
burning of Moscow cost the lives of a hundred thousand Russians who
burning on the table, screened by a bound music book so that the light
burning round his coffin, a pall was spread over it, the floor was
burning sense of jealousy of "the favorite" agitated him now as
burns have been treated like other breaches of the surface. Albuminuria
burns have been treated on the same lines as other wounds.
burns, and in preventing cicatricial contraction. The _deformities_
burns, by thorough purification and the application of dry dressings,
burns. _Nail_ horns are overgrown nails (keratomata of the nail bed),
bursa--"miner's elbow"; and of the ischial bursa--"weaver's" or
bursae, and finally reaching the skin surface by tortuous sinuses.
bursae. As the joint becomes distended with fluid, the ligaments are
bursal tumour_--a small cavity remaining in the centre which serves to
burst into music. Amid these sounds, only the youthful kindly voice of
burst into the cellular tissue outside the sheath, and the suppuration
burying in the subcutaneous tissue of the swollen part a number of stout
bushes here," came the voice of an hussar, past whom Rostov was riding
business and commercial life of the nation." Such was the picture of
business concerns. All over the country decided efforts were made to
business enterprise on a large scale was the system of banking. In the
business men in the East had contended for a sound system of national
business men. On the invitation of President Diaz, they had invested
business of the country was done by corporations as distinguished from
business of the entire country passed under government control. By war
business of the war. With Pfuel was Wolzogen, who expressed Pfuel's
business to look after the wounded; they know that. Look at the
business were initiated by magnates in the banking world with millions
business world. In that sphere the stockholders of each corporation
business!" and turning again to the narrator he began to laugh afresh.
business, Catiche,"* muttered the prince, seating himself wearily on
business, his place, what he had to do. As soon as they had passed the
business--prosperous and profitable industries for the owners and "the
but Denisov's a fine fellow. But that's all nonsense. The chief
but Metchnikoff has shown that the inunction of the part inoculated with
but Pierre did not reply and went out of the room.
but Princess Mary was going to vespers and Pierre left the house
but Rostov had no chance of being present at the review he held at
but Rostov with Dolokhov and Denisov stayed on at the Club till
but Sonya, feeling unusually excited and touched, remained at the
but a great policeman keeping order among the people in a struggle over
but all such opposition was like resistance to the course of nature.
but apparently the sight of them roused no pleasant feeling in Vera.
but are limited in range. The disability is increased by use and
but as means to serve a wider purpose. That purpose was the promotion of
but as soon as one gets to business nothing is ready, and the enemy,
but as sorrow was manifest in every smile, the sound of every word,
but asked him not to be too hard on the poor old man. "What do the
but at a church where, according to the devout Agrafena Ivanovna,
but at a figure reasonably above the market price. Against the
but at the incredible boldness and smartness of this little girl who
but before long the Americans, instead of buying cloth, especially of
but by the side of it many a huge domain owned by foreign or Eastern
but concerns his life, throws down his rapier, and seizing the first
but confirms his power. Chance puts the Duc d'Enghien in his hands and
but did so correspond in the latter.
but diverse discordant sounds of disorder. In and out of the hive long
but execrable, yet to him is entrusted the fate of our whole
but follows the current of his own thoughts, "things will have gone
but for God's sake do let the old wolf come my way and let Karay
but for the whole world--seemed to him centered in his love and the
but he could not, and delirium drew him back into its domain. The soft
but he is in a weak state as you know," said the old servant.
but he was at the period of youth when there seems so much to do
but himself as governor, the representative of authority and of the
but his cheerfulness was not infectious as it used to be: on the
but his face expressed the impossibility of altering that decision.
but hopeless: "The sovereigns, madame... What have they done for Louis
but if the bacteria gain the upper hand in the struggle, the
but in intimate circles details were mentioned of how the private
but in the House he had the barest majority from 1889 to 1891 and lost
but in the whole house, there was a feeling of awe at something
but is a distinct and constant menace to his health: the prolonged
but it is often found that the same vein, or segment of a vein, is
but it left all the states east of the river cut off from the Gulf,
but it may take some months to separate. The condition tends to recur in
but joyous and eager crowd down the hill at their disordered foe.
but lay with eyes open in the darkness, listening to the regular
but may follow upon infection of the skin around the orifice of a sinus.
but most of it being reabsorbed. During the process characteristic
but not concealing the fact that she would not be distressed if they
but not open and official cooperation. According to the eminent
but now numbered only nine hundred was one of the first to arrive that
but nullification and secession were destroyed. The nation was supreme.
but occasionally looking up at her and listening to the sound of her
but on the left flank the columns of infantry, cavalry, and artillery,
but on the man in the ranks who shouts, 'We are lost!' or who
but one of the generals espied him and, hearing what he had come
but remained in deserted Moscow ever in the same state of agitation,
but rode on, his eyes fixed on the conqueror whose fame had reached
but seeing the favor the Emperor showed the prisoners, they now
but she could not jump up and run out. The baby again opened his
but she did not yet sing well, as all the connoisseurs who heard her
but she was not only afraid to speak of it and ask Dessalles the
but she would not let him, and having closed the door behind him
but spadefuls of earth were already being thrown over the whole
but straight toward the wood, just as Karay had run to cut the
but that a certain definite dependence exists between the two.
but that he had heard that the regiments were to be made up to their
but that if Louisa Ivanovna (Madame Schoss) would go with them, the
but that on the contrary his smile was most naive, cheerful, and
but that on the contrary the French had run away. He again recalled
but the capsule merely consists of the condensed surrounding tissues,
but the consolation of having been dutiful et tout ce qui s'ensuit!*
but the countess interrupted him.
but the distribution frequently varies with the cause--the alcoholic
but the feeling is stronger than I. Yesterday I tormented myself and
but the fellow stuck to it. He was sent for trial and condemned to
but the history of the life of the peoples and their impulses has
but the lunatic asylum or the gallows!"
but the mist still hid distant objects. Having reached the valley,
but the swelling and tenderness of the vein and the oedema of the limb
but then came the maneuvers, and considerations about Sonya and
but they wandered about the fields seeking it and dug it out with
but they were defended on the ground that in effect a civil war, as well
but they were slowly losing their identity as the English pressed in
but to sip sweet wine, my dear, now that the time has come for these
but to the two women it seemed quite natural that they should cry, and
but to the whole regiment--all of us--you're to blame all round. The
but turned on the subject Nicholas liked best--recollections of
but were recaptured by the French and shot.
but what would seem most likely to interest him--the impending danger.
but when he was in doubt or inwardly at variance, he referred to the
but when it has been seriously damaged or displaced, the further growth
but when the quantity is large or when the absorption is long continued
but where on account of the smoke nothing could be seen. The nearer
but with the quiet, joyful, and amused smile now habitual to him,
but with the very possibility of life. Life without Princess Mary,
but within ten years the aspect of their affairs had completely changed.
but you have no grounds for telling me so. And that is the whole
but, like Napoleon, did not take part in the actual fighting and
butcher-meat are among the best. When the ordinary nourishment taken is
butler, napkin on arm, was scanning the setting of the table, making
buttermilk, honey in the comb, still mead and sparkling mead,
buttocks, and on other parts where the skin is coarse and thick and is
buttons of his coat and looking down at him--the Englishman was short-
butts of their muskets on the ground.
buzz about here till you get hurt. Be off! Go!" he shouted at the
buzzing on a previous theme, flew over to the new one and by their hum
bweak thwough. Give me five hundwed men and I will bweak the line,
by American leaders in (1) the Resolves of the First Continental
by Chipault and others in the treatment of perforating ulcers of the
by Denisov's words. "We only fooled about with the lads for fun, you
by England to defend that land, zeal for the patriot cause set the
by His sole will determine the direction of humanity's movement; but
by Ilyin, Lavrushka, and Alpatych, came up to the crowd, Karp,
by Jefferson. The strength of the Federalists lay in the cities--Boston,
by Lincoln, including his proposal to leave slavery untouched in the
by Madame de Souza. He began reading about the sufferings and virtuous
by Tormasov. The Emperor was with the first army, but not as commander
by Tuffier and others. In these new surroundings, the ovary or thyreoid
by Virchow, and named leontiasis ossea because of the disfigurement to
by a bugler and two Cossacks, Balashev reached the French outposts
by a loss of sensibility on the radial side of the hand and thumb. Wounds
by a more northerly or more southerly route (say by the road Kutuzov
by a narrow margin was due to no lack of zeal on their part but to the
by a red ribbon worn across the shoulder, and the mayor of the city
by a second mortgage on the company's property. More than half of the
by a sensation of tightness in the finger and tenderness when the part
by a short, dry, croupy cough, and hoarseness of the voice. The first
by a sub-coracoid dislocation of the humerus; the medial cord is that
by a tradition that runs far beyond the written records of mankind,
by abolishing the system of royal administration and establishing a
by accident, or by the will of subordinate commanders was done, if not
by alcohol and tobacco plays a part in the causation of cancer, in the
by all legislative codes. The responsibility appears greater or less
by and independent of the nation.... The Constitution, on this
by auction for half its value, and half the debts still remained
by bacterial infections of the bone and from lesions of the adjacent
by boiling. The best situations for injection are under the skin of the
by breaking the dominance of "the big bankers, the big manufacturers,
by capital, labor, or the state, to democratic, cooperative control by
by common bonds. Washington kept alive and keen the zeal for Western
by confining the patient to bed and elevating the limb, the ulcer begins
by contracting causes stiffness and deformity. The articular cartilages
by day, and the starlight of the winter nights seemed to call for some
by dilatation of the blood vessels, exudation of large numbers of
by districts or by whole provinces... and so on; but as soon as the
by epithelium or endothelium; the contents are fluid or semi-solid, and
by equations and comparing the relative significance of this factor,
by evoking the best side of his nature and taking a pleasure in so
by exclaiming: "I will not be the minister to enforce taxes at the
by expressing his personal belief in the popular election of United
by exquisite tenderness; the skin is tense and shiny, and there may be
by fat, while at the same time there is a regeneration of muscle fibres.
by fragments of bone, but to the violence causing the fracture, and this
by gangrene of the limb; it should also be considered if the nature of
by hail, following a track freshly made by the artillery over the
by him from the time he entered Moscow till the time he left it. The
by his Schon Grabern affair and by the retreat from Austerlitz,
by his love for him. The feeling of pain and fear he had experienced
by his voice. To fresh questions as to the firmness of his
by historians to the military operations along the coast has obscured
by imperfect oxygenation of the blood as the result of a deficiency of
by infection with micro-organisms, there is no interference with the
by it. In his second and third messages, Jackson came back to the
by law direct. The number of representatives shall not exceed one for
by law to their home ports. Every section suffered. The South and West
by law. At the same time, some leaders in the movement, no doubt
by making pressure downwards and backwards in the hollow above the
by manufacturing industry." Taking, however, the number of persons
by means of an apparatus which allows the solution to flow in by
by means of the lymph vessels must be borne in mind, and as this occurs
by nature was followed shortly by another inflicted by the despotic
by noting the therapeutic effects of grey powder, which, in syphilitic
by numerous questions raised by the ever swelling tide of aliens coming
by obstruction of the bowels; in the uterus, prostate, and bladder, by
by officials popularly elected under constitutions drafted by "the plain
by one and the same law (whether he observes the necessity of taking
by order of the Highest Authorities it is said that Kutuzov was a
by others, the chanters relit their censers, and service began. The
by pain accompanying the spasms; the muscles are found to be hard and
by people as the acme of intelligence and refinement, and they pay
by placing a pad in the flexure and acutely flexing the limb at the
by predisposing the patient to arterio-sclerosis and atheroma, and
by producing new material which approximates more or less closely to the
by prolonged immersion in 1 in 20 carbolic, or in the iodine solutions
by removing all gross dirt from the edges of the wound.
by resecting the posterior nerve roots and their ganglia within the
by sand-bags or splints. When the disease is subsiding, the nutrition of
by several factors, of which trauma appears to be the most important.
by severe muscular strain may determine rupture of a vein exposed in the
by shaving them off with a knife until the normal shape of the nose is
by shelling out the larger tumours individually, and persevering with
by slaves. They prevent the migration of whites who really strengthen
by so doing caused the old countess to weep tears of joy. After
by special efforts at home, and the thousands of Hessians bought
by state banks and provided for a national currency. In the second
by steam) was on his way with the old man to buy the pistol at the
by strange chance no one does so and all rapturously greet the man
by sutures, means must be taken to lengthen the tendon, or one from some
by syphilis in the production of disease of arteries and of aneurysm
by tapping, or by incision and drainage. When the wall is thickened, the
by that instrument." From that day to this the practice of federal and
by the Anti-Federalists. As he made his way North, he was wined and
by the Congress prior to the year one thousand eight hundred and eight,
by the Constitution. Thus woman suffrage became the law of the land. A
by the Democrats with responsibility for the deed. Douglas declared his
by the Emperors' presence were eager for action. The strategic
by the English Channel for inspection and sailing directions. In effect,
by the French, a proclamation by a French general that no harm would
by the Grand Duke's courier to Boris and Boris was to forward them
by the President with the approval of the Senate; and for a legislature
by the Revolution, they outnumbered the adherents of the established
by the Spanish government.
by the United States were points now emphasized and developed.
by the action of heat on the skin and on the proteins of the blood.
by the administration of bromides, chloral, or paraldehyde, or of one or
by the aid of a nurse and the use of a perambulator. In hospital
by the ancients, it still follows them in practice.
by the application of a Bier's bandage or that which accompanies a
by the arm, "I believe that intervention will be stronger than
by the back door, afraid of being seen by the prince, not for fear
by the bridle, impatiently awaiting the order to mount. His face,
by the builders of forts. In 1718, the French founded New Orleans, thus
by the capture of transport trains on the Smolensk road, and by the
by the cavalry (a thing probably unforeseen and not heard of by
by the clavichord, happy and smiling. Vera was playing chess with
by the decision in the Oklahoma and Maryland cases, left, however, the
by the depression of the tissues resulting from an injury of that part.
by the disease, and the epithelial infiltration implicates the
by the establishment of a protectorate over Nicaragua in 1916.
by the fact that as soon as the condition of the circulation is improved
by the fatigue of a railway journey. When sinuses have formed and become
by the footmen, and, passing among men and women who were entering and
by the formation of a clot. A whole limb even may be avulsed from the
by the government, not a private concern endowed with special privileges
by the great majority of surgeons; the minority, who find they are
by the hand and hid with her behind a birch tree, not stopping to pick
by the historians about this campaign, and everywhere are described
by the humming infantry as by a frame.
by the law of coincidence thousands of minute causes fitted in and
by the life and activity of the Godfreys and the Louis-es and their
by the light of a solitary candle on an empty box, and these
by the lymphatics to the nearest glands, or by the blood-stream to more
by the old stock. In 1803 Ohio was admitted to the union.
by the organisms of diphtheria, pneumonia, or erysipelas is much
by the policies of government in England and Germany.
by the pond, over all the rising ground, and all along the road uphill
by the presence of multiple tumours in the course of the nerves, and
by the rectum is also useful in diluting and hastening the elimination
by the rich planter in England, the small farmer ordinarily could not
by the side horses who pulled harder--ever increasing their gallop-
by the soldiers' pipes, kitchens, and campfires, and by the
by the supinator muscle. Protopathic and epicritic sensibility are lost
by the tales of those who had taken part in it, but also by the joyful
by the timely withdrawal of the fluid contents through a hollow needle.
by the toxins of the bacteria at work in the inflamed area.
by the troops and mown down while still green. The peasants were
by the universal historians and historians of culture themselves,
by the very nature of the case those who command take the smallest
by the voters but by the legislatures of the states, thus removing their
by the watchman's hut giving final orders. The infantry of the
by the well-known experiment of Garre, who produced a crop of pustules
by the will of God, modern history has given us either heroes
by the wind.
by their armies and their government, spread their dominion beyond the
by their confluence lead to extensive destruction of skin. Sometimes the
by their famous "black codes," restored a form of servitude under the
by these two kept the conversation from changing its ordinary
by this diminutive expressing his affection and the hopes he placed on
by this name consists in exposing the aneurysm, incising the sac,
by those who remained in it. Moscow when occupied by the enemy did not
by thrombo-kinetic processes. When examined after two or three days the
by voters, assembled under the authority of Congress at Chillicothe,
by want of moisture, by being subjected to high temperature, or by the
by washing out the stomach. Thirst is relieved by rectal injections of
by water power or the steam engine, the women and, to use Hamilton's
by way of inviting the other to take a seat beside him. Pierre felt
by way of preparation for the flood of settlers.
by way of the canal systems.
by wearing properly fitting boots, and in applying a ring pad around the
by which the force of attraction is in inverse proportion to the
by. The shouting in the tavern had died down; only the moaning of
c.c. to 10 c.c. of the patient's blood, withdrawn under aseptic
c.c.) into a vein may assist in arresting the haemorrhage;
c.c., and if the serum is given early in the disease, the beneficial
cabinet officers did not escape suspicion, for the trail of the serpent
cabman had told her that the people were breaking open the barrels
cachexia_, a condition which is due to the continued absorption of
cake into masses of considerable size. With the movements of the joint
cakelike aroma all around. The flames flared up again, lighting the
calcaneus, and, projecting downwards and forwards from the greater
calcaneus, it should be shaved off with the chisel.
calcification, is only encapsulated by the new fibrous tissue, like a
calcium. Surgical interference may be required in the destructive
calculate in advance the effect of their methods upon dissenting
calculated to restrain the excess of law making and to keep things in
caleche was already at the door. Princess Mary saw him walk out of the
caleches and coaches for themselves. The few inhabitants who had
call Dmitri Vasilevich, a man of good family and the manager of all
call a Cuban parliament, and to grant all the autonomy that could be
call issued by the Congress in summoning the convention which
call on Prince Nicholas Bolkonski. The count did not set out
call out the militia. We have been summoned to reply to the appeal
call them party bosses. They call the system--I don't coin the
call two or three days in advance, the order had certainly already
call. Undisturbed by this formidable bolt, the regular Republicans went
called Kutuzov. From the field beyond the village came now sounds of
called again--though she could hear Dunyasha coming--called her in the
called everyone without exception and without the slightest
called for according to the progress of the wound and the condition of
called for if the patient's life is endangered by embarrassment of
called for the police and soldiers. For this distressing state of
called him a great man," remarked the vicomte.
called in and that the countess was being attended by a charlatan
called the "Lexington of the South."
called the food in the cauldron, and he thought it more delicious than
called the landowner's house.
called the roll, had supper, and settled down round the fires for
called the troops advancing under the command of Santa Ana, the Mexican
called to him from the hill not to go beyond the stream, but Rostov
called to his father's study as the latter wished to say good-by to
called up from the villages and armed, and wrote a letter to the
called, though defeated on that occasion, was a challenge to the South.
calling and there's nobody there; go and gather the clothes together."
calling on them as old acquaintances and benefactors of the monastery.
calling these sayings and doings "the Revolution"; then they give a
calling ulyulyu. The sounds of both packs mingled and broke apart
calling upon the natives to rise in patriotic wrath and drive out the
callosity forms and suppuration occurs under it, the pus escaping
calm and quiet comment on the advantage or disadvantage of Bennigsen's
calm and significant memories of the last few days rose one after
calm and silent when the talk related to any topic that had no
calm face of the old man and seeking any indication of his being a
came as he expected but not the result. Thousands of English textile
came at the right time. Tout vient a point a celui qui sait attendre.*
came in and saw an hussar of the line recounting his military exploits
came in swelling waves to occupy the fertile Dakota lands, now famous
came into the ballroom where candles were hurriedly lighted. The
came more carts and carriages, and the Rostovs were being shouted at
came on, chromatic scales and diminished sevenths were heard in the
came out onto the highroad at Krasnoe. And here as in a game of
came over him when, seeing these girls, he realized the existence of
came ready dressed into the ballroom to await her father, and
came rebukes from all sides addressed to the jesting soldier.
came riding from the village on a handsome sleek gray horse,
came right up to the road, six Cossacks were posted to report if any
came running out of the cathedral, and after them others in a more
came running, out to the porch carrying candles.
came several other trains of vehicles similar to the Rostovs', and
came smartly dressed cavalrymen on good horses, passing the
came the strange sound of a few voices shouting. Instantly as at a
came to Balashev and informed him of the Emperor Napoleon's wish to
came to Moscow the effect Natasha had on him made him hasten to
came to describe the horrors and sufferings he had witnessed he was
came to me to ask for a few carts for the wounded. After all, ours are
came to the conclusion that our failures were due to a want of unity
came to the support of the German cause. Even the English language
came up at a trot to Pierre and the Frenchman and surrounded them.
came up to Morio. Here the conversation seemed interesting and he
came up to the door of the shed. Rapidly and timidly raising his
came up to the fire, hoarsely uttering something in a language our
came when the cabins were raised in the clearings and rude churches and
came, the pretty, fair haired Frenchwoman, Mademoiselle Bourienne,
camp at Drissa, according to Pfuel's plan, but on changing the
camp kettles and stopping every evening when the weather is fine upon
camp, and emerging from the forest in pitch darkness they descended
camp--the so-called flank march across the Krasnaya Pakhra River. They
campaign can give you no idea. Half the regiments form bands and scour
campaign of 1860. If that calamity comes to pass, responded the governor
campaign of 1896, was deliberate about ratification of the treaty. The
campaign of 1896. Except for three new features--the railways, the
campaign of 1920. Though some Americans talked as if the United States
campaign or, for that matter, the maneuvers of a single great battle.
campaign that ended in Jena and Auerstadt, but he did not see the
campaign was lost, understood all the difficulties of the Russian
campaign went beyond a quarter of a million, but the increase was due to
campaign, suffragists turned to the voters of the individual states and
campaign, while Prince Andrew on the contrary, taking no part in the
campaign. We tried to unite them, with the evident intention of giving
campaigned on this grand sentiment only drew laughter from the Democrats
campaigns did the discussions on the platform and in the press sink to
camped gaily before Vilna, making acquaintance with the Polish
campfire gleamed red. Not all the Cossacks and hussars were asleep;
campfire, Pierre had got up and gone to the next one, which was
campfires. Pierre went up to the fire, ate some roast horseflesh,
camphor, painted over the area night and morning. Balsam of Peru or
camps: the masters' and the serfs'. He noticed this hesitation in
campstool below the knoll, with head bowed and elbows on his knees.
can be determined from the general condition of the patient. The initial
can either fall on the Russian army with double its strength and
can lawfully get out of the union and acts of violence against the
can more readily reach the surface. In from twenty-four to forty-eight
can never be other than uncertain and unfavourable; the danger from loss
can often be traced along these deeper lymphatics into the pelvis, and
can only be accounted for by an idiosyncrasy of the patient.
can only be recognised by the discharge from the meatus and by the
can only be taken prisoners if they surrender according to the rules
can we hope to define the unknown.
can yet heal completely only as the result of a vital force from
can yourself imagine the effect this news has had on me, and your
can't be done. And besides, if she tells Mamma" (Sonya looked upon the
can't permit the land to be pillaged and accustom the troops to
can't tell you. And the Tsarevich was very gracious to all our
can't understand. I was there all the time giving orders and had
can, with all the pleasures of life here. If we were in Vienna it
canal is not followed by relief of symptoms. In the leg and forearm, the
canal which would cement the union, raise the value of the public lands,
canals and railways of those days were built by the labor of Irishmen.
canceled by its successor. Uncertainty and distrust were the natural
cancellous spaces and medulla, the bone becomes denser and heavier, and
cancellous, and the ivory or compact. The _spongy_ or _cancellous
cancer appear, which, although apparently separate from the primary
cancer of the penis. It is especially in elderly patients with a tight
cancer only succeeds in animals of the same species; for example, a
cancer sometimes originates in the slightly pigmented moles met with on
cancer taken from a mouse will not grow in the tissues of a rat, but
cancer. Cancer of the stomach appears and attains a maximum frequency
cancer. They are usually solitary in the first instance, although
cancerous growth forming nodular cords. The permeation of cancer by way
cancrum oris. The odour must not be mistaken for that due to
candidate even more positively than four years before. The popular vote
candidate for President. The South and West had triumphed over the East.
candidate, still clung to the currency issue; but the main emphasis,
candidate; but this hope was not realized. The Republicans chose, and
candidates and platforms. The Socialist Labor party in 1892, for
candidates. After the retirement of Washington, both the Republicans and
candle, and before Dunyasha had left the room had already passed
candles were relit and he was told that he would see the full light;
canned and preserved for the wounded and the prisoners of war. Of their
cannon balls and bursting shells falling on the town. But these sounds
cannon shots, but a roll of volleys of musketry from the slopes of the
cannon that remained uninjured out of the four, they began moving down
cannon, sketched a plan of the position. He made some notes on two
cannon--still agitated as before by the thought of the Emperor and
cannon. Before the guns an artillery sentry was pacing up and down; he
cannonade (delivered by the French alone) was still to be heard from
cannonade began. Count Ostermann with his suite rode up behind the
cannot admit that words can be the immediate cause of the movements of
cannot attain the knowledge of which you speak."
cannot be allowed to go on so and that it is the duty of all decent
cannot be based on the predominance of moral strength, for, not to
cannot be executed is impossible, not only in the case of Napoleon's
cannot be too strongly emphasized, the South expected to see a weakened
cannot dislodge them for lack of troops, the men are running away
cannot endure permanently half slave and half free." At the same time he
cannot fight in this way, or we may soon bring the enemy to Moscow...
cannot leave the estate to Pierre. Pierre is illegitimate."
cannot nullify that act or withdraw from the union; it must abide by the
cannot take into account the loss of private individuals."
cannot transmit the disease by inheritance to their offspring, and that,
cannula is withdrawn, the puncture is closed by a Michel's clip, and a
cannula, an incision must be made, and, after the cavity has been
cannula. The amount injected varies with the size of the abscess and the
capable leadership once afforded by the planters, like Calhoun, Davis,
capable of being destroyed by the phagocytes, become encapsulated. In
capable of lying latent in the tissues for long periods, for example, in
capacity of walking is usually maintained even in the presence of great
capillaries of a subcutaneous naevus. The spaces come to communicate
capillaries; actual extravasation into the tissues is exceptional. The
capillary oozing. When the bleeding is more copious, it is usually due
capital and labor. The free land was gone; he declared that labor was in
capital in the Northern states as merchants of old never imagined. The
capital of $90,000,000, adopting the policy of issuing to the
capital to develop American resources. Thus they accelerated the
capital, Mexico City. The deed was done with speed and pomp and two
capital. Hitherto the installation of a President meant that an
capitalists, if only in a small way. The corporation made it possible
capitals, he still continued to live in the country, remarking that
capotes of Lannes' sharpshooters were already seen crossing the
capsule, there are signs of abscess or of diffuse suppuration in the
capsule. In the subcutaneous nodule the nerve is rarely recognisable,
captain, though it was the memory of a distant past. Then he recounted
captains of industry, on the one hand; and high wages for the workers,
captivity. In the same way little by little he came to understand
capture at Saratoga in October, 1777, and the encampment of American
capture by the sleepless British navy and its swarm of auxiliaries.
captured by the French, and hid in the forests without unsaddling,
captured from the French and standing in front of the Preobrazhensk
captured from the French beside which horses were tethered, that under
captured from the French by Wittgenstein, "the hero of Petropol" as he
captured him. If the Cossacks did not capture Napoleon then, what
captured, if that was what the Russians aimed at.
car works in Chicago spread to the railways. Disorders ensued. President
carbolic acid into the subcutaneous tissues every four hours during the
carbolic acid, the onset of the process is painless, and the patient
carbonate of zinc; and apposed skin surfaces, such as the nates or
carcinoma_, which is met with in those who are constantly exposed to the
cardboard and the queerly dressed men and women who moved, spoke,
cardiac side of the swelling, the pulsation is arrested and the tumour
cardiac side of the wound, and kept there until the opening is secured.
cards and the unhappy Maximilian, the victim of French ambition and
cards with his mother, pace silently up and down the room, and smoke
cards with the mother made careful inquiries as to Julie's dowry
cards, the general raising his voice at the card table, and the
care and tenderness, sitting beside her and talking of the simplest
care must be taken to avoid leakage of the contents of the cyst, as
care of British troops in accordance with the terms of the Quartering
care of each other's good and of the whole," wrote John Robinson, a
care that the laws be faithfully executed, and shall commission all the
careening into anarchy. "The facts of our peace and independence," wrote
career gave weight to his lightest words, inveighed against the whole
carefree girlish life that had been so full of hope. The previous
careful with his fifty-year-old Moscow cousins, and in the midst of
carefully and patiently to disentangle them. The countess, with her
carefully coiled it up and immediately set to work on the other leg,
carefully considered by the President and Senate when he was appointed.
carefully, surprised at its thinness, and in the morning noticed her
cares of army and state and, as far as the passions that seethed
cares to know the latitude in which his ship is sailing, but on the
caressing women and children. There were many such men both in the
caries of the articular surfaces, which may terminate in ankylosis.
caries; in ossifying tumours, the arrangement of the new bone on the
carotid and third part of the right subclavian (Wardrop's operation), of
carotid_ are seldom the primary seat of aneurysm, although they are
carpal bones, the epiphyses of the long bones, the sternum, and the
carpenters, bricklayers, painters, and the members of other mechanical
carpets from the Polish proprietors. Rostov remembered Sventsyani,
carpi radialis, and the palmaris longus muscles. On incising the sheath
carriage, and the count himself, his coachman, and his dragoons looked
carriage, and the solitude of the road, all had a gladdening effect on
carriage, ran in dismay up the steps of the back porch.
carriage. At the foot of the hill, a pale hussar cadet, supporting one
carriages were standing outside the Sloboda Palace.
carriages, wagons, and crowds of orderlies and sentinels. The
carried away, and the four guns were turned against the ten-gun
carried by a vote of two to one and the young orator from the West,
carried forward with unnatural speed but yet stayed on the same
carried him in the same direction. On the tenth of June,* coming up
carried him. For thousands, on the contrary, bondage proved to be a real
carried home to the king and ruling class stories of an astounding
carried into execution," he said, Congress must be allowed the
carried into great detail the Sherman law of 1890 forbidding and
carried on also influence the wounds. Those sustained in the open,
carried on stretchers from the battery. Pierre again went up onto
carried on with greater heat than ever in the highest circles, between
carried out as in other abscesses. When the drain lies in proximity to a
carried out in a way that impugned the motives of a Republican
carried out, and then but partially. For the most part things happened
carried over narrow wagon trails that were almost impassable in the
carried the sovereign at reviews in Russia bore him also here on the
carried to the joint in the blood-stream, and they lodge either in the
carry him to the dressing station."
carry it to Europe. The seas were now open. The area devoted to cotton
carry on its propaganda; but most of the cooperative enterprises failed,
carry out Napoleon's wish, but one of them was slapped in the face
carry the complicated communist legislation into perfect and wholesome
carry the day. Slight gains were made even during the Revolution or
carry to the Russian works, and those 102 guns shot into the air until
carrying away the property that had been stolen by the Emperor, kings,
carrying goods was cut by the Erie Canal from $32 a ton per hundred
carrying munitions of war to complete their voyage to the Continent, on
carrying out of which supplied an occupation and consolation to the
carrying the country for the Democrats. With a fine flourish, he
carrying the standards to advance and surround the commander in
carrying trade to American, that is Northern, ships. The importation of
cars and enjoying at the hotels all the comforts of a standardized
cart, and all the loads were being uncorded and the luggage taken
cartilage and synovial membrane, the proliferation of tissue leads to
cartilage from which it continues to grow until the skeleton attains
cartilage is denser than normal, and under the influence of the
cartilage may be secondary to disease of the synovial membrane or of the
cartilage should be removed with the spoon or gouge, and the bone
cartilage with the shaft is a zone of young, vascular, spongy bone known
cartilage, or by a button felt through a layer of cloth. The evidence
cartilage, provided the new tissue is so situated as to constitute part
cartilage--_the epiphysial cartilage_; and at the junction of this
cartilaginous surfaces is preceded by the spreading of a vascular
carts. The wounded dragged themselves out of their rooms and stood
carved back of a velvet chair he had turned round for the purpose, and
case giving rise to disease of the joint (Fig. 156).
case had to be ordered to keep the "will" in.
case is this: you ought to have thought the matter over and taken
case made an exception to the rule of not receiving bachelors in his
case of a rubber tube, by cutting off a portion of its outer end. On the
case of contempt of court. This measure was hailed by Mr. Gompers as the
case of disagreement between them, with respect to the time of
case of lympho-sarcoma above the clavicle, in which excision of all that
case of runaway slaves, and equal privileges for slavery in the new
case of subclavian aneurysm, as a means of arresting the blood-flow
case of the femur and humerus, extension with weight and pulley along
case of the knee and ankle the patient tires on walking and drags the
case of the other fingers--and there give rise to a diffuse cellulitis
case of the thumb and little finger, and after invading the palm in the
case of tumours within the vertebral canal, which press on the spinal
case the dragoons could successfully make a flank counterattack. If
case the patient himself was in the habit of letting out the fluid from
case they occur in the liver. The secondary growths closely resemble the
case when he came in to dinner straight from the farm--especially
case, the longer bone becomes curved. An _obliquity_ of the bone may
case--are enclosed in a capsule derived from the perineurium. The
caseated glands in the neck, for example, it is obvious that the removal
caseation, is usually sufficient evidence of the tuberculous nature of
caseous foci in the marrow of the adjacent bone show as clear areas with
caseous infiltration in the marrow, and this may be attended with the
caseous mass. This caseous material is surrounded by the thickened
cases arising in the land or naval forces, or in the militia, when in
cases certain of them remain stiff and pass into the crippled condition
cases dies during the early months of intra-uterine life, so that
cases it is only possible when suppuration has occurred and the fungus
cases it may be possible to suture the opening in the vessel wall. When
cases occur in which the point of entrance of the bacteria is not
cases of tertiary syphilis in which the nose is destroyed, it will be
cases one of the bones became the seat of sarcoma.
cases one of the skin tumours may attain an enormous size and cause a
cases paralysis of the muscle is easily detected. In cases of long
cases that by the end of the century, one-fourth of the colored laborers
cases the actual gangrene is determined by thrombosis of the popliteal
cases the infection is by indirect contact, the virus being conveyed
cases the infection transgresses the wall of the bursa and gives rise to
cases the main object is to guard against infection; the skin is
cases the patient may succumb before there are obvious signs of the
cases the process of repair may be attended with the formation of bone
cases where, owing to widespread arterial disease, the collateral
cases, one of the main _lymph vessels_ on the dorsum of the penis is
cases," said the butler's assistant.
cases. The overlying skin becomes adherent and red, and suppuration
cast for McKinley was larger and that cast for Bryan smaller than in the
cast their lot as a rule with one or the other of the leading parties.
cast upon it through the clear morning air penetrating streaks of
casualties of trade" for a livelihood. This was a result, as the great
cataclysm of 1861 sank irresistibly into the background.
catarrh associated with diarrhoea is not uncommon; and ulceration of the
catarrh or adenoids. The contraction may take the form of a vertical
catch the open casement. The cold wind flapped the ends of her
catching," "man hunting" by federal officers on the streets of
catgut or silk, or, more frequently perhaps, from the growth of
catgut, just as it is bought from the dealers, be loosely rolled on a
cattle and horses. The rain was descending in torrents, and Rostov,
cattle, the women at home, two brothers away earning wages, and only
caucus. The Federalist members of Congress held a conference and
caucuses of party members in the state legislatures. In connection with
caught and assimilated all the diverse impressions of life? How did
caught fast. During the night several men from Providence boarded the
caught the words, "the old comedian."
cauliflower-like masses on the inner surface of the prepuce or of the
causative organism and of the tissue attacked, the situation of the part
cause escaped their attention; no year passed without widening the range
cause of Massachusetts became the cause of all the colonies. Opposition
cause of drummer's palsy. The only chance of restoring function is in
cause of humanity." He exclaimed that the contest was between the idle
cause of the accusation; to be confronted with the witnesses against
cause of the excitement shown in some of these faces lay chiefly in
cause pressure on the brain and give rise to intense pain in the head,
cause suffered many vicissitudes. Women were enfranchised by the
cause the child to cry out. Tenderness on pressure over the bone is the
cause, he snatches at the first approximation to a cause that seems to
cause, should seek the laws common to all the inseparably
cause, the ruin was widespread. Bank after bank went under; boom towns
cause. Those who were skillful with the pen assailed the patriots in
caused Lord North to pace the floor and cry out: "It is all over! It is
caused by England's intrigues (as in fact he said on the island of St.
caused by an ill-fitting shoe or the contact of a hot-bottle. In some
caused him to go to Mozhaysk on the twenty-fifth and to make his way
caused serious damage to the intestine.
caused the destruction of Moscow, and said: "How was it you promised
caused the floods to abate.
caused the people in so strange a manner, contrary to the Tsar's wish,
causes a portion of fascia to undergo necrosis and so reaches the
causes motor symptoms--jerkings followed by paralysis. The sarcoma tends
causes of whose action are beyond our ken, we get the conception of
causes pain, and the part is sensitive to touch. The skin is hot and
causes pain, congestion, and oedema of the limb. Rupture may take place
causes--to occasion the event. To us, the wish or objection of this or
causes; in the aged it is less liable to change, so that a rise to 103 o
causing the covering epithelium in places to die and leave small
causing the inflammation. Thus it may be _serous_, as in some forms of
causing tingling down the nerve, and sometimes numbness in the foot.
caustic potash till all the indurated area is softened. Graf has had
caustics or by the actual cautery. If this is inadvisable, the organisms
cauterised at once by means of the actual or Paquelin cautery, or by a
cautery, acid nitrate of mercury, or pure carbolic acid. The ulcers
cautery, and sponged over with pure carbolic acid. The cavity is packed
cautery--act in the same way; and the method of treating erysipelas by
caution to Germany that the government of the United States would not
cautiously and glanced into the room, Sonya standing beside her at the
cautiously from one foot to the other she ran like a kitten the few
cautiously on all these points. The Republicans, conscious of the fact
cavalier of St. George, the hussar remount officer, the good-natured
cavalry to pass. The Uhlans started, the streamers on their spears
cavalry uniform as to a review, expecting to crush the French
cavalryman, a horse fancier, a sportsman, the possessor of some
cavalrymen leading their horses to water across the road along which
cavalrymen were espied they were taken for Frenchmen, the coachman ran
cavities in the interior of the tumour. The colour depends on the amount
cavity in the bone, filled with clear serum, and lined by a fibrous
cavity of the cyst usually contains a pultaceous mixture of shed
cavity should be packed with bismuth or iodoform gauze. The healing of
cavity with iodoform worsted and treating it by the open method and
cavity, and the bone has died in patches, several sequestra may be
cavity, such as the abdomen, thorax, or skull, materially adds to the
cavity--for example, after rupture of the liver or spleen--is attended
cease to reign on the throne of my ancestors, then after exhausting
ceases and gives place to a complete loss of sensation. The dead part
ceases. If the wound heals so that the chyle is prevented from escaping,
ceasing to be wage-earners but by improving the conditions under which
ceded the Floridas to the United States and defined the boundary between
ceded to King George the colony of Florida. Not without warrant did
ceiling, out into the open under the sky once more.
celebrated his promotion to the rank of major, and Rostov, who had
celebrated miniaturist, and he leaned over the table to take the
celebrating awards they had received for the campaign, and made
celebrating the victory, everything was bubbling with life in the
celerity of their reply was aided by the pressure of European bankers,
cells into cartilage cells to take place, the characteristic hyaline
cells may exhibit amoeboid movement. In stained films the nuclei take the
cells may merely accumulate so as to fill the lumen and form indurated
cells of the tubules of the kidneys; (3) minute thrombi and
cells take on the characters of cartilage cells, and, forming a matrix,
cells; they grow from the marrow of the spongy ends or from the
cellular elements. They grow chiefly from the deeper layer of the
cellular layer; the cells, which are called osteoblasts, are continuous
cellular tissue and the limb beyond are oedematous and pit on pressure.
cellular tissue, and the bacteria they contain give rise to secondary
cellular tissue, it has spread from the neck or chest wall; if in the
cellular tissue. The final disorganisation of the joint is indicated by
cellulitis. In moderately acute cases the tendon and its sheath become
censuring his father for the first time in his life), "I did not
census. Between 1870 and 1900 the proportion of women in the professions
center at Germantown for the distribution of German immigrants. In old
center of the Moscow opposition to the government.
center of the circle, ran back to their places as the companies passed
center or on the right, and the engagement would have taken place on
center to the other side of the dip in the ground at the rear was
center, the reserves, and Bagration's right flank had not yet moved,
centered in the homestead even if they were occasionally interrupted by
centers the demand for American agricultural produce. It accomplished
central axis of the bone in the region of the ossifying junction,
central bundle--the axis cylinder--which is surrounded by an envelope,
central incisors, which are dwarfed and stand somewhat apart in the gum,
central nervous system. These are all due to the absorption of toxins
centre of the indurated area, the blisters burst, and a dark brown or
centre of the popliteal space in necrosis of the femoral trigone--it is
centre, around which tens of thousands fell, and which the French
centre, the skin becomes adherent, thin, and red, and finally gives way.
century "the irrepressible conflict." The planting states had neither
century and redoubled their efforts to augment the influence of the
century both became royal provinces governed by the king.
century had been the aggrandizement of Russia, that aim might have
century their religious worship was put under the ban and the export of
century) with his gentle daughter and the pretty Frenchwoman who
century, the commerce of the American colonies spread in every direction
century. In the conquest of business by trusts and "the resulting
cerebritis, when the neck or head is the seat of the burn. Intestinal
ceremonies, and prized the strict performance of these forms without
ceremoniously informed Bolkonski that the Emperor desired to give
ceremony just completed. He lay with his head propped high on the
certain analogies to Raynaud's disease in that spasm of the vessels
certain changes which result in narrowing of the lumen and loss of
certain defeat of the French!"
certain features peculiar to the invading bacteria, and (2) others
certain great western railways, was dissolved by order of the Supreme
certain joints are liable to attacks of inflammation associated with the
certain means of excising one of the suspected glands and submitting it
certain means of preventing haemorrhage--say in an amputation--is by the
certain of the clinical and pathological features.
certain of the lower animals, such as sheep, oxen, horses, deer, and
certain officers) could not be held without the governor's consent. A
certain or at least probable, Rostopchin instead of exciting the
certain other cells play an important part in virtue of the power they
certain proteolytic enzymes or ferments. The toxins cause
certain ulcers have special seats of election--for example, the varicose
certain viscera, notably the liver, spleen, kidneys, and intestines. The
certain women, and to the official side of the service. These
certain, though she hardly heard his voice through the closed doors.
certainly could not carry the weapon in his hand through the
certainly improve, but on the other hand felt anxious as to the effect
certainly not have caused him to expect that honor. The prince, who
certainly rather bigger than the other men in the room, her anxiety
certainly, I have a presentiment that for the first time I shall
certainly, of popular government." There was the undoubted source of
certificates based on the silver accumulated in the Treasury. Still
certificates representing the share to which each participant was
cervical glands, and those within the cavity of the chest--particularly
cessation of that movement when a rational and sacred aim for the
cession of Porto Rico, Guam, and the Philippines to the United States;
cession of the coveted territory. When the Texans took matters into
cessions of territory and Serbia was transformed into the great state of
chain the beginning of which is hidden in heaven," said Pierre.
chair for Natasha and was about to sit down beside her, but the count,
chair, a wax taper in his left hand, was leaning his left arm on the
chairman and president of the council of war. Weyrother evidently felt
chairs to see the people's President." If Jefferson's inauguration was,
chalk as he marked the figures in his clear, bold hand.
challenge the skill of the government. Moreover, there was raging in
challenge to the Emperor. He knew how Alexander desired to be a
challenged the whole country in 1860.
challenged to defend them by acts of willful injustice on the part of
challenging American sea power then and there, the presence of British
chamber of the eye.
champing his bit. At last all were seated, the carriage steps were
champion of the individual against the interference of the government,
championship of the doctor's wife in her queer trap might expose him
chance and was independent of the commander's will, owing to the
chance," and I thought to myself, "Am I telling the truth?" And
chancre at the edge of the nail may be mistaken for a whitlow,
chancres_--that is, those which are hidden by a tight prepuce. The
change in the relative strength, and an advance had become inevitable.
change in the structure of the growth, and has been observed especially
change into lovers--once gave her his view of the matter at a small
change seen with the X-rays.
change that had come over her since the ball. She was silent, and
change that had taken place in herself. From the moment she recognized
change the subject--they talked of the governor's kind wife, of
change the whole aspect of affairs and convert a dry form of gangrene
change, and, like the haemangioma, they sometimes undergo spontaneous
change, or may slowly increase in size, the skin over it becoming
changed and inspired expression at the spot where Anisya Fedorovna had
changed at intervals until healing takes place from the bottom; it may
changed his sergeant major and was unable to manage all the drunken
changed!... Where are the candles?... Tea!..."
changed; there was no longer the former poetic and mystic charm of
changes in agriculture came an industrial and commercial revolution. The
changes in the blood pigment. In from twenty-four to forty-eight hours
changes in the bone are shown by the X-rays. The first change is due to
changes in the other, quite a new reflection of the society in which
changes involving the articular surfaces. It is frequently combined with
changes its characters; the only reasons for its removal by operation
changes occur in the cells of the brain, the adrenals, and the liver,
changes such as blisters, superficial ulcers, and clubbing of the tips
changes which characterise a bruise. The sub-conjunctival ecchymosis,
changes, however, it restricted the convention to "the sole and express
changes--possibly the result of irritation by abnormal constituents in
changing into an old man's simplehearted talk; but the hearty
channel was removed and the water could flow to waste. Pierre felt,
channels, or the duct may be double throughout its course. There is a
channels: support of the policy and opposition to it. The trend in
character and mind of the man in question, the more subject to
character of gossip about the higher government circles.
character of the alluvial soil invited the exercise of more imagination.
character of the settlers themselves. Traces of the fierce, unsociable,
character of the synovial fluid, which protects organisms from
character of the wound in the vessel and may be modified by accidental
character, but more so recently, since in the new reigns of Paul and
character, but the muscles are relaxed between the fits. If the dose is
character--although nothing is known as to the cause of the variation.
character. Abnormal visual sensations, in the form of flashes of light
character. To cut away some of the evils of poverty and enable widows to
character; apart from the outgrowths of bone or "tumours" there is
characterised by effusion and by the extension of the synovial membrane
characterised by the insidious development of a swelling which involves
characterised by the occurrence of vesicles or blisters which are
characteristic "leg of mutton" shape (Fig. 146). The surface may be
characteristic cauliflower growth at the orifice of the sinus, and by
characteristic changes in the blood.
characteristic generosity, in the midst of the war had issued a general
characteristic greenish-grey or yellow granules are seen in the pus, and
characteristic induration, and may themselves break down and lead to the
characteristic of lupus than the appearance of fresh nodules in parts
characteristic symptoms may appear within three or four days of the
characteristic. The height is diminished, and, owing to the curving of
characteristic. When there is hyperostosis and sclerosis, the shaft
characteristically gleeful sarcasm he would remark, "There, I said the
characteristics of an absolute and unqualified despotism." The economic
characteristics predominate, the clinical varieties of bacillary
characterized pioneer days declined. At the same time a part of the
characterized the tariff message as a free-trade assault upon the
characters from those sustained on land. Many other factors, such as the
characters of squamous epithelium, and, being confined within the lymph
characters of the acute variety and speedily prove fatal.
characters of the other two varieties; that is, it is a subcutaneous
characters of the rulers of France, who submit to him; chance forms
characters of this exudate vary in different parts of the body, and
characters, Pierre was considered to be the most suspicious of all.
charge and possibly fragments of bone, will penetrate the pleura, and be
charge for the eBooks, unless you receive specific permission.  If you
charge for the eBooks, unless you receive specific permission.  If you
charged to consumers. With the passing years, the railways, mills,
charged with the duty of inquiring into wasteful and obsolete methods
charities and charitable donations in all 50 states of the United
charities and charitable donations in all 50 states of the United
charm of his talk lay in the fact that the commonest events--sometimes
charm, the mildness of his features, was all the greater. Rostov was
charmante, aussi spirituelle que belle."*[2] The distinguished
charming Frenchmen whom the Russians, and especially the Russian
charming girls. Every young man who came to the house--seeing those
charming, innocent child of seventeen, daughter of the bewitching
charring of parts--are most evident at the points of entrance and exit
charter expired in 1836, banking was once more committed to the control
charter. He held that the Constitution "should be treated as the
chartered in 1621, that the Dutch planted the settlements of the New
charters. He gave money for the erection of temples and supplemented
cheap labor was bound to come when the way was made easy. Some, among
check the growth and spread of the organisms, or to inhibit their toxin
check the inevitable movement, and gave the order to do what he
cheek is affected, the lower eyelid may be drawn down and everted; when
cheeks, bent low over the face of his hearer, as was his habit, and
cheered by the expression of regretful sympathy on his face.
cheerful as befits a good soldier and not to think of the general
cheerful intoxication. He felt as though he were the center of some
chemical affinity. In the naevus the practical result of this reaction is
chemical irritants, such as strong antiseptics. The best clinical
chemical irritation; it must be brought into accurate contact with the
cherish his sentiment for him the more, and unconsciously to
cherished the spirit of personal independence and who had made actual
chest reminded him of the possibility of suffering and death for
chest showing under his open shirt, he stood in a majestic pose in the
chest wall, the abscess should be opened below the clavicle by Hilton's
chevalier of St. George, Shinshin told them the town news, of the
chickens, where he engaged in looting till the French took him
chief cause of Russia's triumph in so far as it was produced by the
chief feature is drop-foot. There is also loss of sensation below the
chief is always in the midst of a series of shifting events and so
chief made a sign that the men should continue to march at ease, and
chief of Tutuila, one of the Samoan Islands, far below the equator, in
chief of staff of the commander of the left flank of the infantry of
chief of the French Republic, soon to be turned into an empire.
chief reason for the war was the necessity of giving them
chief reason was a sudden, vivid sense of the terrible contrast
chief screw which held his life together were stripped, so that the
chief source of our error in this matter is due to the fact that in
chief's and with the exception of Prince Bagration, who declined to
chief, promising to continue "absolutely unbroken" the policies he had
chiefly Karp who did the talking, Dron not showing himself in the
chiefly after extensive operation for the removal of malignant glands in
chiefly in the breast and ovary, and the tumour resembles the cystic
chiefly in the groin, spermatic cord, and scrotum of persons who have
chiefly in the knee and elbow of healthy males under the age of thirty.
chiefly in the lungs, metastasis taking place by way of the veins.
chiefly in the polynuclear neutrophile leucocytes. Immediately before
chiefly in the tendons at the ankle and in the long tendon of the
chiefly the muscles of deglutition and respiration. One of the earliest
child being lifted by the arms; the femur, by a fall. From the extreme
child he made sport of the momentous, and unavoidable event--the
child knocks itself and runs at once to the arms of its mother or
child should be kept off its feet, and the limbs bathed and massaged. In
child survive, the degree of crippling may be pitiable in the extreme;
child while sitting or being carried--for example, the arm bones become
child's chair with its legs in the air, sat a peasant woman uttering
child, a madman, or a simpleton--then, knowing the causes of the act
child, her own--such as she had seen the day before in the arms of her
child, who, playing with the parts of a skillfully made watch, dares
childhood, were of the same age and both handsome fellows, though
childhood--the entire limb, including the foot, being shorter and
childish voice, and he began scraping his dirty feet on the threshold.
childlike pleasure in this purchase of presents for everyone in the
children (Fig. 64). The female members of a haemophilic stock are often
children and anaemic girls. In the mild form there is a sensation of
children and permitting them to divorce their husbands on the grounds of
children are similar to those observed in the adult, with a tendency,
children are the bane of my life. It is the cross I have to bear. That
children of five or six and upwards, the prospect of natural
children would appear to justify the conclusion that the disease is
children's voices and laughter from the next room. Evidently some
children, and with one another. Again the footmen rushed about, chairs
children, but is rare after the skeleton has attained maturity. Boys are
children, from other causes. The _bosses_ result from the heaping up of
children, it would turn to the production of goods persons otherwise
children, your sin might be forgiven. But the question is again a
children; and for married women the right to own property, to keep
chilliness down the back and in the limbs, which may be so marked that
chimed in Zherkov, looking uneasily around. He had not seen the
chimera of the brain," urged one of them, "that the possession of land
chimney-sweeps. The most recent member of this group is the _X-ray
chin, and never extends on to the front of the neck. There is great
china standing on the tables, and still more was being brought in from
chisel, and the exostosis removed.
chiselled away. Opinions differ as to the benefit derived from washing
chivalry, of flags of truce, of mercy to the unfortunate and so on.
chloroform lowers the blood pressure more than ether does, and that with
choice morsels. The group about Mortemart immediately began discussing
choice of the President, the person having the greatest number of votes
choice of the king and the continent hath accepted the challenge.... The
choice. Nevada took the lead in 1899. Shortly afterward Oregon, by the
chondromas growing from the surface of the bone, especially if they are
choose Countess Potocka who, he thought, had gone out onto the
chose for its title the term "Democrat," throwing down the gauntlet to
chose the latter and yielded to the power he felt irresistibly
chosen chief of the Petersburg militia, presiding over the
chosen every second year by the people of the several States, and the
chosen minister to Spain in 1779; John Adams was sent to Holland the
chosen usually by the legislature; but in two instances, New York and
chronic disease of the arteries leading to diminution of their calibre.
chronic jaundice; the patches are often symmetrical, and as they
chronic nodules, in which it may be impossible to demonstrate the
chronic pyaemia. The actinomyces is more complex in structure than other
chronological and the topical methods. It is therefore suggested that
church could be seen through the mist, and here and there the roofs of
church spire, and the corners of the white house in the distance,
churches that had not been burned. The Kremlin, which was not
cicatricial contraction leading to deformity of the face.
cicatricial contraction of the scar subsequently leading to the
cicatricial contraction, which may cause unsightly deformity. When the
cicatricial contraction--for example, in a sinus over the lower jaw
cicatricial tissue, and the growth of epithelium on the surface, go on
cicatrisation and cure. Sometimes the cystic tumour becomes infected and
cicatrix. The swelling is reduced by steady pressure, and increases in
circle of the Napoleonic alliance, the circle of Count Rumyantsev
circle the war in general was regarded as a series of formal
circle, we hear that they have pierced into the opposite region of polar
circled in the air, cawing and noisily flapping their wings.
circles and had no understanding at all of the people he supposed
circles forever by not asking to remain attached to the sovereign's
circles, applied nearly as well to the original thirteen American
circuit when the anode is used as the testing electrode. The loss of
circuit whereby the current is opened and closed automatically at
circular in section and the anterior and mesial edges are blunted, and
circulate with equal facility. Obviously, if the gold in a gold dollar
circulated. In the French circle of Helene and Rumyantsev the
circulating and reaching every tissue and organ of the body, the
circulating blood as possible in the trunk and head. If the shock is
circulating in the lymph, but also living elements, such as cancer cells
circulating through the body, and the diminished haemoglobin content of
circulation by establishing an anastomosis between the main artery of a
circulation consisted of English, French, and Spanish coins, and the
circulation does not develop and gangrene of the limb supervenes.
circulation has been restored, the lower end of the tube is detached and
circulation maintaining the flow through the aneurysm. Matas' operation
circulation through the fingers becomes exceedingly sluggish, and the
circulation through the vessel be re-established.
circulation wielded an enormous influence in the ranks of the workers.
circulation. In the case of a syphilitic father, it is commonly believed
circulation. It has been more successful in the face and upper limb than
circulation. The skin is disinfected and the limb wrapped in cotton wool
circumcision. The blood oozes slowly from the capillaries; at first it
circumscribed or becomes diffuse depends upon the density or laxity of
circumscribed the struggle between the bacteria and the phagocytes takes
circumstances favored their aspirations. The Republicans, leaving the
circumstances had changed. Calhoun dismissed the vexed question of
circumstances prevent these measures being taken, the bleeding may be
circumstances, the manufacturers were clothed with the power of imposing
circumstances. The Empress Marya, concerned for the welfare of the
circumstances. The bitterness of his followers was extreme. On July 8, a
circumvented it in the age of Jacksonian Democracy. The states had
cirrhosis_, in which the granulation tissue is diffused throughout the
cities had adopted in imitation of the federal government, was
cities was the overcrowding in houses unfit for habitation. An inquiry
cities, including San Francisco and Seattle. In New York the subways are
cities, the elimination of undeserved poverty, the removal of gross
cities. In the beginning the right to construct such undertakings was
cities." It was near the end of the eighteenth century before he
cities; the coalition of European monarchs against France was denounced
citizen to bring a suit against "the sovereign state" of Georgia. The
citizen. Burning with resentment, the captain of the _President_, an
citizens of North Carolina, goaded by the conduct of the royal governor,
citizens of foreign countries operating in the empire. To these
citizens. Subjected to pressure on both sides, the federal government
citizens. The one important condition attached was that the settler
city and town throughout the North. Topsy, Little Eva, Uncle Tom, the
city as the boats plying on the Great Lakes carried travelers, settlers,
city commissioners, instead of attempting to supervise the details of
city government!" was the new cry in municipal reform. So, many city
city property.... He had his rating in the commercial reviews and could
city resulted in fires and looting and the destruction of both the
civil and military powers to bring "the traitors to justice"; and it
civil and military, in supervising elections in all parts of the Union.
civil conflict was in preparation, the commander in chief of which was
civil officers they enforced a strict observance of the Puritan
civil servants of the government who had enjoyed long and secure tenure
civil service commissions and the merit system well intrenched in more
civilians blocked the bridge, had ordered two guns to be unlimbered
civilization and undertook to lay down for all countries the principles
civilization, and as the connection of the people with the rulers
civilization. The "wild west" was gone, and with it that frontier of
civilized life. The hunters and rangers passed on to new scenes; the
claimed as their own the soil on which they first planted their feet.
claimed by residents of the Coast that in spite of federal authority
claimed the credit, declaring that only his courage and good luck made
claimed the election and the passions ran so high that sober men did not
claiming the honor of this visit.
claims. Had it not been for the gold fever of 1849 that drew the
clammy sweat, and beads of perspiration stand out on the forehead. The
claret in it. He also brought a bottle of kvass, taken from the
class and kept the tenants and laborers subject to their economic and
class sent out to the provinces. Its bishops and archbishops in England
class with any leisure to devote to matters of the spirit. They preached
classes as a warning against admitting the same classes to a share in
classes--the innocent and the malignant. The outstanding difference
classification of burns is that of Dupuytren, which is based upon the
classification of naevi is into the cutaneous, the subcutaneous, and the
classified on an anatomical basis, taking in order first the
clatter or noise, constitute the most essential part of the machine.
claudication_. During these attacks the large arteries--femoral,
clauses in the ninth Section of the first article; and that no State,
clavichord was. "It's no use your going to the commander in chief.
clavichord. One adjutant, nearest the door, was sitting at the table
clavicle upwards. This renders compression of the third part of the
clavicle, to those in the axilla, and to those of the opposite side
clavicle; the axillary and brachial by pressing against the shaft of the
clavicular fibres of the pectoral and the serratus, take its place and
claw shape. Sensibility is usually altered over the medial side of the
clean and polished to the utmost, and every horse groomed till its
clean-shaven cheek to kiss. The whole expression of his face told
clean-shaven face, the same firm pressure of the hand and the same
cleaned pairs with spurs had just been placed by the wall. The
cleanliness and dryness. After washing and drying the affected patches,
cleanliness. They present the appearance of well-defined circular or
clear and dignified language the grievances of the colonists. It
clear areas are probably cysts. The condition extends right up to the
clear outline of the bone in the vicinity of the ossification in
clear to the end. The suffering induced by the cramp-like spasms of the
clear, the convention cast aside the Articles as if they did not exist
cleared out from both aspects of the bone. In the vertebrae, operative
cleared up by demonstration of the bacillus.
clearing away the clots, to attempt to suture the rent in the artery,
clearing out the clots, and ligating the artery above and below the sac.
clearly defined in his mind as the category of those he termed
clearly that the gory trace of that recollection would not pass with
clearly the figure of a red-haired gunner with his shako knocked awry,
clearly worded the day before, namely, that the commander in chief
clearness of our understanding of the definite position occupied by
cleavage of the trunk axis of the embryo, and is found exclusively in
clemency is always ready to descend upon the vanquished. I must be
clenching his small hand and striking the table with it, "and what
clergy and the nobility to their ancient rights. His policy encountered
clergy resumed the services in many churches that had not been burned.
clergy, would go to the Three Hills; others whispered that Augustin
clergymen and wealthy merchants. With passion the loyalists fought
clerk and Kozlovski were squatting on the floor by a tub so near to
clever comments prepared in their little mental workshop--but the
clever with Vera," said the count. "Well, what of that? She's turned
cleverest, and best man in the world, and were free, I would this
climate all the way around the coast from Virginia to Texas and the
climate that is not witness to their toils. Neither the perseverance of
climax came with the advent of Jacksonian democracy. In 1824, Vermont,
climax the Supreme Court of the United States, the following year (1895)
clinical course of the affection may be profoundly influenced by
clinical features and treatment of the various forms of papilloma are
clinical signs of fixation of the joint from involuntary muscular
clinically and in skiagrams, and which tend to restrict the normal range
clinically in a recent wound which has been packed with gauze. When the
clinically known as _white swelling_. New connective tissue forms in the
clinically or after the specimen has been laid open.
clinically resembles the lipoma. Myxomatous tissue is, however,
clinking of spurs were heard at the door, and the young count,
clip; in infected wounds the tube must remain as long as the discharge
clipping and filing away the metal. Foreign commerce was unsettled. The
cloak Pierre opened his eyes and saw the same penthouse roofs,
cloak, he asked whether they wanted the count or the princesses,
cloak, with a tall peaked cap on his head. He was the buffoon, who
close after an operation which admits of the cavity being obliterated.
close and prolonged part in the defense of his country, but did so
close as that between a postage stamp and the paper to which it is
close at hand. On seeing the hussars, the foremost began to turn,
close correspondence. The periosteum of the diaphysis is easily
close of the war, its proposals vanished harmlessly; but the men who
close quarters and was the first to seize the surrendering French
close supervision until the correct degree of tightness of the band has
close to Pierre. The driver in his bast shoes ran panting up to it,
close to her, of his breath and the smell of him, and could think only
close to the battalion commander's horse. The horse first,
close to the door and as soon as it opened his rough old arms closed
close to the doorpost with bowed head.
close to the fox which began to dodge between the field in sharper and
close union of the bones which prevents movement. Fibrous ankylosis may
close, was gazing with astonishment at the angry face of the
close-cropped hair, spectacles, the light-colored breeches fashionable
closed and the epoch of responsible citizenship opened.
closed as Prince Andrew entered, marking the place with a knife.
closed her eyes, but opened them again on hearing the bedstead
closed the circle of American troubles by issuing his Milan Decree of
closed the doors, they all sat down and remained for some moments
closed the long controversy over the disposition of the public domain
closed their eyes. At the same instant they heard a report and
closed, "is void and the courts as well as other departments are bound
closed, however, before the English colonists themselves began to be
closed, placed the tariff, not the money question, in the forefront.
closed, the curtain was slowly drawn, and from behind it a soft
closed, was barred. Hamilton Fish, his Secretary of State, renewed the
closely allied to rickets, in which the bones of adults become soft and
closely connected with the submaxillary salivary gland. They receive
closely considered things possible which the commanders of the big
closely over the blonde lady and paying her mythological compliments
closing completely, either from mechanical causes or from the persistent
closing up more firmly at the danger, continued, while steadily
closure of the original abscess is removed, it is necessary that this
clot may ultimately take place and lead to consolidation of the
clot results in the healing of the wound in the vessel wall.
clot which is deposited in concentric layers on the inner aspect of the
clot--_consolidated aneurysm_--these signs disappear, and the clinical
cloth at the same time, and said:
cloth covering, and the harp gave out a jarring sound.
cloth stretched over boards. In the center of the stage sat some girls
clothes and a round hat, he wandered about the town, staring at the
clothes covering the part being uninjured. This may also occur about the
clothing and, it may be, articles from the man's pocket, with them.
clothing that may have come in contact with the wound, or from his own
clothing. Pierre took no notice of them. He hurried to find the family
cloths over the chest. The head at the same time should be lowered to
clots extend as far as the nearest collateral branch, but in the larger
clots must be removed and the drug applied directly to the bleeding
clots, and ligating any branches which open into the sac. If it can be
cloud of death that overhung them, they dared not look life in the
cloud of smoke. The Frenchman turned pale and rushed to the door.
clouded with smoke, through which, high up, the sickle of the new moon
clouds away," or, "The wind has brought up the clouds." And in the
clouds, the wind fell, as if it dared not spoil the beauty of the
clown--Dimmler--and the lady--Nicholas--started a dance. Surrounded by
club." Poverty and misery were observed in the cities. State
clue in a number of cases, such as irregularity of the pupils or failure
clumsily creeping toward the door, that dreadful something on the
clumsy and the door, pushed from behind by that terror, opened and
clumsy boots and perspiring necks, and their shirts opening from the
clutched at his head. "Who is going to get me the flowers? Dmitri! Eh,
clutching the handle of a lance that had been aimed at him.
co-existence of indolent swellings, ulcers, and depressed scars in the
co-operate with him for the public welfare! Lay your respect and
co-operative lines, holding down the speculator and profiteer with one
co-ordinated to produce that movement and war: reproaches for the
coachman Ipatka knows--and look up the gypsy Ilyushka, the one who
coachman's coat, going down the street with head bent and a serious
coachmen and the orderlies of the wounded officers, after attending to
coagulability of the blood. Monro has observed remarkable results from
coagulate, but separates into two layers: the upper, transparent,
coagulates both above and below the ligature, the proximal clot being
coagulates both in the sac and in the feeding artery. The ligature may
coagulates on the cut surfaces. In each of the divided vessels a clot
coagulation-necrosis of the tissue cells with which they come in
coal gases that assail the miners. In a word, those who labored to
coal strike, "a few generations ago, the American workman could have
coal-miners and others who assume a squatting position at work. The
coaling stations even in mid-ocean, made a commercial agreement with the
coarse tone which the people despise in their own class and do not
coarsely granular, and the nuclei disintegrated, no longer taking the
coast and the backwoodsmen of the West; in town meetings and from the
coast to Chicago in the light of the fires. Thousands of Whigs and
coat of arms on the table. He explained this to her with as much
coat of the stomach--_gastric fibromatosis_; and in the
coat usually escapes, but the tunica externa is generally thickened.
coat without epaulettes had been packing with his valet in the rooms
coat, and a black kerchief. Often, approaching the chest of drawers
coat, was standing over the others. His face with its fine straight
coat... the ras..." he did not finish.
coats after the method of Lembert, a fine, round needle being employed.
coats of blue cloth and wearing medals. In the noblemen's hall there
coats of the stomach or intestine, and by the development of secondary
coats of the vessel are torn and the blood escapes into the surrounding
coats, buckled on their swords and pouches, and moved along the
coats, so that only the outer coat remains in the grasp of the ligature.
cock, laid the table for two, all properly, and sat down. After
coercion. What was the United States to do? The danger of having some
coffee-grounds from admixture with altered blood--the so-called
cognizable by the senses but which possesses qualities resembling
cogwheels to work, chimes to play, figures to pop out, and the hands
coin of the country and for substituting as legal tender, coin of only
coin, instead of the paper notes of state banks. Whatever the dominating
coincided with the course of events that led the French army into
cold abscess is most likely to occur in wens of the neck or back, and it
cold abscess on the median side of the upper arm and by a huge mass of
cold abscess, such as tuberculous disease of the spine or of the
cold abscesses and leave indolent ulcers or sinuses. The infection is
cold on the twenty-sixth of August was unimportant.
cold room, and the part rubbed with snow, or put in a cold bath, and
cold the orders he gave before and during the battle would have been
cold, bluish in colour, and there may be necrosis of the skin over bony
cold, damp earthen floor of the passage. The cold she felt refreshed
cold, that they are at the antipodes and engaged under the frozen
cold, when half the army perished in a single month--it is of this
coldly it seemed to Natasha. "Go... go," said the mother, sadly and
collapsed and was as worthless as waste paper. The bonds of the
collapsing roof of the barn, the burning grain in which diffused a
collar and cap, went out for his usual walk. It had snowed the day
collar up round her head, leaving only a little of the face uncovered.
collar, an officer of the Guards, a girl of fifteen, and a plump
collar, toward the place where Pierre sat.
collarbones, impressed Pierre more strongly with the solemnity and
collateral circulation after the ligation or obstruction from other
collateral circulation is established, the vitality of the tissues is
colleagues of both chambers. Still the subject was ridiculed by the
colleagues with betraying the "agricultural interest" that Jefferson had
collect his strength before he could go on. A door opened to the
collect pollen from flowers and carry it to the hive, says that it
collect taxes, duties, imposts, and excises. In this way the national
collected by the European powers from China for the injuries inflicted
collected in America, was left as a reminder of the principle laid down
collected the tickets from all his visitors. There was the fact that
collected, the wounded gathered in, the supplies of ammunition
collection are in the public domain in the United States.  If an
collection are in the public domain in the United States.  If an
collection of pus is punctured with a narrow-bladed knife and the use of
collection of seven million people ranging in civilization from the most
collective flight, and on that the whole strength of the French was
collective will of all the animals is transferred from one leader to
collective will of the people transferred to one person. Under what
collectors." When the state constitutions were framed they took a lively
colleges; under clerical guidance, intellectual and spiritual, the
collodion, the epidermis being dehydrated with alcohol before each
colloid material, met with in the vicinity of a joint or tendon sheath.
colonel of hussars with the same order. After him the stout
colonel who had needlessly plunged into the river should be enrolled
colonel, he had no time. He was afraid of falling behind the
colonel, thumping the table; "and ve must tie for our Emperor, and zen
colonial affairs was in operation. At one time the British governors in
colonial days or that of Kentucky later, the advancing lines of home
colonial legislatures within the metes and bounds of established law. In
colonial period, the number of Germans had risen to more than two
colonial records. A number of the artisans and carpenters in the first
colonial times there had been a marked difference between the South and
colonies alone. The character of the English sovereigns, the course of
colonies and protectorates; and (5) the League of Nations.
colonies as to the countries of Europe. The necessity for common
colonies at the opening of the century. The American colonies were
colonies directed the shifting tides of public opinion into two distinct
colonies failed. Selfishness and indolence usually disrupted the best of
colonies into royal provinces only fanned the spirit of independence
colonies raised, clothed, and paid during the last war twenty-five
colonies threatened. Pitt and Edmund Burke, the former near the close
colonies was a constant supervision by the English courts of law. The
colonies were subordinate to the crown and Parliament of Great Britain;
colonies, jealous of their individual rights, refused to accept the
colonies--Maryland, Pennsylvania, and New England--the religious impulse
colonies. It was supported by the British government and the official
colonies. The Connecticut, Hudson, Delaware, and Susquehanna rivers in
colonies. The new order was greeted with thanksgiving. Massachusetts was
colonies. When Parliament learned, as the result of an inquiry, that New
colonies." It was, however, originally conceived by the moving spirit,
colonists in order that the empire might avoid the calamities of civil
colonists to export rough iron to the British Islands.
colonists to provide accommodations for the soldiers who were to enforce
colonists were engaged in the same hard task; that of conquering a
colonists, compelling them to pay higher freight rates. The adverse
colonization was repeated. Hardy frontier people cut down the forests,
colony in 1665. Iron forges appeared in the valleys of the Delaware and
colony in time developed its own legislature elected by the voters; it
color. They did not, therefore, run counter to the letter of the
coloration is best recognised towards the periphery of the affected
coloration which results from coal-dust or gunpowder, the brown scars
colored population in the South.
colostomy. It is used at a dull-red heat, which sears the divided ends
colour becoming less bright. Injury, infection, or ulceration of the
colour like wash-leather, or whitish, like boiled fish. The degenerated
colour, with a pale, sometimes yellow, spot where the pus is near the
colour. It appears as isolated nodules, which may fuse together; the
coloured glasses, and the pupils should be dilated with atropin from
colourless jelly escapes from the punctures; the ends of the thread are
colourless, watery fluid--_lymphorrhagia_; and the opening through which
column advancing against them and winding down over the uneven ground.
column to the measure of "Left... left!" "Close up!" came the
column, Miloradovich's, the one that was to take the place of
column, hydatids give rise to angular deformity and paraplegia. In the
column, skull, and less frequently in the long bones of the limbs. It
columns and filling the alveoli vary with the character of the
columns in the interest of equal justice to the spokesmen for all the
columns that had advanced beyond the village went back; but as
combat," declared this representative of the Russian nation, "and to
combination of incongruities giving the chief charm to the feeling.
combination of syphilitic aortitis and sclerosis of the coronary
combination with other anaerobes, and its main incidence is on the
combinations with anything in the vicinity with which they have a
combine in such relations that the more directly they participate in
combined forces of the two Carolinas and Virginia.
combined with iron, as in the following formula: Hydrarg. c. cret. gr. 1;
combining the spirit of his old college, Harvard, with the breezy
combs and keeping the brood warm, he sees the skillful complex
come and bind Karp. The men obediently came out of the crowd and began
come and see us quite informally," said the governor, taking leave
come at last; even the conservatives who had prayed that they might
come for the cup was an hussar who wanted a drink; but he neither knew
come from Moscow; and also his cousin the eldest princess, who had
come immediately. Perhaps he has come and is sitting in the drawing
come into the hall. Prince Hippolyte stood close to the pretty,
come into the homes of the people, measure their liquor, and take the
come on! That's a dog!... There, it has beaten them all, the
come out of school with no chance to get farms of their own because the
come striding disheveled from the nursery in her dressing gown, and
come to Petersburg to procure an appointment in the Guards for her
come to dinner at the Rostovs'?"
come to own a mine. That outlet was now closed as regards the immense
come to the bridge across the Kolocha between Gorki and Borodino,
come under the notice of the civil surgeon.
come up to him as he lay wounded and would magnanimously extend the
come, said the leaders of the people, to fulfill the promise made to
come, so now the smile of the little princess--influenced by the
come, were all there at the appointed time.
come; the maid, Aniska, was no longer there, and Pierre with a feeling
comes from her heart. Happy the man who wins her! With her the least
comes of itself, and that apart from the words there is no tune, which
comes off just before it passes round the neck of the fibula. In course
comes out of its room, the bigwigs who guided the Club's opinion
comes when the lever catches it and obeying the impulse that wheel
comfort to the enemies" of the United States. This sweeping provision,
comfortable somewhere in a house... in ours, for instance... the
comfortable," thought Wolzogen, and looking severely at the dishes
coming at once, when she heard the young man's discreet steps
coming from these three lands between the years 1900 and 1910. These
coming mainly from the British West Indies. In the course of time,
coming of the vanguard.
coming out into the corridor, looked with pity and repulsion at the
coming round the corner of the house between two dragoons. He had a
coming to a direct decision on the merits of the matter. In one case
command (the one who had paraded his regiment before Kutuzov at
command and power in their primary form. The man who worked most
command in a calm voice. There was a stir in the ranks of the soldiers
command of an immense fortune. The will has not yet been opened. I
command of the advanced army. Prince Andrew Bolkonski came into the
command of the detested foreigner Barclay, whose rank was inferior
command of the rearguard stood with a staff officer, scanning the
command of the seas. Though Jefferson and Madison strove for peace, the
command ordered them to put up the horses. Having done that, the
command was heard to "mount" and the soldiers crossed themselves and
command), and Bagration--being in command of the second army--tried to
command, the whole squadron with its rows of faces so alike yet so
command, was to blame. The troops meanwhile stood growing listless and
command. At Belleau Wood, at Chateau-Thierry, and other points along the
commanded by Kutuzov was hurriedly retreating along the Danube,
commanded by a military officer appointed by the President. They ordered
commanded one party which captured several hundred prisoners in the
commander and then turned to the crowd of generals and officers
commander in chief does not all resemble the activity we imagine to
commander in chief of the recruiting, granted by the Emperor. If I had
commander in chief to look under the uniforms he would have found on
commander in chief was standing at the end of the village letting
commander in chief would be. Though the aide-de-camp did not know
commander in chief's actions describe to us, for instance, the
commander in chief's discretion to take measures or not for the
commander in chief, there resulted on the one hand indecision and
commander like children in an embarrassing situation, and the
commander of the battalion.
commander of the corps and began upbraiding him severely, saying
commander of the rear guard.
commander of the regiment in the hollow and news that immense masses
commander to the general... third company to the commander." The words
commander's stirrup, almost leaning against him. The man was wearing a
commander, and hungry and weary, making his way past the baggage
commander, and the question arose whether the troops were to be in
commander-in-chief of the armed forces, on grounds of military
commanders of columns. By evening, the adjutants had spread it to
commanders of divisions the right to shoot marauders, but I much
commanding a large guerrilla detachment. From the time he received his
commanding officer, but in reply to the third question which he did
commanding officers allow themselves to diverge from the truth in
commanding officers and the orders he gave them and, to his
commanding officers who had gathered at his quarters. The little old
commands did not correspond to the course of events in the first case,
commands still more frequently. A general does nothing but command the
commenced, the above course is prolonged as follows: for three weeks is
commencement of his reign, being the savior of Russia.
commencement of the interview.
commencing tuberculous disease, except by the use of the tuberculin
commensurable with the standard of right and wrong is merely to
commerce commission, thus facilitating judicial review of the railway
commerce with the outside world. The _second_, following closely,
commerce, but England was the more serious offender because she had
commerce, destined to be of such significance in the conflict with the
commerce, under the Constitution, belonged to Congress.
commerce. When the convention assembled in 1786, it was found that only
commercial and the planting states be balanced so as to safeguard the
commercial regulations it had imposed on the colonies. Moreover,
commercial transactions on a national scale. Finally, through the issue
commercial treaty? Did he not then exultantly exclaim: "The laws of the
comminuted fractures, osteotomies, resections of joints, or the forcible
commissariat department. Lanskoy informed the commander in chief
commissariat office. On the previous day Platov reconnoitered with two
commission and appropriated money for the investigation; a body of
commission entrusted to him. Natasha was in bed, the count at the
commission of fifteen men to review the contested returns. The
commission which he appointed. Thus, by stepping outside the
commission, and especially since he had joined the active army and
commission. At first tobacco was the only one of the "enumerated
commissioner to Paris, Silas Deane of Connecticut, often styled the
commissioners conferred with the British agents at Paris without
commissioners to accept not less than the cession of the island of
commissions for arbitration. To this the answer was made that the United
commissions were created with the power to establish the rates after an
commit murder he had restored it to the rightful king, I should have
commit nuisances in all the courtyards and even under the very windows
committed an act of sacrilege. That marriage lacked the dual
committed by men who did not wish to commit them, it was as if the
committed during the Reign of Terror. They turned savagely upon the
committed in conquered countries. The first people to go away were the
committed to a Supreme Council of ten representing the United States,
committed to political leaders from another section of the country,
committed to the great adventure, in the populous towns of the East as
committed. And in the same way every action of an insane, intoxicated,
committee reported the suffrage resolution by a favorable majority on
committee, to all the Club members and to all the Club guests, and
committees of correspondence. The working tools of the Revolution were
commodities which is the very life of industry, was blocked by executive
common accompaniments of the more serious and progressive forms of joint
common defence and general welfare of the United States; but all duties,
common femoral veins--a fact which has an important bearing on the
common flexor sheath of the hand an hour-glass-shaped swelling is
common grievances against the operation of this machinery of control
common iliac for haemorrhage in the thigh, of the brachial in the upper
common in rectal cancer, the malignancy is not appreciably affected.
common in the bones of the hand, often in a multiple form (Figs. 142 and
common in the mouth, but sometimes occurs on the vulva. In the mouth it
common level of rooted custom..." or, with a smile: "But we want the
common mass nourishing the spirit of colonial nationalism. When to the
common peroneal nerve winds round the neck of the fibula. The muscles of
common site of hydatid cysts in the human subject.
common than they are. Of the countless housemaids in whom the
common ties among the settlers of New England, it required a deadly
common to have one, two or more _warning haemorrhages_ before the leakage
common to the processes of inflammation and repair; no hard-and-fast
commonly affected, and the disease is bilateral in a considerable
commonly met with above the wrist as a result, for example, of the hand
commonly met with in gouty subjects. The accumulation of urates may
commonly present. On recovery from the acute illness, it may be found
commonly ruptured are the popliteal, the axillary, the femoral, and the
commonly the pelvis and lumbar vertebrae, but sometimes the entire
commonwealth. All along the southern border the land had been occupied
commotion going on at the back porch. A woman, bent with age, with a
communicates with the knee-joint and shares in its diseases. When shut
communicates, or it may be of adventitious origin; when it is the seat
communicating branches are dilated, the veins fill up from below more
communicating the disease unless contaminated by discharge from a
communicating with the arteries of the limb; the walls of the space
communication between the systems of the great and small saphenous veins
communication is direct--_aneurysmal varix_; the other in which the
communication; gangrene of the limb may supervene, and we have observed
communism itself--"a universal distribution of property." In the triumph
communistic colonies. They believed that people should go into the
community must live on the labor of another; learning, science, and the
compact bone enclosing the medullary canal, which is filled with yellow
compact made by the pioneers in 1843, the spirit of which is reflected
companies and supplemented the savings banks with a parcels post system,
companies and tilled by hired labor. Sometimes the great estate took the
companies met near Ogden in Utah and the driving of the last spike,
companies were common and the public was deluged with stocks and bonds
companies, and other interstate carriers; it gave the commission the
companies, or the proprietors. In the colony of Maryland alone there
companies, some of them the largest and strongest institutions in the
companion volume on _Operative Surgery_, the third edition of which
companion's arm and stepping back from the door.
companion's sake that the latter might say something he would
companions," he thought, glancing at the lady in the black dress.
company commander's voice in jaunty tones. The soldiers passed in a
company of woolen manufacturers to come with machinery and take the wool
company's agents. All these things failing, the dispute was transferred
comparative ease and comfort, if not at a rapid speed, and the bulkiest
comparative ease; but after the war prices declined. Wheat that sold at
comparatively common in joints that are already the seat of some chronic
comparatively little suffering, but at the end of that time the parts
comparatively little, the way of life at Otradnoe--Mitenka's
comparatively low temperature (140 o F.), and the coagulum is
comparatively painless and of being followed by the least amount of
comparatively rare, and has been observed chiefly in the tibia and the
comparatively rich in cells and blood vessels, and in which the fibres
comparatively slowly, and are only malignant in the sense that they tend
comparatively small area on the dorsum of the foot.
comparatively small escape of blood takes place into the tissues, the
compared to "pipe-stems." The pulse is smaller and less compressible
compared to the duration of a dream.
compared with the restrictive measures by which Great Britain more than
compares the ordinary textbook account of a single Civil War campaign
comparison with the past. Against the slow and leisurely stagecoach,
comparison with the reports of the cannon.
compartment of Napoleon's tent, where he began opening the box while
compartment to the other. The usual course of events is that the abscess
compasses; the sensation of pressure, by means of a pencil or other
compelled by force of circumstances to adopt a Russian policy. The
compelled her to speak and act apart from her own will. From the
compensation for mutilation and death, the words of posterity about
compensation, which shall neither be increased nor diminished during the
competition under its terms, owing to the low labor standards of other
competition, notably, wool, hemp, and flax. As the South had little or
complacently. But at the moment the first report was heard,
complained of her position, did not say a word about the past, and
complains of increasing hyperaesthesia and of neuralgic pains in the
complains of severe pain on attempting to use the muscle, and maintains
complaints were made against the troops, who, taking advantage of
complement deviation method as the most reliable; he believes that a
complete absence of pulsation in the distal arteries and if the part
complete carpet, slightly overlapping the edges of the area and of one
complete equality in marriage, including equal guardianship of the
complete extirpation of cancerous organs wherever this is possible. The
complete plan of self-government. A month later, on April 12, the
complete political equality. In Utah, the third suffrage state, the
complete significance. Outstanding among them was the growth of an
complete, the pellets are still close together, so that if they
completely destroy the vitality of the part involved, the changes in the
completely destroyed--the healing process is slow. The resulting scars
completely eradicating the focus of infection, and on the reserve force
completely he destroyed that dreadful barrier which--in the absence of
completely rested, and the pupil is well dilated by atropin to prevent
completely severed. A full dose of morphin is given hypodermically. The
completely under. During an operation the onset of syncope is often
completeness, but the desire to find those causes is implanted in
complex than this is the game of war, which occurs under certain
complicated by the occurrence of pyogenic infection leading to necrosis
complicated disease, unknown to medicine--not a disease of the
complicated in the very beginning by the outbreak of an insurrection
complicated measures--the removal of injunctions, petitions,
complication. In smaller and more superficial ulcers, however, the
complications. The free edge of the nail should be clipped away to allow
complications; and no benefit follows the administration of salicylates.
composed of Dutch, Belgians, men from the borders of the Rhine,
composed of Massachusetts, Plymouth, Connecticut, and New Haven. The
composed of delegates from the unions of the separate trades. In the
composed of the colonel, Nesvitski, Zherkov, and the officer from
composed of the commission. This scheme, like that obtaining in Porto
composed of the executive secretaries and five other persons appointed
composing the tumour from the fibrous capsule which surrounds it. On
composition of the blood.
compound, the dihydrochloride of dioxydiamido-arseno-benzol, popularly
compressed lips, and knitted brows, held on to the sides of the
compressed, the joints may become swollen and painful and afterwards
compressible, and reaches 130 or more, especially if at the same time
compressible; the temperature is only moderately raised (100 o-101 o F.),
compression of his lips about the amusements of the highest Petersburg
compression of the common carotid in the neck. Varying degrees of ocular
compression of the femoral artery, before operating on the aneurysm.
compression paralysis of the nerves of the upper arm which results from
compression paraplegia ensue. In its growth the swelling may press upon
compromise in the Bland-Allison bill, which provided for huge monthly
compromise line. This generous interpretation of the powers of Congress
compromise saved the convention from breaking up. In addition, there
compromise--the great settlement of 1850--seemed to restore peace, only
compromise. Instead of a Congress of one house as provided by the
compromise. It took on the form of a tariff controversy and
compromise. The South, having half the Senators, could prevent the
comrade at the last post station but one before Moscow, Denisov had
comrades, like most of the army, were dissatisfied with the peace
comrades, the same ranks, the same sergeant major Ivan Mitrich, the
concave, and in many cases the epithelium is shed, and an ulcer is
concealed the fact under a show of irritation and contempt, he was
conceded both the prophecy and the claim. Manifest destiny never seemed
conceivable occurrences, and declare this abstraction to be the aim of
conceive the idea of the existence of such an incomprehensible
concentrated and happy resolution you see on the face of a man who
concentrated on passing the commander in the best possible manner, and
concentrated toxins has its vitality further impaired as a result of the
conception (which constitutes the essence of freedom) he cannot
conception of cause, mathematics seeks law, that is, the property
conception of it to her, and though the "God's folk" who came to see
conception of man in the case we are examining, for as soon as there
conception of the movement of the heavenly bodies any longer exists.
conception of the necessity that weighs on him increases.
conception of the welfare of humanity fifty years ago as a present-day
concerned if a person bitten by a mad animal is not subjected to the
concerned in the affair, and like everyone in similar cases, did not
concerned in the causation of tumours is largely based on the fact that
concerned in the reactive process.
concerned she would be the last to quit Petersburg.
concerned, to the male sex. In making manhood suffrage national,
concerning the Krems affair, and about some ladies they both knew.
concerning the part played by free will in the general affairs of
concerning the queer husband of "the most distinguished woman in
concerning the real value of such histories arise either because too
concerning you," said the superintendent of police. "Go on!" he
concert to make slavery national. This daring statement arrested the
concessions from England. "I argue this cause with the greater
concessions in favor of that section; but the duties on sugar, tin,
concessions to the companies. In the administration as well as the
conclaves of party workers, sustained by the spoils system, and
conclude that the whistling and the turning of wheels are the cause of
concluded after the battle of Friedland. They said that had we held
concluded that it was all absolutely necessary. Halfway up the
concluded, "we have the prospect of a glorious issue; by cowardice and
concluded, he admitted to the Emperor that the merit of securing
concluded." To these notes the Central Powers replied that they were
conclusion involves a contradiction, since the series of French
conclusion that "the revolution in the island kingdom had been
conclusion that a new party dedicated to freedom in the territories must
conclusion that the chief mistake made by the student in 1809 had been
conclusion, nor any particular care or trouble on the part of the
conclusive evidence of the disease. The bacillus may be obtained by
concur with the delegates of the other colonies in declaring
concur; and he shall nominate, and by and with the advice and consent of
concurrently with, action on the front to bar the advance of the
condemned by the common opinion of all western civilization; but they
condemned in the South.
condemning it roundly for punishing the innocent with the guilty, and
condemning the tariff, repudiated the step which South Carolina had
condemning the whole British program. The Circular Letter declared that
condensing them, until they form a sac enclosing the effused blood.
condescending respect for their elders which seems to say to the older
condition do I find this ulcer at the present moment?
condition has been proved one way or the other. Should rabies develop
condition in which a limb is swollen and misshapen as a result of the
condition is confined to bed for several months before his death, the
condition is liable to spread to the zygomatic and frontal bones, the
condition is never observed by the universal historians, and so to
condition is the will of the people delegated to one person? On
condition is tuberculous, as in other forms of suppuration the causative
condition known as the "saddle-nose" deformity (Figs. 43 and 44).
condition may closely simulate tuberculous disease. The use of the
condition of all that occurs--the continuity of movement in time)
condition of all that takes place: the continuity of movement in
condition of his consent that the wedding is not to take place for a
condition of the blood, which is known as _leucocytosis_, is believed to
condition of the first man's blessedness before the Fall. Fallen man
condition of the patient is otherwise favourable. Excision has been
condition resembles tuberculous disease of the synovial membrane, for
condition that that person expresses the will of the whole people.
condition that the sovereign himself should not be with the army."
condition to which Virchow applied the term _angioma racemosum venosum_.
condition usually manifests itself after the parts, having been
condition, and may prevent the disastrous consequences that may follow
condition, so that the affected areas dimple under the finger like
condition. The conditions formerly known as "delayed shock" and
conditionally, but that the conditions are unknown and indefinite, and
conditions for repair, and this should be done at the earliest possible
conditions from the median basilic vein by means of a serum syringe, and
conditions healing takes place by what is called "primary union"--the
conditions of to-day can scarcely realise the state of matters which
conditions tending to prevent it undergoing the natural process of
conditions that have to be counteracted before the characters of the
conditions the Russian soldiers were in at that time--lacking warm
conditions to which it is liable, but also with the nature of the
conditions with like success, and so profoundly has it affected the
conditions, it plays a most important part. The discharge from wounds
conditions. The chief part in the regeneration of bone is played by the
conduced to Bagration's being selected as Moscow's hero was the fact
conduct and the breaking off of her engagement, receded into the
conduct during the second war with England, that spokesmen from the
conduct of General Charles Lee prevented a triumph. The recovery of
conduct of the American government, a payment in cash, and an annual
conduct, he did not rest until it was forced to expunge the resolution
conducted Balashev to the quarters assigned him.
condyles of the femur or tibia, may furnish a sequestrum. In such cases,
confederation." Charles Dickens declared the country to be "so maimed
conference arrived, the government at Washington apparently had not made
conference to consider whether the Northern states should remain in the
conferences over the strategy of war, French noblemen of ancient lineage
conferences, Roosevelt the following year (1908) made an imposing
conferred equal suffrage upon the women. This was the last suffrage
conferred the ballot--not on workingmen as yet--but on mill owners and
conferred the status of Councilor of State, and insisted on the
conferred upon the country. Nevertheless he felt that grave dangers to
confess and acknowledge the one Almighty and Eternal God to be the
confidence in the future was rewarded. In nearly every colony a gazette
confidence in the outcome. In the Confederacy at the final reckoning
confidence of success reached Kutuzov's cheerless staff with the
confidence that others loved him in the same way.
confidence the personality of the Freemason inspired in him and his
confidence," said she, repeating the mistake of so many parents who
confidence. Leadership in the House of Commons fell to George Grenville,
confidently steps onto the smooth surface of a bog. When he put his
confined in the shed in which Pierre had been placed and where he
confined to particular groups of muscles, such as those of the neck,
confined to the glands originally infected and there are no signs of
confined to the old Northeast where, as Madison had sagely remarked,
confinements, the nursing of her children, and sharing every moment of
confirm this rule. In proportion to the defeat of the Austrian army
confirmed by finding the recently dead or dying worms in the inflamed
confirmed in this conclusion by the fact that Dolokhov left
confirmed. Even this stipulation was waived in the case of the Civil War
confiscate American goods bound to the Continent. Once more the terrible
confiscated by the federal authorities while the owner was in
confiscated. A new Mexican constitution, in effect nationalizing the
confiscation. Intensely loyal to their race, the Irish were subjected in
conflagrations when the house owners are in residence and a police
conflict which changed the boundaries of countries, called into being
conflicting and intersecting intrigues that eddied about the Emperor's
conflicting evidence. On the patriot side, there is the testimony of a
confluence of the Enns and the Danube became visible, and the rocky
confluence of the rivers Kolocha and Voyna.
confluent, so that the whole gland is ultimately converted into a
conform to his father's wish--to propose, and postpone the wedding for
conform to them and follow them, and let us be persuaded that the less
confused and enfeebled. Bennigsen, the Tsarevich, and a swarm of
confused at seeing the prince, but made up his mind to address him
confused him, as if she were trying to find in his face the answer
confused thoughts were centered on one subject--the irrevocability
confused. "Then a patrol arrived and all the men--all those who were
confusing issues of the slavery controversy, business enterprise sprang
confusing the whole matter. A good chessplayer having lost a game is
confusion in their ranks over the tariff. Like the silver issue, the
confusion; the borzois formed a star-shaped figure, scarcely swaying
congealed an earth saturated by autumn rains. The verdure had
congenital deficiency in the number, size, and strength of the valves of
congenital malformation of the particular tissue from which they take
congenital, and is most often met with in the hand; it forms a
congenitally weak. The direct pressure of a tumour, or of the gravid
congested areola forms in relation to the nail and refuses to heal. Such
congestion of the kidneys. In burns implicating the face, neck, mouth,
congestion, oedema, and mucous patches may be the cause of persistent
congratulate the old prince. Princess Mary, too, went round to him.
congratulated him on the Maria Theresa Order of the third grade, which
congratulations and happy faces, announcing the trophies taken, the
congregated into a mass because the spirit of the army had so fallen
congregation, of men and women brought together in the bonds of a common
congregations of the faithful: Rhode Island, Connecticut, and New
congresses, and conventions, all unofficial and representing the
congressional debate was the better part of valor.
congressmen. The supremacy of the legislative branch had been obtained
conical form previously used. The conditions under which the fighting is
conjecture, but the colonel did not once glance at Rostov, and
conjecture. While the measure was being debated, a friend of General
conjunction of innumerable circumstances the Russians could not give
conjunction with it, easily find a way to prepare for the enemy the
conjunctiva. The middle ear also may become involved by spread along the
connected in their minds with the same sort of vague notions of
connected with the attack on the railways in the Middle West which
connected with the epiphysial cartilage and with the epiphysis, and at
connected with the sale of Southern produce and the purchase of goods in
connection existing between these men and the movement of the nations.
connection of commands with events we must restore: (1) the
connection of which with the masses needs explanation. It is
connection such circumstances have with the actual fact of slaughter
connection with some focus of infection in the adjacent tissues. The
connection with the external world, the greater or lesser remoteness
connection with the post office--a scheme which had long been opposed by
connection with the skull and vertebral column. It may take the form of
connection with the stories of the Grand Duke's quick temper he
connection.) But if you marry the old count you will make his last
connections or rank, and of whom there were very many in the lodge.
connections--_avulsion_. To prevent the regeneration of the nerve after
connective tissue accompanied by thrombosis throughout the capillary and
connective tissue and fat. At a certain stage the muscles exhibit the
connective tissue and hypertrophy of the skin; in advanced cases there
connective tissue of the integument, intermuscular septa, tendon
connective tissue planes are involved. The affected finger becomes red,
connective tissue taking the place of what has been lost or destroyed.
connective tissue throughout the nerves of both the cerebro-spinal and
connective tissue which encroaches on the surrounding spongy bone,
connective tissue which replaces the marrow is not unlike that seen in
connective tissue, derived from the synovial membrane, over the
connective-tissue cells in the tissues at the site of infection. The
connective-tissue cells of the part, and to a less extent from the
connective-tissue framework of such organs as the tongue or liver. Both
connective-tissue framework. In time the glandular masses may form
connective-tissue septa, which are continuous with the capsule
connective-tissue structures, causing marked enlargement of the affected
conquer," he concluded, conscious--as were others--after the words
conquered Georgia, and restored the royal governor. In 1780 they seized
conquering nation have increased to the detriment of the defeated.
conqueror with love. I will tell the deputation that I did not, and do
conquerors of Venice" now looked across the sea for new scenes of
conquest in 1664. At the end of the colonial period over one-half of the
conquest in the Pacific.
conquest was impossible, and they had urged the advantages of a peace
conquest; it proved that the force which decides the fate of peoples
conscience, but the next evening Monsieur de Jobert came to see Helene
consciences stirred by the unending appeal and the tireless reiteration.
conscientiously studied the dispositions and the unfamiliar
conscious of his own guilt toward him for having wasted the family
conscious of his volition. But his will--which forms the essence of
conscious of others we cannot comprehend. The discovery of these
conscious of the strategic relation of the islands to the growth of sea
consciousness as well as the muscular and nervous activity.
consciousness of man's will in the present moves in space, time, and
consciousness of the divine. To love life is to love God. Harder and
consciousness of the solemnity of the impending moment that Pierre had
consciousness, and the muscular exertion entailed may ward off the
consent of the other, adjourn for more than three days, nor to any other
consent to carry out the will of these weak individuals, and should
consent to restore the duchy to the Duke of Oldenburg"--and there
consent, irritating him and having to bear the brunt of his
consent, my dear, I don't! Do as you please! It's the government's
consequence of their going away that the momentous event was
consequences of the action. Hamilton was alarmed when he read the bill,
consequences of the war. Henry Adams, recalling days of humiliation in
consequently I include space. (2) I measure flowing time by the
consequently runs no risk. If, on the other hand, rabies is proved to be
conservation of natural resources, labor legislation, the direct
conservation of natural resources. Hitherto the government had followed
conservative and the operative.
conservative measures fail, the choice lies between the injection of
conservative policy. With little difficulty, therefore, the veteran
conservative, decided that all taxpayers were worthy of the ballot.
conservatories and the beauty of a flower that had just opened, and
conservatory to the place among the tubs where she had been hiding.
conservatory. There she paused and stood listening to the conversation
consider any offensive necessary. The result was a compromise which
consider the whole matter and decide what was right and how he
consider together the effects of the bursting of shells fired from heavy
considerable dissection amongst the deeper structures at the root of the
considerable fever and disturbance of health. The slightest movement
considerable impairment of power in the muscles which antagonise those
considerable number of Republicans accepted the views of the Liberals.
considerable number of men, particularly the mechanics and artisans of
considerable pain and effusion into the joint, which necessitate rest
considerable part of the land in his dominion. Consequently he either
considerable prudence among the perplexing problems of the day. Again
considerable size without the patient being aware of its existence, and,
considerable size, replacing the corresponding permanent tooth. It may
considerable swelling; and in the mouth and fauces this may lead to
considerably larger than that observed in lesions of the secondary
considerably, the occluding clot at the divided end of the vessel may be
consideration for the children. I am nursing and my milk was
consideration he gave the first reply that came into his head. "I like
consideration the question as to whether any people could be called free
considerations can have led the historians to such a conclusion: (1)
considerations, ordered an advance, and the next day his army began to
considered a reply unnecessary. She smilingly waited. All the time the
considered an important step up in the service, and he at once
considered in relation to the repair of blood vessels.
considered in the sections devoted to regional surgery.
considered it immoral and humiliating could not resist the temptations
considered it necessary to hear to the end, probably to arouse the
considered that it would be a useful and worthy action to slay the
considered themselves offended by the new decree concerning the
considered these consultations very valuable for the proprietor and
considered with the diseases of bone.
considered with the diseases of these regions.
considered with the individual tissues and organs.
considered worthy to hear it had to come to the countess, for she
considering how his actions might affect others or what the
considering it necessary to take part in receiving the visitors. The
considering the general progress of affairs and approving and
considering what he was to do. The coming of these visitors annoyed
considering what was to come. He was driving to the Yauza bridge where
considers it a favor that this man receives a daughter the Caesars
consist in the wealth, freedom, and enlightenment of the people, how
consist of the remains of the original tumour, plus a shell of bone of
consist of two-thirds of the whole number of senators, and a majority of
consistence, and of a pale-white colour; the oedema may be so great that
consistent with propriety--sympathy. Among the political leaders on both
consistently with the safety and well-being of the community, intrusted
consistently, and belabored the French till the whole invasion had
consisting in the assumption that between the person they so address
consisting of the edge of the nail, together with the subjacent matrix
consists in amputating the digit concerned, and in removing the
consists in injecting, while the disease is still active, specially
consists in opening the joint by free incision and removing the bodies.
consists in opening up the periosteum and the new case sufficiently to
consists in packing the wound with iodoform or bismuth gauze, which is
consists in picking out the insect with a blunt needle, special care
consists in the removal of the tumour along with the overlying skin.
consists in transplanting strips of epidermis shaved from the surface of
consists of all the elements of the blood, constituting a _red thrombus_
consists of the great agricultural staples of the Southern states which
consolation for our defeat by the memory of former victories; and
consolidated debt resting on the credit of the United States; to the
consolidated into national systems. The industrial population of
consolidating small farms into vast estates; and still more from the
consolidation of all labor's forces; and in 1866, the year after the
consolidation of the new fibrous tissue these vessels are ultimately
conspicuous friends of the experiment. Every member of the federal
conspiracy devised by the money power and secretly carried out. This
conspiracy of silence and injustice. "I have failed to discover in the
constant correspondence between the number of leucocytes and the height
constant efforts of Washington to soften the asperity of the
constant in its seat of origin, being nearly always located on the
constant practice and patient attention to technical details in the
constant symptom and is especially annoying at night, the patient being
constant, dull, and aching; is not obviously increased by use of the
constantly changing with the narrative, watched Pierre with an
constantly moist with the lotion, the dressing being left freely exposed
consternation they had viewed the proposal to make colonial judges
consternation. If the idea was sound, he exclaimed, "then indeed is our
constituent elements--oxygen and acids appearing at the positive,
constituted his merit and his greatness. He rode hurriedly from the
constituted the center of the Russian army, and that that center was
constitutes the essence of the conception called power.
constitutes the main risk, particularly that resulting from
constituting the _bursal hydrops_ or _hygroma_. When the affection has
constitution giving them the suffrage. When told to disperse, they
constitution in which the people of the territory had themselves
constitution on the ground that it gave the ballot to all free white
constitution, intended to change the existing order of government in
constitution, the first in more than forty years, were adopted. The
constitution. A municipality was established and the following
constitution. If any one is bewildered by the controversies of modern
constitutional disturbance is aggravated, while the local signs are
constitutional system the courts must declare null and void all acts
constitutionality of the acts was attacked; but they were sustained by
constitutionally ineligible to the office of President shall be eligible
constitutionally, to draw a cordon around the slavery issue and confine
constitutions of Kentucky, Ohio, and Indiana.... Many of the articles
constitutions of their respective states the provisions of law which
constitutions so constructed as to deprive negroes of the ballot by law.
constitutions the tone of the old East by providing landed
constitutions were put into effect, local committees set to work in the
constitutions," wrote Jefferson for the Kentucky legislature. Jealousy
constructed by the Emperor's desire. The Emperor had written to
construction. By the end of the century there were about ten billion
construed to deny or disparage others retained by the people.
construed to mean that the Court would not interfere with corporations
consuls and those in which a State shall be a party, the Supreme Court
consuls, judges of the Supreme Court, and all other officers of the
consulted everybody in the house; but when it was possible to have a
consulting the French minister. They actually signed a preliminary peace
contact with infective matter that the hands can be kept surgically
contact with the American Federation?
contact with the biceps muscle, is situated a well-defined and easily
contact with the clothing.
contact with the tuberculous focus. One of the obstacles to this is that
contact, and the discharge from lesions containing the virus is placed
contact, the ferments liquefy the exudate and other albuminous
contain; for how can we, miserable sinners that we are, know the
contained the names of all candidates of all parties; it was given out
contained, were two people. They were the yard porter Ignat, and the
containing the Sacred Host, which was left at her house for her to
containing the sputum of her consumptive master; the wound subsequently
containing the typhoid bacillus in pure culture. Necrosis is
contains these in such a form that they are not readily assimilated. The
contaminated tissue is excised, the foreign material, _e.g._, a missile,
contamination may take place from the surroundings.
contemplated the use of both metals in the currency system. Such, at
contemplation of the horrors of their situation. He walked along the
contemplation--he naturally threw away the telescope through which
contemporaries. It naturally seemed to Napoleon that the war was
contempt for her. When the little princess had grown accustomed to
contempt for him and despite all the proofs he deduced to convince
contempt for the dispositions or anything else--he was engaged in
contemptuous look and manner he wore in drawing rooms, but with the
contemptuously respectful attitude of the younger men to the old man
contended that the state laws just cited violated the terms of the
contention the debates in Congress do not seem to sustain. In the course
contest and will be more or less affected to the end of time by the
contest had been carried and acting on the appeal from the Secretary of
contest over the nomination occurred at their convention in Baltimore.
contest. Connecticut and Georgia followed early the next year. Then came
continent at one stroke.... With her on our side we need not fear the
continent, the local unions of craftsmen grew into national craft
continent," which was another way of expressing the hope that the
continent. As for the future, that was in the hands of Providence!
contingencies, just like the younger men, but with this difference,
contingencies... and foresees the adversary's intentions."
continually being received by the count.
continually changed about, now joining the moving column, now again
continually cleared his throat and pulled at the collar of his coat
continually discovering his mistakes. Having descended the hill at a
continually he moved on. The soldiers squeezed themselves to make
continually retreating straight back from the invaders, deviated
continually, bringing visitors to the Countess Rostova's big house
continue studying historic events as the results of man's free will.
continue the iodides for from one to three months after the lesions for
continue to enlarge until it attains the size of a dinner-plate. The
continued all through teatime. All the grown-up members of the
continued and expanded by slavery. Before the war the prosperous
continued in full force to the great discontent of the mechanics thus
continued its course. Evening passed, night came, and the feeling of
continued the vicomte. "I pity the poor husband, that little officer
continued to block the road to Moscow as before, the aim of the French
continued to shout: "Blackgaurds!... Throw the snow back on the road!"
continued to the end of her life to love the man with whom she had
continued to turn over the pages and read. In the diary was set down
continued to walk on in front of the ranks. Suddenly one shot after
continued, "we owe today's success chiefly to the action of that
continued, "we should ask the Emperor--most respectfully ask His
continued, gazing at the floor in front of Dron.
continued, with all that it implied in the creation of land-owning
continues to be the subject of controversy. Reference is here made to
continuity of a nerve results in degeneration of its fibres, the myelin
continuous and adequate labor supply, the manufacturers saw an offset to
continuous chain along the internal jugular vein, beneath the
continuous slaughter which could be of no avail either to the French
continuously, and joyfully that the men themselves were awed by
contour are sufficiently remarkable to suggest examination with the
contour in place of the well-defined outline of the articular end of the
contour of the bone, but they eat away its framework and replace it, so
contour, and a clear interval between it and the surrounding bone.
contra-indicated in shock, as they merely exhaust the already impaired
contracting powers, being convinced that the system of representative
contracting the sterno-mastoid. There may be tenderness over the
contraction of the currency. Only on matters relating to the coercion of
contraction of the currency; it lowered the prices of labor and produce
contraction of the muscles acting on the joint, with the object of
contraction which attends upon recovery, the joint must be kept in good
contraction," the advocates of an abundant currency demanded an increase
contracture of the pronator muscles of the forearm, for example, an
contradict the specialist historians but contradict themselves.
contradicted expressly by the letter of the Constitution, unauthorized
contradiction like the possibility of performing two actions at one
contradictory orders, lost her head and did not know what to do. The
contradictory, as in the case of killing a man as the result of
contradictory, except the feeling that guides the dream, so in this
contrary it evoked the compassion of those who knew and liked him.
contrary said that all the icons had been taken out of the churches
contrary to all human reality. To the question of what causes historic
contrary to all that humanity calls right or even just, the historians
contrary to the Emperor's will had decided on the abandonment of
contrary to the program, reacted on Louis XVI. But why did it not
contrary to what was happening in the Bald Hills district, where
contrary to what was said by the officer previously sent; and a spy, a
contrary, during the retreat passed many positions better than
contrary, now is the best of all. If only you did not go away! Do
contrary, that spiritual tranquility on the one side made it the
contrary, the sore may be actually increasing in area by the
contrast to the facts when some strong rise or fall in the spirit of
contrast to the other features of American life, and he foresaw what
contrasted the United States favorably with England where the tillers of
contrasted with his flattering words, "on the contrary, your
contributed to the irritation between the two countries. Seward, the
contributions of men and money, a necessity that as soon as the
contrived to ingratiate himself so well that the old prince in his
control by the colonists. The second measure of the same date imposed a
control of himself. Another lately added sorrow arose from the lessons
control of public affairs had passed from the people to a sinister
control of the army and of the men and parties engaged in it, and he
control of the post office was vested in the federal government, it had
control over said island except for the pacification thereof." Final
control over the organs of government were not the sole answers made by
control proved unsatisfactory. There was constant friction between the
control them, and they still brought up the charges, loaded, aimed,
control. The charter named all the persons originally included in the
controlled by _digital compression_ of the main artery supplying the
controlled by a tourniquet, or the artery itself occluded by a clamp,
controlled by digital pressure, and the use of a tourniquet should be
controlled in the interests of the mother country, they also enjoyed
controlling her trade, Grenville and Townshend. The king was willing,
controls the tone of the blood vessels as to maintain efficient
controversy over Santo Domingo which arose in 1904. The Dominican
controversy over the tariff had grown into a formidable revolt against
controversy, the people apparently did not appreciate, at the time, the
convalescence is prolonged, and at any time the disease may assume the
convenience Surgery may be defined as "the art of treating lesions and
conveniently considered in the chapters dealing with these structures.
conveniently to keep them under observation, brought them into the
convention also thrust aside the old rule of unanimous approval, and
convention and the adoption of the direct primary. Candidates were no
convention and the few who remained behind refused to answer the roll
convention assembled, Mr. Taft easily won the nomination. Though the
convention display more feeling than at Chicago in 1896. From the
convention ebbed and flowed, decisions being taken in the heat of
convention in 1849 and framed their constitution. With impatience, the
convention to confer the vote upon them. With apparent spontaneity there
convention was held in Worcester, Massachusetts, on the call of
convention, composed of delegates elected by party voters for the sole
convention, nominated a candidate for President, and adopted the name of
convention. Indeed, a man presided over the conference, for that
converge towards the femoral trunk.
conversation gradually settled on some of the topics at first
conversation had been more amusing than the drawing-room talk of
conversation naturally turned on the peace. The officers, his
conversation very well, but at the very last moment, just when he
conversation when they heard the clatter of three horses' hoofs on the
conversation with Kuragin, and again saw the face, gestures, and
conversation with her, when Anna Pavlovna called him away on the
conversation, Pierre heard questions of where the marshals of the
conversation, and then with a distressed face left the room to find
conversation, to talk of trifles is awkward, and yet the desire to
conversation. Count Rostopchin alone kept the conversation going,
conversations, especially the joking with the girls, were such as
conversations. At one end of the table, the old chamberlain was
conversing with the Emperor less than three hours before, and in
convex, and incurved at their free ends, suggesting a resemblance to the
conviction, or the calm firmness and certainty of his vocation,
conviction--aiming at the punishment of vice and folly, and
convince ourselves of the absolute inaccessibility of the causes,
convince the constitution-makers of his own state. "It is not an idle
convinced that America was a success. The fastidious traveler, Mrs.
convinced that the Southern prophecy was true. Abolitionists and
convinced that the will of the historic hero does not control the
convinced that this was the day of his Toulon, or his bridge of
convinced. After examining with a critical eye the life and labor of the
convinces the enemy of the moral superiority of his opponent and of
convincing argument: All good Americans have their hearts set on the
convincing to those who understood the economy of business. The
convoy guards began cursing and the French soldiers, with fresh
convoy of cavalry baggage and Russian prisoners separated from the
convulsions and that we know only the facts--that is, the murders,
cool and quiet, with a scent of autumn. Pierre and the adjutant
cooperating with the autocrats of Russia, Austria, and Prussia, they
copious. The occurrence of syncope or of profound shock also helps to
copy of the manifesto and appeal, which he would obtain from Count
coquettish manner in which she spoke to other men, "the vicomte has
cord remains at the seat of rupture.
cord, with bead-like enlargements in the position of the valves. The
cord; in some cases the bones lose their lime salts and bend, in others
cords would soon get a bit rubbed," said an infantryman, wiping the
cork. Sonya kissed him full on the lips, and disengaging her little
corked eyebrows and mustaches were smeared over the perspiring,
corn pulled the balance down on the American side of the scale.
corner stood the folding bedstead of Bennigsen's adjutant. This
corner, and even in his very smell, and he looked at the man without
cornet of Kutuzov's suite who had mimicked the regimental commander,
cornified and the epithelium assumes a greyish-white colour.
corns may determine the occurrence of senile gangrene in those who are
corns, or wearing ill-fitting boots. The patient should also be warned
corporal that something should be done about him. The corporal replied
corporal told him that nearly all the troops were starting and there
corporate monopolies ... the powers they have so corruptly and unjustly
corporation and gave them certain powers in the management of its
corporation remained in England, as in the case of the Virginia Company,
corporations. An illustration of this tendency was afforded by the
corps commander, and, having spent the day with him, returned to
corps commander, who was fetched, conducted him into the village to
corps much weaker than the army entrusted to you. It would seem
corps which had started before any of the others. Behind, along the
corpses, and the French soldiers, after dispatching the wounded, threw
corpulent, flaccid, and fat. But the bleached eyeball, the scar, and
corpuscles, and are in turn disposed of by the developing fibroblasts,
corpuscles--_purulent_ or _suppurative synovitis_; the synovial membrane
corpuscles_. These processes are accompanied by changes in the
correct officer of the Guards. He was clean-shaven and wore a
correct the deformity by operation. In rickety curvature of the spine,
correction of deformities--fluid fat may enter the circulation in
correspond to the junction of the diaphysis with the epiphysis, and the
correspond to those of the tertiary period of acquired syphilis.
correspondence with the seat of the spinal lesion, which usually affects
correspondence, editorials, pamphlets, and letters to the newspapers,
corresponding increase in the swollen dropsical condition of the lower
corresponding interval between the applications. Each sitting lasts for
corresponding series of events. Restoring the essential condition of
corresponding to those of a superficial burn produced by heat. The chief
corresponds to the disintegration of other unsuccessful homoplastic
corridor he met Nesvitski, with whom he shared a room, and the wag
corroboration of the view that the bone has perished. When the dead bone
cortex of the bone, to invade the soft parts, or to give rise to
cost of diminishing the glory due to the Russian army and people) it
cost of land in your older part of the country is so high that you can't
cost of overland transportation was prohibitive. In the Eastern market,
cost of their own transfer to the New World.
cost, at Philadelphia, about $10 ... and the horses about $12 each; they
costing heavily in men and money. Atrocities were committed by the
costo-chondral junctions where the series of beaded swellings is known
costumes, went into the drawing room. The count sat in the ballroom,
cotton and tobacco to the North or to seaports was of common concern to
cotton and tobacco. With the advance of the frontier, corn and wheat
cotton king. Watt and Fulton were to make steel and steam masters of the
cotton wool stroked gently across the skin; the capacity of
cotton wool, as a well-localised sensation, and the finer grades of
cough broke the silence. All eyes were gazing at him. Malasha too
could I have abstained from lifting my arm at the moment that has
could I, and it cannot be seen if one looks on our life here as the
could act only through the medium of the state governments.
could all that matter in comparison with the will of God, without
could alone extricate us from the present uncertainty and from the
could be got from his answers. The old valet Tikhon, with sunken,
could be had at a low price. The tone of the proclamation was not as
could be heard around the campfires, Dolokhov turned into the
could be heard by the board in person or by attorney; in such cases it
could be the cause of events, history shows that the expression of the
could best handle the master for their own ends.
could bring him to thee, could take him by the hand and show him to
could close its doors and windows against all mankind, the victor in the
could do to prevent a duel. When the officer had gone away, Denisov,
could encounter the invincible Napoleon without fear, and he was
could fail to see it," the prince continued, evidently thinking of the
could find a quick and easy passage into all parts of the West and
could hardly excuse. If the French were less frequently the offenders,
could he no longer think the thoughts that had first come to him as he
could hear the sound of French words but could not distinguish them.
could hold its clergy and missionaries loyal to the crown and so
could know when their intimidation was effective. In this way the party
could no longer remain in Moscow and would leave for the army that
could not abandon the edifice of argument he had laboriously
could not alone make the republic great and prosperous or even free. All
could not at all make out: was it a glade in the wood lit up by the
could not be called wars, they did not accord with the theory, and
could not be discovered from the Shevardino Redoubt.
could not be otherwise, for in order that the will of Napoleon and
could not be responsible for what might happen. On the evening of
could not be said of the State Department or naval officers. In 1872
could not bring herself to leave him alone and for the first time in
could not but believe in the sincerity of those around him. Besides,
could not establish it because it was against the British constitution.
could not forgive the men who had so recently been in arms against the
could not get rid of them. Suddenly, on one of the officers' saying
could not get the two-thirds vote required for victory. For more than
could not help hearing; but it was evident that nothing the general
could not help loving the countess and the whole Rostov family, but
could not know the disease Natasha was suffering from, as no disease
could not make out whether the tea was strong or weak, and the samovar
could not solve all the pressing social questions of the time. The aid
could not surrender to a company, and though the French availed
could not weep. The old man too came up and kissed the waxen little
could not. Now only the commanders of detachments with staffs, and
could only have reference to the clever though shy, but observant
could perform a great deed, and to save his life--the life of M.
could put out a crop of any size. Beyond the Mississippi, however,
could put up an eight-room house." Thus in relation to the Far West the
could readily find an outlet to the land. Now all that was over. By
could remedy, for the peasants of the district burned their hay rather
could run no more. The Frenchman also stopped and took aim. Rostov
could see the gunners who had seized it straining to roll it quickly
could stay. Before they had ridden to the outskirts of the forest
could turn with confidence for those rewards of service which the
could understand the fondness some people have for confusing their
could, but now I can jest, and the more I jest and the calmer I am the
could, on the first of September, quite freely decide whether to
could. Bagration was slow in effecting the junction--though that was
council (the Emperor preferred indefiniteness), but certain persons
council chambers, not on the field of battle. Small in stature,
council could not alter the inevitable course of events and that
council to elucidate certain questions for the Emperor personally.
council, contrary to the views of the old generals Kutuzov and
councils of that party had undergone the change of heart reflected in
councils were reduced in size; one of the two houses, which several
counseled negotiation first, and, applying the Monroe Doctrine, was able
count and the other guests.
count at all, still less why he had to go by the back stairs, yet
count coming out from the dining hall into the anteroom, and he added:
count met the guests and saw them off, inviting them all to dinner.
count stood still at the window and listened.
count's hand got up and said something to the ladies. Anna Mikhaylovna
count's head. He seemed to be unable to understand the meaning of
count's house and now managed all his affairs, stepped softly into the
count's visitors settled themselves, some in the two drawing rooms,
countenance, opening his mouth awry, prepared to shout. The regiment
counter-revolutionists and those suspected of sympathy with the
counteract to some extent the independent spirit that was growing up in
counteracting the tendency to flexion; as much as 15 or 20 pounds may be
countermarches, things of which I understand nothing; and the day
countess also mentioned that Prince Andrew was among the wounded
countess and Sonya, and a fourth held the whole of the gossamer
countess and piloted the provincial Rostovs in Petersburg high
countess from the drawing room.
countess she should not speak French so much. It's not the time for it
countess those contemporaries of hers seemed to be the only serious
countess was not with them, the count decided to stay with Marya
countess who entered the room and glanced uneasily around, evidently
countess will be here in a few days. The countess is in a dreadful
countess), and only her stern but handsome face really joined in the
countess, "but I always wanted Nicholas to marry the princess, and had
countess, described their last days in Moscow, their departure, the
countess, who sat holding in one hand the snuffbox with its portrait
countess. In all his encounters with his son, the count was always
counties in the South were stripped of their colored laborers. The race
counties, and cities was established by the fourteenth amendment. The
countries at war and did establish a Court at the Hague for the
countries declared that, unless the United States undertook to look
countries of the Old World--the scientific use of the soils and
countries, from the debility which they cause, tend to aggravate and
countries--a measure equally futile in staying the depredations on
countries--rates which would have destroyed the American trade with the
country and the Tsar confer honors upon him, what does that matter?
country around unoccupied and to place troops below it. Some of the
country between the Ohio and the Great Lakes. In the South, the second
country by sending the Lewis and Clark expedition to explore it,
country for, out of the cash collected in the fish markets of Europe and
country gentlemen, small farmers, and yeomanry of the mother
country had the government taken such a wise and humane view of its
country house in the far distance.
country in which there are no filarial parasites in the lymph vessels,
country neighbor of the Rostovs, came to Moscow to pay her devotions
country to love!" Ten years later, when asked to write an ode for the
country was made by the farmers, especially on the frontier, in their
country was swept into war by the vehemence of the "Young Republicans,"
country will correct the evil of construction when it shall produce ill
country's inhabitants, robbing them or stealing to provision the army,
country, secured Kaskaskia and Vincennes and laid a firm grip on the
country, which had timidly turned to the Old World for capital in
country," ran one plank, "we demand the passage of such laws as may be
country. A great association, known as the Frankfort Company, bought
country. At the end of the century they had one-half the mills, the two
country. Evidently the government was no longer limited to the duties of
country. In this long battle, Emma Willard and Mary Lyon led the way;
country. Our Emperor joined the army to encourage it to defend every
country. They were almost entirely excluded from the exercise of the
country. Thus the colonists in the end profited from the restrictive
country.' The manufacturing states say to their Southern colonies: 'You
country.... Many of the emigrants were men of wealth, as the old lists
country; and that the vote for Douglas, Bell, and Breckinridge meant a
country; but he that stands it now deserves the love and thanks of men
country; in 1890 more than one-third of the population dwelt in towns of
countrymen on the pressing theme that would not be downed: "What part
countrymen to beware lest the colonists declare that "a government
countrymen, President Wilson, soon after the election, addressed "peace
countryside. All through the North and in some of the Southern colonies,
county a province. In the secret orders there were enrolled over half a
couple, every corner of the Empire, receiving complaints, redressing
coupled with the return of a majority of Republicans to the Senate, made
couples out of the circle. All but one rejoined their companies.
course have not the slightest idea what a treasure they possess in
course of a few days the damaged area of skin becomes of a greyish
course of a month; and there was Vasilisa, the wife of a village
course of an operation, the arm is abducted and rotated laterally or
course of events--the more reassured he was that everything would be
course of public events and grasp the significance of political
course of the battle.) So the battle of Borodino did not take place at
course of the disease. It is probable that many of the cancer cells
course of the lymph trunks are the _lymph glands_, which possess a
course of the nerve. The nerve is very sensitive to pressure, and, if
course of the struggle, the Federalist leaders came perilously near to
course of the war, President Wilson stated the purposes which actuated
course of this uprising, draft headquarters were destroyed; the office
course of time the vertebral column becomes rigid, the head is bent
course to which they had long been accustomed. The French Revolution
course, not to be thought of, all the same the young people might be
course," he added, "for if the peasant is naked and hungry and has
course. He received Genet coldly. The demand that the United States aid
course. The revolt against American rule did but convince him of the
course. Viewing with extreme tenderness the case of the debtor, their
court and at the grand balls was divided into several circles, each
courteous gentleman who was particularly anxious to make the young
courteous. Kindle in all hearts the flame of virtue. Share thy
courteously replied in the affirmative to a request for assistance in
courtly orator, had in a great speech delivered in the Senate in
courts. In the autumn of that year the President, acting under the terms
courtyard of the landowner's house. Having ridden in, he dismounted
courtyard, turned the corner, and ran up into the porch.
courtyard. The voices were those of the orderlies who were packing up;
cousin. The old countess sat with a blissful yet sad smile and with
covenant binding the nations in a permanent association for the
covered by epidermis; the skin glands and hair follicles are usually
covered parts of the body, where a scar is of no importance. Its chief
covered the lower part of his face, and a tangle of hair, infested
covered with feeble granulations and grey shreddy sloughs. The edges are
covered with granulations, which subsequently lead to the formation of
covering can only be derived from the margins--the skin glands being
covering, and retained in position by a many-tailed bandage. The
coverings. When the condition has lasted for some time, indurated
coveted territory west to the Mississippi River, but it left unsolved
coveted the west coast of North America, proposed to send an army to aid
cowardice when he delayed the bold stroke at slavery. Anti-war Democrats
crack of the cattle driver's whip and the hum of the factory: the West
crack of whips, shouts, the urging of horses, and the swearing of
crackings, and aching, aggravated by changes in the weather. The
crackled, the snow was melting, and black shadows of soldiers
crackling from yielding of the thin shell. The swelling may pulsate, and
crackling of campfires and the voices of many men had grown quiet, the
crafty man convinced of the futility of being cunning with so
cranial nerves, particularly the oculomotor and the hypoglossal, may
crashed to earth with his horse. Zherkov and the staff officer bent
creak. The countess was sitting up in bed and speaking softly.
creaked, and the steps of a belated arrival were heard. "There's
creaking of springs, and the tramp of horses' hoofs were heard.
cream-cheese. From the addition of a sufficient number of leucocytes,
created for happiness, that happiness is within him, in the
created our responsibility, before the world and with the unorganized
created the interstate commerce commission and forbade many abuses on
created were to be embraced all the Allied and Associated Powers and
creator, upholder, and ruler of the World." By one circumstance or
creature of state governments. It was erected by the people and derived
credit to be redeemed by the states on the basis of their respective
credit which Eastern bankers were able to extend to the grain and
credit, announced that they would close their doors if the Democrats won
crepitation is absent. There is little tendency to the formation of
crepitation may be felt from crushing of the delicate framework of new
crept in among the French now considered everything possible.
crew. This tragedy, ascribed by the American public to the malevolence
cried in a trembling voice to his coachman. The caleche flew over
cried, quite convinced that she spoke the truth.
cries behind some trees on the right and saw a group of girls running to
crime, the basis of representation therein shall be reduced in the
crimes he has committed so successfully, he reaches Paris, the
criminal and at the same time pacify the mob.
crisis created by the cotton blockade would in time literally compel
critical period of shock, especially at the end of a severe operation.
criticism and was about to reply, when the expected footsteps were
criticism from Republican quarters; but, with the same firmness, he set
criticism might touch the sovereign himself.
criticism of the position at Tsarevo-Zaymishche--as he had listened to
criticism was directed against the League. Article X guaranteeing
criticism, welcomed March 4, 1809. His friends urged him to "stay by the
criticisms in party platforms in Stanwood, _History of the Presidency_,
criticizing the authorities. Still the public interest languished. When
critics were even more savage. The editor of the _Foreign Quarterly_
critics, was a government favor to speculators; the assumption of state
crop exceed in value the output of the mines.
crops without enjoying the picturesque title of "farmerettes" and they
cross section of a particular nerve the component bundles can be
cross the Lech, we can cross the Danube, throw ourselves on his line
cross the Niemen.
cross the path of his caleche. Ahead of the rest and nearer to him ran
cross-section of the bone at the saw-line; or tubular, extending up the
crossed the Dnieper at night by stealth at a wooded spot.
crossed the ballroom, pointing to Natasha.
crossed, so that they had to go round by the ford, and he sent
crossing between the campfires to the other side of the road where
crossing from side to side. The carts, in each of which three or
crossing the ballroom with his heavy waddling gait, he was arrested by
crossing themselves, and the reading of the church service, the
crossing to the other side of the Kolocha to the left of the highroad,
crossly, and buried her face in the pillow.
crossroads. Black figures flitted about before the fire, and through
crowd began at once to disperse through the village.
crowd of dogs. Only the delighted "Uncle" dismounted, and cut off a
crowd on the open space, she, in her rich satin cloak with a bright
crowd standing on the pasture by the barn.
crowd stood in a semicircle. The crowd consisted of a few Russians and
crowd was pressing round him. Pierre went up to the circle that had
crowd went in the direction of the Lubyanka Street.
crowd were suddenly heard saying, and the general attention turned
crowd) that they could not let the princess go, that there was an
crowd, killing five and wounding half a dozen more. The day after the
crowd, the dusty leaves of the trees on the boulevard, the sounds of
crowd. The soldiers near the gun waved their arms and beat the
crowded Rostov in the narrow shanty. Rostov looked at him in
crowded at the gateway. Through the smoke, as he approached the
crowded together, crushing one another, dying, stepping over the dying
crowding around the dams and banks of the ponds near the village of
crowds of whom set off to the neighboring villages, or returned from
crowing like a cock, but the elder members glanced severely at the
crown of Great Britain was suddenly broken, the patriot leaders,
crown to develop over the whole continent a network of vast estates. In
crown, the Puritan monopoly was broken down in Massachusetts, and that
crown. "Old Magna Carta was not the beginning of all things," retorted
crowned heads. Now the Pope's turn has come and Bonaparte doesn't
crumpled shako on the back of his head. He came up to the porch
crumpling and smoothing out the end of her sash while she looked at
crush the hydra of revolution, which has become more terrible than
crushing defeat to the Confederate troops and more than once the union
crushing of a nerve by the sudden displacement of a sharp-edged fragment
crutch in the axilla, by the dislocated head of the humerus, or by
crutch in the axilla--"crutch paralysis." In some of these injuries,
cry when touched. The mother discovers that the pain is caused by moving
crystals, and other detritus in the deposit.
culminated in the Civil War.
culprits at Otradnoe. Mitenka himself, returning tipsy from the
cultivate the fresh-air habit, which is as beneficial in syphilis as in
cultivated on a large scale by machinery. Again it assumed the form of
cultivated the soil and possessed the local interest and independence
cultivation of tobacco and rice. The Piedmont Plateau, lying back from
cultivation were simple and easily learned. They tested neither the
cultivation, the abandoned farms of the New England hills bearing solemn
culture in the pus. Sometimes other pyogenic organisms are superadded.
cumulative, as the organisms not only multiply in the tissues, but in
cunning court liar, frightened of the name of Napoleon, and that by
cunning smile, as if flattered at being made the subject of
cunning, on mistakes, on craft, or on the weakness of a diplomatist, a
cupolas glittering like stars in the sunlight.
curative operation is proceeded with; the instruments used for the
cure by a process of obliteration, similar to the obliteration of
cure is complete the expansile pulsation is lost, and there remains a
cure. The most satisfactory treatment is to excise the affected tissues
curiosity and agitation, like that of the whole crowd, reached the
curiosity everyone tried to get a glimpse of the projectiles as they
curiosity, no longer looked at the French but paid attention to the
curiosity. Pierre stood rather far off and could not hear all that the
curiosity. The Cossack was dead, but the horse still struggled.
curiosity. The accountant, a stout, full-faced man, looked around
curlpapers, ran in. The countess--her prayerful mood dispelled--looked
curly head to her knees and made the whole room ring with her
currency made the exchange of money and goods extremely difficult, and,
currency question and offered a new solution in the form of the federal
currency streamed from the press and debts were accumulated. Commerce
currency. The experience of the states with paper money, painfully
current coin of the United States;
current, to the effect that the Duc d'Enghien had gone secretly to
curtailed. Thus they learned by bitter experience the national
curvatures of the stomach, from cancer of the pylorus; and those in the
curved, misshapen bones covered only by the skin (Fig. 135). In the
curved. The middle of the upper lip formed a sharp wedge and closed
customary place before an icon of the Blessed Virgin, let into the
customers, here were rivals. In the place of helpless reliance upon
customs and dress they sometimes adopted, the squatters spent their days
customs officers in his grim determination to enforce the law.
cut away the nail fold as well as the portion of nail in the infected
cut from the side of the head to fill a defect in the cheek, having in
cut it off from its blood supply (Fig. 130). If the overlying skin is
cut off by large French forces. Everyone was dissatisfied with the
cut out opposite the callosity. After soaking in hot water, the
cutaneous branch of the radial.
cutaneous branch, or when the dorsal branch of the musculo-cutaneous
cutaneous glands. The cells are small and closely packed together in
cutaneous nerve of the forearm (external cutaneous branch), there is no
cutaneous or mucous surface. It usually represents the path by which the
cutaneous or subcutaneous gumma in the tertiary stage of syphilis. When
cutlets, and all the other details of life ordered by the doctors, the
cuts the vessel across without occluding it. The separation of the
cutters. All over the North labor leaders arose--men unknown to general
cutting New England off from the rest of the colonies. No wonder the
cyanosis. It has been shown by Wright of Boston, that the coloration is
cyanosis. The condition is attended with a high mortality. Only in the
cycling, walking, or dancing. There is pain in raising the heel from the
cylinder is the medullated sheath, composed of a fatty substance known
cylinders of nerves, and the muscles. The condition does not occur in
cylinders. Another view is that the formation of new axis cylinders is
cyst upon adjacent structures, and the occurrence of suppuration, are
cyst-forming parasites, the best known being the taenia echinococcus,
cysts are small, usually about the size of a pin-head, and they are
cysts or wens are described with diseases of the skin. _Exudation cysts_
cysts_, and being most commonly met with in the region of the saphenous
d'oeuvres and dishes and arranged them on the table. When she had
daily into the muscles of the affected limb, or directly into the nerve
dainty gray dress, girdled with a broad ribbon just below the breast.
dalmatic and, making the sign of the cross on his breast, began in a
damage of the nerve, but to overstretching of the extensors of the wrist
damaged nerve, and of the parts which it supplies.
damaged plaster of the wall. "Who is that man?" said he, looking
damages done by Germany and her allies; (4) the disposition of German
damask curtain flapping and blew out the candle with its chill,
damp, another hung his coat over the window to keep out the draft, and
dampness of the evening, he went into the large division of the tent
dance the count, breathing deeply, waved and shouted to the
dance. What was expressed by the whole of the count's plump figure, in
danced, to a tune in which the weary musicians blundered, and while
dancer's sprain," affecting the muscles of the calf. The patient
dancing all together. Then the violins played very shrilly and merrily
dancing began in which Nicholas still further captivated the
dancing room, they still heard the laughter and merry voices trying to
dancing, but the governor's little wife placed her plump hand on his
dancing, he stood in the doorway, stopping now one pair and now
danger of being recognized, Rostov went close to the porch, together
dangerous to life, because of the destructive changes produced in such
dangerous to life. In the tongue the tertiary ulcer may prove the
dangerous, as the proximity of the intestine furnishes a constant
dangerous, either by spreading into the large venous trunks or by giving
dare to let him see her. The fact that he did not, as she had
daredevil of an hussar married and settled down. Among these was the
daren't say so. It will be as I said at the beginning of the campaign,
dark and the glow of two conflagrations was the more conspicuous.
dark at first, the hoarfrost on the dusty grass, the Sparrow Hills,
dark patch meets the normal skin of the chest (Beach and Cobb). Pressure
dark purple clouds, but no rain. The ground was damp but not muddy,
dark-haired general who was just ascending the knoll.
dark-red area which extends over the cheek (Fig. 23). The tissue
darkened and he went up to the boy.
darkened of this man on whom the responsibility for what was happening
darkness, and the drummer boy came to the door.
darkness, the man paused, then moved with cautious steps toward the
darted out of the room.
dash the town of Cantigny and all other objectives, which were organized
dashed past. Anatole was sitting upright in the classic pose of
dashing a fellow he would appear as he passed the commander.
date, colonial trade was but one-twelfth of the English export business;
date; there are abundant giant cells of the myeloma type, and
dating from intra-uterine life and probably due to a disturbance in the
daughter a gallop round the room. Out of breath, he took the
daughter and placing an arm on the back of the chair on which she sat,
daughter got up to go and the two young men rose to let them pass.
daughter moved to Moscow. At that time enthusiasm for the Emperor
daughter with special politeness and showed them to the princess'
daughter's absence, knocked at the door.
daughter, and while he laughed the expression on his face clearly
daughter, ending in the mother's sacrificing herself and offering
daughter, entered the drawing room, their dresses rustling.
daughters of farmers from the different New England states." It was not
day Kutuzov was appointed commander in chief with full powers over the
day after, merely to avoid responsibility or to please the Emperor,
day and no one else. At that time the two famous decrees were being
day before with proposals and demands for him to join up with the army
day before--she felt a need of being angry and would choose as the
day from the marshal. What marshal this was, Pierre could not learn
day had been disturbed by party discord. High words had passed over the
day of March next following, then the Vice-President shall act as
day of that time! But it was gone forever. Her presentiment at the
day on the new steamer _Grecian_ "against the whole weight of the
day on which they shall give their votes; which day shall be the same
day that the enemy had been in a certain position the day before, by
day, O Lord, and grant us Thy salvation; make the hearts of Thy
day, and that the richest peasants (who formed the deputation) had
day, before leaving, Prince Andrew went to his son's rooms. The boy,
day, he was taciturn, and the old prince noticing this also became
day, since he had first seen the enemy and fired the first shot, and
day, the people concerned themselves to get this fine young
day--a debt that strained all the resources of the Federal government in
day. And the happiness of taking communion, or "communing" as Agrafena
day: the princess' eyes grew dim, she could not see and could not hear
daylight to Kutuzov: if the defense failed, to throw the blame on
days (Lyon). In cases of haemorrhage the leucocytosis is increased by
days happy, and as widow of the Grand... the prince would no longer be
days he spent in Moscow after the death of Count Bezukhov, he would
days of Cortez. Their clamor for "the restoration of the land to the
days of Jamestown on through the years, the American people were
days this is replaced by the growth of _granulations_, which are of
days, was followed by a disappearance of the disease over a period which
days. The natives were given a voice in their government and the power
dazzled by the sight of Murat's mantle and ostrich plumes, qu'il n'y
dazzled her still more. The host and hostess, who had already been
de Beausset's face and he glided away to the other generals.
de Tolly risked his life everywhere at the head of the troops, I can
dead and fall as lightly as fish scales. The beekeeper closes the
dead bone is separated from the living by the agency of granulation
dead bone, and subsequently with deformity characterised by loss of the
dead flesh that he looked round to see where the smell came from. Next
dead portion is cast off, as in other forms of dry gangrene, by the
dead portion produce a furrow--the _line of demarcation_--which
dead, it proceeds to form new bone with great activity, so that the dead
deafness; depressed scars or nodes on the bones from previous gummata;
deal with villains in our own way! When the time comes I shall want
dealing and conversing with those in the highest spheres.
dealing with Great Britain; by others, a more vigorous handling of the
dealing with new people outside the ordinary routine of her life.
dealing with problems of motion admits the conception of the
dealing with the Indians?
dealings with her father, and always at the thought of enemies and
dear invalid?" said she, as though unaware of the cold offensive
dear, there's friendship for you," he repeated. "He's joining the
dear," and using the formal "you" instead of the intimate "thou" in
death due, as a rule, to a diminution in the arterial blood supply of
death from blood-poisoning frequently followed even the most trivial
death had torn from her half her life. When the news of Petya's
death may result from an innocent tumour in the air-passage causing
death of tissue taking place on a free surface. It is essentially of the
death produced by a _gradual_ diminution in the quantity of blood
death that Borodino was a victory, despite the assurance of generals
death's head. The stranger sat without stirring, either resting or, as
death, and he saw above him the remote, lofty, and everlasting sky. He
death, and the old countess' grief fell blow after blow on the old
death, probably from paralysis of the vagus. Sudden death from cardiac
death. The faults he had--if he had any--were not of his making. So he
death?" And by some latent sequence of thought the descent of the
debate. While it was in the stage of mere reform all Americans favored
debates had gone on for a few weeks, Madison came to the conclusion that
debates in the public forum. Women shared that fireside sifting of
debates, John Brown's raid, the election of Lincoln, and secession.
debt, daily mounting as the unpaid interest accumulated. In a _Report on
debts was a deep design to undermine the state governments; Congress had
debts. This threw most of them into opposition to the Whig program for a
debut, remembered her conversation at the window, and with an
decade; while the number of persons employed almost doubled. There was
decades after the Civil War were the theories of American
decays and so forth is equally right with the child who stands under
deceiving himself, find reason for rejoicing in the calculation that
decent reception, an indirect demand for an apology respecting the past
deception. Whatever he tried to be, whatever he engaged in, the evil
decide the question for or against amputation. If thorough purification
decided not by the orders of a commander in chief, nor the place where
decided not to come to the drawing room when he called to see her
decided opposition to the Republicans and their policies.
decided that he would rather wash himself with water in the barn.
decided to send a dispatch to the staff.
decided what to do with him, the officer cried, "I surrender!" He
decided, with the rapidity with which young people change their views,
decision in Massachusetts. Swift couriers were sent to carry the news to
decision in the McCulloch case. "Each public officer," he argued, "who
decision of the Supreme Court of the United States. The union of these
decision was also an index to the diversity of opinion that divided both
decisions of that Court. This was strong medicine for the authors of the
decisive moment had arrived. With the air of a practical Petersburg
decisive, save in the border states where thousands of men continued to
declaration of faith, the Democrats, with Mr. Bryan at the head, raised
declaration of war, steps were taken to give military assistance to the
declare it right; you must advocate its extension." The challenge, so
declare the Missouri Compromise null and void as being inconsistent with
declared elective on the theory that their appointment "smacked of
declared null and void the income tax law just enacted by Congress, thus
declared such legislation unconstitutional; the Supreme Court declared
declared that "more than two-thirds of the people would prefer the
declared that "the government of the United States is at present the
declared that it would transfer the seat of power to the "great cities
declared that the convention had no claim to represent the voters of the
declared that the earth was stationary and that the planets moved
declared that the nullification of all unconstitutional acts of Congress
declared that their cause "was as holy as the cause of liberty--the
declared the Jay treaty "an infamous act which is really nothing more
declared to be perpetual and the right of a state to secede settled by
declared unconstitutional by the Supreme Court it was reenacted with the
declared war upon America. The answer was swift and firm. The national
declaring afterward that he did not at the time understand their
declaring it unconstitutional. Conservative men were alarmed by the
declaring the Constitution to be a mere compact and the states competent
decline, but took the note quietly and thanked her.
declined them. Though the conversation was very incoherent and Vera
declining, but immediately put her hand gaily on the man's shoulder,
decomposition of sordes on the teeth and gums of a debilitated patient.
decorating the icon. The singing did not sound loud under the open
decorations for the Finnish war also. In 1809 he was a captain in
decorations, who were giving him the salute, he looked at them
decorations. She ran up to him and, in the play of the sunlight that
decree, the action would "be very hard indeed to reconcile with the
deduced for himself the following of the state of affairs.
deductible, and don't have the staff to handle it even if there are
deductible, and don't have the staff to handle it even if there are
deed, imagined oppressors whose victims he would rescue. Of the
deed. The most suitable fete the Germans can devise for him is a
deed. They blamed Kutuzov and said that from the very beginning of the
deemed a menace to the union. At a later date the area thus ruled by
deep black. The most remarkable feature is the rapidity with which the
deep bow to Princess Mary came to a halt by the doorpost.
deep breath, as a man does at the coming of something long hoped
deep influence on the life and culture of a people. The feudal and
deep inguinal and external iliac glands. The femoral glands often
deep layer of the periosteum and its continuation--the capsular
deep salient made by the Germans into the French lines, American
deep sensibility is usually retained. If the tendons are divided as
deep was the influence of sea power on the fate of nations. He was aware
deep, the duration of treatment is materially shortened by a thorough
deep-seated joints, such as the hip. It disappears under anaesthesia.
deep-toned bell clanging. The side horses, pressing against the shafts
deeper layers of the synovial membrane or in the adjacent bone or
deeper parts of the wound, the surface is being covered over by
deeper parts, and when situated over the skull may be lodged in a
deeply as they did the resources of individuals and the interests of the
deeply hidden longing was for earthly love. The more she tried to hide
deeply moved by the poverty of the great industrial cities, had
deeply placed, such as those within the thorax, or those situated
deeply the loss of her father which was associated in her mind with
deer and the buffalo of their forests, and who know they are Americans
defeat in the presidential campaign of 1816.
defenders into the political conflict that centered at Washington.
defending us. But Vienna is on the other side. No, the bridge has
defense exclaimed to the jury that the very cause of liberty itself, not
defense of the English revolution in the seventeenth century. American
defense swift and paralyzing strokes at the North were later deemed
defense, the habit of sharing common burdens, the fusing force of common
defer his return till the beginning of the new year. Natasha was still
deferentially addressed the horseman with the white plumes,
defiance by the Republicans. Mr. Bryan, whom they selected as their
defiling through the town of Enns on both sides of the bridge.
define it, differs in no way from gravitation, or heat, or the force
define these terms in the first instance.
defined his position. The South, he admitted, was entitled under the
definite and distinct groups of symptoms--such as the convulsions of
definite and well-known, but quite false, conception. All the
definite to allow of its clinical recognition. In the vertebrae, or in
definite, but the rumor of an attack spread through the squadron.
definitely passed into industrialism. The number of city dwellers
definitely whether the League devised at Paris could be recast in such a
definition in cancerous tumours explains the difficulty of completely
definition of the conception of freedom and inevitability themselves
deformans with erosion and ulceration of the cartilage and a form of dry
deformities at the knee (genu valgum, genu varum, and genu recurvatum),
deformities occur in the spine, pelvis, and lower extremities, and
deformities of the face caused by gunshot wounds and by petrol burns in
deformities resulting from rickets rather than from the active disease.
deformity of the great toe, which usually takes the form of hallux
deformity, especially when the legs are affected. The bedclothes are
deformity, the patient suffers from blocking of the nose, loss of smell,
deformity. In a case observed by Byrom Bramwell, the patient suffered
deft movements, in the man's well-ordered arrangements in his
deftly on the spot where he stood.
degeneration and absorption and the stroma contracts, the tumour becomes
degeneration and death of the granulation tissue under the necrotic
degeneration and liquefaction of tissue may result in the formation of
degeneration and necrosis of the granulation tissue results in the
degeneration from the surrounding connective tissue. In the region of
degeneration of its fibres, or in suppuration and the formation of one
degeneration, it is not capable of being regenerated, even should the
degeneration. It may originate in connection with a wound in the
degenerative changes, of the nature of caseation and necrosis, which
degenerative changes. The softer medullary forms are composed almost
deglutition, and pass off entirely in the intervals between attacks.
degradation of the moral tone. Is it or is it not a result of democracy?
degradation to the ranks would be the best that could be hoped for.
degree of enlargement of the epiphysial junctions is directly
degree of freedom and inevitability governing the actions of these
degree of oedema that occurs in such parts as the scrotum or the eyelids.
degree, and range from slight alterations in the structure of the
degrees of temperature, and the points of a compass.
degrees, as are also those of parts innervated from the sympathetic
degrees, but seldom reaches the normal. In a few days there is a second
deigned to summon us and the merchants. Millions will pour forth
dejected and frowning, sat on a bench by the bridge toying with his
delayed on account of popular hostility to the practice of polygamy. The
delayed, and only become prominent when pus forms and approaches the
delayed, death usually occurring in from two to four days from the
delegate, the very men the serfs would themselves have chosen had they
delegate, was driven off the platform of a temperance convention in New
delegates brushed aside the plea that "the balance of power between the
delegates dissented, foreshadowing the creation of the new state of West
delegates to a state convention called to cast off the yoke of the
delegation to renew the deafening applause. The platform as reported was
delegations at his home in Canton and discussed the issues of the
delegations of the people's will but are accidents dependent on
deliberate and habitual to him. His face took on the stupid artificial
deliberate opinion," pronounced Josiah Quincy in the House of
deliberately appeals to boys and girls on the very threshold of life's
deliberating," continued Napoleon with the same derisive and
deliberation of a man. As he approached the Kremlin he even began to
deliberative bodies, was exploded for all time; the election of the
delicacy, greater care, and at the same time more seriously than did
delicate arm, bare to above the elbow, lay on the velvet edge of the
delicate irony he questioned Prince Andrew about the details of his
delight in sacrificing everything. He was not occupied with the
delight of frenzy. He flung down the slab, broke it, and swooping down
delight the eye and the mind. And yet, poor and meager as the
delight us continually by falling from the sky.
delight, but for the first time picturing to himself her soul. And
delight, galloped ahead to clear a path for him through the troops. On
delighted at the unexpected rapidity of his pupil's progress, but
delighted him were the women, young and healthy, without a dozen
delighted..." came the sounds of animated feminine voices,
delirious from the agony. He kept asking them to get him the book
delivered up, to be removed to the State having jurisdiction of the
demand for fishing and merchant craft of every kind and thus keeping the
demand of officials to whom the count yielded reluctantly. He was
demand of the executive authority of the State from which he fled, be
demand of the tall lad who had pushed his way up to him, he began in a
demand to commence the action, and wishing to avert responsibility
demand. Finally he secured from the British government in 1871 the
demanded a general engagement. Lubomirski, Bronnitski, Wlocki, and the
demanded of her. She must sacrifice herself for the family that had
demanded the full measure of justice for the South: equal rights in the
demanding an immediate downward revision of the tariff.
demands of each craft. A third step was the federation of the unions of
demands of the men and refused to permit the arbitration of the points
demands on that country. Germany at once proposed that the issue should
demands police officers to guide the army to the Ryazan road. He
demands that the army should be rallied at Smolensk and should first
democracy. Early in his youth he had gone into the frontier of Tennessee
democracy. Its peace must be planted upon the tested foundations of
democratic revolution in the Old World.
demonstrated by injecting the sinuses with an emulsion of bismuth and
demonstrated by the most careful observations.
demonstrates the extent of the disease, the presence or absence of a
demonstrations which would very soon end in peace, and the view
demonstrations. Bells were rung; toasts to the king were drunk; and
demoralization had begun. The Kaiser had abdicated and fled into
denied the privilege of examination before a civil magistrate. A Vermont
denomination was the education of the children in the faith. In this
denominations, if they had the required amount of property, were
denounced the "fraud and violence practiced by the Democracy in the
denounced the President as erratic, dangerous, and radical and decided
denounced the abolitionists, and made a final plea for the Constitution,
denounced the war as a capitalist quarrel; but all the protests combined
denouncing the treaty as a departure from the ideals of the republic.
dense French column coming up to meet the Apsherons.
dense mass. Looking down over the rails Prince Nesvitski saw the
densely below, where they were descending. In front in the fog a
density, continuous with that of the surrounding bone. The shadow of the
denying the obligations of debtors, would not permit any move on the
department established under the constitution of 1795, managed, however,
departments of the government of the United States." Only one of the
departure of the princess and Dessalles with the little prince to
departure till next day to allow time for the relay horses to be
departure. For one of the merry cotillions before supper Prince Andrew
departure. The old count, suddenly setting to work, kept passing
depend on making the patient swallow substances for the most part
depend upon the action of the Progressives. If the breach created in
depend upon the possession of other powers than memory alone. The
depend upon the subsequent course of the disease, whether or not a
dependence on brute force, Davout sent an adjutant to call the officer
dependence upon the cotton exchanges of New York, New Orleans, and
dependent on and allied with the two mammoth or Rockefeller and Morgan
depends on the nature and amount of the stroma, and on the presence of
depends on the tendency which the epithelium has of invading the tissues
depicted on it and with a lid, and a gold snuffbox with the count's
depicting the so-called King of Rome spiking the earth with a stick,
depleted by neglect, until the entire coast line was patrolled with such
deplored the inadequacy of the militia and called for a real army. He
deported to the colonies for life in lieu of fines and imprisonment. The
deposit of laminated clot, and consequently the cure of the aneurysm;
deposited in the synovial membrane, in the tissues of which it can
deposited on the original shaft results in an increase in the girth of
deposition of lime salts and the formation of bone, there occurs a
deposits which formed a large part of the institution's funds. This
depressed below the level of the surrounding skin surface.
depressed. (4) The _surrounding tissues_, as to whether they are
depressing and painful to think of the danger, since it is not in
depressing than ever, and the countess fell ill from mental agitation.
depression and had made desperate efforts to combat it. Since the
depression at reverses. In the dark hour of the Revolution, "what held
depression in the cheek or forehead. It is ultimately converted into
depression or actual gap in the bone. Sometimes the cyst becomes
depression or an actual perforation of the calvaria; multiple gummata
deprived of the ballot. The special qualifications, laid down in several
deprived of the country life to which she was accustomed, youth
deprived," he thought as he lay in the semi-darkness of the quiet hut,
depth of the lesion. Six degrees are thus, recognised: (1) hyperaemia or
depth. The eschar is at first dry and crisp, and is surrounded by a zone
depths of the earth. Perhaps the red spot was a fire, or it might be
depwavity fwom them. The nobility don't gwudge theah lives--evewy
derangements, interference with the gastro-intestinal functions and also
derision. "I ought to know the Emperor by now, after the times I've
derived from an abnormal growth of all the elements of a tooth germ, or
derived from the distension of a tooth follicle. It constitutes a cyst
derived from the nutrient artery. The epiphyses are nourished by a
derived from the sympathetic system, are probably chiefly concerned with
derived from the synovial fluid (Fig. 167). The body is sometimes found
deriving nourishment from the complex organic compounds in which they
deriving the necessary nutriment from the surrounding fluid. The size
deriving their livelihood from one source: the labor of their own hands
dermoids to the post-anal gut; and _branchial dermoids_ in relation to
dermoids, save that mucous membrane takes the place of skin in the wall
descend to the level of the original discussion.
descendant of Rurik and ancestor of the Bolkonskis. Prince Andrew,
descendant of the hero of Tippecanoe, and a son of the old Northwest.
descended into that hollow, the smoke of the guns and musketry on
descended the porch steps.
descending branches, and the motor branches of the deep cervical plexus,
descending the hill, the French were firing, and he felt his heart
descending the valley. That moment of moral hesitation which decides
describe an actual historic event such as the campaign of 1812 for
describe and seize the apparently elusive--the life of a people.
describe the following groups:
described along with the surgery of the Extremities.
described by Eve under the name of multilocular cystic epithelial
described by Hutchinson and by Fournier, as it may be the source of
described by Jonathan Hutchinson as being met with in the domestic
described by Marie in 1890, is secondary to disease in the chest, such
described in injuries of the brachial plexus. The axillary nerve itself
described is available for their treatment--the choice lying between
described the engagement and his reception by the Minister of War.
described with the affections of scars.
described with the surgery of regions.
described--only in smaller doses. On the first appearance of syphilitic
describing an arc in the direction where most provisions were to be
describing the condition of an army) and this is what he said:
description of the dinner to his people in Germany; and he felt
description. A judicial scrutiny of the war reveals his thought and
description. In cottages and fields and along the highways the victims
description. The old man began to sing, in the cracked voice of old
descriptions of methods of travel into the West in the early days have
descriptions of that time without exception speak only of the
descriptive part of the letter. "And what a soul! Not a word about
desert was attacked with a will, some of them replying to the
desert, the home of the sage brush and the coyote! The level prairies of
deserted streets lit by the clear light of dawn. By Agrafena
deserter? Lincoln hears her petition, and grants it even against the
designation as "the man who does not give his name," and under that
designation of God, the three primordial elements--sulphur, mercury,
designed primarily to bring money into the empty treasury, declared in
designed solely for the protection of negroes. As centralized power over
designed to make the conditions in mills and factories safer and more
designed to restore the normal structure and configuration of the part.
designed to save public credit, likewise failed. In 1786, the Congress
designs. As it turned out he found plenty of sympathy across the Channel
desirable locations at the different towns on the line. There are still
desirable to leave the dressing undisturbed for ten days or more.
desire for anything, but joined the Freemasons merely to associate
desire to punish the Russians (Thiers says), and he issued the order
desire to save them; they felt that it could not be otherwise. The
desires the good of mankind. And what have they promised? Nothing! And
desires, prudent and honorable men, who cherished the ties that united
despair and hope were there, but all encompassed by the heavy tedium of
despairing face, felt sure she would fall ill on the journey. But
despairing gesture with his hand and passed through the room.
despairing sobs of a woman, and the hoarse angry shouting of
desperate struggle between slave owners and the advocates of freedom was
desperation a national lottery was held, producing meager results. The
desperation slammed the door with all her might.
despise the adjutant and the minister. "Away from the smell of powder,
despised them because of his old age and experience of life. The
despite his preoccupation with state affairs, himself visited the
despite the angry whispers of the adjutants who tried to stop him.
despite the doctor's encouragement. The countess passed a fortnight in
despite the incessant firing going on there he had no idea that this
despoiled of the stock and seeds necessary to renew agriculture.
desquamation of the surface layers of the epidermis. A special form of
destination or at least to some spot near it. Many people from the South
destined to a stormy career. Founded in 1830 under the leadership of
destiny by the hand of divinity itself, and can never be erased or
destiny greater than that of a prosperous dominion of the British
destiny of America. Circumstances beyond the control of popular
destroy faith in God, in the creation of the firmament, and in the
destroy it. It is the very essence of the soul. Yet how many people
destroy the French; for this flank march, had it been preceded,
destroy the foe, and a trial balloon that was to go up next day. The
destroy the organisms _in situ_. An ointment made up of calomel 33
destroy the temple of their fatherland. You can understand that
destroyed by digestive processes in the stomach and intestine. They may
destroyed by disease or removed by operation. The flat bones of the
destroyed by ordinary germicides, and by the gastric juice. The spores,
destroyed by ulceration. In the nose, especially when the ulcerative
destroyed or purified by means of the thermo-cautery or pure carbolic
destroyed or sunk without provision for the safety of crew and
destroyed the French army. In reality the results of the crossing were
destroyed, gleamed white in the distance with its towers and the
destroyed, new bone may only be formed in patches, or not at all. The
destroyed. Some talked about the Moscow militia which, preceded by the
destroyed. The soldiers and officers again demanded action. Generals
destroying in a mighty revolution of industry the world of the
destroying the nerve fibres, and must be brought into direct contact
destroying the overlying skin. _Carbon-dioxide snow_ may be employed in
destruction as hung over the French, and that the sick Frenchmen
destruction if found in the forbidden area. It was clear that Germany
destruction in the soft parts. The carious process is preceded by the
destruction of articular surfaces and masses of new bone around the
destruction of charters, and the use of troops produced in the colonies
destruction of free government." The solution offered was the historic
destruction of the French, which he alone foresaw, was his heart's one
destruction of the Prussian army at Jena and Auerstadt and the
destruction of the Russian army.
destruction of the adjacent joint.
destruction of the articular cartilage and exposure of the subjacent
destruction of the bank and the issuance of the "specie circular" of
destruction of the bank, a disordered currency, and a national panic.
destruction of the invading organisms or toxins. To increase the
destruction of the surrounding skin. The amount of granulation tissue
destruction of tissue involves chiefly the soft parts.
destruction. Henry Clay, the Whig candidate for President, taking into
destruction. In New York, the relations with the Indians, especially
destructive effect of the pointed bullet compared with that of the
destructive process is liable to implicate the wall of the vessel before
destructive, and result from the formation of gummata, either in the
detached by the formation of pus beneath it, the epiphysis is liable to
detached from the mechanism, swung about in an arbitrary and aimless
detached from the membrane and constitute loose bodies; they also
detached with the saw, or the loose fragments in a compound
detachment and Tula with its famous arsenal so indispensable to the
detachment of all) got to his appointed place at the right time.
detachment on the Znaim road he supposed it to be Kutuzov's whole
detachment operating to the left of Tarutino that troops of
detachment passed along the road and quickly disappeared amid the
detachments did not dare to contemplate. The Cossacks and peasants who
details of the action and our losses. The general whose regiment had
details of the battle, no longer dim, but definite and in the
details she had just seen were exactly what she had seen in the
details to the Austrian General Weyrother: a lucky accident had
details, and the assurance of possessing it agitated and awed him.
detain, the arm I then lifted is no longer the same as the arm I now
detained for some reason by order of the Higher Command. If they
detect signs of cowardice in the other. Both passed the examination
determination he had "waged war on the bosses," and pushed through the
determine the conditions under which Senators and Representatives from
determined by some injury. The joints of the lower extremity are most
determined violation of the law. As such the British government viewed
determining cause of tuberculosis. The question is not one of mere
determining the nature and condition of the wounds that have to be dealt
develop at a distance from the primary tumour, those, for example, in
develop in the peri-articular cellular tissue and result in abscesses.
develop in the region of the ossifying junction. The diaphysis is also
develop the natural resources of that country. Under the iron rule of
developed after a blow on the Orbit with a cricket ball.
developed oedema of the limb, with pitting of the skin on pressure. In
developed on the shores of the Atlantic; and that the future belongs to
developed, the attitude and general appearance are eminently
developed, the central slough with the surrounding vesicles and the
development a suitable food-supply in the form of proteins,
development of industry, the employer and capital investor were
development of mineral resources went on all during the Civil War. Alder
development of the medial condyle of the humerus, and by cubitus valgus.
development of the primary sore, and the enlargement of the nearest
development should be placed under the tutelage of certain powers acting
development, and as in true aneurysm, the pulsation and bruit disappear
development. Certain tumours, for example, are the result of some
developmental anomalies such as achondroplasia, _dwarfing_ of the
develops rapidly after spinal injuries and in the course of certain
deviate from the normal, giving rise to knock-knee or bow-knee. In
deviation from that theory. To this party belonged the foreign nobles,
devices of the Federalists. In 1816, they chartered for a period of
devil..." cried the old count. "My head's in a whirl!"
devised while serving at the outposts during the retreat. He had
devitalised tissue. If the wound is closed, the narrow space between its
devoid of any foundation. Prince Bagration turned to the old colonel:
devoid of freedom and entirely subject to the law of inevitability.
devoid of lime salts, but later becomes calcified, so that the bones
devoted to General Surgery, the other two to Regional Surgery. This
devoted to no calling or profession, merely enjoying the refinements of
devoted to the affairs of his regiment and was considerate and kind to
devotion and that she was ready to do anything for him and for the
devoured him warmed his body.) The one thing that was at first hard to
diabetes. In others there is sloughing of the flaps and death results
diagnosed them even better? What would the countess have done had
diagnosis a certainty; but as it is by no means easy to identify the
diagnosis of an intra-muscular tumour is made by observing that the
diagnosis, as the condition is apt to be attributed to an injury to the
diagnosis: the cause must be removed, and the condition so modified as
diagnostic importance in cancer of internal organs such as the rectum,
diagnostic signs, particularly in deeply seated joints such as the
diameter. The great majority are non-motile. They multiply by fission;
diaphysis of the femur may be projected into the popliteal space.
diarrhoea with blood-stained stools is not uncommon. The urine is small
dictionaries that were on the top.
did McKinley assure the Filipinos that the institutions and laws
did come, the very end?" Princess Mary sometimes thought. Night and
did everything the best of officers could do in his position, he was
did for the common good turned out to be useless and foolish--like
did he write in a letter to Paris that "the battle field was
did not at the time regard as being crimes.
did not cause the least embarrassment to Countess Bezukhova, who
did not dare dine at the Club as a pastime, did not dare spend money a
did not dare to. He stood irresolutely beside him in the passage. Then
did not do it for my own sake. I was bound to act that way.... The
did not fall on the cot.
did not fall, something was still stretching out, and the candle
did not flatter her friend, the princess' eyes--large, deep and
did not forget to look at it again when Alexander came out. The
did not hear the slightest sound from the study after that.
did not know whether a certain order received in the form of advice
did not let him and, on the other, Pierre himself feared to begin to
did not let it out of her hands. The tutors came, and the nurses,
did not lift his stick again but hurried into the house.
did not move, though her little bare foot, thrust out from under the
did not prepare for it. The inhabitants left against his wishes. If
did not recognize in this big, stout man in a peasant coat the
did not run naturally to abstruse economic questions; and owing to the
did not see herself. She listened to the sounds in the hall. When
did not see the enemy on the other side of the river, and for a long
did not see those who, judging by the sound of hoofs and voices, had
did not stay silver on its downward course. Thereupon the silver faction
did not then and do not now exist for those for whom the purpose of
did not turn the Russian position.
did not wait to be called. The shapely figure of the fair-haired
did not want to cry just then she glanced indifferently at the
did so much to precipitate the Civil War. Lying to the north of Kansas,
did the proprietors and the governors who succeeded one another, in an
did was to enwich the pwiests' sons and thieves and wobbahs...."
did well and in that case badly. He behaved admirably at the beginning
did, only reached the quarter where Pierre was staying by the
didn't know the right charm. He catches him and catches him--no
die in her daughter's arms during the journey--as, judging by what the
died he saw the wheat fields of North Dakota linked with the spinning
died of cold and want in the woods; finally, in its march from
died or been seriously disabled, the Revolution would have ended....
died that same year and, as always happens, after the father's death
died, and how glad I am that he is alive again!" On one side of the
dies _en masse_, as distinguished from the molecular or cellular death
diet, improving the surroundings, and preventing deformity. Phosphorus
differ materially from the regular companies created for trade and
differed from the Mississippi Valley states. That was in the
differed in any way from the other, unexecuted orders but because they
difference between a man who says that the people of the West moved on
difference from ordinary burns is the extreme slowness with which
difference of opinion. The traditional view of Konig is that in the knee
difference, that it was livelier in the towns in consequence of the
differences in the point of view from which we regard the event, but
different branches of the service, who all looked with astonishment at
different branches on the face, and pressure over one or other of these
different branches, it was the serf who especially attracted his
different campaigns, and even in different fields of the same campaign.
different conjectures as to where and from what side the beast would
different directions, and a few minutes later the chief forces of
different from those met with in the entrenched warfare in France in
different individuals, and in the same individual under different
different joints is fairly constant and is determined by the anatomical
different kinds, all of which are incommensurate with the movement
different levels. During the healing process an excess of fibrous tissue
different parts of the field, or to the driving of the herdsman,
different parts of the skeleton: while the long bones, the scapula, the
different roads.... The provisions I would purchase in the same manner
different rooms came together and crowded in the large drawing room by
different temperatures. While these tests are being carried out, the
different type were invading the Pacific slope. Long before Polk ever
different ways, and one of them, the Senate, was made a check on the
different, holding its breath while the ball flew past, rose in the
different--an unpleasant character and has not the same
differential of history, that is, the individual tendencies of men)
differentiate the lesions from a torn medial meniscus in which the pain
differentiate tuberculous dactylitis from the enlargement of the
differentiated from without inwards into the stratum corneum, the
differently the two Empresses behaved in these difficult
differs from any other force. The forces of gravitation,
difficult but impossible for the Russians to stop this movement, to
difficult by the retraction of the ends and by their adhesion to
difficult or nasty had to be done--to push a cart out of the mud
difficult position of the Russian people. There were the same
difficult to compare the contending forces in the revolutionary contest.
difficult to explain what caused the Russians after the departure of
difficult to get efficient labor to till the vast plantations. The
difficult to imagine any aim more worthy or more consonant with the
difficult to master the fatigue of his old and feeble body.
difficult to recognize in this robust, motherly woman the slim, lively
difficult, a portion may be resected from each of the nerve-trunks at a
difficulties of the actual position. Stories were whispered of how
difficulties only because they were apprehensive as to how the
difficulties, he bade the world wait to see what would be brought forth
difficulties--engineering, labor, and sanitary--the American forces in
difficulties. The surplus in the treasury had been dissipated by 1861
difficulty because of its intimate connection with the epiphysial
difficulty in breathing usually takes place during the night, and once
difficulty in breathing. He was not at the ice hills, nor at the
difficulty in carrying out the proper treatment of the primary surgical
difficulty in overcoming the infection than younger adults. Malarial and
difficulty in securing admission to the union. The first, Nebraska, had
difficulty in swallowing. The left recurrent nerve may be stretched or
difficulty of recognizing the subjection of personality to the laws of
difficulty of removing the naevus without leaving a scar which is even
difficulty repress the sobs that rose to her throat. He said
difficulty that had presented itself to the colonel). "Charmed to make
difficulty, went to the small sitting room.
diffuse brownish or bluish pigmentation of the skin of the lower third
diffuse haziness or steaminess near the centre of the cornea, and as it
diffused throughout the skeleton--we have seen it in the skull and in
diffusely infected, the appearance is either that of a multitude of
diffusing the organisms in the tissue, and is only to be employed under
digestion is not impaired. Benefit is also derived from the
digital examination of the rectum or vagina is of great value in
digits it has been called _lupus mutilans_. In the lower extremity a
dignity of the state, if any might be bold enough to question it, was
dignity, Murat solemnly drew himself up, assumed the pose in which
dilatation of a large superficial vein and its tributaries is the most
dilatation of the superficial veins, by throwing an increased amount of
dilatation. A careful consideration of the position in which the
dilatation. Little is known regarding the _etiology_ of naevi beyond the
dilate, the skin becomes moist with a clammy sweat, and nausea with
diligently named. More than half the ladies already had partners and
diluted toxins and the growth of the bone in length exaggerated. In
dimensions; the same adhesion of the people of Central Europe to the
diminish its volume and force as to favour the deposition within the sac
diminished and the formation of coagula favoured. Similarly, in wounds
diminished in size. When the nose is attacked, both the skin and mucous
diminished when the tribunal of arbitration found that Great Britain was
diminishes or increases according to the greater or lesser
diminishes the outflow of venous blood, and so may determine gangrene of
diminishing thickness (Fig. 145). The inflammatory lesions at the ends
diminishing this risk. If cleansing is carried out within the first six
diminution in the next dose. If, on the other hand, the local as well as
diminution in the number of leucocytes. The false membrane may separate
diminution in the size or tension of the swelling, and when the pressure
dimly burning among the French Guards, and in the distance those of
dimpled or puckered when an attempt is made to pinch it up. As the fat
dimpling of the overlying skin, the lobulation of the tumour, which is
dine that evening at Speranski's, "with only a few friends," as the
dined alone--the countess had many visitors I do not like. I ate and
dined and given popular ovations that turned his head. He thought the
dining room and that Prince Michael Zakharych was in the library,
dining room came the resounding strains of the polonaise:
dinner called the count aside and implored him with tears to take
dinner party at the Karagins', and Marya Dmitrievna took them there.
dinner!... And there, look at this.... Well, my boy," the old prince
dinnerless, had been whipped and sent to the village in quest of
dinners," said he, "but the health of our Sovereign, that good,
diplomacy was set down to the credit of the State Department.
diplomat. Another group was at the tea table. Pierre wished to join
diplomatic questions of the most delicate character arose. For more than
diplomatist fresh from Berlin with the very latest details of the
diplomatists of the time (Joseph de Maistre and others) recognized.
diplomatists still firmly believed in the possibility of peace and
diplomatists think that their disagreements are the cause of this
direct blow, a crush, or a grazing form of violence. If the force acts
direct legislation amendment to the state constitution. Within ten years
direct participation of the Deity in human affairs.
directed against it, the man sent there was this same irresolute and
directed his will to the fulfillment of the divine ends, and that
directed the movement that induced the New York legislature to establish
directed the movement which ended in the capture of Charleston in 1780,
directed to one and the same threefold end: (1) to brace all his
directed to seeking the correlation of cause and effect in people's
directed to the state of the main blood vessels, in order to determine
directing the march rode backward and forward between the carts. Their
direction along the hollow. The first to come into view was Milka,
direction backward and slightly upward against the brim of the pelvis,
direction from which the shouting came. He felt both frightened and
direction of De Lesseps, the hero of the Suez Canal, had made a costly
direction of Tushin's battery. Prince Andrew followed with the
direction of affairs was entrusted to men enjoying the king's
direction of all our levies, both those now barring the enemy's path
direction of spread of the abscess and the situation of resulting
direction of the conflagration. As if urging each other on, the
direction of the whole herd is constantly altered, this is because
direction the army should take in its retreat. Malasha, who kept her
direction toward the valley and disappearing one after another into
direction, but though the columns would have been visible quite far
direction, hence tenderness over the inflamed bursa may disappear when
direction. From the study, like pistol shots, came the frequent
direction. He negotiated, with Denmark, a treaty providing for the
direction. President Polk, accepting the Texan view of the controversy,
direction: from the suffragists who made a straight appeal on the
directions about the fortification of the Kremlin, and drew up a
directions that they should all be removed to Kazan, and the things
directions with orders which showed that the Russian troops, who had
directions, and deformed attitudes add to the disablement. The disease
directions, these having failed to reach the distal end because of the
directions--(1) The infective element must be eliminated. When the ulcer
directly conscious of it, but in the eyes of reason it in no way
directly destroying the skin, or by so diminishing its vitality that it
directly in intensity with the amount of the poison introduced, and the
directly into a vein, or into the spinal canal, _e.g._ anti-tetanic
directly involved but is merely influenced by the proximity of an
directly or by way of the lymphatics. A peri-articular abscess may
directly through the epiphysis and articular cartilage, or along the
directly to the cost of living, the action of the unions affected the
directly to the surface by the firm fasciae and other fibrous structures.
directly with the height of the temperature. _Respiration_ is more
director and prophet, Smith, first imprisoned by the authorities and
disabilities imposed upon them by the English common law imported into
disability becomes complete. A radiogram shows a shadow in the muscle,
disability of the President. The person having the greatest number of
disability of the finger which may last for weeks unless it is properly
disadvantage of what pleased the sovereign.
disadvantageous and dangerous path, where the old scent was familiar.
disagreeable that in a fine season it is extremely pleasant." The
disagreement with those about him began, he alone said that the battle
disappear after removal of the primary growth; actual infection of the
disappear and a single question, that of the closed door, superseded
disappear. It is usually followed by a _papular eruption_, the
disappear. There is no actual swelling of the joint, although there may
disappeared down below. That was the only part of the fourth act
disappeared during the night, but nothing was stolen; and as to the
disappeared from circulation. The fourteenth amendment to the federal
disappeared in the commercial states, leaving behind only such
disappeared in the smoke, Rostov hesitated whether to gallop after
disappeared into the forest, and Count Orlov-Denisov, having seen
disappeared. The artillery the prisoners had seen in front of them
disappeared. The pain is relieved by salicylates, but most benefit
disappears. This lesion is chiefly met with in drummer-boys and is the
disappoint the expectations of those who knew her. The subdued smile
disappointing--ominous--for only about 87,000 soldiers were added to the
disappointment. The funeral of the Greenback party was hardly over
disappointments in the service, heard with pleasure of the things done
disapproval of the reforms, simply because he was the son of his
disapproval, but at that moment the thought occurred to her that her
disarmed Frenchmen pass by. The French, excited by all that had
disasters. Far from capturing Richmond, they had been thrown on the
disastrous for the army, as the sequel showed. Had Napoleon's aim been
disastrous revolutions which the world has witnessed, those political
disastrously. Moreover, the early period of Franklin's sojourn in Paris
disbelieve in the divine significance of Napoleon, but for anyone
discharge from the sore, and are chiefly arranged in small groups or in
discharge is then foul and blood-stained, and the prepuce becomes of a
discharge reduces his strength; the open sore is a possible source of
discharge which causes the breathing to be noisy. It usually begins
discharge which is sometimes foetid. The affection is a painful one and
discharge, and, on the other, of removing more bone than is necessary.
discharge, but no drain is inserted. The whole of the inflamed area
discharge, or to the formation of a sequestrum as is so common in
discharge. On examining the wound at intervals of a few days, it is
discipline and in the experience of regular troops. When the war broke
discipline and zeal in the service. He brought with him into our
discipline led them back to the zone of fire, where under the
discoloration appears under the conjunctiva or behind the mastoid
discomfort it causes, by a supporting bandage, or by ligation of the
discomfort to others. The primary object of treatment in any ulcer is to
discomfort, and impairment of the use of the limb. A ganglion is
disconnected buzzing from different parts of the deserted hive. From
discontent with the present, which is most strongly felt on a
discontented farmers believed that the way to raise prices was to issue
discord, the source of "Black Republicanism," as well as squatter
discordant materials as the thirteen British provinces."
discourages arts and manufactures. The poor despise labor when performed
discover its resources, and lay out an overland route through the
discoverable. The dissemination of the organisms takes place through the
discovered and the great fields of Michigan, Wisconsin, and Minnesota
discovered at the apex of the lung after death in persons who have at
discovered in abundance; numerous rail connections were formed with the
discovered in the South and West. Coal deposits were found in the
discoveries and explorations in the Far Northwest. Their appearance in
discovering the laws of history lie, and that as yet not a millionth
discovery of gold at Sutter's Mill in the Sacramento Valley. When this
discovery of the bones of prehistoric animals. Robert Fulton, the
discovery of the laws of the motion of the planets was possible only
discredit of the panic unjustly laid at his door; but he was far from
discreditable to any man to accept the convention's approval under such
discretion exercised by the President in selecting the tariff for
discretion which "will enable that body to perform the high duties
discrimination. The patient must be encouraged to take plenty of easily
discs like wafers. The presence of irregular thickenings of the wall, or
discussed it, the question was no longer important in itself but
discussed the place of America among the powers of the earth. The Senate
disdainfully at himself. "I had other duties," thought he. "The people
disease admits of the patient being inoculated with a modified virus
disease affects several glands, on one or on both sides of the neck.
disease are compatible with the appearance of good health. As a rule,
disease are somewhat different from those of the acute form. Here, too,
disease are well marked, and are best illustrated by the attitudes
disease as it affects the phalanges, metacarpal or metatarsal bones. The
disease becomes disseminated along the lymphatics, the first evidence of
disease developing in the other limb has already been referred to.
disease does not spread to the glands until it has invaded the tissues
disease from the bone or joint into the surrounding tissues, either
disease has almost entirely replaced reduction by force; the contracted
disease has been acquired by accidental inoculation in the course of
disease in an adjacent bone or joint. In the peronei tendons, for
disease in an adjacent bone or joint. It is met with chiefly in the
disease in them is exceptional. The infection spreads upwards along the
disease is frequently observed also in the flat bones of the skull, in
disease is not attended with any disturbance of the general health; the
disease is recognised by the thickening and usually also by the curving
disease is seldom symmetrical, it closely resembles the arthropathy of
disease of the adjacent joint.
disease of the central nervous system or of the peripheral nerves,
disease of the internal organs; on the other hand, it may recover and
disease of the knee, and in the deltoid in disease of the shoulder. The
disease of the skin or of a mucous membrane due to the action of a
disease of the spine; over the end of the bone in amputation stumps, and
disease seldom spreads beyond the phalanges or deeper than the skin.
disease to become gangrenous, and for the death of tissue to extend
disease to others, until eventually the tendency dies out altogether, as
disease to the offspring cannot be absolutely excluded. It is
disease" applied to them. Although they usually develop in the ataxic
disease, but the graver forms occur in the tertiary stage of acquired
disease, especially those of bacterial origin. The destruction of
disease, from which it may be diagnosed by the history of typhoid fever,
disease, in which the muscles, tendons, and fasciae throughout the body
disease, the lymph glands, especially those in the neck, axilla, and
disease, the marrow is seen to be replaced by a vascular young
disease, the relation between them and the tissues remains one of mutual
disease, the true nature of erratic chancres is often overlooked until
disease--_antitoxic serums_; the anti-streptcoccic and the serum for
disease--as, for example, in the hip-joint or spine. It is called
disease--for example, in the knee-joint from repeated sprains, or when
disease--the scalp, mouth, throat, posterior cervical glands, and the
disease-producing micro-organisms, the presence of foreign substances,
disease. If one of the varieties gain the ascendancy, the poisons
disease. In rickets, for example, the formation of new bone may take
disease. In the early stages the gland is enlarged, it may be to many
disease. On the face it is most liable to be confused with syphilis and
disease. Recent haemorrhages into the cellular tissue often present
disease. The ease and rapidity with which large masses of glands may be
disease. The purer air of places away from centres of population is
disease. The sac may press upon the popliteal artery or vein and their
disease. When, however, the rash is scanty or is obscured by co-existing
disease_ is applied, usually disappear in the course of a few days.
diseases of bone if the osteoblasts on the surface of the bone are still
diseases of the brain and spinal cord. The bones are liable to be
diseases of the spinal cord, in cerebral paralysis, in limbs weakened by
diseases such as trichiniasis and hydatid disease, the eosinophile
diseases--gout, for example; the endothelium of the veins undergoing
disengaging himself, the prince spurred his horse and rode down the
disentangled from the web of world affairs. Isolation, if desirable, had
disfigurement caused by breaking down of the tuberculous tissue and
disfigurement, especially on the face or scalp or because its bulk
disfiguring scars, especially on the face. The palate and fauces may be
disgrace the whole regiment? Disgrace the whole regiment because of
disguise, and involuntarily took a step back from the campfire.
disguised as Indians, boarded the hated tea ships and dumped the cargo
disheveled head from the hot pillow.
disillusionments?... His hopes for the future?... Yes and no. The
disinclination for movement. Very commonly the child ceases to move one
disinfect the walls of the cavity with eusol or hydrogen peroxide, and
disinfection and drainage, and the constricting bandage applied to aid
disintegrate it, the debris being gradually absorbed in much the same
disintegrated in the suppurative process, and the bleeding start
disintegration of the osseous trabeculae--_caries_. With the destruction
disintegration, and the infective material, by bursting into an adjacent
disjointed and awkward, as were all the words he spoke that day, and
disliked, caused by the Emperor's presence, he danced, and had
dislocate the tendon at will, but the disability is so inconsiderable
dislocated humerus or in attempts to reduce the dislocation, by the
dislocation at the hip and flexion ankylosis at the knees; should the
dislocation is also favoured by destructive changes in the bones.
dislocation of the adjacent joint.
dislocation. In the acute arthritis of infants, the epiphysis concerned
dismal and attentive faces, whom the officers keeping order tried in
dismal influence of cannon balls flying from the French batteries
dismay. Its fears were increased as quarrels broke out between the
dismembered. Russia was reduced by the creation of new states on the
dismount and stab the wolf, when she suddenly thrust her head up
dismount each moment that the wolf crouched back, and starting forward
dismounted and walked up the hill on foot.
dismounted, and stopped beside the farthest of the four unlimbered
dismounted. He gave the reins to a Cossack, took off and handed over
dismounted. The game had begun.
dismounting from his horse, paced for a long time by the
disorder mainly affects the ossifying junctions of the long bones of the
disorder of the French; the flow of recruits to our regiments; the
disorder the division.
disordered battalion and at the enemy, "what's that?"
disordered. The French cannon did not reach there and the musketry
disorganisation of the joint. The knee is most frequently affected, but
disorganized and terrified mobs. The generals re-formed them, but
disorganized, I stopped in the road and thought: 'I'll let them come
dispatch and verbal instructions, galloped off to the General Staff
dispatch. "But Komarov and I"--he pointed to the Cossack--"were
dispatched a force to repel "the invading army," as General Houston
dispatched mine. I have written to my poor mother," said the smiling
dispatched to the President a note promising to suspend hostilities, to
dispatching Balashev, the Emperor repeated to him the words that he
dispelled. Samuel Gompers, speaking for the American Federation of
dispensed with, as the constriction of the limb is liable to interfere
dispersed throughout the lung; in the head, the skull may be shattered
dispersed, re-formed, and then moved with a hum of talk into the
dispersed. Pierre threw off his cloak and entered the first room, in
displace the liberated nerve from its original position so as to
displaced and dissociated by the overgrown endoneurium, undergo no
displacement are some disability at the elbow, and pain and tingling
displacement of the eye and paralysis of the ocular muscles.
displaying the profundity of their strategic perceptions, discussed
displeasure without attaining her object. "Besides," he wrote, "the
displeasure--said in Vilna that to carry the war beyond the frontier
dispose of Andros. The response was prompt and hearty. The hated
dispose of Gettysburg or the Wilderness in ten lines or ten pages is
disposed of all the armies; the men around him were his assistants.
disposition of the forces, so as to know his bearings should he be
disposition of them in the public interest. Prosecutions were
disposition. Prince Eugene of Wurttemberg fired from a hill over the
dispositions. The tall, fair-haired General Buxhowden stood, leaning
dispositions. Toll read them to Ermolov, asking him to attend to the
disproportionately long; less frequently the growth of the diseased
disproving it, it would seem impossible to continue studying the
dispute as to whom the honor is due. Even foreign historians,
dispute with Venezuela was a matter of interest merely to the parties
dispute with the French grenadier. They were naturally talking about
disputing and vigorously gesticulating. The conversation was about
disquieting reports came from the seat of war and Natasha's health
disregarded the warnings of a blockading ship, were to be captured and
disrupted the Republicans temporarily in 1912 when the Progressive party
disrupted, a fragment of the former Whig party, known as the
disruption on the eve of the Civil War, did a Democratic national
dissatisfaction at the slowness of the pursuit and at the mistakes
dissatisfaction the agitation and fear he had betrayed before his
dissatisfaction with the Russian government. Judging by the calmly
dissatisfaction. Fire prevention work was undertaken in the forests on a
dissatisfied and drowsy Kutuzov, who reluctantly played the part of
dissatisfied that her indisposition delayed their return to the
dissatisfied with him, and also that at the Emperor's headquarters
dissatisfied, interrupted by another, an unfamiliar voice. From the
dissection. A second tube of radium is placed upon the skin over the
dissemination of cancer cells by way of the blood-stream and are to be
dissemination of infective material from the primary source of
dissipated by the appearance of His Highness. "She is right, but how
dissipated life of his son Anatole, the son whom they were planning to
dissipation and the exercise of authority.
dissolution of the republican government, which a year earlier might
dissolution of the union if the bill was defeated. To this dispute was
dissolution of the union." The answer that came this time was in a
dissolution, of the trusts. Like apostles in a new and lofty cause, the
dissolved at once. The Virginia House of Burgesses, thoroughly aroused,
distal end, it extends throughout the entire peripheral distribution of
distal parts being cold, devoid of sensation, and powerless. As the
distance and puckering the skin above his left eye, "malgre la haute
distance from Pierre. "Call the interpreter."
distance from the ossifying junction and to "point" away from it. They
distance he heard as he rode the merry sounds of a soldier's dance
distance lured one to itself. Pierre glanced up at the sky and the
distance seems to us not merely to move of itself but to govern the
distance, but down the hill before him. "It's the French!"
distance, distinguish a living body from a dead one, Napoleon from the
distance, when he felt the contact of the fresh air and heard the
distances do not yield the desired results.
distant parts of the body.
distant, and it may be to all, parts of the body. When the infection is
distended with a viscous fluid, and the fibrinous material on the free
distended with fluid and the whole limb is oedematous.]
distension of the veins of the limb, an attempt should be made to
distilled water, 40 ounces, and applied over the whole of the reddened
distinct in his dream) that he was talking of goodness and the
distinct, precise, enticingly rhythmical strains of a waltz. The
distinctly but took to be the enemy. Shots could be heard, but some
distinctly caught the music of the hunt with only two or three
distinctly repeating the terms of the bet, addressing himself
distinguish our troops from the enemy's.
distinguished according to the part of the tooth-germ concerned in their
distinguished dignitary and a Swiss who had formerly been tutor at the
distinguished economist, "is the high-water mark in the history of
distinguished economist, John Stuart Mill. Soon he was the champion of
distinguished from inflammation of its sheath, and give it the name
distinguished from that due to disease in the cervical spine,
distinguished part in the framing and the adoption of the Constitution.
distinguished them from others was the absence of host or hostess
distinguished, important, and well informed forgathered when the
distinguishing feature of these tumours. The innocent forms are the
distortion and deformity which, in the case of the fingers, is extremely
distortion of the truth, it was quickly dramatized and played in every
distracted by partisan disputes, a storm broke in Europe--the
distractedly and screwed up his eyes as if dazzled by the sun. He
distractions lasted only a moment, and for eight hours the men had
distraught, pounced down on the ladies, asking them to move aside.
distress either of them. I would give my life for the happiness of
distress, and by the embarrassed faces of Sonya and Marya
distribute it in the United States without permission and
distribute it in the United States without permission and
distribute supplies to the troops, thus displaying administrative as
distributing the joint produce of their labor with rough equality among
distribution of one of the branches or nerve roots, is often
distribution of the subcutaneous secondary nodules so frequently met
distribution. All the way from Maine to Georgia inducements were offered
district court at Chicago issued an injunction forbidding the president
district in connection with the affairs of the Ryazan estate of
district postmaster who had obtained a post in Petersburg. Among the
disturbance of health. The movements are free except in so far as they
disturbance of nutrition, and attended with changes in the skeleton.
disturbance. The disease runs a prolonged course, sometimes lasting for
disturbance. They only threaten life when growing in the vicinity of
disturbances are included the presence of fever or elevation of
disturbances of growth resulting from rickets. In about one-third of the
disturbed by injury or through some other influence, the encapsulated
disturbed by starting pains. The joint is held rigid in the flexed
disturbed that day, evidently by the fact that they had dared to
disturbed the nation's peace of mind. The South, doubly frightened by a
disunion." South Carolina announced that the day for talk had passed and
diversified, the small farming class was raised in the scale of social
diversion of forces. They passed the Sherman Act of 1890 providing for
diverted from New Orleans to the East and Eastern credit sustained
diverted her attention from the unfinished game.
divide the vessel wall.
divided (Fig. 1). With undermining it is usually easy to bring the
divided above or below the origin of the large cutaneous branch which
divided after the graft has adhered.]
divided artery at the bottom of a deep wound, escapes on the surface in
divided by means of the chisel. The multiple variety of osteoma is
divided in the substance of a muscle also sometimes bleed unduly. Any
divided into three armies. First, the army under Barclay de Tolly,
divided nerve-trunk, the nails are apt to suffer, becoming curved,
divided on the matter of free homesteads, the same could hardly be said
divided opinion of the country it was "good politics" to be vague and
divided up into free homesteads for farmers. The South steadily swung
divided, for example, in the course of an operation, the opening should
divided, victory loomed up before the Democrats. Naturally, a terrific
divided. The major portion, known as "reservationists," favored
dividing the deep fascia behind the medial condyle and to stitch the
dividing the living from the dead lies uncertainty, suffering, and
dividing the scar, correcting the deformity, and filling up the gap with
divine authority of the kings and the "fate" of the ancients, to reach
division of its fibres. The sinuses associated with empyema are
division of the nerve before the dorsal branch is given off resembles
division of the vessel under these circumstances the bleeding can often
divisions of Morand and Gerard did not take the redoubt but were
divisions) of the cervical nerves, the fifth, or the fifth and sixth
divisions, which under his leadership will be directed against the
divorce and remarriage during a husband's lifetime, and the priest
divorced...'" said the old princess.
do and to do quickly. Glowing with the heat and from running, he
do anything for public welfare not forbidden by the Constitution and the
do for him?" he thought, and opening the door he let the boy pass in
do for man to taste of the tree of knowledge of good and evil....
do me the honor of calling on me on Wednesday," he added, "I will,
do not charge anything for copies of this eBook, complying with the
do not charge anything for copies of this eBook, complying with the
do not coincide with the results obtained, the patient should always be
do not know the nature of gold, so universal historians and historians
do not know. We only know that to produce the one or the other action,
do not know; but from that year forward we have the records of the
do the best he could for himself and his army, as he had done
do their full duty in such an event. As things turned out, the service
do to let him die on the road. "Would it not be better if the end
do to take young ladies and house serfs to the Three Hills quarter
do with the Gospels. That was why he asked for a copy of them. The
do you stop? Go on! Go on!" And cries of horror were heard in the
do; on the contrary it gave her an unnatural, and therefore
do? They tied a policeman and the bear back to back and put the bear
dock-labourers, and navvies. In these classes the condition usually
doctor bent down over the wound, felt it, and sighed deeply. Then he
doctor had said that the festering might take a normal course. Then
doctor smoking a cigar. The doctor was followed by a Russian
doctor taking her arm led her out to the veranda, soothing her and
doctor told him the case was dangerous."
doctor when they turned him over. Several times she listened at the
doctor who had entered the hall after him (they had met at the last
doctor's wife, but not once of the impending danger.
doctors did not keep me here at the spas I should be back in Russia,
doctors say?" asked the princess after a pause, her worn face again
doctors, lawyers, farmers, miners, and laborers from the four corners of
doctrine of "rotation in office." At the same time the principle of
doctrine of party loyalty; if beaten in the convention, he voted the
document setting forth the reasons for the act, and on July 2 all the
documents in small rooms. The higher authorities and the police
documents, and rising heavily and smoothing out the folds in his fat
does everything alone. The next battle is won by him alone. Kutuzov is
does form, when the blood-pressure rises it is readily displaced,
does not always avert the fatal issue, because the quantity of toxin
does not prove that Napoleon caused it to retreat, but that the forces
does not prove that the conquerors caused the wars and that it is
does not realise his danger. A line of demarcation soon forms, but the
does not take place whether the wound is infected or not. At the
does so. This is the battle of Pultusk, which is considered a great
does the same, I will pay him a hundred imperials. Do you understand?"
does them credit! And the people too are quite mutinous--they no
doesn't the Frenchman stab him? He will not get away before the
dogs! But this sort of thing is the very devil, with them shooting
dogs," she added to the huntsman.
dogs--my passions especially the last, which unites in itself the
doing began shouting in angry haste at the Frenchwoman, her voice
doing so. In the crowd people began talking loudly, to stifle their
doing well where you are and can safeguard the future of your children
doing!" said the officer and rode off.
doing. He smiled at the recollection of that time and of his love
dollars, was fifteen times the figure for 1860. In the Eastern states
dollars." "The way to resume," John Sherman had said, "is to resume."
domain of the Chinese Empire"? Was it not almost half a century before
domestic arrangements, the count grew quite tranquil.
domestic industries, their own particular province being the manufacture
domestic production and cut down the carrying trade. Defeated in their
domestic serfs loyal to him that the peasant Karp, who possessed great
domestic serfs were crowding in the hall, waiting to bid good-by to
domestic serfs. The only thing that made Princess Mary anxious about
domestic servants in the North.
domestic species and in wild animals in the natural state such as the
dominance of a "hotch potch of wild men from the Far West." Federalists,
dominated Congress to the same degree as did some other Presidents. The
dominated by an inner circle of bosses. The remedy offered in this case
dominion in America. It was the surrender of Cornwallis at Yorktown that
dominions. Yet nothing could stop the movement. By the end of the
don't obey," answered the quartermaster.
don't tell her everything!" said she to Pierre. "One hasn't the
don't wish to let the mistress leave the estate, and threaten to
done in the Dum-Dum bullet, or by splitting the end, the bullet is made
done in the conversion of blood-clot into granulation tissue, and this
done mainly in small herds, with winter corrals, and then the cowboy's
done the job just as well."
done when the major operation has been arranged for, the surgeon waiting
done, as from the spots selected by Napoleon the projectiles did not
done. All the generals, officers, and soldiers of the French army knew
done. Their chairs made a scraping noise as the gentlemen who had
done: the rest of the army merely lost some hundreds of men uselessly.
donor, is the most efficient means (_Op. Surg._, p. 37). Cardiac
door and took the boy back to the nursery. Five minutes later little
door by which the prince was to enter. Prince Andrew was looking at
door into the huntsmen's room, from which came the clear sounds of a
door of the hut.
door of the sitting room.
door to mild reservations; he appealed to the country largely on that
door. And that sphinx had the pale face and shining eyes of the very
door. It seemed to him the horses were not moving at all. At last
door. There was no one in the passage. He went along the whole
doors. Pierre rose, rubbed his eyes, and seeing the pistol with an
doorway looking with a stern, grim face at the new arrivals. One might
doorway to allow him, as the guest of honor, to enter first. Bagration
doorway. Prince Andrew stood right in front of Kutuzov but the
dorsal aspect, and, according to the distribution and extent of the
dorsal flexion, and thus improve the attitude and grasp of the hand.
dorsal nerve, it may be necessary temporarily to resect the clavicle.
dorsiflexion at the wrist returns to the normal. Recovery is sometimes
dose contains nearly three grains of arsenic. Before the administration
dose is proportionately increased. The general health should be improved
dose of 0.45 grm. given intra-muscularly or into the deep subcutaneous
dose of anti-tetanic serum is injected. The tourniquet is removed and
dose should always be a small one, particularly if the disease is acute,
dotted about in the forest did not jar on the general beauty but,
dotted here and there among the thickly settled regions, added to the
doubled. Those who obeyed the law were ruined; violators of the law
doubt fell from him. He was glad, and at the same instant began to
doubt of the continental situation, said in a political address at the
doubt would exist in the mind of any man that it would have all the
doubt," exclaimed Samuel J. Tilden, spokesman of the Democrats in New
doubted that the Shevardino Redoubt was the left flank of our and
doubter in the house of the faithful. He had expressed opinions both for
doubtful cases the possibility of rendering the parts aseptic will often
doubts remained in his soul. He firmly believed in the possibility
douching and gentle massage may be employed to disperse the oedema; and
douching should be employed, and the tendon should be protected from
down as far as the knee; and if the vessel is sharply percussed a fluid
down at the old man with moist, shining, and ecstatic eyes, "I say, do
down beside the sofa.
down by the roadside.
down from trivial causes. The treatment is to excise the weak portion of
down her broad neck and the corners of her mouth drooped.
down in her armchair and called Natasha and the count to her.
down in pendulous folds. Blisters form on the surface and yield an
down is not opened into during the operation.
down on a sofa in a far corner of the room. He closed his eyes and
down on the floor. The countess was crying.
down on the sofa beside Prince Andrew.
down on the sofa, facing her brother. "She is quite a child: such a
down the Ohio carrying eighteen thousand men, women, and children, and
down the Ohio in fleets of boats or crossed the Mississippi from
down the back of the hip, especially if, as is commonly the case,
down the boots and drawing his sword, moved threateningly toward
down the hill. He knew all this and therefore waited calmly for what
down the knoll.
down the room, pondering over his vicious past, and with a rapturous
down the room.
down the room.
down the street.
down the tariff by the Wilson bill of 1894, they were checkmated by
down them, how his left foot began convulsively tapping the horse's
down to the deepest part of the ulcer and so prevents closure. While
down to the justices of the district courts, had favored the
down with him in the parlor--the first room they entered. To
down, and the information received of the movements of the French
down, but when Princess Mary had drawn the blinds and was going away
down, he was surprised by the beauty of those ruins. The
down. The Grand Master began reading the statutes. They were very
down. The small lamp in front of the icons was the only light left
down. Then Mr. Platt ruled the state; for nigh upon twenty years he
downcast eyes to the countess' cruel words, without understanding what
downcast head; and he began to pace the room, glancing occasionally at
downward by a "milking" movement, or by "catheterising the artery" with
downward revision in the rates of duty, fixing them on the average about
downwards into the thigh. Sometimes a constriction occurs across the
downwards like a little bird; a flame flashed in the middle of the
dozen families of the gentry and a few score of tradesmen. Inland county
dozens of police officers and even the police master himself stood
draft army created, huge loans floated, heavy taxes laid, and the spirit
drafted "was in its principal provisions a copy of the then existing
drafted. It was quickly ratified by the states; elections were held in
drafting well-phrased protests against British measures, the Sons of
dragged below the level of the surrounding skin by contraction of the
dragged home with him, and Berg who spent whole days at the Rostovs'
dragged off to the New World to be sold into servitude for a term of
dragging away the last logs from the huts and barns. Then they rode
dragging him to the window. "That money is Denisov's; you took
dragging it by the staff, ran on with the battalion. In front he saw
dragoons, something confused happened there amid the smoke, and five
drain the side of the head and auricle. These three groups pour their
drain the ulnar side of the hand and forearm, and pour their lymph into
drainage of the wound are first carried out. To arrest the absorption of
drainage tubes into wounds in fat patients when there is the slightest
drained by them in the head and neck and in the extremities.
drained by tubes or packed with iodoform gauze. The practice of scraping
drains the top and back of the head; it is rarely infected. _The
dramatic features. On the continent of Europe, England subsidized
drank during those days, the absence of wine and cigars, his dirty
drank moderately and after dinner copied out some passages for the
drastic in spirit and in letter. It placed the enforcement of its terms
drastic laws in the summer of 1798: the Alien and Sedition Acts.
draught of cold air. Between the paroxysms the patient is free from
draw attention to the fact that a tuberculous family history is often
draw back the curtain of the window facing Kutuzov, but the latter
drawing Natasha (whose cheeks were glowing from the cold) to her by
drawing back the wide sleeve on his right arm, she went up to Sonya
drawing room of the house, which had been left with all it
drawing room, almost all the company had assembled, and the
drawing room. The guests began to disperse, some without taking
drawing the sleeves on with upraised arms.
drawing trade away from the Mississippi Valley, lines were built from
drawing up a proposal for a reform of the army rules and regulations.
drawings. And in my dream I knew that these drawings represented the
drawn and forecasts as to the further progress of the war. In this
drawn from the Revelation of St. John.
drawn from their scabbards. Still no one moved. The troops of the left
drawn himself up like a black pillar at sight of the Emperor, Napoleon
drawn into the consideration of public questions. Under the leadership
drawn into the current of national affairs. The answer is simple. There
drawn toward the district where supplies were abundant.
drawn up, and in 1919 a national conference on the subject was held in
dream] is to be able in your soul to unite the meaning of all. To
dreamed of California, the Yankee with his cargo of notions had been
dreams and hopes that had been on the point of awakening within her
dregs of mankind." The generals in the army they sneered at as "men of
dress sat apart on a low bench, to the back of which a piece of
dress sat down on a sofa near the silver samovar, as if all she was
dress were heard in the room. Natasha looked round at her, and then,
dress, have it fetched. Really! You know the fate of your whole life
dress, transparent over her shoulders and bosom. The abbe, a
dressed in a dark-green dress coat, knee breeches of the color of
dressed in white muslin, she returned home after communion, for the
dressers, and nurses. The habitual use of gloves has also been adopted
dresses, and the bowing and scraping. Everything was just as everybody
dresses, condemned the bearing of a lady standing close by who was not
dressing and so was the countess, but Natasha, who had bustled about
dressing applied so as to exert a certain amount of compression. If the
dressing gown and fez, his face distorted with fury and the pupils
dressing is kept in place by a firmly applied bandage, and in the case
dressing should be changed once or twice a week, under the guidance of
dressing station or a doctor for the cadet, and sat down by a
dressing, and yet the question he was always putting off demanded an
dressings and bandage are then applied, with the limb in the attitude
dressings, these must be stopped, the redundant granulations clipped
dressings. The effect of these agencies is to delay repair or to prevent
drew, one out of the other, in the children's presence.
dried and warmed themselves, cooked their porridge for the first
dried bread and put a little dripping. The pleasant odor of greasy
dried contents of a wen on the surface of the skin: the sebaceous
dried spores into the respiratory passages. This occurs oftenest in
dries up, and the shrivelled brown skin is slowly separated by the
drift of public sentiment in the North was being revealed.
drifting before a genial breeze, they place the turbine steamer crossing
drinking and, as he unbuttoned his waistcoat, of abusing the
drinking of hot water between meals, say five or six tumblerfuls in the
drinking vodka a quarter of an hour before, he saw everywhere the same
drive away the evil spirit that threatened him. Toward midnight, after
drive her, sat perched up high on the box and did not so much as
drive the border states into secession, and that the Northern soldiers
drive the princess away by that scream... "Killed!"
driven back to the Kolocha and could get no farther; while the
driven back, and the redoubt was only taken at the end of the battle
driven from the platform with blood streaming from his face. Jay was
driven out through the exit wound.
driven to the use of brown wrapping paper and wall paper. As the
drivers and hovels of the Sivtsev Vrazhok, those old Moscovites who
drives that broke the might of Germany's army. Such was the nation's
driving here today, the nearer I got to the house the more anxious I
droplets of fat derived from the marrow, and in some cases minute
dropped the snuffbox. Nastasya Ivanovna dismounted to pick it up.
dropping behind the carriage he stepped onto the pavement.
dropping him, carried the infant round the battered tin font and
dropping his hand, turned toward Alexander as though sure that the
dropping them into the water, or when he challenged a man to a duel
drops and again went up to the cot.
drove in their carts to pillage the town, and in general personally
drove into the birch forest where the gnarled old oak had made so
drove the Germans back.
drove the Republicans out upon this new national course--the purchase
drove to Bald Hills. Prince Andrew, glancing at Pierre, broke the
drown up on the vast field. The whole army was extended in three
drowned and obscured the voices of those who were disputing honestly.
drug by means of a hypodermic syringe into the substance of the gluteal
drum-stick (Fig. 26). The spores, which are the active agents in
drummer, their leader, turned round facing the singers, and
drums was suddenly heard from both sides. The corporal frowned at
drunk three bottles of wine with him and, despite the jolting ruts
drunk. Had Napoleon then forbidden them to fight the Russians, they
dry and shrivelled, and as the skin is usually intact, infection does
dubbed "Young Republicans," under the leadership of two members destined
dubbed it with the expressive but inelegant phrase, "waving the bloody
dubiously, and without communicating to the generals around him the
dubiously. And this silence about Dokhturov is the clearest
duc even the most partial ceased to regard him as a hero. If to some
duct and all the chyle escapes, the patient suffers from intense thirst,
duct of a secreting gland is partly obstructed; the secretion
due for value received. And to avoid being imprisoned for the
due in forty days; but a four-year term was allowed for the discharge of
due time the Mormons had to give up their marriage practices which were
due to a lesion of the fifth cervical nerve, as has already been
due to aneurysm of the ophthalmic artery, to thrombosis of the cavernous
due to stasis from mechanical over-distension of the veins and
due to the injury of wage-earners while at their trade. Every year the
due to the specific virus of scarlet fever.
due weight and consideration in political arrangements.... The
due. During the war, the Western farmers had been able to dispose of
duel, confirmed by Pierre's rupture with his wife, was the talk of
dug ditches through the length and breadth of that great region which
dull ashy grey, the nose pinched, and the skin cold and clammy.
dull, Natasha betook herself to the ballroom, picked up her guitar,
dull, sleepy expression was no longer there, nor the affectation of
duly assembled in the following month. In no mood for compromise, it
dumb, swung his foot, and smilingly examined the princess' hair. It
duodenal ulcers are liable to perforate during the third period.
dupe of China than the chum of the Kaiser." By pursuing a liberal
duration depending upon the size, depth, and asepticity of the raw area.
duration of the disease varies from a few hours to four or five days.
duration, and the central scarring with peripheral extension of the
during Jefferson's administration, had discovered the resources of New
during that time learned, from the talk of the French soldiers, that
during the Civil War. If we except the reductions of 1872 which were
during the French Revolution they guillotined one another.
during the Revolution all those qualities counted heavily in the
during the World War could not read a newspaper or write a letter home.
during the cold stage, however, the internal temperature is already
during the convalescent stage. They are doubtless due to the action of
during the early years of the seventeenth century was but one phase in
during the eighteenth century the migration continued to be heavy.
during the first clashes with the French nearly twenty years before. He
during the first days was now replaced by Marshal Junot's enormous
during the last few days. The antagonists stood forty paces apart at
during the night at an unusual hour would irritate him.
during the operation; to the slipping of a ligature; or to the giving
during the process of separation there is considerable risk of secondary
during the process young blood vessels permeate the superficial parts
during the recess of the Senate, by granting commissions which shall
during the service at the palace church in honor of the Emperor's
during the spasms, and may become exceedingly rapid and feeble before
during the summer, and on September 5 the Congress duly assembled in
during the visits of condolence paid to him on the occasion of his
during the war and especially the proletarian revolution in Russia in
during the whole of his army service. When he related anything it
during their attendance at the sessions of their respective Houses, and
during which the cannon balls and shells all flew overhead, but
during which time the patient remains in a more or less profound state
dusky red or purple colour, and may finally slough, exposing the glans.
dust, stood before a looking glass and brushed the hair on his temples
dusty highroad along which the troops were moving. But not far from
duties and through a British merchant's hands paying the usual
duties as hostess, threw significant glances from behind the
duties as they looked at the beautiful Helene with her radiant face
duties designed "to encourage the development of the industrial
duties should be laid "for the purpose of revenue"--Calhoun's doctrine.
duties so laid as to promote or foster any branch of industry. The
duties so low as to presage a tariff for revenue only. The war changed
duties, imposts, and excises, to pay the debts and provide for the
duty and did not return to her the whole evening.
duty of maintaining the rights of the United States and its citizens and
duty of the President, as commander-in-chief, to remove the federal
duty to the Fatherland. But this shall be our last separation. Believe
duty. The Emperor is gracious, and I shan't forget you if you
dying brain, at any rate he glanced at the refractory arm, at Pierre's
dying, alone among strangers and unable to send news of himself. The
e, though incorrectly, Pierre got the answer he sought. L'russe
eBook and Project Gutenberg at the bottom of this file.  Included is
eBook and Project Gutenberg at the bottom of this file.  Included is
each 2 drams; it must be warmed to allow of its passage through the
each State, elected by the people thereof, for six years; and each
each bacillus measuring from 6 to 8 u in length. The organisms are found
each bore and hid their grief in their own way. The old prince would
each family, but great care was exercised in the distribution so that
each has become covered with healthy granulations. The exudate on the
each new free soil state knocked for admission into the union, the
each of the last two years, and he did not know how the rest, about
each of the political parties lending a helping hand in the admission of
each of the six states which were carried by Breckinridge, there was a
each of them in the same direction; on the other hand an army corps
each other by irregular eroded surfaces bathed in pus. The separated
each other upon the present legal ratio or such other ratio as may be
each period, bringing in the narrative rather by way of illustration.
each section in the ribs and telling him to hold his hand up. Soldiers
each segment retracts within its sheath in virtue of the recoil of the
each side of the open door and the carriage steps waiting to help
each state was given two members in that body. In the formation of the
each trying to snatch from the other a boot they were both holding
eagerly addressed him. This was one of the head army doctors. He was
eagerly at it. Governor Hughes in New York pressed it upon the unwilling
eagerly from the balcony toward the porch. Rostopchin, coming out
eagerly seized by the planters as they came more and more to overshadow
eagerly the more those past interests were closed to him. It was as if
eagerness and briskness presented a marked contrast to the
eagerness to push on that had seized them at the start. Once at a
eagle-eyed, hard-drinking hunter remained. The settlers who followed the
ear and gave a peculiar significance to the spectacle, as music does
earlier in life the disease occurs. Even under favourable conditions,
earlier than cancer of the skin; cancer of the uterus and mamma is more
earlier--156,000 as against nearly 3,000,000, the combined vote of the
earlier. The Gold Democrats were repudiated in terms which were clear to
earliest possible stage of the infection, an effort should be made to
early as 1826. President Johnson, an ardent advocate, made it the
early as possible and be perseveringly employed to diminish the
early days of colonization. The voice of the democratic nationalism
early days of power was in accord with the ideals of government which it
early efforts being directed to the alleviation of shock and the
early in the morning amid the lines of his army with his suite of
early in the sessions when Randolph presented "the Virginia plan." He
early loss of the House of Representatives in 1874, also moved with
early stage. When the disease is widely distributed throughout the
early stages and when the infection is limited are local measures
early that morning to the Three Hills. Having waited there for
earnestly sought relief in the establishment of cooperative or
ears from the beginning of the meal and was certain that there was
ears of the harvests they had sown in earlier years. But to the old
ears, and now again drawn out in a thin line the musketeers were
ears, and the nose. In this country it is seldom seen except in members
ears. Dunyasha, her maid, entered the room quickly and abruptly with a
ears; but the pockmarked Guardsman drove his huge spurs in
earth by English gold, we shall cause to share the same fate--(the
earth lay in abandoning the immediate sensation of the earth's
earth, but knew there were laws directing its movement and that of the
earth. "All the world agree," exultantly wrote Franklin from Paris to
earth. It was clearing, and over the tops of the trees clouds were
earth. The ancient Greeks flung out their colonies in every direction,
earth; but the broad empire of Britain was open to American ships and
ease while the army starved, the intrigues of army officers against him
easier by recognising the presence of a lesion that is likely to cause a
easiest and most direct descent and ascent to the brook separating
easily and surely recognized, Lavrushka was not in the least abashed
easily attack instead of being attacked, and so render the whole of
easily broken, the fractures are attended with little or no pain, the
easily collected and little felt among the masses. To this expectation
easily framed, but it was rejected by the Colombian senate, much to the
easily killed. The effect varies a good deal with the nature and seat of
easily ruptured, and the middle coat contains a smaller proportion of
easily separated from the bone; at the extremities it is intimately
easily victorious in 1832, the popular vote cast for Clay should have
easily, Dolokhov climbed carefully and slowly through the window and
east and from the east to the west form the essence and purpose of
east to west and for the refixing of national frontiers as Kutuzov had
east to west. The commencement of that movement was the movement
eastward explained by the activity of Louis XIV, XV, and XVI, their
easy, but as the displacement tends to recur, an operation is required
echinoccus, which are conveyed to the marrow by the blood-stream. The
echoed by the people. Then and there James Otis sounded the call to
economic and political tendencies to draw America away from the English
economic historian, "was a workshop where the women spun and wove the
economy. The better educated the Easterners were, the less, it seems,
eczema of the scalp, and otorrhoea; and it is possible that this indolent
eczema, most reliance should be placed on the distribution of the
ed.), pp. 369-374; E.L. Bogart, _Economic History of the United States_,
edge of the dam, throwing two soldiers off their feet, and ran onto
edges of the fascia over the nerve. This operation has been successful
edges of the gap in the abdominal wall together, even in children; the
edges should then be freely scraped with a sharp spoon, and the
edges, which become pale and sodden. The term "proud flesh" is popularly
edifying. As to the last meeting between father and son, it was so
editions, all of which are confirmed as Public Domain in the U.S.
editions, all of which are confirmed as Public Domain in the U.S.
editions, all of which are confirmed as Public Domain in the US
editions, all of which are confirmed as Public Domain in the US
editor of the New York _Tribune_, though he afterwards recanted, used
editor of the _Mercury_ in Philadelphia was called before the
education of the young, unite ourselves in indissoluble bonds with the
education, incidentally imposing uniform standards throughout the
education. Other institutions, especially the state universities of the
educational establishments for young ladies. Prince Vasili entered the
educational opportunities for women. Other colleges soon emulated the
effect against America half a century before. In the United States, on
effect on him; on the contrary, they stimulated his energy and
effect on the old general. He carefully and hastily felt himself all
effect produced, as indicated by the hardening of the tumour, the
effect their safety and happiness. Here was the prelude to the historic
effect there is not much difference between the various high velocity
effect upon existing trusts and upon the formation of new combinations
effect, however, was short-lived, for the measures stimulated
effect, informing him that he was already under the command of the
effect. They voluntarily entered the union under the Constitution and
effected by the emerging artery becoming occluded by a clot; it has also
effected on the 22nd instant, and both armies with their united forces
effected the dangerous crossing of the Straits of Dover and captured
effected, nature will do the rest, provided extraneous sources of
effected, or they may be the cause of a relapse of the disease at a
effective resistance to the sale of the hated goods by spurring on
effective support of the Federation in their efforts to organize the
effective work, it is due to historical accuracy to deny the
effective, immediate steps were taken to increase the naval forces,
effective. The first and most easily administered was the ingenious
effects, the latter are frequently prescribed along with carbonate of
effects. Carbolic acid was the first antiseptic agent he employed, and
effects." Thus the stanch advocate of "strict interpretation" cut loose
efferent vessels from the femoral and superficial inguinal glands. The
efficacious than continuous application. It is now believed that the
efficiency of this treatment. The intra-thecal injection of 10 c.c. of a
efficient administration based on the pattern of the royal provinces. He
efficient circulation. As the sarco-lactic acid liberated in the muscles
efficient means of combating bacterial infection. The treatment of
efficient. The full dose is 0.6 grm. All these members of the "606"
efficiently prepared. The local and general reactions may be slight,
effigy with an inscription--"Stephen A. Douglas, author of the infamous
effort and the French would be destroyed. But neither the French nor
effort concerned in the production of the sprain, in gently exercising
effort for the twenty-thousandth time and lay down. But hardly had
effort not to throw the child down and ran with her to the large
effort to bring France to her knees by starvation, declared the coast of
effort to go near him. When he did so and heard the subdued moaning
effort to swallow, a question addressed to the patient or his attempt to
effort, and stress, like the opening of a door grown rusty on its
effort, he continued to urge the subject of annexation. Even in his last
efforts of the old count, and instead of being degraded to the ranks
efforts on opening the mints of the government for the free coinage of
efforts to capture organized labor and seeing that the gains in
efforts to place on the Federalist candidate, President Adams, all the
efforts to stop "the present suicidal and destructive policy of
efforts vain; but the party call to the nation to repudiate Lincoln and
efforts were made by President Jackson to buy the territory for the
efforts were made in every community to lift the people above the plane
efforts, they accepted the inevitable and turned to manufacturing. Soon
effused under the conjunctiva is bright red, while that in the eyelids
effusion into the joint, or it may erupt on the periosteal surface and
effusion of blood, the skin is tense, and the muscles, vessels, and
effusion of fluid into the sac of the bursa with thickening of its
effusion of fluid into the sheath, the swelling is more marked and
effusion or hydrops, which is followed by fibrous thickening of the
effusion, which may be sterile. When the cocci gain access to the joint,
eggs of the sand-flea (_Pulex penetrans_) into the tissues. It occurs in
eight inches deep, and eight feet long. At one end of the trench,
eight o'clock the booming of cannon was added to the sound of
eight of the fifteen electoral votes cast by Pennsylvania. "Our beloved
eighteen inches and kept in this position for five minutes--till the
eighteenth century and the outbreak of the Revolution were in bondage.
eighteenth century the pioneers of Connecticut had pushed north and west
eighth day onwards. The presence of the reaction of degeneration
eighties, he had associated himself with the reformers in the Republican
eighty-six per cent in ten years. In this same period the total
eighty-three books and pamphlets to his credit. In cooperation with the
either at home or in Ireland and the Americans could see no good motive
either by natural means or by the aid of the surgeon, that repair takes
either by obstructing the venous return from the part (_passive
either resorted to or connived at the practice of kidnapping men, women,
either side of the tendon. When, in spite of palliative treatment, the
either through the mouth or nose. When this is impracticable, nutrient
either. Don't I know that at the rate we are living our means won't
elastic elements in its walls, the tunica intima curls up in the
elastic fibres--the internal elastic lamina. The tunica intima is easily
elastic, and usually painless. The movements are impaired, especially if
elasticity in the arteries. The condition may affect the whole vascular
elasticity of the vessel wall, they are liable to lead to the formation
elasticity, become hard and paralysed, and anaesthesia of the "glove" or
elbow with a vigorous movement. The Emperor's mild and handsome face
elbow, or hip. The patient suffers repeatedly from such haemorrhages, the
elbow. Partial displacement and mobility at the ossifying junction may
elbowed to one side the busy citizen, not conversant with party
elbows on the table and, with a look of nervous agitation such as
elder, who slew hundreds of the French.
elderly face, and she took the money from under the handkerchief.
elect the directors and the directors, in turn, choose a business
elected by direct popular vote. There was also easy agreement on the
elected, be appointed to any civil office under the authority of the
election and then withdrawing it. The drift was inevitable, and the
election as chief of the militia would not please the Emperor. They
election of 1800. The Republicans left no stone unturned in their
election of 1852 seemed to show conclusively that the nation was weary
election of 1880. A still greater drop came four years later and the
election one degree from the populace. In the second place, their term
election, Senator Harding, of Ohio, knew better. The election returns
elections were frequently held in the open air and the poll was taken by
elections, and two years later they were decisively beaten in the
elective and conferring American citizenship upon the inhabitants of the
electoral vote stood 277 to 254. The result was regarded, and not
electoral votes, and his party, while retaining possession of the House
electors in each State shall have the qualifications requisite for
electors of the most numerous branch of the State legislature.
electors of the most numerous branch of the state legislature." Thus
electors with the legislature. Eight years later South Carolina alone
electrode applied to the spine, and the negative over the affected nerve
electrolysis is employed, it should be directed towards the afferent
electronic works in formats readable by the widest variety of computers
electronic works in formats readable by the widest variety of computers
element favored the large estate. Slave labor quickly exhausted the soil
element in the structure of the tumour. They are sometimes derived from
element of fear may to some extent be eliminated by the preliminary
element of foreign competition. As a part of the revenue act Congress
element of freedom is just as impossible as the conception of a
elemental force against which man is powerless--to the condition I
elements are diffused over the peritoneum, and may give rise to
elements into the tissues--with the result that an insufficient quantity
elements of the vessel wall are destroyed by suppuration, and the
elements succumb, and the process for the time being is a destructive
elevate the arm; there is always loss of sensation on the lateral aspect
elevation of the limb. The skin becomes rough and warty, and may hang
elevation of the part, and firm pressure applied by means of a thick pad
eleven billion dollars. Even after the Confederate Congress authorized
eleven states stood in a peculiar relation to the union now declared
elicited after close investigation. From the history it is usually easy
elicited, in her presence, joyous comments from the countess, who
elided from the article le before the word Empereur. By omitting the
eligible to that office who shall not have attained to the age of
eligible to the office of President; neither shall any person be
eliminate the conflict between capital and labor by making workingmen
eliminate undeserved poverty, industrial diseases, unemployment, and the
eliminating the poison already circulating in his blood.
ellipse of skin is removed along with the cyst. When inflamed, it may be
eloquent lines to their memory: "These wretches had occupied the
eloquent, nor could I frankly mention my doubts to the Brothers and to
else you please. But why intellectual activity is considered by the
else, and in the course of the dispute drew from his side pocket a
elsewhere--in the relation to the people of the man who wields the
elsewhere. The captain went out into the porch and gave some orders in
emaciated face that bore the stamp of inconsolable grief, replied:
emaciation which the laity associate with consumptive disease. A
emanated from the man who gave it or from the Emperor and whether it
emanations and the reaction produced. The object aimed at is to induce
emancipated should be given outright the fields of their former
emancipation. If a date must be fixed for its appearance, the year 1831
emancipation. Six days later it abolished slavery in the District of
embankment, to celebrate the signing of peace with the Turks, and
embarrassed by the problem of supplies. Their troops could not forage
embarrassed, "is the Emperor...?"
embarrassing attentions. On the face of the wag Zherkov there suddenly
embarrassment looked Pierre straight in the face.
embedded in the subcutaneous tissue, from which they can readily be
embedded in the tissues of animals suffering from the disease. In the
embedded in the tissues. As a result of explosions, particles of carbon,
embolism, and metastatic suppurations in the kidneys, heart-wall, and
embolism. Arterio-sclerosis also interferes with the natural arrest of
embolus at its bifurcation, the obstruction of the iliacs and femorals
embolus, thus if the _abdominal aorta_ becomes suddenly occluded by an
embolus. This may be observed in sarcoma of the kidney, the growth
embraced him and lifting his spectacles kissed his friend on the cheek
embraced his bald head, over which she again looked at the letter
emergencies West as well as East. When some Japanese came to the United
emerging from the gates of the yards and moving along the streets.
emigrants, was an economic matter. It involved the use of capital to pay
emigre who declined to marry the lady with whom he had spent his
eminences unduly prominent; the bridge of the nose sunken and rounded;
eminent men with instructions to reach an understanding with the French
eminent tribunal. At the same time they saw a powerful combination of
emotion most commonly stirred. A horseman, at the witching hour of
emotional and softened mood he went out of the hut in which he was
emperor, kings, and princes who had deserved it, reprimanded the kings
empire, was sent to America as a special agent. For months he filled the
empire. At the same time Zebulon Pike, in a series of journeys, explored
empire. The economists, who tried to prove by logic unassailable that
empire. To the north and west were the French, ambitious, energetic,
empires in North America. It was the ambition of Louis XIV of France,
employed all the old feminine arts. But as soon as the prince had gone
employed either officially or unofficially by members of the Klan. Tar
employed for the dressing of wounds. _Double cyanide gauze_ may be used
employed for wages as contrasted with the farmers working on their own
employed in the World War. (See below, chapter XXV.)
employed in the form of a 10 per cent. solution in ether or the same
employed in them; while the total value of the output, fourteen billion
employed, the tube containing it should be inserted into the substance
employed. The tension is relieved and death of skin prevented by scoring
employees to make room for men "fresh from the people." This was a new
employer and the individual employee standing alone. The great
employers and the general public, raising up against itself a vigorous
employing torsion, the end of the vessel is caught with forceps, and the
employment; to the legitimists of that day that it was the need of
empower the executive thereof to make temporary appointments until the
empowered to inquire into the methods of corporations and lodge
emptied, and if pressure is then made over the region of the saphenous
emptied, the iodoform is introduced through a short rubber tube attached
empty and that the serfs continued to give in money and work all
empty. It was empty in the sense that a dying queenless hive is empty.
emptying his glass at one gulp he dashed it to the floor. Many
enable the packer, miller, and speculator to hold on to their produce
enabled the landlords to maintain themselves in power as a governing
enabling it to resist the blood-pressure and so prevent rupture, but, if
enact it, have been whistled down the wind in this Senate as idle talk
enacted a voluntary arbitration law applicable to the railways. The
enacted and approved, null and void, on the ground that they were
enacted and the Supreme Court, after the death of John Marshall, had
enacted previous to the close of the French and Indian war. Relatively
enactment, Parliament declared its intention not to exercise the right
enamel, dentine, and cement. The tumour is to be regarded as being
enchanting, and great man! Let us drink to his health and to the
encompass the realms of Russia with death-bearing terrors; humble
encounter and to preserve his troops, the massacre of the broken mob
encounter one another at the clean, smart hussars who moved past
encounter the shaft of a long bone, even the femur, they fracture the
encounter with the French since Suvorov met them. He feared that
encountered in the Senate, especially from the West, was overcome by
encountered vigorous opposition in the Senate, where twenty-four
encountering the old prince, of whom he was afraid. He did not mention
encounters the monuments and tradition of that period.
encourage the emancipation of slaves and their return to Africa. James
encouraged rather than extinguished the vigorous movement among the
encouraged the Democrats to redouble their efforts all along the line.
encouraged the early establishment of varied industries, thus creating a
encouraged." He likewise cautioned the people against "the insidious
encroaches also on the orbital cavities. In addition to the hideous
encroaches on the cavity of the joint and gives rise to adhesions, and
end an even chatter of voices was heard all the time, at the men's end
end he gave me a notebook, the one I am now writing in and in which
end of June. The first army, with which was the Emperor, occupied
end of his effort and the cause was in the hands of Congress. Humanity,
end of his life could he understand goodness, beauty, or truth, or the
end of the divided nerve is usually limited to the immediate proximity
end of the femur, or either end of the humerus, may be the seat of the
end of the femur, the upper end of the tibia, and the bones of the
end of the femur. It may be less evident to the eye than to the fingers,
end of the room.
end of the tibia and the lower end of the femur; the other bones of the
end of the xiphi-sternum; when the sternum and cartilages form a
end that peace may be restored on the basis of the federal union of the
end, in this way ensuring a better hold and preventing the ligature from
end, may spread to the other.
end. And the only such conception known to historians is that of
end. May I have succeeded!' The Prussian generals pride themselves
end. Out of the bushes came the huntsman who had been fighting and
endanger the cause of union. They were applied all through the Northern
endanger the vitality of the tissues by pressing on the blood vessels to
endangered by toxaemia, which is attributed to the primary lesion. It may
endangered, it is advisable to expose the injured vessel, and, after
endeavors we are gravely hampered by the political institutions of
endeavours to save himself by clutching at some projection, and the
ended, again turning to the count. "Zat is how ve old hussars look
ended, but her love for her mother unexpectedly showed her that the
ended. It seemed to him as though one of the soldiers near him hit him
endemic in Samoa, Barbadoes, and other places. It attacks the lower
endorsement. In 1896 the Democratic platform denounced "government by
endothelioma, or myeloma. The tumour tissue largely disappears, while
endotheliomata of the skin have recently been described by Wise.
endothelium of the vessel walls, which result in an increased formation
ends like the piers of a bridge; this method is well suited to defects
ends of the nerve being sutured, or the distal end grafted into the
ends. One was to count the slaves as people when apportioning
ends. The blood that escapes from the injured vessel fills the
ends. When the space is considerable the connecting medium consists of
endure a collision with the warlike military group of the east, (2)
enemy came into view through the smoke, no one paid any attention to
enemy of England, compelled to choose in the interest of America, never
enemy ship found therein would be destroyed. The German decree added
enemy was, the long-drawn shouts of thousands of voices. His horse and
enemy would send the squadron on a desperate attack just to punish
enemy's fires were still in the same places. He nodded approval.
enemy's hand, lacking the spirit to die stinging him; the rest are
enemy's troops. The weather had cleared again since noon and the sun
enemy, who at the moment is not Bonaparte but Buxhowden. General
enemy. On the tenth of August the regiment Prince Andrew commanded was
enemy; and though the big hospitals and the houses in Krems
energetic men ready to develop them, and then to leave the rest to the
energetic steps of her sturdy little legs, and having examined the
energy and unheard-of rapidity toward the goal they had fixed on.
energy, and immense number of the delving insects prove that despite
enforce his own orders. To the end he pursued his willful way, finally
enforce it. They had been deeply offended by the assault on freedom of
enforcement of neutrality against the friends of Cuban independence, no
enfranchised their women. Illinois in 1913 conferred upon them the right
engaged in export trade, the purpose being to encourage large
engaged in such conduct upon the first tree that I can reach." He made
engagement to Prince Andrew, and knew that the Rostovs had lived in
engagements with Your Majesty, your troops have crossed the Russian
engine, and the oak, I shall not discover the cause of the bells
engorgement and infiltration of the synovial membrane, and an effusion
engraved stock which Gerasim had replaced on the writing table, he
engrossed the general attention, and Anna Pavlovna felt that the
engulfing them all. The dragoon was about to repeat his blow.
enhanced the demand for the produce of the soil. It brought about
enjoyable!" was what the face of each soldier and each officer
enjoyed the respect of his fellow prisoners. He kept one hand, in
enjoyed, and he was beginning to make plans for marrying one of the
enjoying the favors of a very important personage and Boris had only
enjoying the feelings of a man who has at length begun to attain a
enjoyment, gazing with ever-increasing amiability at the other guests.
enlarge the treatment of our own time. We have given special attention
enlarged and painful. In severe cases the symptoms merge into those of
enlarged branches of an arterial trunk. It originates in the smaller
enlarged bursae, synovial cysts, and new-growths are the swellings most
enlarged glands, and sarcoma, especially pulsating sarcoma of one of the
enlarged in all directions and project on the face, and the nasal fossae
enlarged, but if these are inconveniently situated--for example, in the
enlarged, leading to the formation of a cavernous angioma.
enlarged, with pain and tenderness on pressure; in others there are the
enlargement in the neck which attends tonsillitis and other forms of
enlargement of American trade." On this ground he directed the
enlargement of the spleen, is known in veterinary surgery as "splenic
enlisted for the war. Nearly all of them were well disciplined and many
enormous and brilliant comet of 1812--the comet which was said to
enormous movements of the mass of which in his regiment he felt
enormous projecting tumours, the swelling being added to by lymphatic
enormously high study door opened and showed the figure of a rather
enormously long row of carts full of wounded men had stopped in the
enough of the new bone is taken away to allow of the removal of the
enough to cause ulceration of the vessel wall by pressure.
enough to divide muscular fibres at right angles to their long axis. The
enough to dominate after the Revolution, but, for the most part,
enough to satisfy the land hunger of the American people for a century
enough." So the soldiers, after a twenty-mile march, were kept mending
enough; but still nothing as compared with the chaos that would follow
enraptured, mounted chasseurs of the Guard who, breathless with
enriched by the fur trade of the Far West and the steamboat traffic of
enriches a part enriches the whole." To the future he turned an
enrolled from our people and starting to join the army. You should
enrollment in 1900 was only 300,000. At that point the increase became
enrollment of recruits at the Treasury, cautiously ventured to suggest
ensue resemble in character those in other tissues, and the extent of
ensue, followed by the discharge of pus on the free surface. It would
ensued and Congress adjourned without making provision for the army.
ensued the treaty was definitely rejected, owing to the failure of its
ensuing in the wound. (4) Loss of muscle or tendon, interfering with
entangle portions of the false membrane or exudate. The swab thus
entangled in the crowds of soldiers.
enter first. He walked shyly and awkwardly over the parquet floor of
enter the circulating blood, in which they are carried as emboli. These
entered on the journal.
entered the League or not, it could not close its doors to the world and
entered the ballroom. First came Marya Dmitrievna and the count,
entered the drawing room and seeing Anatole went up to him.
entered the field. It led the Democratic candidate in that year,
entered the hall, took off her fur cloak, and, beside Sonya and in
entered the lists, only to meet another defeat. Though he polled almost
entered the lists.
entered the room, stepping briskly to the front of the crowd of
entered the room.
entered the room...."
entered the service at the age of sixteen, had been in Paris and
entered the vestibule.
entered through a wound or abrasion of the surface, or along the ducts
entered to the sounds of music that had immediately struck up.
entering an enchanted, sleeping castle. The same old stateliness,
entering the anteroom and inquired timidly and softly whether the
enterprise demanded capital larger than the ordinary merchant or
enterprise set in motion by the famous Morgan banking house of New York.
enterprise, American shippers had become the foremost carriers on the
enterprise, began to filter into the new settlements in increasing
enterprise. The cotton and sugar lands of Louisiana, opened by French
enterprises, or in the general enterprises of development. This was for
enters, the sensation of fear and respect which the old man inspired
entertained with conversation about the French embassy, at once
entertainment at the gypsies', with the result that he had no
enthusiasm and spoke of it as Plutarch speaks of the deeds of the
enthusiasm but, on the contrary, looked like a man ashamed of what
enthusiasm could not bear to remain inactive and has left the
enthusiasm on him--though it happened not to be the Emperor-
enthusiasm. The band immediately struck up "Conquest's joyful
enthusiasm; he is grand. But Kutuzov--the man who from the beginning
enthusiast who had brooded over the oppression of a people until he
enthusiastic shouts of the audience.
entire British system of trade discrimination was turned against the
entire army along the Krems-Znaim road. Bagration's exhausted and
entire business. So extensive had profit-sharing become by 1914 that the
entire cotton crop. Having both the raw materials and the power at hand,
entire government which they were to hold for fourteen years--until the
entirely by the ingrowing of the cutaneous epithelium from the margins;
entirely in Moscow. All the members of the lodges were men Pierre knew
entirely local and depend for their severity on the environment of the
entirely of fat, the arborescent lipoma (Fig. 159) being the most
entirely of men and women known for the freedom of their conduct.
entirely superseded marine sponges for operative purposes. To avoid the
entirety, announcing themselves to be "irreconcilables." The grounds of
entitled to the office.
entitled to the presidency. Their anger was deepened when Adams
entitled." Then followed the list of grievances, the same number which
entitled; and took over the management of the entire business. Such was
entitling them to make entries in the West, called for action.
entity to whom you paid the fee as set forth in paragraph 1.E.8.
entity to whom you paid the fee as set forth in paragraph 1.E.8.
entrance is smaller than the bullet. If the weapon is discharged within
entrance may be inverted, and those of the exit wound everted. If the
entrance, after scrutinizing the mother and son (who without asking to
entrance. He went down that staircase and out into the yard. No one
entrenched under the enemy's fire, if they have nothing to do, try
entrenchments looked out just as menacingly, and the unlimbered cannon
entrenchments there by the twenty fifth and that those begun on the
entrusted with the executing of the plan.
entry of the French into Moscow, during the whole of that agitating,
enumerated, and the restrictions upon the states had been written into
enveloping the whole neighborhood in powder smoke.
envious looks which had followed him out from both sides, and the face
envy of the nations!
envy, earthly love, or desire, and reaching at last the place where
epidermis, such as a sun blister, the bite of an insect, or a scratch. A
epidermis, which grows downwards, pressing upon and displacing the
epigastrium and lower intercostal spaces. The hoarseness becomes more
epilation may occur without destroying the hair follicles and the hairs
epiphysis and destruction of the articular surfaces or dislocation of
epiphysis may be kept in place by the periosteum, but when this has been
epiphysis, rarely from fracture of the shaft of the bone. X-ray
epistaxis. The infection may spread along the nasal duct to the
epithelial grafts, or with a flap of the whole thickness of the skin.
epithelial tumours, giving rise to _melanotic cancer_, one of the most
epithelioid cells. At a later stage, the gland tissue is studded with
epithelioma and melanotic cancer are the forms met with. Treatment
epithelioma has been described by Neve of Kashmir. The natives in that
epithelioma originates at the skin orifice of the sinus, and spreads to
epitheliomas of the skin may be cured by means of the rays, they are not
epithelium along the sides of the ulcer, this must be removed by the
epithelium in which the cancer originates. The malignancy of cancer
epithelium is attempting to grow over the surface; also their shape,
epithelium of a mucous membrane is regenerated in the same way as that
epithelium of the enamel organ, and constitutes a multilocular cystic
epithelium, and they invade the sub-epithelial connective tissue in the
epithelium, fluid fat, and hair. If the cyst ruptures, the epithelial
epithelium. The contents consist of accumulated epithelial cells, and
epithelium. The disease was unknown in Europe before the year 1493, when
epoch-making French Revolution--which not only shook the thrones of the
equal necessity fell to the planting interest. While the planting
equal or unequal to each other simply because the masses involved
equal work and gave official recognition to the value of their services
equality between the sections. Had their narrow views prevailed, the
equally absurd to the serious student of military affairs. Any one who
equally essential to success at the polls. The southern counties of
equally important in the development of America, where practically all
equally positive although, on account of the composition of the Senate,
equally set against this course for his country. He feared the
equally zealous opposition and in 1830 he was overthrown. The popular
equation does not give us the value of the unknown factor but gives us
equine animals, horned cattle being immune. It affects the septum of the
equino-varus. Pressure sores and perforating ulcer of the foot are the
equipment employed, and so on--mistaking these for the real
equipment of the newly commissioned officer were collected. Anna
equipped, out of every thousand serfs, as the Smolensk gentry had
equities involved by sneering at the debtors."
equity, arising under this Constitution, the laws of the United States,
equivalent to that of an acid cauterisation, and on those round the
erect posture the great saphena receives a large share of the backward
erect, looking at something over the heads of the ladies. "He's
erected out of slender needles or splinters, to the sound of this
erected tariff barriers against their neighbors. The condition of the
ergot of rye. It has also occurred in the fingers of patients who have
erosion of cartilage, caries of the articular surfaces, and
erosion of the wall of the artery so that it gives way under the
errand and brought back the guitar.
eruption, on the brown stains which are left after it has passed off, on
eruption, the papules being of large size, with a smooth shining top and
eruption. The thickened tooth sac is usually mistaken for a fibrous
eruptions, especially in the form of blisters, occur, or there may be
erupts through the capsule of the gland, and infiltrates the surrounding
erupts through the shell and reaches the periosteal surface or invades
erysipelas invades the mucous membrane of the mouth, and spreads to the
erysipelas, especially when it affects the head or face; or with chronic
erysipelas, especially when they affect the face or the lower extremity,
erythema sometimes appear scattered over the body. The skin may assume a
erythema; (2) vesication; (3) partial destruction of the true skin; (4)
esaul and the Cossacks rode past Petya and Denisov. When they had
esaul, who was fond of using words the Cossacks did not know.
escape by new channels, or one of the old sinuses may re-open.
escape him. Buxhowden pursues us--we scuttle. He hardly crosses the
escape the dreadful crash greeted it with a sigh of relief.
escape. Every additional day the patient lives adds to the probability
escapes into the cellular tissue.
escaping it; the other, still more reasonably, says that it is too
escaping what they called "the domination of trade unions." In the babel
escorted him to the door, repeating something to him several times
especial attention. This was unavoidable. By far the larger part of the
especially about Sophie--I can't repeat them--that it made the count
especially about the honors conferred on Buonaparte, who only at
especially after the French soldiers enlisted the Indians in their
especially among women and children, was found to be the low wages paid
especially at the one running toward them.
especially by the French, which says that a girl should not let
especially by their employment at an early stage in the disease, the
especially dangerous, because of the greater risk of dissemination of
especially expensive. The twenty-five thousand men put in the field by
especially if the ideal of a nation of home-owning farmers was to be
especially if the nerves have been cut so as to be exposed in the wound,
especially if there is a tendency to sickness and the patient is not
especially in disease of the hip or knee; it eliminates muscular spasm,
especially in the South and the West. Its notes drove out of circulation
especially in the case of the femur, with its liability to fracture; so
especially in the knee, the clinical features are those of an enormous
especially in women, around the anus, beneath large pendulous mammae,
especially muscle, is removed with the knife or scissors, and foreign
especially of the face, feet, and hands. The skin is moist with a cold,
especially of the fifth, or fifth and sixth, anterior branches.
especially on returning to the old conditions of life amid which he
especially on the face. The dressing and the after-treatment are the
especially round the neck or chest, must be loosened. The heart may be
especially such as are associated with the loss of large quantities of
especially such as implicate the marrow of long bones--for example,
especially the congenital variety which grows from the periosteum, and
especially the conservative sentiment of the country."
especially the extensors, in the vicinity of the joint is a constant
especially the great toe, whence it spreads up the foot to the heel, or
especially the sterno-mastoid and trapezius. The patient is inclined to
especially the trapezius and latissimus, are the first to be affected,
especially to the surface exposed at the line of demarcation. In moist
especially true of children who grow at the average rate; in those,
especially when situated over the sternum, appear to be specially
especially when the blood escapes externally, that it rapidly proves
especially when the cut runs across the part, or when it extends deeply
espouse the cause of the province. Far to the north the sister of James
essence of life, and the laws defining that essence.
essence of the matter aside, shut out the possibility of that
essential cause of varix. The weight of evidence is in favour of the
essential for him to go to Petersburg, and even to re-enter the
essential in defending the colonies against the Spanish, Dutch, and
essential rights of each? (6) What shall be the form of the new
essential that the surgeon should be conversant not only with the normal
essential that the vessel should be lying over a bone which will furnish
essentials which the pioneers had to buy mainly in Eastern markets were
establish a conception of the expression of will, referring it to
establish negro supremacy in the ten states in order to gain to itself
establish the diagnosis without delay by demonstrating the spirochaete.
establish this Constitution for the United States of America.
established by Hutchinson. It occurs between the ages of six and sixteen
established by the Missouri Compromise, and then carried back into his
established in 1858, and more than ten days for the swift pony express,
established in the islands would be designed "not for our satisfaction
established the "spoils system" at Washington. The famous slogan, "to
established, and in the meantime preparations for operation should be
established. A wound of the right lymphatic duct is of less importance.
established. Already there were signs of the coming democratic flood
establishing the first United States Bank for a period of twenty years
establishing the new government. When at length they were driven from
establishment of an army, but it could only request the states to supply
establishment of gold as the sole unit of value must have a ruinous
establishment of vascular connections, it contributes to the survival of
establishment which Nicholas had even enlarged, the same fifty
establishments increased 79.6 per cent as against 14.2 for the previous
establishments under the patronage of the Dowager Empress. In Helene's
estate and will keep it; you won't require it. We'll go into the
estates and the growth of a large body of small farmers or freeholders
estates came to beg him to buy them, and long after his death the
estates in Great Russia, which formed the larger part of his property,
estates. Some of the stewards (there were semiliterate foremen among
estates. They were bound to pay the owner a rent in money and kind; they
estimable man. I used to meet him at Mary Antonovna's," said the
estimated that the planters annually lent to Northern merchants the full
estime que je professe pour the Orthodox Russian army, j'avoue que
eternity." And again he twisted the screw with the stripped thread,
eternity; again the question: for what? presented itself; and he
eusol a useful adjuvant to the passive hyperaemia.
eusol for some hours daily is useful. The sore is then covered with a
evacuated Philadelphia in the summer following the alliance, and
evacuation of the abscess by a hollow needle may suffice, or bismuth or
evanescent macular rash, not unlike that of measles--_roseola_--is the
evanescent periostitis, the patient complaining of nocturnal pains over
even add to it--the resulting picture differing widely in different
even approved of it. He now approached the sick man with the noiseless
even as far away as the fjords of Norway. Seldom had the plow of man cut
even brighter than before. The light was so strong and the snow
even broken with their party colleagues to vote against the entire
even destructions of power result from a nonobservance by the rulers
even diffuse daylight, is inimical to the growth of bacteria, as are
even express in words--the Great All or Nothing-" said he to
even have a rigor. At the same time he feels generally out of sorts,
even hinted at corruption. He refused to assent to the proposition that
even know), the matchmaking chronicles of Moscow now speak of me as
even learned to speak the language of the land over which he reigned.
even less than the frightened and bewildered Mitenka. The conversation
even mentioned in the Orders of the Day. That's what keeping one's
even military assistance. For the transaction of this delicate business,
even more vigorous and alert than he had done the day before. Only his
even obliterated; sometimes the soft parts, including the cartilages,
even on the cannon! Look there, those are furs!" they exclaimed. "Just
even ought to go straight to him and give the message Dolgorukov had
even pleasant to be able to show, by disregarding the orders, that she
even pushed aside, he began wrapping it round the princess. Either
even ready to fight in the streets. Do not be upset, brothers, that
even the Grand Master of the principal lodge.
even the hair was wet, so profusely had the child perspired. He was
even the happier for it?" So thought Prince Bolkonski while
even the removal of a portion of it, is not necessarily followed by
even those of the jaws, are abolished. The subjects of this disease
even to 106 o F., and assumes a pyaemic type. The pulse becomes rapid and
even to the layman who cannot be expected to master the details of a
even to the leg (Fig. 20). There is often a history of some slight
even under his weight alone. The men looked at him and pressed to
even went so far as to authorize the confiscation of the property of the
even when sought for. The streptococci are found most abundantly in the
even when the danger from haemorrhage has been overcome, may have a fatal
even with the help of the X-rays, and their nature is seldom recognised
even without complying with the full terms of this agreement.  See
even without complying with the full terms of this agreement.  See
even years after the official publication date.
even years after the official publication date.
evening and advanced during the night. It was an autumn night with
evening of the second of September.
evening. (This was the battle of Shevardino.) He was told that there
evening. Denisov himself intended going with the esaul and Petya to
event of another war unless prevented by the foresight of this body....
events altered the whole situation.
events another answer presents itself, namely, that the course of
events in the forthcoming action in broad outline. He imagined only
events may be explained by the fact that certain persons treated one
events that subsequently occur, the law of reciprocity comes in,
events to consider the annexation of the Hawaiian Islands in the
events, remembrance of remote ones, and the childish vanity with which
events, we find that a command can never be the cause of the event,
events. On the 1st, Germany declared war on Russia. On the 2d, the
events. The incontestable proof of this deduction is that, however
events? It's too late now when Vienna is occupied by the French army!"
events? What force made men act so? These are the instinctive,
eventuality could alter the efficiency of the Drissa camp, that
eventually forms, but the sloughs are exceedingly slow to separate,
ever before in the history of our country. That there had been abuses in
ever in the person of this murderer and villain! We alone must
ever with politics, delayed; and the inhabitants of Michigan, unable to
ever-increasing intimacy with Mademoiselle Bourienne. The idea that at
ever. A solitary tallow candle burned in the anteroom.
everted the tendon of the peroneus longus is liable to be jerked
every administrator finds the chief reward of his labor and efforts.
every burden and hardship and introduced some of the features of
every conservative who doubted the omniscience of the people. All these
every day to the Rostovs', but did not behave to Natasha as an
every day, and yet he continued to spend whole days with the Rostovs.
every denomination, not excepting the Episcopalian, thunder and lighten
every honest man's duty to go against the government, and that the
every line it revealed a determined effort to tear apart the great
every loss, the liveliness increased more and more.
every man a clean shirt, and in every knapsack the appointed number of
every man be fully imbued with the thought that we must defeat these
every man dies, up to the knowledge of the most complex economic and
every man; that..." They interrupted him, for this was not to the
every morning prayed that the daily interview might pass off well.
every one knew, from the temper of Congress, meant war--a prospect which
every part of it. "The Wilmot Proviso," as the resolution was popularly
every township one section of land was set aside for the support of
every two, three, or four days. In the course of a fortnight or three
everybody had to serve, he took a post under his father in the
everybody has beaten the Germans. They beat no one--except one
everybody in one big union but brought together the employees of each
everybody who did not condemn loudly enough the proceedings of the
everybody within the houses was still asleep, Natasha experienced a
everybody--both those who, as he imagined, understood the real meaning
everyone adopted toward him the tone of men who know something
everyone had displayed during the Emperor's stay was the call for
everyone was talking about the army and about the enemy who was
everyone went out on tiptoe, leaving the great man to himself and
everyone would be at his youthfulness--and yet in the arrangement of
everyone's ear tingling. By that shriek she expressed what the
everything I understand, and the greatness of something
everything depends on innumerable conditions, the significance of
everything else in the world and above everything in the world.
everything else the Tsar did.
everything for it. The one thing that recalled the patriotic fervor
everything had been foreseen, and that if the enemy were really
everything in the children's lives that seemed noteworthy to their
everything in the world, it seemed to him, depended entirely on his
everything in the world." Prince Andrew came up to her with downcast
everything is green already.... How early! The birches and cherry
everything superfluous that in the excitement of the dispute he had
everything that constitutes men's happiness--the comforts of life,
everything that might lead up to the subject--this halting on all
everything was all right and everyone was cheerful. The thought has
everything, also thought that discussion of the government was a
everything, and put the matter before the Emperor," said Princess Anna
everything. One must think of the future, of all of you... I love
everything. The young people, at the countess' instigation, gathered
everywhere disturbed him and distracted him from the military cares
everywhere obtainable, very difficult, and near Ryazan where the
everywhere was one indication of the new tendency. Mr. Wilson had once
everywhere, absorbed the greater part of his vital energy. He did
everywhere, but the corner behind the piano in the sitting room was
everywhere. He might easily become aide-de-camp to the Emperor. You
evewything here is wotten and howwible, but the Tugendbund I don't
evidence now. Through the hard century-old bark, even where there were
evidence of a sequestrum. The medullary canal in the vicinity of the
evidence of healing. The parts around are usually pigmented and slightly
evidence of injury. In the mildest cases red spots or wheals--closely
evidence of the disease.
evidence than changes in the blood vessels, and in which the subsequent
evidence to the contrary. Napoleon's historians themselves tell us
evident a widespread alteration in the internal architecture of the
evident in many a record like the _Letters_ of Mrs. John Adams to her
evident nonsense; but if it is only some particular side of the
evident that the boundaries of Oregon must be fixed. Having made the
evidently a gentleman in disguise, and who was passing under the
evidently all made an effort to hold themselves at the height the
evidently both formed the same resolution; the eyes of both shone with
evidently confirming the opinion that everything was going from bad to
evidently did not understand it--in the bright light of the emotion
evidently disconcerted, very soon became silent and went in to the
evidently does not equal the resultant, namely the phenomenon of
evidently due to intemperance, and his mouth twitched nervously. The
evidently engrossed by her thoughts, was crossing herself for the last
evidently exhausted by work or by feasting. Two doors led from the
evidently in despair that the sole remaining chance of verifying his
evidently just been brushed, but one lock hung down in the middle of
evidently mistaking him for one of the hospital authorities.
evidently not wishing to join in the conversation, was looking over
evidently only to justify himself before the stranger. "Sister must
evidently run out of that room to give vent to the sobs that were
evidently suffered a defeat at the old prince's. She was still too
evidently suggesting that he should do the same. The rider, whose
evidently unable to understand all the complex significance his
evidently very proud of this but at the same time felt shy.
evil which sways the world. Think this over and I will come to you
evil, and all the institutions of state and church that have been
evils in life: remorse and illness. The only good is the absence of
evils, the management of cities early came under critical scrutiny. City
evils. Three lines of progress were laid out by the reformers. One group
evincing the strength of their attachment and the value of their
evoked by the memory of the time when the paper he was now reading had
evolution of American policy fell into three stages. At first the
exacerbations of pain; or the abscess may perforate the joint and set up
exactly the opposite effect from that which their authors intended.
exaggerated degree, the condition is described as an _arborescent
exaggerated grasseyement, "the prince has been scolding Michael
exalted personages passing in the streets in their elegant carriages
examination in which vessel it takes origin. The special symptoms to
examination is made with the X-rays. Although these tumours have been
examination of the status of women in her time; and Mrs. Elizabeth Ellet
examination with the X-rays, an exploratory incision should be made; if
examination with the X-rays.
examination with the X-rays.
examinations; (2) promotion for meritorious service of the government
examine it. In the holy science of our order all is one, all is
examined by the boldest thinkers. This in turn reacted upon women in the
examining only his momentary action in the present, unevoked by any
examining something down below and that one of the soldiers he had
examining that dreadful place. The doctor was very much displeased
examining the familiar Rostov features of the young man's face, his
examining the plan, evidently engrossed in his own ideas.
examining the urine that the cause of the condition is discovered. The
example at the elbow--a considerable amount of bone, and it may be also
example in a dense tissue like the scalp or periosteum, or in a friable
example is the cystic hygroma or hydrocele of the neck.
example of Oberlin: the University of Utah in 1850; Hillsdale College in
example of an inflamed ulcer is the venereal soft sore. The base of the
example of grafting is the transplantation of skin.
example rapidly. By 1920 the principle of public control over municipal
example set by the first chief magistrate.
example the face--both ends of a divided artery bleed freely. The blood
example the pleura and peritoneum, the restoration to the normal is not
example, Bright's disease, diabetes, or syphilis--the vitiated state of
example, _any condition which disturbs the static equilibrium of the
example, an attack of erysipelas may effect the cure of a patch of
example, and Mesopotamia and parts of the Sudan--but the people of all
example, becoming infected from cancer of the lip, tongue, or throat;
example, by shivering, rigor, or rise of temperature. The number of
example, by the pressure of the head of the humerus in a dislocation of
example, dock-porters and coal-heavers. It is more common on the right
example, flexion at the elbow in haemorrhage from the deep palmar arch.
example, in aneurysm of the common carotid near its origin, the artery
example, in certain fractures of the base of the skull, where
example, in the deeper planes of the neck--_Hilton's method_ of opening
example, in the neck or groin.
example, it may result from disease of the fibula or of the ankle-joint.
example, may profoundly modify the lesions they produce: witness the
example, should be flexed to a little less than a right angle; at the
example, the case of a person who receives a cut on the face by being
example, the election of 1860. In all the fifteen slave states the
example, the fact that the most common origin of the infection is in the
example, the preamble began: "When in the course of human events it
example, the traumatic, the septic, and the varicose ulcer; some from
example, when the wall of a vein is incised, or the vessel included in a
example, when the whole shaft of the bone is dead without the formation
example--are present at the same time; there is little itching; they are
examples of the kind in Russia. On other estates the serfs' compulsory
exceedingly brittle. In some cases the thickening is uniform, and in
exceedingly lofty, the members of the household and the footmen--one
exceeds the value of the silver in a silver dollar on the open market,
excellency how you propose to deal with the memorandum I have
excellency's participation in the common action is highly valued by
excellent reader, to read the appeal.
excellent results by the latter method in a large series of cases, the
excellent, simple, and kindly people. The old count's hospitality
except during the life of the person attainted.
except in the veins of the lower extremity, in the veins of the
except the Tsar!"
except the cavalry, the artillery, and the transport--there was no
except the drawing room, where you will be ranged side by side with
except the one cause of all causes. But there are laws directing
except the palms of the hands and soles of the feet. The tumours are of
exception to the mandatory principle arose in the case of German rights
exceptional cases the necrosis involves the entire vertical plate of the
exceptionally graceful, was first, even danced the pas de chale, but
exceptions to the theory.
excess of blood has left it. With the limb still raised, the ulcer with
excessive _pressure of splints_ over bony prominences, such as the
excessive haemorrhage, but they seldom manifest the characteristic
excessive pressure over a bony prominence, especially if the parts be
excessive tenderness and with impairment of the functions of the joint.
excessive tension, the fluid wave cannot be elicited. On the other hand,
excessive use of the limb. The symptoms usually subside under rest, only
exchange for Havana, which the British had seized during the war, Spain
exchange passed into the hands of Northern merchants and bankers who,
exchange the current paper money for the real gold of actual
exchanged for salt, lemons, and raisins for the American market. The
exchanged glances with the other committeemen. "There will be many
exchanging remarks. The old count rose once more, glanced at a note
excised; others advocate cauterisation of the affected part with solid
excising the bony mass.
excising the glands and the affected skin. The dissection may be
excision are usually satisfactory, even if the removal is not complete.
excision may bring about a permanent cure, but it may result in the
excision of the sac.
excision, followed by the use of radium and X-rays. We have observed a
excision, may recur as a fibro-sarcoma. The alveolar sarcoma commences
excitability to the interrupted current, and the specific alteration in
excited all the European powers. The Pope took an active interest in the
excited by the spirochaetes.
excited by their presence. They are found also in the diverticula of the
excited horse he galloped forward along the village street.
excited that he had not thought about it until that moment. The
excited voice told him the whole affair, asking him to intercede for
excited. Not noticing the monk, who had risen to greet her and was
excitement and mirth that shone in all their faces. Evidently in the
excitement in the lodge. The majority of the Brothers, seeing in it
excitement of the conflict could not and would not give way.
excitement, rushed toward the drawing-room door, probably in order
exciting news reached the East, a mighty rush began to California, over
exciting relapse or metastasis, the joint is massaged and exercised.
exclaimed Edmund Burke, in the House of Commons, "at the manner in
exclaimed the great jurist, Lord Mansfield, "is the overt act of High
exclaimed, and immediately seizing him by the shoulder and looking
exclamation he was asking the adjutant to wait, and he went on with
excluded from important offices. Not until the summer of 1898, when the
excluded from state and federal offices, and the fourteenth amendment
excluded; it will be observed that these are exactly the same conditions
excludes the standards of right and wrong. For the "great" man nothing
excluding the sole, is enveloped in a thick layer of wood-wool wadding.
exclusion of it from the territories of the United States by act of
exclusively formed by the cellular elements or osteoblasts: these are
exclusively in the central nervous system, retina, and optic nerve. It
exclusively in the knee; it is frequently bilateral, and is insidious in
exclusively of cells; while the harder forms--such as the fibro-,
exclusively on the lower third of the leg; from Bazin's disease (p. 74);
excretory ducts, such as those in the thyreoid.
excruciating pain, usually during the early hours of the morning, the
excursions of the head of the femur. The new bone, which limits the
excuse himself from appearing at the staff and went into hospital.
excuse that the prisoner was ill and could not walk, the officer
excuses now! It's your turn to sing the ba'cawolla--I entweat you!"
executed commissions to the Emperor himself, so that the latter knew
executed with all the civilities of law, was painful enough, for it
executed with needless severity in the autumn of 1864.
executing the law in South Carolina, was taken up. After a short but
execution of his design. The pistol, dagger, and peasant coat were
execution of the law.
executioner as he fulfilled the judgment of the law.
executioner of the peoples, assured himself that the aim of his
executioners." The remedy advanced was a federal law assuring trial by
executive (when the legislature cannot be convened), against domestic
executive and judicial officers of a State, or the members of the
executive departments, upon any subject relating to the duties of their
executive or judicial officer of any State, to support the Constitution
executive, however, there were many views. The New Jersey plan called
exercise of his veto power, known as the royal disallowance. Any person
exercise of the king's veto power in specific cases. Nevertheless, on
exercise the office of President of the United States.
exercised a profound influence on the drift of opinion among European
exercised a profound influence on the formation of the first political
exert themselves to cheer the men but merely carried out the
exerted to arrest the bleeding.
exerting injurious pressure on the nerve-trunks. The tourniquet should
exertion and prolonged standing or walking are to be avoided, and the
exertion, excitement, or over-stimulation, also interferes with the
exertion, he should be advised to take exercise in the open air. On
exertion, or exposure to cold and wet. This form of the disease is
exertions--the least effort to move her shoulders or bend her arms
exhausted forces. The defense of Vienna was no longer to be thought
exhausted, and sometimes strangely indifferent faces, the same
exhaustion of the energy-transforming mechanism. These changes vary in
exhaustion, and not from respiratory or cardiac spasm. The usual
exhibiting the manifestations that characterise the acquired form of the
exhibits expansile pulsation, forms, usually towards the left of the
exhibits malignant characters. The essential structural feature is the
exile, showed human dignity--Napoleon is the object of adulation and
exist), nor did he see an advanced post of the Russian army, but while
exist. It was impossible not to retreat a day's march, and then in the
existed among the people and gathered new forces ready to manifest
existed before the introduction of the antiseptic system by Joseph
existed only in his imagination. Pierre maintained the contrary, and
existed only in the heads of a dozen individuals--for the events and
existed under the Articles of Confederation. A paper currency, almost as
existed, only charred green boards and rags littered the scorched
existed. In the summer of 1915 a revolution broke out there--one of a
existence of tuberculous lesions in the marrow can only be inferred from
existence remained unchanged. There was still the hunting
existence. There then succeeds, usually between the twentieth and
exists as to the real nature of membranous croup and its relationship to
exists only to give measure to the words. As a result of this the
exists to gather honey. Another beekeeper who has studied the life
exists to suck the fragrance of flowers. A beekeeper, seeing the bee
exit of discharge, and the hyperaemic treatment is continued.
expanded figure and in the glass at her pale, sallow, emaciated face
expanding the currency, a step which the Democrats had long urged upon
expanse, to right and left of the forest and the road, smoking
expansion is the history of our nation's progress and glory. It is a
expansion of our territory," said the latter, "has been in accordance
expansion of the bone; it is fusiform or globular, and is at first
expect me to sacrifice my feelings and my honor for the sake of
expectation of a solemn event, and at the same time the everyday
expectation. Prince Vasili, in the rare moments when he was at home,
expectations, but the old man's strength was failing him. Several
expected from the war. Napoleon nodded condescendingly, as if to
expected the wolf to come his way any moment. He made thousands of
expected to discover in him the perfection of human qualities.
expecting answers from him to the questions that occupied all their
expedition.... But what's the southern army to do? Prussia is
expedition? The English will come off badly, you know, if Napoleon
expeditions across plain, desert, and mountain, arousing the interest of
expeditions and had him enrolled among the Cossacks.
expeditions to Olmutz to visit a certain Caroline the Hungarian, who
expel the French from this continent. The Secretary of State, Seward,
expenditures from the treasury in the form of public land grants to
expense of America. "Their Franklins and Washingtons and all the other
expensive products, and the buying of expensive seed corn, and did not
experience has confirmed our preference for it. For the convenience of
experience he knew it would be some time yet before the order, "Be
experience he knew, and with the wisdom of age understood, that it
experience in women that the signs of varix date from an antecedent
experience is required, not only to obtain the maximum effect of the
experience of life had reached the conviction that thoughts and the
experience the tormenting expectation of terror and death the cornet
experience these evils." With the Republicans nationalized, the
experienced driver knew it was better to hold the whip raised as a
experienced for the last fortnight, and the joy that had lit up her
experienced sportsman he knew that the beast was wounded, and
experienced the same feeling his mother, his father, and his sister
experienced the same feeling of respect and even fear when the
experienced the same feeling; sharing with the young folk of the
experiences a sudden pain, with the sensation of being struck with a
experiences, was able to form a clear conception of the man. Pfuel was
experiencing nothing but humiliation and failure." Frederick the Great,
experiment was under the direction of the men who had launched it. All
experimental investigations in the laboratory, and proved fatal. The
experimentally that joints are among the most susceptible parts of the
experimenting, there grew up in the industrial world a more radical
experiments in democracy. The protests of a few women, like Mrs. John
experiments of the same character.
expiration of the second year, of the second class at the expiration of
expire at the end of their next session.
explain our position to the count. It is amazing how his Serene
explain the matter according to the rules of fencing are the
explain the resultant forces they are obliged to admit, in addition to
explain, took possession of him. He felt that the condition he was
explained how to rivet the hoof and went away to his own quarters.
explaining the whole position of our troops. Pierre listened to him,
explanation of historic events in the will of one man; he is as
explanation of the rapidly fatal issue in extensive superficial burns.
exploit and to the forests and minerals awaiting the ax and the pick.
exploit at Trenton on Christmas night, 1776, and the battle with
exploration and settlement in the St. Lawrence country, the English
exploration must not be used again until they have been boiled. The
exploration. The aim is to remove all the disease with the least
explored and given its place in the general record.
exploring needle clears up the diagnosis.
expose to a bullet, and then you congratulate us on the victory! Admit
exposed for the first time, who would have felt very much ashamed
exposed to friction and pressure. The occurrence of a number or a
exposed to injury, are frequently the seat of thrombosis (Fig. 66).
exposed. The separation of the slough is a tedious process, and the
exposing the tissue of the gumma, which sometimes appears as a mucoid,
expostulated De Bow, "stands in the attitude of feeding ... a vast
exposure to a strong fire may cause severe degrees of burning, the
exposure to the X-rays.
exposure to the heat of the fire.
exposure to the sun's rays. They are characterised clinically by acute
expound his plan of cutting the enemy's lines of communication between
express and fundamental condition to the acquisition of any territory
expressed animation and apprehension, but it seemed to Pierre that the
expressed approval, and the governor's wife began to speak of Rostov
expressed in all the looks that met his.
expressed in words, and that any reference to the details of his
expressed is fulfilled, that opinion gets connected with the event
expressed to the effect that one ought not to go to the French theater
expressed, and, after withdrawing the needle, gentle massage of the
expressed. The ridicule and contempt were of course expressed in a
expresses the nation's life, we have first of all to know in what
expresses the sentiment of esteem and special regard I have long
expressing hatred for the French in words proved insufficient, when it
expressing its joy at the approach of the Emperors. One voice was
expressing legitimate criticism concerning the present government." The
expressing the thoughts that had suddenly occurred to him.
expression and she sat silent. She sat a long time looking at the
expression anywhere of a desire to do justice to the people of the
expression from the French, and when his eyes met those of the
expression in the management of great estates and the control of hosts
expression in the manifesto. In all these words she saw only that
expression in them which the countess knew so well and feared so much,
expression of extreme suffering and anxiety. When the paroxysm is
expression of his face at will, he drew nearer to the portrait and
expression of opinion. The first measure penalized those who conveyed
expression of the commander in chief's one sound eye showed him to
expression of the contradictory replies, not meeting the questions,
expression of the face that emerged from the shirt.
expression on her kind little face, "that really would be the match
expression on his face that the old man himself understood how
expression on the faces of soldiers, officers, generals, and
expression on the faces of the crowd of soldiers and militiamen who
expression on the faces of the listeners and from the fact that some
expression soon share in the rigidity, and the face assumes a taut,
expression to his own feelings and those of the Russian people whose
expression, was not disfigured by the approach of death. It was the
expression. "You remember when I looked in the mirror for you... at
expression. The officer walked in front, leaning on a stick and
expression.) "Take the covert at once, for my Girchik says the Ilagins
expressions, it was clear that the others knew, and Pfuel himself
exsiccated sulphate of iron, in the form of a powder, may be employed in
extend the forearm until the displaced tendon has been reduced by
extended above the head, causing over-stretching of the plexus,
extended line of the advancing Russian columns. Evidently the person
extended position of the limb.
extended position, and knew that the occupation of Moscow would not be
extended still more widely. The number of women teachers increased by
extended the system of rewarding party workers with government
extended to Virginia and North Carolina, as they withdrew from the
extended to nearly five years, when death resulted from a tumour in the
extended. The flap is raised as in the direct method but is left
extending from the Atlantic to the Mississippi and from the Great Lakes
extending from the pelvis to 6 inches beyond the sole.
extending in some places up to the road itself though in others a mile
extends along Kobelnitz and Sokolnitz behind the ponds that are there,
extends at any later period in life to the bones, joints, and internal
extends beyond the area of the original wound, and the name is derived
extends to the periosteum by way of the enlarged Haversian canals. The
extends towards the thorax, where it may become adherent to the pleura.
extension from those in the neck, from the mamma, ribs, or sternum, or
extension of a neuro-fibromatosis to the skin and subcutaneous cellular
extension of education, the improvement of living conditions in the
extension of the area under cultivation. Finally, the planter took a
extension of the disease and by the destruction of tissue and
extension of the railways, the development of the Great West, and the
extension to the territories, be taken as a standard, it was slight
extensive area, or has invaded the cavity of the orbit or nose, radium
extensive cancerous disease of the lymphatics in the axilla secondarily
extensive obliteration or blocking of the main lymph trunks. An
extensive tearing and bruising of all the tissues, including the bones,
extensive than appears externally. It is recognised clinically by the
extensively affected on both sides of the neck, it is advisable to allow
extensively lacerated than the wound of entrance. Its margins are as a
extensor muscles of the thumb. Epicritic sensibility is lost over the
extent and direction of any given sinus may be demonstrated by the use
extent as to lead to pathological fracture. If it is near the surface of
extent of land awaiting the white man's plow, it was impossible to
extent of spread in the medullary canal and beneath the periosteum is in
extent of the danger to which Bald Hills was exposed. Dessalles
extent of the disease are shown in X-ray photographs. After the
extent of the disease in the soft parts overlying the bone, and consists
extent of the gap. The peripheral end is completely degenerated, and is
extent of the loss of epicritic or protopathic sensibility, but usually
extent on the situation and extent of the affected area, and on the
extent the index finger: the terminal phalanx of the thumb cannot be
extent, follow the line of attachment of the interosseous membrane and
external conditions, whose action was performed very recently, and the
external influences, and in cold weather the parts present a bluish
external world is well known, where the time between the action and
externally, but prevented from doing so by Macewen's needling. The
externally, or into the cellular tissue of the iliac fossa.
externally; or to the petrous temporal, from suppuration in the middle
extolling Kutuzov as they had done the day before, they condemned
extra-peritoneal fat in the posterior abdominal wall, in which case it
extract of syphilitic liver rich in spirochaetes is mixed with the serum
extraneous agencies, the most important of which are infection by
extraordinarily clever doctor. He was received in the best houses
extraordinarily disdainful composure with which Speranski answered the
extraordinary and mysterious part of the prediction.
extraordinary clearness and rapidity. He again vividly recalled the
extraordinary event reached the United States, the people were filled
extraordinary outburst of agitation. Pamphlets streamed from the press.
extraordinary statement was invented (probably to justify the mistakes
extraordinary. Only the old countess with her maternal instinct had
extravasated blood being widely diffused through the cellular tissue of
extravasated blood in the tissues, from haemorrhage taking place into a
extravasations throughout the tissues of the body; (4) degeneration of
extravasations. Apart from combating the shock, or dealing with
extreme mental agitation and despair, and the sufferer is in constant
extreme socialism which exalts the state above the individual. Leaders
extremely pleasant to him. He thanked the soldier and began to eat.
extremist went to the length of advocating an equal division of wealth
extremities and pelvis to hang over the end of the table, while the
extremities, the most important question that arises is whether or not
extremities, the vertebral border of the scapula, and the cristal border
extremities. In course of time, particularly in the larger arteries,
extremity and when the veins also are obstructed, to become infected and
extremity or the genitals in either sex (Figs. 97, 98). The disease is
extremity the most reliable and satisfactory results are obtained by
extruded; the resulting scars are extremely unsightly, being puckered or
exudate containing a few dead leucocytes. They grow until they reach the
exudation, resulting in the formation of new connective tissue which
exultantly wrote a Boston editor. "In no part of the globe," soberly
eye at the sun, which showed like a huge crimson ball in the unclouded
eye in the crowd was turned to her; evidently they were all trying
eye must be protected from irritation, especially during the first month
eye on the order of retreat, "which is also very important."
eyebrows gave it to the waiter.
eyebrows which, when he frowned, sometimes hid the gleam of his
eyes and a look of complete absent-mindedness, kept rubbing the bridge
eyes and remained in doubt for over a second. The wolf ran forward and
eyes before the man who was making him angry. But he did forget
eyes fixed on a miniature portrait of her son on the lid of a
eyes fixed on what was going on before her, understood the meaning
eyes glanced askance at her husband's face, and her own assumed the
eyes had always shone with a suppressed smile of the joy of life,
eyes off the stage. And feeling the bright light that flooded the
eyes on him again. Pierre--only now realizing the danger to the old
eyes was resting on his hand. Raevski, twitching forward the black
eyes which penetrated into the very depths of her heart, it was
eyes wide, and assumed the expression he usually put on when taken
eyes, and stooped glass in hand over the infant.
eyes, and the impression of those voices and faces and a sense of
eyes, and went to the further end of his study. Having stood there a
eyes, he patted Michaud on the shoulder. "You set me at ease,
eyes, slightly bowed his head. The Emperor re-entered the ballroom and
eyes, to the sounds of firing. With painful dejection he awaited the
eyes, wearing the uniform of a general with sash over his shoulder,
eyes. Alpatych went out to the gate. A retreating regiment,
eyes. He sighed and pressed on the bench with both hands to raise
eyes. This was an old bachelor, Shinshin, a cousin of the countess', a
face all lit up by the moonlight. He slipped his arms under the
face and figure of Prince Andrew, in a fur cloak the deep collar of
face and neck may become affected. From the lips it may spread to the
face and personality generally, and in the cold, repellent glance
face and quivering nose. But if the count, getting more and more
face and searching beneath the eyebrows and mustache for his former
face becomes the seat of tumour-like masses consisting of leprous
face began to twitch. The twitching increased, the handsome mouth
face brightened. He kissed the countess' hand and Natasha's, and sat
face during the whole time of the reading, gazed at his delicate
face like the light of heaven, and from the blessed Mother's cheek
face of American business was changed. Three-fourths of the output from
face of the Emperor like a cloud of haze across a clear sky and
face on the field of Austerlitz. Not only does a good army commander
face stepped away from the man and looked round inquiringly at the
face to that of the lady in the black dress and said:
face was telling him how she had gone to look for mushrooms the
face went laughing out of the room. "Uncle" continued to play
face with kisses, holding him tight by the skirt of his coat, sprang
face, and she felt that the silence brooding over the house and within
face, but only pressed it to the cold braiding of his hussar's jacket.
face, had been defending himself against the hussars. When Petya
face, in the sound of his voice, in the stirring and deafening noise
face. The party was very successful and quite like other parties he
faced. Following the lines laid down by President McKinley, the
faces and scanty beards emerged from the tavern, smiling,
faces of the two Frenchmen as they ran past him, of the lowered and
faces suddenly changed to one of horror. The French were supposed to
faces that they despaired of the possibility of checking this
faces--that of fear. Prince Andrew for the second time asked the
facilitate the approximation of the edges of the resulting wound. The
facilitated by elevation of the limb and massage. (3) The induration of
facilities there.... Not so can it ever be in the hands of France....
facing it, on the crest of the opposite hill, the village of Schon
fact a little government set up by the king. When the members of the
fact of the days in which we live; and he who has any chance to instruct
fact that a large proportion of those who become the subjects of cancer
fact that all the generals expressed the same wish--could no longer
fact that the Monroe Doctrine celebrates in 1923 its hundredth
fact that the breach of surface at the line of demarcation furnishes a
fact that the majority of the council voted for such a retreat, and
fact that the routine injection of anti-tetanic serum to all patients
fact that the size of any army does not coincide with its strength and
fact that these "vaccines" render the bacteria in the tissues less able
fact that while Napoleon's proclamation was being read to the troops
fact they were to the whole Rostov family. Their usefulness did not
fact tried by a jury shall be otherwise reexamined in any court of the
fact which helps to explain the frequency with which varicosity occurs
fact which is made use of in the recognition of _concealed
fact, Bilibin's witticisms were hawked about in the Viennese drawing
fact, however, it did not prevent the continued use of injunctions
faction which had a substantial support in the silver mine owners of the
factor being usually derived from the throat, it may take on active
factories for paper, boxes, and furniture. As the railways preceded
factories, ships at the wharves, trade with friendly countries, the
factors in the causation of rickets are ill-health of the mother during
factors or the personal maintenance of a corps of artisans. He needed
factors probably explain the comparative frequency of aneurysm in those
factors, the nature of which is not always apparent.
factory and in his place came the manager, representing the usually
facts, more dates, more words--then history deserves most of the sharp
facts, were themselves uncertain as to the outcome of a civil war and
facts. As early as July 26, 1898, acting through the French ambassador,
fade again in the course of twenty-four hours. Sometimes large patches
failed to learn from Suvorov even so simple a thing as the art of
failed to manifest any heroic feelings), and the whole innumerable
failed to take account of the fact that the American people were growing
failing to receive the guarantee, broke off diplomatic relations. On the
failing to renew the licensing act, did away entirely with the official
fails to bring about a cure, repeating the injection every second day
fails, or if the condition is allowed to go untreated, the inflammatory
failure of it because the rates at which we haul you and your goods make
failure some twenty years before. After a heated argument over the
failure to receive the nomination, advised his friends to vote for
fainter and fainter in the South. Then apologies were superseded by
fainter in the distance, while his eyes saw nothing but the
fairly thundered at them, is the supreme law of the land; the Supreme
fairly well versed in European history. They knew of the balance of
faith in the meaning of life.
faith that the future of America lay in agriculture. Even a stanch old
faith: "The duties of any public office are so simple or admit of being
faithful reproduction of the structure of the primary tumour. Apart from
faithfully to execute the orders he had received, the whole French
fall in prices which followed the return of peace, the farmers of
fall of Austria's capital. "How is it Vienna was taken? What of the
fall of itself when ripe, but if picked unripe the apple is spoiled,
fall to 96 o F. or even lower. The mouth is parched, and the patient
fall.... Ah, they don't see it!" came identical shouts from the
fallen behind, and just as he looked round the first man changed his
fallen in love for the first and last time in her life.
fallen leaves that strewed the road. The men sat huddled up trying not
fallen leaves. The earth in the kitchen garden looked wet and black
fallen under a cannon and the crowd were dragging it out. A cannon
falling glass. It would appear that the rupture is brought about not so
falling prey to daring privateers and fleet American war vessels. The
falling snow a purple-black and starry sky showed itself and the frost
falls upon Mack and the Austrians, who surrender without a battle.
falls with the rulers of France turns to his advantage. His attempts
familiar faces of the men of the first battalion, and waited. "Here it
familiar voice. "One is afraid of the unknown, that's what it is.
families of slaves from generation to generation, came the plantation
families together in village life rather than dispersing them on the
families who had taken refuge here from the fire with their
families with the advantages of culture which come from leisure and the
family and to the crown serfs--those fields and meadows where for
family and with the household. With the stern old prince and the
family circle? How would the count have borne his dearly loved
family tendency to haemorrhage and inform the doctor of it, but they are
family were assembled near the round tea table at which Sonya presided
family, Count Ilya Rostov, continually drove about the city collecting
family, and who went once to the Nizhni fair with a companion--a
family, but by the tender friendship his commander showed him,
family, home, and all the cares of worldly welfare, in order without
family, restored to the throne of France by the allied powers after
family. This was favored by natural circumstances and the spirit of the
fan-like arrangement (Fig. 151). The peripheral portion consists of soft
fancied he had seen before) rode up to the ditch, struck his horse
fancies are crawling over him. The pulse is soft, rapid, and
fancy--of the look Platon had given him as he sat under the tree, of
fanning the flames of Populist discontent all over the West and South.
far and wide under the hot summer sun. No majestic mountains relieved
far as possible to conceal his own part in the improvements that had
far as the Dorogomilov gate, but there again stopped and,
far as the first post station.
far as the majority of its members were concerned--committed to
far from the capital of the Confederacy.
far from the convent. This was Prince Shcherbitov's house, where
far interfere with the circulation of the part pressed upon, that the
far off on the horizon turned away from the hare, and the whips, but
far wrong; but before the lapse of half that time there appeared beyond
far. He was the man of the hour! Amid lusty cheers from ten thousand
faradic current. When tested with the galvanic current, it is found that
farewell kiss. And there in the coffin was the same face, though
farm of 160 acres on the installment plan; another payment of $80 was
farm produce and even much of that for slaves, the planters naturally
farm-land views; farmers are pre-empting valleys and the sides of
farm. While the Confederate leaders were writing into their
farm." The spirit of this imaginative enterprise, which laid out
farmer perishes on his hands.... The recent war fell with peculiar
farmer's wheat, the housewife's sugar, coal at the mines, labor in the
farmer, too outspoken in his criticism of the government, found himself
farmers of the "middling order," and mechanics from the towns,--English,
farmers of the West and South claimed him as their own. The mechanics of
farmers preparing to preach, teach, or practice law. The College of New
farming of the thrifty and well-to-do peasant Matthew Ermishin, who
farms were drawn from every quarter of western Europe; but the freehold
farther, probably along the line of the French camp. Rostov no
farther. The Emperor reproached the commanders in chief for every step
farthest extremity of the panorama seemed carved in some precious
farthest point the dragoons. In the center, where Tushin's battery
fascia and pectoral muscles, according to the group of glands involved.
fascia and with the walls of veins. The caseated tissue often remains
fascia covering a muscle becoming stretched or torn, the muscular
fascia, a grooved director is gently pushed through the deeper tissues
fasciae, and ligaments, in those who are the subjects of arthritis
fasciae, paring away bruised tissues, and purifying the whole
fascinating feeling at the Sloboda Palace, when he had suddenly felt
fascinating marquise of thirty-five and at the same time for a
fashion on the wet grass.
fashion, resulting in the formation of a fibrous tumour--_the solid
fashions with the countess and Natasha, and about albums and fancywork
fast and prepare for Holy Communion, and Natasha gladly welcomed the
fastened to the cording of his uniform and, indicating a bandaged arm,
faster, vying with one another, they moved at the double or at a trot,
fat in the anterior abdominal wall and protrude from one of the hernial
fat, fascia, or tendon, and if the process continues for some time
fat, the skin is smooth and thin, and may be abnormally dry. The hair is
fatal termination. The differential diagnosis from other forms of
fatal. The barrier of human feeling, strained to the utmost, that
fatal. The streptococcus has less capacity of liquefying the tissues
fatal. When the bleeding takes place into the cellular tissue, the
fate of millions and by the employment of power confer benefactions.
fate of the army at Ulm)."
fates. The delegates, after cheering Mr. Bryan until they could cheer no
father about the battle and his visit to Brunn. At the door he found a
father and his fatherland. To the great regret of myself and of the
father as he opened the door--speaking from under the filmy skirt
father did it purposely when she was there) the old prince kissed
father is mortally sick you'll send the valet away and attend to
father of internal improvements," the solution of this problem was the
father to let her go to the dressing room to rearrange her dress, that
father to let him have the carriage to drive to town:
father to me!" The prince was about to say something, but Helene
father to the ambassador's entertainment; she wore a ball dress and
father understood him. The old man got up and gave the letter to his
father's house. Though he expected that the story of his escapade
father's letter, he returned to the nursery.
father's nature showed itself in Pierre. He felt the fascination and
father's pardon for herself and for Philip the footman, who had begged
father's room with the good-humored and victorious air natural to him.
father's room. The old man already knew everything. He was standing
father, but that the longer he stayed now the more embittered their
father, wife, sister, and future son, and the tenderness he had felt
father-in-law and now at Princess Mary. When they left the table she
father. The feminine society world welcomed him gladly, because he was
father. The old man made a departure from his usual routine in honor
fathers and mothers of the better kind gave their children the rudiments
fatty tumour is movable, and is often lobulated. The confusion with a
fauces and larynx, setting up an oedema of the glottis which may prove
faults, the possibility of a new, clean life, and of happiness.
favor an immediate declaration of the Nation's purpose to give to the
favor during this campaign, and who had formerly commanded the
favor of the principle that a man could choose the nation to which he
favor of the principle. The following year Washington referred to the
favorable to colonial prosperity. The Navigation Acts, for example,
favored the American cause. Great Britain, harassed, worn, and
favored the plans of the king to restore some of the ancient luster of
favorite expression when he was in a rage) and called for the
favorite topic--making fun of the military men of the day, and more
favorite, Natasha, on the cheek with her large hand.
favour coagulation. When the thrombus is formed slowly, it consists of
favoured by anything which throws excessive strain on the vessel walls,
favouring the development of a collateral circulation.
fear of a mixed infection, especially in abscesses near the rectum or
fear of breaking something in the master's apartment, and he
fear of his impending fate. Happily the inevitable issue is not long
fear of the Indians to produce in 1643 the New England Confederation,
fear this will oblige one half the army to shoot the other."
fear, and enthusiasm--was only the loss of the battle of Austerlitz,
fear, anxiety, or worry, physical injury and toxic infection, and the
fear, as at the sight of something too large and unsuited to the
fear, uttered the senseless cry, "Cut off!" that is so terrible in
feared that he would be a damper on the spirits of the company, but no
feared the growth of democracy and others cherished it. These factions
feared the trap would come for her too soon. After a casual pause,
feared this strange, unexpected happiness of meeting again the very
feared to make some mistake in speaking about the distribution of
fears of the planting states were allayed and the "bargain" over the
feasible in the peripheral veins, although, as will be pointed out
feather and bowing according to the rules of his art, as he
feather bed for the third time, muttering to herself.
feature is a gradually increasing difficulty of extending the limb at
feature may be the beading at the costo-chondral junctions, principally
feature of the disease, may be associated with actual lengthening, and
feature of the disease; the secondary growths in the glands exhibit the
features are similar to those observed when the infection has reached
features characteristic of the periods have been greatly modified since
features he adored: that same face and same look and step, and the
features met with in the male members.
features not unlike those of disease of the hip-joint. The limb is
features of the contest were the evacuation of Boston by the British,
fed upon grain brought halfway across the continent.
federal Constitution. With reference to the status of the former slaves
federal courts, supreme and inferior, by the President and the Senate.
federal employees injured in the discharge of their duties. Another
federal government into the sphere of local money lending. In 1917
federal military and naval supplies in the South, and having left the
federal offices, but under the constant pressure from the reformers it
federal troops in possession of the field, with their leader in jail,
federal tutelage. At the same time Washington, far away on the Pacific
federation. The second Continental Congress had hardly opened its work
feeble pulse and low temperature, are the chief symptoms.
feel I am not the same and it troubles me. A wonderful boy, but I am
feel for their dogs, cocks, goats, and in general for the animals that
feel in the same way toward Karataev.
feel myself to be the cause of every manifestation of my life.
feel sleepy. The punch was finished and there was still nothing to do.
feel the bony surfaces grate upon one another. When all its constituent
feel to be rising does not come from the quarter they expect. It rises
feel what the soldier was doing to her.
feeling akin to what he had felt at the Sloboda Palace during the
feeling himself one with his horse, rode past the Emperor with a
feeling himself wounded and understanding that the matter is no joke
feeling new to her, a sense of the possibility of correcting her
feeling of "the heart of Russia." Not only did it seem to him (as to
feeling of doubt and conflict with which he had trodden the Enns
feeling of joyful animation produced by the sights and sounds of the
feeling of pity for her and loathing for the thing he had to do,
feeling of weakness tied him to the spot; he wished to get up and go
feeling she had had at the opera--gratified vanity at his admiration
feeling that arose in her toward the girl, she kissed her. But she
feeling that he had been a martyr to political treachery in 1824. The
feeling that he had reached the limit beyond which censure was
feeling that lay in the commander in chief's soul as in that of
feeling, though not so bright and poetic as the former, was stronger
feeling. It was already six in the morning and he still paced up and
feelings upon nullification, for, at a Jefferson dinner in the spring of
feelings were, the latter would probably have left him, but the
feelings, but if that were so, he would say for the last time....
feels great suspicion of the Imperial aide-de-camp Wolzogen. He is
feels himself in harness and grows skittish between the shafts--he
feels, and remembers innumerable things simultaneously, but has the
feet and wheels, while the rest rose and hung like a cloud over the
feet in their overboots on the table, and began to reflect.
feet into his slippers and his arms into the sleeves of his dressing
feet of the galloping side horses. Nicholas began to draw ahead.
feet spread apart, he began explaining his reasons for thinking the
feet--usually go through the skin, but seldom pierce the fascia, and lie
feet. Emboldened by their own strength and the weakness of their
fell asleep unexpectedly in the daytime, but at night, lying on his
fell back from the carriage and rode up to Dolokhov.
fell in small round spots through the shade of the lime-tree avenue,
fell more than a million below that cast for Bryan in 1900; of the 476
fell on his back. He opened his eyes, hoping to see how the struggle
fell on the whole squadron. All were looking at the enemy in front and
fell to 5300. An analysis of the figures for South Carolina in 1900
fellow citizens to "support the Constitution of the country, the union
fellow countrymen. Thanks for the fire--we'll return it with
fellow diplomat, "that the Chancellor told him flatly that his
fellow he is. His father keeps a cookshop here by the Stone Bridge,
fellow partisans at a direct primary--an election within the party. In
fellows on the staff who get rewards without doing anything!"
fellows? The last one was hardly twenty."
felon's death. Lincoln spoke of the raid as absurd, the deed of an
felt as he told it communicated itself also to Pierre. The story was
felt as if part of his soul had been torn away. He lost the power of
felt as if the sound of the waves kept up a refrain to Pierre's words,
felt at once that he had entered into his proper position in the
felt at that moment more strongly than ever the sense of youth,
felt by every man, is understood by us only to the extent to which
felt certain of what ought and what ought not to be done. The first
felt flattered by this. Anna Pavlovna arranged the different groups in
felt glad to know that to the unknown place where he was going, many
felt herself released, and Helene's footsteps and the rustle of her
felt instinctively that if the hussars struck at the French dragoons
felt nearer to him. Natasha would have been completely happy if the
felt oppressed by the fact that the mood of everyone around her was so
felt that that fatal force which had crushed him during the
felt that the being before him was quite different from, and better
felt the blood rush to his heart and had again to get up and move
felt the nearness of the actual battlefield. They began to meet
felt the necessity of replying; but, as a man, he shrank before the
felt the weight of that resolute and affectionate scrutiny and glanced
felt the whole trend of thought he had formed during his life of
female flea remains attached to the part till the eggs mature, when by
feminine envy at Natasha. The curtain had not yet risen and the
feminine whispering behind the door, and a desire to observe
femoral glands in infected wounds or purulent blisters on the foot; in
femur in tuberculous disease of the knee. The fusion of the
fence, the snowy plain bathed in moonlight and motionless spread out
fence, there is tingling and powerlessness in the limb as a whole, known
fencing has gone on for some time; suddenly one of the combatants,
fencing was the French army; his opponent who threw away the rapier
ferocity and for Russians to blame the scoundrel Bonaparte, or later
fester (Natasha knew all about such things as festering) and the
fetching the wonder-working icon of Smolensk.
fete, and the thirteenth of June was fixed for a ball, dinner,
fete. The club cook and the steward listened to the count's orders
feudal age in that they were not bound to the soil but to the master.
feudal privileges of the nobility were abolished by the national
fever and septicaemia, and increases the liability to general
fever assumed a malignant character, but what the doctor said did
fever set in, but the doctor had said the fever was not very serious.
fever" are believed to be due to a diplococcus. In the course of a
fever, but have been known to occur much later. The chief complaint is
fever. In all febrile conditions in children and adolescents, the
fever." But despite the fact that the doctors treated him, bled him,
feverish condition and the pain he suffered, but at Troitsa that had
feverish haste with which the mob tried to end the work that had
few days the suspense was over. The news of Lincoln's election came
few days this clot becomes permeated by granulation tissue, the
few drops of laudanum sprinkled on the flannel has a soothing effect.
few exceptions, in the towns. The transplantation has been practically
few glasses of wine he had drunk and the conversation with this
few hundred acres at most became the typical unit of Western
few minutes went down by the bow, carrying to death 1153 persons
few moments, he strode back to Michaud and pressed his arm below the
few of them still move, rise, and feebly fly to settle on the
few were engaged in the hat and iron industries as compared with those
few." Having delivered this sweeping indictment, the Populists put
fibres are destroyed and efficient regeneration is prevented; the
fibres being compressed or stretched in the cicatricial tissue; and in
fibres in the peripheral nerves can be divided into three systems:--
fibres may be spread out all round the tumour, or may run only on one
fibres of the affected nerves, and the prominent symptoms are the result
fibres supplying the voluntary muscles. Its first effect on the motor
fibrin tending to limit the spread of the inflammation by forming
fibrin--_serous synovitis_. In more severe infections the exudate
fibrin-forming elements in the exudate, their occurrence in tuberculous
fibrinous bodies of the melon-seed type, sometimes moulded into circular
fibrinous degeneration of the surface layer of the diseased synovial
fibroblasts of which are derived from the sheath of the tendon, the
fibromatosis may also affect the cranial nerves, the ganglia on the
fibrous adhesions form between the opposing articular surfaces, or it
fibrous ankylosis and obliteration of the joint. The bones are affected
fibrous or cartilaginous ankylosis, or may result from the fusion of two
fibrous tissue of the capsular ligament, occurring at first in numerous
fibrous tissue of the wall is in immediate contact with the colloid
fibrous tissue, but when the ends are in contact it contains a number of
fibrous tissue--the so-called _fibroid lupus_. Sometimes there is a
fibrous tissue. In its growth it gradually obliterates the capillaries,
fibrous, or soft, vascular, and oedematous, and the peri-articular fat
fibula, the dorsum of the foot, or the base of the fifth metatarsal
field and the meadow.
field of Austerlitz, enduring the heedless blows of his left foot
field to save the union and who regarded continued Republican supremacy
field with the cannon aimed at me?"
field. The labor press seems to have begun with the founding of the
fields and forests of fir and birch, which were partly cut down. The
fields in the chill dusk of the autumn evening, experienced one and
fields on the seaboard, came together in the widening settlements of the
fields, meadows, troops, woods, the smoke of campfires, villages,
fifteen and was also entering the regiment. On returning home Petya
fifteen dead and wounded to each couple of acres. The wounded crept
fifteen to sixty hours, the patient complains of headache, pains in the
fifteen years after the founding of Boston. The smelting of iron began
fifteen years, with the assurance of Napoleon's invincibility, with
fifteenth amendment; but they did unquestionably make the states which
fifteenth and thirtieth day after the appearance of the primary lesion,
fifth President, had been one of the bitter foes of ratification. The
fifty times the roll of the convention was called without a decision.
fifty years is transferred to the Convention, to the Directory, to
fifty years of age. It is insidious in its onset, and, the patient's
fifty-second month, the World War, involving nearly every civilized
fight and smother it, and the victim, enfeebled or killed, drops
fight for there, we wanted to get away from the battlefield as soon as
fight had not only held the field but had repulsed the French.
fight, and the thing is that these two hundred thousand men will fight
fight, let's fight. But the devil knows what this is."
fight, white teeth gleamed, brows frowned, ever the same words of
fighting and blows in the passage and porch. The tall lad waved his
fighting army (with the Pavlograds on the right flank of the front);
fighting at Salamanca, at the other end of Europe, with but one
figure came in view through the smoke. He was pressing one hand to his
figure cut by the new French ambassador."
figure well under $75,000,000. When the Union Pacific Railroad was
figures tell only a part of the story. In Washington's day nine-tenths
figures that once seemed splendid and mysterious. Glory, the good of
figures--ten, twenty, and thirty cents on the dollar. Accordingly, it
filaments in the sheath of the nerve, and there may be patches of
file could not be kept in line. The majority of the members wanted
file; the next higher and smaller section of the cone consists of
fill such vacancies: _Provided_ that the legislature of any State may
fill the gap, and are rapidly covered by epithelium, derived partly from
fill the gap, but the process is essentially the same as in the ideal
fill the places in the new government. Public opinion was overwhelmingly
filled the room. "Two, two!" they shouted.
filled to its borders, the beginnings of the present city of New
filled with a hum of conversation, like the hum of bees swarming in
filled with serous fluid. The local temperature is raised, and the part
filled. Very serious consideration was given to the question whether
filling up its recesses and distending its capsule so that the joint is
filling up the marrow spaces with a white, bone-like substance; in the
final application is omitted in the case of children. In emergency
final phase of the war commence. The pitiless drive told at last.
finally came, was the signal for an outburst of popular rejoicing.
finally carried the day.
finally demonstrated the futility of resistance, and Hamilton by good
finally in 1912 the two-thirds majority was secured for an amendment to
finally presented an almost solid front against assumption, the bank,
finally read, the independence of Cuba was recognized; Spain was called
finally to Count Ilya Rostov separately, as the organizer of the
finally to the American colonies. In this quest he had the aid of a
finally told him to leave the country. Overlooking this affront in his
finally under the American flag likewise drew to a conclusion another
finally, it seems, everything led to the quest of the franchise. By
finally--like any wild beast--ran back along the most
finance the war. "Do you think," boldly inquired one of the delegates,
finance were more or less intimately associated. To use the language of
financial difficulties into which it had fallen partly by reason of the
financial institutions of the East.
financial magnates who in a back room corner the money of the world....
financial resources at the service of the government. Some urged the
financier" because he labored night and day to find the money to meet
find extensive obliteration of the medullary canal, and a considerable
find it and fearing to be captured by the French on the way to Krems.
find means of remedying the position. From her feminine point of
find the adjutant on duty," said the official. "He will conduct you to
find the right place for it.
find them. Still slapping his pockets, he kissed the hand of the
find there. Thoughts of home grew stronger the nearer he approached
finding any confirmation of the ideas that occupied him.
finding competent people for all the technical offices. "Now," said the
finding its shipping interests crippled in the European conflict and
finding pleasure in drawing out the human qualities of the embittered,
finding the sleeves of his fur cloak threw it on and got into his
fine record of self-education. His formal training in the classroom was
fine silk are the most appropriate. These _stitches of coaptation_ may
fine silk or catgut stitches are passed through the outer and middle
fine speeches and in his rude and savage way throws himself on the
fine spirit of public service, he was unable to overcome the opposition
fine suture; failing this, the duct must be occluded by a ligature as if
fine weather; the long rest the Russian soldiers had enjoyed, and
fine when he said that," he remarked, repeating the words in
fine, highly tempered steel needles through the tissues overlying the
finest harbors in the Pacific, to the intense delight of the American
finest woods, the railroads made good use of the timber. They consumed
finger at Hippolyte, invited Prince Vasili to the table and bringing
finger or toe, indolent, painless, and interfering but little with the
finger to a certain extent without increasing the pain--a point which
finger, "you forever lose the chance of marrying the other, and you
finger, or with a pad of gauze, directly over the bleeding point. While
finger, saying, "June," and continued, kissing, "July, August," on the
fingered the hand of the girl in white, obviously awaiting the beat to
fingers and toes and in those of the vertebral column. The synovial
fingers are extended at the metacarpo-phalangeal joints owing to
fingers being caught in the reins of a runaway horse, or being seized in
fingers of his right, listened to Rostov as a general listens to the
fingers over the strings in the bass, picking out a passage she
fingers when it is said 'There are thieves among the Pavlograd
fingers! Where's the victory?"
fingers, and diarrhoea are among the most prominent symptoms of this
fingers, especially if it is lodged in the supra-patellar pouch in the
fingers, it stood an aged, stern, and scornful monster among the
fingers. "The sniveling Anna Mikhaylovna? That's two. She's here
finished her prayers and came to the bed with a stern face, but
finished our argument. But the law of history relates to man. A
finished plan for the new government. Then the great debate passed to
finished their song the girl in white went up to the prompter's box
finished, she stepped aside and stopped at the door with a smile on
finishing his third cup of tea and getting up. "Ours must have got the
fire myself. We're done for!..." and Ferapontov ran into the yard.
fire on the Russian troops crowded in front of Knyazkovo. Napoleon had
fire sounded far away. Here everyone clearly saw and said that the
fire the bridge, and now someone has gone and blundered; they are
fire to the village. "Very good!" said Bagration in reply to the
fire! Our stories have some weight, not like the stories of those
fire, and the destruction of all their property. In this letter the
firearms, or the bites of animals. In addition to the irregular wound of
fired in the air; a third was striking the horse Kutuzov himself rode.
fired incessantly. A little behind the guns stood infantry. When
fired it suddenly became as bright as noon. He galloped to the bridge.
fires and bad harvests, or of the necessity of rebuilding factories
fires flared up and the shouting grew louder and louder. Rostov
fires. Through the streets soldiers in various uniforms walked or
fires; and to descend into the deeps of the earth to combat the deadly
fireworks with difficulty, "the troops are burning with eagerness..."
firing and was only not captured by the French because the enemy could
firing at them, no longer to hinder them but because the guns were
firing, and the glory that awaited him.
firing, but these did not impress him. What struck him most was the
firing, not at the cavalry which had disappeared, but at French
firing, though who they were firing at could not be seen for the smoke
firing. Above the heights was the dark clear sky, and to the right the
firing. Petya too would have run there, but the clerk who had taken
firm and elastic, or fluctuating, and are incorporated with the
firm regular tread and halted eight paces from the post. Pierre turned
firm swelling attached to the vessel (_consolidated aneurysm_). While
firm. Her foreign secretary denied all obligations in the premises,
firmly fixed on the idea of reelection and let the troublesome matter
firmly on the firm lower one, and something like two distinct smiles
firmly united in from three to five days. Where the anastomosis is less
first Prince Andrew, considering it his duty to rouse the courage of
first aid, and the transport arrangements, also play a part in
first amendment to the Constitution. It was therefore legal for
first among the nations of the earth. By moral obligations and by
first article of the agreement reached by the delegates: "The high
first demand of reason is the assumption of and search for a cause,
first described by Ducrey in 1889. Ducrey's bacillus occurs in the form
first described by Sir James Paget in 1877. In the early stages, the
first discovered, the control of publishing was vested in clerical
first door on the left led into the princesses' apartments. The maid
first hand with the labor of farmers and mechanics. He had been educated
first indication is to prevent infection by purifying the part, and
first installment only twenty cents an acre in addition to the small
first life office, and then hereditary office, which leads to the
first of his famous tracts, "Commonsense," a passionate attack upon the
first phase of the battle. Pierre saw that there was a bridge in front
first place because her provinces have been pillaged--they say the
first place, there were radical changes in the nationality of the
first quite powerless, but the patient usually recovers sufficiently to
first round the edge of the circle, then at the corner of the room
first row of boxes. Through the closed doors the music was already
first settled toward the northern border by immigrants from Virginia.
first she found it amusing to give away dresses and ribbons to the
first soldier in the rank, stepped briskly forward.
first thing he saw was the pale face and trembling jaw of a Frenchman,
first time at the Sloboda Palace he had been continuously under its
first time for many months she felt calm and not oppressed by the
first to appear, usually in from six to eight weeks from the date of
first to hand from the crumpled heap under the table would save him,
first visible sign of the disease appears at the site of inoculation,
first watery, but later sanious and purulent. Necrosis of the bones of
first white settlement was the little French village of Mendota. To the
first, and she kissed the bold forehead that bent over her hand and
first. After she had played a little air with variations on the
fishery. Whilst we follow them among the tumbling mountains of ice and
fissures and warts. The trade epithelioma varies a good deal in
fistula_), or between the bladder and the rectum (_recto-vesical
fitful bursts of song and music and the inconsequent but friendly
five different occasions. During the same period, however, there were
five in the afternoon," replied Bolkonski growing more animated and
five minutes before the troops had passed the Emperors. Not only would
five or six per cent of the population. The old French post, St. Louis,
five paces of it. As if aware of her danger, the wolf turned her
five states had taken the trouble to send representatives. The leaders
five to seven years. In the proprietary colonies the proportion of bond
five tricks, Pierre, hearing greetings and the steps of someone who
five years of age this may, as a rule, be confidently expected; the
fix a trunk on the narrow footboard behind a carriage. "We must keep
fix the standard of weights and measures;
fixed at not more than 100,000; the General Staff was dissolved; and the
fixed moment of the present in which alone I am conscious of myself as
fixed on Rostov. The man's neighbor on one side whispered something to
fixed on a streak of light escaping from the pantry door and
fixed rates. This process was called "funding the debt." Such a
fixed straight on his son's. Something twitched in the lower part of
fixed the age limits at twenty-one to thirty-one inclusive. Later, in
fixed when the muscle contracts, and that, when the muscle is relaxed,
fixedly at the floor and holding in her hands the old ball dress
fixedly before her. When her toilet for the night was finished she
fixing his eyes upon it, told her to read the letter aloud. When she
fixing on a last ribbon that squeaked as the pin went through it.
fixity and of the motion of the planets, so in history the
flag of truce, demanding an audience with the Russian Emperor, was
flag. As the foreman of a spinning mill, when he has set the hands
flagellae. The spirochaete associated with syphilis (Fig. 36) is the most
flags, and his monogram were displayed, and the Polish ladies,
flaming up in the same way in his own soul.
flank and rear and securing from the Ukraine recruits for his army;
flank had been assigned to the commander of the Pavlograd regiment
flank march to the left, cut off the Vice-King (Murat) and capture
flank of Murat's army, encamped there without any precautions. The
flank of our position, halted behind our Uhlans who were in the
flank of the position, and that Kutuzov himself in his report, written
flank weak and the right flank too extended," he went on. "That's
flank, began riding downhill to where the roll of musketry was heard
flank, infantry and hussars alike, felt that the commander did not
flank--still more obstinately. We should have attacked Napoleon in the
flank. In the center Tushin's forgotten battery, which had managed
flank; he knew that all the guns there had been abandoned at the
flanks of his sweating chestnut gelding with all the anger the count
flap of periosteum from the lateral aspect of the fibula, and stitching
flashed through Petya's mind and he galloped on to the place from
flat bones of the skull they may traverse the diploe and erupt on the
flat bones of the skull undergo absorption in patches, was formerly
flattened nodule in the skin, the epidermis over it being stretched and
flattering to him. At first it seemed strange that the son of an
fleches, beside the wood, the chief action of the day took place on an
flee from the plantation to the nearest town or city, or to the distant
fleecy clouds floated across the sky and occasionally veiled the
fleeing slave, Eliza Harris, and the cruel slave driver, Simon Legree,
fleet was mobilized, American ports were thrown open to the warships of
fleet, the commissariat, and so on and so on--millions of commands,
flesh cut away, and the wound bandaged. Water was being sprinkled on
flesh under the withering blasts of Civil War.
flesh which forms an impenetrable veil between us and the Eternal? Let
flew over the fields on which these men were floundering about. As
flew over the heads of Bagration and his suite, and fell into the
flew over their heads. Several people came round the corner talking
flew past. Rostov on the left flank, mounted on his Rook--a handsome
flew past. The hare had squatted. Again the beautiful Erza reached
flexed and extended by the patient.
flexed owing to the paralysis of the flexor pollicis longus, and the
flexed, abducted and rotated out; there is a swelling in the upper part
flexed. On palpation, it is usually possible to displace the contents of
flexible instrument vesting in Congress the powers necessary to meet
flexor carpi ulnaris, the ulnar half of the flexor digitorum profundus,
flexor muscles of the forearm in children and young persons under
flexures of joints (Fig. 63), where they are most marked, the contracted
flexures of joints, at the mouths of large branches, and at parts where
flickering on the frozen window, she felt still sadder and more in
flight from it, the death of Prince Andrew, Natasha's despair, Petya's
flight has been arranged to get all the old maids married off. Catiche
flight of the French army along the Smolensk road became well defined,
flinging themselves on, rending and exulting over the dying beast.
flirtatiousness of a handsome youth at Sonya and the young lady
flitted across his face. The sight of them reminded him of all he
flitted to and fro all over the occupied space where the snow had been
float down to New Orleans could be carried upstream and sent to the East
floating up out of the mist.
flogged. The flogging was only just over, and the executioner was
flood. During the period of the war the army was enlarged from about
flooded the country, hindering the easy transaction of business. The use
floor of an ulcer. If the limb is dependent, the incompetency of the
floor. He well remembered that seven afterwards. He laid down the
floor. The count's face was white and he could not control the
floors. The yard was crowded with peasant carts, some loaded high
flourish his whip before the eyes of the Guardsman's horse. The
flourished as never before; prices had risen rapidly; the demand for
flourished in spite of nominal prohibitions of the law.
flourished, had received a severe blow in the compromise of 1833 which
flourishing centers of trade. The stream of immigrants, flowing down the
flourishing his arm and really catching the tune.
flow and comparing it with the movement of the ship do we convince
flow as to distend the veins of the lower extremity. It is a common
flow from an excess of democracy. The people do not want virtue but are
flow may appear to be continuous and not in jets. The blood from a
flow of motherly tenderness and pity for the unknown young officer.
flow of the blood in the veins, and so admit of fresh blood reaching the
flowed to and fro across the Atlantic. Friends of popular government in
flowers, dances, the Emperor, and all the brilliant young people of
flowing always from the essential attitude of the masses. Only in
flowing from an artery may be dark in colour if the respiration is
flowing from the different streets with one and the same desire to get
fluctuating swelling on either side of the ligament, most marked in the
fluctuating swelling, the result of serous effusion into the sheath.
fluctuation can be detected in the bursa. In the majority the condition
fluctuation can usually be elicited, and the joint is held in the flexed
fluctuation cannot be detected. The patient is usually able to flex the
fluid at a temperature of 112 o F.; the soft parts are then brought
fluid forms a horse-shoe swelling above the patella.
fluid from the body--for example, by severe diarrhoea, notably in Asiatic
fluid in the joint is in sufficient quantity to cause tension, if it
fluid into the joint. While they may result from the coagulation of
fluid nourishment. It is worthy of note that the anti-streptococcic
fluid withdrawn from the joint. The treatment is carried out on the same
fluid, of acid reaction, probably of the nature of an albumose, and
fluid--met with in the neck. It is often difficult to determine with
flung it away. Tikhon caught it and handed it to a footman. The little
flushed by a glass of vodka and the dinner; and the staff officer with
flushed face in the lace of her mother's mantilla--not paying the
flushed, and merry faces. Pelageya Danilovna began to recognize the
fluttering above the fire and remembered a Russian winter at his warm,
fluttering, and often all but imperceptible at the wrist; the
fluttering, and trotted downhill toward the French cavalry which was
flying thick and fast, the mastery of the government passed from the
fo'gotten the waising of the militia in the yeah 'seven? All that
foe this aroused among the Russian people. But no one at the time
foes--the hostile forces of Nature.... The story of how the white man
foetal residues or "rests," is associated with the name of Cohnheim.
folded and pulled up, the door was shut, somebody was sent for a
folk sayings which Pierre thought he invented himself, but the chief
follow a wound of the dilated vessels.
follow from the smaller doses usually disappear on giving a larger
follow that the injury and the tumour are related as cause and effect.
follow the army. I have had everything removed, and it only remains
follow the repeal of the Missouri Compromise. Several places claim to be
follow with the things, and--now slipping in the mud, now splashing
followed Anna Mikhaylovna out of the carriage, and only then began
followed and the idea was quickly taken up in other states having large
followed by a demand from the new Hawaiian government for annexation to
followed by complete anaesthesia in the distribution of the nerve. The
followed by degeneration of the contused nerve fibres. Function is
followed by gangrene of the skin and adjacent parts." The predominant
followed by more or less complete paralysis of the muscles of
followed by suppuration, commonly met with in the fingers, less
followed by the development of arterio-venous aneurysm.
followed by the owner of the manly voice, a dashing infantry officer
followed her. As soon as she saw him she was seized by the same
followed her. The men went into the study and little Nicholas
followed him in some excitement. Seeing the enemies exchanging
followed his example, and the loud shouting continued for a long time.
followed his example, then the officers, and after them with excited
followed it and the flight of the French without further conflicts, is
followed the carriage in a cart.
followed the subcutaneous injection of lipoid solution containing tin.
followed the trail he had blazed. A great land corporation, the
followed the use of pyocyanase, a vaccine prepared from the bacillus
followed the war, however, it was deemed undesirable to set the young
followed upon antecedent disease of the joint, such as pyogenic or
followed was like the first movement of the main wheel of a large
followed, and only the reports most flattering to our army were
followed, filling the whole dining hall, and last of all the children,
following cellulitis of hand resulting from a scratch on the palm of the
following day. On that day, June 27, the preliminaries of peace were
following in the footsteps of Jefferson, he vainly tried to solve the
following may be taken as the standard proportion of the various forms
following so quickly upon the ratification of the treaty with Spain,
following the Civil War bequeathed to the new generation many perplexing
following the French, ready to use its strength in case their movement
following the cart on foot, caught hold of it with his sound hand
following the path laid down by the universal historians who sometimes
following year Congress, yielding to the popular appeal, made Colorado a
following, in spite of the fact that he traveled ten times as fast
follows upon ligation of the artery at a distance above the sac may be
follows weight extension, the induction of hyperaemia by the rubber
follows: They attack by preference the tissues derived from the
folly hidden in the first fateful measures. Everywhere he saw a
folly, that "the militia of Kentucky alone are competent to place
fomentation. We prefer the application of lint soaked in a 10 per cent.
fomentations, and ichthyol and glycerine. The affection readily subsides
fomentations, however, are to be avoided on account of the risk of
fond of the boy, and Princess Mary often deprived herself to give
fontanelles remain open until the end of the second year or longer, and
food were all a pretense, and that the whole attention of that company
food, clothing, and shelter. This second course the major portion of
foods, and is most common in the well-to-do classes. The haemorrhages,
foot and toes, on the hands, and on other parts where no pressure has
foot down it sank in. To make quite sure of the firmness the ground,
foot of the bed being raised to enable the serum to reach the upper
foot to the other, glanced inquiringly with his large, intelligent,
foot with the other.
foot, from the orderly and began to mount.
foot, when one or other of the main nerve-trunks has been divided or
foot-soldiers in the German army, and has received the name of
foot. "It's the steam that spoils them," he added, stretching out
foot. By a little manipulation the tendons are replaced in their
footing with the original states was promised to the new territories.
footman who cleared the way for them, she heard a young man speaking
footmen, and the stern shrewd old man (himself a relic of the past
footmen, who were evidently flurried and intimidated by the directions
footstep Rostov knew at once was heard on the stairs. Forgetting the
footsteps in the passage he hurriedly unclasped his hands, stopped
footsteps, and greetings deafened Natasha, and the light and glitter
footsteps, the moaning, the distant cries, and the crackle of fires
footsteps. Anna Mikhaylovna opened the door. Her face wore the proud
for Bonaparte. The fact that Speranski was the son of a village
for President, shall be the President, if such number be a majority of
for Russia, for the Orthodox Greek faith! All that is beautiful, but
for Women three years later. In 1852 the American Women's Educational
for a considerable distance around becomes markedly oedematous, and the
for a council selected by the Congress; the Virginia plan provided that
for a fresh conflict to finish the enemy and did this not to deceive
for a future campaign abroad. Kutuzov made no rejoinder or remark. The
for a life of uncertainty in Canada or the mother country.
for a more rigid execution of the law. In 1907 the classes of persons
for a position beside the staid commonwealths of the East and the South.
for a renewal of commercial relations with the mother country. At the
for a short distance into the lumen, without, however, materially
for a wagon road connecting the seaboard with the Ohio country and was
for a woman, his father's death, and the French invasion which had
for aid from the other players, or peered at the now cold face of
for all America at the court of the king of France.
for all America. The convention balked at the latter but went half way
for all practical purposes a local one, the symptoms of the disease
for all that was near to the man she loved; and of pity, suffering for
for an instant, scrambled out on all fours, all black with the wet,
for anything taken from them. As proof of this the peasant had brought
for battle; having passed Uvarov's cavalry he clearly heard the
for both candidates loudly proclaiming the regularity of their election.
for concealing it, but the Frenchman hastily interrupted him.
for cutting off the enemy's retreat and the soundness of the only
for days the whole enemy army that came upon him at Hollabrunn,
for death. Well, one night the convicts were gathered just as we
for defense against the Indians; and colonies were planted in the
for departure which the whole army was demanding.
for dinner and the potatoes are grand!"
for eighty thousand rubles. Berg smiled meekly, kissed the count on
for establishing a new population on immense lands, as well as the
for establishing the colony of Georgia in America." In the structure of
for everything that was brought across the mountains. Scows of from five
for example, Congress in 1792 fixed the ratio of the two metals at one
for example, a displaced bone or a mass of callus is pressing upon the
for example--had begun to draw together in the towns for the advancement
for executing its inspection laws: and the net produce of all duties and
for food was sold in the markets of Spain, Portugal, and Italy, or
for future grafting, it should be embedded in the subcutaneous tissue of
for gold. Three years later, the countries of the Latin Union followed
for having killed so many people (they even exaggerate the number),
for her age. The third group was gathered round Mortemart and Anna
for her, the first he had ever written. Boris and Natasha were at
for him. Rostov was particularly in need of money now that the troops,
for him; and that in the morning when the princess gave orders to
for his freight cars limited by bad drainage on the farms? Hill then
for his outfit and various other things the old count sent to his son.
for his own benefit and profit, with the right to hand the estate down
for independence and self-government. Expeditions to help the insurgents
for independence and that the embers of the old hatred for George III,
for lunch as he had promised. He was in very good spirits; the
for manufactures. Pierce promised to silence the abolitionists. His
for me to weep over the fate of my fatherland.
for negligence or inefficiency so staggered him that, forgetting the
for our best hope of averting the onset of symptoms. "It may now be
for political reasons. The act itself at first applied to only 14,000
for releasing them from hard work. On a third estate the priest,
for revenge that lay in the heart of every Russian as long as the
for saving his life that Pierre had not the heart to refuse, and sat
for sawmills to furnish timber for the mines and smelters to reduce and
for small homesteads was all gone, then was raised the real issue. At
for some distance, though the collision had deprived it of all its
for some easy way of sending his produce to market as the manufacturer
for some time to get the wedding ring off his fat finger. When that
for support at an officer of the suite who turned away from him.
for support to their "natural rights." The latter doctrine, in the form
for taking the first step toward regularizing this method of warfare.
for tea. Day was breaking, the rain had ceased, and the clouds were
for that view is not confirmed by such facts as the very cruel murders
for the American army."
for the Emperor to be in! Kutuzov was a traitor, and Prince Vasili
for the French from Vienna to Znaim was shorter and better than the
for the Imperial family and the Synod, she bowed very low and made the
for the Spanish flag, his resentment was keen. In February, 1899, there
for the abolition of the foreign slave trade on January 1, 1808, several
for the aged? And is it not a palpable, unquestionable good if a
for the army to fight, and that if it could not succeed it would not
for the attainment of benefits which endure but for an instant. Not
for the baron.
for the benefit of the parent states (any more than for the benefit of
for the business of the earth. The capital of the Steel Corporation
for the campaign of 1812, was carried out--not because those orders
for the carting.
for the common defence, promote the general welfare, and secure the
for the compulsory arbitration of certain matters of international
for the deepest part where the current was swift. Hundreds of Uhlans
for the duel with Nesvitski, Bezukhov's second. Pierre went home,
for the emotions of people who had fled to America in a quest for
for the empire at the present moment to adopt conscription or to
for the establishment of a permanent Court of International Justice. The
for the establishment of this Constitution between the States so
for the first soldiers to take who got there.)
for the first time, seemed to him unnecessary and horrible.
for the first time. What for a long while specially surprised and
for the good we have done them.' Father took her when she was homeless
for the government of the territory recently acquired by the treaty of
for the grand Compromise of 1850 which it produced. In the Senate sat
for the honor, but I shall never be your son's wife."
for the journey to Moscow.
for the last time three heroic figures: Webster from the North, Calhoun
for the legislature, or Congress, was composed of two houses, elected in
for the life of man is expressed by muscular movements and muscular
for the loss of the whole edifice constructed through the ages, on the
for the men nor fodder for the horses had been issued. As no
for the morning greeting, crossing herself with trepidation and
for the most part parallel with the surface, and the epidermis is
for the most part superficial in character, affecting the skin and its
for the name--_osteomyelitis fibrosa cystica_--sometimes applied to the
for the night on a soft clean bed, or when he remembered that the
for the nourishment and support of the actively lengthening axis
for the payment of some part of the purchase money. Under the operation
for the period of the war the operation of the railways under a
for the peroneal nerve are more often and more severely injured than
for the phagocytes.
for the princess' carriages. Meanwhile he went himself to the police
for the principle of proscription it stood fast. When finally in 1872,
for the protection of its citizens; and that when emergencies occur the
for the public good"--and he began thinking of his social duties to
for the public school teachers of the land, added its seal of approval.
for the public welfare and the general safety."
for the purpose of securing their continued rule through systematic
for the removal of civil and political disabilities. It is in part also
for the removal of disabilities was stubborn and bitter. Lincoln, with
for the routine of the reservation, ranch, or wheat field.
for the sick man, and brought some buckwheat porridge and vodka for
for the society of ladies, began to come often to the house, and the
for the state when his aid is required and a quiet onlooker when not
for the statement that "the settlers of New England were drawn from the
for the steady and progressive enactment of measures aimed at admitted
for the stupidity of everybody concerned. Stolypin, stuttering,
for the suffrage? (5) How shall the conflicting interests of the
for the support of the army they attached a "rider," or condition, to
for the supremacy of the Constitution and the national character of the
for the things to be removed from Bogucharovo. Though the peasants
for the traffic that poured to and from the Great Lakes.
for the view formerly held that they owed their origin to the
for their generosity in the matter of illustrations.
for their passage, to sustain them on the voyage, and to start them on
for them to be the seat of tubercle, but in epithelioma of the lower lip
for them--did not go up to the dying man, but passed by him, joined
for themselves the question of obeying federal law, and that armed
for this dinner. The count had been a member and on the committee of
for those parts of the forehead and neck which are close to the roots of
for three years been suffering from a painful disease of the
for ulcers due to syphilis. The base of the ulcer is covered with
for voting. Southern leaders, unwilling to disfranchise any of the poor
for which he gave the order only because he thought it was expected of
for whom he spoke--the wage-earner, the country lawyer, the small
for work; and the prices of wheat and corn dropped to a ruinous level.
for you somewhere nearer the sun."
for you? Who found the priest and got the passport? Who raised the
for, had come over him with the capture of that officer and the blow
for, it is carried out on the same lines as for haemangioma, by means of
for. Pierre saw the distracted count, and Sonya, who had a
for. The height of happiness was reached--and so simply, without
forage for the horses or the cattle. That was a misfortune no one
forbidden people to leave Moscow was false; on the contrary he was
forbidding the men to disperse about the town, sternly forbidding
forbids excision, radium or the X-rays should be employed. Excellent
force adequate to sustain it. The voyage around the world therefore
force becomes apparent--such as the commands of the general, the
force is only an expression for the unknown remainder over and above
force of its own life. By the indefinite signs which, even at a
force of man's free will is distinguished by reason from the other
force the effect of which he had witnessed during the executions. To
force the governor to sign bills which he would otherwise have vetoed.
force to reach the frontier with, and that he would not sacrifice a
force, and would it not be better first to send for the military?
force, like the power of Hercules; nor can it be based on the effect
force, so variously understood by the historians themselves, is really
force, the sum of the components must equal the resultant. This
force--it is civil war." Virginia spoke more softly, condemning the
forced out for advocating free silver. The language employed by
forced the President and Congress to turn from negotiations to problems
forced to give up Boston, they seized New York and kept it until the end
forced to realize that there was a limit to the rich, new land to
forced to the conclusion that the present policy of His Majesty's
forced upon her a humiliating peace "at the price of our possessions,
forceps, cutting it across and twisting out the segments of the vein
forceps, such as that suggested by Lynn Thomas, may be employed. In the
forces at Valley Forge for the terrible winter of 1777-78.
forces combined made the wide dispersion of wealth, in the early days of
forces could be heard. It was there Prince Andrew thought the fight
forces in sustaining the authority of the federal government. Then in a
forces of England and France found in the United States, in spite of
forces of nature only by the definition reason gives it. Freedom,
forces of the enemy and abandoning all hope of a junction with
forces penetrated deeply into Mexico without effecting the object of
forces), the French army with its marshals, kings, and Emperor was not
forcible and so continuous that the nurse has great difficulty in
forcibly displaced from the subjacent tissues, and lymph vessels are
forcibly than in any other way that he had the right, since he had the
forearm and hand and over the lateral surface of the arm in its distal
forearm and leg. When the tibia is affected the disease is frequently
forearm are placed on a palmar splint, with the hand dorsiflexed to
forearms. The essential lesion is a degeneration of the conducting
forecast by the leaders of 1848.
foreclosing mortgages upon the debt-burdened farmers, against the
forehead against the pillow.
forehead with both hands, went down as far as the first landing. The
forehead. He went to the cot in confusion, sure that he would find
forehead. In consequence of their divergence from the typical chancre,
foreign affairs were kept well at the front. Alaska was purchased from
foreign body if it is sufficiently opaque to cast a shadow. The heavy,
foreign body in the wound seems to favour its action. The infection is
foreign body. Although this may be regarded as a victory for the
foreign body. The ignorance of patients regarding the possible lodgment
foreign immigration into the United States was diverted southward. As
foreign lands. For every planter who cleared a domain in the Southwest
foreigner who sees her, even if ignorant of her significance as the
foreigners who, they said, "were lacerating China like tigers." In the
foreigners, German immigrants from Pennsylvania and Europe being the
foreigners, was killed in the streets of Peking; and to all appearances
foresaw (what now seems so evident) that this was the only way an army
foresaw. She drew her wool down through the canvas and, scarcely
foresee in what condition our or the enemy's armies will be in a day's
foresee the unifying power of nationalism binding its communities with
foreseen everything. But the contingencies are endless."
foresees the encounters that would result from his way of expressing
foresight and genius the generals who, of all the blind tools of
foresight for every eventuality, every possibility even to the
forest covered with melting snow, the frost having begun to break up
forest it was almost hot, no wind could be felt. The birches with
forest trails and laid out the routes through lake and stream and over
forest, and the crackling of dry branches.
forestall the French with his whole army was impossible. The road
foresters--the skilled in all the sciences, arts, and crafts.
forests, waterways, and the public lands--interested President Roosevelt
forever from the territories of the United States. Chief Justice Taney
forever happy, rewarded, and distinguished from everyone else in the
forged Russian money which he had prepared: "Raising the use of
forgetting his mother--and brother-in-law's commissions, nor the dress
forging bonds of union between the old home of Jacksonian Democracy in
forging new economic bonds between the East and the West, a national
forgive him for being an astute politician from New York. Still the
forgive me." Pierre involuntarily glanced at the loose button. "And if
forgive the trouble I have put you to," said Pierre, and seeing
forgot that the frightened face and the figure could not be altered,
forgotten by the astute managers who led in selecting candidates. All
forgotten the use of the vocabulary of liberty. They talk about giving
form a definite opinion about it. But the question whether the camp
form again shook with a deep ringing laugh, the laugh of one who
form in one or more of the fatty fringes and give rise to hard nodular
form long chains in both ends of the nerve, and are believed to provide
form of an elevated ridge. Sooner or later the epidermis gives way in
form of excitement, of dementia, or of melancholia; and the symptoms are
form of raised yellow patches, usually in the skin of the eyelids of
form of relapsing osteomyelitis is the circumscribed abscess of bone
form on the skin. The infection frequently spreads along the line of the
form tumours of variable size, and are often larger than the primary
form up on the farther side and wait. But before that order was given-
form, for example, mainly affecting the legs, the diphtheritic form the
form, urate of soda is deposited in the wall of the bursa, and may
form.  Any alternate format must include the full Project Gutenberg-tm
form.  Any alternate format must include the full Project Gutenberg-tm
formal summons came. Thus, by the persistence of governors,
formation of Parrot's nodes is also being withdrawn from the category of
formation of _pyogenic abscesses_ in vital organs, such as the brain,
formation of a cold abscess in the soft parts is often the first
formation of a sequestrum either in the interior of the bone or
formation of abscesses outside the joint.
formation of adhesions between the tendon and its sheath. If the tendon
formation of calcareous plates or rings over a considerable area of the
formation of callus. Joint lesions of the nature of Charcot's disease
formation of fibrin, covering the surface of the membrane and floating
formation of fibrous tissue leads to changes in the secreting epithelium
formation of granulation tissue in the marrow or periosteum, which eats
formation of new bone in the capsular ligament and surrounding muscles.
formation of new bone, but in many cases the doubt is only cleared up by
formation of new nodules in the same way as tuberculosis.
formation of scar tissue. The metatarso-phalangeal joint of the great
formation of stricture. When mucous glands are present in the membrane,
formation, prophylaxis is the chief consideration. In patients suffering
formed a Progressive Republican League at the home of Senator La
formed a national trade union of printers built upon the local unions of
formed and the name Republican--the name of Jefferson's old party--was
formed and the shoulder is fixed, it may be necessary to break down the
formed at Baltimore under the leadership of an experienced organizer,
formed between the iris and the structures in relation to it, the pupil
formed by the heaping up of epidermis in the scars that result from
formed by the new case, lined with granulation tissue. The separation of
formed by the periosteum.]
formed by the will of one man, Peter I, or that the French Empire
formed connective or fibrous tissue, the inner of embryonic tissue,
formed granulation tissue. As lymph and leucocytes escape from the
formed in imagination a new plan of life. On the previous evening at
formed in relation to the capsular ligament. Cystic distension of bursae
formed in the vessels, or causing vessels to bleed which did not bleed
formed of him soon after his arrival at the shed. With his knowledge
formed relations with all the crowned heads of Europe. The discredited
formed round the rim of the acetabulum mechanically arrests the
formed round the speaker and listened. Count Ilya Rostov, in a
formed the center of the gathering) and to speak so that he might
formed tissues or attempts at fully formed tissues predominate over the
formed to promote the peace of the world. They were quickly approved by
formed up and moved to the right; from behind it, dispersing the
formed with carious bone at the bottom. A central gumma may eat away the
formed, and one of these may finally erupt through the shell of the bone
formed, bulging above and below the transverse carpal (anterior annular)
formed, the term _streptococcus_ is applied (Fig. 3). Streptococci are
former battles. He saw that what he was feeling was felt by all the
former conditions of life was but little noticeable. As to the serfs
former strength, and at the same time felt that she loved Kuragin. She
former war. "The Emperor will teach your Suvara as he has taught the
former went so far in the direction of local autonomy that he exalted
former years, but still the enormous house and its lodges were full of
formerly bound the Anglo-American colonies to the British empire....
formerly described as scarlatinal rheumatism. The most frequent clinical
formerly imagined, but worse, much worse, than anybody else in the
formerly known as _gelatinous degeneration_ of the synovial membrane. In
formerly, but much the same as usual. These dispositions and orders
formerly, on the strength of similar wretched logical arguments, it
formidable to these countries. Liberty of conscience and the facility
forming the Holy Alliance as praiseworthy in Alexander, while others
forming the commander in chief's suite. He was in a state of
forming the cranium may be enormously thickened, the sutures are
forming up on the field before the fortress. Now thousands of feet and
forms a new barrier, and eventually the spread is arrested, and the
forms in the sheath, the tendon rarely sloughs. The treatment consists
forms in the vicinity of the intestinal canal it usually contains the
forms of tuberculosis of the skin in which the bacilli penetrate from
forms of wrong-doing in the capitalist are far more infamous than any
forms the subject of history, while free will itself is the subject of
forms, and extends as far as the nearest collateral branch; and on the
forms, and is slowly separated. It is not uncommon for the gangrenous
formulate a scheme for the reduction of armaments and to submit a plan
formulate and carry out a financial plan. Like the North, the
formulated the treaty, rejoiced, as he afterwards said, that he had kept
forsaken by her husband, Mortemart, the delightful Prince Hippolyte
forsook the classroom for the field of political controversy. The poet,
forth American nationality. That was the product of the long strife
forth many events which aggravated the ill-feeling expressed in the
forth surprise and gratitude in the United States and smoothed the way
fortified Yorktown, where he was penned up by the French fleet from the
fortnight after the injury and causes intense and continuous suffering
fortuitously, but that on the contrary the nerve fibres to a particular
fortuitously. The armies were divided at the commencement of the
fortunate circumstances of climate, soil, and isolation which made the
fortunately rare, accident is apt to occur in the course of operations
fortune not wrested from them the fair country of California. Upon this
fortunes. In one case a young man who was forcibly carried over the sea
forty in the upper end of the tibia or lower end of the femur. It grows
forty years of age, and is usually situated on the back between the
forty-eight hours the Emperor consented to arbitration, American
forty-eight hours. If the patient survives for two days the prognosis is
forty-eight hours; the waiting suture is then tied, and delayed primary
forty-year-old Russian general's face and, taking him by the ear,
forward and upset an old woman who was catching at a biscuit; the
forward from the crowd as if expecting the Emperor to address him.
forward in a gentle curve, which is compared to the curve of a
forward over his temples as the Emperor Alexander wore his hair.
forward their remedies: the free coinage of silver, a graduated income
forward to the opposite bank and, though there was a ford one third of
forward to the task of winning the entire country. Then it flung its
forward with his breast toward the swords, meaning them to pierce
forward, open fire, and overwhelm with shellfire the enemy's
forward, the hips are flexed, and abduction and other movements of the
forward-looking men of the East to take thought about the western
forwards out of its groove, sometimes with an audible snap. The patient
forwards with the movements of the arm. The symptoms at the time of the
forwards, or forwards and laterally just above the ankle. The
foster child of the special interests." He proposed to free the country
fostered by the provincial officials, and the Anglicans, embracing about
fostered: "Under which of the old tyrannical governments of Europe is
fostered; but Calhoun refused to listen to their criticisms. "When the
fought bravely, as the records of Bunker Hill, Brandywine, and Monmouth
fought there. This was shown first by the fact that there were no
foul streets, tattered inhabitants, and the sick and drunken
found an opportunity to serve the needs of their communities. So local
found and where the country was richest.
found at the margin of the gangrenous area. It is prone to attack
found embedded in its wall. The cyst usually forms in relation to one of
found himself in a corner of the shed among men who were laughing
found in my mind the text from the Gospel: "The life was the light
found itself so close to the Emperors that Rostov, standing in the
found matted together in its wall. The wall is further strengthened by
found on the surface of the bone, lining the Haversian canals and in the
found partly in European conditions and partly in the cheapness of
found that easier. The committeemen met him at the first door and,
found that peace and inner harmony only through the horror of death,
found that the granulation tissue gradually increases in amount till the
found the West a strange mixture of all sorts and conditions of people.
found the injection of from half to one ounce of sterilised white
found there. They abused the police and bribed them, made out
found to be pigmented. Sometimes the blood persists as a collection of
found within himself. But now he felt that the universe had crumbled
found within the abscess cavity. In long-standing cases it is common to
found. The theory that this connection is based on the transference of
found. Under measures admittedly open to grave objections, the Southern
foundation as the continental debt. This measure he defended not merely
foundation of population? (3) What direct share shall the people have in
foundation of prosperity for the railways and the people.
foundation of the republic: the currency, the national debt, banking,
foundations of a new industrial order. The severe regime instituted by
founded in 1858 and named after the governor of Kansas whence came many
founded, and destructive of the great objects for which it was formed."
four and six in the morning, when it may be about 97 o F.
four days previously had been that of the Emperor Alexander.
four glands which lie entirely under cover of the upper end of the
four hours after meals, and about the same hour each day.
four hours previously on his way from the Dorogomilov suburb to the
four of them did not apply it to the judges of the courts. Still it was
four or five necessary calls or appointments for certain hours. The
four thousand strong, to the right across the hills from the
four to six weeks the discharge of lymph ceases and the wound heals.
four wounded soldiers were lying or sitting, jolted over the stones
four years later and then rose in 1920 to about the same figure.
four years later they sent a son of the soil from Tennessee, Andrew
four years, and, together with the Vice-President, chosen for the same
fourteenth (1868) and fifteenth (1870) amendments, giving the ballot to
fourteenth amendment in the Appendix. Macdonald, _Documentary Source
fourteenth amendment they attempted to guarantee the ballot to all negro
fourth of the population.
fox had been found, and the whole pack, joining together, rushed along
fox! I gave him one with the fox. Here it is on my saddle! Do you want
fracture, there may be bending or curving of the new case, and this
fracture. In the rare cases in which it attacks the articular end of a
fractured bone--the changes are similar to those in a divided nerve, and
fractures and dislocations in the region of the elbow. Division of the
fractures of the leg. It may become purulent as a result of infection,
fragments of a fractured bone, or by a stab or cut. Sometimes the vein
fragments of clothing, gravel and blood-clot, removed, the wound
fragrance exhales from a flower. He could not understand the value
frail bark, holding on with a boat hook to the ship of the people
frame to hide a smile probably evoked by the amusing scene she
framers of the Constitution, in shaping the form of government, arranged
frames and panes broken and a courtyard surrounded by the remains of a
framework and not from the muscle fibres. Innocent tumours, such as the
framing it, and her hostility was deep and open. So the convention cast
frankly suppurate as do the acute types, but are attended with a
frankly, I don't want to. I am speaking of the staff in general."
frankly: call out the militia. For the Minister is leading these
fraternity, was originally designed to promote in a general way the
freak, as he seemed much upset by the Rostovs' visit.
free farmer a voice in the government of their common country.
free farmers was many times greater than that left to the planters. The
free from soldiers, wagons, and the filthy traces of a camp--he saw
free from the fear of her father, and even the possibility of love and
free from these old restrictions, the Americans found themselves
free homesteads for the very good reason that they only promised to add
free lands for farmers. Planting had dominated the country for nearly a
free of his fever and particularly lively. When Pierre reached the
free people the most stinging of insults. In that little phrase, as in a
free suppuration occurs, resulting in the formation of sinuses. The
free surface, forming an _inflammatory exudate_. The quantity and
free than elsewhere, so that the extra stress thrown upon the surface
free the Holy Land; but the people did not go, for the unknown cause
free the better we understand their cause. If the man whose actions we
free the more correctly we connect the effects with the causes. If
free the process is more prolonged. The more highly organised elements
free the slaves whom he found, and called upon them to take up arms in
free, so that even when large trunks have been divided the vascular
freedmen and excluding from public office the Confederate
freedom I could understand it and should be the first to enter the
freedom of the plains; interested in everything--a new species of game,
freedom to the law of God," the voice had said. "Simplicity is
freedom we see in any action the less inevitability do we perceive,
freehold limitations on the suffrage. The professional classes also were
freely distributed in machine readable form accessible by the widest
freely distributed in machine readable form accessible by the widest
freely employed without the patient even being aware of it or suffering
freely opened and explored, firstly to find the body and further to
freely sharing Project Gutenberg-tm works in compliance with the terms of
freely sharing Project Gutenberg-tm works in compliance with the terms of
freely to alleviate pain. Stimulation is to be avoided, and the patient
freely with one another by the disappearance of adjacent capillary
freely. Faintness and giddiness are marked features. The diminished
freezing the part with a spray of ethyl-chloride; one or more
freezing, or roasting themselves to death at the campfires, while
frequency of application. Robert Knox describes the following
frequency of the applications varying with the strength of the
frequent hot baths, and by the wearing of warm underclothing. While the
frequent intervals during the operation. The hands are sterilised before
frequent movement of the limb, the necessary dressings should be kept in
frequent than in tabes, and they usually involve the upper extremity in
frequent towards the decline of reproductive activity than in the later
frequent, more severe, and of longer duration, until eventually the
frequently compressed against the humerus in sleeping with the arm
frequently followed by healing of the sinus, and that, if one injection
frequently follows a fall on the shoulder, great care is necessary in
frequently found in the bone underlying the dilated vessels.
frequently from the mucous membrane of the pharynx (J. B. Murphy). The
frequently in contact. The transference of cancer from one human being
frequently in the toes. The point of infection is often trivial--a
frequently met with in inflammations of the serous and synovial
frequently met with in the great toe in young adults with flat-foot
frequently met with in the muscles of the abdominal wall. A rarer
frequently met with in women. From its position the swelling is liable
frequently met with. The disease attacks and destroys every structure
frequently on the battery and spent bullets buzzed and whistled
frequently one of the other bacteria capable of producing pus, such as
frequently over the lower sacral vertebrae, giving rise to small
frequently participates, the result being an ulcer--the tertiary
frequently preceded by an injury. It almost invariably occurs in the
frequently results in an abscess forming in the floor of the mouth. When
frequently severed. If divided below the point at which its dorsal
frequently the body is bent forward so that the knees and chin almost
frequently the seat of disease, which is usually of the nature of a
frequently the seat of tuberculous disease. _The occipital gland_,
frequently the subject of venereal infection, and also of epithelioma
frequently under the head of the metatarsal bone of the great toe. A
frequently, of tuberculous disease which usually originates in the
fresh outbreak of the infection or because the ankylosis recurs.
fresh, bright, and very still. Just before the window was a row of
freshness of the clear but windy evening.
friable (Fig. 72). The laminated clot not only strengthens the sac,
friction on moving the joint, or, in the knee, on moving the patella on
friend a model of perfection because Prince Andrew possessed in the
friend of the General from Tennessee. A few grains of sand were to run
friend. But the father whom the boy did not remember appeared to him a
friend. Though his views on the tariff, internal improvements, and other
friendliness to the Confederate agents. The British ministry, with
friendly ear to the American cause, the Congress, in March, 1776, sent a
friendly relations happily subsisting between the two governments." The
friendly relations with all the Rostovs which had made her almost a
friendly words to officers he had known in the Turkish war,
friends of the governor complained in 1747 that "the inhabitants of
friends rather than by its enemies. On the other hand, it was the
friends, he longed for the quiet of his beautiful estate at Mount
friendship at all; I simply feel that the army is my vocation."
frightened and angry faces struggled for the mop: how differently do
frightened and drew back in astonishment at the forces they had
frightened faces out of the door of a room where a bright samovar
frightened gesture of Anatole's. "First, the letters," said he, as
frightened here?" and the artilleryman understood him.
frightened lest she should be in the way and tried to find excuses for
frightened. "I believe the whole of Moscow will burn, there's an awful
fringes--and great oedema of the peri-articular tissues (Fig. 163). The
frock, darted in and stopped short in the middle of the room. It was
from Alexandria to Boonesboro in Kentucky and then westward across the
from Davout's corps. From the talk of the Germans Pierre learned
from England or France. Unable to export their cotton, planters on the
from European powers that looked with satisfaction upon the breakup of
from Gavril to pay a sleigh driver, his kissing Sonya on the sly--he
from Honolulu carried sugar, molasses, and fruits from Hawaii to the
from Kentucky and Tennessee. When the great compromise of 1820-21
from Masha, the lady's maid, the necessary report of how handsome
from Missouri and was settled mainly by farmers from the North. Though
from Moscow back to the Niemen were like those in a game of Russian
from Napoleon, and from the awkward wording of Memorandum No. 178.
from Nevada, spent their money principally in the East, others took
from Petersburg the post of commander in chief as a reward for his
from Smolensk and two miles from the main road to Moscow.
from Tula and other towns in the interior. You will be responsible
from Vera Cruz and the incident closed.
from _involvement of the adjacent joint_, in which there may be an
from a bean to a hen's egg, the larger forms being called _venous
from a bright scarlet to a dull brick-red. The edges are slightly raised
from a conversation with Karataev the day before.
from a course of treatment he would lose as a result of the disputes
from a haematoma may be withdrawn by an exploring needle, and the
from a pea to a cherry, attached to the tendon and moving with it. They
from a plain girl had again become what she had been at the ball.
from a region beyond the mountains, peopled by men and women from all
from a syphilitic patient, a large amount of complement is fixed. The
from above slowly and lightly as a feather, among the heap of corpses.
from acute infective gangrene. Both follow on the same kinds of injury
from all appearances the Stamp Act hardly roused as much as a languid
from all else--formed by the men in the battery. His first unconscious
from all help. Refusing to surrender, they fought to the bitter end, the
from all share in the government by the first French constitution,
from all sides by the American forces, his flanks harried, his foraging
from all sides. More than ten years had elapsed since the enactment of
from all the nations. In a few years we shall watch with grief the
from among that mass of dogs, and then her forepaws were on the edge
from an excited throng in the streets. Then he seized his pen and wrote:
from an operation such as the removal of an epithelioma of the mouth,
from bursts of anger in the presence of Kurakin and then of Balashev.
from callus or adhesions. If the nerve is torn across, the ends must be
from chest to back than across the shoulders. He had on a brand-new
from comparatively slight violence, disease of the bone should be
from control over the former Confederate states where the newly
from day to day, and may be authorized to compel the attendance of
from evil and lead him into the path of truth, but evil thoughts of
from four quite undefended guns. On the contrary, the energetic action
from four to eight weeks,--and includes the period of incubation, the
from gloom to glory" when the news of peace arrived. The bells were
from half an hour to an hour, and the treatment may be carried out once
from having experienced the change of feeling toward Napoleon and
from healing by primary union in the _amount_ of blood-clot that is
from her brother that Papa was asleep and Mamma was in the sitting
from her neck the necklace the young Armenian was wearing, and the
from here, right above the Volga," said the courier.
from him today for the Emperor." Dolgorukov smiled significantly.
from him, a cannon ball tore up the dry earth and disappeared. A chill
from his home and, in place of the luxury and comfort to which he
from his own doctrine and intrusted the construction of the Constitution
from his pockets had seized her by the neck.
from hyaline cartilage--for example, at the ends of the long bones--it
from hyper-extension of the arm during anaesthesia.
from infection through a wound involving the bone--for example, compound
from infection, the clinical course is that of dry gangrene.
from it. It is seldom used in the treatment of surgical forms of
from its situation--for example in the vicinity of the eye--any marked
from laughing. He turned his eyes rapidly from Tikhon's face to the
from lesions from these in the primary and secondary stage lesions of
from loss of elasticity of the vessel wall and narrowing of the lumen as
from one on foot. Napoleon, in the blue cloak which he had worn on his
from other houses, complained of the injustice of taking everything to
from outside the door: "Papa! Mamma's standing here!" Countess Mary
from power, and sent him to jail. In Philadelphia, the local Republican
from pressure on the veins and nerves as they pass under the clavicle;
from prosecution as combinations in restraint of trade, limiting the use
from quite a different point of view from the outposts of the flank.
from rural regions into military camps, where they died by the hundreds
from sale and held until Congress was prepared to enact laws for the
from sectarianism. Brown, established in Rhode Island in 1764, and the
from side to side of the ulcer. The outline is irregular; small
from similar clear areas due to other kinds of tumour, especially the
from that of the ancients. The Greeks usually carried with them
from that of the living bone by which it is surrounded is conclusive
from that of the men, squeezed his way along; sometimes like a chip of
from that spot the day before, but now the whole place was full of
from the Berezina to Vilna--independently of the greater or lesser
from the Deity but from a man, which is, that the man who gives the
from the Emperor to Count T., Prince V., and others. Then he bursts
from the Federalists, Tennessee was accepted as the sixteenth state.
from the Great Ordynka Street.
from the Gulf of Bothnia to the mouths of the Danube. Catherine the
from the Indians, reserving to the crown the right to acquire such lands
from the Kremlin, but called on his friend Obolenski, who was
from the Revolution leaving the people to anarchy, and Napoleon
from the Russian army, and Kutuzov was left with only his own weak and
from the South, and Clay from a border state. For nearly forty years
from the Tsar about it too. Anyone who stays is a traitor to the Tsar.
from the Ukraine excellent horses which pleased him and earned him
from the United States. The Mexican War, therefore, was not the
from the adipose connective tissue _between or in the substance of
from the administration of Grant to the close of Cleveland's second term
from the army to Sergey Kuzmich, in which the Emperor said that he was
from the bargain. Thoroughly alarmed by that, Jefferson pressed the
from the bench, and he rode to Fili where his carriages were waiting.
from the bonds of State and Church, a teaching of equality,
from the bone. Following on the destruction of the cartilage, the
from the bridge leading to the village, not more than five hundred
from the bridge, for the horizon as seen from the valley through which
from the bridges and slipped stealthily and silently past the church
from the cardiac end of the divided vessel in pulsating jets
from the cattle and sheep ranges. In many sections the "cattle king," as
from the chest may be brought up to form a new forehead and eyelids.
from the confederation of the whole United States Congress is not
from the court arrived, and on the first of May, Denisov was ordered
from the days of "strict construction." And Jefferson still lived!
from the fact that this extension occurs in the form of radiating
from the factories or enabled them to make unlimited demands for higher
from the former dominions. All power was declared to be in the people.
from the government; they overcame every obstacle of canon, mountain,
from the governors themselves. It was wanting in one respect only. It
from the guardhouse on the Zubovski rampart, but rose through the pure
from the hampering interference of the Southern planters and the
from the horses, and not a soul was to be seen there. In the great
from the immense quantity of phenomena of which it is cognizant and
from the infantry and approached Kutuzov. Of Kutuzov's suite only four
from the infected tissues of the rabbit.
from the inhabitants, the officials--the heads of the various
from the joys and sorrows of this world--overflowed the great grief
from the low ground by the pond, a puff of white smoke appeared,
from the moment Prince Andrew entered the room had watched him with
from the mouth--an appearance best seen in inherited syphilis (Fig. 44).
from the necessity of surrendering to civil courts persons arrested
from the neck and brought up to where it is wanted. In this way, skin
from the neck, the axilla, or the groin. They are also met with as a
from the neighboring town, who had been at Bald Hills for the last
from the officers or adjutants who wandered about in the fog in
from the old Southern states--from Virginia and the Carolinas as well as
from the old government buildings in New Orleans and the Stars and
from the onset of the fever. Its favourite seat is in the hand and
from the other limb inserted into the gap; a tube of radium should also
from the other side of Europe killed and ruined the people of Smolensk
from the others, Prince Andrew came out in front of a platoon of
from the others, went behind the wings, adjusted her bodice,
from the outer table, forming a smooth rounded swelling, or it may
from the outset.
from the periosteum of the base of the skull and project into the
from the periphery towards the centre.
from the point of view of reason man is subject to the law of
from the porch and the cook came running into the vestibule.
from the ports of entry, they encountered reverses. Burgoyne was forced
from the pressure of a crutch, or of the head of the humerus in
from the pressure of a tourniquet, from tight bandages or splints, from
from the public domain (does not contain a notice indicating that it is
from the public domain (does not contain a notice indicating that it is
from the rag, and handed it to Pierre.
from the republic of Mexico, slavery should be forever excluded from
from the right, in the unlifting smoke the guns boomed, and out of the
from the rising full moon, and that vast red ball swayed strangely
from the rules.
from the sacrum. On dissection, such a tumour is found to contain a
from the said colonies and plantations and improving and securing the
from the scalp, to which therefore treatment should be directed.
from the scene of action. General events involuntarily group
from the seat of inoculation, the organisms having travelled by the
from the seat of war came contradictory news, false as usual and
from the serfs' quarters.
from the service and go abroad, and see England, Switzerland and
from the shaft and new bone formed in relation to it. Haemorrhages also
from the sheep and convert it into the best clothes. We want a company
from the skeleton. Two varieties are recognised--the spongy or
from the skin or through the circulation.
from the sofa. The princess came in. She had changed her gown for a
from the soldiers. Evidently for them "the marshal" represented a very
from the sound by a barefooted girl, and a stout, rosy, good-looking
from the sovereign which does not admit of the possibility of
from the sowing or mowing or reaping to have tea with her. She did not
from the standpoint of the old system of government, were the essence of
from the surrounding tissues and is cut across above and below. Any
from the territories of California and New Mexico ... I am for
from the trees there, came upon Prince Andrew. On seeing the young
from the ulcers that result from certain forms of malignant disease,
from the upper waters of the Arkansas River. Not long afterward, traders
from the very day you first came to Otradnoe I have loved you," she
from the vessels, for the escape of which provision must be made. If
from the village, and over the fields the larks rose trilling, one
from the village, but it was not of them she was thinking. She felt
from the village. The Russian Cossacks and bugler and the French
from the way he darted forward at every word or gesture of the
from the way he walked through the ranks behind the generals,
from the way they had spoken during the council, communicated
from the yard to the house and back again, shouting confused
from their battery a milk-white cloud arose. Then came the distant
from their commercial operations. The towns were also centers for news,
from their context. Every word and action of his was the manifestation
from their own words when, after the election, they had time to reflect
from them some of the plate and bronzes that were in the drawer, moved
from there"--he pointed to the merchants' hall--"but our business is
from these relations of theirs the submission of millions of people
from this by its more rapid progress and by the pigmentation of the
from three sides. The most vigorous attack came from an old
from toxaemia. Occasionally the other limb becomes gangrenous. On the
from two to five days after the operation, and take the form of
from under his pillow a paper he had received from the commission
from violet into gray and milky white, and "boom!" came the report a
from west to east. For the peoples of the west to be able to make
from which granulations may spring up. Should the raw surface left be
from without--for example, by haemorrhage into the sheath or the pressure
from. He could only have had it from the Postmaster. But evidently
front and men four abreast, spread across the bridge and began to
front and, walking backwards before the company, jerked his
front corner of the room, and went up to Dolokhov, holding out a
front entrance of the house at Bald Hills. As they approached the
front line and that of the enemy were far apart on the right and
front line. To the right stood our infantry in a dense column: they
front of Bagration's detachment. His hussars were placed along the
front of her mother, mounted the brightly illuminated stairs between
front of him, who was the first against whom he directed his
front of the battery and along the Kamenka streamlet retreated. From
front of the entrance. But Napoleon had dressed and come out with such
front of the infantry, who had to wait.
front of the orchestra partition, looking at the Rostovs' box. Natasha
front of the pre-vertebral layer of the cervical fascia. They receive
front of the sheds, and animated French talk mingled with curses
front of the valet. She knew of the duel and had come to speak about
front of them two men--the Emperors. Upon them the undivided,
front the better. But Bogdanich, without looking at or recognizing
front, beside, and behind him. Pierre ran down the slope. "Where am
front, flourishing his arm and saying something with a stern look. The
front, the French infantry were firing as they ran. The hussars
front, the wounded carried away, and the ranks closed up. If any
frontal bone. Pus is formed between the bone and the dura (suppurative
frontier in earlier days, so now veterans led in the settlement of the
frontier rolled westward with deadly precision. The Pequots on the
frontier settlements, and hiding places for runaway slaves. Thus the
frontier to record the number of immigrants who entered the West during
frontier, Alexander spent the evening at the entertainment given by
frontiersman fleeing from the advancing borders of farm and town. In
frost-bite, in which the skin tends to blister and give way, leaving an
frost-bitten, and starving--and the column that had been presented
frost... the frost!
frowned, as lovers of music do when they hear a false note. The two
frozen in a minute and must go back--but you wrap the fur cloak
frozen, and a considerable portion removed with the knife; if only a
fruitful field for the bone-setter.
fruitless years there, "ignored by the court, living in obscurity and
fruits of Dewey's victory. President McKinley doubtless voiced the
fruits of his victory. The hungry horde of Whig office seekers descended
fugitive slaves, and the vogue of a popular novel seemed of slight or
fugitives" the right of trial by jury, the right to witness, the right
fulfill than to utter. In fact, the vigorous execution of one measure
fulfill the demands of politeness, and she firmly resolved to maintain
fulfill the one which enjoined every Mason to set an example of
fulfilled another of the precepts--that of reforming the human race-
fulfilled its pledges to the country. When Democratic Senators balked at
full and honorable discharge of the interest and principal. The spoils
full conflict with the allied French and Indians. Georgia, by clever
full dinner pail" for the workmen. Naturally a large portion of those
full gallop so that he outstripped the others. Ahead, the enemy was
full of sick and dead Frenchmen, cavalrymen, and members of the staff.
full quota of men. Natasha, on the other hand, having put on her
full rations and the prisoners already taken were perishing of hunger.
full share of responsibility. Even when the New York legislature took
full speed. Rostov, fearing to be crushed or swept into the attack
full up with crockery, the other with carpets. There was also much
fuller accounts of the same events and characters. To put it bluntly, we
fully conscious of the gravity of the disease, and his mind remains
fully out from behind the clouds, and the clear sound of the
fully prepared to take the most resolute and desperate steps to punish
fully pronated, the extensors of the wrist becoming feeble flexors of
fulness in the limb after standing or walking, sometimes accompanied by
fun of anything that gave him the opportunity: Sonya's reading, any
fun of the tenderness the Italian expressed for him.
function of the digit. Recovery may eventually occur without
function of the glands of internal secretion, the thyreoid being the one
function of the limb. It is to be understood, however, that operative
function, measures are employed to maintain the nutrition of the damaged
function. Extension by weight and pulley is the most valuable means of
function. The condition may be overcome by graduated movements or by a
functionary about the priests who were officiating that day with the
functions are exaggerated, and the framework of the bone becomes
functions may be retarded or abolished, and the subsequent growth of the
functions, often to an exaggerated degree. Where the periosteum has been
fundamental. As towns grew in size and the number of landless citizens
funds were exhausted, he borrowed from his friends. Experienced in the
fungates through the opening. Sarcomas vary in malignancy, especially as
fungating granulations protrude from the sawn end of the bone, and if
fur traders who were quick to take advantage of the opportunity to ply
furnish new resources to agriculture and commerce in the form of credit
furnish the necessary resistance. The use of styptics may be called for.
furnish the whole interest of the story, and we are still unable to
furnished by his decision with regard to his wife's debts and to the
furnished the occasion for a statement of American policy which stood
furnishes the sole cutaneous supply becomes insensitive, and the other
furnishes the strongest evidence of permanent, common interest with, and
furnishes us with the main indications for treatment as well as for
furnishing men and supplies, the indolence of civilians, who lived at
furniture was being carried out or moved about, and the mirrors and
furrows of the plowed land, and reached some fleches* which were still
further coagulation. The needles may be left in position for some hours,
further contraction, and this brings about a claw-like deformity of the
further embittered the relations between the commanders in chief,
further end of his regiment's encampment. Through a gap in the
further in among the plants and threw down the doll. "Closer, closer!"
further intensified his sense of the importance of the occasion.
further manifested by dwarfing of the long bones; these are not only
further reply, he began thinking of the glad vindictive moment when he
further risks of septic intoxication, especially in the form of hectic
further strengthened in him by the high opinion his fellow prisoners
further treatment consists in the use of diluted boracic or resin
fury until the close of his second administration, ending in the
fusiform being the most common, although a sacculated aneurysm
futile, for the royal governor promptly vetoed it. From time to time
futility. Some of the ablest men refused to accept election to it, and
future father-in-law to let him know what Vera's dowry would be. The
future shaped itself in Mademoiselle Bourienne's head at the very time
future sister-in-law as soon as the Rostovs arrived and to try to
future, the more independent of that position in which he found
fwom the fields."
gag her!" and, changing his position, set his foot on the wolf's neck.
gaiety with which Zherkov spoke, and to the intentional coldness of
gaily and contentedly galloped along the roads of Poland, without
gaily, were escorting him and the other criminals; he felt it in the
gain access directly to the blood-stream, as a rule they produce their
gain access to the sinus, and through it to the wall of the abscess.
gained experience. He knew that this tale redounded to the glory of
gained in power at the expense of the king, it reached out to bring the
gained nothing important save the satisfaction of seeing England humbled
gainfully employed as compared with 30,000,000 men. When, during the war
gaining the king's interest was a curious French adventurer,
gains in the practice of civil liberty. To allow a "minion of the law"
gall-bladder, and other abdominal organs. Haemorrhage from the mucous
gallantly; but unexpectedly finding himself in the front line had
galloped back to Grunth to find Prince Bagration. He heard the
galloped back. Kutuzov still in the same place, his stout body resting
galloped heavily aside to intercept it. But the quickness of the
galloped in after him. It was cold and uncanny in the rapid current in
galloped on to the village where he was told that the commander in
galloped on yet faster. Hardly had the Horse Guards passed Rostov
galloped past the company, and overtook the carriage, still keeping
galloped past, while another horse lay, like Pierre, on the ground,
galloped through the Semenovsk hollow and as soon as they reached
galloped to the advanced line under the fire of the French and had
galloped to the place whence came the sounds of firing and where the
galloped toward the count.
galloped toward the vanguard. Before he came up with the hussars,
galloped up the Frenchman had already fallen. "Too late again!"
galloping off past Vasili the Beatified in the direction from which
galloping round by the bushes while the field was coming up on both
galloping turned sharply to the left, and Pierre, losing sight of him,
gallops up from Miloradovich asking whether he is to engage the French
galvanism persevered with. If the paralysis persists, the sterno-costal
games. The countess, when she had identified them and laughed at their
ganglia of the cord is to render them hypersensitive, so that they are
gangrene does not involve immediate risk to life; the danger lies in the
gangrene does not necessarily follow. The rupture of a popliteal
gangrene ensues, the process usually reaches the middle of the upper
gangrene is averted, recovery ensues, its onset being indicated by the
gangrene is considerable unless means are taken to develop the
gangrene may ensue, especially if the wound is infected. Punctured and
gangrene occurs, it is treated on the same lines as other forms of dry
gangrene of the limb. Experience shows that ligation of the vein, or
gangrene supervene, and the dead portion is delimited by a line of
gangrene" were of everyday occurrence. The mortality after compound
gangrene, but the local results of bacterial action and the
gangrene, on the contrary, organisms having already obtained a footing,
gangrene. Amputation at the shoulder was performed by Fergusson in a
gangrene. The risk of gangrene is diminished by a course of digital
gantlet. The collision between the _Merrimac_ and the _Monitor_ in
gap is completely filled up, and that coincidently the epithelium
gap may be felt between the retracted ends, and this becomes wider when
gaping of a wound, further, is more marked when the underlying tissues
garden at the back of the house. "Wait a bit--I'm coming down."
garden by the light of the illuminations and to the sound of music
garden path, arched his back and, rushing headlong toward the porch
garden the shadows of the bare trees often fell across the road and
garden were hung with transparent drops which fell on the freshly
garden, where, seeing Balashev and the Emperor returning to the
gardeners. The South, which in planting days had relied so heavily upon
garment had rushed back to the gate on seeing the carriage driving up.
garments were called for and received from the footman by bare girlish
gastro-intestinal and urinary disturbances; and derangements of the
gate Dolokhov whistled. The whistle was answered, and a maidservant
gate, listening to the sounds and looking in silence at the people.
gates ceased. The guns were advanced, the artillerymen blew the ash
gates of the city he was met by Count Rostopchin's adjutant.
gates. The revelation of the illiteracy in the army raised the cry and
gateway, splashing through the mud, and talked to the innkeeper. Above
gather in the baggage wagons. So it had been at Lodi, Marengo, Arcola,
gathered and prepared by her. The smell and taste of it all had a
gatherings Julie and Boris looked on one another as the only souls who
gauze, and treating it by the open method, if this is possible.
gauze. After the packing is removed, iodoform powder is rubbed into the
gave a stimulus to business which more than replaced the lost markets of
gave an order, and the dragoons formed up in line. The crowd moved
gave at her country house on the Stone Island, the charming Monsieur
gave her no pleasure was here and they met every week. Like the old
gave him money under the guise of loans.
gave little heed to carping critics who saw the flaws and not the
gave no answer, she left the room.
gave notice then that his ministry was at an end. The king moaned:
gave orders to admit no more, but the porter was told to be sure to
gave strength to them in the contest. Whenever the British ventured far
gave the driver a three-ruble tip, and on arriving he ran
gave their suffrages to the party that promised them rest." The Free
gave them the order to march, thereby indicating that he intended to
gave to Townshend and the Tory party practical control over Parliament.
gazed at his own monarch), looked round at the Emperor Alexander to
gazed into the distance, at the waters of the Danube, at the sky,
gazette report of the battle of Austerlitz came a letter from
gazettes from which the old prince first heard of the defeat at
gazing at Weyrother's face, and only turned away his eyes when the
gazing at her sparkling eyes, and under the mustache a happy rapturous
gazing at his head and at the little arms and legs which showed
gazing at the moonlight through the frosty windowpanes.
gazing tenderly at her and the child. "But no, it is impossible, I
gear, take off a skull, and hand it to the trembling victim with the
gelatinous pus the organism is cultivated without difficulty, and this
general being accustomed to the respect due to his rank in the
general circulation, and bleeding from the wound should be encouraged.
general circulation. The infective agent, moreover, in order to reach
general condition of the patient must be improved by tonics, good food,
general convention of Southern states to meet at Nashville the following
general course of affairs in the Russian army, but no one
general course of affairs, he respectfully suggested--on the plea that
general expanded his chest and rode, frowning, beside him to the front
general health is scarcely affected and the convalescence from an
general health of the patient. The temperature remains normal; the
general hyperaemia of all the organs of the abdominal, thoracic, and
general in command of the infantry went toward his horse with jerky
general looked the captain up and down as he came up panting,
general on duty in a discontented voice, "the plans must be examined
general paralysis of the insane, locomotor ataxia, and other chronic
general patted him on the shoulder, with a smile.
general poisoning, and, from the fact that it produces a marked
general principles. "I was bent upon making the government," he wrote,
general stood, but the French soldiers stopped him.
general subject to personal considerations as to the proposals made
general surroundings and the local applications are gradually made
general treatment. Many surgeons advise that so long as the abscess is
general was left in the rear guard. Ill with fever he went to Smolensk
general who on Kutuzov's staff in charge of the provisioning of the
general with a St. George's Cross on his neck stood just behind the
general with the white mustache and red flushed face.
general, and Pierre especially, for he reminded him of all the painful
general, by which is usually meant that of the peoples occupying a
general, in a white uniform that looked strange among the Russian
general, the men themselves not knowing what, or why, they were
generally listens to the first voice, but in society to the second. So
generally purchased their elections in order to protect the great
generally slurring his consonants: the voice of a man calling out to
generally the conduct of the war, which all these men believed they
generally when he was dying of wounds and the sovereign had thanked
generals and courtiers accompanying the army were living in the best
generals expressed the same opinion. One in particular declared with
generals killed and wounded, of reinforcements needed, of the
generals of the suite around him.
generals who whispered among themselves behind his back. All along the
generals, others said he must have returned home. The officer searched
generals, who one after another came into the room and sat down on the
generation later, King Philip, son of Massasoit, the friend of the
generation of men was coming on the scene. The supremacy of the whites
generation that followed the age of Douglas and Lincoln, it must be
generation that had framed the Constitution, chattel servitude
generation, "We are prepared to respect and honor you, but all the
generations. Explorers, fired by curiosity and the lure of the
generosity could stay the inevitable conflict as the frontier advanced,
generous pretensions, and Zapata, a radical leader of the peons. Without
generous spirit and tireless labors of its first proprietor, the leader
genitals, anus, perineum, buttock, and anterior abdominal wall. The
genitals, in which the skin becomes infiltrated with granulation tissue
genitals. When the primary lesion has taken the form of an open ulcer
genius for colonial administration as they could command to the
genius would seem to be required to retain the brilliant position
genius, and the free labor supply of Europe. Unseen by the thoughtless,
genius. Prince Auersperg feels his dignity at stake and orders the
gentle breathing. Then the countess called to Natasha. Natasha did not
gentleman," said the postmaster, entering the room followed by another
gentlemen anything! As fast as ever the horses can gallop, so fast
gentlemen in the full meaning of that word. It is only to prevent some
gentleness and affection. He could not refuse the post, or rather
gently stroking the part from the healthy towards the affected area. The
geographic, ethnographic, or economic conditions, then the free will
geometric formation, now in the equipment employed, now, and most
geometry book and eagerly broke the seal of her letter. It was from
germ at least, by the time the mid-century was reached: unions, labor
germinal layer, from which all the others are developed. The _corium_ or
gesture he referred to the people's representatives in Congress,
gesture to the portrait. "It is too soon for him to see a field of
get beyond the Niemen."
get on without it. 'When wood is chopped the chips will fly.'" He
get out of it. They could not understand that I have not the necessary
get them expelled from the commune.
get there and fire the bridge or will the French get within
gets across the Channel. I think the expedition is quite feasible.
getting a dinner. Two officers of his own division joined him. The
getting her foot into the other. Sonya, when he came in, was
getting nothing for the house, and now you wish to throw away all our-
giant cells. The treatment consists in dissecting the tumour tissue off
giddiness precede the onset of the acute manifestations, which affect
giddiness, dimness of sight, and a feeling of great terror. The pupils
gigantic footman in his bass voice, entering the drawing room. The
gigantic undertaking. Between the declaration of war and the armistice,
gilt-edged... it must be exactly like the sample. Varnish, sealing
girl boldly opened the creaking door, went up to the sofa with
girl he had saved. Rostov took the joke as an insult, flared up, and
girl of thirteen, hiding something in the folds of her short muslin
girl seemed to say by the smile that replaced the threatened tears, as
girls' voices came from the adjoining room. The door was opened a
give a serious turn to the conversation. Magnitski starting quizzing
give access to the sores. They should be washed with eusol, and dusted
give her back!" he almost shouted, putting the child, who began
give rise to the symptoms of loose body. The fringes of synovial
give room for the two approaching battalions. While he was speaking,
give the angel's face, Prince Andrew read the same mild reproach he
give the pre-eminence.
give to the French who, though not harmful, or hated, or guilty,
give up learning the harp and to play only the guitar. She asked
given a lump of sugar while drinking his tea, remained on the top of
given a monopoly in the coinage markets of civilized governments. This
given a small room as a favor, the soldiers would violate my
given a trial, and in extreme cases the question of amputation may have
given another charter which, though not so liberal as the first,
given body, the direction of its motion cannot coincide with any one
given by a battalion of the French Guards to the Preobrazhensk
given by the authorities at that time was Napoleon's attempt to stop
given by this kind of historian to the question of what force causes
given everything away. There was never a dinner or soiree at the
given for the Emperor by his aides-de-camp. This idea was eagerly
given free entry to England to encourage the production of the raw
given from the first, and in afebrile cases the injection of a foreign
given her approval by a narrow margin, leaving New York as the next seat
given her to hold. Assuming quite the pose of a society woman
given him in his own life--is just what makes the choice of occupation
given him some doubts about the faith of "the whole people" in the
given him, he was to advance from the left through Borodino to the
given in Hart, Channing, and Turner, _Guide to the Study and Reading of
given in from 7 to 21 days according to the dose.
given in pensions and the same amount for asylums; 150,000 alimony was
given in the Emperor's honor, whether they should group themselves
given it to the old prince), and he heard from him the story of
given my message wrong. I only said that you were to give them the
given parasitic micro-organism has of multiplying in the body and giving
given rendering the execution of the last command possible.
given the first year, three courses of the same number during the second
given the power to appoint all the chief officials. This made the mayor,
given the provincial instead of the proprietary form. New Hampshire,
given to the cause of independence.
given to the war by the burning of Russian towns and the hatred of the
given to the world announcing that, unless the states in arms returned
given ulcer, two questions have to be answered--first, What are the
given us an account of the Pittsburgh route as he found it in 1791. "If
gives "bounties to classes and individuals ... at the expense and to the
gives it into the hands of contemptible men whom he despises, saying
gives the resulting force. To define and express the significance of
giving battle; if it succeeded, to claim the success as his own; or if
giving courses of instruction on the subject to young men and women. In
giving him greetings from various people and retailing the town
giving representation on the board of trustees to several religious
giving rise to an _inflammatory oedema_, or, if the inflammation is on a
giving the messenger a significant look.
giving the word of command, the whole squadron, sharing his feeling,
glad that ladies and tradesmen's wives were leaving the city. "There
glade and were kindling glowing fires in a hollow of the forest
glance at the esaul and Denisov one saw that the latter was wet and
glance, and hardly able to restrain her tears and maintain the
glanced round at Sonya and seated herself on the sofa beside Natasha.
glanced uneasily at the count and at Anna Mikhaylovna, the latter very
glances without coloring, but even the old countess and Natasha
glancing into the drawing room, where he saw Vera and his mother
glancing up at Pierre. While one hand hung up the first string the
glands and the bone marrow. In the glands of the groin, for example,
glands as the mamma, parotid, thyreoid, and prostate, adenomas are met
glands in chancre of the finger; the submaxillary glands in chancre of
glands in the axilla or groin; in the leg in long-standing standing
glands in the groin are infected, the patient must be confined to bed,
glands in the neck. There is sometimes considerable improvement from
glands in the severer forms of sore throat associated with diphtheria
glands most frequently affected are those in the neck, axilla, and
glands nearly always break down and suppurate, and after destroying the
glands receive lymph from the arm, mamma, and side of the chest, and
glands the infection has come through the afferent lymphatics; if in the
glands, following an infected wound of the hand, or it may spread from a
glands, however, does sometimes occur, and in them the histological
glands, is most likely to be the primary lesion of syphilis.
glands, most commonly those in the cervical region (Fig. 80).
glands, or of hair follicles, may spring up in the centre of the raw
glands. The extension of malignant disease, whether cancer or sarcoma,
glands_ lie beneath the parotid fascia in front of the ear, and some
glands_ lie in or close to the median line between the anterior bellies
glands_--glandulae concatinatae--form a chain along the posterior edge of
glans; in the latter situation the induration imparts a "collar-like"
glass bore that imprint of newness found in the households of the
glass down the highroad before him.
glass in the region of the wrist. It may also be injured in fractures of
glass was smashed, and the shouting grew louder. They drank to
glass, hardware, and ammunition were drawn almost across the continent
glass. "This cold is tiresome. They talk about medicine--what is the
glasses. After the fish, which made a certain sensation, the count
gleam of bayonets visible through the smoke, make out moving masses of
gleamed in the sun. Here and there over the whole of that blue
gleamed white in the mist would have been safer because it would be
glimpses of swiftly moving legs and the shadows of the troyka they
glitter of diamonds and a flight of marble steps and the silver
glittered. And with that light, and as if in reply to it, came the
glittering close to her; the red patches on her face came and went,
glory of our arms and of the day's work, they assumed a serious
glory of the Russian arms.
gloves given to a newly initiated Brother to present to the woman he
glow from the fire, Pierre experienced a joyful emotion. "There now,
glow were in Moscow?" remarked one of the footmen.
glow! Natasha, do look! You can see it from the window," she said to
gluteal muscles, particularly the medius, and their aponeurotic
glycogen as it is required by the muscles, and in addition, deals with
gnashing her teeth, flew at the yellowish borzoi, which, with a
go away and the couple, left alone, still remained silent. They rarely
go away somewhere, so as not to be near her. Soon after the Rostovs
go in and find no one there." But he had hardly entered the room
go into a reclamation fund to continue the good work forever.
go on living without having solved the problems that so absorbed
go on!" he muttered to the valet who was rubbing him, slightly
go out. But it then occurred to him for the first time that he
go over periods of many years, with the result that the external
go that when I have not a soldier left I shall put myself at the
go through the eye of a needle than for a rich man to enter the
go to bed, and for a long time he paced up and down the room,
go with me in the carriage."
goal. Every soldier in Napoleon's army felt this and the invasion
goals and ensuring that the Project Gutenberg-tm collection will
goals and ensuring that the Project Gutenberg-tm collection will
gobble the same food as the gentry."
god and not to use it godlike." Leaders among the Republicans sought to
gods and, after that, the will of those who stood in the most
going every day to the house when there was a girl of seventeen there,
going on in the interior, and the cortex may be reduced to a thin shell
going on in the yard... Mamma!... It's impossible!"
going on to greenish-yellow purulent infiltration. Where the process is
going out, and Rostov heard the hoofs of several horses splashing
going through the peritoneal cavity (trans-peritoneal operation).
going to outflank it, the enemy would inevitably be destroyed.
going to the war, or was he sad at leaving his wife?--perhaps both,
going toward the door without raising his eyes. Denisov paused,
going, but why he was found near the fire? Who was he? they asked,
going. The Emperor was wounded, the battle lost. It was impossible
gold was brought in at the front door of the Treasury, notes were
gone a second time that day to inspect the fortifications of the
gone far before the opponents of the administration began to look to
gone out foraging, when he had again entered into all the little
gone out of the conservatory she followed and called Boris to her.
gone to the church service. Pierre drove on toward Gorki.
gone, tracks grown up in weeds and bushes, not a saw mill near the line
gonorrhoeal synovitis, upon repeated haemorrhages into the knee-joint in
good and for their own benefit to follow the example and instruction
good deal of pain and discomfort. When, on the contrary, the upper part
good fellow, who a bad one, and most of all, who was a comrade. The
good illustration of subcutaneous rupture of the arteries of the head is
good in the world. Pierre had first experienced this strange and
good news, though Schmidt's death is a heavy price to pay for the
good results. The peasants in the crowd were similarly impressed
good spirits, but that is the effect of your visit--he is not often
good standing. They did not belong to the classes from which emigration
good to have a friend like the prince," she said, smiling at Prince
good!" said Natasha, rising and going to the looking glasses.
good, he could not stop short for the sake of one man's life."
good, that seemed to be associated with the "alien invasion." They saw
good-by. So you'll give her the packet?"
good-for-anything loam." The federal government came to the aid of the
good-looking, dark-haired man. This was the celebrated Petersburg
good-natured man had destroyed the mood of concentrated gloom in which
good. Thus fulfilling the highest law thou shalt regain traces of
goodness. Natasha, leaning on her elbow, the expression of her face
goods became a competitor of Europe in the markets of the earth.
goods from the colonies and even the woolen trade between towns and
goods that had been dragged out of the houses. Besides Russian
goods to be brought from, and carried to, the interior regions in little
goods, the Sons of Liberty renewed their agitation, and women set about
goods." After the Indians were disposed of in 1794 and the last British
gossip, religious controversy, and political discussion. In the market
got the upper hand. According to this theory, the colonies of the
got up and began watching the movements of our troops below, as
got up, sighed, and sat down again on his heap of straw. "That's the
gouge, the latter procedure being preferred in the case of the
gouty and rheumatic subjects who have overstrained the tendon,
govern the general concerns of the confederated republic." The governor
govern the granting of amnesty?
governess. The other guests were Gervais, Magnitski, and Stolypin.
governesses, lived three miles from the Rostovs.
governing power. An army of adventurers from the North, "carpet baggers"
governing the people of those states by the sword.... The next was the
government a bit, a member of the Moscow English Club, and a universal
government and for the performance of international obligations. Our
government and giving a new dignity to the common man that has become a
government and the grand principles involved, the opinion of the
government at low prices to induce immigration. The second was the
government attempts to coerce the state into obeying the law, "the
government by public opinion, enlightened by the open discussion of
government clerks by the wholesale, Adams was retired from the White
government control. Accordingly laws were enacted bringing the railroads
government departments--knew that Moscow would soon be in the
government did not dare to execute any of the prisoners because they had
government enjoyed it, the principle was not positively established
government had been determined, the powers to be vested in it had been
government had passed out of the hands of the people.
government in Louisiana. The Senate rejected the proposal. A deadlock
government in opposition to which all their passions were enlisted." The
government in the hands of people who labored that struck the French
government is equally incompatible with the monarchical principle and
government is wanted, save that of the parish constable, as in America
government less prepared than was that of the United States in 1812. It
government must be counted the emancipation of the slaves in the states
government must rest not on authority but on secure bases. The Emperor
government no churches, shrines, riches, or houses--it was still the
government of George III in the colonies. It foreshadowed the Congress
government of dependencies, such as the Philippines and Porto Rico, the
government of his country on the consent of the governed.
government of the Czar had been overthrown by a liberal revolution,
government of the United States, and to exercise like authority over all
government of the United States, directed to the President of the
government or by the state governments. The other of these interests
government or occasioned the migrations can no longer be regarded as
government ownership and the government itself, boldly proclaiming their
government ownership. Moreover it adopted the policy of "rewarding
government revealed certain patent defects. The division of the work
government so that the light of public scrutiny could shine through it.
government that as no effective armistice had been offered to the
government to disavow the act, make reparation as far as possible, and
government to raise revenue in America "towards defraying the expenses
government to which submission is equivalent to slavery." The third and
government toward neutral ships and cargoes exceeds the manifest
government was brought into play. The commander-in-chief of the armed
government was eager to avoid a war that could have but one outcome. The
government were supplemented by gifts from the states in land and by
government whose principal duty was to keep the peace among them and
government" in the provinces, authorized royal agents to transfer to
government, Mr. Bryce had remarked, was the one conspicuous failure in
government, Thomas Jefferson, the Secretary of State, was reckoned as a
government, made its way upward into the federal system. The framers of
government, that the Crown is not as oppressive in England as in
government, the ranchmen, miners, and business men of California; and it
government, were slow to appreciate the place of the West in national
government--be it what it may--I know it is my duty to obey the
government. Accordingly, they at once repealed the act creating the new
government. An illustration of this process is found in the Oregon
government. Many boroughs returned one or more members to the Commons
government. The exemptions were numerous and the number who preferred
government. Washington was the Revolution." The weakness of Congress in
government. Yet there were no Republicans, as the Federalists asserted,
government: "The consequence will be that if they can clothe themselves
government; and the people at large fell into the habit of buying
government? (7) What powers shall be conferred on it? (8) How shall the
governmental control, paying no attention to the cries of worthy people
governments derive their just power from the consent of the governed?
governments. Two days later President Wilson sent a note to the warring
governor and reserved the power of appointment to the king. It also
governor did not count, the legislature did not count, comptrollers and
governor of New Motherland, was a German from Wesel on the Rhine, and
governor of New York wrote of the industrious Americans to his home
governor of South Carolina, the following year, "levelling principles
governor was arrested, imprisoned, and sent back across the sea under
governor, the provincial councilors, and the richest planters. "The
governors in America. These two men, with the support of the entire
governors were as independent of popular choice as were the appointees
gown and held the stem of his pipe firmly with the other. Panting
gown, he went to the couch on which he slept.
gown, talked to her of old acquaintances and at the same time, unaware
grabbed the King himself!" cried he, looking around him with eyes that
grade were forced to go West or were driven to the margin of
grade, generally speaking, an expansion of the elementary book by the
grades, and following the battle fresh changes were made in the staff.
gradual abolition of slavery in the District of Columbia and the total
gradual process of fitting the inhabitants of the islands for
gradually becomes darker till it is almost black. The parts around are
gradually deepens until complete separation is effected. As the muscles
gradually faded into the past, and she began to recover physically.
gradually fades away, and he falls in a heap on the floor.
gradually increased. If the body-weight falls, or if the gums become
graduated young students to lead in the woman movement. Sarah J. Hale,
graft should be cut to the exact size of the surface it is to cover;
graft to fill defects in the dura mater, and interposed between the
grafting into the gap left after excision of the sac a segment of the
grafting is carried out when the surface is covered by a uniform layer
grafting knife, the blade of which is rinsed in alcohol and kept
grafting purposes; the higher tissues such as those of the central
grafting the raw surface.
grafting; the other, in which the graft consists of the whole thickness
grafts have been taken, gauze soaked in _liquid paraffin_--the patent
grain was superseded by the towering elevator, loading and unloading
grain. The union of the two sections under Jackson's management seemed
grains of rice shifting in a bag. If the bodies are so numerous as to be
granary of the nation. In the second place, they reckoned upon a large
grand confusion of ideas under the title of "National Republicans." Thus
grand-patience as usual, when Pierre and Natasha came into the drawing
grandee of Catherine's time who now lay dying in Moscow. The young man
grandfather clause." This plan admitted to the suffrage any man who did
grandfather. Mishka had opened the clavichord and was strumming on
grandiloquently of the Saltanov dam being "a Russian Thermopylae," and
granted only the barest rudiments of education, inured to hardship and
granted them but the landowners had stopped it), then of Peter
granted to them, often at the expense of colonists, did much to deepen
granular protoplasm and a multi-partite nucleus; if still warm, the
granulation tissue grows into the space and gradually fills it; and
granulation tissue into scar tissue is effected by the fibroblasts,
granulation tissue is built up. Capillary loops grow into the coagulum,
granulation tissue when it is embedded in the tissues.
granulation tissue with the spoon, scraping sinuses, and packing the
granulation tissue, and when it is of long standing the opening may be
granulation tissue. The subsequent changes depend upon whether or not
granulation, or may be covered by skin-grafts. In the case of a finger
granulations and small sloughs on its floor. The edges are raised and
granulations springing from the matrix. A new nail is formed, but it is
granulations with a thin pink pellicle. As the epithelium increases in
granulations. For this purpose the sore may be covered with gauze
granulations. The infection rarely spreads to the lymphatics, but we
grapeshot from the four isolated guns on the hillock.
grapeshot range and wipe them out?" These were the questions each
grasp of the ligature. An internal clot forms and, becoming organised,
grasp the profundity of their plans, that he would answer with his
grasp the question.
grasp, it is an admirable book which calms and elevates the soul.
grasped at first by its promoters. Yet, appealing as it did to the most
grasped from side to side between the finger and thumb. The sensation on
grass through the mist and taking it for a tree can again take it
grass-grown streets.... How few young men there are, how generally the
gratefully at him with that radiant look which caused the plainness of
gratify the "heroes") of the efficacy of the directions issued in
gratifying in the extreme.
grating sensation transmitted to the fingers on making firm pressure on
grating. Dislocation is observed chiefly at the hip, and is rather a
grave misgivings of the first generation of statesmen, America was
graven in his soul: thoughts of the Contrat social and the French
graves of victims of the plague.
gravitated to the Republican ranks. They worked in the North and the
gravity, passing under fasciae, between muscles, along the sheaths of
gravity. The left median basilic vein is selected, and a platino-iridium
gray bitch that caught it! Go to law, indeed!... He snatches at the
gray coat who was standing on the hill.
gray overcoats, wounds, the smoke of gunpowder, the sounds of
grazing country forbid the wearing of side arms; nobody shoots up these
grazing. As soon as the railways were open into the Missouri Valley,
grease from the skin favours the action of these applications.
great American drive to the northeast in the Argonne forest, while he
great President who has preserved the vital interests of our government
great advantages in her markets. Free trade existed nowhere upon the
great armed conflict, the Civil War outran the purposes of those who
great commander. Rostov charged the French because he could not
great compromise between the large and small commonwealths by giving
great confusion and obscurity to the common task. Whatever question
great deal. Of the two soups he chose turtle with savory patties and
great debt had been created in the defense of the union, and to the
great districts into which the country is divided. All local national
great expedition went overland. The way once broken, others followed
great geographical extent of our territory, and the diversity of the
great majority of instances the formation of a chronic or cold abscess
great man. The Revolution was a grand thing!" continued Monsieur
great oedema of the part, and others again lead to the formation of gases
great powers, England, France, and Spain, decided in the autumn of 1861
great ship-building program. In December, 1917, the government assumed
great size, projecting on the buttock and extending down the thigh, and
great success. There were many pretty girls and the Rostov girls
great swelling of the whole limb, which is of a firm almost "wooden"
great toe often stops when it reaches the metatarso-phalangeal joint; or
great trades of that city." There, wrote another traveler, "I heard the
great trochanter, thus favouring invasion of the bone marrow when
greatcoats were not in very good condition), and instantly the squares
greater or lesser readiness to fight and face danger felt by all the
greater resistance on the part of the tissues, there is active formation
greater was her wonder at the short-sightedness of men who seek
greater. The dishonest conduct of the son of a dishonest father, the
greater. The same thing is observed in persons injured while under the
greatest document ever devised by the wit of man to aid a people in
greatest honor and mark of favor at the French court.
greatest number of men had perished in fleeing from Pratzen. The
greatest of American state papers, he laid before Congress the outlines
greatest to the least were solely engaged in sacrificing themselves,
greatest weakness--the one to which he had confessed when admitted
greatly afflicted by the death of the father he had hardly known), and
greatly influenced by the terrain in which the fighting takes place. In
greatly offended when the butler with a bottle wrapped in a napkin
greatly swollen, livid, and cold, and the pulse beyond is completely
greatness of soul by not fearing to take on himself the whole
greatness of soul?" said the little princess, smiling and drawing
greatness, the unimportance of life which no one could understand, and
greedy of power, early adopted the practice of choosing the electors
green protective is placed next the raw surface to prevent the gauze
green sheath which he had bought at the Sukharev market with the
greenish-yellow pus from which the staphylococcus can be isolated, and
greenish-yellow pus. This rarefaction of the spongy bone is the earliest
greet the young man.
greeting, and the first regiment roared "Hurrah!" so deafeningly,
greetings with American women who were raising the same issue here. By
grenadier, who, with his face buried in the ground and a blackened
grew angry. It made him angry just because the idea of marrying the
grew anxious. The courtiers suffered because of the suffering the
grew calm, but was not immediately ready to reply to the Emperor's
grew into immense proportions and the industrial area was extended from
grew. As I entered the anteroom I heard Andrusha's peals of laughter
grey colour, the discharge is small in amount, and consists of thin
grief in her vexation, "if you won't obey the doctor and take your
grief, Natasha spent most of the time in her room by herself,
grief. I belong to the province of Smolensk."
grievances which led to the American Revolution.
grievances. It thus defied the federal government and announced a
grievances. Some of the more restless spirits rioted in the streets,
grieved and mortified Nicholas. In the first place he was sorry that
grieving at the misfortunes of our common cause, or we are merely
grimace. "Didn't I explain to you? What?" And Anatole, with the
grinning expression known as the _risus sardonicus_.
groans, and the shuffling of feet be heard.
groin, from cancer of the external genitals. In lymph vessels the cancer
groove on each side, or of a horizontal groove at the level of the upper
grooves in the rifle, and to prevent it stripping as it passes through
grooves, and are retained there by a series of strips of plaster. At the
gross dirt. Devitalised and contaminated tissue is removed with the
ground that it was "in derogation of the Constitution," recalling
ground to complain of the exercise of personal prerogatives by the king.
ground, and began dancing round the room with it.
ground, as well as that the French were outflanking our left. The
ground, shall withdraw the left flank under its cover, and retreat
ground, so that in walking he is obliged to jerk the foot forwards and
grounds of agitation. There was also a diversion of forces to the silver
grounds of justice; and from the suffragists who besought the women of
grounds of the Rostovs' house at Otradnoe. He heard merry girlish
group of horsemen coming toward them. In front of the group, on a
group was busy getting out caldrons and rye biscuit, and feeding the
group. A shopkeeper with red pimples on his cheeks near the nose,
group. England, aware of the dangers arising from German outposts in the
group. Two huntsmen galloped up to the dogs; one in a red cap, the
groups. These two mammoth groups jointly ... constitute the heart of the
grow luxuriantly. Refrigeration for steamships and freight cars put the
growing at a steady rate. The fourth town in size was Charleston, South
growing form of epithelial cancer, described by Hutchinson as the
growing from the bones of the extremities may implicate the main
growing from the dorsum of the terminal phalanx of the great
growing in connection with, a secreting gland. In the substance of such
growing light over the field. Denisov talked in whispers with the
growing more and more intense glowed in the faces of these men.
growing, the effects are more striking. Gummatous disease may come and
grown young, and he was quietly telling me something about the
grown-up lady. She had a fan in her hand that one of the ladies had
grown. This active old servant was unpacking the traveler's canteen
grows from the skull. It is generally sessile and solitary, and may grow
grows from the subcutaneous fat, and forms a soft, irregularly lobulated
growth has been removed, the more do we depend upon radium or the X-rays
growth is confined to those elements of the skeleton where a core of
growth lies within the territory of the portal circulation, in which
growth of a "central money power," it provided, in the third place, for
growth of the United States and dreamed of establishing in the Western
growth of the epidermis is a frequent accompaniment of moles and of that
growth of the tumour is out of proportion to that of the child, or when,
growth, the characters of which they reproduce. The glands are at first
growth. This centrifugal spread of cancer is clearly seen in the
growths of the skin.
growths, especially in the mamma of women over fifty, should be regarded
growths--for example, implication of the pectoral muscle in cancer of
grumous discharge. Sometimes several small collections under the skin
guarantee peace on the border. In the second place, British garrisons
guard for the old views and accused the new of violating revelation.
guerrilla band, less than a mile from the road, sitting on a wagon
guerrilla troops over the French, the envy aroused by this; the desire
guerrilla warfare raged in the island. American citizens, by virtue of
guessed the reason of that sadness and suddenly began to cry.
guessing by the voice that it was not Konovnitsyn.
guests settled down in their places. Then the strains of the count's
guests were all conversing with one another. "The Razumovskis... It
guests, and so he went from one group to another. Some of the most
guests, expecting the summons to zakuska,* avoid engaging in any
guidance from those who blame him and who profess to know the ultimate
guided by individual men, and (2) the existence of a known aim to
guided the army, as well as the military genius shown by his marshals.
guiding hand. Before withdrawing American troops from the island,
guilt and the disgrace of having lost two guns and yet remaining alive
gum and palate, giving to the mucous membrane the appearance of a
gumboil, with tonsillitis, or with affections of the temporo-mandibular
gummata (Fig. 16). Fresh crops of nodules appear in the neighbourhood of
gummata and in the thickened patches in syphilitic disease of the aorta.
gummatous disease are: the skull, the septum of the nose, the nasal
gummatous disease causes ulceration, which, beginning in the mucous
gummatous lesions of the nose, throat, larynx, and bones, either with
gummatous tissue degenerates and breaks down, and especially if the
gums, the nasal or the intestinal mucous membrane. In other cases the
gun carriages and with the smell of linstocks, came the artillery
gun to gun, now aiming, now counting the charges, now giving orders
guns had begun to reply. From the bottom of the slope, where the
guns seemed to him like ants. In that world, the handsome drunkard
guns' crews had been disabled, but the artillerymen were still as
gust of wind blowing over the army slightly stirred the streamers on
guttered in the draft. On the landing below, Philip, the footman,
gypsies', nor at Komoneno's. Pierre drove to the Club. In the Club all
habit of walking, had been swept: the marks of the broom were still
habit. Her position in the house was such that only by sacrifice could
habits of the Americans they were allowed to filter into the seaboard
habits of the East at the same time that he retained his hold on the
habits: wrote commands, letters, reports, and orders of the day;
had "learned his trade on the continent," and was regarded as a man of
had a better view of the whole crowd. The tall lad was standing in
had a dangerous fleet on the high seas. In vain did the king assert in
had a leader of remarkable power who gave direction to the redemption of
had a new significance for him. The presence and remarks of
had abandoned since the ball. Having finished her morning tea she went
had accused Douglas, Buchanan, and the Supreme Court of acting in
had already advised the architect not to go to the prince with his
had already anticipated the Congress by selecting delegates before the
had already decided something in her mind. The countess knew this, but
had also passed. When they reached Yaroslavl the wound had begun to
had always imagined battles to himself), nor could he help to fire the
had aroused and flew off after the hounds. The count, like a
had as usual summoned the village elder and asked him what he knew
had assured him was ready to do anything for him. The captain was also
had at first seized Nicholas and the others that she might not do
had attracted an army of miners and prospectors. The city of Denver,
had become one of the richest heiresses in Moscow, was in the full
had been arranged on the top of her head (a style that quite altered
had been assiduous in sending aides-de-camp to inquire after the
had been at work on the battery, threw down their spades and ran to
had been bewildered. At that time, the Russians were so used to
had been charged by the companies. In effect, the right to fix freight
had been concentrated on the Russians, as he had ordered, but that
had been dislocated by the capture of the Shevardino Redoubt on the
had been dispersed like dust by contact with the first man he met.
had been done, the Rhetor said:
had been dug in the ground, and near the post and the pit a large
had been effectively boycotted by the Americans; ships lay idly swinging
had been established over this ruined nest. He felt this in the
had been exhibited to George III in 1776. Especially did they assail the
had been for some time as to what should be done with the members of the
had been forbidden to leave, that traitors had been seized, that the
had been found, Napoleon also gave instructions that the Polish
had been going to sit down, but fell. The other, a short sturdy
had been holding it up by the linen bands attached to it were relieved
had been killed or not and whether the cannon had been captured or
had been liberated and raised to the summit of her glory, there was
had been long gathering upon the horizon. From the very beginning in
had been lying and replied through the closed door that she did not
had been made so hastily that the Frenchmen with the wagons had all
had been on its last march the day before--presented a well-ordered
had been one of the impelling motives in stimulating immigration. In all
had been retaken by the Russians and burned, in the very skirmish at
had been sent to the rearguard by the commander in chief, was
had been shown in and out of the minister's room by the adjutant on
had been since the war for independence and to grant certain slight
had been sitting with the old aunt rose hurriedly and overtook
had been struck on the teeth, or what the ham had to do with it.
had been the leaders of their section were ruined financially and almost
had been told to, and the Emperor Francis merely looked fixedly into
had been, as the figures show.
had brought into the room had vanished; and as if answering a question
had brought the publican some skins from the factory and for this
had carried the sick man dispersed. Anna Mikhaylovna touched
had cast off all allegiance to the Anglican Church and established a
had cleared off the bridge and the troops were now moving forward.
had come and wanted to put up their horses in the yard where the
had come down from the days of Andrew Jackson, were, it was said, merely
had come from Barclay de Tolly to report on the progress of affairs on
had come from Petersburg. There was no general plan of action. The
had come in, and settled up with the innkeeper. The noise of wheels,
had come sailing in from another room as soon as the guests began to
had continually sought to find--the aim of life--no longer existed for
had crossed the Niemen and, thanks to this, was able to show certain
had declared that Congress, the superior power, could not do it under
had departed a long way from the old idea of the government as nothing
had disappeared he noticed that the eyes of all in the room turned
had disappeared. The hazel bushes parted behind the hounds and
had done before. As soon as she began to think of him, the
had done for her; then it occurred to her that her aunt and the
had done in the past with nothing but her charms which gave him
had drafted the Constitution, suggested the holding of another
had elapsed after the disappearance of the last manifestation. While
had enlisted to save the union. Moreover, he had before him a solemn
had entangled; the count too sighed and, noticing the snuffbox in
had entered the room while he was picking up his tricks, glanced again
had entered took no notice of her. The princess nodded to her daughter
had even been forgotten after the many subsequent speeches, but to
had even brought from the village of Visloukhovo, which was occupied
had experimented with popular election, still left the choice of
had fallen and the full force of the French artillery fire was
had fallen into disorder through the strife of the Liberal and the
had firmly resolved not to call on the Rostovs again and to forget the
had firmly resolved to answer his father-in-law. Moreover, the words
had fled all the way from Ulm, while Dolokhov maintained that the
had followed the sovereign from Petersburg to Vilna and eclipsed the
had formerly been in love. In the state of intoxication she was in,
had found in the kitchen. But as the captain had the wine they had
had gone down into the valley. The fourth column, with which Kutuzov
had gone into another room, to which the countess hurriedly followed
had gone through the same process as the Rostovs, but with less
had grown up in state legislatures there arose a demand for the
had had drink served them. The blacksmiths from a neighboring
had had little experience in its operation. When the supervision of the
had had on the Spasski Hill which might have been serious for her in
had had time to secure quarters the soldiers ran out into the
had happened, yet the former purity of her love for Prince Andrew
had he been in Congress, he would have opposed the two bills because he
had he not been able to explain the details of how Metivier and Feller
had heard at the staff.
had heard in the army many stories of Dolokhov's extraordinary bravery
had heard of him inspired him with but little respect for the man.
had heard of the swiftness of Ilagin's borzois, and in that
had heard, was the mainspring of the whole affair. Prince Andrew had
had held the crowd in check suddenly broke. The crime had begun and
had immediately let the matter drop.
had in 1828. He was truly a man of the people. Born of poor parents in
had in Russia, to be placed in this position--made the laughingstock
had in common: a desire to get to the place that had been called
had in imagination been playing the role of director of the popular
had instantly unfolded itself in his soul as if freed from the bondage
had kept the Frenchwoman at a distance. Prince Andrew's second letter,
had killed a man, he felt uneasy. He looked round at the captive
had left Moscow. Half the wagons laden with hardtack that had traveled
had left the room Kutuzov gave a sigh of relief and went on with his
had left the room the old prince, looking uneasily round, threw down
had listened attentively to the pilgrim.
had long been wishing but had been unable to divert the conversation
had long laid claim to Oregon and in 1818 they had agreed to occupy the
had longed for more than anything else in the world, did not know
had lost nearly half its men from hunger and sickness. In the
had made by sending someone else there first. And the quiet little
had made of the cost of rebuilding the town and country houses,
had made peace with Germany in March, 1918. Thereupon the United States
had neither the disciplined troops, the ships of war, nor the supplies
had never before known. And this not only stayed with him during the
had no doubts about the justice of his cause, such as plagued some of
had no power to suspend the writ of _habeas corpus_. In Congress and
had nominated him for the vice presidency as a man of views acceptable
had not retreated a step, that the French losses were much heavier
had not understood the symptoms, but Frise had, and Mudrov had
had not undressed during the first three nights, in order to be
had not yet entered either the military or civil service, as he had
had not yet even dared to think of--the complete extermination of
had obtained control of the national council of peasants, workingmen,
had obtained the confidence of many highly placed persons, had been
had occupied but more to the left, and among the orange-colored Uhlans
had once been appointed either by the governor or the legislature. Even
had only seen on the faces of soldiers who had been long in
had only to follow legal methods, and the transaction would be correct
had otherwise interfered with the enforcement of private agreements. The
had passed that morning, the lines were so near together that the
had passed, and at the cost of that temporary unpleasantness he had
had plagued the country all during the administrations of Washington and
had played in the American Revolution.
had probably come to Tilsit to see the Emperor.
had produced such letters from the unfortunate deceased that they
had promised the Rostovs to bring them, from Count Rostopchin whom
had rapidly become the fashion. He was enormously tall, handsome,
had read on the face of his dead wife: "Ah, why have you done this
had received, informed the count that an immense crowd had collected
had recognized the Tsar and watched his approach. When he was within
had recourse to a rider on the army bill and carried it through, putting
had retired to private life, the stern Chief Justice continued to
had revealed to Pierre the following prophecy concerning Napoleon,
had said it for the tenth time, Molibre's words: "Mais que diable
had seen a grievous danger to the republic. "Plutocracy has taken the
had seen before, there was the same general expression of refined,
had seen them last. The household was divided into two alien and
had seen. Everything was similar: the ladies' subtle talk, the
had served so long. He felt in his own person the sufferings and death
had spoken to the gentleman ranker, he addressed him with the
had sprung into being. The time was ripe, it seemed, for a national
had stared with merry surprise at his hat (perhaps the very men he had
had stayed at home in attendance on the court."
had still to be done in the realm of history did not concern him at
had stolen some boots from the recruits; I should even have been
had stolen was as impossible for them as it is for the monkey to
had suddenly appeared in the fog, there was a flash, followed by a
had suddenly taken a very large dose of the drug, and had died in
had taken from the prisoner.
had taken part in the battle knew it.
had taken place at headquarters and in Boris. In the army, Bonaparte
had taken the affairs of America out of the hands of British
had taught her involuntarily to be secretive, having answered the
had tea and their voices were audible from the next room. At tea all
had the armies been united and had someone else, instead of Barclay,
had the ear of the company.
had the effect of making them gradually begin to forget him without
had the government offices removed; now distributed quite useless
had the honor of being received, that I have not yet had time to think
had the right to choose, and these posts never changed hands. Before
had the right, if it could, to blockade the ports of an enemy and
had the right, subject to certain regulations, to carry his case to the
had time to visit the kitchen, came up to his officer.
had to Spanish territory beyond the Sabine River.
had to be devised to pay the cost of the war, precipitating the quarrel
had to be executed or not. But this was only the external condition;
had to be left behind and making a list of them as the countess
had to be under the forms of law and according to the rules of business.
had to bear, bring into the world, nurse, and bring up.
had to choose the latter.
had to cross by ferry. While the carriage and horses were being placed
had to face responsibilities to the general public. With the passing of
had to go to Moscow. But the countess' health obliged them to delay
had to say to the adjutant that Boris felt uncomfortable. He turned
had to sign papers, to present himself at government offices, the
had told the population plainly that the town would be abandoned.
had tried to put into effect with the aid of his associates,
had vainly suffered all the dread that precedes a battle and had spent
had written his immortally victorious name on the Pyramids, would
had wrought American independence and set the government afloat. With
haemorrhage before it becomes serious. As an aid in diagnosing the source
haemorrhage by ulcerating into large blood vessels. All the local and
haemorrhage into the cavities of the large joints, especially the knee,
haemorrhage may occur if the wound becomes infected.
haemorrhage may occur into the cavity of a bursa and give rise to a
haemorrhage or by implication of the ureters and kidneys. Independently
haemorrhage stops when the bandages and soaked dressings are removed. If
haemorrhage takes place into the substance of the tumour, the persistence
haemorrhage vary widely in severity: they may be so slight that the
haemorrhage, and by rendering the vessels brittle, makes it difficult to
haemorrhage, by favouring the entrance of septic infection, by
haemorrhage_, which, it will be observed, is effected by the contraction
haemostasis that results from curling up of the intima and contraction of
hailed as America's Tiberius Gracchus, was nominated as the Democratic
hair and a plump, well-nourished body. The fourth was a peasant, a
hair follicles or of the nail matrix has escaped destruction. The
hair follicles, it is a local infection through the skin.
hair, and looked at Bezukhov. The stern, shrewd, and penetrating
hair. The princess' beautiful eyes with all their former calm radiance
hairs. When the patient has been brought under the influence of the
half a century, the imperial powers of Europe had been carving up the
half a million dollars to the American cause and died broken in purse,
half a million. In five states--Maryland, Virginia, the two Carolinas,
half a million. To the west, Arizona with a population of about 125,000
half acres on the Ohio and began operations by planting the town of
half an hour, during which time the temperature rises to 103 o, 104 o, or
half broken by the clouds, over the roofs of the street opposite, on
half changed their summer coats, the fox cubs were beginning to
half submerged, was floating on its side in the middle of the pond. He
half the strength of the French, does not make a single attempt to
half-burned mansion occupied by the French, with lilac bushes still
half-inch incisions, and, after clamping the vein between two pairs of
half-open door into the sitting room, where there was a smell of
half-ruined houses. The seniors tried to collect straw and potatoes
hall all sat waiting, silently and alert. In the outlying serfs'
hall porter was standing at the front door. From the landing where
hall, where Denisov was sitting on the same chair by the clavichord
halo of romance on account of his supposed death and the tragic loss
halted to have a look at the French.
halted. All remained where they were in the middle of the muddy road.
halted. It had grown so dark that one could not distinguish the
halting place. The regiments had entered and left the town with
halves of the body coalesce during development. Such a dermoid usually
hammering on the field of battle, the North was victorious.
hand (he had probably soiled them when he, too, had knelt before the
hand and at the head of a regiment--he fell as a hero, worthy of his
hand and by the throat with the other. The officer, dropping his
hand and giving encouragement to the industrious poor with the other.
hand and kissing her, and then he left the room with rapid steps.
hand carried the day. The Senate, after hearing the Federalist protest,
hand in greeting. Rostov still had the same indefinite feeling, as
hand is tilted to the radial side, but the paralysis of the flexor carpi
hand of Congress was now forced. Objections were made to the new
hand or at the wrist can be remedied only by operation. When some time
hand she went up to her husband and kissed him on the forehead.
hand the force of this common attraction to Smolensk, their goal, drew
hand the letter direct to him and tell him all... could they really
hand them to the Emperor after my death. Now here is a Lombard bond
hand to deign to touch that soldier's breast for the soldier to be
hand to him, and began to speak in a voice in which for the first time
hand to his ear toward Weyrother, with the air of a man absorbed in
hand to replace Barclay. The Grand Duke was there because it suited
hand to show that there was no need to ask the question. He wished
hand with the other, came up to Tushin and asked for a seat.
hand, "so this is how we meet again. He spoke of you even at the
hand, and that ancient capital of the Tsars would perish. But my
hand, and the hill opposite, with the French moving about on it,
hand, lifted her high, placed her on his shoulder, held her by the
hand, neither suffer themselves nor transmit the disease to their
hand, she sat down to show him the French alphabet, she so longed to
hand, speaking of the princess' sorrow and making herself a partner in
hand, such as secreting glands, muscle, and the tissues of the central
hand, the dense integument of the palm preventing the swelling from
hand. A few days before the wedding Berg entered the count's study
hand. The affected muscles usually show the reaction of degeneration. In
hand. With a madman's cunning, Makar Alexeevich eyed the Frenchman,
hand.... The Emperor Napoleon burns with impatience to make Prince
handed Kutuzov a garrison report and the keys of the town. The
handed him over to the godmother, Princess Mary. Prince Andrew sat
handed him to the nurse, and went with rapid steps toward the door.
handed him which he rested on the back of a happy page who had run
handed the Emperor his hat and gloves; another brought him a pocket
handkerchief and rushed from the room.
handkerchief or bathing-drawers; if there is inflammatory oedema the
handkerchief she needed for the dance, had tears in her eyes, though
handkerchief to his wounded cheek and pointing to the fleeing
handkerchief, and listened to what the housekeeper was saying.
handkerchief, that the major ceased smiling and after some reflection-
handkerchiefs; they assure the officer on duty that they, the
hands after washing and drying. The persistent warts of young adults
hands and seized the man (a French officer) by the shoulder with one
hands for their sustenance. Trusting as he did in the innate goodness of
hands has followed prolonged and repeated exposure to the Rontgen rays.
hands in defense of their homes; when the armed conflict was over they
hands of the French. A cornet, hearing the story, informed his
hands of the Russians, or that after Moscow there were other battles
hands of the surgeon or his assistants, through the medium of
hands on his knees with the air of a man who enjoys life and knows how
hands or the toes of both feet are simultaneously attacked, and the
hands outside the quilt. Into the right hand, which was lying palm
hands that lay quietly crossed one on the other on her breast, and
hands which held the pack. Much depended on Rostov's winning or losing
hands, he looked more closely at the ring, with its skull--a Masonic
hands, sat at the table which was scrawled over with figures, wet with
hands, slowly and solemnly conducting the service. A little behind
hands. Then he caught her up. It was lucky the maids ran in just
handsome man--the other evidently a private or an orderly,
handsome open face of the man who might perhaps be her husband
handsome soldier of forty--looked sternly at the singers and screwed
handsome, ruddy face. He lay just under the icons; his large thick
hanging down on her nose and her head flung back, stood in the hall
hanging unnaturally and one leg bent under him. Pierre ran up to the
hangs powerless. A considerable proportion of the cases recover
happen!" she said, looking at herself in the glass. "How shall I enter
happened between Sonya and Dolokhov before dinner, and with the kindly
happened in their former battles, instead of the news they expected of
happened that a very considerable part of the whisky manufactured in the
happened that throughout the whole battle the Russians opposed the
happened to Karay--the borzoi was suddenly on the wolf, and they
happened to her, but she felt herself the representative of her dead
happened to him from the time of his rescue till his illness. He
happened, and now all is changed," she thought as she sat with the
happened. From the pretense of illness, from his daughter's
happening at the copse. He knew that young and old wolves were
happening there, especially as the smoke mingling with the mist hid
happening, and Sonya's life in the countess' house had grown harder
happens that the infection assumes a virulent character and causes
happens. A sovereign should not be with the army unless he is a
happens. The movement of humanity, arising as it does from innumerable
happiness are wrapped up in you, and that in spite of the distance
happiness on the faces of both father and daughter.
happiness or peace of mind. Can anything in the world make her or me
happiness the victory had afforded him had been now left in the
happiness when you began living for others. I experienced just the
happiness with thy neighbor, and may envy never dim the purity of that
happiness), feeling the eager bustle around him, and hearing the
happiness. The old princess sighed sadly as she offered some wine to
happy by the news of their son's having received a decoration, so he
happy in the assurance that the rumors about the Emperor being wounded
harbored nasty suspicions of him, making it the object of her life
harbors along the coast favored a lively water-borne trade among the
hard across the field. The borzois bore down on it.... Now they drew
hard at work and in a hurry. "How can I think of the bright side of
hard cider and a log cabin, the Whigs treated the remark not as an
hard crust or _scab_, which serves to protect the surface from external
hard dental tumours which are met with in the jaws, and consist of
hard labor, I believe. Now the father has come to intercede for him.
hard to find some occupation the more easily to bear the danger. To
hardly able to drag their legs went to the front rather than to the
hardly daring to dismount and always expecting to be pursued. By the
hardly keep the thinning ranks of the army filled. With reluctance
hardly moved, and in the silence that followed the heavy breathing
hardly open to debate. The feebleness of the Articles of Confederation
hardness, and by the shadow which it presents with the X-rays (Fig. 138).
hardship of this march, the rapidity of which was unparalleled for
hardships, sleeping on the ground with them, and eating parched corn
hardy, industrious, and independent in spirit, sharing neither the
hare he made his way far into the forest and came upon the left
hare, but it was easier for the hare to run on the balk and the
harm of disablement and death was caused by the balls and bullets that
harm, but fatal damage may be done to the brain or to the aorta, or the
harmful (the harm was scarcely perceptible, as they were given in
harmful but helpful to the success of the service, but not a class
harness for her journey, the peasants had come in a large crowd to the
harnessed two young side horses with the bay in the shafts," he went
harp, she joined the other young ladies in begging Natasha and
harsh voice was heard from the other side of the door, and the
harsh, bookish theorist, self-confident to the point of despising
harsh, dry, and easily shed. The nails become brittle and furrowed, or
harsh, enforcement of the law. It ordered customs officers to remain at
harvest in. She did not understand why he stepped out from the
has advanced along the Vladimir road, and a fourth, rather
has already been described. Infective emboli are the direct cause of the
has been actively immunised. The process by which passive immunity is
has been ascribed to compression of the nerves in the narrowed Haversian
has been completely cleared out in operating for cancer of the
has been described. The battle of Borodino was not fought on a
has been found useful in relieving the urgent symptoms of dyspnoea.
has been known to follow soiling of the sheets by the escape of a
has been likened to the colour of raw ham; they exhibit a predilection
has been previously sterilised by heat. The nails should be cut down
has been received by the Emperor. Had you heard?"
has been revealed, holy oil trickles from the cheeks of our blessed
has been separated from the living, the X-rays yield the most exact
has behind in the cart.... Why, those are settings taken from some
has come to this as I have through the same sufferings..."
has elapsed since the accident, the proximal end may be so retracted
has given us the opportunity to extend our influence, our institutions,
has greatly diminished the number of cases in which it becomes necessary
has implicated the femoral vessels and led to secondary haemorrhage.
has largely gone out of fashion, but the cautery may still be employed
has long been the practice to speak of the early settlements as founded
has lost, the grief of that loss has gone too deep in his heart for
has no knowledge of them. This city was evidently living with the full
has no place. The distinction between the poor teachings of mundane
has not been demonstrated that there is any alteration in the
has not yet reached. Wheels creak on their axles as the cogs engage
has penetrated to the necessary depth, by passing a few cubic
has retained a love of idleness, but the curse weighs on the race
has so far been unsuccessful, but in one case operated upon by Keen the
has surpassed my expectations. I thank you in the name of the
has the right to grant dispensations..."
haste to clear out that the prince could hardly stop them. He
hasten to display their insignificance before him. The King of Prussia
hastened by the application of a fly-blister. When a gumma has broken on
hastened to return the holy image.
hastening coagulation, by bringing the blood into contact with damaged
hastens to check the machine or set it in proper motion, so Anna
hastily brushed smooth in front of the temples, but stuck up behind in
hastily closed the door. Tikhon knew that neither the son's arrival
hastily threw something into the bushes, removed his sodden hat by its
hastily to the front porch, saying he felt too hot. The crowd of
hastily to undo the buttons of his clothes and undressed him. The
hastily took his seat and told the coachman to drive him to his
hat galloped up to Kutuzov and asked in the Emperor's name had the
hat in hand, rode up smiling to the Emperor to congratulate him on the
hatred of the enemy flared up, and while it retreated the army
have "a peculiar heavy but not putrid odour." The constitutional effects
have a look at his Frenchman with the dimple on his chin. He was
have a look at the hunters who were arriving. The presence of Natasha-
have a majority, then from the five highest on the list the said House
have a majority, then from the two highest members on the list, the
have a room of your own," and she took the inkstand from Nicholas.
have admitted the conception of the infinitely small, and the
have almost all died unawares, sitting in the sanctuary they had
have almost entirely disappeared, and the original wound is occupied by
have an equal interest in the principles of its institutions and to be
have an equal number of votes, then the House of Representatives shall
have an opinion), but he urged that at this point the army should
have attributed to this last period of the war of 1812 an aim that
have become of the activity of all those who opposed the tendency that
have been a prisoner if Suvorov had had a free hand; but he had the
have been done to attain an end worthy of the nation, and they are not
have been even less reason to expect a disturbance among the people if
have been expected, probably because the serum is not made from the
have been fought two days before. Others again spoke of the battle
have been in the mountains of Bohemia, and you and your army would
have been omitted from the _Manual_, as they are to be found in the
have been put off," said the prince, who, like a wound-up clock, by
have been recorded with greater frequency since the more general
have been recorded, and it has been observed that the thermometer
have been separated from the body for some time inevitably lose their
have changed so to me? What have I done to you? You are going to the
have declared that this Constitution shall be the supreme law." When a
have failed and the condition of the limb is affecting the general
have given diplomacy, foreign affairs, world relations, and the
have had equally good results by simply protecting the local lesion with
have happened had Napoleon been in time to penetrate into the rich
have him conscripted for the army.
have horses, let them be off to Vladimir, and not leave them to the
have killed the greater their achievement. How does God above look
have light friction applied to it. As the circulation is restored the
have liked "Uncle." "And then I was saying to myself all the way, 'How
have lived almost without restraint, free as the mountain air or as the
have mercy on us and save us!" he concluded, then bowed to the ground,
have no right to punish. And then you will know the happiness of
have no time now--I'll think it all out later on!" But the later on
have not met the solicitation requirements, we know of no prohibition
have not met the solicitation requirements, we know of no prohibition
have not once been in to see the count. He has not sent for me.... I
have now been forgotten because the event falsified them. There are
have opposed so illegal an intention) but simply that the
have originated, who shall enter the objections at large on their
have power! The success of a military action depends not on them,
have reached the posterior urethra; they have been observed, however,
have repeated the field marshal's address, begun solemnly and then
have said and therefore was what an ukase emanating from the highest
have said that, if only the French made one more slight effort, it
have seen inoculation tubercle of the index-finger followed by a large
have seen the state of the mothers, wives, and children of the men who
have something to tell you. Here, here!" and she led him into the
have sustained it had the commander in chief continued to look at him,
have tea. Seats were brought in and so was the tea. The officers gazed
have the blood of indentured servants in their veins.
have the books."
have the fact that up to the twenty-fifth, Barclay de Tolly and
have their origin in the external or common iliac arteries or in the
have thought she was angry with the travelers and would immediately
have thought that regarding this period of the campaign the
have to show all I can do." And his fancy pictured the battle, its
have you in the criminal court...."
have, my dear! I tasted it. The thousand rubles I paid for Taras
having been accidentally wounded while performing venesection of the
having been captured, of his deposition, and of the choice of a new
having been unjust to the Austrians and especially to Weyrother.
having carefully removed the leg bands by deft circular motions of his
having destroyed the cancer chain connecting the nodule with the primary
having disengaged herself from the dogs, with tail tucked in again,
having dissipated their property--that being the chief fault of
having embraced the one true faith, and asking him to carry out all
having entertained her so well. The visitors were invited to supper in
having fully realized what had happened, namely the loss of our
having her own way. She packed, repacked, pressed, made the butler's
having in her joy left the child too soon, and she glanced round.
having reached the bushes he glanced round once more. The French had
having realized that the main object of all these words and all this
having ridden ahead, had pulled up his horse near the bridge, with a
having taken and closed the exercise book with the next day's
having taken off his shako, carefully loosened the gathers of its
having weakened in Moscow, and do so only because the results did
having, as Marya Dmitrievna told him in secret, poisoned herself the
hay and having picked up one of the wealthiest heiresses in Russia, he
he (the old prince himself) would die before then, and he decided to
he accepted the role of head of the Moscow opposition. In spite of
he added quickly: "There is only one Paris in the world. You have been
he also lived, saying: "Can the liberties of a nation be thought secure
he and all his suite showed pleasure at the sound of the singing and
he announced with such solemnity and significance that the official
he asked for new legislation to aid him in enforcing the laws. With two
he asked the aide-de-camp with a respectful politeness evidently
he attacked them at Smolensk? What would have happened had the
he branded as "incompatible with the existence of the union,
he came out of the Governor's room. Involuntarily listening now to the
he caught Helene's left hand and turned her, the only sound audible,
he chose. At home Natasha placed herself in the position of a slave to
he continually realized as he read that book: the joy, hitherto
he continued to struggle desperately forward, and from between the
he could not look his old comrades in the face and pronounce their
he could not prevent it from endorsing public ownership of the railways
he described the whole campaign with a fearless self-censure and
he described. Not only her look, but her exclamations and the brief
he did frighten me... You've seen the princess? Is it true she's in
he did not begin the engagement.
he did not say that the sun or the earth had a property of attraction;
he did. He alone could play on the clavichord that ecossaise (his only
he done so before he felt the bed rocking backwards and forwards
he drew the logs together.
he dwelt particularly on the word possible... "as po-o-ossible," he
he even felt the heat of the fire. Occasionally curly tongues of flame
he exclaimed, "the same spirit of freedom which actuated that people at
he experienced an indefinite feeling of shame and awkwardness. The
he feared a court-martial and was worried over the affair, which was
he feel dimly that the terribly tangled skein of life which previously
he felt afraid--afraid not for his life, but for the courage he needed
he felt himself to be. At the right beat of the music he looked
he felt that the battle of which he had brought tidings was far, far
he felt the impossibility of going to sleep on such a night. It was
he flung it on the ground.
he found a suitable spot overlooking the Salt Lake Valley. Returning to
he found old friends and associations, besides the comforts of life of
he found the Prussian army. Boris, speaking with deliberation, told
he gave the order for it and thought it was done as a result of that
he gave the signal for work by summoning Congress in a special session
he had a right to suppose so. And, in fact, the last letter he had
he had already gained a step on his old comrades of the Cadet Corps;
he had been able to retain the old prince's favor for twenty years had
he had been insulted through his daughter. The insult was the more
he had been to his captors; and in fact the guard of the second day
he had been told the common soldier prisoners were stationed. He
he had but recently left their regiment, rode up to the colonel. After
he had changed greatly during that period. In the expression of his
he had come because Moscow, the capital, was no more and only the army
he had come over because he had been slighted in the service: that
he had conferred on them, to build a new chantry to the church at
he had done to the things on the table. He flushed and went up to
he had galloped across the path of a wolf, Rostov gave rein to his
he had left the countess' apartments, he was sitting upstairs in a
he had left the room the general merriment stopped and the guests
he had never been so much in the grip of inevitable laws, which
he had never seen before, filled Napoleon with the rather envious
he had read thus far, he crumpled the letter up and threw it away.
he had read, and listened to what was passing in the nursery. Suddenly
he had seen the Emperor, but there was no one beyond the ditch now.
he had seen the body of Petya Rostov. That same day he had learned
he had spent the last few days and which was essential for the
he had till now gazed over men's heads, and gladly regarded the
he had to forgo that pleasure because he was already under the command
he had witnessed on the battlefield. The heaviness of his head and
he halted. Prince Andrew was behind, among the immense number
he heard some French spoken he at once began speaking to the officers,
he himself did not expect, Rostov felt for the letter in his pocket
he himself went to the nursery.
he in a frightened whisper when the sergeant major had passed on.
he involuntarily yielded to Nicholas' good humor. Toward the end of
he is poor now and I am rich.... Yes, that's the only reason....
he is really cleverer than all the others?" she asked herself, and
he is sensible, well educated, and good-natured, and the next he's a
he jumped down and, his boots scrunching the snow, ran back to his
he knew or a stranger, so unlike himself did the corporal seem at that
he knew well, both the appeal to the people and the news from the
he lay down on the leather sofa in front of a round table, put his big
he learned that Kutuzov's staff were not far off, in the village the
he looked at Ilyin talking to the girl. Following Dunyasha, Alpatych
he made himself when going into battle, and he was more amiable to the
he may come from the Northern or Southern states. A good waggon will
he mentioned him. On the day of Prince Vasili's arrival, Prince
he never can at any moment consider the whole import of an event
he not been hindered by anything on the way, his intention could not
he observed the proprieties of neutrality. At all events, Secretary Hay
he opened his mouth when one of the senators, a man without a tooth in
he ordered the commencement and conduct of the battle and thought it
he possesses: the feeling which causes a man to perform actions
he put those who did not take an active part in the affairs of the
he raised his arm and addressed the people, almost shouting:
he recalled Petya's words. And the Cossacks looked round in surprise
he received in Dresden, the diplomatic negotiations which, in the
he received the plan remarked that diversions planned over great
he refused to give direct aid to the Revolutionary cause.
he regretted that the lad should have heard him. He had, however, to
he remembered the words the Emperor Alexander had not written in his
he replaced the aloe with alfalfa, the mesquite with maize, the cactus
he returned from Sokolniki after the duel and had spent that first
he run into the redoubt before a thin, sallow-faced, perspiring man in
he said now his future depended--whether he would follow the same
he said that all bodies from the largest to the smallest have the
he said to me, "the chief duty of a true Mason, as I have told you,
he said to one of his adjutants, and then turned to the Duke of
he said: "They want the whole nation to fall on them." The sight of
he saw a closed door. Below, under the staircase, was a door leading
he saw for the first time peasant militiamen in their white shirts and
he saw rather short man. Having evidently come from the light into the
he saw that the carved garden fence was broken and branches of the
he saw, in the light of the dull autumn evening, mounted men coming
he says, 'did that deed, and I put the knife under your head while you
he showed to the soldiers by pressing nails into the walls of the hut;
he slighted them and plainly preferred the gypsy girls and French
he smelled the odor emanating from him which was now stronger than
he spent the night in our house and is going with us."
he stopped the rotary motion of the snuffbox, raised his head, and
he struck one of his small hands energetically with the other. "Yes, I
he sung a second, a third below the high note. "Ah, God! How fine! Did
he take bribes? That's the way he was brought up, and everybody does
he thought he heard a strange noise through the door. He was seized
he thought. The minister drew the remaining papers together,
he used every shred of his powerful influence. When the Republican
he was called, was as dominant as the planter had been in the old South.
he was connected with the great event foretold in the Apocalypse he
he was doing for his serfs, he would be vexed and reply: "Not in the
he was in attendance, to include him in the suite appointed for the
he was left alone, suddenly he came to himself and realized the
he was proud to be at the head of such a nation and would endeavor
he was with everyone in the regiment, and how satisfied his father was
he was worried by the question of what news Balashev had brought and
he waved aside those agitators who devoted themselves "to the supposed
he went quickly forward, missing the trodden path and stepping into
he went. The Emperor was following him, and Bennigsen had hastened
he were a corpse or a leper. The eldest princess paused in her reading
he were now to approach the gentlemen-in-waiting in that plight he
he whispered, "straight to the Lyadov uplands."
he wore a ring, he made the sign of the cross over him with a
he would be idolized, must betray his trust; the people have got their
he would enforce the law, saying with his frontier directness: "If a
he would have been mentioned among the officers found on the field
he would have ready and to drive her forty miles to the village of
he would have to play. Involuntarily he felt a joyful agitation at the
he would immediately overtake the enemy he had selected. That
he wrote to Livingston, the American minister in Paris, "works sorely on
he's crying. Well, good-by!" and she left the room.
he's going too. Besides, all the same I can't study now when..." Petya
he, breaking the silence and pointing to Natasha. "She looks after
he, going to the door and looking into the nursery.
he, looking at an officer who was entering the house the Emperor
he--the lover--assumed the role of the husband, as well as several
head and did not raise it again till the heavy coach, rumbling,
head disconsolately, told the driver to turn into the yard, and
head fall on the window sill.
head first to one side and then to the other watched the smokers
head higher, his eyes shone with the light of life, and with swift
head in the pillow, felt happy in the mere consciousness of life-
head means. That's the way, Count," said Berg, lighting his pipe and
head of armies, who formerly reflected the movement of the masses by
head of my beloved nobility and my good peasants and so use the last
head of the French column, with its officers leading, appeared from
head of the bed and around the candle beside him, the wick of which
head of the femur, and on the posterior and upper segment of the
head of the femur, the pus when it reaches the surface of the bone
head out of the carriage and staring at a tall, stout man in a
head thrown back. His curly hair, its color, and the shape of his head
head wrapped in the shawl was Morel, his orderly.
head, Pierre went down the corridor, trying to avoid making a noise or
head, or the belly of the muscle. Most interest attaches to rupture of
head, were lit up from both sides. Everyone crowded to the window, the
head. He was pleasantly considering the probability of being
head. I opened the book, and on all the pages there were excellent
head. It was evident that the cadet was liberal with his tips and that
head. The wounded soldier was so dirty, coarse, and revolting that his
head.... But all this confusion of tongues will go its way. The country
heading occur in association with diseases of the nervous system.
headlong to the horse. "Walk him up and down, my dear fellow," he
headlong up the stairs.
headquarters in the morning and had started the whole movement that
headquarters of the commander-in-chief, Kutuzov.
headquarters where he had dictated the dispositions in German, and
headquarters with a French guardsman he had captured. The prisoner
headquarters, and the commander in chief has to ask for a battalion to
heads of the departments when everybody has to pass examinations?"
heads of the men around him, when he should have merely looked in
headwaters of the Ohio--gradually turned the tide of trade from New
heal. There is itching but little pain, and the condition progresses
healed, the patient should wear in his boot a thick felt sole with a
healing finally takes place after the caseous tubercle has been
healing in the large defects of skin caused by severe burns; the
healing is promoted by cutting away diseased skin, removing the
healing over of the raw surface, and the new formation of fibrous
healing process may be modified. After primary union has taken place the
healing. Later in the conflict when the seasoned forces of France were
heals. The presence of a foreign body is often suggested by a mass of
health of our Sovereign, the Emperor!" he roared, "Hurrah!" and
health, but suddenly in the midst of its work it would turn to some
health. "Not 'our Sovereign, the Emperor,' as they say at official
health. The future is concerned with the local conditions, and,
healthy and vascular surface. The cavity thus formed is stuffed with
healthy body, and all the affection and care of his family. "And why
healthy muscle, and the contraction appears first at the closing of the
healthy, white, muscular flesh. The officer, Timokhin, with his red
hear more went to the door of the room opposite the innkeeper's, where
hear the folk tales one of the soldiers used to tell of an evening
heard Pierre talking to the corporal immediately asked what the
heard Russian words), others were eating bread; the more severely
heard at the front door, and the old nurse--knowing how to please
heard coming from the study. The prince walked in quickly and jauntily
heard hurried footsteps beyond the door, both halves of it were opened
heard in full cry, with that peculiar lift in the note that
heard in the crowd. "We are Russians and will not grudge our blood
heard in the ranks, and it ceased altogether every time the thud of
heard of the fertile lands awaiting their plows on the Pacific slope;
heard on all sides. The countess rose and went into the ballroom.
heard on the stairs, and the general, leaving him, went to the
heard over it. The chief risk is haemorrhage from injury or ulceration.
heard shouting: "Eyes front!" Then, like the crowing of cocks at
heard the question, did not reply, but lighting a short French pipe
heard the shouting of the French more loudly and distinctly. In the
heard the voice of an old maidservant saying, "Straight, straight,
heard the words as he might have heard the buzzing of a fly. Not
heard this news stifled all sympathy for the man they both liked.
heard, words of prayer, and the sobbing of the count's old valet.
heard. He said the people had been getting arms in the Kremlin, and
heard. Nobody drove through the streets and footsteps were rarely
heard. On the Arbat Square the troyka caught against a carriage;
heard. The Povarskaya was quite still and deserted. The huge courtyard
hearing from the highest quarters a confirmation of what they wanted
hearing him!" said the old prince, keeping hold of the hand and
hearing how the master talked, while the cleverest among them,
hearing the bells of the old prince's carriage approaching. Prince
hearing this the regimental commander hung his head, silently shrugged
hearing those words I said good-by to the holy folk and went."
hearing with pleasure the whistle of bullets evidently aimed at him.
heart I wish the Emperors may arrange the affair between them, and
heart against the senator who was introducing this set and narrow
heart and of one soul," we are told in the Acts describing the Church at
heart may continue to beat forcibly, the peripheral pulse is weak, and
heart of Sonya, who blushed and smiled unnaturally. In the midst of
heart was not in the mystical aspect of Freemasonry.
heart, "but it must be brought to a head. The day after tomorrow
heart, lungs, and liver, for example, the venous pressure may be so
heart, the latter being usually infected with micro-organisms.
heartfelt talk. It is impossible to go back to the same
heated debate over the action of the Supreme Court in permitting a
heated that winter and, as they had come only for a short time and the
heaven on the states in which it prevailed. Mason of Virginia, a
heavenly feeling. Boris was telling his new friend Pierre who the
heavier than were imposed upon freemen for the same offense. A free
heavily financed by the Mormons of Utah and also by the state
heavily in the North where huge accumulations made the rates of interest
heavily in the campaign in the Ohio Valley. He was a man of the soil,
heavily in the saddle with the lassitude of age, sat yawning wearily
heavily in the scale. American sailors scoured the seas searching for
heavily to his knees, bowed to the ground, and for a long time tried
heaviness of heart that they surrendered the last sign of Spain's
heavy borrowers of money in the North, they were generally in favor of
heavy dues and created a benefit system to hold men loyally to the
heavy fire; while the treatment accorded to China and the sections
heavy standard, he ran forward with full confidence that the whole
heed. In 1903 it enacted the Elkins law, forbidding railways to charge
heedless, genial nobleman of the old Russian type. His purse was
heels, the gentlemen and Mademoiselle Bourienne rose and the little
heiress through the death of the last of her brothers.
heirs on the decease of the owners. Roosevelt was an ardent champion of
held in the cities and banners bearing the inscription, "We want
held only six tumblers of water, but this made it all the pleasanter
held out his hand to him, and how they both retired into the pavilion.
held to be a son of the South and the West. Like Jackson he was a
held to the old practice. Popular election had become the final word.
held, which decided that the horses should be driven out into the
help and strengthen me that I may walk in Thy ways! Read the
help loving her as the one chosen by her brother, for whose
help negroes to flee. One negro woman, Harriet Tubman, "the Moses of her
help to get the other children up, telling him that I did not love
help, it meant no sudden change in the fortunes of war. The British
helped to bear fruit in the founding of Vassar College shortly after the
helped to train them for local self-government in matters political. The
helpless women and children"--a crime for which the leader had met a
helpless, dreading the slightest movement. From day to day fresh joints
helplessly on the sofa.
hemisphere an imperial power to offset the American republic.
her Christ"--he placed a sudden emphasis on the word her--"as a mother
her aid. "I have nothing to do with him and I only wanted to see the
her and again fixed her eyes on the corner of the stove. She had
her badge as maid of honor. The youthful little Princess
her bouquet and dropping his voice, he added, "You will be the
her brother a small, oval, antique, dark-faced icon of the Saviour
her brother's arm, led him into the sitting room, where they began
her childish promises and accept the offer," but before he had time to
her companions' not having the least conception that it could be
her completely. The count was not angry even when they told him that
her confess everything, and intercepting the note to Natasha she
her daughter in marriage to her lover, even now agitated the
her down that it would soon no longer be seen or noticed. The wound
her drawing room with her habitual skill. The large group, in which
her eight miles from Bogucharovo to where the road was occupied by our
her every joy. Besides, she had lost all the old interests of her
her eyes filling with tears, and then not for the first time the
her eyes fixed on the dark face of a large icon of the Saviour lit
her eyes, glancing at the sick man's hand and moving her lips as if to
her father had forgotten his son's letter on the drawing-room table;
her father's words. She was listening to the ceaseless moaning of
her father, and when the old prince was at home went to his study with
her father, pensively watching the lights of the street lamps
her first exercise she stood still in the middle of the room and
her for a long time and did not recall the past, but as Helene was
her for the sake of doing right, then let union with her have only a
her forgiveness, without knowing what for. From that day the eldest
her friend the pleasure of dandling the little angel--as she called
her geographical position, formed a part of the United States, that
her hair, got up, and went to the window, involuntarily inhaling the
her hand, he left the room with quick resolute strides, without
her handkerchief too. Pierre was kissed, and he kissed the beautiful
her hands. The countess was to wear a claret-colored velvet dress, and
her head (the pains had just left her). Strands of her black hair
her head toward the darkness of the open doorway.
her husband had gone with others to the cathedral, whence they were
her husband, and the whole household went on tiptoe when he was
her illness, and so the sound of her voice surprised and delighted
her improvised ball, and the Rostovs stayed on. Anatole asked
her in one clear and simple law--the law of love and self-sacrifice
her knees before the icons that had been left here and there hanging
her lap, turned her sparkling eyes swiftly from her husband to the
her lips to his cheek. But she stepped back immediately. All the force
her lovely head like a coronet) entered the room, calm and majestic,
her luminous eyes shone more brightly than usual from the tears of joy
her marble beauty forming a complete whole with her dress, but all the
her marriage wondered at the change in her as at something
her melancholy was just like the august melancholy she showed at the
her might to conceal it. And this was the very attitude that became
her mind was so full of the question why she alone was granted so
her mind: the idea occurred to her of jumping onto the edge of the box
her mistress--entered the room inaudibly but hurriedly and with a
her mother's side, passed through the crowd behind a liveried
her mouth to the other with her tongue.
her nails and spat a little for luck as she returned to the drawing
her naked shoulders. She did not give him the money, but let herself
her other children. The nearer the time came for Petya to return,
her own eyes she comforted the count, and decided that at dinner and
her own eyes--the look they had when she was not thinking of
her parents, the consideration of all that had caused the illness, her
her parish church--the Church of the Assumption built over the
her quietly and went to the door. Sonya went away by another door.
her reported, in their own way, the rumors current among the people of
her room hearing the sound of the peasants' voices that reached her
her rudenesses, and told good stories about her, while none the less
her satisfaction that the engagement had been broken off. Looking at
her size and habitual severity. The dance grew livelier and
her something, and the fact that her presence always increased his
her straightened out a turned-up corner of the carpet.) "And how
her that he had not forgotten the morning's talk, that his decision
her to find the way of truth, my dear sir, but have thrust her into an
her to send a letter by Alpatych to the Provincial Governor at
her velvety black eyes--she wrote that touching letter the arrival
her when they met. Just then Julie, who by the death of her brothers
her wish that Kuragin should be banished from Moscow. The whole
her, and so on--and these pictures of the future had given him
her, kissed it on the back and then on the palm, then again turned
her, shown special endearments to the companion and expressed his
her," said the old count.
her. "Do please just leave me alone!" And she ran out of the room,
her. A few minutes later the eldest sister came out with a pale hard
her. He was still lying on the bed as before, but the stern expression
her. She ran across the street, turned down a side street to the left,
her. The prayers to which she surrendered herself most of all were
her. The reawakened power of life that had seized Natasha was so
her. When they had last met on the old prince's name day, she had
her?" said the old prince angrily. "What an idea! I'm ready for it
here I've brought the prince's wedding candles to light before his
here and there, amid the sounds of falling drops and the munching of
here in the regiment with these gentlemen, and I consider that on us
here into the middle of the room and at the word of command, 'One,
here made the inquiries. The proclamation had passed through exactly
here!" thought Rostov, who had unconsciously returned to the house
here's the little shop where we used to buy gingerbread! Can't you
here? Don't you see the skirmishers are retreating? Lead the
hereditary, self-appointed, or elective, may justly be pronounced the
heretofore but have been taught by experience the danger of a leveling
heritage Thou gavest to us and to our fathers, and let not the scepter
hernia, lipoma, or cystic pouching of the great saphenous vein. It is
hernia; and when it occurs in the middle line of the face, head, or
herniated portion excised, and the rent in the sheath closed by sutures.
heroes of 1812--the Barclays, Raevskis, Ermolovs, Platovs, and
heroes were lifted into presidential possibilities. In the Far West a
heroes' will. But in the Crusades we already see an event occupying
heroes. But the hero of heroes was Prince Bagration, distinguished
hers, she could not scream like that--came from the bedroom. Prince
herself Anna Makarovna used to knit at the same time on the same
herself all the difficult work of directing the storing and packing of
herself and, as it might seem, of the obligations to her he had
herself back on the sofa.
herself disinterestedly at the head of an alliance having for its
herself for it; but when her youngest: the scapegrace who had been bad
herself in the hall facing an elderly woman of Oriental type, who came
herself in the middle of a small room containing baggage. Another man-
herself in the third person, and imagining it was some very wise
herself on her bed, laughed at the pleasant thought that she would
herself trying on the new dresses. Just as she had put on a bodice
herself up head and all, and now peeping at her mother. The countess
herself with the thought that no one would ever know it and that she
herself, and stepped cautiously on the cold and dirty floor with her
herself, tears choked her: tears of remorse, tears at the recollection
hesitating until the bombardment of Fort Sumter forced a conclusion,
hesitation which decided the fate of battles was evidently culminating
hesitation, rapidly threw off his uniform and put on the shirt. He had
hid her face still deeper in the bed. Natasha wept, sitting on the
hid in the shadow of the wall. Pausing for a moment, Pierre noticed
hid the brilliant moonlight, but as soon as they were past the
hid themselves in the forest by night, making their way round as
hidden from mankind. What was accomplished with the help of French
hide the terrible news from her till after her confinement, which
hideous deformities (Fig. 103). The patient may succumb to haemorrhage or
hides, iron, lumber, and pearl ashes. This was not all. The colonies
hieroglyph," said the Rhetor, "is an emblem of something not
high and graceful action, as if flying through the air without
high as ever. The division into two irreconcilable factions was
high import, but the crowning act of nationalism was the fourteenth
high in the mountains; and of how, in the conquered and submissive soil,
high posts, civil or military, under the federal government, were still
high rank. The development of Southern timber resources was in every
high royal prerogative, said of George: "The young king was a born
high springs creaked, and the body of the coach swayed. The footman
high time," she said, giving Natasha a significant look. "The old
high-pitched voice struck him unpleasantly, and the incessant laughter
higher and higher and trembled with the effort. The bottle was
higher temperatures for its cultivation than the tubercle bacillus, and
higher than that of the colony, foreshadowing a day when the
higher than the Constitution, the Constitution itself has been
higher up the hill to the right in the courtyard of the farm, as he
higher; and the patient begins to take notice of his surroundings. The
highest abstraction, the welfare and civilization of humanity in
highest degree embarrassing for the Russians, as the most adroit
highest degree just the very qualities Pierre lacked, and which
highest happiness. Here and now for the first time he fully
highest pitch at this fifth murder. Like the others this fifth man
highest point. "It's in charge of the queer fellow we saw without
highest rates yet laid in the history of American imposts was prepared
highly delighted with what he saw and experienced in the army, but
highly sensitive papillae of the skin are exposed. Unna has found that
hill again, passing the militiamen.
hill into the town, the cocks were already crowing. Pierre went on
hill to the Red Square where some instinct told them they could easily
hill with its singers, surrounded Pierre's carriage and blocked the
him a deed to sign for the princess' benefit.
him about Paris and about some changes he meant to make the Empress'
him across the steppes of the East. All his loquacity was suddenly
him an audience. The Emperor Francis received him standing in the
him and Dolokhov saw through the gloom that Petya was bending toward
him and at him, about some pair of boots he had thrown into the
him and evoked his sympathy. In men Rostov could not bear to see the
him and shot him in the fleshy part of the back. That wound (which
him and stretched out, and the strange face was before him. Prince
him and the prostrate adjutant, near a wormwood plant between the
him as the cause of the Emperor's anxiety. That day Prince Vasili no
him as they crossed the Virgin's Field.
him back again and pressed him against the railings, and all he
him beside the fair Helene and listened to the general conversation.
him by such shouting, but the shouting which accompanied him
him by the bearer of the letter.
him during the campaign, he forgot and forgave. When in April, 1865, he
him for heroic deeds, and while dying he expressed the love his
him formally.) "Though I don't agree with the gentleman..." (he
him from his father and the neighbors. Throughout the whole province
him from the ranks of obscure officers and offer him the first step to
him he paced briskly from corner to corner of the room, looking
him if there is a lack of bread, to move farther into the interior
him in the accounts that the serfs' payments had been diminished by
him in the determination to rule as well as reign, to subdue all
him in the vestibule and tried to take the pistol from him. Pierre,
him intelligible and says: "This is the cause!" In historical events
him into the garden.
him into the wing and put him in the room that had been Madame
him like a child. Her smile for him was the same as for everybody, but
him not in the least abashed.
him now, when my heart fails me and my mouth feels dry at the mere
him now. That search for the aim of life had not merely disappeared
him of what was quite true; he had been indebted to her father for the
him on the shoulder and left the room without snuffing the candles
him or anyone else, and I don't want anything of the kind."
him pacing angrily about and snorting. The old prince felt as though
him reported. The cause of this indisposition was the strong
him since he was so high." She held her hand a couple of feet from the
him tender and amused as he was when he put on the little icon. "Did
him that he now protected himself from the danger of its repetition,
him the closer bound he involuntarily became to the order. When he had
him the exercise book containing geometrical figures.
him the letter and to let me know how he looks at the whole matter and
him the tramp of the horses of his deployed squadron, rode at full
him the way!" she cried to the maid, angrily opening her mouth and
him the wood where the wolf would certainly escape should she reach
him through a rift in the clouds. The next day he was brought into court
him to attend to the business himself and so he disliked it and only
him to be. The ex-Minister Stein was there because his advice was
him to come. There were other guests and the countess talked little to
him to see Her Majesty. The archduchess also wished to see him. He did
him to stop. The lunatic's solemn, gloomy face was thin and yellow,
him to take part in the Austrian campaign and the reasons why he had
him to the devil, I'm busy!" he shouted to Lavrushka, who went up to
him to the island of St. Helena. And the exile, separated from the
him two candles and the manuscript begged him to begin. Everyone
him was a clear blue sky, and the sun's vast orb quivered like a
him was the autumn sowing where the ground was soft. The two borzois
him when he opened the door, but when, turning quickly, she saw his
him with a contemptuous smile, waiting for the valet to go.
him with a scared look and that Princess Mary was no longer by the
him with nearly their former strength. For Denisov, too, the
him with surprise and even alarm as they went past him. The senior
him with the others. Again someone shouted, "Stretchers!" Four men
him with the whole expression of her face, radiant with gratitude
him with the words she always used when Pierre or her son returned
him!" said the valet.
him). The baby Prince Nicholas lived with his wet nurse and nurse
him, 'Who gave it you?' And the point is that we knew whom he had it
him, Princess Mary imagined the words he would say to her and what she
him, and closed the door himself behind him.
him, and could not say with certainty whether the attack had been
him, and opened the door into the part of the hut where Prince
him, and summoned Lelorgne d'Ideville, the interpreter.
him, and taking him by the hand led him forward. The hairs tied in the
him, and the officers collected round to greet the new arrival, Rostov
him, as a regimental commander, close up to one of the tents and there
him, as having, when wounded in the right hand, taken his sword in the
him, at any rate he took his stand at the post, waiting to be
him, began to tell him of the young Count Kamensky's campaign, the old
him, but in his usual impulsive and hearty way he took Boris by the
him, but when close to the hare's scut paused as if measuring the
him, frowned, and left the room with an expression of cold dignity.
him, peremptorily requested him to remain there, to move on with the
him, pointing at Rostov, who noticed that the old man wanted to
him, spellbound by beauty. It was the same panorama he had admired
him, stretched himself to the utmost and, watching the wolf,
him, the same shall be a law, in like manner as if he had signed it,
him, they heard, as Napoleon had anticipated, the rapturous cries of
him, transient as they were, have been one of the sweetest comforts to
him, tried with his lips whether the child was still feverish. The
him, was drinking on the sly what was left in the glasses. From the
him," said the wit Shinshin, parodying the words of Voltaire.
him--Rostov. Then he imagined how, after the attack, Bogdanich would
him. And strange to say, the Governor of Moscow, the proud Count
him. And the closer he looked the more tranquil and happy he became.
him. At the same time he felt that the deeper the ground sank under
him. But he fingered the money in his pocket and wondered whether it
him. But if you want to ride round the position, come along with us.
him. He had been engrossed by the same thoughts ever since the day
him. He opened the door softly and saw her, in the lilac dress she had
him. He regarded the whole business of the war not with his
him. His position was the more difficult because with his salary of
him. In the yard, at the gates, at the window of the wings, wounded
him. She had noticed with what dissatisfaction he turned from the look
him. She wished to help him, to bestow on him the superabundance of
him. The soldiers lifted the canteen lids to their lips with
him. Then, excusing herself, she went to the door of the old
him. There was warm blood under his arm. "No, I am wounded and the
him. When they brought his son to him, he pressed his lips to the
him." The mere thought of her father's look filled her with terror.
him.... The milk's come.... But I'm sorry to leave you."
him; she led him to the house, offered him lunch, and sat down with
himself after being wounded and the flower of eternal, unfettered love
himself and insult Alexander--just what he had least desired at the
himself and was leading him from the room.
himself as a living being by the fact that he wills, that is, is
himself as tenderly as he could and ran with her through the garden
himself at any moment face to face with the Emperor and being put to
himself before the icon. All the others did the same. Then the count
himself but the best man in the world and free, he would ask on his
himself could have foreseen how the separation from her lover would
himself entering the French service. The captain was happy, the
himself falling asleep, but suddenly, almost with the distinctness
himself for the hundredth time. He took a pack of cards that lay on
himself had driven round by side streets to the other side of Moscow.
himself he rose from the table. "One does get tired sitting so
himself in a leading position among the Petersburg Freemasons. He
himself in the midst of his army, it was clear that there was
himself in this way, the study door opened and on the threshold
himself now to the force of circumstances and to those who were
himself of permission given him by the Emperor to discuss the
himself of, but had also convinced the sovereign Emperors of.
himself or paid into the war office a sum, not exceeding three hundred
himself pushed it a few inches from the corner and then closer in
himself take part in the conversations or express any opinion. After
himself the best post he could--preferably that of adjutant to some
himself the gloomy mood which alone enabled him to endure his
himself the whole responsibility for what is happening and has to
himself to be at the head of a movement that had already become
himself to be guiding. Ever since the enemy's entry into Smolensk he
himself to blame since what generally happens to the narrators of
himself to do what was for him the most difficult thing in life--to
himself to the fire. From pain, cold, and damp, a feverish shivering
himself to the ground to avoid being knocked over, and a riderless
himself to the idea that he was one of those same retired Moscow
himself was pining for the dear princess, and how she showed him the
himself were the joyful and comforting thoughts, memories, and
himself, "the man who advised the Drissa camp--I see no alternative
himself, Nicholas arrived at the governor's rather late, but with
himself, he first sat down on the sofa in an attitude of despair, then
himself, into "one body politic and corporate," known as the "Trustees
himself, recall and reconsider the meaning of everything Pierre had
himself, stepped back to get a good run, and plunged into the water;
himself. "Come in, come in!" he added to the princess.
himself. Even when the credit or installment feature was abolished in
himself. He got up from his chair and went to the door.
himself. I am called in to help sort the letters and take those
himself. The commander in chief never takes direct part in the
himself. The harder his position became and the more terrible the
himself. The process in his mind went on tormenting him without
himself; nor that of the Cossack who wanted more booty than he got,
hinder the young people who came to her house from passing the time
hindered her from following the details of her husband's plans,
hindered that abstraction. But as it is in no way proved that the
hinders the reparative process. Bruised or lacerated skin heals less
hinges, a smile appeared on the face with the attentive eyes, and from
hinted that in a forthcoming decision the Supreme Court would settle one
hints and expectations to the contrary which were current then but
hip flexed to a right angle, and then gradually extending the knee until
hip; it may result from effusion into the joint and stretching of the
his Dron on the day of the prince's funeral and told him to have
his Moscow house and the country house on his Moscow estate, which had
his Secretary and to make the fateful choice.
his advice about Petya's education or Nicholas' service. The old
his affairs, and while looking with pleasure at the enormous table
his apron while a patient is being strapped to the operating table.
his arched back spattered with mud and clanking the ring of his leash,
his arm above the elbow--as from the shock to his horse and from
his arms behind him, long paced the room, now frowning, now smiling,
his arms, he went forward uneasily over the rough field with the
his art, ridiculed and excoriated bondage in the South. Those
his assistants may wear sterilised cotton caps. To obviate the risk of
his back against the wall, his eyes fixed on a burning candle, and
his back and now his plump hairy chest to the brush with which his
his bald head he looked good-naturedly at the officer and the
his betrothed had broken faith with him--which he felt the more
his blunders at Krasnoe and the Berezina he deprived the Russian
his bony fingers. "What is the difficulty? Nonsense, childishness!"
his bosom and solemnly pointing to the floor at Dron's feet. "I can
his broad forehead. His plump white neck stood out sharply above the
his bulky body so as not to slip out of the ramshackle old vehicle,
his chair and pacing up and down the room followed by Tikhon, who
his chest, his tail extended, Bedouin, as if also conscious of the
his clear, insolent eyes in the general's face.
his club were one of the greatest pleasures of both mother, and
his companion and said something, pointing to his mouth. The
his considering the long journey too hard and too dangerous for her
his course and launched the country into the war by sending to Congress
his cowshed and Rostov going to the cottage he occupied with Denisov.
his daughter and give her to a husband. The prince never directly
his daughter) to give the future sisters-in-law an opportunity to talk
his deception. He would make that foxy old courtier feel that the
his departure for the army. To be in Anna Pavlovna's drawing room he
his departure from that city, while walking through the streets with
his desk, busy with his will, I expect." (One of the prince's favorite
his dignity to traffic and huckster with politicians over the trifling
his diminished income. The burning of Moscow had cost him, according
his dirty fingers. The sleeve of his coat kept slipping down and he
his disdain for the comforts of life, his absent-mindedness and
his dismissal from headquarters Zherkov had not remained in the
his dispatches and reports up to the time of his death. He alone
his division to the decisive point, and gains the victory alone.
his due. I always wonder at the way rumors fly from Petersburg to
his education, his early liberalism, the advisers who surrounded
his elbow in a broken-down shed in the village of Knyazkovo at the
his elbow with the aid of a pair of scissors, and that in another the
his elbows on the table, thinking always of the same terrible
his elderly hosts and by the more important of the visitors (the old
his entire administration profoundly disturbed the business and finances
his every action depends on his organization, his character, and the
his exactions, and that the pupils' parents wept at having to let
his excellency have the courier horses. It was plain that he was lying
his eye. But Rostopchin did not look at him. A vein in the young man's
his eyes and at the same instant plumped into something. Some
his eyes off the French.
his eyes. "Can they be French?" He looked at the approaching
his eyes. He really was in love with the Tsar and the glory of the
his face assumed the coarse, unpleasant expression peculiar to him.
his face he felt that the man continually glanced at him. On growing
his face in the mirror.
his face under his gray mustaches, especially as the song grew brisker
his face, besides the look of joyful emotion it had worn yesterday
his face. As soon as Prince Andrew opened his eyes, the doctor bent
his family and to the city entrusted to him, and of himself--not
his famous tracts, _The Rights of Man_, which was given to the American
his father dismissed the abbe and said to the young man, "Now go to
his father had visitors from Petersburg, the very vortex of life,
his father to be a connection of Prince Vasili's. The elderly lady who
his father, and even his comfortable bed in the house on the
his father, now with the Swiss tutor Dessalles, and showing an
his feelings for the Emperor not everyone could understand, and with
his feet off the sofa.
his feet toward the fire.
his feet were bare. The other, whose appearance particularly struck
his felt coat, stretched his legs, and set his cap straight. The
his final conclusions in the form of commands. Having listened to a
his finger while operating for cancer, or by the deliberate introduction
his first message, reviving the old custom of Washington and Adams. Then
his fist, and tapped it on the floor, making the sparks fly, while
his free hand to balance himself. One of the footmen who had stooped
his full height without the smallest effort, his ease contrasting with
his full uniform and prepared to visit the commander in chief. His
his fur coat said that the mistress asked him to come to her bedroom.
his generals, and while awaiting the Emperor's arrival led a
his gestures, that Pierre, unconsciously smiling in response to the
his glance. He spoke a few words to some of the generals, and,
his glass flung it on the floor.
his group at the height of the guerrilla enthusiasm. Since early
his hair he began to pace the room.
his hand at the salute and resuming the game of adjutant and general
his hand over the thin grizzled strands of hair combed back across his
his hand. A single report of a signaling gun followed, and the troops,
his hands to the musicians and shouted up to their gallery, addressing
his hands were folded," she concluded, convincing herself that the
his hands; the ammunition wagons he had been approaching no longer
his head and another his throne, a tyrant's device which placed the
his head, pulled it off, and showed the blood congealed on his hair.
his head, with a shrewd though angry expression, standing near the
his head. "And the French shall too, believe me," he went on,
his health, and to reminiscences of the gay and amusing times he had
his heart ever more cruelly and painfully to the end of his life. He
his heels, held his hands to the blaze, and turned away his face.
his high office only two years when he laid down for the first time in
his horse keep pace with the company.
his horse which would not stand still, then he rode out of the yard at
his horse, but from behind still came the shouts: "Onto the ice, why
his horse, galloped to the regiment under a hail of bullets which fell
his horse, gave the word of command, and immediately, hearing behind
his horse, with his hand on the saddle, the Emperor turned to the
his hussar revels and life in the fighting line, the other of the
his illness, until the fat is eliminated from the blood vessels.
his instinct urged him on. Before the officer finished his sentence
his knee with the palm of his hand.
his knowledge of the right time to sow the oats, and the fact that
his labors more than to any other influence. Within the League thus
his leg. Perhaps at another time Denisov would not have left the
his lifted knees and fixed his eyes on Pierre. The latter was
his line, and (on the Russian side) as to luring the enemy into the
his lips. Then he took his place in the first row of the stalls and
his little feet in low shoes, Iogel flew first across the hall with
his looks and manner gave that impression. The princess felt this, and
his lying up in bed, the healing of the ulcer is much delayed. He should
his magnanimity, and having written a letter to the Emperor
his manners with the strict formality of his house. At that moment the
his marshals, kept galloping up to Napoleon with reports of the
his marshals, or such plans to the Russian commanders. All the facts
his master's thoughts. He guessed that the question referred to Prince
his mastery of the English language but also to his mastery of all those
his men and officers. In the regiment they called him "our prince,"
his militant message of April 11, 1898. Without making public the last
his mind. Recalling the moment at the ambulance station when he had
his ministers were at last convinced that the hour had come to aid the
his mission. The queen, Marie Antoinette, fated to lose her head in a
his mistake at once. "Now, is it suitable that Count Kutuzov, the
his moments of cruelty, as when tying the policeman to the bear and
his most poetic recollection. But he went with the firm intention of
his mouth and winking at the count.
his name, his nationality would also be given in the answer. So he
his name; and Sam Houston, warrior and pioneer, rushed to the aid of
his neck. On his right sat the Italian abbe whom Pierre had met at
his nephew, General Chatrov an old war comrade of the prince's, and of
his own about the facts he was recounting. For some time he
his own heart from vice, and indulgently to smooth with it the heart
his own ideas tonight, but must yield himself up entirely to the
his own impotence was gained by the Russians at Borodino. The French
his own legs, occasionally glancing at the door of the adjoining hut
his own place, as he had felt under the parental roof. But here was
his own regiment, but the whole brigade--gave Rostov a dinner to which
his own weight and, turning to look at the hussars starting in the
his own will--the inevitable course of events, and he can see them and
his personal character. Perhaps never in the history of political
his pipe in the middle of his mouth and with red lips gently inhaled
his pipe, now for the first time recognized the old Natasha. A flood
his power to select the most foolish and ruinous of all the courses
his presence Napoleon happened to fall into one of the fainting fits
his previous resolutions, as a lover forgets in the presence of his
his proposal and Sonya's refusal and felt uncomfortable at the thought
his prosperity and his enjoyment of life upon close relations with the
his purpose, for his stomach will not digest the two dinners.
his quarters at Mikhaylovna on the Smolensk road:
his r's, and pronouncing the Latin words with a French accent.
his ranks are filling with men who work for wages rather than for the
his reins, settled himself in the saddle, and, feeling that he was
his retreat fled in the opposite direction.
his rising. "This unfortunate fete at the ambassador's deprives me
his room to write to his father, to whom he wrote every day. In the
his shoulders. Only once, after the affair of the Berezina, did he get
his shriveled head, and in a corner of the room sat a chanter
his soldiers and behind the outposts and told him that his wish to
his son, however, he employed the diplomacy he reserved for
his son, sat at the table writing. He glanced round.
his stand, and there's Zakhar himself and still the same horse! And
his stature, saw over the heads of the others what so attracted
his suite, and in the smoke that suddenly surrounded the gun they
his suite, with Pierre among them, set out on their ride along the
his talk while giving orders to the steward, and at last stopped,
his tent on the hill, they threw up their caps and shouted: "Vive
his term, President Taft had to face the tariff issue. He had met it in
his thin neck filled with blood and the color rapidly came and went in
his throat when the door opened and Lavrushka came in with some
his toes toward the general. The captain's face showed the
his too, again pressed Pierre's hand, and leaned his elbows on the
his track. Anatole Kuragin promptly obtained an appointment from the
his uncomfortable habits was to blame for the condition of the
his usual jokes, but noticing that what he was saying redounded to the
his vanguard, driving off the Cossacks, crossed the Russian
his view, to show the Austrian general the wretched state in which the
his views regardless of anybody. All the benefit he might derive
his waist. The nearest soldiers shrank back, the gun driver stopped
his was lit up by the fire and the soldiers looked at him in silence.
his way forward and approached that very captain who as the corporal
his way, being only two miles off the Smolensk highroad. During the
his weary eyes on the paper, began to read them with a fixed and
his whole being. Rapidly leaping the furrows, he fled across the field
his whole body as if in that position he hoped to hasten the speed
his whole soul he shared the adoration then common in Moscow for the
his wife should expect him not to forget to procure all the things
his will might have saved Russia, and consequently the valet who
his will that his own slaves should be set free after the death of his
his will. He is as right as other historians who look for the
his works had gone forth. The response came, giving Lincoln 2,200,000
his wraps with the aid of his servant, and not looking at Pierre. With
his young grandson. The first George, the son of the Elector of Hanover
his youngest boy, had all settled down in the drawing room and were
his. And he understood this not merely from the attitude of the court.
historian Lecky: "The conduct of England in hiring German mercenaries to
historian has said: "The enterprising merchants of New England developed
historian will prove that the National Convention, the Directory,
historian, Rhodes, "four-fifths of the British House of Lords and most
historians (to the effect that Kutuzov hindered an attack) is
historians as has been devoted to describing the actions of various
historians as to why the crisis came at last, he can clarify his
historians dealing with the matter have written the history of the
historians describe the affair as follows:
historians have supposed, but by the activity of all the people who
historians of culture to be the cause or expression of the whole
historians relate) the aim of the Russians was to stop the French,
historians say that power rests on a conditional delegation of the
historians select the indication of intellectual activity and say that
historians studying the events from the letters of the sovereigns
historians who assume that the collective will of the people is
historians who have described the event.
historians, we shall have the history of monarchs and writers, but not
historians, who attributed the actions of the mass to the will of
historic characters and perceive the cause of the effect they
historic leaders but in the nations themselves, what significance have
historic leaders. Popes, kings, and knights incited the peoples to
historical characters (that is, re-establish the inevitable
historical movement is hard to understand. Only the following
historical texts are only enlarged editions of the first text--more
histories of separate states to the writers of general histories and
history and is seldom read. It is the part laying down a new basis for
history and progress of the swelling and by the absence of fluctuation.
history has not done this. Having in theory rejected the view held
history now, the whole difference of opinion is based on the
history of each colony, using Elson, _History of the United States_, pp.
history of self-sacrifice and a present consciousness of the future
history of the Godfreys and the Minnesingers can evidently not cover
history of the events.
history of the swelling and by physical examination. Cystic tumours and
history of these gifts and their relation to the political leaders that
history only an expression for the unknown remainder of what we know
history reasonably, the more unreasonable and incomprehensible do they
history so far as they can slay and bury it--of their country." In the
history tells us, the expression of that will is independent of time
history were the most enslaved and involuntary.
history, especially in relation to the politics of each period.
history, has the inconvenience--in application to complex and stormy
history. But to arrive at these laws, resulting from the sum of all
history: to say that the field of battle at Borodino remained in the
hit him in the throat or mouth. Another was walking sturdily by
hitherto been inactive, would also soon have to meet the enemy.
hitherto occupied...." So also it closed: "Such has been the patient
hitherto with the surgery of the Extremities, including Fractures and
hitting the first man who came in his way a swinging blow on the back.
hitting the table with the fist of his newly bled arm so violently
hoarfrost, the distance and the river, all began to sparkle in the
hoarse sound. Anna Mikhaylovna looked attentively at the sick man's
hoarseness. The _tongue_ often presents a combination of lesions,
hold a pair of compasses to his left breast with the other hand and to
hold of, were standing in the road beside a long row of unharnessed
hold the limb during the operation.
hold their position till reserves from the center come up. In that
holders of idle capital and the toiling millions. Then he named those
holders of the old paper should be issued new bonds drawing interest at
holding a cigar between the thumb and little finger of one of his
holding an end of it in each hand, went out into the street.
holding him under the arm with one hand while warding off the pressure
holding his elbows high arranged the reins deliberately. Anatole and
holding his nose as he ran past the men at work.
holding the horses near the window, Prince Andrew felt that
holding the reins he waved both his arms about rapidly and
holding the snuffbox in his hand but not taking any. After the cry
holding up his saber, his spurs jingling, he ran up the steps of the
holding up the folds of her dress, and the smile shone still more
holding up their dresses, jumped out quickly. The count got out helped
hole cut out opposite the situation of the cicatrix. When a joint has
hollow between the trochanter and the ischial tuberosity, and where the
hollow that lay between them and the fleches. As soon as they had
home in Moscow. When he saw the first hussar with the unbuttoned
home world. His father and mother were much the same, only a little
home," said the valet.
home-seekers had reached the crest of the Alleghanies."
homes and did not mention the subject of political rights. All these
homes in the United States. Far and wide they scattered, from the mills
homes of obnoxious Unionists were burned down; the residence of the
homes sometimes brought softer manners; but the equality of life and the
homes to the factories. Then arose many questions: the hours of labor,
homestead act of 1862 and the contract immigration law of 1864. Not
homestead bill through the House of Representatives only to have it
homesteaders and land companies came and fenced in the plain and desert
homesteads from the public lands, which tended to overbalance the South
homesteads, the builders of states.
honest, that's the chief thing. I'll be sure to send it to you. Or
honestly the whole truth: what sort of girl is she, and what do you
honey flew into the hive, and they flew out empty; now they fly out
honeymoons, and that the greatest happiness is at first! On the
honor of being presented to the Duke. Prince Bolkonski glanced at
honor of knowing, I suppose that the nobility have been summoned not
honor sees," said Gerasim. "Will you step into the study?" Pierre
honor... Eh! Call the next one! Who else is there?" he shouted, bowing
honor.... O! ye that love mankind! Ye that dare oppose not only the
honorable opponent") "with the gentleman... whom I have not the
honors, but everyone knew of the imperial dissatisfaction with him.
hood of the doctor's cart, from under the apron of which his feet were
hood, and was quite covered by an apron. On the box beside the
hoofs and the jingle of their weapons and saw their horses, their
hoofs and wheels and now and then a gleam of bayonets; to the left
hoofs, and apparently ready to jump over the railings had his rider
hoofs, and bells was heard from the gateway as a little trap passed
hop, looked back angrily, and through the ominous silence and the
hope that was also new to the princess.
hope, was the first to catch his eye. He sent him.
hoped to confine the conflict to the realm of opinion. They constantly
hoped, in vain, to carry the Confederacy up to the Ohio River; and, with
hopeless, for at every mention of the young Countess Rostova the old
hopelessly. At the count's first words he raised it slowly and
hopelessness at her reflection in the glass. "She flatters me,"
hopes and desires. And the impulses felt by a single person are always
hoping to drive the British out of Gibraltar, once more joined the
hordes of our large cities on the level with the virtuous and good man?"
horizon bounded by the adjacent wood. Prince Bagration ordered two
horizon! The long bleak winters of Wisconsin--California of endless
horizontally round the head, or by ligation of the feeding trunks. In
horn grows from a warty papilloma of the skin. _Cicatrix_ horns are
horned snakes of Africa, the viper of Europe, and the adder of the
horrified at her own vileness, horrified that the former purity of her
horrified at the thought of the order he had to issue. But something
horror and detestation of his crimes, now recognize his authority, the
horror at the extinction of life there is a severance, a spiritual
horror into Princess Mary's heart as the tone of his voice.
horrors that occurred did not stagger his soul. He boldly took the
horse despite its game leg--had the happy air of a schoolboy called up
horse fell in among the hussars. Nearly all the French dragoons were
horse the rein and galloped along the line. At first he rode along the
horse, and vanished into the darkness.
horse, galloped ahead of the soldiers where there was a free space.
horse, having galloped up to a campfire that was smoldering in the
horse-shoe margin, while the central portion may heal and leave a scar.
horse. Again the crowd of members of the suite and street gazers
horsecloths, and the like. All this had to be dealt with, the
horseman now somewhat stiff in the saddle. Chekmar held in leash three
horsemen could be descried. The officers said that either Napoleon
horsemen were passing that morning, then into the distance across
horsemen. Pierre also looked at them, trying to guess which of the
horses and fifteen grooms in the stables, the same expensive
horses available: some horses were carting for the government,
horses beside them were discernible, and in the hollow the dying
horses driven by Zakhar could be clearly seen against the white
horses fly! Gracious me, they did rattle past! It's time I knew the
horses ready for the general?" he added, with a slight inclination
horses showered the fine dry snow on the faces of those in the sleigh-
horses than the money he had from them would buy. But he liked them;
horses to gallop--the other sleighs followed. The shaft horse swung
horses to make them turn and move on. The horses moved off the bank.
horses' feet at the wolf.
horses, being drenched by the rain, all looked black whether
horses. A third section scattered through the village arranging
horses. Blood was gushing from its leg as from a spring. Among the
horses. Rostov could already see their faces and heard the command:
hospitable in Moscow. In addition to the formal evening and dinner
hospital dressing gowns. The first person Rostov met in the
hospital. This was Speranski, Secretary of State, reporter to the
hospitals and schools and reduced the quitrent the peasants had to
hospitals, asylums, and schools were to be established on all the
hospitals. The one and the other may serve as a pastime. But what's
hospitals. When spring came on, the soldiers found a plant just
host also followed Natasha with his eyes and asked the count which was
host and hostess look toward the door, and now and then glance at
host had said when inviting him. The prospect of that dinner in the
hostess. Looking at her she may have recalled the golden,
hostile to Napoleon, which had been sent to all the European courts.
hostile to him; tell of the influence some of these people had on
hostility but yet with respect, in the guardhouse to which he was
hostility to the masters of industry, a sign of bitterness that excited
hot rays of the sun beat down vertically and a fresh soft wind
hot-bottles. All lotions used must be warm (100 o F.); and the operation
hotly attacked the bank on the ground that Congress had no power
hour alone with the dying man, passed out, slightly acknowledging
hours after an operation or injury. It may be due to the increase in the
hours each day. To support the distended vessels, a closely woven silk
hours in monkeys. He recommends the adoption of this procedure in the
hours in the day during which the private and intimate life of the
hours the chance of eliminating sepsis is good; with every succeeding
hours the patient is conscious of a sensation of chilliness, or may
hours twice daily; it can be worn while the patient is following his
hours, the _reaction_, as it is called, being often ushered in by
hours, the minute vessels in the vicinity of the wound dilate, and from
hours. For the old workshop where a master and a dozen workmen and
hours. When he is unable to swallow, it should be given by the rectum.
house dress as fresh and elegant as the other. Prince Andrew rose
house in his uniform wearing all his orders and go down the garden
house lay behind a newly dug pond filled with water to the brink and
house of moderate size, situated on the very banks of the river.
house or to the place of execution his companions had pointed out to
house to the carriages, the caleche, the phaeton, and back again.
house was brilliant with lights shining through its lofty windows. The
house where such things could be said, and was at the same time
house where the prisoners were. This officer, probably someone on
house which had remained intact between the Russian and French forces.
house with Prince Bagration and Weyrother. Weyrother was the
house, and the allowance to the three princesses; about 15,000 was
house, by the evening they had talked over everything and the
house, informed him that the princess had gone to her own
house, on hearing of the arrival of the letter went softly into the
house, warehouse, shop, cellar, or other place in the British colonies
house, where he had not been for a long time past. He went up to the
house, you know, and danced with the children. Be sure to invite
house. It was now, however, impossible to get back the way he had
house; he laid before it the projects of law desired by the crown; and
household band were replaced by the clatter of knives and forks, the
household phrase in the Old World as in the New.
household, surprising the prefect by his memory of minute details
households at work in Bogucharovo and the peasants were well to do.
houses and half their belongings, did so from the latent patriotism
houses of Congress and ratification by three-fourths of the states. This
houses of Kansas City as well as Chicago. The waters of the Northwest
houses of the tufts in the plowed ground, or plaited baskets from
houses of the villages on both sides of the river, over a radius of
houses with axes, the women hawkers, and the shopkeepers, all looked
houses without a division, the entry "unanimous" being made upon their
how "the son has sacrificed himself for his mother," as people were
how a total force of five hundred thousand men was to attack the
how and where to haul it. They haul the log away, and it happens
how close was the bond that united him to Denisov and and the whole
how hard it was for me to see her again. I have settled on the upper
how he could ever even have doubted the necessity of taking an
how he could find it out before others. In the figure in which he
how her head had cracked right across the skull. Having said this he
how in the West they were the forerunners of civilization, the makers of
how in wartime the company commander might get killed and he, as
how joyful it seemed, that her son, the scarcely perceptible motion of
how long she had been there when she was aroused by the sound of a
how man's consciousness of freedom is to be reconciled with the law of
how many years Mr. Conkling was the supreme ruler in this state. The
how readily in such cases they omit all that makes for the contrary.
how the file may be used.  You can also find out about how to make a
how the file may be used.  You can also find out about how to make a
how the prince had received the Rostovs, pretended not to notice how
how the workman suddenly sank down on the cords that held him, how
how they carried to the pioneer the comforts of civilization; nor yet
how they standardized the whole country, giving to cities on the
how they suited the young ladies, and she thanked them all for
how this bit of boastful patriotism slipped out at the end.
how to approach the Emperor, and a thousand reasons occurred to him
how, muddying his back, he rolled over with the hare. A ring of
however dirty it might be, and he glanced round at the pool from
however small the units it takes, we feel that to take any unit
however, and especially if there is mixed infection, the health suffers,
however, are not always so characteristic as the above description would
however, brought the sharpest division of opinions. To the Southern
however, forbade them to deprive any citizen of the right to vote on
however, have little tendency to gape, because of the close attachment
however, in whom growth is retarded, especially from the fifth to the
however, indicated a state of confusion in the country. The combined
however, it nationalized the issue.
however, it was not, and could not be, possible to explain the burning
however, made manifest their affection for the "plain republican" in
however, not diminished, but only changed character. The horses were
however, of settlers from the South--restless Kentuckians hoping for
however, other commodities were added to the list of enumerated
however, slow in taking form. The founders of the American colonies had
however, that the compression causes rupture of the inner and middle
however, the Constitution is supreme and superior to Congress, it is the
however, the deeper parts of an extensive wound cannot be brought into
however, there came a decided change in the tenor of American diplomacy.
however, they were instantly informed by the country that their program
however, this does occur, and in illustration of the fact may be cited
however, to be more severe, probably because the disease is often late
however, to capture popular imagination to the same degree as the
however, to the great importance of instituting treatment at the
however, vary with the nature, site, and relations of the abscess. In a
however, when, about the end of a week, the sloughs separate and expose
however,--and especially in the lower extremity--gangrene ensues and
howling wilderness" ever should be settled, it would turn against the
http://pglaf.org/fundraising.  Contributions to the Project Gutenberg
http://pglaf.org/fundraising.  Contributions to the Project Gutenberg
huge but helpless victim. The United States alone among the great
huge cost were maintained in the East and in Europe; an army was kept
huge hollow, crimson float on the surface of that milky sea of mist.
huge red hands; he did not know, as the saying is, how to enter a
huge sums in Mexican lands, oil fields, and mines, and had laid the
huge territory they had set their hearts. The mild climate and fertile
human events is predetermined from on high--depends on the coincidence
human pedestal from which he, the commander in chief, devoted all
human--for everything the majority of men regard as the greatest
humane. Thus it was evident that hundreds of employers had abandoned the
humanitarian grounds." This departure from the letter of the peace
humanity's movement. The most usual generalizations adopted by
humanity. A contemporary event seems to us to be indubitably the doing
humble enough to please the most exacting Jacksonian Democrat. They had
humerus, skull, pelvis, and jaws. In the long bones it may grow from the
humerus. In the vertebrae, it is attended with a painful form of
humidity and constriction of the limbs producing ischaemia of the feet.
humored ridicule. Speranski related how at the Council that morning
humour and to perforate the globe. It is usually of the nature of a
hundred and eight shall in any manner affect the first and fourth
hundred and eighty-seven and of the independence of the United States of
hundred and fifty towns and cities had adopted it. Among the larger
hundred and thirty-six of them removed the balloon that was being
hundred miles into the Confederacy. At Shiloh, Murfreesboro, Vicksburg,
hundred now remained. The prisoners were more burdensome to the escort
hundred of the two thousand woolen mills in the country in 1860 were in
hundred other reforms were adopted and tried out. The national watchword
hundred paces apart, but nevertheless the men were always in one and
hundred paces that separated the bridge from the Kaluga road, taking
hundred privateers furnished consolation for those who suffered from the
hundred thousand rubles' worth of things in the house. I don't
hundred times the price paid to Napoleon.
hundred to the minute, and the blood throbbed at her heart. She
hundred yards after that before he saw to his left, across the whole
hundred, and Dolokhov might have as many more, but the disparity of
hundreds of years the peasants of Borodino, Gorki, Shevardino, and
hung low over the field of battle on the horizon. It was growing
hung over her perspiring face, while with the other she pressed down
hungry Russians who froze and lagged behind on the road (in which case
hungry detachment, which alone covered this movement of the
hunt, by old custom, the count had drunk a silver cupful of mulled
hunter were, with some exceptions, soldiers of the Revolutionary army,
hunting horn; the pack joined the first three hounds and they could be
hunting party should spend the night in his little village of
hunting: it was as if the sky were melting and sinking to the earth
huntsman, the snort of a horse, the crack of a whip, or the whine of a
huntsmen waved their arms and did something to the fox. Then from that
huntsmen's room when "Uncle" returned from the chase. "Uncle" was fond
hurrah! hurrah! The Cossacks--those rascals--see how they run! Vive
hurried and noisy, but the different companies did not get mixed.
hurried through Congress in spite of the opposition and the clear
hurriedly along the path they had trodden down, to the dressing
hurriedly and ostentatiously approached the officer, swinging his
hurriedly but vainly tried to get his foot out of the stirrup and
hurriedly glancing round at anyone who entered the room. She was
hurriedly opened his eyes and saw close before him the head and ears
hurriedly undressing, tugging at the tapes of her petticoat.
hurry, blinking at the light.
hurrying away nor the burned ruins of Moscow. All that he now
hurrying away on her old legs, went through the back yard to the
hurt if Pierre spoke of his love, but that it was the very thing she
husband and his men. The daughter of Benjamin Franklin, Mrs. Sarah
husband during the Revolution; the writings of Mrs. Mercy Otis Warren,
husband's property; the management of her lands passed into his control.
husbandmen, and those living in the neighborhood of Moscow may without
hush seemed to reign over the town, broken only by the rustle of
hussar eyes as a rich civilian, the husband of a beauty, and in a
hussar overcoat, stood in the middle of the sleigh, reins in hand.
hussar, "and why are you exciting yourself? Do you think the French
hussars drew up to the picket ropes and a crowd of hussars
hussars got back to their horses. Two were misdirected and the shot
hussars hastily dismounted, not knowing what they were to do. The
hussars in the bright evening light and the blue tunics advancing from
hussars must return quickly and fire the bridge.'"
hussars on their skinny horses behind them. The wagons escorted by the
hussars who galloped up disengaged his foot and helped him into the
hussars, a good dancer, and one of the best matches in the city.
hussars, but the balls with rapid rhythmic whistle flew over the heads
hussars, told them to follow him, and trotted downhill in the
hut, dug out for them by the soldiers and roofed with branches and
hut, evidently much excited. Rostov moved to the window to see whom he
hut. The roar of guns sounded more distinct outside. An adjutant
hyaline cartilage, known as the _articular cartilage_, which would
hydrogen and bases at the negative electrode. These substances and gases
hydrops would appear to be the result of coagulation necrosis, or of
hygroma_ is most often met with in the neck--_hydrocele of the neck_; it
hyperaemia by means of heat. In neglected cases, that is, where the
hyperaemia by means of massage, the elastic bandage, and hot-air baths is
hyperaemia by the method devised by Bier, constitutes one of our most
hyperaemia_), or by stimulating the arterial flow through it (_active
hyperaemia_. Soon, however, the rate of the blood flow becomes slower
hyperplasia of the tissue elements which results in enlargement of the
hypertrophy of the superficial vessels than as a true varix.
hypodermic syringe is used. The needle is passed for a few millimetres
hypothesis unconfirmed by the experience of history.
hypothesis, is a mere thing of wax in the hands of the judiciary which
icons, and now forbade Father Augustin to remove icons or the relics
icons, by heaven!... Oh, the rascals!... See how that fellow has
idea in Pennsylvania in 1837, "unfits a man for the discharge of its
idea occurred to him of taking part in the popular defense of Moscow
idea of independence began to come from many quarters. On the tenth of
idea of the means by which our holy Order will help you to reach
idea that the Constitution did not warrant the purchase; but he lamely
idea to go and bury themselves in the steppes when the French army
idea was Monroe's enunciation of the famous doctrine that bears his
idea. Despite the doctor's orders that she should not go out early
ideal, now so familiar, then so novel, is summed up in the simple
ideas of American life. On the contrary, they were diverted mainly to
ideas of political policy. The former looked with favor on protective
ideas of these days. I said so even at the time when everybody was
identify the bacillus a piece of the membrane from the swab is rubbed on
idle and at ease. An inner voice tells us we are in the wrong if we
idle and dissipated life, because besides the hours he spent at the
idle and frivolous. The military calling is the most highly honored.
idle he was fulfilling his duty, he would have found one of the
idle or only partly employed; by increasing the trade between the North
idlers have failed to beat the Germans. Since the world began
if German warships made hostile demonstrations in the Channel. August
if I had the power," he began again, "I would not take prisoners.
if Texas was brought into the union with slavery. John Quincy Adams
if a light had been kindled in a carved and painted lantern and the
if about to tell a good story he put down the cards, leaned back in
if by this to express a consciousness of the airiness and purity of
if caught with forbidden goods was subject to seizure. In the third
if he did not get one.... Individually the miners were impotent when
if he had come straight from the bath... Papa used to..."
if he succeeded in forestalling the French he was to delay them as
if it is a limb. By this means the force of the circulation is
if it is diseased, may result in the formation of a thrombus which
if it trespasses this limit it may be arrested either at the
if repeated, ligation of the artery itself or of the trunk from which it
if she loved him she need only say the word yes, and no human power
if she were blossoming under the praise of this dear Countess
if that was not possible, to provide "in the last resort for their
if the army itself, rejoicing at the Emperors' approach, had naturally
if the degeneration is complete, as may occur in the breast, the
if the enemy is able to direct a force of any size against
if the government allows it. Not merely is it not hostile to
if the invading portion becomes detached it may constitute a dangerous
if the main duct is obliterated, a collateral circulation is usually
if the parts are kept absolutely dry and clean. A useful dusting-powder
if the vascular supply of the part beyond the lesion is sufficient to
if those two thousand men breathlessly gazing at him and the
if we meant to retire and lure the enemy into the depths of the
if we occupy the villages of Sokolnitz and Kobelnitz, whereby we can
if you are in love, marry him!" said the countess, with a laugh of
if you formed a secret society and began working against the
if you marry the prince"--he meant the younger man--and he crooked one
if you still try to defend the infamies and horrors perpetrated by
if you were to order an attack! If not, the Guards will not so much as
ignoramuses--have taken the work of the naturalists who deal with
ignorant hill men to the highly cultivated inhabitants of Manila. The
il faut, that's a different matter; but the Kuragins' set of women,
iliac crest and the lower border of the ribs, but this procedure has
iliac veins below or from the hepatic veins above.
ilium, ribs, or jaws. They usually project from the surface of the bone,
ill-designing men," were in a state of insurrection; it called on the
ill-fitting boots or from the excessive use and strain of the tendon in
ill-health or _cachexia_, the patient becoming pale, sallow, feverish,
ill-suited to the family circle of which Pierre was almost a member.
illegal "every contract, combination in the form of trust or otherwise,
illegitimate son Pierre, the one who had behaved so improperly at Anna
illness (Figs. 12 and 13). The pulse is soft, and tends to remain
illness of the old Georgian princess, of Metivier's disappearance from
illustrate more than one of these degrees, the deeper forms always being
illustration of this is seen in the psoas abscess, which may originate
imaginary foe with his imaginary sword, but smiling at the remembrance
imaginary insults which one witnesses among people of the West."
imagination of the men of the stagecoach generation. The total debt of
imagination, and "the bird restored to its native fields" galloped
imagination. The North was now free to pursue its economic policies: a
imagining that they have discovered and appraised the peculiarities of
imitated by the short extensor and the long abductor (ext. ossis
immeasurable height. When the old man began to speak too loud,
immediate and unconditional emancipation cannot be measured. If the
immediate answer was the enactment of a tenement house law prescribing
immediate answer. Prince Vasili had brought his son with the evident
immediate gains in wages or the reduction of hours; when their hopes
immediate occasion, though not the actual cause of this provision, was
immediate removal of the dead and dying tissues, as a rule, offers the
immediate vicinity of the area of infection young connective tissue, and
immediately after dinner. He called Natasha and asked her what was the
immediately all submitted to him. But the Allied monarchs were angry
immediately fall asleep, called Dunyasha the maid to put out the
immediately increases. How much then must the probability of fire be
immediately involved, and sclerosed in the parts beyond. If the
immediately jumped aside in terror. The wolf crouched, gnashed her
immediately smiling again, and the little princess curiously noting
immediately to city federations of the several crafts.
immediately, as the Emperor's quarters were, he believed, not far off.
immediately, blushing and looking anxiously at the officers to see
immediately, but yet looks about him and straightens the cap that is
immense number of bodies splashing about in the dirty pond.
immense number unexecuted. All the impossible orders inconsistent with
immensely to the prestige and power of the nation. They purchased
immigrant, landing penniless on these shores, as a result of the same
immigrants as cared to till the soil. Every new pair of strong arms
immigrants fitted, on the whole, with little friction. Even the Dutch
immigrants. For one thing, the abundance of land and the scarcity of
immigration on native labor, the wages of women as compared with those
immigration, and the opening of new wheat-growing regions. The currency,
immigration, reaching the half million point in 1880; rising to
imminence of war with Germany led to the withdrawal of the American
immunised by numerous strains of the organism derived from various
impact. High velocity bullets are unlikely to lodge in the body unless
impaired as a result of mixed infection, and the absorption of toxins
impaired by the bulk of the tumour or by effusion into the cavity.
impaired or lost. Under these conditions the operation of secondary
impaired. Wounds heal slightly more quickly in the young than in the
impairment of function and the minimum sacrifice of healthy tissue. The
impairs the growth of the mandible. When there is arrest of growth
impart to the tumour an aneurysmal pulsation and bruit. The enlargement
imparted to the fingers of the hand grasping the joint while it is
imparts confidence to the nurse, and, it may be, to the patient, if a
impassable, new tracks have been made through the woods and fields
impassable. The Orthodox begin looting, and in a way of which our last
impassioned and embittered speakers on both sides roused the public to a
impassive face of Oriental type, came out after the commander in
impassive on the face of a loved one who is dead, tapping the last
impatience, while the princess jumped up and with a gesture of
impatient at the formalities of international law, they soon made it
impatient every day. The thought that her best days, which she would
impatient for the talkative doctor to go.
impatiently for the intruder to go.
impeachment, and endowed with regal powers in the command of the army
impeded. When the heart's action is weak and the blood tension low the
impending battle. All he had seen that day, all the significant and
impending engagement) he would say something about men, honor, and the
imperative measures. The problem of the North was, to put it baldly, one
imperatively demanded for the arrest of haemorrhage, the prevention of
imperceptible; the respirations shallow and hurried; consciousness
imperfectly disinfected. The formation of pus under these conditions may
imperial ambitions on the American continent were laid to rest. In
imperial defense and make provision for supporting the local officers of
imperial in temper, and prepared to contest on land and water the
imperialism that had brought the nations of antiquity to judgment and
impermeability once he has become acquainted with them. But the same
impetuous Alexander Hamilton. "The sacred rights of mankind," he
impetuously at the wolf from in front and almost knocked her over. But
impetuously at the wolf, and seized it by its hindquarters, but
impetus, and Princess Mary long remembered the dying creak of that
implanting of living bone is to be preferred to the implanting of dead
implements from which rust is deposited, the pus often presents the same
implicated, the pressure in the vein is high and the patient suffers a
implicated. In the abdomen a lethal injury may readily be caused even by
implicates the intestinal canal and its accessory glands, the lungs,
imply that what he was now doing was done for the sake of his ally,
imply. It is to be diagnosed from the "leg ulcer," which occurs almost
import British goods while the hated law stood upon the books. Lawyers,
import aliens under contract. By an act of 1887, the contract labor
import apart from the risk of haemorrhage and of infection.
importance because of the serious results which may follow if they are
importance herself, and in the rough copies of which the countess
importance of rail connection between the East and the Pacific Coast had
importance of the moment than anything he had yet seen or heard.
importance were the Germans. From the very beginning, they appeared in
importance were the Scotch-Irish and the Germans. Into the melting pot
importance, adding to the prestige of the whole country and deepening
importance, and under the influence of the depression that possessed
importance, as it may enable the source of a given abscess to be traced
importance, because it results in interference with the development of
importance, he returned again, called back the cook and the club
importance, the cotton industry was launched, and the coal, iron,
importance--on the ground that they either were destined ultimately to
importance. As the Emperor's suite was a very small one, it was a
importance. There were abundant reasons for this. In many of the
importance. Victory in the East promised the capture of the Confederate
importance: the more important nearer to the honored guest, as
important both to the Americans and to the English?
important but pleasing to Balashev, he raised his hand to the
important causative factor in ulceration, especially when it is the
important determining factor in the production of varix.
important factor in regard to the action of certain bacteria. Young
important factors determining the formation of the clot. Alterations in
important guests, and there too sat the members of the family, and
important laws relating to the war. Macdonald, pp. 433-482.
important native sources must not be overlooked; above all, the women
important occasions and, adopting a quiet tone, discussed the whole
important old men were the center of groups which even strangers
important only what was rational, and was capable of applying the
important part of the field of Borodino.
important part. The man who does not understand the construction of
important personage, a position in the army which seemed to him most
important possibilities: "If the enemy attacks the right flank," he
important role in the counter attack that "smashed" the salient and
important tendons, or comminution of the bones, amputation is usually
important that was bound to happen. The countess looked with sad and
important to avoid a scar, the opening should be closed with a Michel's
important to enable the fluids of the body, so altered, to come into
important, the holy of holies of the order. This was the authentic
important. What is important are the rights of man, emancipation
importation necessary. Ellsworth of Connecticut took the ground that
importation of slaves was reached, the convention vested in Congress the
importation thereof into, or the exportation thereof from the United
imports. Yet this mild measure was rejected by the states. Two years
importunities of friends, he accepted the post in the spirit of public
imposed upon Southern commerce; and it is unnecessary to add that the
impossibility of driving back the Russians, and of disorganization
impossibility of levying fresh troops, spoke of the hardships
impossible because she had no territory on this side of the water which
impossible for the patient to keep the parts clean, septic infection
impossible not to tell the whole truth which she saw. And suddenly,
impossible possible. The success of the trick that had placed the
impossible thus to obliterate the communication, the artery should be
impossible to block its path. This was shown not so much by the
impossible to defer the journey to Moscow any longer. Natasha's
impossible to describe the movement of humanity without the conception
impossible to discover the primary seat of infection. A firm, brawny
impossible to dissect out the cyst, and the wall should be destroyed
impossible to distinguish between them, except by the history. If there
impossible to enter the drawing-room door for the crowd of members and
impossible to explain the facts of history without introducing the
impossible to give further orders for the sake of killing time, for
impossible to hold? The lower-grade officers and even the soldiers
impossible to imagine any result more opportune than the actual
impossible to make a definite diagnosis as to the state of the nerve, it
impossible to prevent it. Three regiments have been here and spent the
impossible to stop him, she rallied her forces and joined the
impossible. Adduction and abduction movements of the fingers are lost.
impossible. Matas suggests infolding the wall of the vessel with
impossible... Oh, how pleasant it was at home!... The knave, double or
imposts, and excises shall be uniform throughout the United States;
imposts, laid by any State on imports or exports, shall be for the use
impotence--apart from the cooperation of all the other coincident
impracticable, ligation of the third part of the subclavian may be had
impracticable, much can be done to aid the tissues in their struggle by
impressed by the fact that Pierre was very rich, had two mansions in
impressed with the passion of Americans for land ownership and
impression made on his sensitive mind by the sight of the killed and
impression of the drawing room, he served, by the contrast he
impression on Americans, convincing them that the whole world was moving
impressions of the recent battle, picturing pleasantly to himself
impressive in the years before the framing of the Constitution, had been
impressively, blocking the way to the bedroom and preventing the other
improve the whole human race, offering it in our members an example of
improved and knowledge of the subject spread among the people. Lands in
improved by the change. Probably Prince Andrew's thought interested
improvement of the human race by striving for such purification. Which
improvements, the Republican leaders at Washington were planning such
improvements. The farmers of the West demanded that the public domain be
improvements; respect for the Supreme Court; resistance to executive
improving the condition of the circulation in the inflamed area, so as
impulses reaching the brain and causing shock during an operation. If
impulsive man who had always moved in the highest administrative
impurity we are unworthy to receive, or seek the reformation of the
in "a wilderness," this was not actually the case. From the earliest
in 1606, that laid during the following year the foundations of Virginia
in 1607, and the close of the French and Indian war in 1763--a period of
in 1629 under the title: "The governor and company of the Massachusetts
in 1638 made the beginnings of a settlement, christened New Sweden; it
in 1702. Pennsylvania was, in a very large measure, the product of the
in 1787. In making his appointments, Washington strengthened the new
in 1796, and it encouraged the professional land operator by making the
in 1824 but they were soon to pass from the scene, reconciled at last,
in 1845 a separate asylum for the criminal insane. In the same year
in 1862, provided for the immediate organization of companies to build a
in 1865 they found devastation--in the towns, in the country, and along
in 1866 and held its first national convention the following year. It
in 1878, it forced Congress to provide for the continuous re-issue of
in 1892, George William Curtis, as president of the Civil Service Reform
in 1902 the federal government by its liberal Reclamation Act added its
in 1917 of the Danish Islands just off the coast of Porto Rico. The
in 1919. To be counted in the ranks of organized labor were several
in America to-day is the result of a slow evolution from an almost
in America, following the example set by their English neighbors in
in Bogucharovo that belonged to the landlord.
in Congress and for three terms as governor of his state. The latter had
in Congress and the approval of all the states. As if to give force to
in Congress, many Northern Whigs and Democrats had come to the
in Europe reacted upon thought in the United States. The French
in February, 1778. The independence of the United States was recognized
in Helene's good fortune and in the question which match would be
in July and at the beginning of August showed that they expected this.
in Kentucky, Tennessee, and Texas. Within two decades, 1880 to 1900, the
in Kentucky, had become the waterway for a vast empire. The center of
in Moscow with him. I must tell you, mon cher," he continued in the
in Moscow, or of the roughness of their treatment by the French, or of
in New York City made under the authority of the state in 1902 revealed
in New York City. "Long live George Washington, President of the United
in October, having appointed the tenth of May following for the meeting
in Parliament, Grenville announced a plan for a stamp bill. The next
in Pawtucket, Howe attaching the needle to the flying wheel, Morse
in Perkhushkovo the earth trembled from the firing, but nobody could
in Pierre which he had been conscious of ever since the appearance
in Prince Andrew's ears long after he had left the house.
in Republican ranks, he was chagrined to see the whole scheme come to
in Russia the less did he realize their significance. In Petersburg
in Scarpa's triangle than in Hunter's canal. Any of the methods already
in Sing Sing penitentiary, was known throughout the nation for her
in Spain, and in Russia--and that the movements from the west to the
in Suvorov's time, now passing so gallantly before the Emperors,
in Virginia, North Carolina, the Appalachian chain from Maryland to
in a Persian dressing gown, writing. Another, the red, stout
in a Salter's cradle. A rubber hot-bottle may be applied over the seat
in a bitter rivalry to secure a majority of the delegates to the
in a cry of: "The general to the third company," the missing officer
in a damaged part each element takes its share in the reparative process
in a darkened room, the pretext would be the retelling of the same
in a deep voice and with a slight cough--the voice and cough with
in a famous speech in the Senate in 1837, sounded the new note by
in a hollow between two hills near the village of Pratzen, the Russian
in a large way to control private enterprise in the public interest were
in a lawful manner. The sutlers alone venture to trade, and they
in a superficial bone--such as the head of the tibia--there may be local
in a vessel in which the blood is almost stagnant--as, for example, in a
in a voice not his own, gripping Karp by the collar. "Bind him, bind
in a way more natural and animated than usual, so that the wrinkles
in a whisper and four more Uhlans left the ranks and placed themselves
in a whisper though the music had ceased. "But I am certain that we
in a woman aet. 24, the subject of inherited syphilis, showing active
in accord with the modern science of strategics, had been handed to
in accord with the proclamation of his highest excellency the count,
in accordance with the enemy's movements.
in addition, folding the wall of the sac in such a way as to leave no
in adults who have suffered from severe disease of the hip in
in advanced cases of cancer of the breast, are the result of
in all the departments of government.
in all the recorded cases.
in all, this form of ulcer is associated with the presence of varicose
in all; the prognosis therefore is grave in the extreme.
in among the baggage trains, and the prisoners, hemmed in on all
in amount, and contains a large proportion of urates. As the poisons
in an editorial in an old copy of the _Rocky Mountain News_: "We claim
in an increase in the reactive changes around the tuberculous focus, an
in an overwhelming proportion to the strength of the Democratic party,
in and hand the letter to the Emperor myself so much the worse for
in another room, faint with fear lest the baby should be drowned in
in arms against the union. This step was early and repeatedly suggested
in arteries, but the thrombosed area may become canalised and the
in astronomy, far from destroying, even strengthens the foundation
in axillary abscess, for example, if the suppuration is in the lymph
in battles with the royal and proprietary governors. When called upon by
in bed with light weight extension. In the chronic hydrops the fluid is
in bitterness. It flamed up in 1820 and was allayed by the Missouri
in bleeders, and when the slough separates the blood-clot is exposed and
in chief's face attentively, and the only expression he could see
in chief. In the orders issued it was stated, not that the Emperor
in chief. One of the visitors, usually spoken of as "a man of great
in choosing the President, the votes shall be taken by States, the
in comfort. It was evident, too, that he was in the best of spirits
in competition with those of the Northern and Middle states.... These
in connection with a _chronic ulcer of the leg_. The cancer may infect
in contact. The frequency with which infection takes place on the
in contact. They are chiefly met with on the external genitals,
in court circles the possibility of marriage between Napoleon and
in danger--are surrounded by the French. It would be dangerous to move
in debt, on the other hand, urged even more drastic action against
in defense of our faith, the throne, and the Fatherland! We must cease
in defense of the American colonies and nothing seemed more reasonable
in diameter--free excision is the most rapid and certain method of
in different patients. Sometimes the virulent character of the disease
in dismay the executioner who was undressing the other man.
in disorder and was retreating upon the Kiev grenadiers. Prince
in dispute, although John Mitchell, the leader of the miners, repeatedly
in eating or speaking, touching the face as in washing, or exposure to a
in effigy until, as he himself said, he could travel from the Atlantic
in endless expanse, it was far different with the Southern planters.
in enormous numbers throughout the bodies of animals that have died of
in excess. In the majority of surgical affections it is chiefly the
in exchange for the cost of the passage. Negroes were brought on account
in exploring the interior of the bone. It is exposed by a suitable
in express terms, deprive any one of the vote on account of race or
in extreme cases it may lead to a pronounced form of hump-back. The
in fact the committees of correspondence--small, local, unofficial
in favor of Washington as the first President. Yielding to the
in fibrous and cartilaginous tumours, in tumours of the thyreoid gland,
in former years, that is, entertaining almost the whole province
in front of Kutuzov he began to report to "the old gentleman" the
in front of her looking with pleasure at the town, she bowed her
in front of the position where the battle was accepted. Why was it
in general. It should be excised widely; in the lower extremity when
in giving concerts in the choir? I don't like it, it's just
in glycerin are injected and the wound is closed. In virulent infections
in glycerin. This may be repeated within a week, the patient being kept
in glycerine. The dressing is changed as often as necessary, and in the
in going to and returning from the same; and, for any speech or debate
in gold or silver at the discretion of the Secretary of the Treasury. In
in good health, the tissues are able to resist the attacks of moderate
in good spirits, he mounted his horse and rode out into the field in
in granting it in North America. The act was also offensive because
in great detail the size of the rooms, the air space, the light and the
in greater or lesser amount. The myeloma is also to be diagnosed from
in hand, was clearing manure from the cowhouse, looked out, and his
in hand. Denisov told him of the designs the large detachments had
in her glance and in every motion, she looked at the visitors and,
in her turn began thinking aloud. Her thoughts were about the
in his armchair. He took the guitar a little above the fingerboard,
in his blood-thirsty pride. This icon of the Venerable Sergius, the
in his dotage was expressed in the highest degree by the behavior of
in his excellency's courtyard unseemly, told the dragoons to take it
in his foreign accent that he would mention him to the Emperor for a
in his glowing eyes and his resolute gait, the terrible indications of
in his hand Prince Andrew came up to his comrade, the aide-de-camp
in his nose, and tears dimmed his eyes. The sick man was turned on
in his opinion, the sole cause of the whole disaster, and with
in his pocket, left the shed.
in his study, the old prince went for his walk as usual next
in hot haste after the battle, speaks of the Shevardino Redoubt as the
in immense force upon Kutuzov's line of communication with the
in individual muscles is remarkably constant, and is usually at the
in industry, commerce, and cities far exceeded the value of all the farm
in industry, it was discovered how far women had traveled along the road
in infective conditions originating in the appendix, intestine,
in its neighbourhood, and on the capacity of the cells, when
in its stead the plan of sending his messages in writing--a custom that
in love with the Tsar," he said.
in love. The marshals stood behind him not venturing to distract his
in many cases it is only possible to estimate the real extent of the
in many states, enfranchised the women of the nation.
in marriage but the pleasure married people get from one another, that
in membrane, such as the flat bones of the skull, it is usually dense
in most cases their prosperity, to the proprietary system. Maryland,
in natural science and to win single-handed recognition at the hands of
in number. In South Carolina they formed almost two-thirds of the
in number: (1) Shall the Articles of Confederation be revised or a new
in obstructing the enforcement of the law. Such was the Great Compromise
in one of her customary states in which she needed the mental exertion
in one political party. The theory on which they based their hope was
in one side of the neck, and is excited by some inadvertent movement.
in opening the mouth--hence the popular name "lock-jaw." The muscles of
in operating for cancer of the breast. The displacement of the scapula
in order to follow a given direction the animals transfer their will
in order to select a place for the crossing.
in our battery it is still bearable," said the adjutant. "Will you
in overgrowth of the connective-tissue framework of the muscle and
in peace. The old man was beside himself: moved the chair on which
in place of the Russian order of life that had been destroyed,
in politics, and in the field of labor control can hardly be measured.
in principle between the free coinage of silver--"the confiscation of
in private by the king's minister, Vergennes. The French people,
in property involved in the adjustment with Germany, but the burden of
in proportion to the severity of the reverse, and if its army
in rank; the Grand Duke Tsarevich Constantine Pavlovich; Count
in relation to the popliteal vessels. They receive lymph from the toes
in relation to the surface, and other factors.
in relation to the thyreo-glossal duct; _rectal and post-rectal_
in reply the same kind of lamentation was heard from other parts of
in return. That was the best that many of them could do.
in seating the Taft delegates was vigorously denounced by Roosevelt. He
in session, by the governor of the state. To make sure that the
in sight of land. British and French vessels patrolled the coasts,
in silence, and then the same joke was repeated.
in size; a gradual decrease then ensues, but the swelling persists, as a
in so that the water splashed in the air, and, having disappeared
in society seems less guilty and his action more due to the law of
in some cases, the only elective city official and gave the voters a
in some respects from the hard chancre as met with on the penis; it is
in spite of the provision in the Constitution that states shall not
in spite of this, both the face and words of his new acquaintance were
in statistics. What is man's responsibility to society, the conception
in stopping it. Taken all in all, very little was heard of "the galling
in structure that they remain permanently dilated, and are at the same
in such affairs. I think it would be best not to bring it before the
in such numbers as to cause the Anglican clergymen there to lament that
in such regions as the neck, axilla, or groin, where complete
in sufficient quantities to export it to the Southern colonies and to
in summoning the nation to arms, President Wilson placed the desire to
in superficial joints such as the wrist or elbow; prolonged exposures
in tailors, giving rise to the condition known as "tailor's ankle"
in that they are not diminished in size by compression of the main
in that year a committee of American loyalists asserted that "the number
in the Apocalypse. Moreover, by applying the same system to the
in the Constitution or laws of any State to the contrary
in the Declaratory Act that Parliament had the right to tax the
in the East. The public, already angered against "the bosses," grasped
in the French, so that birds of a feather may fight together. The
in the Legion d'honneur of which Napoleon was himself the head.
in the Mason's arguments; he dreaded not to be able to believe in him.
in the Mississippi Valley, and in the Western mountains from North
in the North at first but was later admitted to be sound. Otherwise
in the North. Between 1870 and 1900 the number of farms doubled in every
in the Revolution. James Madison, the chief author of the Constitution,
in the Senate, "or in the press which supports it and them, a single
in the South turned to the Republican party for relief, asking for
in the South where the timid freedman might readily be frightened from
in the South, if not yet complete, was at least assured. Federal
in the Sushchevski or the Rogozhski quarter."
in the Temple and the Tabernacle, the irrigation works, and the great
in the Tula and Ryazan provinces, and that if they retreated on Nizhni
in the United States and to prevent any man, no matter who he is, from
in the United States. "Liberty will have another feather in her cap,"
in the West any able-bodied man with initiative and industry could
in the West collapsed; Eastern mills shut down; and working people in
in the Whole," said Pierre, and he pointed to the sky.
in the World War (1917-18).
in the abdominal and in the glandular and osseous tuberculous lesions of
in the abdominal wall after strangulated hernia, operations for
in the acquired disease. An infant the subject of inherited syphilis
in the act of falling asleep. Rostov lifted his head that had sunk
in the affair--this man did not understand the meaning of what was
in the affected area. It has been shown experimentally that repeated,
in the affirmative. Congress, ran his reasoning, has large powers over
in the afternoon or evening to 102 o or 103 o F. (Fig. 11), the cheeks
in the area affected. Less frequently the trabecular framework is added
in the army was asking for leave to visit Moscow and had something
in the army; I am not a diplomat or a government clerk.--I don't
in the art of warfare. Sir William Howe had served in America during the
in the arterial blood pressure. The capillaries dilate--the blood
in the back to the left of the spine.
in the ballroom with such a look of cold dignity. He did not know that
in the bantering tone he habitually adopted toward her, always feeling
in the battery. Several men were lying about who had not been removed.
in the black dress was a good, kind, excellent creature who would
in the body. The commonest variety is the _subcutaneous lipoma_, which
in the bone from which they originate. All intermediate forms between
in the bones of limbs that are paralysed; in the case of adults, atrophy
in the bones of the lower limbs of persons who are unable to stand or
in the bones, and the disease gradually extends up the leg (Fig. 32).
in the boxes, especially at Helene in the next box, who--apparently
in the branches of the fifth nerve, and is one of the most painful
in the brightest frame of mind, continually urging on the driver so as
in the burned tissues. In fatal cases there is often evidence of
in the cancellous spaces and medullary canal, or in all three
in the carriage as pale as anything. How they made the four black
in the carriage beside the countess and gazing at the slowly
in the case of any commander in chief) to prevent an attack.
in the case of the hip or shoulder.
in the case of the hip, may so predominate as to overshadow those of the
in the category of tumours, is to be regarded as a disorder of growth,
in the city and there is not the slightest danger. See! I've just been
in the command and though the members of the committee were aware of
in the common pyogenic form of teno-synovitis.
in the condition of the pulse that we have our best guides as to the
in the convention in any good encyclopedia.
in the councils of the country.
in the count's house. Such were Dimmler the musician and his wife,
in the country. The fact that, out of the eighteen years between 1875
in the courtyard and wished to see him.
in the dark corner. And this someone was he--the devil--and he was
in the darkness he took the boy's hand and pressed it.
in the daytime, and at night there were the campfires; the lice that
in the diet such as is required in gouty patients, so long as the
in the dining room.
in the direct work.
in the direction indicated. At the back entrance stood his caleche.
in the direction selected by the whole herd." Such is the reply
in the direction whence came the sounds of firing.
in the distance, and he listened to the sounds of firing in the
in the doctrines of liberty.
in the dorsal vertebrae, extend downwards within the sheath of the psoas
in the drawing room from habit, and Pierre answered the countess'
in the drawing room, talking to the little princess and Mademoiselle
in the drawing room, waiting for Boris to come out. She was already
in the drawing room.
in the elastic lamina--a form of obliterative endarteritis. The
in the election of several obdurate Anti-Federalist Congressmen from the
in the endless delays of the federal courts--such was the strain of the
in the essential circumstances of American life. The second was to
in the establishment of a stable peace on the basis of certain
in the establishment of the new order. Power was thus arbitrarily thrust
in the evening," reported Rostov, stooping forward with his hand at
in the extensor than in the flexor groups of muscles. Those affected
in the extreme. Moreover, they regarded the German imperial government
in the fabric of our government and in the fundamental principles upon
in the face and with bloodshot eyes, dragged Mitenka out by the scruff
in the face of bitter opposition Jackson had removed the deposits from
in the faint morning light.
in the femur and tibia in tertiary syphilis; if the subject of this
in the fields and forests, celebrated far and wide as "honest Abe, the
in the fleeting glance they threw at the riders and in the
in the fluid as flakes or masses; under the influence of movement it may
in the fold to act as a pad. The handkerchief is applied round the
in the forearm with bismuth paste.
in the forest, and this oak, refused to yield to the charm of spring
in the form of a flap, the base of the exostosis divided with the
in the form of coal-dust or gunpowder, or portions of shale, may lodge
in the formation of spicules of new bone on the periosteal surfaces and
in the fulfillment of his duties, severe to cruelty with his
in the full vigor of life do, when behind the purpose for which they
in the furrow between the glans and the prepuce.
in the future.
in the general conversation by smiling, but in spite of herself her
in the gray haze. It grew light. The evening was ending, but the night
in the groin as a result of chronic irritation about the external
in the hall and anteroom, as if someone had arrived.
in the hands of British commissioners appointed by the king, resident in
in the hands of federal officers appointed from Washington and so
in the hands of leaders more or less involved in politics. Where a few
in the highest and most diverse Petersburg circles of the day. The
in the hip or sacro-iliac joint, especially tuberculous disease and
in the history of federal finance, embraced four leading features. In
in the hounds, while the borzoi whips, with a cry of "A-tu!" galloped
in the house was done in haste at that time), and Pierre and Anna
in the hussars.
in the inferior vena cava are imperfectly developed, so that in the
in the inguinal glands for long periods, and only give rise to
in the interior of the bones may become encapsulated, and a cure be thus
in the interior of the heart or of a blood vessel, and the process by
in the interior; but he could not hold the inland region he had invaded.
in the intervals the limb is elevated to get rid of the oedema and to
in the joint.
in the knee-joint of adult women, one in the shoulder-joint of an adult
in the land of Brigham Young. His prophecy had come true.
in the later secondary period; the biceps of the arm and the hamstrings
in the least fear any kind of trial, and that if those scoundrels
in the life of the Russian people, the causes and meaning of which are
in the light of the new age. So it will be with the rise and growth of
in the limb and locking of the joint, followed by effusion and other
in the lower extremity cause a limp in walking. The limb may be disabled
in the lower extremity. If the tissues are infected with pus organisms,
in the lower limbs of athletes and of those whose occupation involves
in the lungs of the men and beasts as they moved along that road.
in the male, the prepuce is removed and the warts on the glans are
in the matter of law enforcement. The ordinary motives for the discharge
in the mechanical removal of dirt and grease by the same means as are
in the men such as I had never seen before, that we had held the
in the middle line, and in the palm they should be made over the
in the middle of the room smoothing out the folds of the gauze.
in the middle of the streets. Both the Russians and the French
in the middle of what he was saying.
in the middle.
in the midst of rough plenty, beset by chills, fevers, and the ills of
in the military firmament, had honorable records duly appreciated by
in the mist.
in the mood he then was, this was not even unpleasant to him.
in the moonlight.
in the morning from a foraging expedition. Rostov in his cadet
in the morning, Natasha insisted on fasting and preparing for the
in the mornings--what is called an "old wives' summer."
in the most temperate tones, to take thought about the common
in the mother country.
in the mud not far from Mikulino where the forest ran close to the
in the name of my dead father, who was a good master to you, and of my
in the name of the governor of Virginia, to keep out of territory "so
in the necessities of life. The French did not need to be informed
in the other, with the result that the axis of the shaft comes to
in the people but they were not "of the people" themselves; they were
in the peripheral segment has already taken place. Sensation is
in the pocket, or the core and the case separating--"stripping" of the
in the porch had resulted.
in the porch?"
in the position of a beggar rather than a sovereign. Having no authority
in the possibility of goodness and truth, but of seeing the evil and
in the power of the two sections. Societies for the encouragement of
in the presence of disease of the heart and blood vessels, especially a
in the presidential campaign of 1900. Anticipating attacks from every
in the project to confer upon Congress the power to regulate interstate
in the purchase of Alaska from Russia. The treaty of cession, signed on
in the pyogenic diseases of bone, the metastasis occurring most
in the real estate business. We don't want you to go out West and make a
in the realms of eternal peace and blessedness?" she thought.
in the rear, as the right flank would probably not be able to
in the region of the popliteal space, or across the front of the upper
in the region of the thorax, neck, or axilla, if a large vein is opened
in the reparative process.
in the room with the inkstand in her hand.
in the room. All were silent.
in the room. But in the yard there was a light from the fire at Little
in the sagittal plane (_flat pelvis_); when the bones are unusually
in the same manner. Thus the United States turned back to the provincial
in the same pitiful plight, would be on a lower level to claim a share
in the same way!" thought Natasha, feeling with horror a sense of
in the same way. As twenty years before, it seemed impossible that the
in the samovar. But Rostov went off to his squadron without waiting
in the sea of mist. In front and behind moved infantry. The
in the seclusion of our lodge--we must act--act! We are drowsing,
in the service of Bonaparte, as we used to call him? Yet here I am
in the service, as often happens, turned in his favor. After the
in the sheath and to diminish the risk of the tendons sloughing. No form
in the small circular room. Around the table all who were at Count
in the soldiers' ward, and still seeming to see fixed on him those
in the sore itself and in the parts around.
in the square. Two officers with flushed faces, looking cheerful and
in the streets of Moscow and had always been protected from the
in the streets. The gates and shops were all closed, only here and
in the subservience shown to him by the European sovereigns a
in the substance of the muscle, and this may likewise impair its
in the surface cancelli breaks up the spongy framework of the bone into
in the thigh are the muscles more commonly affected. The striking
in the tissues in response to irritation. These changes represent the
in the tissues of a foreign body--even of considerable size--is
in the tissues, _e.g._ a piece of unabsorbable chromicised catgut, the
in the tissues, particularly in the muscles.
in the tonsil--they rarely infect the lymph glands. Minute portions of
in the town, and was it true? Pierre laughed and said it was
in the vessel wall, with the result that a localised dilatation or
in the vessels may lead to the development of secondary growths in
in the vicinity there may be a deposit of new bone on the surface,
in the volume of silver in circulation. This precipitated one of the
in the wall of an artery diminishes its elasticity and favours
in the walls and increase in the arterial tension due to
in the world, and especially therefore above himself.
in the wrong place, and for a long time two menservants stood one on
in the yard and in the house. The count bad been out since morning.
in the yards and huts of that large village. The Rostovs' servants and
in their covered cart, the officers lay down in the tavern, covering
in their places, and one of them read an exhortation on the
in their turn, and the procession of carriages moved up the street. In
in their uniforms, in the second bearded merchants in full-skirted
in their vicinity, and so interfering with the exudation of leucocytes
in their zeal were inclined to be oblivious. They repeatedly charged the
in them the help and protection due to their misfortunes. These are
in these circumstances the inflammation persists in a chronic form,
in this lies the purpose of the bee. But the ultimate purpose of the
in this part of the house and did not even know of the existence of
in this respect on the greater or lesser lapse of time between the
in this way toward an understanding of the laws of history; but it
in those who are the subjects of haemophilia.
in time the West would dominate the East. "At the adoption of the
in time, for the condition is chronic and may become stationary, but
in time, to begin a general engagement then on the evening of the
in too"--different voices were saying in the crowd, as the men
in transverse accidental wounds just above the wrist. In the arm it may
in two or three days, thus diminishing the marks they leave.
in upon the floor of Congress, the party of Jefferson, christened anew
in view--to lead the troops into action in the order prescribed by the
in war on our own frontiers, with and for the King of Prussia. We have
in warfare as practised in the European War.
in what happened to the ram that was fattened. Even if they do not
in which Rostov was serving, and a misunderstanding arose. The two
in which all vital organic and elemental events occur. And the
in which he already commanded the squadron he had taken over from
in which he had been happy became trying to him, and the freedom and
in which it lies, and a discharge of pus from the sinuses, so that the
in which it was employed by the colonists, was as English as the
in which necrosis of bone has occurred, those portions of the periosteum
in which smoked the bonfires of our infantry who were felling wood.
in which the artery is remarkably attenuated and dilated, and so friable
in which the diagnosis is surrounded with difficulties.
in which the figures of the Emperor and Volkonski could already be
in which the nerve is directly damaged by the bullet, and (2) those in
in wide removal of the diseased tissues and resection of the bone, or in
in yielding reluctant approval to the Constitution, had drawn a number
in your parts, too, the harvest is nothing to boast of, Count?" he
in, I think there is little need for discussion. The Emperor has
in, the crowd, carrying Petya with it, streamed forward into the
in? Is it possible that the meaning of life was not disclosed to him
in?" she asked Natasha. "Here, hand some fruit jelly to the Turk!" she
inability both of the President and Vice-President, declaring what
inability properly to throw the muscles into action and dispose the
inactive? If the Russian army at Krasnaya Pakhra had given battle as
inadequacy of his words for the solemnity of the moment, as he
inasmuch as the hero of New Orleans had received the largest electoral
inaugural; the federal Constitution has no provision for its own
inauguration he lodged with the Spanish government a dignified protest
inauguration of a President--even that of Jefferson, the apostle of
inauguration on March 4, 1801, the first at the new capital at
incalculable wealth, is in Napoleon's hands. The Russian army, only
incapable, possessed him. The whole meaning of life--not for him alone
incapacitate the patient from following his occupation or sport for
incapacity to think and feel all that time. On the day of his rescue
incapacity, and (it was whispered) the youth and inexperience of the
incendiaries the rest of Moscow burned down.
incendiary balls at the village of Schon Grabern visible just
incessant moaning of the adjutant's? Yes, he was altogether like that.
incessantly because the mere sound of her tender, caressing tones
inch beyond the margins of the sore. Over this three or four thicknesses
inch beyond the red margin.
inch of Russian soil and not to retreat. The enormous Drissa camp
inches in length, with acorn-shaped terminals. The instrument is passed
inches to thirty feet, grains of powder may be found embedded in the
incidence of disease in bone. The nutrient artery, after entering the
incidence of the disease is mainly on the superficial parts, which
incident to particular occupations. The most familiar examples of these
incident: Kutaysov's death. Everybody knew him, the Emperor liked him,
incidents of the revolt and its repression, they admitted, were painful
incidents of the war," says Thiers, narrating this episode. In reality
incised, disinfected, and drained. The general treatment is carried out
incising the overlying skin; sometimes splitting the cyst makes its
incision and filling the cavity with iodoform glycerine, followed by the
incision is made along the line of the median nerve above the bend of
incision of the overlying soft parts, the sheath is carefully isolated
incision over the centre of the most tender area, care being taken to
incision, and the ends brought into accurate contact by catgut sutures.
incision; the periosteum is reflected and the bone is opened up by a
incision_ a blood-clot forms between the edges, becomes organised, and
incisions across it in different directions, so that the resulting wound
incisions being made to admit of the escape of pus.
incisions for the escape of pus. The site of incision is determined by
incisions have been made, we have found the _immersion_ of the limb, for
incisions, which should be placed on the thoracic side of the axilla to
inclined to the most reasonable opinions, he made no confusion, did
include their families, that nearly one-fifth of the people of the
included among her enemies the creditors and all who had business
included by the new case; each portion of dead bone is slowly separated,
included in the Compromise--the fugitive slave law--only made matters
included in the consideration of wounds and contusions.
included merely for propriety's sake in the list of the so-called
includes all three coats, and as the inner and outer coats are usually
including how to make donations to the Project Gutenberg Literary
including how to make donations to the Project Gutenberg Literary
including the French, acknowledge the genius of the Russian commanders
including the chief steward, understood from this speech how they
including the lucrative fur business, in the hands of royal officers in
including the plumbers, printers, mule spinners, iron molders, and stone
including ulcers, patches where the papillae are absent, fissures, and
incoherently described the depths of the forest, her feelings, and a
incompatibility with their natures--by the fear of weakening at the
incompetent, but in the depths of her soul she felt at peace--a
incomplete removal of the benign tumour by operation, or the altered
incomplete rupture of the nerve cords, until sufficient time has elapsed
incomplete, cicatricial tissue taking the place of the glandular
incompletely healed wound in the neck, causing death within a few
incomprehensible Being? didst thou, and why did the whole world,
incomprehensible terror seized him at the thought of that dreadful
incomprehensible the causes of the action may be--can we ever conceive
incomprehensible why, the position of the Russian army being what it
incomprehensible--the death of one she loved.
inconvenience, the muscle being exposed by a suitable incision, the
inconvenience. If, as is commonly the case, it is fixed to the femur,
incorporated into the American union. The Republicans seemed far away
incorporated it in an amendment to the federal Constitution. Again and
incorporated with the bone with which it is in contact, and does not
incorporated with the surrounding bone. Embedded foreign bodies, on the
incorporated with the tissue with which it is in contact.
incorporation (1663) by the crown. Not until long after the congregation
increase could not be accounted for by the authorities responsible for
increase each dose to 20 or 25 grains. The symptoms of iodism which may
increase in the force of the heart's action, such as may result from
increase in the girth of the bone.
increase in the immigration of leucocytes, and infiltration with the
increase in urban population, although the wide dispersion of cotton
increase the commodities of which they will become the carriers," said
increase the skill of those already in positions of trust; we must see
increase. The victories of the French at Jena and Auerstadt destroy
increased activity, whirring, and chiming in the higher spheres.
increased after the Emperor had been at headquarters for a month. Each
increased and the planting system expanded, apologies for slavery became
increased by leaps and bounds. The cities overshadowed the country. The
increased by the appearance of the American Federation of Labor, a still
increased if the virus is retained under cover of a long and tight
increased the more Napoleon raised his voice.
increased vascularity and thickening of the membrane and an enlargement
increased vascularity. This is followed by a fall in the local
increased, according to the point of view from which the action is
increased, almost steadily, for many years. The record of 1860 showed
increased, the demand for continued and heavier protection grew apace.
increased, the restrictions were defended with even more vigor. In
increases in length, to project from the surface of the bone at some
increasing the number of public domain and licensed works that can be
increasing the number of public domain and licensed works that can be
increasing trade, gave prophecy of an urban America away from the
incubation period, the rapidity of its progress, the severity of its
incurred in aid of the Confederacy or in the emancipation of the
incursions of the barbarians, or of the decrees of Napoleon III, or of
indeed for any infraction of the law, the term of service was extended.
indeed the one book of the people. Farmers, shopkeepers, and artisans,
indeed the only pretext for his departure it was decided that it was
indeed!... Why not? He'll explain"... voices in the rear of the
indeed," he said, looking at her significantly. "You'll come to the
indeed. In 1844, the Free Soil candidate, Birney, polled 62,000 votes
indefinite and pitiful, and when speaking of him and of the year
indefinite future. Ireland was on the verge of revolution. The French
indefinite period of good health. On the other hand, when it attains the
independence and the advent of Jacksonian democracy the great American
independence but firmly attacking the policies pursued by the British
independence could be kept alive only by free farmers, owning the land
independence in the quest for local autonomy.
independence of one's own personality. But as in astronomy the new
independence of the will of the nation is a solecism, at least in a
independence, demanded a place in the union, and precipitated a war with
independence, denounced the government as the aggressor and rejoiced in
independence, he was now met by the vehement cry: "Remember the
independence, if you are renting your land, if the money-lender is
independence. But if even one of the innumerable causes of the act
independence. The forces that created this nation did not operate in the
independent of the assemblies in the matter of their salaries.
independent of the colonists, they imagined it would be easy to carry
independent officer, he had now fallen under the control of a caucus of
independent opinion nourished by the press and enriched by discussions
independent state." Gouverneur Morris, a member of the convention which
independently of him, in accord with the will of hundreds of thousands
index can only be flexed at its metacarpo-phalangeal joint by the
index-finger or of the thumb. Several fingers may be attacked at the
indicate how profoundly he valued and comprehended the Emperor's
indicate that, besides military matters, social interests and the fair
indicate the chief directions in which danger lies, and to describe the
indicated by the escape of pus. If, owing to the small size of the
indicated continuous, varied, and orderly activity. The motion of
indicated that Natasha had some terrible intention. "The count is
indicated, and should be employed until the diagnosis is definitely
indicated, the quantity being gradually reduced till it is just
indicates a positive phase, and the original dose may be repeated or
indicates that the tendon sheaths have not been invaded. The
indicates that they are after a wolf. The whippers-in no longer set on
indicating a profound disturbance of nutrition in the joint structures.
indication being to prevent the access of bacteria to the dead part, and
indication of the existence of fluid in the swelling. Its recognition,
indication of the extent of the bone lesion from which it originates. As
indication of the necessity of deviating from what had previously
indication to stop. To cauterise the track and so prevent bleeding, the
indication, of an increase or decrease in the strength of the
indications, he saw clearly that the allies believed him to be far
indications: the relief of pain; the prevention of sepsis; and the
indicting the Republican President fiercely enough to please the most
indifference the evening before, had greatly increased during the
indifference, continued to explain how by exchanging into the Guards
indifferent hands of the Minister of War and the polite adjutant.
indifferent. It is just to use every legitimate means for the
indignation and resentment the Emperor had found a phrase that pleased
indignities, wrongs, and outrages of the lawless, the violent, and the
indirect signs--such, for example, as rigidity and curvature in the case
indirectly with slavery in the states. Anxious to reassure the South on
indistinctly, without looking at the man he was addressing, and did
individual branches, the _removal of the semilunar ganglion_, along with
individual focus varies in size from a pea to a walnut. The changes that
individual glands, or around them; in the latter case, on incision, the
individual papules being raised above the surface of the skin, smooth or
individual we may consider, we always regard it as the result partly
individual work is in the public domain in the United States and you are
individual work is in the public domain in the United States and you are
individuals who, discerning the will of Providence, submit their
individuals, moreover, is characteristic: the male members of the stock
indolent or bullet-bubo which accompanies the primary lesion, and the
induced by tapping there. The downward growth of the axis cylinders can
induced capitalists to invest in irrigation and at the same time
induced him to come out openly as a candidate against Taft for the
induced in X-ray workers who are imperfectly protected from the effects
induces symmetrical gangrene of both extremities as high as the inguinal
inducing an increase in the vascular tension in the peripheral vessels,
inducing the formation of a mass of inflammatory tissue around them,
indurated. The primary lesion meanwhile inflames, suppurates, and, after
indurated; and the discharge is thick, glairy, and peculiarly offensive.
indurated; sometimes they are raised and crater-like. The floor of the
induration felt between the finger and thumb on palpating the urethra.
induration is due not only to the dense packing of the connective-tissue
induration is rarely characteristic and does not last so long. The
induration is well marked, the chancre can be palpated through the
induration of the lymph glands. The primary lesion usually appears about
induration of the surrounding skin and cellular tissues (Fig. 18). The
induration results from coagulation and partial organisation of the
induration. Several of the glands along Poupart's ligament, on one or on
industrial centers. In 1920 New York made a further invasion of the
industrial cities, the exhaustion of the free land, and the acquisition
industrial development during the last two decades of the nineteenth
industrial empire. Herein lies the explanation of the growth of
industrial enterprises so essential to the military needs of the
industrial population, detached from the land, concentrated in cities,
industrial revolution in America, the rise of the factory system, and
industrial spirit that had conquered feudal Europe and the agricultural
industrial system was confined mainly to the North. By canals and
industrial system, which had risen and flourished before the Civil War,
industrial, as well as a true political, democracy in the United
industries multiplied. In the Northwest territory, the old home of
industries of the country. Mainly on that issue they elected in 1888
industries springing up in the new cities made Western life more like
industries" by dumping the accumulated stores of years suddenly upon
industries, and the Confederation itself. In 1781, even before the
industries, based on the cost of living, and to enforce the rates fixed.
industries, the funds to be provided by the employers or the state or by
industries, they said, are in the East and the protective tariff which
industries. During the presidential campaign that followed Governor
industries. Long foresight carried the McCormick reaper works to
industries. With the West, however, it became possible to establish
industrious workmen, and the peasants caught the commissaries who
industry and improvement and shall not take from the mouth of labour the
industry and trade were more than offset by the privileges they enjoyed.
industry as steel and steam power was the great market, spread over a
industry from a severe panic which had set in during 1873, the Silver
industry to the extent to which it has been pushed by this recent
industry, chemistry, and mechanical inventions. Through the sale of
industry, the nursery of seamanship and the maritime spirit.
industry. By an act of 1750, pig and bar iron from the colonies were
industry. He promised them to make the desert blossom as the rose, and
industry. Unregulated competition he regarded as "the source of evils
ineffective. Burke spoke eloquently against the Boston port bill,
inevitability alone can explain how the cruel Arakcheev, who tore
inevitability and the less free do our actions and those of others
inevitability of the connection between the person commanding and
inevitability without any freedom, we must assume the knowledge of
inevitability, to destroy the conception of the soul, of good and
inevitable because, watching the movement of history, we see that
inevitable by ceding the Floridas to the United States in return for
inevitable for the mass of those who labored on the land. It also
inevitably assume that the historian who judges Alexander will also
inevitably drawn into the national sphere. It was the basis of the
inevitably increased every year. The only resource obviously
infamous," had extended the list of exceptions. Congress, even more
infantry officer who just before the battle had rushed out of Tushin's
infantry regiment, but learning from Lavrushka that the transport
infantry soldiers who were seizing the artillery horses and turning
infantry who had come into the hollow and were firing at our men.
infantrymen ran to the Kutafyev Gate. Beams and wooden screens had
infants, and occur more commonly towards the end of the second or during
infants, usually effects a marked and rapid improvement both in the
infect distant parts through the blood-stream. Sarcomas are devoid of
infected and increase rapidly, so that, when the primary growth is still
infected and suppurates, and finally ruptures on the surface. This may
infected surface may be sponged over with pure carbolic acid, the excess
infected with pyogenic bacteria, there is not only the risk of
infected with pyogenic bacteria, there may be a diurnal variation in the
infected women, or through the rite of circumcision. The risk of
infected wound, with inflammatory redness around it and along the lines
infected, the separated horny layer must be cut away with scissors to
infection by the organisms of suppuration, erysipelas, or other specific
infection is chiefly responsible for the pyrexia, sweating, and
infection is on the sheaths of the flexor tendons, but it is not always
infection is the all-important factor in prognosis.
infection leads to caries and necrosis. In the nose, the disease is
infection may spread to the jaws from lesions of the mouth; to the
infection of serous cavities, or for the relief of pain which is
infection of the glands in the groin. The resulting bubo is ill-defined,
infection of the sebaceous glands from dirty underclothing. The
infection of the surgeon's fingers while operating upon a syphilitic
infection of the wound has occurred, a marked inflammatory reaction soon
infection passing by way of the lymph channels from the area of skin or
infection taking place by drops of saliva projected from the mouth in
infection taking place through the pharynx or oesophagus, and leading to
infection which formerly existed by the arm-to-arm method of
infection, _lymph vessels frequently convey the cells of malignant
infection, and the manifestations are the result of the entrance of the
infection, and their complete removal is an essential part of the
infection, antiseptic measures are employed to overcome the infection,
infection, showing black eschar in process of separation. The oedema has
infection, suffices to neutralise the virus in man, and up to eighteen
infection, the condition is spoken of as _acquired syphilis_, and the
infection. Usually only one joint is affected, but the condition may be
infection. Within recent years the value of the "open-air" treatment has
infection; it is widely diffused over the trunk, and the original dull
infections of the accessory air sinuses, and in other diseases caused by
infections of the soft parts, such as erysipelas and cellulitis, and, in
infections, also, the organisms may be found in the blood.
infective diseases of the urinary organs. In the various forms of
infective element combated by the induction of hyperaemia.
infective emboli spread, by ligating or resecting the main vein of the
infective focus, its bone-forming functions may be stimulated by the
infective, and the disease may be transmitted by the discharges from
infective, the disease has been really acquired at or soon after birth.
inferior in sharpness and definition to those of metal; almost all the
inferred," says Channing, "that in advocating conquest, the Westerners
infiltrated and oedematous. In the course of a few hours a dark spot
infiltration in the form of accumulations of plasma cells around the
infiltration of the soft parts surrounding the phalanx, or a gummatous
infiltration. The framework of the bone is rarefied in the area
infinitely small, and so conforms to the chief condition of motion
infinitely small. The same is done by the natural sciences: leaving
infinitesimals, mathematics, the most exact of sciences, abandons
inflamed causes alteration in the attitude of the shoulder and
inflamed part. The shade of colour varies with the stage of the
inflammable material on the bridge must be reinspected."
inflammation begins in the periosteum--usually of the terminal phalanx.
inflammation due to the action of other pathogenic organisms,
inflammation of his bowels, which were injured, were in the doctor's
inflammation of the surrounding cellular tissue--_peri-lymphangitis_.
inflammation to the surface. When the superficial cellular tissue is
inflammation with which we are most concerned is that due to the action
inflammation, being lighter and brighter in the early, hyperaemic stages,
inflammations of internal organs like the kidney--_chronic interstitial
inflammatory condition. Later, the disease may simulate acute articular
inflammatory conditions of internal organs, for example the abdominal
inflammatory effusion, and prevents the necessary contraction of the
inflammatory process, but in the fact that he is liable to be poisoned
inflammatory reaction becomes more intense, certain of the tissue
inflammatory reaction in the surrounding tissues; nor is there any
inflammatory swelling. The cervical lymph glands, as well as the lungs,
inflicted a heavy blow on the British at Monmouth, but the treasonable
inflicted by the venomous varieties of snakes, the most important of
infliction of the wound, but the incubation period may extend to three
influence carried the day.
influence in political affairs, every high official appointed to the
influence in the village commune and had recently been away driving
influence of the external world, we never get a conception of
influence on the course of American politics. It was latent during the
influence on the course of these events is purely external and
influence than anyone else on the staff, had begun to avoid him,
influenced by the direction he himself prefers, regards those as
influenced by the pressure of the head on the pillow. Craniotabes is
influences both the prognosis and the treatment, for it implies a lesion
influences, and especially of the movement of the joint.
influences, the popular choice of Kutuzov as commander in chief was
influencing historical events, that is, as not subject to laws, is the
inform him of my firm intention to attack the enemy tomorrow," said
inform the mind. We have been at great pains to make our text clear,
information can be found at the Foundation's web site and official
information can be found at the Foundation's web site and official
information is obtained by examination with the X-rays. When a toe is
information that if the army remains in its present bivouac another
information to a foreign country to be used to the injury of the United
informed him of the resolution just arrived at.
informing him of the change.
informing them of the state of affairs in Massachusetts and roundly
inframaxillary branches of the facial, the hypoglossal and its
infrequent in cases of aneurysm of the thoracic aorta.
infrequently infected by tuberculous disease that has spread from the
infusion of fluids into the circulation. After all operations there is
ingenuity they turned to trading on the river, building before 1836
ingratitude--the blackest ingratitude--in this house..."
ingrowth of healthy epithelium from the surrounding skin, and at the
inguinal (Poupart's) ligament, and receive lymph from the external
inguinal canal into the abdomen, or down the spermatic cord into the
inguinal glands, and cases are recorded in which the sloughing process
inhabitant of the same State with themselves; they shall name in their
inhabitants (grave as that fact seemed), but by the question how to
inhabitants (who gazed with curiosity at the soldiers) were not
inhabitants abandoned it and did not welcome the French with bread and
inhabitants are totally ruined, the hospitals overflow with sick,
inhabitants had spent their time pleasantly in the company of the
inhabitants hiding in the cellars the little they have left, even have
inhabitants in the little post of two thousand on San Francisco Bay were
inhabitants of the Mississippi Valley were forced to ship their produce
inhabitants, a legislature elected by the voters. No railway line
inhabitants, the Dakotans could not see why they should be kept under
inhabitants, when in 1848 Congress admitted Wisconsin to the union.
inhaled or swallowed; those inhaled are mostly derived from the human
inhaled the air with joy.
inherent in heroes and rulers, but as the resultant of a
inherent, and inseparable rights of the colonists as men and as citizens
inheres in all free government and it is expressly guaranteed by the
inheritance on the death of a cousin he paid his debt to Pierre as
inherited little changed from the age of Caesar. Whitney was to make
inherited, is the organism, described by Schaudinn and Hoffman, in 1905,
inhibit or destroy the invading parasite.
inhibiting the cellular elements of the growth. The tubes of radium are
initial infection and the first constitutional manifestations,--roughly,
initiated by Americans who went to till the soil, to trade, or to follow
initiated receives a sufficient majority, it becomes a law. The
initiated, the hurry and preoccupation of everyone, and the
initiated." The issue was submitted to the voters in the choice of
initiation a like method of enlightenment. Our Order imitates the
initiative and referendum and announced a doctrine known as the "recall
initiative and referendum. At the end of ten years' agitation, only ten
initiative, the Northern Securities Company, formed to obtain control of
injected at one time. If the pain recurs, the injection may require to
injected into a vein, or smaller quantities under the skin.
injected with iodine, or excised; the operation for removal may entail a
injected; the patient should be warned of the marked reaction which
injecting the edges with quinine and urea hydrochlorate before suturing,
injection being followed in a few days by the appearance of an
injection of 1 in 20 solution of tincture of iodine into the cavity;
injection of antitoxin; after the injection there is usually a
injection of new issues like the trusts and labor problems. As of old,
injection there may be pain and stiffness in the gluteal region.
injection, and this even when rupture of the abscess on the skin surface
injections of anti-tetanic serum, the toxins entering the blood being
injections of ether or strychnin and the application of mustard or hot
injections of fresh blood serum, taken from the human subject, the
injections of the "914" group are not painful, and even more efficient
injections. The amount of mercury to be given in any case must be
injured or dead. The soldiers, for the most part handsome fellows and,
injuries and diseases of the spinal cord, also plays an important part
injuries for which he was not personally responsible; but the argument
injuries may be unattended by pain or shock at the time, although when
injuries of nerves are met with. One of the best known is the
injuries, especially in fractures occurring in the region of the elbow.
injuries; and the subjects of it are popularly known as "bleeders."
injurious to the corn and wheat producers of the West. Cheap labor
injury by administering an anaesthetic and exploring the wound. In
injury is therefore liable to be overlooked until the wasting of muscles
injury preceding its onset. The vitality of the tissues is so low that
injury, exposure to cold, antecedent disease of the joint, or other
injury, sometimes without apparent cause. The muscles of the back,
injury, the application of heat or of chemical substances, or the action
injustice and the consequent loss of national self-respect and honor."
ink-stained women were equally detestable." To the natural resentment
inmates of the house and strangers crowded into the drawing room round
inmates of the house dispersed to various rooms. It was the dullest
inner and middle coats so that they curl up inside the lumen, while the
inner table. The tumour tissue next the shaft consists of a dense,
innocence and youth, his voice was pleasant and musical. But the chief
innocent to have the strength to perform all a mother's duties. As a
innocent--that was the chief thing," said Natasha. "Do you remember?"
innumerable canneries. The lumber industry, starting with crude sawmills
innumerable tapers burning before the golden covers of the icons,
inoculated into wounds in the sole or about the toes, and although the
inoculation tubercle on the toes or sole of the foot. The affected
inquire of the commander in chief. Bagration knew that as the distance
inquire: "Are not all the great communities of the Western World growing
inquired about her health, led the way to his mother, and having sat
inquiringly at the young prince, wondering what would follow.
inquiry into the matter, he sent a special commissioner to the islands.
inquiry. The son noticed that an expression of profound sorrow
inquisitively and alertly scrutinizing the people driving or walking
insensibility is shaded black. The parts insensitive to light touch and
inserted into the rectum, where, however, the temperature is normally
insertion of the deltoid, and that spontaneous fracture of the femur is
insidious morals and manners. The only substantial foundation for a
insignificance beside her in the spiritual world, and rejoiced all the
insignificant creatures, and he so longed to find in someone the
insignificant trifles, but did not seem so to the mother or to the
insincere. In the family's feeling toward this wedding a certain
insisted on Natasha's going with her to consult the doctors.
insisted on adopting the French title, "Citizen," speaking, for example,
insisted on an answer to the question, in how far was she bound by her
insisted that he had gained his victory with the rapier according to
insisted that it was just the crossing of the Berezina that
insolubly difficult and destroys the desire and possibility of
inspected by the commander in chief. Despite the un-Russian appearance
inspecting the position was finishing his savory dinner. They waited
inspection the appearance is found to be due to the presence of
inspiration sucks air into the right side of the heart. This is
inspire confidence his power was limited. The armies were divided,
installed as the successor to Diaz, was deposed in 1913 and brutally
installs himself in the palace at Potsdam.
instance, and the daily dose is increased to five or even seven grains
instance, the external iliac or the subclavian. For such contingencies
instances the patient has carefully observed his own symptoms, and is
instances the patient's first complaint is of pain and stiffness in the
instant, as if to give the visitor time to greet her aunt, and then
instant, he knew not why, the recollection came to his mind of a
instant, they heard the quick rustle of the countess' dress. She
instantly dropped them again. All the blood which had seemed congested
instead of being left indefinitely in the iodine solution. If
instead. The new school of socialists, adopting the principles of a
instigating. Although Great Britain and nearly all the powers of Europe
instinct and did not go wrong in the side streets that led to the
instinct suggesting to him that the sublime moment having been too
instinctively avoided the blow. "Thought... Blackguards..." shouted
instinctively felt that the way advised by Tushin and the other
instituted, and a system of national insurance was established in the
institution designed "to strengthen the arm of wealth and counterpoise
institution, founded in the early days of Christianity, proved to be a
institutions and ideals. The income tax law of 1894, exclaimed the
institutions, and the trade of Europe to the very ends of the earth.
instruct the classes that appeared in its pages. With the growth of
instructed to treat them as wards of the nation--a trust which
instructions and occasionally glancing disapprovingly at the
instructions his father had sent and taking the correspondence and his
instructions to the hurrying people, and flurrying them still more.
instructions to the servants for the accommodation of the visitors and
instructions to the steward who had been waiting for him, went to
instructions, orders, and commissions to the baggage men who
instrument for the illumination of one side of it. For the fact
instrument in the attainment of the historic, universal, aims of
instrument of common welfare to be used in the public interest. "We must
instruments, and the sharper and smoother the instrument the more does
insult but as proof positive that Harrison deserved the votes of Jackson
insult, painfully irritated the wound, interrupting that necessary
insupportable" expense involved, had failed to make provision for the
insurgents by American sympathizers. Thereupon the President returned to
insurrections whenever called upon by the legislature or, if it was not
intact, made gains in India, and maintained her supremacy on the seas.
intangible is the real strength of the colony, still exists; and
integration of unknown, infinitely small, quantities. Abandoning the
integrity of the lining membrane of the vessel wall, are the most
integrity of the members of the League was subjected to a specially
integrity of the nerve be restored, and so its function is permanently
integrity. Though the "regular" Republicans called them "Mugwumps" and
integument under aseptic conditions, the passage of the knife through
intellect. No one, not even the most critical, can run through the
intellectual activity and the movement of peoples, and in no case
intellectual activity, nor even by a combination of the two as
intellectual life of the colonists may seem by way of comparison, heroic
intellectual pride," said the princess, following the train of her own
intelligent, how is it you don't see that if the count has written a
intelligible to us, and admitting the ultimate purpose to be beyond
intended to devote his leisure to an account of the great deeds he had
intending to dance who had not yet gathered courage to enter the
intends to welcome him in the house.... She's very pretty," added
intense look fixed on him on his right, and he turned. Close to the
intense, but passes off during the first or second day, to return again,
intense. Appeals and petitions poured in upon Congress and the
intensified in the mass, urged them on. It was not that they knew that
intensity of the cold, the pursuit, the barring of the way, or any
intention of becoming citizens. By the first act of May 18, 1917, it
intention of demonstrating the advantages of his position and
intention to unite all employees into one big union and seize the
intention. He struggled against the confession of his weakness but
intention. If now you married again with the object of bearing
intently at the battlefield.
inter-pectoral group, between the two pectoral muscles. The axillary
inter-phalangeal joints, the flexion being most marked in the little and
intercept every glance directed toward her, and tried to appear the
intercolonial cooperation. In the middle of the seventeenth century, the
intercourse contrary to all laws of reason, the words themselves
interest by the Republican Congress at Washington and, reduced to its
interest him, she turned to his father. The conversation was general
interest in life. But the same blow that almost killed the countess,
interest in the city of London. In fact, it is recorded that the fateful
interest in these things and to question Pierre. The questions put
interest lay in the general progress of the war. When he saw Mack
interest of the Southern planter is promoted by every diminution of
interest of the colony, the Mormons, eager to be self-supporting in
interest of the immature pupil, seems out of place in a book that
interest of the men in service. Never before in the history of the
interest of the taxpayers. It made annual, not permanent, grants of
interest only of the new homestead he was constructing and its
interest, they will not oppose the increase in slaves which will
interest," said he, carrying away into the darkness a glowing stick.
interest. He had the satisfaction of seeing the conference end in a
interested him. What the diplomatic matter might be he did not care,
interested in all the controversies going on around them. The temperance
interested in every phase of Western development--the survey of lands,
interested in removing the barriers which excluded many of them from
interested the Minister of War less than any of the other matters he
interesting and entertaining. After the field marshal's departure it
interesting nature of the question," wrote John Marshall, "the equality
interesting questions arose. It was pertinently asked whether the
interesting type of lymphangiectasis is that which results from the
interests and service interests and intrigues as usual. Only in the
interests are all in the East, and in regard to Bonaparte the only
interests are on the one hand allied with the Vanderbilts and on the
interests could not fail to find a place in time in the written record
interests in a boston card party, Peter the cook, Zinaida Dmitrievna's
interests in the Western hemisphere carefully watched and guarded. The
interests of some and the prejudices of others, have obtained a decided
interests of the North. The first paralyzing blow at the planters was
interests of the farmers. Its political bearings were apparently not
interests of the mother country, where merchants and men of finance had
interests of the regiment and felt himself deprived of liberty and
interests of the relatively few Africans in the United States." Like a
interests of the several foreign countries should be respected; that
interests of the whole country." The platform was greeted with cheers
interests of the whole." Strangely enough the fulfillment of this
interests that they always prevent the public interest from being felt
interests," continued McDuffie, "the manufacturing capitalists have
interests. By the admission of these [new] states that balance has been
interests. The farming and planting South, outside of the few towns,
interests. Where the freehold qualification was applied, business men
interfere by performing the operation of sequestrectomy. Displacement or
interfere with private business at all, the American people at large
interfere with the continued life and growth of the organisms
interfere with the natural arrest of haemorrhage.
interfere, making a scene on the very threshold of a dying man's room?
interference is usually restricted to opening and draining the
interference with elections. Even the measures of reconstruction were
interference with the management, prices, rates, charges, and conduct of
interference with the nerve-supply of the skin, whether from injury or
interference with the trophic nerve-supply of the parts, and to the fact
interferes with function. When involving the ophthalmic division of the
interferes with the carrying out of the operation--as, for example, in
interferes with union. If necessary, the wound should be purified by
interfering with the flow through the vessel. The organisation of this
interfering with the function of organs which are essential to life, by
interfering with the nutrition of those parts of the brain supplied by
interior aflame. It was the members of the western vanguard, like Daniel
interior of bone are the result of the liquefaction of solid tissue;
interior of certain cystic tumours of the breast and of the ovary.
interior of the vessel, and the tunica externa collapses over the cut
interior, a sufficient amount of the cortex should be removed to allow
interior, and remove any tooth that may be present. The cavity is then
interior, resulting in obliteration of the medullary canal.
intermediary stage in the healing of fractures, especially in young
intermit the flow through the main artery as in operations for aneurysm.
internal carotid is of special importance on account of the way in which
internal jugular vein for infection of the transverse sinus.
internal jugular, the femoral, or the axillary, it is usually possible
internal organs, and there is no fear of interfering with the growth of
internal organs. This is true not only of the circumscribed gumma, but
internal peace and the increasing power of the mercantile classes in the
internal, because of its elasticity, curls up in the interior of the
international agreement. The Western states were fixed in their
international law; but a submarine ordinarily could do nothing of the
international relations, conquests, and alliances, the historians
international relations, is the will of the people also transferred to
interosseous muscles attached to it. Pronation of the forearm is feeble,
interpretation and annulment by the judiciary, appointed by the
interpretation upon the term as to include nearly every important
interpreted to make the maximum disclaimer or limitation permitted by
interpreted to make the maximum disclaimer or limitation permitted by
interrupted Weyrother, wishing to say something. But the Austrian
interrupted him in the special deep cooing tone, precluding the
interrupted sutures that do not pierce the intima, and wrapping it
interrupting one another and mingling with the rustling of dresses and
interstate rates. In 1887, the pressure became so strong that Congress
interstices of the tissues, and, coagulating, forms a clot which
interval between the femur and tibia, most often on the lateral aspect
interval--"boom--boom, boom!" came the fine, firm, precise sounds in
interval--usually a week to ten days--between the receipt of the wound
intervals when the band is off, gentle active and passive movements
intervals, especially when the patient is warm in bed. Scratching also
intervals, so as to cause contraction of the muscles.
intervention in America. At his suggestion the assembly adopted a
intervention in human affairs, want to see the cause of events in
intervention in state affairs was the passage, in December, 1917, of an
intervention of the Deity in human affairs or a definite explanation
interview with the Emperor, about the remarks he had heard at court
interview with the gentleman-ranker--"that Private Dolokhov, who was
intimacy of his wife with the royal prince, Pierre had unexpectedly
intimate contact with the leucocytes, and in bacterial infections there
intimate conversation--"I often think how unfairly sometimes the
intimate friends only the Rostovs remained, but he did not go to see
intimate home circle of the man he so admired had greatly interested
intimate in her house. The count decided not to sit down to cards or
intimate with you may injure you in the eyes of other young men who
into French and was scattered in numerous editions throughout the
into Latin America, of which the operations in the Caribbean regions
into Moscow gave General Sabastiani strict orders to observe the
into Rostov's eyes with the same veiled look. Each time this
into Vesenny (vernal) and into Vesenya by the peasants and soldiers.
into a Holy Alliance to sustain by reciprocal service the autocratic
into a committee of the whole on the state of the union, and Franklin,
into a national campaign, and called upon trade unionists to desert the
into a new land, only a part of which was under the American flag. The
into a reverie without finishing the story. He thought not of this
into a study, the very one from which the Russian Emperor had
into action; but there was no unnecessary delay. Soon after the
into an agreement to enforce the claims of their citizens against Mexico
into civil war. The Kansas-Nebraska Bill rent the old parties asunder
into execution the foregoing powers, and all other powers vested by this
into four slave states. The new territories secured by the treaty of
into granulation tissue, which eats into the cartilage and separates it
into her eyes and, unable to bear the looks turned upon her, ran
into her work as if to testify that the interest and fascination of
into his bed; the Pope, the guardian of all that the nations hold
into maps, but to fight, beat the enemy, keep him out of Russia, and
into one of the carts and knocked a hole in it with its pole.
into one of the moist type. Moreover, the low state of vitality of the
into pus and a localised abscess forms; or portions of the thrombus may
into scar tissue. The internal clot plays the most important part in the
into sugar--and then run out into the yard to see whether it had
into territories, each administered under a governor appointed by the
into that. But consider the position in which you are placing her
into the Atlantic to the Ohio River and beyond into the Northwest
into the Kolocha, a mist had spread which seemed to melt, to dissolve,
into the Moyka Canal. And there was the bear swimming about with the
into the Rostovs' yard. Mavra Kuzminichna concluded that he was a very
into the Russian service, and the appointment he seeks in Turkey comes
into the anteroom. "I can't remain any longer in Petersburg. Tell me
into the ballroom where, shyly at first and then more and more merrily
into the cavity of the joint of serous fluid mixed with flakes of
into the condition known as weak.
into the deep subcutaneous tissues every week for six weeks, followed by
into the depths of the country.
into the distance straight before him, down the narrow open space,
into the drawing room.
into the feather bed, rolled over to the wall, and began snuggling
into the garden and as far as the pond, along the avenues of young
into the general circulation.
into the general state of affairs which was far from satisfactory.
into the great reception room and, bowing politely, asked Balashev
into the ground near the shed with super human force, throwing up a
into the hands of a journalist, William R. Hearst, who published it to
into the hands of a small body of Senators and Representatives.
into the hands of professional politicians who devoted their time to
into the hands of the newly emancipated male negroes and the handful of
into the hands of the soldiers or of riotous peasants would be
into the harbor. This was serious business, for it was open, flagrant,
into the hollow, but perhaps he had simply vanished--disappeared
into the hollow. On reaching the bottom, Dolokhov told the Cossacks
into the hundreds of millions, the conviction of the planters and their
into the inflamed and oedematous surrounding tissues. Such ulcers are
into the interior of the cysts, constituting what are known as
into the interior of the skull, into the frontal sinus, into the cavity
into the joint, and in the case of _sarcoma_ the fluid is usually
into the market great streams of the white metal, bearing down the
into the markets of the Old World.... What are the effects of a war with
into the neck, or, extending inwards may form adhesions to the chest
into the open air, upon a double Thomas' splint extending from the
into the pelvis.
into the pit.
into the pleura.
into the porch following the princess, whom a footman was helping into
into the porch, putting on his gloves and carrying his hat under his
into the right position opposite the other; her face assumed a serious
into the room where Khvostikov and Makarin were sitting.
into the sac.
into the study--that was in the old house--and it was dark--we went in
into the swing of it, charmed the spectators by the unexpectedness
into the territory. During the first night a city of tents was raised at
into the valley. He greeted the men of the foremost regiment and
into the vestibule to inform Kutuzov, who was waiting in the hall
into the wood. Besides, to tell everything as it really happened, it
into the wounds, the scissors must be freely used to remove the tissues
into those above the clavicle and those below that bone.
into two unequal parts: one, our Pavlograd regiment; the other, all
into unless this is essential for purposes of diagnosis, and the wound
into war: the repeal of the Missouri compromise in 1854, the rise of the
into which our troops had descended and from whence came the sounds of
into whose frugal and industrious lives the later Irish and German
into words, to describe directly the life of humanity or even of a
intothe ground ten paces apart to mark the barrier. It was thawing and
intra-cellular digestion. To this process Metchnikoff gave the name of
intra-muscular injection of ether, are the most speedily efficacious
intracranial venous sinuses, the eye, or the ear. In some cases the
intrigue, met his death at the hands of a Mexican firing squad.
intriguing for his election to that high office. Had it not been for the
intrinsic muscles of the hand are affected, and the hand assumes the
introduce Rostopchin's witty remark on that occasion. The foreigners
introduce in its entirety and over the whole area the system of lords
introduced into naval warfare, one not provided for in the accepted laws
introduced into the tissues.
introduced obliquely through the overlying soft parts, avoiding any part
introduced on January 4, 1854, a bill organizing the Nebraska territory
introduced to such a wound from the shaft or wheel by which he was
introducing examinations to qualify for the grades of Collegiate
introduction of a Swiss device known as the initiative and referendum.
intubation of the larynx, or tracheotomy, but the antitoxin treatment
invade the lymph spaces, and are associated with acute spreading
invade the skin, forming one or more sinuses. The further progress is
invaded by the federal government, the tenth amendment expressly
invading the knee-joint.
invalid chair that they had lifted the dying man and were moving him.
invariably found in the blisters of burns, these must be opened and the
invasion of Russia in which millions participated, but even in the
invasion. If the aim was the aggrandizement of France, that might have
invasions into slave territory and the emancipation of three hundred
inventor of the steamboat, was another man of vision who for many years
inverse chances occur--from the cold in his head at Borodino to the
invested with the right of suffrage are such persons as could be,
investigated by Head and Sherren, the period between the operation and
investigation. This legislation was at first denounced in the East as
investigations. One eloquent passage illustrates all the rest. From
investors. Moreover the Mexican border was in constant turmoil. Even in
invincible America, down to the settlement at Versailles in 1919 closing
invisible power. During the hour Pierre watched them they all came
invitation to dine with the Emperor that day.
invite to dinner all who came "to congratulate." The countess wished
invited the contestants to the White House and by dint of hard labor
involuntarily compared the two: the lack of spirituality in the one
involuntarily drawn into doing the same. In Carriage Row carriages had
involuntarily noticed the quivering of Napoleon's left leg which
involuntarily passed round in a curve and came upon the large house
involuntarily rested longer on the slim Natasha. She looked at her and
involuntarily: "he could not understand that there, for the first
involuntary shudder ran down his spine. In the corporal's changed
involve only the epiphysial junctions in the immediate vicinity of the
involved in all of them. The frequent occurrence of varix in youth is
involved in restoring the seceded states to the union was the question
involved in scar tissue subsequent to an operation for clearing out the
involved, the enlarged glands extending from the mastoid to the
involved, the skin assumes a dark bluish-red colour, is swollen,
involved. It consists in exposing three or four inches of the vein in
involved. The royal veto power over colonial legislation was not,
involved; and arbitration of the question was impossible. This response
involved; and lastly those of the limbs. Although this is the typical
involvement of the articular surfaces.
involvement of the lymphatics.
involvement of the tendon sheath is usually indicated by the patient
involving chiefly the superficial lymph vessels and glands. The
involving its outer shell, as shown in Fig. 127. The situation and
iodides. When it affects the lower jaw, in its early stages,
iodine are applied, one after the other, and this is repeated daily for
iodine in rectified spirit. The painting with iodine is repeated just
iodine, or both. If a wet dressing is required to cleanse the ulcer,
iodine. Deep ulcers, and obstinate lesions of the bones, larynx, and
iodoform is gradually absorbed. Iodoform gives a dark shadow with the
iodoform may be introduced after withdrawal of the contents.
iodoform, and removal of the infected tissues with the sharp spoon. In
iodoform; if an ointment is indicated, the choice lies between the red
iron blockade finally established by the British government when it came
iron works at Shrewsbury within ten years after the founding of the
iron, and copper of Colorado were worth more than the wheat, corn, and
irony he administered the oath of office to his bitterest enemy, Thomas
irrational events (that is to say, events the reasonableness of
irrecoverable days of her own girlhood and her own first ball. The
irregular nodular enlargement (Fig. 132). If the bone is macerated, it
irregular projections of bone, at the ends of the long bones, the
irregular prolongations around its margins. The patient may complain of
irregular train, have the consistent policy or the matured experience
irregular, and ragged, showing no sign of growing epithelium--on the
irregular, firm, and swollen, and the surrounding mucous membrane is
irregular, the pulse small and rapid, and the urine may contain blood
irregular. The discharge is usually watery, and cakes in the dressing.
irregular. The face is flushed, the tongue dry and brown, and the
irregularity in the contour of the cortical bone, and frequently there
irresistible influence of the dark, graceful girl who loved another.
irresolution, and alarm, yet at the same time joyfully expecting
irresponsibility for crimes and the extenuating circumstances admitted
irresponsibility. Commissioners were often lacking in the technical
irrigate with Carrel-Dakin solution and pack with gauze smeared with the
irrigation of the colon are indicated, and Arbuthnot Lane claims to have
irrigation purposes. In this work Wyoming took the lead with a law which
irritable, and it was Princess Mary who generally bore the brunt of
irritable. The infantry passing before him came to a halt without
irritably and she went to the window and opened it. Through the open
irritant effects are overcome, the inflammation is arrested, and
irritant. Sometimes it is mild and evanescent, as in the glandular
irritate Pierre now became a basis of the sympathy he felt for, and
irritation caused by injury or disease. The vital reaction induced by
irritation in the same way as would a dry pad of sterilised gauze. Under
irritation in these cases is probably due to toxins in the catgut and
irritation of the X-rays; there is first a chronic dermatitis with warty
irritation, the potato famine added physical distress beyond
irritation, ulceration ensues, and the sore becomes painful and tender,
irritation; and it became a formidable item in the long list of
irritative effects. The resulting reaction is correspondingly
is a similar septic process attacking the wall of the artery from the
is a slowly growing, soft, ill-defined tumour, which displaces the
is abducted, the fixed lower part or floor of the bursa is carried under
is abnormally thick and vascular, the superficial layers of the bone
is accompanied by severe neuralgic pain in the part, probably due to
is accomplished, the success which attends conservative measures is
is advantageous in raising the blood-pressure (_Op. Surg._, p. 565).
is advisable to give a thorough trial to the medical measures used in
is aggravated by such movements as bring the affected muscles into
is aggravated by walking, and the tendon is sensitive and swollen from a
is all because we want to ape the foolish enthusiasm of those
is almost fluid at the body temperature, fluctuation can usually be
is always a right way of doing things," replied the governor's wife.
is always a struggle between the organisms and the leucocytes, so that
is an advantage, as it enables the operator to recognise the area that
is an effective blockade?" and "What is contraband of war?" The task of
is an offense against the teachers of those subjects that are
is applied, and if suppuration occurs, the pus is let out through one or
is apt to be walled in by new bone; the sinuses continue to discharge
is apt to die and furnish a sequestrum; the separation of the dead bone
is apt to persist till the foreign material is cast off or removed.
is as clear as day, and can go so far astray. That is the only thing
is as much a business man as his employer. The attorney in a country
is attached, is inserted into the substance of the tumour, either
is attended with pain, or it suddenly attracts notice by the occurrence
is attributed to an interference with the trophic innervation of the
is based on the average course of the disease in untreated cases. The
is based. Pathogenic bacteria are so widely distributed, that in the
is best illustrated in arthritis deformans of the hip in which new bone
is best treated by the open method. Even advanced waxy degeneration does
is best--conscription or the militia--we can leave to the supreme
is better to expose it by operation, and thus learn the exact state of
is blocked also, the action of pyogenic organisms is favoured and
is brought up to the lip or cheek, or eyelid, where it is wanted; when
is called Unterkunft and where the husbands eat sauerkraut and the
is called power. This relation consists in the following:
is centered and in which lie the ashes of your ancestors! I shall
is characteristic of suppuration, extends into the surrounding tissues,
is chronic, and the chief feature is the gradual accumulation of fluid
is conical, the end of the bone projecting beyond the soft parts.
is considerable constitutional disturbance, the temperature often
is converted into cicatricial tissue which seals the aperture. Such
is customary to divide the life-history of syphilis into three periods
is diminished. In tertiary syphilis, individual muscles may become the
is directly involved in the destructive process, its bone-forming
is dorsiflexed. In girls it may give rise to pain which shoots up the
is dried by the sun, because it grows heavier, because the wind shakes
is dying," replied the maid with a sigh.
is evidence of formation of bone in the form of characteristic spicules
is evident that only along that path does the possibility of
is exposed, but, if the granulations are healthy and can be rendered
is extremely slow, partly from the want of vascularity in the sclerosed
is formed, the cells of which are arranged in parallel lines and
is found on the skin, in the mouth, and in other situations in the body,
is frequently the case when the abscess is situated in the subcutaneous
is gradually absorbed, and there result excavations or cavities. The
is greater on the dorsal than on the plantar aspect, and that the death
is hot, tensely distended, and there may be oedema of the peri-articular
is impeded. From the same cause the blood in the deep veins is enabled
is implicated, the bleeding usually takes place into the tissues rather
is important to bear in mind the possibility of infection of a wound
is in a deformed attitude which does not readily yield to extension, the
is in an historical sense involuntary and is related to the whole
is in normal health and the vitality of the tissues has not been
is in the dependent position. The acute symptoms pass off in a few days,
is incomplete--the inner and middle coats being torn, while the outer
is indispensable in abduction and rotation of the humerus. When the arm
is indistinguishable from the thickened and enlarged bursa so commonly
is insensibility to deep touch. The areas of epicritic and of
is instructed to tighten up in the event of bleeding taking place.
is introduced into the main affluents one after another.
is it that Louis XIV and Ivan the Terrible end their reigns
is it?" said the man--a singer and a wag--whom Morel was embracing.
is kept up from twenty to twenty-two hours out of the twenty-four, and
is known as the "core," and consists of the necrosed hair follicle or
is less likely to be successful owing to the organisms having entered
is liable to relapse. In the more severe variety the skin is red, and
is like money in circulation--paper money and coin. The biographies
is lost. The paralysed muscles undergo fatty degeneration, which attains
is merely to remove the gangrenous part, and so relieve the patient of
is met with almost exclusively between the knee and the ankle, and it
is met with in the axilla in cases of chronic interstitial mastitis, and
is mine is yours," she concluded, scanning the faces before her.
is most frequently met with in the breast. If the cells undergo
is most frequently met with in the shaft of the femur. Short of
is most likely to develop when the patient is infected on the face or
is much laceration of the skin. It is not uncommon to have considerable
is my witness," and she made the sign of the cross, "I love her so
is neither in the one nor in the other but in the union of the two.
is no freedom there is also no man. And so the conception of the
is no proof of any structural defect in the blood vessels, and beyond
is no urgent call for operation to save the patient's life, the primary
is not found to increase the risk of gangrene.
is not playing with the subject. Electricity produces heat, heat
is not possible and recourse is then had to ligation of the artery just
is not so marked as in the preceding type, and the patient is able to
is not uncommon in children, and explains the occurrence of aneurysm in
is nothing extraordinary in the capture of Murat. Still, it is
is now centered round the Emperor. So we will go to Dolgorukov; I have
is now rushing along the road to Brunn and will be here in a day or
is obtained by the use of the X-rays.
is of a bright-red colour, while the skin in the centre resembles a
is of a severe type, when it is mon-articular, and when the general
is of an ashy-grey colour, the lips dark and swollen. On the inner
is often found between the patella and the trochlear surface of the
is often possible with the aid of X-rays--the affected bone is excised
is often seriously impaired by fibrous or bony ankylosis of the
is often the case in the knee and elbow. Cold abscesses should, if
is one consisting of calamine and 5 per cent. salicylic acid; the
is one of the epics of civilization, this reclamation of the Southwest,
is one of the greatest possible agencies in the attainment of a true
is only now gradually opening before me." But five of the other
is performed or not. Paget recommended that the dietetic treatment
is possible about a matter the conditions and circumstances of which
is possible. For this purpose the free application of blisters, as first
is present at the end of fourteen days, operation should not be delayed.
is present in cases of moderate severity; but in severe cases the
is present, an operation should be performed. After operation, the
is present, the abscess is probably due to infection carried in the
is private physician to the Queen of Spain."
is pus, let it out," summarises the treatment of abscess. The extent and
is quite equal to Marya Antonovna. See how the men, young and old, pay
is raised from the bed, sometimes to such an extent that the patient
is really a recurrence of primary bleeding. As the name indicates, it
is recognised that there are a number of conditions which favour the
is removed the pulsation is restored immediately.
is rendered a suitable soil for bacteria. If these gain access, in the
is repaired by ordinary cicatricial fibrous tissue derived from the
is revealed by its tendency to spread up the limb along the lymph
is revealed in the pages of congressional reports based upon first-hand
is roughened by disease, especially in the form of calcareous plates,
is secured against the effects of bacterial action the serum and vaccine
is situated beneath the deep fascia, and projects either in front of or
is soft and elastic in the centre and firm at the margins, and shades
is sometimes obtained by bringing the two surfaces into apposition after
is spoken of as _periostitis_; the term _osteomyelitis_ is employed when
is spoken of as one of the most active, cultivated, and capable of the
is squeezed or knocked against anything. In the course of a few hours
is stitched up with the object of obtaining primary union; otherwise it
is superior to the resection of branches of the nerve, for though
is sure he will always say the right thing and say it well.
is surrounded and permeated by the phagocytes, which soften and
is sutured to the base of the phalanx, which may be drilled for the
is that of some force commensurate with the whole movement of the
is that so frequently met with in the great saphena vein, especially
is the baby born?"
is the count's son," she added more softly. "What a terrible moment!"
is the diaphysis that is displaced, for example, the lower end of the
is the essential step in arriving at a diagnosis. The disease yields in
is the first sign that calls attention to the condition. Consolidation
is the form most commonly met with in civil practice. It may follow such
is the freedom of the press.
is the good of that? War is my profession, but his business is to
is the greatest happiness,'" Rostov fancied the sovereign saying.
is the indication to operate. It may be necessary to operate to enable a
is the matter with you, my angel? Are you ill?" asked the count.
is the more prominent feature, and the affected bones are attenuated,
is the name of the ruler of all. The third name is the name
is the one held by the majority of people, and is the invariable fruit
is the principal aim of these three? Certainly self-reformation and
is the result of the action of the tubercle bacillus. It is therefore
is the seat of a burning sensation and is tender to the touch, the most
is the shortness of the interval between the original infection and the
is the spirit of impartiality and fairness and friendliness to all
is the well-known Prince Bolkonski who had to retire from the army
is the whole government now!"
is then stored in 90 per cent. alcohol. (3) Cladius recommends that the
is thereby greatly increased, the resulting wound being much more
is thicker than normal, and is actively engaged in forming bone. In the
is to be looked upon as determining the _localisation_ of the
is to be suspected. Motor disturbances are exceptional, unless in the
is to go to the right and who to the left? It is only because military
is towards the formation of an abscess. This is illustrated in the
is transferred to historic personages conditionally, but that the
is transmitted through the female line. Thus the daughters of a father
is treated by paring away all the thickened skin, after softening it
is treated by the open method.
is unsuspected before the onset of the gangrene, and it is only on
is usually applied to the point of the shoulder.
is usually called for. This is carried out on the same lines as for
is usually due to over-stretching of the plexus, and especially affects
is usually recognised by the persistence of suppuration long after the
is usually required. A more effectual method is to expose the nerve
is usually sufficient to excise a portion of the wall, scrape out the
is usually supplied, for they all had a stake in the country they left
is usually through an abrasion of the skin, and the primary
is waiting at the porch," said the adjutant.
is what Christ preached on the Cross."
is what follows from the fact that it is cold; and not that a child
is what his cajolery has brought us to! Barbara Ivanovna told me the
is wobbly, and the quadriceps is wasted. The patient himself, or the
is, a man from the enemy column. That morning's attack on the wagons
is, however, the most potent factor in disturbing the natural process of
is, only the beginnings of marriage and not its whole significance,
is, pain elicited on pressure--is one of the most valuable diagnostic
is, the position on which the battle took place), but never till the
island except for the pacification thereof." In the settlement that
island of St. Helena in the peaceful solitude where he said he
islands and a native king, laid claim to an interest in the Samoan
islands were annexed. The Monroe Doctrine was applied with vigor in the
islands were governed directly by the President under his supreme
isn't it all the same not to send them?"
isolated bundle of fibres which supplies the pronator teres, the flexor
isolated or as multiple foci of granulation tissue, which replace the
isolated position, render it master of the situation and practically
issue after the historic voyage of the battleship _Oregon_ around South
issue be submitted to arbitration. The outcome of this somewhat perilous
issue between the North and the South--a definite statement of the
issue in the campaign.
issue manifestoes, and stir up the people against England, Washington
issue paper money. So the country was beset by the old curse, the banks
issue was in the hands of the Senate where the Democrats and the
issue. The election of Senator Harding, in an extraordinary "landslide,"
issued at night on the first of September.
issued by the French authorities concerning the party of prisoners
issued from the openings of the windows and from under the roof.
issued to inflict severe punishment for the nonperformance of military
issues before the country were either vague or unknown, he was readily
issues, however, nullified the effect of foreign credit and forced the
issues, the World War broke out in Europe in 1914. As a hundred years
issuing the call. At this great international assembly, held at the
it Likhachev was sitting sharpening a saber for him, that the big dark
it a measure of confiscation and repudiation; an effort of the debtors
it actually did in December, namely a hundredth part of the original
it all, be unjust? And what is justice? The princess never thought
it and be put to shame and perish, and may all the nations know that
it and saw Telyanin's horse at the porch.
it and the collective will of all the other animals is vested in
it and the retreating troops were filling it. Why should that cause
it as for the French vanguard; Rostov, as a careful squadron
it at once to the general on duty."
it at the banquet, and then that same face pale, quivering, and
it be said of each of you: "He was in the great battle before Moscow!"
it becomes softer, and can be moved in the transverse axis of the
it before the alcohol is injected. The treatment by injection of alcohol
it bulges into the pharynx in the region of the tonsil, in some cases
it burn, I could not know by the holy spirit!"
it causes a spindle-shaped enlargement of the shaft, which in the case
it comes to resemble a cyst. On the other hand, the cartilage may
it could not be done, because the flagging spirit of the troops
it defines this freedom by the laws of reason, and so history is a
it does in the tertiary period of acquired syphilis. It should be
it does one good. It uplifts the soul to see such men as the old count
it down. At the time of the meeting at Tilsit he asked the names of
it empty and that the nurse had been hiding the dead baby. He drew the
it extended the commission's power over oil pipe lines, express
it fails, the old operation should be considered, but it is a more
it flourished. While slavery lasted, the economy of the South was
it formed a considerable part of the population.
it goes off with the rest of the charge, and is often buried in the
it had "too much weight in the democratic part of the constitution."
it had appeared. The count sat on the sofa between two guests who were
it had been cleared of the enemy were most diverse and personal, and
it had been from the cold, ours would not have rotted either. 'But,'
it had to perish, bleeding from the mortal wound it had received at
it had to undo the Clayton-Bulwer treaty, made with Great Britain in
it happened in the greatest of all known wars.
it happened that all three countries sent battleships to the Samoan
it hard, except by a great effort, to realize the danger and the
it has been called _lupus elephantiasis_. The tuberculous infection
it he found it was a road. Having come out onto the road he reined
it he went blind. And he dreamed that the Holy Virgin Mother of the
it heals from the bottom.
it in other directions, in the use of massage, and the induction of
it in the kitchen would have cared to eat, so Anna Pavlovna served
it in the stillness of the night when he slept. Nicholas suddenly
it increases sufficiently to fill the cavity, may bring about cure. The
it is admitted, was far from satisfactory to the British government and
it is always related to the will of one or of several men who have
it is called, but in the fact that he alone understood the
it is common, for example, in lymph glands, in bones and joints, in the
it is dangerous here... the enemy is near... because... I am giving
it is drawing the products of the upper Mississippi through the same
it is hour-glass or dumb-bell shaped, as is well illustrated in the
it is impossible to feel the affected vein until the swelling has
it is in a straight line with the thigh (Billroth). A general anaesthetic
it is located in the marrow. The term _epiphysitis_ has been applied to
it is not worth running the risk of attempting to save it. If, in
it is of the same shape and density as the original shaft, while its
it is only by his efforts that the whole population under his rule
it is positive except in so far as it is modified by the results of
it is possible to restore mobility, the new joint is apt to be
it is prepared. Its curative effects would appear to depend upon the
it is rarely called for. In the case of a metacarpal or metatarsal bone,
it is ready for use. Moschcowitz has found that the tensile strength of
it is so beautiful out in the fields, the little town presented a
it is sometimes necessary to employ considerable pressure to stop the
it is sometimes subnormal. The pulse is small, feeble, rapid, and
it is spoken of as _internal_. The blood may infiltrate the connective
it is strong, one commanding all the wisdom and talent of America that
it is typical of them all. Some had seen fighting with the French and
it is usually solitary, and is easily removed with scissors. The
it is, brothers," said he. "Mother Moscow, the white..." his voice
it is, ready," said Platon, smiling and unfolding the shirt he had
it may be found that the muscles in the immediate neighbourhood of the
it may extend from this to aponeuroses, ligaments, periosteum, and the
it may give place to a hard node. In some cases the gumma softens in the
it may increase in size, ulcerate, and fungate. The amount of pigment
it means that we have deserved it, it's not for us to judge. If the
it might be, should be dragged to the lockup by his hair'? (How
it might cease and the sky clear, but after a short break it began
it might compromise the young Countess Rostova and so he wanted to
it occurred to him: if the answer to the question were contained in
it occurs near the end of a long bone the limb frequently assumes a
it on the fire.
it once was, a considerable proportion of the patients recovering. In
it one of the least significant parts of the field.
it out of this position; that here was the Toulon that would lift
it over and began kissing first one knuckle, then the space between
it over the tendon.
it paid to serve him. Rostov patted the horse's neck and then his
it plates and spicules of soft porous bone. The new bone may be so
it polite to return the young count's compliment, Ilagin looked at his
it presents the appearance of a finely reticulated sponge.
it really dissent. The West heartily favored internal improvements, the
it really..." But he did not say what "it really" was. "For the
it resembles Caesar and Alexander the Great and is therefore good.
it said nothing about the seizure of American sailors, the destruction
it seemed as if he were not interested in the import of the words
it seemed as if the black spaces were clouds. Sometimes the sky seemed
it seemed to her that someone was there standing behind the screen
it seemed to him that the society of women was rather derogatory to
it seems.... They say the other day Matthew Ivanych Platov drove
it shall become a law. But in all such cases the votes of both Houses
it shows active movements. The organism is readily destroyed by heat,
it soon became clear that there was danger ahead. Between the extreme
it spreads is influenced by the anatomical arrangement of the tissues,
it suggested the liveliness of a fourteen-year-old boy, and yet it was
it swept away the last vestiges of slavery. So with the passing of the
it takes some time for the bacteria to produce a sufficient dose of
it tends to spread to those along the carotid sheath: when the posterior
it to the Emperor."
it took one's breath away, the rate we flew. We came across a train of
it under the bast matting and cover it with hay--that's the way!"
it up. Several people in the crowd rushed at the coachman. Seeing this
it upon the attention of the country. Finally the manufacturers yielded;
it was a combined service of prayer on the occasion of the Emperor's
it was agreed that whoever became "King" should have the right to kiss
it was argued in defense of the army that the ordinary rules of warfare
it was called, enraged the populace. A radical party, known as
it was decided to move to Tarutino. Only when the army had got
it was full of the naked white bodies of soldiers with brick-red
it was good, indeed excellent. Moreover, the Rostovs' affairs were
it was impossible for cavalry to act among the bushes and broken
it was impossible in the heat of battle to say what was happening at
it was impossible to forbid the soldiers to express their love of
it was necessary for the sovereign to arouse a warlike spirit in the
it was now with the inhabitants of Moscow. It was long since people
it was out of the question for her to refuse him. And therefore
it was pleasant, after his reception by the Austrians, to speak if not
it was simply a fortified point on the left flank--and that the battle
it was worked out into a system early in the reign of Charles II
it was, the disorder was readily and naturally attributed to the
it were a bleeding artery. The tissues are then stitched over it and the
it were forever washed away from his imagination and memory the
it were in any way unsuitable. But on the contrary, my papa and
it were prepared to remain so for a hundred years; but the moment
it were, the breathing of that great and beautiful body.
it with one finger. The yard porter, his arms akimbo, stood smiling
it with their own hands. A free soil nourished the spirit of freedom.
it would be better to put A in B's place and B in D's, or on the
it would operate, or whether it was within the power of Congress to
it would roll on its back, yelping with delight, now bask in the sun
it! Aren't there plenty of troops on the march? Let him in, indeed!
it" (he corrected himself) "has shown or displayed in the battle of
it's definite and one is rid of the old tormenting doubt." Pierre held
it, and involuntarily waded knee-deep in the bog.
it, and looked at Telyanin. The lieutenant was looking about in his
it, and so the melody that unexpectedly came to his mind seemed to him
it, appeared on the threshold with a shawl round her head.
it, as, for example, in the removal of piles, or in opening the bowel in
it, but the next day the following communication was received from
it, fingered his papers, closed the bureau again, and sat down at
it, or because the boy standing below wants to eat it?
it, slink in among the French, or walk more than thirty miles in a
it, the union was older than the states; it was created before the
it," Ilagin was saying at the same time, breathless from his gallop
it," and she rushed forward so that the maids who were tacking up
it--far stronger, as though this feeling of his was subject to the law
it. But the swords were drawn back from him and he was at once
it. Excuse me, Vicomte--I must tell it in Russian or the point will be
it. He did not, and could not, understand the meaning of words apart
it. It was calm, and at intervals the bugle calls and the shouts of
it. She knew that the sole weapon against him was prayer, and she
it. She said her only consolation was the fact that the princess
it. She waited till the valet had set down the coffee things and
it. She was going straight on through the conservatory, neither seeing
it. Some were using their ramrods, others putting powder on the
it. Such, for example, were the Railway Brotherhoods with more than half
it. This operation is most successful when the pain is due to the nerve
it. Two of the commanders of large parties--one a Pole and the other a
it. When the king was executed and a radical democracy set up, American
it; I don't in the least understand why men can't live without wars.
it; gives the singles and snatches the doubles!"
itching and burning, and of great sensitiveness of the scar, even to
itching are attended with pain, and the skin becomes of a violet or
its advance into the heart of Russia late in the season without any
its aid. Both the Democrats and Republicans approved the idea, but it
its attraction to the earth, because its stalk withers, because it
its authors. The vote in the Commons stood 205 in favor to 49 against;
its breakfasts, lunches, dinners, and suppers, provided out of the
its calamitous condition was the sending of Lauriston to Kutuzov's
its charter in 1684, and the new instrument granted seven years later
its continuity or torn from its attachment to bone. The site of rupture
its convention in 1919, the Federation went on record as "opposed to
its effects upon the life and destiny of the American people; for beyond
its examination is great, and where the causes of the action are
its first representative assembly appeared. As the towns of
its frequency during the earlier years of life, has been called _the
its general aspect was unchanged. The old footman, who met Pierre with
its insignificance compared to the magnitude of the events, and by its
its jurisdiction the equal protection of the laws.
its language and its appeal. It denounced the practice of allowing
its language or the severity of its indictment give it a secure place in
its lumen, when the collateral circulation is not sufficiently free to
its manufacture for the Western markets may be said to be one of the
its margin of attachment or pedicle the superficial temporal artery, is
its maximum three or four months after the division of the nerve.
its new bed. When these conditions are fulfilled the tissues of the
its numerical strength, and led by inexperienced commanders as the
its onset and progress, the patient usually being able to go about.
its openings or cloacae, and is mainly responsible for the increase in
its original architecture; in extreme cases the shadow of the femur
its parents a child he had saved from the flames. Why had he fought
its powers directly from them. "It is," said Webster, "the people's
its pressure effects, and of the condition of the pulses beyond, may
its progress is slow, the infiltration of the bone is usually more
its race. A botanist notices that the bee flying with the pollen of
its returning in the new scar. The application of radium is, so far as
its security in time of war; by making use of the labor of women and
its selection and the way in which it is fashioned; for example, a flap
its shaft towards the end. The maximum thickening and tenderness usually
its sheath. In some of the larger arteries the sheath assumes the form
its sovereign and independent character" in forming the Southern union.
its subject on the path it now follows, seeking the causes of events
its supplies. Subsequently the inactivity of the French (who even
its upper part, applying a ligature at the upper and lower ends of the
its vicinity or by callus following fracture of an adjacent bone. The
its way into the vein and so does not escape into the tissues. Even if a
its way through it, and often spreads widely between it and the
its wheels go round. A third asserts that the cause of its movement
itself after a thorough trial, or if the disease relapses after apparent
itself as the result of the will of one man or of several men.
itself bore eloquent testimony to the high quality of the American
itself but by its mysterious significance: by the rapturous joy that
itself clinically by spasms of the muscles of mastication. It is almost
itself existed as before at the capital of the nation. This concession
itself he appeared in his place at the given moment and, uniting the
itself to her a loud rattle of the door handle struck painfully on her
itself, a petty German town, Rostov saw the Emperor again. In the
itself, or together with the brevis, can be felt on the lateral aspect
itself--_delayed tetanus_. Usually, however, the wound is inflamed and
jauntily back on one side of his head. As he rode up to the camp he
jaw, came out of the room. Prince Andrew turned to him, but the doctor
jealousies, and turbulence of the people at times almost stagger my
jennies of Manchester and the docks of Yokohama.
jerky steps down the line. He was evidently pleased at his own display
jerky steps to the front of the regiment and examined it from a
jobs asked in return by the members who hold out against him. Does a New
jocose as in the former Chigirin talks. Pierre pondered over these
join the army, with such passionate girlish adoration that her smile
joined Orlov-Denisov. Excited and vexed by the failure and supposing
joined by France in a common war on the English empire, Lord North
joined in a great parade to celebrate the fall of the Bourbons. Mingled
joined in political uprisings against the king.
joined the Freemasons he had experienced the feeling of one who
joining battle, turned to the right and reached Malo-Yaroslavets,
joint affected, or those of all the bones of the limb. This is well seen
joint are withdrawn, the iodoform is injected; and this may require to
joint becomes enormously swollen, loses its normal contour, and the ends
joint becomes swollen, red, and glistening, with engorgement of the
joint is wobbly or flail-like from stretching and destruction of the
joint lesions by injury or by movement of the joint under anaesthesia, or
joint may be available for inspection. The methods of Kocher, which
joint, filling up its pouches and recesses, and spreading over the
joint. In the early stage the swelling is elastic, doughy, and
joints and tendon sheaths, and is liable to the same forms of disease.
joints where it is desired to restore the function of the articulation.
joints, or over the ribs and sternum, usually results from the bursting
joints--for example, those of the wrist.
joints. Even division of both the ulnar and the median nerves above the
joints. Limitation of movement and locking at the hip-joint when due to
jostle and tease some British regulars stationed in the town. Things
jostling masses of Russian troops. At the bend of the Danube, vessels,
journalists, as the expression of their age.
journals although it did not accurately represent the state of opinion.
journey he found himself in the open world and saw hundreds of new
journeyed far to fight under the _fleur-de-lis_ of France when the
journeys and occupations, the war, and so on. The preoccupation and
journeys, of perils by sea and among the heathen, philosophic arguments,
journeys. Funds were raised and secret agents sent into the South to
joyful and solemn was aroused among the soldiers of the convoy and the
joyful feeling in the depth of his heart. In one place the peasants
joyfully (as though she had not expected it) to the charm of the notes
joyfully at the baby when the nurse brought it to him and nodded
joyfully, when warm steady rain began to fall on the dry and thirsty
joylessly passing the best years of her life in fear and constant
joyous laugh, having finished the dance. "Well done, niece! Now a fine
joyously festive mood reigned in the city. Everyone believed the
joys and sorrows. You are fortunate, for the latter are generally
joys of his life; and the burning of an arm with a ruler as a proof of
judge all these affairs and felt that only in the regiment would
judge of farming and an end in himself. At first he watched the serfs,
judged by the cautious movements of those who crowded round the
judges. Other members of the convention were stoutly opposed to such
judgeships, thus depriving the "midnight appointees" of their posts.
judging by the respect the guards showed him--entered the coach
judging others, and suddenly, at the sound of the service, she felt
judgment of what was good and bad. Only when he had understood the
judiciary whom Washington appointed, from the Chief Justice, John Jay,
jugular vein after operations in the neck, and the wound must be opened
jumped awkwardly back into the room, tripping over his spurs.
jumped up and rushed from the room as fast as her nimble little feet
jumped up from the sofa, seized Boris under the elbow in his quick,
jumping or dancing; of the adductors of the thigh in gripping a horse
junction of the muscular and tendinous portions. When rupture takes
junction with the forces that were advancing from Russia, without
junction, and the surfaces of the diaphysis and epiphysis are opposed to
junctions caused by the original disease.
junctions results in abnormal height of the skeleton or _giantism_ as a
junctions. Conversely, excessive growth of bone at the ossifying
junctions; the forehead low and vertical, and the parietal and frontal
juncture General Sheridan was dispatched to the Mexican border with a
juncture the governments of Argentina, Brazil, and Chile tendered their
jurisdiction of any other State; nor any State be formed by the junction
jurisdiction over us." Thus self-government made its way across the
jurisdiction, among other things, over appeals from the interstate
jury, however, Adams warned the British government against its course,
jury; and such trial shall be held in the State where the said crimes
just above the external malleolus in women of neurotic temperament. They
just above the origin of the coeliac artery and at the bifurcation.
just as a sailor is always surrounded by the same decks, masts, and
just as indifferently quiescent till the moment when motion is
just as the officer came up to it a man in a gray coat with a shaven
just as the velocity of a falling body increases as it approaches
just in the shape of a man, like an officer--comes in and sits down to
just out of the Cadet College, who was zealously commanding the two
just passed. Prince Andrew was struck by the changed expression on
just such gratefully religious ones, with offerings of icons and the
just take out the top one."
just the same smile of agreement with which for fifteen years he had
just the same way I thought there was something lacking in her."
just then the adjutant had come in and interrupted him. The
just think of the fellow's audacity, lying, and obstinacy!"
just what she needed. While attending to him she bore the anxiety
just where he had been ordered to look for the commander in chief,
justice, all security and repose in the social order."
justice. All through the western part of the state the revolt spread,
justifiable, if the patient urgently desires it, to amputate lower than
justification for being gloomy. For the same reason they are always
justification in the belief that among the hundreds of thousands who
justifications of the collective action that is performed, the less is
justifications of the events have no common sense and are all
justified on the ground that it was mere retaliation against Great
justified the declaration; namely, the British had been encouraging the
justify his hero says that he was drawn to the walls of Moscow against
justly earned honor of being for the moment at the center of the world's
keen interest in the whole affair. You know she is very gracious to
keenly appreciated by the leaders in the Continental Congress. They were
keenly directed on the internal changes that were being undertaken
keep me from returning to the country. But now, at the commencement of
keeper, fell face downward on the pavement.
keeping the appeal, the bulletin, and the other orders to take with
keeping the bedclothes on the patient, or even in keeping him in bed.
keeping this work in the same format with its attached full Project
keeping this work in the same format with its attached full Project
keeping till I should be in bed. The bolts? No, I told him about them.
keeping up discharge, and if the body is removed the sinus usually
kept absolutely dry--as, for example, by the picric acid method of
kept away from everyone in the house and felt at ease only with her
kept extended; and by active movements--the patient flexing the limb at
kept glancing at his master with whom he had lived on the best of
kept silent when the subject did not relate to himself, but in
kept steadily rising as assemblies were dissolved, the houses of
kept the peasant families together in the largest groups possible, not
keratitis, the eyes should be protected from the light by smoked or
keratitis_, the relationship of which to inherited syphilis was first
keys and joined the peasants and had not appeared when Alpatych sent
kill him, and either perish or put an end to the misery of all Europe-
kill one another. And corresponding to the event its justification
killed by a cannon ball--struck in the breast before our regiment."
killed two of the cubs and the borzois three. The huntsmen assembled
killed, you are a fool and are lost for certain. But go with the
killing Napoleon and his calculations of the cabalistic number of
kind, that is the chief thing," thought Princess Mary; and fear, which
kind. He insisted that they were the outcome of "natural economic
kind. In the winter of 1904 there broke out between Japan and Russia a
kindled in her face now. That happened only when, as was the case that
kindly eyes from Prince Andrew to the staff officer.
kindly, jocular face of the general, he took him aside and in an
kindly, promised not to forget him, distinguished him above the
kinds: for example, the secretion of certain glandular organs, such as
king for a redress of the general grievances. The immediate dissolution
king in council, forcing his opponent to follow him across the sea. In
king of England," he observed in 1820. "During the thirty or forty
king of Spain turned for help to the friendly powers of Europe that
king was cautious. Then the unexpected happened. Burgoyne, hemmed in
king's government to the Congress' tyranny." In an address to the king
king, he retorts and asks me if I take him for an idiot." To the charge
kings, commanders, and ministers and propounding the historians' own
kings, then the dukes. The Russian army, expecting Napoleon to take
kissed Princess Mary's hand. She did not know how she found the
kissed everyone, the tutors and governesses made their bows, and
kissed her mother, Natasha got up and went to the door.
kissed her on the lips that wore a mustache and had a smell of burnt
kissed her warmly. Anatole went up to kiss the little princess' hand.
kissed him on the neck instead.
kissed the boy he got up quickly, took out his handkerchief, and
kissed the icon as a child does with naively pouting lips, and again
kissed the old prince's cold and stiffened hand.
kitchen for them to try. That beverage was already known to the French
knapsack and flask, and swung his heavy person easily into the saddle.
knaves at the cost of fools?"
knaves than others" and his methods were colored by his belief. On the
knee except along the course of the long saphenous nerve on the medial
knee joints were infected from the cellular tissue.
knee seldom succeeds, is explained by the fact that the vascular
knee, or on one or other side of the olecranon in the elbow. In most
knee_ it frequently occurs in relation to the prepatellar bursa and to
knees for her hand; and the same feeling of pity, tenderness, and love
knelt down before the altar to which she was led. The enchanting,
knew (or rather felt at the bottom of his heart) that by resigning
knew German, translated what the German said to the captain and gave
knew of Prince Andrew, who also was evidently no favorite of hers, the
knew or cared where the Philippines were. Certainly there was in the
knew that his letter would be read by the Emperor, and therefore
knew that none of the words now uttered by Napoleon had any
knew. It was already past midnight, the hour when Karataev was usually
knew... it's the devil knows what!"
knife or scissors and the wound purified with antiseptics of the
knife or sharp spoon. The base also should be excised, and any bone
knife was found under the old merchant's pillow. He was tried,
knife, cut something, closed the knife, placed it under the head of
knitted railways; or how, like the tentacles of a great monster, the few
knives and the munching of the lieutenant.
knocked against the very region of his face where it was rising. But
knocked down in a carriage accident on the street. Organisms may be
knoll on the left, near which some troops could be seen.
knot, was crouched feet and all in the corner of her sofa, nervously
know Dmitri Sergeevich? Those are his quarters," and he pointed to the
know and discuss so minutely and acutely all the recent European
know how to dance, had liked sitting in this room to watch the
know how to hide what I feel." As he spoke he kept glancing with the
know it and are sufficiently Teutonic to carry it out successfully. The
know quite well that what I propose is the only thing possible."
know that he fell in with the Rostovs.... What a strange coincidence!"
know that pair of women's gloves?" (He referred to the Masonic
know the Emperor spoke to him most graciously. Annette and I were
know the number of your battalions as exactly as I know my own. You
know the real state of French public opinion."
know this and moved the troops forward according to his own ideas
know which had behaved better during those awful moments--the father
know why she had to, she knew the meeting would be painful, but felt
know yourself that last winter the count made a will by which he
know! The Prussians are up in arms now. The Austrians, you see, are
know!" and the Frenchman with the spot on his cheek ran back to his
know, 'a pet of a trader,'" said the adjutant smiling. "They asked
know, and know for certain, that the enjoyment of doing this good is
know, my dear, whether the will and letter were written, and whether
know," muttered the old man, and after looking Natasha over from
knowledge, from the point of view of a trained British officer, was
knowledge, observation, and experience, but had he possessed all the
known as "force bills," providing for the use of federal authorities,
known as "lipping" of the articular margins, and also into other
known as Sons of Liberty and Daughters of Liberty: the former including
known as _cancer en cuirasse_. Although the cancer cells constantly
known as _farcy_, and follows infection through an abrasion of the skin,
known as employment managers, whose task it was to study the relations
known as the Boxer uprising, compelled the United States to join with
known as the _venom_.
known in its entirety and life. The Trinity--the three elements of
known to arrest the disease when other measures have failed to give
known to the Imperial family as well as to all Moscow and
known to the Russians as the Knoll Battery or Raevski's Redoubt, and
known, it is believed to be due to degenerative changes in the semilunar
known, so much appreciated by everyone. The other day at the
knows the mental condition of him who committed the action, and
l'Empereur!" just as they had cried "Vive l'Empereur!" at the sight of
l'ennemi!"*[2] In spite of the animation of his speech, Bilibin did
labelled as confidently and accurately as can be the cortical areas in
labia, are separated by sublimate wool. In the ulcers of later secondary
labor and capital and municipal administration, which the earlier
labor and to win elections. Like the other parties they put forward
labor conditions should not be made unduly onerous by the war and
labor made it impossible for the companies, the proprietors, or the
labor on the Pacific Coast did the federal government spread the first
labor would in time be so abundant that slavery would disappear as the
labor, only to abandon the idea and go in for individual ownership of
labor. At the annual conventions of the American Federation of Labor
labor. The approval of socialism, he maintained, would split the
labored with his own hands in the fields and forests. He sold his rice
labored, by means none too nice, to wring from the Mexican republic the
labouring men and sailors, and not infrequently follows an injury in the
lacerated over an area of two or three inches around the opening made by
lacerated wounds with the _bacillus aerogenes capsulatus_, usually in
lacerated wounds, much can be done to avert the conditions which lead to
lacerated, so that the function of the limb would be seriously impaired,
laceration of the fascia that holds the nerve in its groove; it is
lack of news, the loss of Kutuzov, and the death of Helene.
lack the bump of paternity."
lad," he said, addressing his favorite soldier. "And where is the
lad--especially dreadful because of its simplicity--and the faces of
laden. The beekeeper opens the lower part of the hive and peers in.
ladies in satin and ermine cautiously descended the carriage steps
ladies-" He turned with the same request to Denisov who was also a
ladies? For us that movement of the peoples from west to east, without
lady on one of the boulevards whom he visited of an evening. He led
lady she now, keeping Pierre close beside her, entered the room even
lady, adding the priest's clerical title, as if she had no opinion
laggards, came two battalions of the Sixth Chasseurs in fine order.
lagging in any way behind them, Pierre went to the Three Hills gate.
lagging, the activities of women in other directions were steadily
laid back (Karay was pinning her by the throat), was the happiest
laid it on the table (made of a door with its hinges still hanging
laid open the route, making Franklin, Missouri, and later Fort
laid out their farms in the Willamette Valley when the slogan
laid out their small farms, and worked as "sturdy yeomen on the soil,"
laid out. The fences and gates were new and solid; two fire pumps
laid siege to the door of Congress and were admitted to the union in
laid the foundations of fortunes in a region destined to become one of
laid to rest in England and the representative principle thoroughly
laid up for three months. He had what the doctors termed "bilious
lament within a few years the proofs of his folly. The difficulties of
lamented, would fasten slavery upon the country forevermore. "No living
laminated clot and erosion of bodies of vertebrae. The intervertebral
laminated clot. Near the blood-current the clot is soft, red, and
lancinating twinges. Should doubt remain as to the presence of pus,
land between the Atlantic and the Pacific; thus the course of economy
land concentrating in the hands of capitalists.... The fruits of the
land in the Northwest based on old English charters and Indian treaties.
land owners in time and it afforded an easier life, the renter being, to
land tenure found in the proprietary colonies, in the seaboard regions
land was gone. They could not, therefore, be dispersed widely among the
land was steadily mounting. The free land, once the refuge of restless
land, a sum amounting to $19,000 at the time of the Revolution. The quit
land, executions against the property could be obtained in federal
land, it left to the slow working of time.
land. It was in this way that "the frontier speculator paved the way for
landed property to his eldest son. This prevented the subdivision of
landowner in the Vilna province, offered his country house for the
landowners, preparing for reviews and being reviewed by the Emperor
lands and he made a special effort to attract peasants from the Rhine
lands, were compelled to go to the border; but in a large part the path
lands. In the wake of the fur hunters, forest men, and farmers came
lanes were deserted. The air was full of smoke and the smell of
language against his policies. Even Otis, regarded by the loyalists as a
language and the traditions of England whence came the founders of
language and understand the government of our country. Congress was
language of his acceptance speech. The whole program of Populism he now
language, but the only response which it evoked from Germany was a
language, to grasp the hidden meaning of their words, and felt akin to
language, very different in tone and meaning from the involved reasoning
languages and races, the differences in civilization all combined to
languages, then the historians assume a grave responsibility in adding
lantern of life and regarding them now in the cold white daylight of
laparotomy for perforated or lacerated intestine. In the majority of
laparotomy, the parts are immediately douched with lymph charged with
lapsed, it was renewed and flourished in the eighteenth century.
large Venetian mirror in the wall, and in her trodden-down shoes
large armed force; General Grant urged the use of the American army to
large black eyes that seemed more prominent than ever, lay on the
large body of dissenters. In 1892 the Populists made heavy inroads upon
large boned, fleshy hand. Neither the hand nor a single muscle of
large claims in the territory thus annexed to Quebec.
large communicating branches may develop between the two.
large dark ballroom. All was the same: there were the same old card
large enough to allow of its escape, but the surgeon has usually to
large expenditures for the education of the colored population. By the
large gland (the tonsillar gland) which lies behind the posterior belly
large group was destroyed, as well as the old habits and traditions,
large hoard of gold. "On the appointed day," wrote the assistant
large leather sofa from Prince Andrew's study into the bedroom. On
large majority of the American people were without doubt on the side of
large monthly purchases of silver and for the issue of notes redeemable
large numbers annually to the Southern colonies and to Ireland, Spain,
large part of that water-borne traffic which made it "the Mediterranean
large powers were by no means the sole concern of the convention. Its
large prizes out of the forfeitures and penalties.
large scale, reducing the appalling, annual destruction of timber.
large table covered with books and plans, the tall glass-fronted
large tumours the bleeding is formidable. In many cases electrolysis is
large vessels are associated with an external wound; the profusion of
large village in the vicinity of the camp, the immense number of
large, almond-shaped eyes at the ground before her. Evidently she
large, newly furnished Petersburg house, the happy possessor, as
larger carnivora and the gorilla; evidence of it has also been found in
larger did that subject grow and the weaker and more inadequate did
larger or smaller unit as the subject of observation--as criticism has
larger proportion of women, the patient has no knowledge of having
larger self-government for Porto Rico had been among the policies of the
larger trunks the lymph may escape in considerable quantity as a
larger, named trunks. The injuries of smaller, unnamed vessels are
largest hall and to the big table. Not only was Pierre's attempt to
larks returned), and, forcing open a loosely closed latch, set the
last Thursday--sold flour to the army at nine rubles a sack. Will
last fragment was swept away, the country took little note of the fact.
last gains a real victory, destroying the spell of the invincibility
last happy event in the family of the old Rostovs. Count Ilya Rostov
last long? It's all the Club and his easygoing nature. Even in the
last man falling a victim to the sword. Vengeance was swift. Within
last medicine and one must wait and see, that the malady was chiefly
last night, and today. The Emperor sees with regret that the picked
last night--the tune of which she had all the way been trying to get
last out until, at the first pause, the guests rise with a rustle of
last phase of the war in 1918, several battalions of infantry were in
last sent Dolokhov the whole forty-three thousand rubles and
last spike was driven in the Northern Pacific at Helena, Montana. Lake
last spring his wound reopened and the doctor said he ought to go away
last syllable of the general's name like a Frenchman, "has been
last the time had come to experience the joy of an attack of which
last time. And suddenly, in the most casual tone, which made him
last to change. The rate at which this play of colours proceeds is so
last words of the statutes and these remained in his mind.
lasted some time, or has frequently relapsed, the wall of the bursa
lata of the thigh, the characteristic signs are obscured and a
late at night on the twenty-fourth? A Cossack patrol would have
late master--may the kingdom of heaven be his--has remained here,
late, listening to the gypsies and other singers.
late," said a voice from behind the fire with a repressed laugh.
later against the French. They were all subjects of the same
later by the formation of a traumatic aneurysm.
later conferred upon them the ordinary territorial form of government.
later eight American women, five of them in Quaker costume, attended the
later for conspiracy. During the twenties and thirties, local labor
later regarded as a mere union of monarchs to prevent the rise and
later the Congress prepared another amendment sanctioning the levy of
later the National Sugar Refining Company, of New Jersey, started with a
later the Young Guards stationed behind the knoll moved forward.
later this is replaced by cicatricial tissue. As a result of the
later with the news that the commander of the dragoons had already
later years the tibia may present alterations in shape resulting from
later, and during the remainder of the pregnancy 2-grain mercury pills
later, fibrous tissue, is formed. This may replace the tuberculous
later, four years after the admission of California to the union, the
later, in the congressional elections, the Greenbackers swept whole
later, the federal Constitution was being framed, the mechanics watched
later, the jugular vein is ligated with this object in cases of
later. The meaning of this for the farmers in debt--and nearly
later. The sponsor for the repeal spoke of commerce interrupted, debts
lateral aspect of the limb. With a strong piece of wood the handkerchief
lateral aspect of the nose or in the vicinity of the lower eyelid
lateral malleolus, the medial condyle of the humerus, or femur, or over
laterally. The loss of sensibility depends upon whether the nerve is
latest cut, such as no one else yet had in Moscow, and boots of the
lather and the men to flush.
laugh as much as you like, but all the same Bonaparte is a great
laugh, "when the steward, a man I know, ran out and asked me whether I
laughed at them as the "men milliners, the dilettanti, and carpet
laughed spasmodically as he stood in the porch waiting for the vicomte
laughed. Prince Andrew heard the nickname "Sila Andreevich" and the
laughing, "Und vivat die ganze Welt!" Though neither the German
laughing. Kutuzov turned round. The officer evidently had complete
law abolished the duty which the East India Company had to pay in
law and thus became interested in the election of judges and lawmakers.
law impairing the obligation of contracts, or grant any title of
law might be reversed by the same body "as it may hereafter be
law of primogeniture, which at the death of a lord transferred all his
law of the state applicable to this agreement, the agreement shall be
law of the state applicable to this agreement, the agreement shall be
law was a significant beginning; but it left the main question of
law was aimed at the "cheap money" which the Americans were fond of
law was placed in the hands of the Secretary of Labor, W.B. Wilson, who
law which shall abridge the privileges or immunities of citizens of the
law-making through representatives in Parliament, and the idea was early
law. Members of the Maryland legislature, the mayor of Baltimore, and
law. Representatives of the unions sought support from the Democrats and
lawfully withdraw. It was this address that called into the arena
laws affecting the rights of states? The prohibition of child labor
laws binding the colonies in all cases whatsoever; and that the
laws invalid. In 1878 the Democrats even won a majority in the Senate
laws is only possible when we have quite abandoned the
laws of astronomy destroyed religion, and he utilized the law of
laws of the states; and "those sovereignties," far from possessing the
laws unenforced, the treasury empty, and the public credit gone, the
laws was put to a severe test in 1902. A strike of the anthracite coal
laws, and so, mingling with the townsmen, were drawn into the main
laws." As the Republicans had only forty-six of the ninety Senators, and
lawyers for increasing the costs of legal proceedings, against the
laxity of the ligaments, the joints can be moved beyond the normal
lay an open book. The book was the Gospel, and the white thing with
lay down his briefs and take up the sword. Anthony Wayne was a
lay down on the sofa, cleaning himself with his tongue and teeth.
lay down with his back to the fire, and immediately fell asleep. He
lay gazing at the sky on the field of Austerlitz and had later
lay in the east. The abandoned campfires were burning themselves out
lay in the fact that his plan had not been precisely executed. He kept
lay more than on all the others who took part in it. Never to the
lay on the table, again bound his eyes.
lay prone so that his face was not visible. The cavalry singers were
layer of the epidermis. The fluid may be clear, as in the blisters of a
layer, the interior shows no trabecular structure, and some of the many
layer--the epidermis, and the corium or true skin. The _epidermis_ is
layers of the skin, from mucous membranes, and into the substance of
layers so as to ensure primary union. If, on the other hand, there is
layers, caseation of the outer layers, and the further invasion of the
laying an excise tax on distilled spirits, for the purpose of increasing
lead ores of the northwest, some of them bringing slaves to work their
lead that column himself. When he had reached the village of Pratzen
lead the Old Guard into action. Ney and Berthier, standing near
lead to variations in the character of its contents. In some cases the
leader among the Pilgrims who founded their tiny colony of Plymouth in
leader from Nebraska once more rallied the Democrats around his
leader of Ohio, afterward banished to the South for his opposition to
leader since the days of the Revolution, but in legislative halls and
leader, Brigham Young, that they go into the Far West beyond the plains
leaders as a whole, the event was very embarrassing. They were taunted
leaders charged with responsibilities in the national field, were
leaders firmly grasped this fact about the middle of the eighteenth
leaders gathered around Washington were well aware of the excited state
leaders in the great republican commonwealth beyond the seas. Travelers,
leaders of these meetings. At the same time the first national suffrage
leaders on the seaboard who directed the course of national policy. It
leaders serves as an expression of the people's will or only some part
leaders they characterized as "wretched banditti ... the refuse and
leaders who, owing to the people's change of direction, are no
leaders, familiar with the writings of Locke, also took up his thesis in
leaders, particularly from the East, stemmed the silver tide by a
leaders, the advice was favorable to the plan. The treaty, duly drawn in
leaders, with a crowd of vagrants, and with Peter the Hermit,
leaders--driving from the work of reconstruction the finest talents of
leaders. Thus practical considerations were united with the spirit of
leadership in promoting the sections in which they had made their
leadership of Daniel Shays, a captain in the Revolutionary army,
leadership of Samuel Adams, resolved to resist the policy of renewed
leadership of the Czar, Alexander I, in the autumn of 1815, had entered
leadership of the tall lad were drinking in the dramshop that morning,
leadership, for they held the presidency during all the years, except
leading from the village of Stromilova to Dmitrovsk.
leading to a greater number of perforations of the intestine and more
leading to necrosis. The gangrenous process spreads with appalling
leading to reactionary haemorrhage. Should the wound become infected,
leading to thrombosis which first occludes the artery and then extends
leading, in the breast, to retraction of the nipple and overlying skin,
leads to a widespread destruction of tissue. It is also met with in the
leaf out of the Democratic book, they nominated, not Clay of Kentucky,
league of nations to guarantee peace and establish justice among the
leaned against the fence to save himself from falling.
leaning back and shouting something. Rostov saw nothing but the
leaning on his elbow for a long time, gazing at the shadows that moved
learned men was appointed to determine the merits of the conflicting
learned of her brother's wound only from the Gazette and having no
learned opinion bristling with historical examples, that the President
learned that Dolokhov the brawler, Dolokhov the bully, lived in Moscow
learned to respect both the talents and the simple character of the
learned. Spots appeared on his nose, the redness of which was
learning and even the patriotic feeling shown by Denisov, but despised
learning lessons in warfare they were also paying the bills. All the
learning the power of cooperation and union.
least an approximate equality in the conditions under which each man
least one of the French quartermasters who had been sent on in
least part of the dowry in advance, he would have to break matters
least proof of the fallibility of his theory in the disasters of
least resistance, tends to point at several places on the surface, or to
least sense in it for either the French or the Russians. Its immediate
least the part of it which bears the tumour. In the case of central
least tolerated the Kansas-Nebraska Bill, declaring that the startling
least, could lay aside the petition for the ballot and enjoy with the
least, was the view of many eminent statesmen, including no less a
least: "This bill provides for the making of changes in the legal tender
leather apron, such as the others wore, was put on him: he was given a
leather, tar, and ship timber. From the harbors along the Connecticut
leather--"saddle-back creaking." There may be swelling in the long axis
leave her for the rest of the evening.
leave of Rostov in the Club porch.
leave the hut till toward evening. Denisov had not yet returned. The
leave you cold a thousand times and the thousand and first time thrill
leave, he kissed her hand for the last time. "Don't go!" she said in a
leaves, silently led them to the edge of the forest.
leaving a gap which is speedily filled by blood-clot. In the course of a
leaving for the country.
leaving her he stood breathing deeply and watching the other dancers.
leaving the field to Carranza. For six years the new president,
leaving the northern and eastern sections in the status of a territory.
leaving the service just at the most critical moments. "The militia,"
leaving the theater Anatole came up to them, called their carriage,
leaving their seats, went up to "congratulate" the countess, and
leaving their villages to be devastated by the Cossacks, the
led in the pioneer movement; but through large sections of Tennessee and
led straight to the door of one of them.
led the fight against the new French principles which he feared might
led to consider their nation as a great power among the sovereignties of
left _in situ_ for from eight to fourteen days, according to the power
left after the charge.
left after the separation of the dead skin may be allowed to heal by
left arm is more often affected than the right. The lesion is seldom
left bank of the Danube and took up a position for the first time with
left bank of the Danube covered with pine forests, with a mystic
left breast, and stooping down pulled up the left leg of his
left common carotid in aneurysm of the transverse part of the aortic
left flank during the night and attack the French right flank the
left flank of the position. It was much later, when reports on the
left flanks, but in the center where the men with a flag of truce
left hand with his right, and reached the bushes. Behind these were
left her face, Anna Mikhaylovna entered the hall. Though she came upon
left home now for the first time after eighteen months again
left in position as long as it adheres to the raw surface. The packing
left of the highroad (from Moscow to Smolensk) and almost at a right
left side of the road, and without recognizing it he looked with
left side, while the other clutched his drooping pistol. His face
left the Republican party. Most of his supporters withdrew from the
left the country.
left the hut. The panes were rattling in the little windows and his
left the room.
left the room. Pierre looked at her timidly over his spectacles, and
left the wounded Bolkonski, and the doctor had to admit that he had
left to itself ruptures externally, leaving a sinus. The most
left to the tender mercies of a great power. Russia refused to take this
left toward the middle, unfastened, exposing their sunburned
left tracks in the deep wet snow between the place where they had been
left, having abandoned all the rest and all his cannon, and having
left, in the valleys and on the summits of the high ground, clouds
left, not far from the farthest cannon, was a small, newly constructed
left. Now what are you dawdling for?" she cried to the maids. "Get the
left?" thought Nicholas. "Are we getting to the Melyukovs'? Is this
leg all these last days. It was decided that the count must not go,
leg crossed over the other and stroking his left hand with the slender
leg which as you see does not want to march, I got that on the seventh
leg with more or less of a limp. Movements of the joint are permitted,
leg. When he had finished with the Tartar, whom they covered with an
legal as well as economic points. The Constitution gave Congress the
legal fees, that arise directly or indirectly from any of the
legal fees, that arise directly or indirectly from any of the
legislation, the provisions of this article.
legislation. Certainly after the establishment of independence, when
legislature approved the plan, but did not press it to a conclusion.
legislature of any State, the executive thereof may make temporary
legislature the disease was rife. Revenue officers permitted whisky
legislature thereof, is denied to any of the male inhabitants of such
legislature thereof; but the Congress may at any time by law make or
legislature who had been most zealous in their attacks on the insurgents
legislatures and the courts of law. It was waged, in the main, by secret
legislatures as to the futilities of a paralyzed Continental Congress.
legislatures in the South. The result of the amendment, as was
legislatures of the States concerned as well as of the Congress.
legislatures of the several States pursuant to the fifth article of the
legislatures of the states might determine, and the judges of the
legislatures to issue large sums of paper money. The currency fell in
legislatures, and private citizens, there was brought about the
legislatures, making fortunes by the inflation of securities, by
legislatures. The President was to be chosen by electors selected as the
legs and the old man at once began pulling off his boots. The other in
legs in their woolen stockings to the earthen floor and began
legs, and paced the room with her. There was an expression of carefree
leisure, he seemed the embodiment of the spirit of the new American
leisurely; when he saw those old Moscow ladies, the Moscow balls,
lending themselves to the mood around, were delicately green with
length of the long bones, the enlargements at the epiphysial junctions,
length of this passage to the stairs and, frowning and rubbing his
length portrait of Catherine the Great. The same people were still
length. This form is chiefly met with in the arch of the aorta, but may
lengths--which found expression in the tones and looks more than in
leniently. Then came the last straw. Women decided that they would
lesion of syphilis in unusual positions, such as the lip, finger, or
lesion of the vessels can be discovered. The bleeding occurs as an
lesion presents, on a small scale, all the anatomical changes that have
lesion then mainly affects the first dorsal nerve. There is tearing of
lesion, met with chiefly on the face and in the region of the external
lesion, which has obtained for it the name of "hard chancre," is its
lesions in the marrow.
lesions is the least dangerous to life. The commonest form of
lesions may be dusted with calomel the last thing at night. For deep
lesions of the nature of burns.
lesions similar to those observed in man, and also containing the
lesions than in those below the clavicle, which nearly always recover
lesions the least dangerous to life; but while it is the rule to recover
less any of those who did the actual fighting.
less deserving of sympathy and less the result of free will. The
less free than ever under the observation of all these "eyes of the
less insistent on punishment for the crime, or the acknowledgment of
less severe, and is referred to the parts that have been burned to a
less than a hundred prisoners, the Russian army which left that
less than a yard above the glow of the charcoal. Flakes of falling
lessened on paper. He did not know that where the steward had shown
lessens, and healing takes place by the formation of granulation
lesser light. The bandage was taken off his eyes and, by the faint
lesser understanding of the causes that led to the action.
lesson of the Tarutino battle and of the day before it, which
lessons have been learned in the hard school of war. Some may yet have
lessons in geometry were among the greatest delights of her life.
lest she should rouse the dozing baby.
let him know. I have informed him of the matter.
let off with a fine; a white servant guilty of the same unlawful conduct
let or hindrance to the developing of natural resources of unparalleled
let the reading begin but wound up the springs of a general
letter Prince Andrew pointed out to his father the danger of staying
letter and spirit of the fourteenth as well as all other amendments.
letter containing information about the orders to the French army
letter from Sonya freed him from the knot that fettered him and from
letter of the law carried into effect.
letter requested the count to send police officers to guide the troops
letter the old prince had replied affectionately, and from that time
letter to a mother who has given her all--her sons on the field of
letter to the Emperor begging him to recognize Pierre as legitimate,
letter to the governors, that the duration of the union would be short
letter, but had specially inserted in the rescript to Saltykov and had
letters that had come from the Archduke Ferdinand, who was in
letters to Nicholas from all the household were written and copied
letters to the Grand Duke Constantine Pavlovich, who commanded the
letters were the more vexed she felt. Her letters to him, far from
letting her and her parents feel that the childish relations between
leucocytes also show a proportionate increase (_eosinophilia_). The term
leucocytes but to lymphocytes. In isolated cases the temperature rises
leucocytes rises somewhat rapidly, increases while the condition is
leucocytes. In new-born infants the leucocyte count is abnormally high,
leucocytosis may be absent. The absence of leucocytosis in a disease in
leucocytosis, and sweating, mark the transition between inflammation and
leucocytosis, but the increase is due not to the polymorpho-nuclear
levee. The Emperor, though he met him twice, did not favor him with
level of the communication and accompanied by a continuous venous hum.
level of the law which Calhoun had supported in 1816. About the same
level of the surrounding skin, and so fill the gap with a fine velvety
levied a tax on incomes as authorized by the sixteenth amendment to the
liability to intercurrent complications. When the limb is quite useless,
liable to be dwarfed (Fig. 129). The finger should be immobilised in a
liable to be implicated by the upward spread of an aneurysm at the
liable to develop anaphylaxis and the mechanism by which it is
liable to occur when calcareous plates are exposed in the lumen of the
liable to suffer from manifestations which may affect the deeper tissues
liable. The scar becomes more and more conspicuous, is elevated above
liberal interpretation of the Constitution.
liberal policy, self-government was extended to the dependencies; but it
liberated at Princess Mary's wish from the cupboard where he had
liberation of iodine, which restrains the activity of the bacilli, and
liberties unjustly or in violation of the Constitution? Lincoln is ready
liberty and equality. Have people since the Revolution become happier?
liberty." The first step in this direction, the Clayton Anti-trust Act,
licking their lips and wiping them on the sleeves of their greatcoats.
lie vertically along the upper part of the great saphenous vein, and
lies before me, but why is the deputation from the city so long in
lies embedded in the axillary fascia and fat, and is often related to an
lies in a cavity a little larger than itself; the wall of the cavity is
lies in perfecting himself. We often think that by removing all the
lies in the smoke which the wind carries away.
lies not in the conquerors, nor even in armies and battles, but in
life and I shall leave the children... in an excellent position."
life and adding to its graces--the flaw in American culture that gave
life belonged to her and to the family. His wife's demands
life he led in the regiment and was able to find pleasure in that
life infringed the majesty and sacredness of the mystery that had been
life is unfavourable, and no satisfactory treatment of the disease has
life of the Far West also differed from that of the Ohio Valley. The
life so long associated with America was gone. The unity of the nation
life that the Countess Helene thought it necessary to speak severely
life though he loves death, for which--in spite of the purity and
life who are the subjects of pulmonary tuberculosis.
life without her. I cannot propose to her at present, but the
life, and the exhaustive literature now available on every aspect of it
life, and what to expect after it beyond the grave! How happy and calm
life, his disillusionment? Pierre was the only person to whom he
life, marked by the spreading mill towns of New England, New York, and
life, multitudinous and never-ending, form the very warp and woof of
life, the destiny of man, and the laws which govern the world. But who
life--not merely harming no one but necessary to the happiness of
life--we may allot Petersburg life, and especially the life of its
life. The Grimke sisters of South Carolina emancipated their bondmen,
life." These words are all the more remarkable because, in spite of
life; while others--such as the softer varieties of mammary cancer
lift his eyes from the colonel's athletic back, his nape covered
lifted themselves in the scale of culture above the savages of the
lifting it up from its bed, the pus being visible through the nail. The
ligament, and the name "Baker's cysts" has been applied to these.
ligament. By pressing with the fingers the pus may be displaced from one
ligament. When the epiphysis is intra-articular, as, for example, in the
ligament; the actual rupture may occur painlessly, more frequently a
ligaments, fasciae, or skin. As the structures on the flexor aspect are
ligaments, or may be the sequel of a purulent arthritis; the signs of
ligaments. When gangrene follows occlusion of the _external iliac_ or of
ligated above and below the point of communication; although the risk of
ligation of the artery. The continuity of the artery may be restored by
ligation of the hypogastric artery for haemorrhage in the buttock, of the
ligation of the lacerated vessels.
ligation of the superficial femoral artery in Scarpa's triangle or in
ligature is usually sufficient to rupture the inner and middle coats,
ligature without occluding the lumen. In the large veins, such as the
light enough to see a long way in the deserted street and it seemed
light falling from the window, she listened to the words of the
light he gazed now at the city and now at the plan, considering its
light of dawn and the dying campfires. Our columns ought to have begun
light of the burning spirit, Pierre, as in a dream, saw several men
light of the campfire, waving his uplifted arm.
light of the fire the slender, handsome figure of a young soldier
light sky hung the full moon. Forests and fields beyond the camp,
light, luxurious drawing room, went to the balcony door, took hold
lighting up the branches of trees heavy with hoarfrost.
lightly and joyously, nearer and nearer to their goal. Suddenly the
lightly falling snow and toward evening it began to clear. Through the
lightly touched on: their past life, plans for the future, Pierre's
lightly, and yet more lightly whirled the count, flying round Marya
lightning from the water, from the dew, and from the bayonets of the
lights and shouts in the enemy's camp. Rostov rode up to Bagration,
lights gather at the shore to lure the ship of state upon the rocks."
like a milk-white sea. Nothing was visible in the valley to the left
like a nightmare took possession of him, and all the unlucky accidents
like a schoolboy on holiday. Everyone--the stagecoach driver, the
like all previous wars. She did not realize the significance of this
like an amphitheater, extended before him in the clear rarefied
like an arrow piercing the earth--to remain fixed in a chosen spot,
like himself with eyes fixed on the cavalry below them.
like ivory, and the term _ivory exostosis_ is employed. When derived
like people who, recognizing the defects of paper money, decide to
like seeing a horse or a bear on the floor among the furniture and
like the boy." (She meant her little son.) "Oh, it's time to go to
like the cobwebs that float about in autumn and which Dessalles called
like the foaming combers of an advancing tide, went first. Then followed
like the others an enemy in regard to Anatole? As for Pierre, he
like the signboards at our Public Baths if I may say so. Ah, when
like the stroke of a whip is felt in the calf; there is marked
like to combine frivolity with the serious business of hunting.
like to ride over to the French camp with me? I have brought a spare
like were simply the product of Napoleon's misdirected will, and
liked giving a painful lash on the neck to some peasant who, more dead
liked to tell him. He gathered up the papers and with a bow to both,
liked. He did not concern himself with the interests of his own class,
likely the doctor."
likely to be mistaken for them. The diagnosis is sometimes only cleared
likely to draw England's sword into the scale? Lincoln counsels
likes her way of reading. She reads to him in the evenings and reads
likewise opposed the exercise by the Courts of the high power of passing
limb and its companion vein, so that arterial blood may reach the
limb as a whole_ would appear to predispose to the disease in one or
limb is immobilised should be that in which, in the event of subsequent
limb is placed at absolute rest, the elbow supported, and massage and
limb may for some days remain in a condition verging on gangrene, the
limb on the same side.
limb should be placed in the attitude which, in the event of stiffness
limb which affords best access, and which entails the least injury of
limb, an elastic bandage is applied some distance above the inflamed
limb, and there are often, especially during the night, exacerbations in
limb, between the middle of the thigh and the middle of the calf, the
limb, with the pad over the main artery, and the ends knotted on the
limb. Pain, located commonly at the insertion of the deltoid, is a
limb. The age and occupation of the patient must also be taken into
limb. There is often oedema of the leg and foot, especially when the limb
limb. When the whole length of the main trunk of the great saphena is
limbs so as to place them under the most favourable conditions to meet
limbs, because of the fact that secondary cancer of the femur nearly
limbs, headache and delirium, and the condition proves fatal in from
limbs, rapidly followed by paralysis and arrest of the circulation.
limbs, the function of the muscle that is removed may be retained by
lime salts may precede the formation of bone, as is seen in Fig. 111. In
lime salts; this condition may be widely diffused throughout the
lime trees fell on the snow and on the path. This path led to the
limit no mechanical disruption of the body could hasten the process of
limit the activities of any commander in chief. The activity of a
limit to the factories, forges, refineries, and railways that could be
limit. Everything not connected with the execution of the prince's
limitations and trespass upon the rights of citizens, Marshall argued,
limitations on the suffrage, decided that the House of Representatives
limitations prescribed in the case of a bill.
limited the number to 75,000, put their term of service at three months,
limited times to authors and inventors the exclusive right to their
limiting the scope of its application, so far as the suffrage was
limits of the infected area, and stringent precautions must be taken to
limits, and the child is often observed to twist its limbs into abnormal
line can be drawn between these processes, and the two may go on
line from the Missouri River to California and made grants of land and
line in couples and he himself rode along the line trying to master
line of action. But all these hints at what happened, both from the
line of demarcation to form and allowing the dead part to be separated.
line, as if their differences would be settled there amongst the
line; and the Austrian troops. But they all stood in the same lines,
lines of nationality; more liberty for the peoples of Austria-Hungary;
lines of power that had fallen from the hands of his distinguished
lines the more confident was the appearance of our troops. The
lines were indicated in the official record by asterisks or stars. Even
lines. If the lymphangitis affects an extremity, Bier's elastic bandage
lines: the cavalry in front, behind it the artillery, and behind
lingered over these images, repelling with horror only the last one,
lining membrane. While friction and pressure are the most evident
lint which is wrapped round the toe. Another favourite application is
lion, and the deep characteristically noble wrinkles of his
lip or tongue, to the mandible; in cancer of the uterus or intestine, to
lipoma_ (Fig. 159). Individual fringes may attain the size of a hazel
lipping and other hypertrophic changes in the ends of the bones are
lips and you want to go into the army! There, there, I tell you,"
liquefies, resulting in the formation of a cold abscess. In their
liquefy. The gumma does harm by displacing and replacing the normal
liquid starch; while the starch is drying the limb is kept elevated.
list (Pierre was sixth), and were led to the post. Several drums
listened and made out the word. It was "drink, drink, a drink!" Rostov
listened attentively to words spoken by important personages. At the
listened intently to the ebb and flow of these sounds.
listened to the Rhetor in silence, feeling from all he said that his
listened to the light click of the steel needles. "Can fate have
listened to, and he looked only at the person with whom he was
listened. "Do you hear?" he asked. Petya recognized the sound of
listening to him. Balashev said that in Russia the best results were
listening to his voice which reached her from the garden. Suddenly
listening to that noise which mingled in his imagination with the roll
listening to the general's report--which consisted chiefly of a
listening to the vicomte's story. Prince Vasili's words frightened
listless tired expressions, and feet that moved through the sticky mud
listless, and complains of extreme thirst. The temperature is usually
lit up Karataev's face as he told it, and the mystic significance of
lit up the whole of her thin, sickly face and made it beautiful. Her
literature of England furnished the basis of national unity. Most of the
little Bourienne, Anatole came to the conclusion that he would not
little above its insertion to its junction with the muscle. Gouty
little alarm while cheap land in the West was open to the discontented.
little behind the Emperor. The Apsheron men, excited by the Tsar's
little better. Oh, she is certainly the most charming woman in the
little consequence in practice. In the beginning they were viewed as
little discomfort, and may even be ignorant of the existence of the
little dust from the sleeve of his uniform, and going up to a mirror
little earth crumbled from the bank under the horse's hind hoofs.
little finger, the ulnar half of the ring finger, and that part of the
little foot, which he was then touching with his own under the
little girl, the little girl, what am I to do with her if she's not
little lamp was burning as usual. (The boy was afraid of the dark
little man in the gray overcoat got up and, having summoned
little meaning for him, that he paid no attention to it. The aunt
little nose, standing on the dam wiping himself with a towel, felt
little or no disability from the unilateral paralysis of the muscles of
little princess on hearing the news.
little princess, and having asked for a needle began tracing the Conde
little suffering. The usual complaint is of a sense of weight and
little while after the civil conflict came to a close, it was called
little, coughed, and was always low-spirited. The doctors said that
live in the presence of oxygen are spoken of as _anaerobes_. The great
live with the regiment. The men soon accepted Pierre into their
lived in the tropics.
lived until 1836. This age, therefore, was the "age of the fathers." It
lived with the squadron commander.
livelier. The other couples could not attract a moment's attention
livelihood from the soil.
livelihood mounted into the millions and industries spread across the
liveliness he began chaffing Pierre about the need to be very
liver and kidneys, and softening and enlargement of the spleen. Bardeen
liver, spleen, lung, and other organs, and in the nasal secretion, and,
livery, get up behind the carriage, and come with me while I make some
lives and property in the revolutionary area, and similar matters kept
living in the empty house of his deceased benefactor, Bazdeev. This is
living this life temporarily; but then he was shocked by the thought
living tissue are, by distinction, known as _parasites_. The power a
living with the Rostovs.
living, it would have been at once announced in the Gazette, as he
living. The first death I saw, and one I shall never forget--that of
loaded gun and awaited the inevitable explosion. Until the doctor's
loan had four and a half million subscribers; the fourth more than
loans from the Land Bank, and the consequent impossibility of a speedy
loans of money to aid in the enterprise. The Western end, the Central
lobulated, and projects beyond the level of its surroundings. Sometimes
lobules are left behind. If the overlying skin is damaged or closely
local affairs as a violation of the Constitution of the United States
local appearances may not be characteristic, the nature of the infection
local lesion varies from a _synovitis_ with infiltration of the synovial
local leucocytosis, proliferation of fibroblasts, and the formation of
local markets, and they sprang up to meet the need. Smiths, hatters,
local measures are employed. These may be described under two heads--the
local measures to arrest the bleeding, the employment of general
local phenomena persist, the joint remaining permanently swollen and
local problems and in the formation of political opinion, so much of
local union the printers or the cordwainers, for example, considered
localisation of the infection in a particular joint is determined by
localisation of the staphylococci in the bone marrow. In average cases
localised _abscess_; or it may infiltrate the tissues over a wide
localised at the seat of inoculation, tend to pass to distant parts,
localised in one; they are aggravated by movement, or by handling the
locality was known and shown in every detail on the maps, and
located in the United States, we do not claim a right to prevent you from
located in the United States, we do not claim a right to prevent you from
location--the vertebrae, skull, pelvis, and lower jaw being specially
location. Another group favored cutting the way through Panama after
lock rather than a sea-level canal was agreed upon. Construction by the
locking. _Rigidity_ is the fixation of a joint by involuntary
locks of hair escaped. The girl was shouting something but, seeing
locomotive is that of a force commensurate with the movement observed.
lodge in the mucous membrane and cause tuberculous ulceration, or they
lodge presented itself to his mind. It was taking place at the English
lodges or in human affairs, but were exclusively occupied with the
lodging in the capillaries of joints, bones, kidney, or lungs, and there
lodgment and growth of tubercle bacilli. The injury or disease, however,
loftiest of human appellations he could not renounce it, said the
lofty claim, they set out to make it good by constructing in the years
lofty, secret suffering of a soul burdened by the body appeared on her
log that lay on the bank. At a mute sign from him, a telescope was
loneliness merged with the physical pain. It was they, these soldiers-
lonely plain. Often the development of water power in connection with
long ago, but the countess won't on any account leave Moscow till
long and impassioned proclamation to the people of South Carolina he
long and tortuous sinuses is often hastened by the injection of Beck's
long and warmly to the Emperor and how the Emperor, evidently weeping,
long as it was quite unknown what character the war would take. Some
long as possible. Kutuzov himself with all his transport took the road
long as the patient is still he is free from pain. The slightest
long been a member of the House of Representatives and was Senator-elect
long been the paradise of the swarthy hunter and the restless
long bone it may replace the rigid framework of the shaft to such an
long bone, gummatous disease may implicate the adjacent joint and give
long bones is delayed beyond the usual period at which the skeleton
long controversy over a similar outpost in the Atlantic, one of the last
long corridor leading to the back of the house, to the room of the
long enough to permit of its deriving the necessary nourishment from its
long fretted to utter that word, and letting the borzois slip he
long grumbled at the administration of royal governors, protested
long in Moscow? They meant to leave for the country long ago.
long in preparation. The revolt against corruption in politics which
long low study at the door of which stood an adjutant.
long neck trailed twisting along the ground. The crowd shrank back
long oversea voyages were uncertain at best and doubly so when the
long past. He could not conceive that a stupid chance, letting the
long period without further change; if it breaks down, the overlying
long periods--rather because of the changes in the muscles than from
long remain unanswered. In 1829, Ewing Young broke the path to Los
long shall the wicked triumph? How long shall they wield unlawful
long since gained him the reputation of being a wizard, and that the
long standing to become the seat of cancer. In addition, the offensive
long table on one side sat the grownup young people: Vera beside Berg,
long the most popular method in this country, the preparation usually
long thin neck swelled like a cord and went blue behind the ear, and
long time alone with Helene in the little drawing room where they were
long time--nine or even twelve months in the case of a severe joint
long train of wounded in front of them. Almost at the head of the line
long vision, seeing in conservation and permanent improvements the
long, slender, delicate arm, high above the elbow on that part that is
long-cherished aim of dining with the Emperor, would stubbornly insist
long-drawn, measured death rattle did the crowd around his
long-expected campaign and of rapture and devotion to the man in the
long-range fighting of the South African campaign of 1899-1902 were very
long-standing cases the pain and discomfort may lead to a postural
longed for the independence of the farmer, owed to its indulgent land
longer and broader than that on the distal side. In small arteries these
longer and went on, between gasps of laughter: "And the whole world
longer any life in it. The bees do not fly in the same way, the
longer at Vienna (which was threatened by the French) but at Brunn.
longer boasted of his protege Kutuzov, but remained silent when the
longer hearing the terrible sounds of the crowd, Rostopchin grew
longer in front, but on one side, or even in the rear.)
longer in the house she so loved and where she had sacrificed so much.
longer period. On the other hand, owing to the lower blood-pressure the
longer seemed to be in the future but in the past. All the
longer the commander in chief speaking but an ordinary old man who
longer they did so without saying what they wanted to say, the greater
longer trying to show the advantages of peace and discuss its
longer wanted to sleep. The gay triumphant shouting of the enemy
longitudinally through the ring finger and continued upwards.
look Boris in the face without a sense of awkwardness. Boris, with one
look as small as possible. He looked at the count, who still gazed
look at her. When he had reached the fence, still without finding
look at the boy they are in love with and have just kissed for the
look at the cannon ran back again. At last four men in uniforms and
look at the killed and wounded, thereby, he considered, testing his
look at the map and listen." Langeron lifted his eyes with an
look at the part of the French bivouac they were to attack next day.
look at them--his whole attention was absorbed in watching the serious
look for him in the town and was returning to the inn. The groom
look round, but at the sound of each shot, as at the word of
look. Nicholas went up to her and kissed her hand. This was the
looked around as if asking what it meant. The same question was
looked as he always did when at the front, solemn and stern. Then came
looked as if the smoke were moving, at times as if the troops moved.
looked at Dolokhov and his eyes dropped, the something terrible and
looked at Princess Mary, but did not at once take his arm from the
looked at him in alarm, awaiting her sentence) that the rain had
looked at one another, and all pressed toward the exit from the
looked at the concealed depression on the faces around him and heard
looked at the paper again. "Oh, this German precision!" he muttered,
looked at the princess. She still sat motionless with a look of
looked attentively at the carts in the yard and while going up to
looked eagerly toward his eyes, waiting for the look for which she
looked in a mirror, and standing before Dolokhov in the same pose he
looked intently at Rostov with the same expression of hope, of relief,
looked out of the window, he saw it was an unsurpassable morning for
looked round as if asking everyone whether he was doing the right
looked sternly and reproachfully at the count who had presented it
looked through a spyglass at the streams of his troops pouring out
looked upon Brown as a martyr and tolled funeral bells on the day of his
looked upon as a temporary necessity to be discarded with the increase
looked with partiality upon high protection or with indulgence upon the
looked. If, however, the tendons are divided as well as the nerve, there
looking about him. Standing among the crowd of peasants, Pierre
looking at Alpatych from the back of the crowd.
looking at Pierre's fine though dirty linen and at the ring on his
looking at the Armenian family and at two French soldiers who had gone
looking at the Russian soldiers with red and vacant eyes. Occasionally
looking at the cathedral and crossing himself. Another, a young lad, a
looking at the ground, he came on some sticky, trodden mud,
looking at the midwife with wide-open eyes of alarm.
looking at the officer's handsome, self-satisfied face, and noting the
looking at the prisoners who thronged past him.
looking at the puff from the gun that had sent the ball. His eyes
looking at the world is so opposed to yours that we shall not
looking at them, began to disport themselves in the dark sky: now
looking at what they were doing. When the aide-de-camp, having
looking at you," Natasha began, evidently anxious to disperse the
looking back at the place where the shot had been fired and the dog
looking glass, draping the folds of her velvet dress picturesquely.
looking in the large mirror there saw that she was pretty, very
looking into the mouth the base of the skull is readily seen. Gummatous
looking not at Pierre but straight before him, and turning the
looking over the wall of the trench.
looking round at the sound.
looking with pained distress at the dead body with its long, thin,
looking, pressed two fingers together and the badge was between
looks of the soldiers who, marching in regular ranks briskly and
looks that the news was bad, rose as if to stretch his legs and,
looks the visitors cast on him seemed to say: "And what is he
loops of the convoluted vein are often bound together by fibrous tissue.
loose and, unless confined in a recess of the joint, it wanders about
loose epithelial cells from the edges. Even the fluid from a blister, in
loose--for example, in the eyelid or scrotum--there is often
looting, and to reassure the inhabitants. But Pierre did not know
lope farther to the left to the very place where they were standing.
lords who openly sold the right of representation to the highest bidder.
lose the battle at Austerlitz? The French losses were almost equal
loses a whole army, the Archduke Ferdinand and the Archduke Karl
loses its vitality and crumbles away, leading to the formation of what
loss of sensation. When it is divided above the origin of the dorsal
loss of sensibility over a larger area, because the musculo-cutaneous
loss of sensibility; division in the lower third after the nerve has
loss, the concentration of fighting at one point, and the hesitation
losses when the Civil War carried prices skyward while the interest
losses)--now remorselessly pursued the young heir who had
losses, despite the greatest confusion, the most important results
lost a considerable quantity of blood. It may also follow the sudden
lost in the peripheral vessels. Gangrene eventually ensues, is attended
lost or have the wolves eaten you? Fetch some more wood!" shouted a
lost sight of the Russian army), concern for the safety of the arsenal
lost. Admitting the view of Barclay and others that a defensive battle
lost. The arrest of the blood supply may result in gangrene. Sometimes
loud and prolonged as the protective tariff and homestead planks were
loud and solemn voice to recite the words of the prayer...
loud that those in the drawing room heard her and were startled.
loud voice, popped her head in at the door.
loudly advocating the very thing the Emperor had hinted at the day
loudly of the field marshal's great weakness and failing health.
loudly went into the drawing room. Two letters brought by a courier
love adventures of the soul with its beloved. And on its pages I saw a
love and forgiveness of injuries--and that men attribute the
love for Natasha, Antichrist, Napoleon, the invasion, the comet,
love for Sonya and of his firm resolve to marry her. The countess, who
love from men I don't know and never shall know, for the love of these
love from the time Nicholas returned, and the faithful, unalterable
love him all the more, but Nicholas now considered himself unworthy of
love of Moscow, he proposed to move troops from the right to the
love of the free life and bold companionship that once tempted men into
love stories had the sensual character which Frenchmen regard as the
love to find some way of taking on herself the excess of grief that
love, and was still as ready to throw herself into all the pleasures
love. Now reason suggested quite the opposite. After that journey to
loved. We are nice to know. And then the Emperor..." he began, but
loves America will act and speak in the true spirit of neutrality which
lower grade--of great corporations." The owner disappeared from the
lower grades of fish were carried to the West Indies for slave
lower on the best maroon dress, and so on, all would be well. They
lower part of the leg sometimes assumes a mahogany-brown or bluish hue,
lower part of the trapezius, the branches from the third and fourth
lower than the smaller banks of the South could afford.
lowered at the Emperor's feet on his entering the ballroom, the
lowered his legs. Pressing against both sides of the window, he
lowering her eyes but casting side glances at the newcomers, had
lowest cervical glands, from the upper part of the chest wall, and from
loyalty to our sov'weign the Empewah in other ways. Have we
luck the man has!"
luggage. Very sinister reports of the position of the army reached him
lumbricals only are affected; the abduction of the thumb can be feebly
luminous, Rontgen, or radium rays, and possesses the advantage of being
lumps, resembling the tuberculous tumours met with in the brain; they
lunatics out into the town. When lunatics command our armies God
lung is not specially involved, and the condition is an indication of a
lurid light the fatal weakness of Southern economy stood revealed.
luxuries of the rich planters nor the easy life of the leisurely
luxurious study and sat down to the dinner prepared for him. Bilibin
luxuriously because the soldiers of his squadron liked him, had also a
luxury, the kind of life that can be changed at any moment, was no
lying beside his plate, and proposed a toast, "To the health of the
lying beyond material forces, outside the material influences that act
lying down to rest, fell on the wolf, seizing her by the ears.
lying down to rest. Life in the regiment, during this campaign, was
lying in the interior. If the periosteum has been extensively
lymph from the deep lymphatics of the lower limb, and some of the
lymph from the face, lips, floor of the mouth, gums, teeth, anterior
lymph glands is early and constant, and constitutes the most dangerous
lymph glands, subcutaneous tissue, or, in fact, in any tissue of the
lymph into the superficial cervical glands. _The submaxillary_--two to
lymph passes from them into the deeper cervical glands. They are
lymph passes on to the deep inguinal and external iliac glands. The
lymph spaces just beyond the swollen margin of the inflammatory area,
lymph then passes on through the femoral canal to the external iliac
lymphadenitis if the glands be subsequently subjected to injury. The
lymphadenitis, especially in the glands of the groin (bubo), but it is
lymphadenoma at an early stage. The negative results of tuberculin tests
lymphangitis during which the swelling becomes painful and tender. These
lymphangitis may extend a short distance up the forearm. By clipping
lymphatics of the limb, it becomes swollen and hard--a condition
lymphatics, or of infective emboli in the blood vessels, leads to the
lymphatics. The last-named is chiefly observed in the lower limb in
lymphocytes and other mononuclear cells which have migrated from the
lymphoid and epithelioid cells appearing in the mucous membrane. These
macerated specimen, the new bone presents a characteristic coral-like
machinations against the government."
machinery of government and the practice of politics. The enfranchised
machinery." For the Republican candidate, Blaine, they could hardly find
machines was made in connection with the ballot. In the early days
made a deep impression upon Roosevelt, turning his mind in the direction
made a sign to someone, and the torturing pain in his abdomen caused
made a sign with it to the marshals, and ordered the action to
made a slip and spoke French should pay fines to the Committee of
made a third appeal to the states for help, declaring that they had been
made and a light moist dressing placed over the wounds to absorb the
made and fund-raising will begin in the additional states.
made and fund-raising will begin in the additional states.
made at Krasnoe and the Berezina, and informed him of his intentions
made by the Northwestern states in the decade between 1870 and 1880.
made by the rich and of course for the rich." Here and there an
made constitutions and unmade them again, but the salons of Anna
made for exploration should be tightly closed by stitches before the
made his way by night around through the forest and across the Dnieper
made in 1754. On the suggestion of the Lords of Trade in England, a
made in any other way than by the knife of the surgeon operating through
made plans of battle but was always found where the situation was most
made political capital out of the fact that he had "insulted the
made the nations happy or unhappy. Suddenly the diplomatists and
made the serfs and gentry join in one large circle: a ring, a
made the way of the shipbuilder easy. Early in the seventeenth century a
made this last effort, for all the Russian troops had been broken
made to cover the raw surface and the skin for about a quarter of an
made to cure the condition by removing the contents through a small
made truly progressive like the study of mathematics, science, and
made where the pus threatens to point, and a Klapp's suction bell be
made. An incision is made down to and through the periosteum, and
made. The manifestations differ in degree rather than in kind from those
magazine, "The Lowell Offering." So excellent were their writings that
magically colored and outlined everything. The smoke of the guns
magnanimity, the captain restored the wife to the husband, saying as
magnanimous conqueror, but at the moment of trial, without asking what
magnanimous deed--interrupted several times by the tears that dimmed
magnesium in a small quantity of water, ensures a free evacuation of the
magnificence of the spectacle. It was Boris Drubetskoy who was
magnificent outcome of the affair. Notwithstanding the treaty with Great
magnitude in industry, transport, and finance, overturning as it did the
mahogany sphinxes carved on the corners of the bedstead, so that the
maid's voice at the door.
maid, a cook, two old women, a little pageboy, the coachman, and
maids, had given orders to harness and intended to start, but when the
maidservant ran into the hall and hurriedly said something, mentioning
main factor in the production of moist gangrene is _bacterial
main lymph vessels of the part (_septic lymphangitis_) and may reach the
main object is to exclude or to eliminate the bacterial factor, and so
main trunk by the fact that the pulses beyond are, in the former,
main trunk from some of its tributaries, either from the femoral or
main trunks at the root of the neck. Belonging to this group is one
mainly directed towards combating the shock, the surface-lesions being
mainly mining, the receipts from the mineral output being $43,000,000 or
maintain a continuous patrol of the waters in front of blockaded ports,
maintain the vitality of the tissues.
maintained that their party, which had saved the union and emancipated
maintained, therefore, that the disposition to fracture does not depend
maintaining highways. The same year the Farm Loan Act projected the
majestically entered the room. He was wearing his long coat with three
major was pacing up and down the line, and regardless of the screams
major-domo came in a second time to say that the Frenchman who had
major-domo. "What are your orders about the pictures?"
majority in the Senate during his first administration; and at the same
majority of cases the bones of the lower extremities are much earlier
majority of so-called advanced people--that is, the crowd of
majority of the patriots whose labors and sacrifices had made this
majority of two-thirds was mustered, many a Senator who voted for the
majority vote, the importation of slaves should not be forbidden before
majority would appear to be the result of changes in a sarcoma,
majority, then from the persons having the highest numbers not exceeding
majority.... The majority of men who earned wages in the coal industry,
make a hobby of any particular part of the work on his estate. He
make a menacing move on Petersburg, or even, in the case of a reverse,
make a remark, for the conversation interested him, but Anna Pavlovna,
make any plans. The happiness before him appeared so inconceivable
make every statue leap from its pedestal," he soon learned how alive the
make him President. Jackson shook hands cordially with Adams on the day
make his escape as quickly as possible from this position, of the
make profits for the owners. Hence the term "soulless corporation,"
make the Cossacks budge when once they had got booty and prisoners.
make the overland journey to California by the stagecoach system,
makes the fall of the first man, resulting in the production of the
making a plea for the restoration of independence to the republic. For
making arrangements, but instead of that I have the honor to serve
making him out a traitor! They slander him as a traitor, and the
making himself one with his family and entering into all the details
making his way out of the house through the brilliant suite when a
making its way to the surface, there are defects or holes in the
making the constitutional bar absolute. Congress, he thought, might
making the flames hiss and crackle. The men drew nearer and lit
male (Fig. 168), and Caird has observed one in the hip. The treatment
male citizens of the right to vote (except in certain minor cases) the
male industrial workers and the mechanics of the Northern cities, at
males in any district. Eventual admission to the union on an equal
males, including aliens not yet naturalized; but the protests were
malevolent expression with which, after a glance at Kutuzov, the
malformations of the human body by manual operations, mediate and
malicious conspiracy, the sole object of which was to cause
malignancy is shown by the proliferating epithelium invading the other
malignancy, according to their situation and to the age of the patient,
malignancy, but it tends to cause death in the same manner as other
malignancy, recurring after removal like the "recurrent fibroid" of
malignant of all new growths. Cyst-like spaces may form in the tumour by
malignant, it is the same as for sarcoma.
mallei_, which resembles the tubercle bacillus, save that it is somewhat
malleolus as a result of inversion of the foot.
malnutrition from any cause. _Bossing of the skull_ resulting in the
mammas burdened by marriageable daughters, and of the young ladies
man aet. 19. The curving of the bones is due to multiple fractures.]
man aet. 27, the same as in Fig. 140.]
man aet. 27. The scapular tumour projecting above the right clavicle has
man and not in the habit of running, trotted awkwardly stumbling on
man and not to the Deity.
man as the man who goes upon the board of trade and bets upon the price
man as the merchant of New York. The farmer ... is as much a business
man had a separate plot of his own. The motto of the community was:
man had been bayoneted in the back before his eyes, for hardly had
man he caught a momentary glimpse between their heads and backs of the
man is at the approach of a long-awaited moment. He was firmly
man is controlled, and the more correctly we perceive the
man laughs who looks at a portrait so characteristic of the original
man of great merit"--this of the man usually so described.
man of the troops on the high ground above the bridge involuntarily
man showed impatience. He made an effort to look at the servant who
man though undone is but one,' as the proverb says, but with
man wanted. Having been sent with papers from Kutuzov to the
man weary but unflinching in the fulfillment of duty, he rose to see
man who after straining his eyes to see into the far distance finds
man who had succeeded to the post when Dron died and who was accused
man who had taken an oath to support the Constitution as a member of
man who had the next bed, a stout Uhlan, continued to sit on his
man who stands at the head of the movement grows with the increased
man with a long face and nose, as he entered the room.
man with the half-closed eyes was there greedily gnawing a mutton
man would have rescued her from the fire. But this is a monster and
man' in the race for a seat in Congress. In proportion to their numbers,
man's in violation of the laws governing human action would destroy
man's power to foresee everything and avert the general course of
man's relation to the external world and the greater or lesser
man's soul. And without considering the multiplicity and complexity of
man's subjection to the Deity and in a predetermined aim toward
man, and who was one of the disinterested friends so
man, roused by activity, expected the best results from the new
man, shaking his powdered head as much as the tail, which Tikhon was
man, to which he had devoted himself with such ardor--all the zest
man," and advocating freedom for the territories, failed to carry a
man," cried one, "will see the end of slavery in the United States!"
man--the wisest and best of men--who was saying it of her. "There is
man." Again he pressed the hand of the latter with an expression of
man.... Here he is, and the count has not once asked for him."
managed to please him the day before, he wished to do what the young
management of affairs, in particular--was such that the debts
management, Western agriculture presented many contrasts to that of the
manager to conduct the affairs of the company. It was suggested that the
managers of the old school spoke of him as "brilliant but erratic"; they
mandible at the anterior edge of the masseter.
manhood suffrage, they were usually abolished along with the monopoly of
manhood, did not exist for the countess. Her son's growth toward
manifest itself a few days after infection, and the virus of syphilis,
manifest themselves, an injection of warm olive oil should be given; the
manifestations and before the appearance of tertiary lesions, the
manifestations develop. These facts, together with the disappearance of
manifestations may take the form of localised gummata, which tend to
manifestations of power but the causes that produce it. But modern
manifestations of the tertiary period are the arsenical preparations and
manifested by fever, the temperature rising to 102 o, 103 o, or 104 o F.,
manifested in a less obvious fashion. In the lower extremity, for
manifests itself between the ages of thirty and fifty--that is, when the
manifests itself during the first few years of life. In rare instances
manifests itself, and the same changes as occur in the formation of an
manipulations, exercises, and the use of special forms of
mankind and of the free and independent states of America." As more than
mankind has forgotten the laws of its divine Saviour, Who preached
mankind, especially appealed to Pierre. The important mystery
manner as to meet his requirements. The Democrats, on the other hand,
manner that this name day of hers had been one of the pleasantest
manner, and Kutuzov with the same expression on his face again
manners habitual in the prince's household, a common anxiety, a
mantilla, Natasha, shivering in the fresh air, went out into the
manufacture, advertising, and selling. It studied the cheapest methods
manufacture, sale, or transportation of intoxicating liquors within, the
manufacturer, is directly promoted by every increase of the taxes
manufacturers for protection. Direct taxes were imposed on the states
manufacturers whose spinning and weaving mills were the wonder of the
manufactures for the tiller of the soil, ship subsidies increasing the
manufactures into the South. To the leaders who were averse to secession
manufactures, which, flourishing in the supple fingers of their tireless
manufactures. As skilled white labor increased in the Ohio Valley, the
manufacturing states have reduced the planting states and that which
manufacturing, financial, and commercial groups of the population who
manuscripts were kept, and took out what had once been one of the most
manuscripts, but was unable to do so) the idea that had previously
many Eastern leaders, particularly from the South, who understood the
many a band of wagoners to death; but the lure of the game and the
many a stanch Republican joining with the majority of Democrats in
many acute diseases one attack protects the patient, for a time at
many blemishes and defects, a guarantee for the future of the people's
many commands were issued, the event does not take place unless
many difficulties as the Congress. They too were loaded with
many factors. Among them must be reckoned the discontinuance of
many laws but no one to carry out the old ones. Nowadays everybody
many left alive. Go that way, to that village, all the commanders
many men. (Poniatowski's action against Utitsa, and Uvarov's on the
many of the futile and costly wastes of competition in connection with
many of the inhabitants of Moscow wished to be armed, weapons were
many of the tumours become detached and lie in the serous exudate
many people in the church; Natasha always stood beside Belova in the
many persons connected with the event.
many problems. In the first place, tribes of resentful Indians in the
many sections, particularly in New England, the climate, the stony soil,
many such and they remained silent, while the majority were interested
many were to quite the contrary effect.
many who did take the doubtful honor failed to attend the sessions.
marauding. At Smolensk too he judged correctly that the French might
march past," continued the general, "and it seems the ambassador
march to be the profound conception of some one man who saved Russia
march, and at last, on the first of September when the army drew
march, it does not at all follow that the march was the cause of it.
march. It seemed as though not the trumpeters were playing, but as
marched all the way in step (a practice on which the Guards prided
marched in front of the prisoners was left; they had all
marched with long steps. Behind the company the sound of wheels, the
marched, followed only by their escort and the vehicles and wagons
marches with the marshal's baggage and the French army, which occupied
marching along the highroad past the avenue leading to Bald Hills.
marching at the rate of twenty-seven miles a day that they could not
marching order or not, it was decided at a consultation between the
margin, it may resemble tuberculous disease of the skin. It can usually
margins are rounded in outline, firm, and congested; the base is
margins present an irregular contour from the erosion concerned in its
marine when Britain swept that from the seas, and supplying Britain with
mariners for the exploration of inland waters. Leaders of good judgment,
mariners, the employees of railroads, expresses, and steamboats; of
mark in a single year at the opening of the new century. Immigration was
mark the onset of the tetanic condition, or the patient may feel
marked by a chill, or a rigor, which may be repeated, while the
marked constitutional disturbance with rise of temperature follows the
marked curve of the radius in a forearm of which the ulna was quite
marked in the tongue, the lips, and the hands. The patient imagines that
marked is the shock; a crush of the hand, for example, is attended with
marked on rising from the stooping or sitting posture, and may extend
marked tendency to spread to other parts of the body. Fragments of the
marked tenderness on pressure due to the involvement of the nerve
marked, the cough more severe, and the patient restless. The difficulty
marked. The membership reached 1,650,000 in 1904 and more than 3,000,000
marked; the latter, having few industries and producing little save raw
market for the produce of farms and plantations; by making the United
market place, where there had been some rather heavy firing before the
markets of great cities at the doors of Southern fruit and vegetable
marquise. The conflict of magnanimity between the mother and the
marriage today. It is the reason why the life and activity of people
marriage. The Spaniards, through the Catholic clergy, offer praise
marrow and erode the trabeculae of bone in the vicinity (Fig. 124). The
marrow and spongy bone first disappear, the compact tissue then becomes
marrow of one of the adjacent bones. There is gradual enlargement of one
marrow, so that _necrosis_ of bone is one of the most striking results
marrow. The _osteoid sarcoma_ is characterised by the formation of a
marrow. The extremities, which include the ossifying junctions, consist
marrow. We believe that it will avoid confusion in the study of the
marrying her he would make the countess his mother happy, would be
marrying. The old fellow's crotchety! Of course Prince Andrew is not a
marshal of the court, Count Tolstoy.
marshals and an escort, on the pretext of inspecting the army and
martial swagger in their clothes, and a touch of the gaiety and spirit
marveled at the feeling that had mastered him as at something strange,
mask-like aspect. The angles of the mouth may be retracted, producing a
mass and its relationship to the femur. The treatment consists in
mass of earth. The ground seemed to groan at the terrible impact.
mass of granulation tissue. At the edges, the young epithelium may be
mass of the European peoples from west to east and afterwards from
massage, and from the induction of hyperaemia by means of heat. Cupping
massage, douching, and electricity. If there is drop-wrist, the hand and
masses (pachy-dermatocele). The treatment consists in removing the
masses were to the meaning of his propaganda. Abolition orators were
massive figure was a very noticeable one at the dinner. Rostov
master and workmen, which existed in the days of small industries. For
master into the upper Louisiana territory, where freedom had been
master of the Spanish king's domain to the south.
master the secrets and the powers of nature were summoned to the aid of
master was at the Rostovs' he stayed till midnight. The Rostovs'
master, paying him usually with a share of the produce of the land. This
master, the elder one frightened look clutched her younger companion
master. The masters, both the old prince and the young, and the
masterly way in which he danced the mazurka, Nicholas ran up to
masters of no trade and wholly inexperienced in the arts of self-help
masters. In these ways, a large part of the financial operations
masters; but Congress steadily rejected the very idea of confiscation.
mastication; but on account of the insensitiveness of the cornea, the
material fastened to sticks, called standards, and of the ground on
material in a finely divided state is introduced into the anterior
material in the interior, which appears to be derived by a process of
material into the water, and approaches the tete-de-pont. At length
material; but at the same time the law provided that "no mill or other
materially affected and unless the practice be modified must ultimately
materially change the situation. They demonstrated the skill of American
materials, such as milk, containing tubercle bacilli. The organisms may
materials, was being forced into the position of a dependent section. As
matrix being secreted by the new cells. This is sometimes observed as an
matter and quite the thing for a dashing young hussar!
matter in a wound by means of the materials used for ligatures and
matter of Alsace-Lorraine; adjustment of Italian frontiers along the
matter of great importance, for a man who valued his success in the
matter to him who was appointed chief of the artillery.
matter to me or to Bitski what the Emperor was pleased to say at the
matter with him. By the by, Count," he added suddenly, addressing
matter would be regarded by the secular authorities.
matter. It brought the most odious aspects of slavery home to thousands
mattered more to him than that of all the rest of the world. As he
matters of conscience was established in the beginning. Maryland, by
matters were left to the states, and the legislatures of some of them,
matters. The countess was accustomed to this tone as a precursor of
matters." And really, during the awkward silence that ensued, that
maturity does not appear to impair the growth in length of the bones
maturity, they enter upon the phase of decadence or involution, and this
may also be explained by the less severe muscular strain involved by
may assist in the differentiation from tuberculous disease, but the more
may be a wound or a purulent blister, and the streptococcus pyogenes is
may be achieved by Macewen's needles or by the introduction of wire into
may be acquired as the result of any condition which is attended with
may be buried in the substance of the triceps, or it may be surrounded
may be carried through the wall of the bowel into the lacteals, along
may be considered as the equivalent of ulceration or molecular
may be covered with canvass, and if it is the choice of the people, they
may be detached from its insertion and stitched to the distal end of the
may be followed by marked improvement, especially in the hospital class
may be followed by serious complications. The effects are mainly due to
may be given with caution. When by these means the occurrence of
may be heard. Death may result in a few minutes; or the heart may slowly
may be impossible without the use of an exploring needle to
may be introduced into the wound from the patient's own skin, from the
may be left undisturbed for several days. The packing should if possible
may be ligated near its bifurcation, or in aneurysm of the innominate
may be made of tickling and of pins-and-needles over the lateral aspect
may be mentioned: The application to the bleeding point of gauze soaked
may be merely unsightly, or they may interfere with the use of the
may be mucous patches in the mouth, or a stomatitis which is of
may be necessary to get rid of the chronic oedema, adhesions of tendons,
may be necessary to submit it to bacteriological examination. When the
may be primary in the muscle, or may result from extension from adjacent
may be renewed at intervals until the wound is filled by granulations;
may be repeated at diminishing intervals during the course of the
may be revealed by the presence of egg-shell crackling, and by
may be single or multiple, they involve the marrow or the periosteum or
may be so compressed that congestion and oedema of the parts beyond are
may be the seat of tuberculous disease, and give rise to clinical
may be tried. Exposure to the X-rays and to radium has been more
may be ulcerated from pressure (Fig. 107). It incapacitates the patient
may be, also of the sixth. The position of the upper limb is typical:
may be, or how short a time it may remain exposed, the access of
may be, vomiting; the strength of the pulse gradually increases, and
may become involved in the cicatrix, and it may be necessary, on account
may become permanent from ankylosis or from contracture of the soft
may become sclerosed and in time form a sequestrum. In the macerated
may burst into the abscess which forms, so that when the latter points
may by law provide for the case of removal, death, resignation, or
may cause symptoms by "locking" the adjacent joint or by pressing upon
may complain of numbness and tingling in the distribution of the
may direct, a number of electors, equal to the whole number of senators
may elicit the "hydatid thrill" or fremitus. This thrill is not often
may escape while the adjacent bones are destroyed (Fig. 71). The skin
may even be imperceptible. On auscultating the heart, a churning sound
may form in the soft parts and in the adjacent joint. In the vertebral
may give way and the body become free. In this condition it may wander
may increase in size and become extremely sensitive; the pain is then
may intervene between the original attack of osteomyelitis and the onset
may invade the internal organs by the blood-stream in enormous numbers
may lead to gangrene of the limb beyond.
may lie latent for a considerable period before doing so. The lesions
may not be worn; all the civil authorities in nearly all towns in the
may not occur till long after the disease has subsided. The abscess may
may occur during a paroxysm from fixation of the diaphragm and arrest of
may occur in several members of the same family. In severe cases,
may occur simultaneously with the alterations in the bones. In
may occur, so that the area of permeation is a ring, rather than a disc.
may originate in the periosteum, or may spread thence from the marrow,
may perhaps have a stronger effect on the sincere seeker after
may prevent extension of the forearm (Fig. 63). These are treated by
may recall it with pleasure someday... Napoleon or I," said the
may reduce the opsonic index to such an extent that the vaccines
may rise to 101 o F., or, in the large extravasations that occur in
may seem to a savage to guide the vessel--acted like a child who,
may sleep in it of nights with the greatest safety. But if they dislike
may subside under rest and elevation of the limb and the application of
may take place. The infection may spread to the adjacent joint, either
may unfit the patient for work. In mild cases the condition may be
may vary in size with variations in the temperature; the blood presents
may, always remain the same backs and foreheads."
mayor of the city was attacked; and regular battles were fought in the
me after the review and we will do what is possible."
me all the time."
me and around... Another instant and I shall never again see the
me and the whole family wretched," wrote the countess.
me by asking whether I remembered the threefold aim of the order:
me from the pleasure of smashing your head with this!" said Pierre,
me from the time Prince Kuragin asked for his passports. The reasons
me in war the energy of young men often shows the way better than
me my whole past and the future path I should follow. He surprised
me on the right they will expose a flank to me. Soldiers! I will
me the forty thousand rubles I need." But when he came across
me to burn the bridge! I know the service, and it is my habit orders
me to have the pistol."
me! What will become of us? I am the wife of the doctor of the Seventh
me, directly the war is over, if I am still alive and still loved by
me," thought Natasha--"is it possible that I am now to be the wife and
me. But I," he paused, "by the authority entrusted to me by my
me: sleeves nowadays are this size! The other day young Princess Irina
meadow nor the Demkin hill, and heaven only knows what it is! It is
meadow, dragging his feet, rustling the grass, and gazing at the
meadows. Only at night and in the forests while the dew lasted was
meager--all out of proportion to the irritation involved. Stamp taxes
meager. The natural resources, coal and water power, were abundant; but
meanest of my peasants, rather than sign the disgrace of my country
meaning of historical events this way or that; yet there is the same
meaning of the French army's inactivity, he alone continued to
meaning of the Great Square of creation and pointed out to me that the
meaning, that several times she was on the point of abandoning
means of a glass-barrelled syringe, which is firmly screwed on to the
means of diagnosis in animals, but in the human subject its use is
means of the knife, scissors, or sharp spoon, of the ulcerated surface
means of which long portions of the vein are removed through
means to attain his end was at the same time influenced by
meant for us. The field marshal looks on and waits for letters
meant fresh movements of the army and a lengthening of its marches,
meant renewed security to the planting interest against the increasing
meantime, all the colonies had learned on how frail a foundation their
measurable equality of opportunity for the people of the generations
measure be subjected to microscopical examination; the results are often
measure for maintaining the circulation, however, is by transfusion of
measure of limitation on the statute books. After the discovery of gold,
measure of visible phenomena. In astronomy it was the immovability
measure showed an evident resolve on the part of the planters to rule
measure wrung from Congress under a threat of a great strike by the four
measured nearly 34 inches); the wound in the artery is then sewn up with
measured, monotonous pacing. Behind the guns were their limbers and
measures are employed for the relief of shock, and urgent operations are
measures are proximal ligation of the innominate, and distal ligation.
measures are usually sufficient to relieve the patient's discomfort.
measures calculated to favor agriculture and to enlarge the rights of
measures directed to the lesion from which the sinus has originated. The
measures directed towards overcoming the sepsis in the soft parts, and
measures fail, and the whole track of the sinus is accessible, it should
measures had been taken for the sale of the land and forests and to
measures of defense against the French, and to enter into "articles of
measures to be taken immediately to extinguish the fire, to prevent
measures to counteract the accompanying toxaemia, and when the loss of
measures which violate it. Therefore, from the nature of the American
measures without fear of recurrence. The diagnosis, X-ray appearances,
measures, departing from American tradition, the Republican authors
measures, the first of which became a law on March 2, 1867, betrayed an
measures. Under a law of the previous year the commanders of armed
mechanical industries were formed, the investment of capital was sought,
mechanically he began reading. The old prince, now and then using
mechanics and farmers of the North who stuck by Jacksonian Democracy
mechanics by reference to the mass only: stating that momenta are
mechanism of life, the arrangement of the day so as to be in time
medal he can get his reward just as well in the rearguard, but if he
media assumes a white colour. It is the common cause of stitch
medial (internal) bicipital groove or at the bend of the elbow. They
medial aspect of the lower third of the leg. At this point the
medial part of the thigh, which becomes smaller and harder when the
medially (Codman). When pain does not prevent it, movements of the arm
median basilic vein,--may be treated, according to the amount of
mediastinum. In a second case in which the growth was in the groin, the
medicine at the right time! You mustn't trifle with it, you know, or
medicine. The majesty of his law was to be vindicated by force.
meditative concentration and thoughtfulness, and the way he spoke
medium of infected emboli which form in a thrombosed vein in the
medullary canal through a special foramen in the cortex, bifurcates, and
meek." Lord George Germain characterized the tea party as "the
meet (_emprosthotonos_). Sometimes all the muscles simultaneously become
meet Kutuzov at the castle where the latter was to stay. In undress
meet the church procession. Following the battalion that marched along
meet the deferred payments. It was, however, a hard battle at best. Many
meet the gap left by the collar, through which Matrena's brilliant
meet the ordinary expenses of the government. Confronted by military and
meet the rising expenditures. This currency issued at par on
meeting and in my mind gave him the most malevolent and bitter
meeting for the first time since their encounter concerning
meeting he was struck for the first time by the endless variety of
meeting her in the large sitting room (it seemed to Countess Mary that
meeting of the Imperial Council, at which Sergey Kuzmich
meeting refusal, he promptly dissolved it. The Maryland, Georgia, and
meeting shall be on the first Monday in December, unless they shall by
meeting someone there not of the conventional society stamp. And
meeting the captain, and passed out into the street.
meeting with Napoleon. To the joy and pride of the whole army, a
meeting with Rostov was smothered by arrangements for the journey,
meetings until after the extinction of the Indian peril on the immediate
melted away on the road from Moscow to Vyazma without any battle?" But
member of Congress from Rhode Island. By this time the last barrier to
member of the American union.
member of the American union; and that union has a constitution ...
member of the family, she thought it her duty to go to see them. But
member of the union. The opposition to a new Constitution was
member or members from two-thirds of the States and a majority of all
members for disorderly behaviour, and, with the concurrence of
members of the Hofkriegsrath and both Emperors took part. At that
members of the House of Commons were favorable to the Confederacy and
members of the House of Representatives, and one hundred and five of the
members of the League (Article X) were to respect and preserve as
members of the Senate, ninety of the two hundred and thirty-three
members of the family, or persons who were, it seemed, obliged to live
members of the national convention that framed the document or of the
members of the same community ... and vests in a favored class, not in
members of the same family in succeeding generations suffer from varix,
members of the staff could be heard conversing in French, and
members of the state conventions and so express their will directly.
members of which were to be apportioned among the states according to
members were numerous and important. The Council was to take steps to
members. Its growth up to the end of the century was slow, for the total
membrane and the ligaments; they consist in cellular infiltration and
membrane has erupted through the joint capsule and infiltrated the
membrane involved, and there is comparatively little complaint on the
membrane is less adherent to the surface than it is when the disease
membrane is removed with the scissors or knife. If the cartilages are
membrane of joints. It may originate in the sheath, or may spread to it
membrane of the joints being involved. It does not tend to migrate to
membrane of the mouth, gullet, or larynx. The cancer cells retain the
membrane of the stomach after abdominal operations--apparently also due
membrane proliferates, grows over the cartilage, and replaces it, and
membrane spreads over the articular surface, fuses with the cartilage
membrane which is engaged in forming bone. Around the cavity the bone is
membrane, spreads to the bones, and being complicated with septic
membrane, the joint is swollen, and as the muscles waste above and
membrane. However formed, their shape is the result of mechanical
membrane. The palmaris longus is anastomosed with the abductor pollicis
membrane. When the surface epithelium projects as filiform processes,
membranes of joints, and are liable to the same diseases. Apart from the
membranes, and manifesting other evidence of the rheumatic taint, such
membranes, in suppuration in the liver, and in various other
memorable for the great men who took part in the debates and memorable
memorable plea in the Charleston convention of 1860 when, with grave and
memorable week, there had been the extraordinary autumn weather that
memories awakened by the name of Bolkonski belonged to a distant,
memories of the Italian campaign with the name of Suvorov. Moreover,
memory aroused in him no feeling but pity that she had not known the
memory of his administration was devoutly preserved among the serfs.
memory of the dinner at the English Club when he had challenged
memory of the distant past. He felt himself not only free from
memory of their ties with the Fatherland, openly sympathized with the
memory), or on the rare occasions when something happened to induce
memory, I will do the impossible--your son shall be transferred to the
men about him experienced in the art of war. All their faces looked
men and women journeyed hundreds of miles to witness the ceremony. Great
men and wounding eighteen more--an act which even the British ministry
men are in the United States only on a temporary sojourn, solely to make
men are not here. I came to the battle and have lost them."
men in the wood. I beg of you, I beg of you," he repeated, "to
men not reckoning the Guards (who did nothing during the whole war but
men of whom the greatest number of monuments have remained: kings,
men on the staff would be stirred up by this news, especially
men undressed, opened the bedroom door.
men were crossing themselves. Rostov no longer looked at the
men who set the tone in conversation--Count Rostopchin, Prince Yuri
men who very soon became frequent visitors at the Rostovs' house in
men who were right in the heat of the battle acted according to the
men whom we have noticed, it happens that the activity of the millions
men" and indicated that he would assume the role of leadership. As an
men's wives were created for them, Rostov did not leave the lady's
men, for the connection between those men and the nations has not been
men, it was only after some seconds that the impression produced by
men, leaving the women to take care of themselves. The amendment
men, seemed so immeasurably above him, an insignificant officer of the
men, who had till then constituted an army, flowed all over the
men, who looked like tradespeople, ran hurriedly from the entrance and
men. The jug and the cabin they proudly transformed into symbols of the
men; the Russian army in its retreat from Vilna to Moscow lost in
menace than to strike the running animal on the head.
menace. The reply of Congress on April 6 was a resolution, passed with
menacing way. But within the Trinity Gateway he was so pressed to
mend matters? There is nothing to mend! The principles laid down by me
meningitis also, and in some cases of injury to the head, it is common;
meningocele or spina bifida. When other means fail, the use of an
mental effort was needed to see that the best position for an army
mental state is often one of complete apathy, the patient failing to
mental state of the patient when wounded. We have observed pronounced
mental, but... And the countess, trying to conceal the action from
mentally classed as they. When Gerasim roused him from his reverie the
mention in connection with the diseases to which they give rise.
mention of her most august Majesty the Empress Marya Fedorovna. Pierre
mention the name of her who could give up Prince Andrew for anyone
mention, and which you think is the result of your own mental efforts,
mention, because they are peculiar in that neither the primary growth in
mention. If the ulcer is of limited extent and situated on an exposed
mentioned by the Rhetor, though it aroused his curiosity, did not seem
mentioned during the journey.
mentioned gummatous disease in the _larynx and trachea_, attended with
mentioned, the Supreme Court shall have appellate jurisdiction, both as
merchandise. It could be said, with good reason, that the disadvantages
merchant ship caught on the high seas was a legitimate prize of war
merchant ships under the American flag, taking the place of the French
merchant's house near the Crimean bridge. On his way through the
merchant, Robert Morris, won for himself the name of the "patriot
merchant, the farmer, and the miner. "The man who is employed for wages
merchants and mechanics became an important element in the social
merciless critics. The fiery apostles of abolition accused him of
mercury (5 per cent.), or the mercurial plaster introduced by Unna. In
mercury and lanolin. Every night after a hot bath, a dram of the
mercury, inunction may be replaced by one of the other methods, of
mere dots, others are as large as the palm of the hand, and occasionally
mere guards for the sovereigns.
mere recognition of the fact that it was not the sun but the earth
mere revision of the Articles, the spokesmen of the smaller states
merely act as a scaffolding. We believe also that the retention of the
merely because his opponents lacked one vote of the two-thirds required
merely erosion of bone, and the shadow is not unlike that given by
merely lying low, the hunter did not know. Suddenly the beast was
merely ridiculous in the eyes of her husband, to whom she had from the
merely secretions of the brain, and that man following the general law
merely to convince himself that he is in the right. Balashev began
merely understood but lay in the soul of every soldier and found
merely upon incidental differences in the conditions present, such as
merit," having described how he had that day seen Kutuzov, the newly
merits of the two plans, preference was given to the Panama route. As
merrily along the side of the road, sometimes in proof of its
merrily and quickly across the meadow grass.
merrily at him. Probably the word "gallant" turned the captain's
merrily to his two friends, one of whom was a dashing hussar and the
merrily, smuggling taking the place of lawful traffic.
merrily. One of the carts with wounded stopped by the side of the road
merry and lively as ever. Twice they noticed the French appearing
meshwork of fibrous tissue, the meshes of which are occupied by colloid
mesoblastic layer of the embryo--the cellular tissue, bones, muscles,
message to Congress he placed the conservation of natural resources
messenger returned and said that the colonel wished the officer to
met Joseph Alexeevich. Loud knocks were heard at the door. Pierre took
met and their passengers, the carpenters cutting the timber for new
met with in generalised neuro-fibromatosis. Apart from fracture, the
met with in the _groin_ following on inflammation and suppuration of the
met with in the joints and tendon sheaths of the wrist and hand,
met with in the subjects of the disease.
met with in those who, from the nature of their occupation, handle
met with most often in the femur and tibia, less frequently in the
met with on the face. They may be multiple, and vary greatly in size,
met with on the leg, especially in the region of the knee (Fig. 42) and
met with outside the body, gives rise in oxen, horses, and other animals
met with which have many of the clinical characters of those associated
met with, and it is due to a lesion of the fifth anterior branch, or, it
met with, especially in the skin of the buttock, and may present a local
met with, such as _effusion into the joints_, especially the knees;
met, in reply to inquiries as to where the prince lived, pointed out a
metacarpal bones to avoid the digital vessels and nerves. If pus has
metal articles. Other French soldiers standing below went up to the
metal harness disks and from the eyes of the horses, who looked
metal instruments; it is essential that the efficiency of the steriliser
metallic roar, and a whistling grenade flew above the heads of our
metallic sound of the bells reverberated high above and the hot rays
metaphysis between the epiphysial cartilage and the diaphysis. We shall
metastases by lymphatic permeation (Handley), the common metastases
metastases in other tissues, the secondary growths resemble the parent
metatarsal in hallux valgus; over the tarsus, metatarsus, and digits in
method is applicable when the body can be palpated, usually in the
method of electing the President.
method of getting rid of the coloration is to excise the scar; the edges
method of treating historical material, merely deprives himself of the
method, and a counter opening may be made in the axilla.
method, or from fracture of the upper end of the humerus or of the neck
method, the return to normal is often far from perfect, and there
method. They are found mixed with other organisms in the purulent
methods of historical instruction. If the study of history cannot be
methods of treating certain infective diseases have been evolved. The
methods. The spirit survived the national association. "On the whole,"
methylated spirit to dehydrate the skin, and then for two or three
metropolis. The merchant at the cross roads store is as much a business
micro-organism, the _bacillus tetani_, and characterised by increased
micro-organisms are those that cause inflammation and suppuration--the
micro-organisms, such as the staphylococcus aureus and the spirochaete of
microbes, may be the result of gonococcal infection alone or of a mixed
micrococcus tetragenus, the gonococcus, actinomyces, the glanders
microscopic particles of drizzling mist. The bare twigs in the
microscopical examination of a portion of the tumour; this should be
microscopical examination. Other forms of sarcoma, and the enlargement
mid forties by an almost total failure of the potato crop, the main
midday he was admitted to the Emperor, and an hour later he rode off
midday sun as gaily as around the living hives; from a distance it
midday they put the hounds into a ravine thickly overgrown with
middle Europe. The counter movement reaches the starting point of
middle cutaneous nerves; the disinfection of the skin is carried out on
middle ear, the usual phenomena of acute inflammation and suppuration
middle line. It may extend upwards under cover of the ribs, downwards
middle of the action by someone's order, the battery had continued
middle of the century, Southern economists noted the change, one of
middle of the cotillion, having completed one of the figures, Natasha,
middle of the night a motley throng of people sat there, not
middle of the room. Before the conversation began Prince Andrew was
middle of the shaft. In exceptional cases there is more than one abscess
middle of which soldiers were watering their lean horses at the pump
middle thirds of the forearm.
middle, a cry was heard, then Princess Mary's heavy tread and the
middle-ear disease, and conjunctivitis. These lesions afford the bacilli
midnight of the last day of the month of any such announcement.
midnight of the last day of the month of any such announcement.
midnight she went to Natasha's room fingering the key in her pocket.
midnight, would ride up to the house of some offender, lift his head
midst of that crowd terrible screams arose. Petya galloped up, and the
midway between the symphysis pubis and the anterior superior iliac
midwinter was the count at last handed a letter addressed in his son's
might be construed as a preference of one party to the struggle before
might be corded up. Thanks to Natasha's directions the work now went
might be put to him and the answers he would give. He expected to be
might be the relations of the company and its workers in that particular
might encounter an enemy invisible ten paces off. But the columns
might have been as good as Weyrother's, but for the disadvantage
might have been more decisive had the commander in chief not been so
might have forgotten him, or confused him with the others. But no: the
might rid them of the Bourbons and because they saw that he was a
might, and a passionate attraction to him who was the cause of this
might, he would join the army.
mighty web over the face of the North, and as accumulated capital rose
mighty weight into the scale of free government and emancipate a
mild solemnity which has so elevating and soothing an effect on the
milder laws. The shoemakers of Philadelphia, organized in 1794,
miles from Hollabrunn) received Murat's dispatch with the proposal
miles to $1. New Orleans was destined to lose her primacy in the
miles. The hard covering is employed to enable the bullet to take the
military and naval projects not connected with "the defense of our
military class are the absence of freedom, that is, discipline,
military court and from the consequent presence there of an
military dandies, the lower part of his face hidden by his beaver
military decorum through the service, meditating on a great variety of
military governors, instructing them at the earliest possible moment to
military machine, an impulse once given leads to the final result; and
military matters yourself!' Yes... That was the answer I got!"
military measures to be taken. In case the decision in any arbitration
military or naval forces of the United States; those who attempted to
military policies and to frustrate the designs of those who sought to
military science destroyed the French, and to him belongs the credit
military talent from beyond the seas. Baron Steuben, well schooled in
military, under the United States, or under any State, who, having
militia officer, "you won't catch me. Speak of the sun and you see its
militia, and for many other reasons. The fact is that other
militia, you too will have to mount a horse," remarked the old
militiamen numbering 300,000 for nine months' service. The results were
militiamen were digging. This was the redoubt, as yet unnamed, which
militiamen who had assembled near Boston, after the battle of Lexington,
militiamen who were entering the battery ran back.
militiamen, ascended the knoll from which, according to the doctor,
milky fluid--chyle--may at once escape from it. The jets are rhythmical
milldam and forming up within twice the range of a musket shot. The
million dollars, "supposed to be the largest estate in Boston," then one
million members. As in the case of the Grangers many years before, the
million slaves, decreed the equal citizenship of all, and established
million were actually irrigated. In the single year 1918, the crops of
millionaires won their fortunes in the railway business and still more
millions depended, was being shaped. From the irritation of the
millions of Frenchmen submitting to the Bourbons. That
millions of Northern Democrats who stood by the union and the tens of
millions of men, reckoning those transporting and feeding the army-
millions of men. On the other hand, even if we admitted that words
millions of spindles tumbled unheeded to the seas. Coal and iron beds
millions, all the facts of history (as far as we know it) confirm
mind at rest," said he without altering his tone, beneath the
mind does not seem to be the case. He admitted himself that when he
mind inspired him with respect all the more because he did not quite
mind the presence of a monarch, talked with extreme familiarity of the
mind the question of the dowry, nor spoken to his wife about it. At
mind was not in a normal state in that respect. All the powers of
mind, arising from the circumstances and persons he met. Of these
minds in 1848 when the world was startled once more by a revolution in
minds of many historians as to whether one of the three Presidents,
mine," wrote the Secretary of State, John Hay, on the day of the
miner. The miner, on the other hand, however expert, could not dispense
minerals continued to be the chief source of wealth in a number of
miners from Kentucky, Tennessee, and Missouri crowding in to exploit the
miners, and promoters who explored the valleys, climbed the hills,
miners, which started in the summer, ran late into the autumn.
mines of Utah was worth four or five times the wheat crop; the coal of
mingled with this mist, and over the whole expanse and through that
minimise the risk of its incorporation in the scar of the original wound
minimum. The risk of infection from this source has further been greatly
mining rights, ports, and commercial privileges at the expense of the
mining, and metal working, the results of business enterprise far
minister, Canning, proposed that the two countries join in declaring
ministers behind them believed that a large part of the colonists were
ministers of the crown in London. With governors, courts, and an army
minor powers on the other. On American soil, the defeat of Braddock in
minority called "the invisible government." So eminent and conservative
minute's pause. "He says she's moved them into the Otradnoe enclosure.
minute. Men who want to fight will always put themselves in the most
minutes into the skin where it is soft and comparatively free from
minutes late in starting her practice on the clavichord, went into the
minutes later our Uhlans were galloping back, not to the place they
minutes of irksome, constrained conversation, they heard the sound
minutes with artery forceps. It is usually found that on the removal of
minutes, and Natasha rested her head on the arm of her chair and
minutes. And that it will not be too dull, here is the dear count
miracle of Joshua the son of Nun. To the defenders of the laws of
mirrors that had been so carefully packed the night before now lay
misfortune has driven from the city, and you scattered tillers of
misfortunes of some Mary Viktorovna or other. At the center of the
misfortunes you have suffered, should entertain the hope of a less
misleading, because the lesion involves the ossifying junction and the
miss a single word of the commander in chief's regarding the regiment.
missing any clever conversation that was to be heard. Seeing the
mission and feeling the hand of God upon him, suddenly recognizes
mission to the Indians and then as a college for the sons of New England
missionaries to spread the gospel of "Western opportunity" to people in
missionaries were planning a French empire for the great monarch, Louis
mist the rays of the morning sun were reflected, flashing back like
mist. They had the right to fire when they liked as they approached
mistaken in his identification of the different wards of Moscow.
mistaken in his view of what was good for the people, we must
mistaken us for my father. This is the one matter in which she
mistaken," said the stranger in a deliberate and loud voice.
mistaking this view of the issue. As the vote in the election gave
mistress rocked and hushed her baby and when anyone came into the
mistresses and ministers, and by the lives of Napoleon, Rousseau,
mists, foreseeing the brilliant glory of thy rule, sings in
misunderstandings were at an end; that availing herself of the
mitigates his fault in our eyes. The self-sacrifice of a father or
mixed forms which usually develop in pre-existing innocent tumours. The
mixed infection, advocate the removal of the glands by operation.
mixed toxins of the streptococcus of erysipelas and the bacillus
mixed with the pus, it contains granules of blood pigment and is said to
mixture onto the floor and asked for some more water. The maid brought
mob, the traitor... the public welfare," thought he.
mobbed the agents of King George sent over to sell stamps. They were in
model village Elder, so Alpatych had not managed the prince's
models. For the royal governor was substituted a governor or president
moderate and amicable tone in which the French Emperor spoke, Balashev
moderate compass. For another thing, the English, Scotch-Irish, and
moderate degree of leucocytosis. If the labour is normal and the
moderate in degree, as soon as the patient has been put to bed, about a
moderation. He takes the irritating message and with his own hand
modern publicity being employed to enlist popular interest. The first
moist velvety darkness of the night.
moist with inspissated sweat, the patient not daring to touch or wash
moist with skin secretions, urine, or wound discharges, determines the
moistened with warm saline solution. The cutting is made easier if the
moisture is a necessary condition; spores, however, can survive the want
moisture was descending from above. Near by, the campfires were
molasses from the French and Dutch colonies were shipped into New
moment "...of my youth, farewell!" he said, turning to Makarin and the
moment and that if he let it slip it would not return. The bullets
moment and then continuing the conversation. They were now
moment before, just as he never could repeat to Pierre the words of
moment expected the conversation to take a fresh turn. But the abbe,
moment fearful screams reached them from the huge crowd on the
moment he opened his eyes he heard in front of him, where the
moment seemed to him all the interests that engrossed Napoleon, so
moment the Emperor may see them.... But no, these must be only a
moment the Emperors went into the pavilion he looked at his watch, and
moment think of what awaits them, but pass by, winking at the wounded.
moment when I asked the question. Time has gone by which I could not
moment, sat beside him: the rest, crowding round him, watched every
moment, seemed to her the acme of musical delight.
moment. But I am not now abstaining from doing so at the first
moment. He was tormented by the consciousness of his own weakness. The
moment. The fertile land of Texas just across the boundary lured them on
momentary pause. "So much the better, so much the better, Monsieur
moments that Dunyasha noticed her smiling as she looked out of the
monarchical tendencies of the Federalists, they boldly assumed the name
monarchs nearly quarreled and were on the point of again ordering
monarchs on the continent to secure their help in the same enterprise,
monarchy and aristocracy but had forgotten the starving peasants and the
money by subscription. The lady who was thought to be most pleasing to
money for their daily needs. All together he contributed the huge sum of
money invested and the labor employed in the favored industries
money party set up a shrill cry of protest, and kept up the fight until,
money, and he was keeping the bank. Rostov had not seen him since
money, so that this seven of hearts meant for him not only the loss of
money-making and who had dreams of empire unequaled by many kings of the
money?" he asked his mother, not realizing the cruelty of his question
monitress and saw that she was again going on tiptoe to the
monopoly and excessive prices. By a series of measures, enlarging the
monopoly, they continued, was the fruit of a conspiracy against the
monosyllables. He was in the way and was the only one who did not
monotonous waves of men, like a fleck of white foam on the waves of
monster petitions in favor of the emancipation of slaves. In hospitals,
monsters, the _Minnesota_ and the _Dakota_, thus preparing for
month after his death, surprising everyone by the immense total of
month, finding herself in difficulties owing to the boorishness of
months after infection. The patient complains of impairment of sight and
months after the award. Should any member disregard its covenants, its
months after the outbreak of the European revolution in the first
months an area which in the case of tuberculosis would require as many
months it debated and wrangled over plans for a constitution. The small
months or even years after the cessation of exposure. _Sterility_ may be
months, but later may again become positive. Subsequent doses of the
monument to the zeal and industry of a Democrat, better known in
mood of the Bogucharovo commune, by which the Elder had already been
mood of the moment. In reality, however, all these movements forward
mood. The house had escaped the fire; it showed signs of damage but
moon began to show from behind the lime trees, a fresh white dewy mist
moon. Hence the gates of the proprietary colonies were flung wide open.
moonlight and the shadows, expecting every moment to see his dead
moral barrier the absence of which she had experienced with Kuragin
moral force of the attacking French army was exhausted. Not that
moral life, and that of the seven virtues he lacked two--morality
moral qualities, but on the contrary were generally morally weaker
more American. The planter faced the Old East. The farmer faced the New
more amicable in 1763 than at any period under the Stuart regime which
more and holding out the letter.
more and more and at last the wall fell, and with it the men who had
more and more impatient the nearer they got to Moscow.
more assimilated to the system of the North. In this process several
more at least not less a man than the great Napoleon--demands the
more clearly written in the stars.
more common than complete, and it is noteworthy that the fibres destined
more costly of the two labor systems. The processes of nature were aided
more dangerous were thrown into jail. The prison camp in Connecticut at
more difficult questions. The number of islands, the variety of
more effectually preventing the clandestine conveyance of goods to and
more evident are the laws of that movement. To discover and define
more evident is the predestination and inevitability of his every
more excited as he paced up and down the room, repeating to Balashev
more hopeful by the expression he read on the faces there, he smiled
more important than verses, and Bagration, again preceding all the
more in harmony with the ideals of humanity. Having set out upon it,
more intense over the whole field, especially to the left where
more like morning or evening than night. On the way Pierre
more manly," continued the countess, taking her daughter's hand.
more of the gummata may break down and give rise to tertiary ulcers. The
more on his, but that the best thing about Bezukhov's action was
more on its downward course. In the meantime the Treasury was in a sad
more open the method of operating the better, so that all parts of the
more our conception of his freedom diminishes and the more our
more particularly those in which pyogenic bacteria are present. In the
more persistent, and is associated with swelling of the parts from
more placed in favourable circumstances. On this fact the practice of
more profound understanding of the meaning of the scene he had
more ragged than that of entrance, and that its edges are everted; the
more ragged, and portions of the clothes may be driven into the tissues.
more rarely from the upper extremity. We have seen it from an infected
more small incisions; in other parts of the body Klapp's suction bells
more sweeping till our political conditions will become a war of the
more tense than that met with over the wrist, so that it is sometimes
more than 5 milliamperes for about ten minutes, the current being made
more than Timokhin had done when he was reprimanded by the
more than a million dollars' worth of damage done to property. The draft
more than an hour to do so, and came out upon the square where the
more than an incident in precipitating the war for independence.
more than forty borzois, so that, with the borzois on the leash
more than once noticed that her mistress leaned out of the window
more than once remarked: "We regard everything that is above the
more than once seen a father and son together in the hospital
more than one species of organism, for example, the tubercle bacillus
more than one wife, they fell in heartily with the suggestion of a new
more than one-half the national debt of Hamilton's day. The yield of the
more than the Russian army, weaker by one half, could help swerving.
more than the amount borrowed, with interest, are in reality, in the
more than two seconds. Whether or no the Emperor understood what was
more that in both diseases improvement follows the administration of
more to approximate, are significant from the fact that after
more tractable and more willing to surrender the freedom of the hunter
more tranquil and confident you ought to be, and the more amazed at my
more, as on many other occasions, peace was purchased and the union
more, tore the standards from the floor and gathered around the Nebraska
more. She is so affected. Ask her in," she said to the footman in a
more; when there are several, they are individually smaller than the
moreover in the air. As if conscious of impending calamity, the
moreover, that a sudden strain may, by rupturing the valves and so
moreover, what the accused always feel at their trial, perplexity as
morning all these dreams melted and merged into the chaos and darkness
morning at dawn the first impression of him, as of something round,
morning for the princess' things. And don't go to any meeting
morning he and his party had been on the move. All day long he had
morning light, stopped suddenly, and Petya fell heavily on to the
morning she told the Rostovs and all her acquaintances the details
morning the regiment--instead of the straggling, disorderly crowd it
morning, and came out to the porch in his lilac silk dressing gown. In
morning, but he was silent with his steward, the gardener, and the
morning, but, on the contrary, tried to reassure Balashev. It was
morning, came up to the Emperor and ventured respectfully to suggest
morning, was asleep on the sitting-room sofa. The old count was
morning, which in the mean jocular way common to anonymous letters
mornings, and that day she returned to the old way of life which she
morosely up and down it, then they descended into the hollow where the
mortally ill. Before the end of a month he lay dead at the capitol.
mortgage bonds, $27,000,000 in second mortgage bonds held by the
mosaic of farms stretching from the Southern Appalachians to Lake
most accessible, we get the conception of a maximum of inevitability
most advanced--that is, at the ossifying junction--there are evidences
most becoming aspect. Before the beginning of the second act Pierre
most cases of uncomplicated influenza. The occurrence of leucocytosis in
most cases universal historians still employ the conception of power
most common disease of lymph glands. In the neck it is met with in
most common exciting cause is increased pressure within the veins, and
most commonly met with in the tibia and in the ribs at the
most commonly met with on the shoulder, buttock, or back. In certain
most compassionate Russian commanders, those favorable to the
most fashionable young man. He sat with his legs up on the sofa as
most frequently affected, and the condition usually yields readily to
most frequently injured, and the muscles paralysed are those supplied by
most important being the _fibroblasts_, which are destined to form
most important characteristic. It is best appreciated when the sore is
most important episode of the war of 1812 was the movement of the
most of the houses were locked and the shutters up. The streets and
most of the powers, and the first Assembly of the League of Nations met
most of them in the Lake region. Sons and daughters of German farmers in
most often indicated in wounds of the extremities.
most often met with in the nearest lymph glands; those in the neck, for
most often met with on the nose or cheek. The early and typical
most on earth, it would be to be poorer than the poorest beggar. A
most potent, and the one which most concerns the surgeon, is physical
most recent is that by Babinski and Barre, which traces the condition to
most satisfactory treatment is to excise the bursa; the overlying skin
most severe portion. It is also to be remarked that the extent and
most solemn duties of his life. He walked about in front of the line
most urgently demand the punishment for such an act; in the case of
most vivid and precious memory and the personification of everything
most wonderful, most splendid man in the world, whom no one knew of.
mother and Sonya, realizing for the first time how wrongly she had
mother and the youngest daughter--both named Nataly. Ever since the
mother country. Allegiance to her had been responsible for the many wars
mother equal rights with the father in the guardianship of children,
mother had dinned into his ears the slogan: "George, be king!" Lord
mother, and Sonya. She valued the company of those to whom she could
mother, or self-sacrifice with the possibility of a reward, is more
mother, to repay you, and not to leave the children such beggars as
mother; in others, it is administered in the same manner as already
mothers' pensions became popular during the second decade of the
motile (Fig. 4). It closely resembles the typhoid bacillus, but is
motion is painful and restricted. Slight contracture of the fingers is
motionless above the buzz of talk that came from the resting troops.
motionless as if turned to stone, hundreds of riders composing the
motionless in a corner of the coach with wide open eyes, and the
motionless masses of the French now swayed and that there really was a
motive of the Republican party is by these means to secure itself
motives acting upon him; yet man never submits to the deductions of
motor nerves within the muscles. The nerve fibres, although mechanically
motor power, while--and this is a point of great importance--the normal
mount before it was halted facing the enemy. Again, as at the Enns
mountains. Many of the later immigrants, in their search for cheap
mounted Frenchmen, probably adjutants, were galloping up the hill. A
mounted. Rostov riding in front gave the order "Forward!" and the
mourned. Polk stormed but could not win even a renomination at the hands
mournful silence as he left the drawing room. He pictured the vanity
mournfully, addressing the queen, but the king waved his arm severely,
mouth and pharynx, the _simple epulis_ of the alveolar margin and the
mouth of a bottle, was sprinkling Eau de Cologne on the Emperor's
mouth!" said Bilibin, and the mop of hair on his head moved with
mouth, or by the introduction of saline solution into the rectum. Ice
mouth, was inhaling the smoke spasmodically and screwing up his
mouth. The pupils dilate; the pulse becomes small and almost
mouth. The quartermaster frowned, looking at the soldiers as if
mouth. The short, round-shouldered Captain Tushin, stumbling over
mouths were closed by the opinion uttered by the simple-minded soldier
move into the drawing room. They can have all our half of the house."
moved about discussing it. Besides the ordinary topics of
moved according to the enemy's movements and the number of men
moved across the bridge.
moved forward evidently wishing to end the conversation, but the
moved from the place where it had spent the night, advancing into
moved from the west eastwards to the Russian frontier, toward which
moved the American opponents of McKinley's colonial policies to redouble
moved the chair for her.
moved the sympathies of the American people. Sermons were preached about
moved toward the door.
moved toward the sofa she had indicated. As soon as Anna Mikhaylovna
moved; then he and the general in white, accompanied by the suite,
movement by Napoleon which might endanger the army--news
movement from the west occurs: a backwash which serves to solve the
movement gave impetus to the other, with increasing force during the
movement in the bud.
movement may suggest arthritis deformans, but the X-ray appearances make
movement occurs; swelling is most marked in the vicinity of the joint,
movement of her head a lady standing on the opposite side, beyond
movement of humanity went on as unceasingly as the flow of time.
movement of steam, of the bells, and of the wind. History must do
movement of the French as was desired in Petersburg and by the Russian
movement of the Tsar's seemed to him enchanting.
movement of the Uhlans. They swooped down close to the French
movement of the hand on the dial of human history.
movement of the head and lips indicating very little hope for the
movement of the head that he was considering this information.
movement of the tendon. The sheath itself is thickened by the growth of
movement to an ankylosed joint. It consists in transplanting between the
movement to them which causes them to scarify the inner surface of the
movement, and their excitability to the faradic current is diminished.
movement, picked up the ball, and regained her former position.
movement, so that the patient walks lame or is obliged to lie up. It is
movement. Each time the commander started and bent forward, the hussar
movement. For one thing, the number of local unions increased by leaps
movement. The sound of musketry at the foot of the hill, now
movement; the same hesitation midway, and the same increasing rapidity
movement; there is the same coalescence into a group of enormous
movements are conditioned by the activity of the nerves; the soul
movements of 1805, 1807, and 1809--precede the great westward
movements of the Russian army, sent army corps out along the different
movements of the arm, such as are performed in wringing clothes. The
movements of the herd we must watch the movements of all the prominent
movements of the joint, becomes smooth and polished--a change described
movements of the other armies. Though, by this course, neither one aim
movements of the tendon. The cyst is at first multiple, but the
movements, by the softness and flexibility of her small limbs, and
movements, just as such a connection may be found between the
moves eastward and collides with a countermovement from the east
moves were perfect. He only notices the mistake to which he pays
moving according to rules at a distance from the French, still
moving eloquence, he espoused the Southern cause against the impending
moving freely, then the laws of Kepler and Newton are negatived and no
moving from the battlefield.
moving through Moscow, nobody came to the count any more for
moving to the door of the room assigned to him. The priest's wife
moving toward her as she entered the room. Prince Vasili approached
moving toward our left flank, the higher command found that our center
moving with great haste and in the greatest disorder. The road was
much as a whole army corps. The progress of the war was eagerly
much as possible. In the well-to-do classes this is readily accomplished
much behind the times, and had sunk, as he expressed it to himself,
much by the contraction of the muscle concerned, as by the contraction
much less disastrous to the French--in guns and men lost--than Krasnoe
much of the apparent increase is due to more accurate diagnosis and
much of the worn-out soil to its original fertility. In the meantime
much self-government on the Puritans.
much the shawl had cost; another was saying that all silk goods had
much to talk about that they could not discuss before the old
much to the distress of everybody in America, including loyal
much upset when I told him people had come to ask what was the
much! I have promised myself not to serve again in the active
much, therefore, the age of the person in whom it occurs, as the age of
mucous membrane gives way an ulcer is formed. The margins of a
mucous membrane, something should be done to avoid the danger of its
mucous membranes livid, the pulse feeble and fluttering, the discharges
mucous surfaces it consists of the epithelium covering the mucous
mud-stained face--fair and young, with a dimple in the chin and
mules; and many a fortune was made out of the traffic.
multiple exostoses, grow from the long bones and from the scapula,
multiple from the outset--for example, fatty, fibrous, and bony tumours,
multiple. The articular cartilages are destroyed, the ends of the bones
multiplied in number, and augmented in population, will control the
munching their oats. In the dark Petya recognized his own horse, which
municipalities in a series of articles bearing the painful heading: _The
municipality did not stop the robberies and was only of use to certain
murmured, pacing the garden with hurried steps and pressing her
muscle has not been exercised, the patient shrinks from using it and the
muscle may be paralysed by direct pressure on the terminal filaments of
muscle, and finally appear in the thigh.
muscle, whereas in sarcoma the involvement of the bone is shown by
muscles and ligaments about the elbow; the "angler's elbow," affecting
muscles around the joint, designed to prevent movement. This muscular
muscles becoming relaxed, the sensitive ulcerated surfaces jar on one
muscles keeps him in a constant state of fearful apprehension of the
muscles of mastication, notably the masseter, so that he has difficulty
muscles of the limbs may waste to such an extent as to leave the large,
muscles on one or both sides. The amount of tenderness varies, and so
muscles reflected from centres in the spinal medulla. It is more marked
muscles regain the power of voluntary movement, and as the condition
muscles, and vaso-motor and trophic changes. The presence of the
muscles, one or more incisions should be made, and the cavity drained by
muscles, or some movement or twist of the limb. The occurrence of
muscles. The syringe is made of glass, and has a solid glass piston; the
muscles_, and, when situated beneath the deep fascia, such as the fascia
muscular elements, which are not regenerated. The mucous lining is
muscular fibres, arranged for the most part concentrically round the
music and songs and coming from the field where the review was held.
music. The host followed with Marya Antonovna Naryshkina; then came
musketry and the rattling of carriage wheels seemed to fill his
musketry. Many people were hurrying through the streets and there were
must be derived from a comparison with the total illiteracy which
must be engaged in frequent controversies, the causes of which are
must be offered "a golden bridge"; that neither the Tarutino, the
must be placed in the most favourable condition for restoration of the
must be placed the labor of those who had valiantly fought in forum and
must be referred not to the fourth but to the fifteenth of October-
must be strictly adhered to," said he, drumming on the table with
must be suppressed and advised the colonies to set up governments of
must be worn, at least during the night, until the muscles regain their
must believe in the possibility of happiness in order to be happy, and
must either pole be allowed to come in contact with the skin, lest a
must entirely change my point of view and study the laws of the
must hide the traces of their guilt as quickly as possible.
must now be completed. The plaintive moan of reproach was drowned by
must put in an appearance there," said the prince. "My daughter is
must retreat and the order to do so must be given." To give that
must.... It is a death blow to the Constitution. It may afterwards
mustache. Another borzoi, a dog, catching sight of his master from the
mustaches extending onto his cheeks, who after riding to the staff had
mute confession, communion was administered to the dying man,
muttering the prayer at Communion: "Let the bold and insolent
muttering, the creak of his bed, and the steps of Tikhon and the
mutton. In the room three officers of Denisov's band were converting a
mutual acquaintances, now turned on Moscow, the army, and Napoleon.
mutual defense. A few years later the Old Dominion cooperated loyally
mutually engage in the most solemn manner to use all their efforts to
my brave, kind friends," and he leaned his head against the shoulder
my dear boy, among other things you are too attentive to the other,
my dear boy, are you serving in the Horse Guards?" asked the old
my dear fellow," said he, "into the fire with all such things! Let
my dear fellow. Oh, by the by!" he shouted through the doorway after
my father was much affected by it. He says the count was the last
my place," she thought as she went out in the twilight toward the
my proposal for the reform of the army regulations to the Emperor
my son in the Empire; my dictatorship would have been finished, and
my wife--are the count's only direct heirs. I know, I know how hard it
myeloma is made with the aid of the X-rays: the typical appearance is
myeloma occurs most frequently in the cancellous tissue at the ends of
myself and you with the hope that your son is alive, for otherwise
myself can I retain in some degree of purity the liquid I receive."
myself the cause, teach me what I should do! I shall perish of my
myself.' And that was the end of it. The count had the father fetched,
mysteries of public finance, as well as the management of rapacious
mysterious domain of smoke that overlay the whole space in front,
mysterious forces that move humanity (mysterious because the laws of
mysterious voice pronounced some words. Tears, the cause of which
mystery... which has come down to us from the remotest ages, even from
mystical science of the order: with questions of the threefold
myxomatous degeneration, resulting in the formation of a glairy,
naevi disappear spontaneously, interference is only called for when the
naevus with involvement of the skin.
nail as well as the raised horny layer of the epidermis should be
nail, with swelling and redness of the nail fold, causing intense pain
nails. All the officers appeared to be, and really were, in love
naive look at Bennigsen he added: "Oh yes; take the battle of
name day," said the visitor. "What a charming child," she added,
name secret. Then during the first day spent in inaction and
name shall be fifty-four forty!" Thirteen years later, the southern part
name the whole army gave to their encampment there, and because many
name. The occasion was another European crisis. During the Napoleonic
namely the Orthodox Russian soldiers, loudly demanding bread, meat,
namely, by the actual growth of cancer cells along the finer vessels of
naming his guests. Rostov looked frowningly at the Frenchmen, bowed
nankeen-covered, sheepskin coat, the traveler sat down on the sofa,
napkin, and from whom she could hear reassuring words to the effect
narrative of individual effort on the part of women, of organizations
narrator. Several persons, among them the elderly lady and Anna
narrow dam amid the wagons and the cannon, under the horses' hoofs and
narrow lands of Italy until it stretched from the heather of Scotland to
narrow pedicle or stalk, or this may be torn across and the body becomes
narrow pointed boot then fashionable, touched the groin of the
narrowed disdainfully, he entered the room of the Minister of War with
narrowed, or even obliterated--_endarteritis obliterans_. The middle
narrowing of the vessels may be sufficient to determine gangrene in the
narrowly escaped amid the general confusion. The men of this party had
narrowly intelligent, conscientious, and pedantic preceptor. The old
nasal cavities, and the bones of the face; hence it may produce the most
naso-pharynx--the blood vessels are dilated into sinuses and have no
nation in general to a patriotic war. And by this visit of the Emperor
nation on the globe, was brought to a close. More than 75,000 American
nation's chief magistrate was committed to the tempestuous methods of
nation, he came to the conclusion that democracy with all its faults was
nation--even though it is unintelligible why the defeat of an army-
nation--the first of a long line of Presidents from the Mississippi
national banks to issue notes intended to circulate as money on the
national convention to enlarge the powers of the Congress. The
national debt and he could hardly endure the thought of issuing more
national debt as the source of a dangerous "money power," giving
national debt at full value. The bill for the assumption of state debts,
national government weak in armed power during their possession of the
national highway binding the East and the West. The Cumberland Road, as
national needs. The bank would enlarge the amount of capital so sorely
national parliament, the "Estates General," composed of representatives
national politics? To the public?
national supremacy was the destruction of the planting aristocracy of
national unions of this character. The expansion of the railway made
national. The nineteenth, following upon the adoption of woman suffrage
nationalism and democracy was in the course of time given to new leaders
nationalism and nullification upon Jackson, the same could not be said
nationalism, which made them still more one-sided in the dispute. They
nationalism. The immediate occasion of the trouble was the tariff--a
nationalities and tendencies begin to describe the same event, the
nationalities to freedom and self-government; the independence of
nationalities, mainly the Scotch-Irish and Germans, rival the English in
nationalities. The English led the way. Next to them in numerical
nations asking them to avow "the terms upon which war might be
nations in the first Hague Peace Conference in 1899. The conference did
nations of Europe, led them to the goal.
nations, while as zealous as any in the pursuit of peaceful trade, had
native Americans to assimilate quickly and unconsciously the habits and
natural and habitual enemy. It is New Orleans through which the produce
natural arrest of bleeding is favoured by tearing or crushing of the
natural resources developed, and industries promoted, the social order
natural resources of the country, struck at the rights of foreign
natural state. Anti-scorbutics in the form of orange, lemon, or grape
natural to man which he had first experienced at the first halt
natural tone of good-natured familiarity. He laid his hand on the
natural, logical, inevitable result of the doctrines and teachings of
naturally as water flows deepest where the land lies lowest.
naturally resulted the usual demand for admission to the union. Instead
naturally suggested that men as well as women be invited to attend the
naturally thin and pigmented. In parts where the extravasated blood is
nature and severity of the injuries sustained in warfare vary widely in
nature of the vessel from which it takes place.
nature the spread of the gangrene is seldom arrested by the natural
nature to freedom, the planting interests might have been content, had
nature's method--to encourage the flow of blood to the brain, the
nature, and known as _toxins_. When these poisons are absorbed into the
natured egotism that the Rostovs involuntarily came to think it
naught by the overthrow of the Liberals in the Canadian elections of
naval officer, that he would drink a bottle of rum sitting on the
naval officers who seized offenders against the law were rewarded by
navigable rivers for everybody, that the seas should be common to all,
navigation laws. Revenue collectors, officers of the army and navy, and
navy of the United States, and of the militia of the several States,
navy, the American merchants were high-spirited and mettlesome, ready to
near Bexar--a commission finally carried out to the letter by his son
near Moscow--despite the strength of the feeling that had arisen in
near Ostralitz. In the large drawing room which had become the
near by on the right, shouting and firing were again heard. Flashes of
near his temple, where an Ismail bullet had pierced his skull, and the
near its termination. It is an advantage to have a metronome in the
near one, the chestnut Falcon, who was pawing the ground and
near the door; but besides all this something creaked, there was a
near the end of his term, to sanction the annexation of Texas, which had
near the firing line women were to be found, aiding the wounded, hauling
near the panting little nag where Pierre stood, it was damp, somber,
near the scar left by the operation, the cancer nodules are not
near the village of Novoe, and the center at Borodino at the
nearer in disorderly crowds came the Uhlans and the French dragoons
nearer the surface, also the interior of the skull, the larynx, trachea,
nearer to one another, beginning to see one another through the
nearer to the destruction of Moscow--which we feared more than
nearer to the window. She was evidently leaning right out, for the
nearer. Then the clang of hoofs, as of several horses galloping,
nearest soldier. The soldiers simply held their sides as they
nearest to him fell against the rails with a groan. Rostov ran up to
nearing home she suddenly struck up the air of As 'twas growing dark
nearing the town at the Dorogomilov bridge saw ahead of them masses of
nearly a hundred years," and then hinted that the decision annulling the
nearly all the neutrals. By a two-thirds vote of the League Assembly the
nearly always lie beneath the fascia, the skin is movable over them. A
nearly always of the relapsing variety. In some cases the bone becomes
nearly three thousand miles from the main base of supplies and, though
nearness to the Emperor. He felt that this nearness by itself made
neatly dressed, at a round table in the clean quarters allotted to
necessarily associated with the action of bacteria, although in any
necessarily dictate and prescribe its policy." He went on: "The
necessarily due to actual tuberculous infection of the joint.
necessarily erupts directly into the joint.
necessary arrangements would be made by Napoleon during the battle.
necessary for dealing wisely with Indian matters. As the difficulties
necessary for him to inspire the people in the capitals and arouse the
necessary for the position. Then there's this house, which must be
necessary in the organism of nature, and they always exist, always
necessary in the ratification of treaties. A further concession to the
necessary tendency to embitter the dispositions of the vanquished and to
necessary that millions of men in whose hands lay the real power-
necessary the devices of indirection. They were few, simple, and
necessary to close the circle of our felicities."
necessary to cope with the problems of reconstruction left by the war.
necessary to fill the gap is therefore great; and as the epithelial
necessary to grasp clearly the meaning of the fact that, while not
necessary to indicate briefly the method of dealing with gunshot wounds
necessary to introduce himself, and without experiencing the least
necessary to operate for the purpose of applying a ligature to the
necessary to protect it in all its rights." Referring to the recent
necessary to rush back to Russia after him, but all the same he knew
necessary to use the catheter if retention of urine occurs.
necessary virtue in the republic. "Amongst a democratic people where
necessary, according to the size and character of the naevus.
necessary, during the operation, and at its conclusion. The
necessary, shall propose amendments to this Constitution, or, on the
necessary," said the younger of the two speakers, evidently in the
necessary. To counteract the general effect of toxins absorbed into
necessary. When there is reason to believe that the nerve is severely
necessary; but in the elbow it may be called for to obtain a movable
necessitating the wearing of larger hats. When the condition is fully
necessities of the hour.
necessity of a belligerent and constitutes restrictions upon the rights
necessity of paying off the debts and undertaking new activities
necessity. They had to unite in defense; first, against the Indians and
necessity; but it does not advance by a hair's breadth the solution of
neck becomes infiltrated, the spread is more rapid. The whole region
neck or base of the tumour with a chisel, care being taken to remove the
neck, delicate as a child's, revealed by the turn-down collar of his
neck, on the limbs, or in the scrotum, the use of Michel's clips is
necklace. From time to time she smoothed the folds of her dress, and
necrosis and separate, exposing the subjacent bone and leading to
necrosis takes place, the sequestrum is annular, affecting the
need be, by force of arms. The German reply was still evasive and German
need for American economic independence. During that conflict, the
need of men for her navy, adopted the practice of stopping American
need, even the inevitability, of entering into conversation with
needed for the family--that is, one wife or one husband. Natasha
needed to cry, the deceased count would be the pretext. When she
needed. When you stand expecting the overstrained string to snap at
needle is then withdrawn, but the wire is left _in situ_. The results
needle with a short point and a bore larger than that of the ordinary
needles should be slowly withdrawn while the current is flowing. When
needs money for food; the man said an officer had once given him a
needs of the nation demanded unless such action was forbidden by the
needs, merely renounced their allegiance to the king and went on as
needs, while it seems to me that animal happiness is the only
negation to refer only to the victory and not to the lunch, M. de
negative answer can be given--unless the spirochaete can be identified.
neglecting _bienseance_ [good manners] but hoped that the great work
neglecting his own. The countess in turn, without omitting her
negligence. By 1914 more than one-half the states had such laws. In the
negotiated the treaty of annexation, and laid it before the Senate for
negotiation, the leadership of the steadily growing party of opposition.
negotiations and to offer the Russian army the three days' truce.
negroes from Africa, were dragged here against their will. The lure of
negroes in the South had slowly declined. By 1900 they were in a
neighbor on the other side, who lay motionless some distance from
neighbor, the beautiful Helene, whose eyes several times met those
neighboring state of North Carolina uttered the daring phrase from which
neighbouring bone, perhaps causing neuralgic pains in the joint, or
neighbouring lymph glands soon become swollen and tender. The affected
neither could she doubt the righteousness of the prayer that was being
neither the Federalists nor the Whigs had been able to accomplish in the
neither the corpse smeared with soot for fun nor these women
neither the money nor the time, like Prince Galitsyn, to engage a
neither was it noticeably neglected. In the entry there was a smell of
nephew, little Nicholas, and religion--and these were the favorite
nephew, the princess noticed all that was going on around her and felt
nephritis_; and in the breast and prostate, as in the kidney, the
nerve and of the parts supplied by it. The limb is exercised, massaged,
nerve at the elbow, and is described with injuries of that nerve.
nerve bundles for the various groups of muscles. In several cases of
nerve fibres bridging the gap.
nerve fibres. The blood vessels and lymphatics run in these
nerve fibres. The removal of the tumour is usually followed by
nerve is also divided, there is a loss of sensibility on the dorsum
nerve is divided as well, and some of the fibres of the lower lateral
nerve may be stretched, or, in the case of a purely sensory trunk, a
nerve roots within the vertebral canal.
nerve sheaths of the distal portion, and continue growing until they
nerve, and interference with the movements at the hip.
nerve, or the ends may be implanted into the median.
nerve, steps must be taken to relieve the pressure, by operation if
nerve-supply, such as follows injuries to the spine or peripheral
nerve-trunk being sacrificed, means must be taken to bridge the gap. In
nerve-trunk or upon a bursa which has developed over it. The Rontgen
nerve-trunks and with pigmentation of the skin. The clinical features
nerve. Failing relief, it is better to make a bed for the nerve by
nerve. The following description refers to a mixed sensori-motor trunk,
nerve; flexion of the terminal phalanx of the little finger is almost
nerves are compressed; this is further increased if the elbow is flexed
nerves within the vertebral canal may be considered.
nerves, disease of the brain, or acute anterior poliomyelitis. When the
nerves, which regulate the size of the lumen by inducing contraction or
nerves. The essential lesion is an overgrowth of the endoneural
nervous persons who have been subjected to pain, as in the reduction of
net and the harpoon in almost every quarter of the Atlantic. "Look,"
network is evident through the skin. Elevation of the temperature over
neuralgic character, with cramps in the limb, and these may persist long
neuralgic in character, or may simulate renal colic. When the aneurysm
neuritis, it may be necessary to resect the corresponding posterior
neuro-fibromatosis of the cutaneous nerves (Fig. 89); and by
neuroses, that the symptoms come and go without sufficient cause. When
neutralising the poison is to apply to the sting a drop of a mixture
neutrality, they early accepted the Confederates as "belligerents" and
never after sleepless nights or the hardest tasks had he shown the
never been intimate, came to him with the professions of friendship
never before been attained. The principle was applied to other
never before received was shown him. A strange lady, the one who had
never cooled even at night. Some of this dust was kneaded by the
never dare to cross the Russian frontier, as was the case in 1807!"
never felt the doubt, "Is not all I think and believe nonsense?" And
never had any notion of the outcome of any of his actions.
never is expressed in the account of the activity of some dozen people
never known what it was to have the free and open publication of books,
never live to see such happiness. The presence of Sonya, of her
never occurred to him. On the contrary, he became more and more
never rightly accounted to himself, but which formed the whole
nevertheless immediately ran away again, abandoning to its fate the
nevertheless it kept collapsing and again slowly rising to the sound
new Brother. They laid on me the duty of Rhetor. I feel myself weak
new amendment was designed to protect states against the federal
new bone by the periosteum, is sometimes met with.
new bone round the edge of the acetabulum may be greatly relieved by
new case of bone. The resemblance to sarcoma may be very close, but the
new colonies, as entering the twentieth century in the role of "a world
new condition for the attainment of that purpose.
new confederates to govern the East, and finally the Western states,
new grass, the first leaves on the birches, and the first puffs of
new house Prince Andrew had built at Bogucharovo, ever in the same
new kind of anti-slavery doctrine--the dogmatism of the abolition
new men would come to the front. So Boris was full of nervous vivacity
new movement. A number of younger suffragists sought to use the votes of
new mustache. "Now then, get on," he shouted to the driver. "Do wake
new nations, and reduced the power and territories of the vanquished.
new political democracy had been created. The age of agitation was
new position away from the Petersburg and Moscow roads. The reason for
new soil, no blood-clot intervening between the two, no movement of the
new spongy bone beneath the pericranium, and they may be grouped
new streams of paper money from the press. Almost the only good money in
new surroundings; in a certain number of cases the flap dies and is
new, envious glance at the grass, the wormwood, and the streamlet of
new-mown hay lay by the riverside. They rode across that bridge into
new. He recalled his exertions and solicitations, and the history of
newcomer, and Natasha, following the direction of that look, saw an
newcomer. As she was crossing the anteroom she saw through the
newcomers, with their servile workers, spread upward in the valley
newcomers. The migration from Northern Europe--England, Ireland,
newly formed muscle fibres. In the process of repair, one or both ends
news and about Nikolenka, twice asked when the last letter had been
news began to arrive in December, nothing was said about the war and
news of Mack's defeat, the camp life of the officers of this
news of something detrimental to the children's interests, such as the
news that even the Sugar Act had been repealed, thus practically
news that you, with the army, have decided to abandon Moscow. You
news was all over the land, and the New York bankers were sipping their
news! Is the army retreating or will there be another battle?"
news. The footman having greeted him, knowing his habits and his
newspaper; "the North elects them."
newspapers and looked upon as freakish by the masses.
next day for the funeral. But this he was unable to do, for he
next day they moved the prince to Bogucharovo, the doctor accompanying
next morning, was unable to rest and leaped up. The pack on leash
next note, the next phrase, and everything in the world was divided
next quarters, of Matreshka the vivandiere, and like matters.
next to hers. A woman came from the bedroom with a frightened face and
next twenty years over thirty thousand miles were added, most of the
next village the sentinels of Davout's infantry corps detained him
next--to drink tea in the servants' wing with Vasilich, or into the
nexus of this new force with the event.
nice indeed, quite French," and he kissed the tips of his fingers.
nickname with the same vague irony Prince Andrew had noticed in the
night I looked at the campfires and there was no end of them. A
night and prevents sleep, and the part is extremely tender on pressure.
night at its halting place--a village on the highroad. The
night he has not slept," said the orderly pleadingly in a whisper.
night of the battle, having arrived at Krems excited but not weary,
night till two in the afternoon and bore away with them the wounded
night!" said Pierre, giving his hand to the Swiss tutor, and he turned
night, by the disorderly movement of the Russian columns, and from all
night, dragoons mostly. I took down the name and rank of their
night, of pains over the frontal bone, ribs, sternum, tibiae, or ulnae.
night, so dark that the coachman could not see the carriage pole.
night. Moscow was on fire in several places. The buildings in Carriage
nightcap and Katie, sleepy and disheveled, beat and turned the heavy
nightcap. The valet's sleepy, frightened exclamation, "What do you
nights and of the Empress. Evidently he had wanted to talk. "And why
nine unfavorable reports and only once did the subject reach the point
nip his leg, but Petya leaped quickly into the saddle unconscious of
nipple. When the disease is thus acquired by innocent transfer, it is
nitrogen in the soil, nor the oxygen in the air, nor manures, nor
no apparent reason and knowing that it will cost him all the money
no attention to them. At the gate of one house three Frenchmen, who
no conception of man is possible constitutes the other side of the
no constitutional power to create a bank; the law creating the bank
no desire for the post. A propos of marriages: do you know that a
no difficulty in diagnosis. The only condition with which it is liable
no doubt about the future of American industry.
no foreign competition in cotton and tobacco, the East could not offer
no instance has any tertiary lesion been observed. The severity of the
no inversion of the cutaneous surface takes place. In extensive and deep
no less sincerely than the twenty-year-old Rostov.
no longer feared to make happy plans for the future. She spoke
no longer sentinels sounding the alarm with their abdomens raised, and
no mustache, so that his mouth, the most striking feature of his face,
no new slave states; but he did not see how Congress could exclude the
no notice of amid the smoke of the campfires the day before; but
no one but bricklayers going to work or men sweeping the street, and
no pity on me, have some for the children."
no putrid odour; and the condition being non-infective, there is not
no reaction. As the toxin accumulates the reflex arc is affected, with
no thought of the Tarutino position; but innumerable circumstances and
no twigs, leaves had sprouted such as one could hardly believe the old
no--this is something new I've never seen before. This isn't the Kosoy
nobility were to stand when the Emperor entered, when a ball should be
nobility, Sonya, with a quiver in her voice due chiefly to the
noblemen, enraged at the loss of their special privileges, fled into
nodule," and rarely gives rise to motor symptoms unless it involves the
nodules containing the organism. These nodules break down by
nodules make their appearance in the main scar or in the scars of
nodules subsequently break down in the centre, forming irregular
nodules, and lacks the rounded, elevated border. Syphilitic lesions
nodules. It is also illustrated by _elephantiasis involving the scrotum_
noise of the crows flying from Moscow across the field, and when
noiseless steps, lifted the curtain, and dropped it again behind
noisome smell of mortifying flesh that came from the wound, began
nominally independent, also presented problems to the government at
nominated for the vice presidency, against his protest, Theodore
nominating speeches, and served on committees. In the contrast between
non-combatants, provided the liners do not try to escape or offer
non-freeholders of Richmond, in petitioning for the ballot, "accord with
non-sensitive, and corresponds to the superficial area of the synovial
noncommissioned officers (of whom there are fewer) perform the
none of all that turmoil of the world at large, where he did not
none of his orders were executed and during the battle he did not know
none should have great advantage over another. The purchase of supplies
nonintervention. And..." he paused. "Finally one cannot impute the
nonobservance of the Continental System, the Duke of Oldenburg's
nonsense for he had just come from the Rostovs'. He asked everyone
nonsense out of them! Fancy giving the command of the Semenov wegiment
nonsense," he thought. "The slur on my name and honor--that's all
nor any other unusual event must be allowed to disturb the appointed
nor any that were at all serious, yet the French army ceased to exist.
nor anyone else had a right to criticize what the Empress desired or
nor hearing anything, when suddenly the well-known whispering of
nor her brother would refuse to help the peasants in need, she only
nor of the nearness of the Emperor Francis' black cob, nor of all that
nor see the borzois, nor the ground over which he went: he saw only
nor the fears of their opponents were realized. The marks of the
nor the other could be attained, yet it seemed best to the adherents
normal according to the recuperative capacity of the particular tissue.
normal movements--for example, a scar on the flexor aspect of a joint
normal shedding of the hair, or in scattered areas over the scalp
normal, the bone becoming lighter and richer in fat, although retaining
normally present in the marrow. On section these tumours present a
north bank of the Ohio River. To the south, in Kentucky and Tennessee,
north, in Canada. Still others had wandered from the South--the Gulf of
northern tier of states lying against Canada from Lake Michigan to the
northern waters. They first blazed their trails into the black forests
northward increased while the westward movement of white farmers which
nose; and he added, "Let the Emperor but say the word and we'll
not a distinction," said the diplomatist--"a gift, rather."
not admit the fresh cold water that was leaking in under their
not advanced far before there appeared upon the scene still mightier
not affect the essence of the matter but, like the hands of a clock
not affect the pulsation in the limb beyond. The risks are practically
not all the same?" she thought, and did not reply.
not angry with me! Tell me everything--the whole truth. What did he
not answer for the consequences.
not as the daughter of Prince Vasili, but visualized her whole body
not at all the decisive episode of the campaign. If so much has been
not at once raise, and he spent most of his time in the girls' room.
not bar his way), the historians forget that nothing could have
not be attended with any of the usual signs of suppuration, and beyond
not be bad as regards the unwritten code," thought Boris), "but
not be done. By 1818 slavery had become so entrenched and the
not be executed. After passing through Borodino the vice-King was
not be left behind. On inquiry, the countess learned that Madame
not be questioned. But neither the United States nor any State shall
not be, yet he awaited with a sinking heart the movement of Dolokhov's
not because they were displeased by the substance of his speech, which
not been for the moderation of Lincoln, he would have pursued a course
not been noticeable at the council of war in 1805: there was now a
not been there she would have perished at the hands of the mutineers
not believe, and said, 'The monks cheat,' and as soon as he'd said
not brought through the drag net. With extreme difficulty could the
not but perceive the living charm of her neck and shoulders, so near
not changing the expression of her eyes. "I am a woman, and you
not clearly heard and the difficult names of villages. Weyrother
not collected. The molasses and sugar trade with the foreigners went on
not confined to the central end, but that it goes on also in the
not contra-indicate this line of treatment, as the diseased organs
not contradict himself, did not get frightened or run away from the
not convey the passionately poetic feeling she had experienced that
not dead, but evidently the crisis was over and he was convalescent.
not depend on whether they took the Saltanov dam or not, as we are
not desire war and as Your Majesty sees..." said Balashev, using the
not enough money in the treasury to buy pen and ink with which to record
not every day as much as I do, the next day shall be set beyond the
not exactly hear his words but understood them from the movement of
not exasperated the vicomte, and had convinced herself that it was
not expect you today," he added. "I only sent you the note yesterday
not feel; in the present case it is similarly necessary to renounce
not find the baby. At last he saw him: the rosy boy had tossed about
not finish because their eyes meeting said the rest.
not get everything packed. The countess had fallen asleep and the
not going to the battle (she knew he enjoyed the thought of the
not govern but acted only through ministers representing the majority in
not grand is bad. Grand is the characteristic, in their conception, of
not had time to recover from him, and begged the officer to let the
not halfway up the hill stumbled upon his groom, who had been to
not hearing them, the Emperor, recognizing Bolkonski, addressed him
not hearken to his appeal. At the very moment when she would have
not help loving him. What am I to do if I love him and the other one
not infrequently happens that the development of a tumour is preceded by
not interest Natasha, she saw the terrible moral symptoms which to her
not interest him now. He sat on his elevation--the pedestal of the
not know (it was that of the Legion d'honneur), the monarch came out
not know what to do. Though he knew it was coming, he did not till the
not know who was in it, but each time she looked at the procession her
not knowing whether it would be proper to call the dying man "the
not let the army get discouraged.
not lethal, the spasms soon cease. In _hydrophobia_ a history of having
not like a real weapon) and looked now at the superior officers and
not like us sinners of the line," cried Rostov, with martial swagger
not lost sight of for a single moment during the whole service. He
not merely pleasing but powerful. Nicholas had been struck by the
not move the limb voluntarily, the condition is spoken of as _the
not necessarily the determining factor in the fate of peoples. A
not necessary for cure, as the parts that remain undergo cicatrisation.
not need any special qualities, on the contrary he needs the absence
not only because we have to seek our bread in the sweat of our
not only doubted but felt almost certain that without the help of
not only less pretty than at the ball, but only redeemed from
not only that all the men of the day were mere babies who did not know
not recognised and treated. _Iritis_ is the commonest of these, and may
not recommended, as it is followed by great suffering and the adhesions
not refrain from asking what was the matter, so strangely dismal and
not replying to the Austrian.
not rest after all upon the English constitution or a charter from the
not right, not quite in the right, you were impetuous..."
not see the true light, and that he, Pierre, ought to aid,
not see... But what is the matter with you, Mary?" he suddenly asked.
not shake his iron will or his firm determination to see the war through
not so mad as I seemed. On the contrary I was then wiser and had
not sons of the soil or the workshop. They were all men of "the grand
not stir.) "To the General Staff!" he said with a smile, knowing
not such a vital matter. All the materials for a comfortable though
not suit in the least. Not in the least! Please change it."
not surmise that anyone could have the effrontery to continue firing
not surprising that the decision excited much adverse comment in
not take a French officer into his hut to warm him, and when the
not take part in the events about to happen--despite their former
not take place, or if it does, the want of moisture renders the part an
not the Rhetor but Pierre's sponsor, Willarski, whom he recognized
not the count's fault for he could not help being what he was--that
not the devil but a German, who moves the locomotive. Only then, as
not the gentlefolk, also moved away. All were moving slowly and
not the least feeling of fear. He was fearless, not because he had
not the right one.... How not the right one?... O Lord! And there's
not the sole support of any considerable number of people.
not there is _pain_ or tenderness in the raw surface or its
not think so yourself. And the main thing is," he continued, "that I
not think that consistency required giving the vote to all adult males.
not till adult life. Superficial dermoids, such as those met with at the
not time to reply to all the questions about Moscow that were showered
not time to say it, for Natasha, with a pale and set face, entered the
not time to signify his approval of them all, and the group increased,
not to be late, and the huntsmen had not yet reached their places when
not to be outdone by her two rivals, reached out over the mountains for
not to be the first to break silence, if she had to wait till morning.
not to continue his military service, and when the war recommenced and
not to grasp what was said. He looked at the count.
not to leave their homes and that the French authorities would
not to let them out again, and having told the footman to bring them
not to see her often," thought Boris. "The affair has been begun and
not to trouble the lady, and also to pick up the glove himself and
not to unload the carts but only to let them sit on the top of the
not toward mediation but the strict maintenance of American rights, if
not trying to imitate the prince now, lifted the hat from his bald
not twenty-four hours in the day which could be spent in such a
not uncommon for patients or their friends to attribute the condition to
not uncommon to have particles of carbon embedded in the tissues after
not understand that he was saved, that he and the rest had been
not understand the significance of this war, which seemed to her
not understand why he suddenly felt all alone in the world.
not unlike the vas deferens.
not upon the soil but upon wages for their livelihood. When Jefferson
not used to it. She will retaliate. And she has been fooled in the
not wanted here? Go to the other girls, or..."
not yet had a loud conversation among the men and a dispute about
not yet killed. The regiment stood in columns of battalion, three
not yet understanding what the latter was telling her.
not, and do not, in the least care about that scoundrel of a clerk who
not, desire war, that I have waged war only against the false policy
not, fighting under the command of a genius, in two--or three-line
not, however, be treated in this manner, for the alcohol may escape into
not, it is usually sufficient to remove the clots and apply firm
not. Unwittingly the avalanche was started.
notably "drunkard's palsy," the disability appears to be due not to
notch. These appearances are commonly associated with the name of
note from Kutuzov, he felt the more irritated the more he felt himself
note he had received from Spain, he declared that he was brought to the
note none too conciliatory, asked the British government whether it was
note to the Secretary of State: "Liners will not be sunk by our
notes on the justice of the Teutonic cause. From a press bureau in New
notes were the recall of the obnoxious General Weyler, the appointment
notes" to the European belligerents. On December 16, the German Emperor
notes. The next year they stopped all bank paper sent forth under the
nothing about himself, adopted no prose, always appeared to be the
nothing and all those idiotic societies!" Natasha declared of the very
nothing and forgotten nothing. Charles X, who came to the throne in
nothing before him but the motionless earth and the stubble around
nothing beyond the pleasure of the moment, nothing troubles him and so
nothing but a trick! He has retreated and ordered the rearguard to
nothing but cause the Emperor annoyance.
nothing but the coming war was talked of. For the Rostov family the
nothing but withdraw the treaty from the Senate and close the incident.
nothing can be seen, as the military scientists might convince
nothing for it but to fly as fast as possible along the nearest,
nothing for the prisoners. The French perished from the conditions
nothing left to do as a Russian. Nothing remained for the
nothing less than the "confiscation" of the railways in the interest of
nothing more to do. But his thoughts--the simplest, clearest, and
nothing of the sort. For the victories of Bennington, Trenton, Saratoga,
nothing to keep him any longer in Moscow, away from the countess
nothing when they have no powers; this one had none.... The
nothing, but here on the one hand the local nobility have done me
notice the fact. Most of the guests, knowing of the affair with the
notice. The women and girls flirted with him and, from the first
noticeable since the time when he thought his son had been killed,
noticed and felt the tension of the amorous air in the house, and also
noticed in the anteroom, by her father's nervousness, and by the
noticed that he had gone because the ball became livelier after his
noticed that he was spoken of now as the "Seeker," now as the
noticed that the bones have suffered most, while in lupus the
noticed, and repeated in a whisper, the one coarse word she had
noticing that the sole of the dancer's boot was hanging loose. "What a
notion--science, that is, the supposed knowledge of absolute truth.
notions about the sacredness of royal authority and his duty to check
notoriously known to be property of the crown of Great Britain," the
notwithstanding strong opposition in the Senate was able, in 1907, to
notwithstanding the resistance of the Dutch, the Established Church was
nourish the grafts placed on it.
nourish the tissues.
nourish, the organisms evolve, probably by means of a ferment, certain
nourished as it was amid favorable circumstances in the New World, made
nourished by numerous blood vessels from the periosteum, which penetrate
nourished in the West was heard when Clay of Kentucky advocated his
nourishing food, and by the administration of cod-liver oil, iron, and
novelty of their position as soldiers, Pierre once more thought of the
novo-arseno-billon, and neo-diarsenol belong to the "914" group, the
novocaine into their substance on the proximal side of the field of
now I do believe in it. Let the dead bury their dead, but while one
now again an officer in the Semenov regiment. The faces of these young
now and then detached ideas and impressions from the world of
now at Denisov, now at the esaul, and now at the French in the village
now back at the men without losing step, his whole powerful body
now been admitted to the true Catholic Church and that in a few days
now came into the open. Perhaps a majority of the men highest in the
now counted the cords on his coat and took a card with that number and
now decided him to despatch part of the army abroad and to create a
now entered the room, and the reading of the letter began. After a
now expelled all the French residents from Moscow, and now allowed
now got dear. The clerk who had rescued Petya was talking to a
now had to tell contained the chief charm and the whole meaning of his
now have been carried out, for Napoleon had passed the Arbat more than
now heard the nurse calling her and went to the nursery. Countess Mary
now on one side, now on the other, giving his face an unpleasant
now on the staff."
now out of danger, though still so weak that it was out of the
now permissible; "the door to the left, ma'am."
now relating the latest town news, and now the latest political
now replaced, not by another question or by a reply to the former
now rose and took their leave. The visitor's daughter was already
now saw something else that absorbed all her attention. She saw the
now seemed quite natural, but on the other hand all her previous
now there's Dolokhov sitting in the snow with a forced smile and
now understood the whole meaning and importance of this war and of the
now we are unsheathing our sword to overturn them." The same year he
now we know where we are. And what do you think of the Boulogne
now went out into the passage to hear better.
now when he first entered and glanced at her there was not the least
now, from the hints contained in his letter and given by the little
now, now it seemed to her she was penetrating the mystery.... But at
now, the latter could not withstand them, but if a charge was to be
now. When similar doubts had assailed him before, they had been the
nucleated cells derived mainly from the proliferation of the fixed
nuclei of the muscle fibres in close proximity to this young cicatricial
nuisance and a hindrance to everyone. Almost all day long the house
nuisance it is!" thought the officer, and he rode round the whole
nullification and waging a national war themselves, the Republicans lost
nullification in 1832. It appeared again after the Mexican war when the
numb in the sharp frost so that I threw down the reins--'Catch hold
number of cases beginning in the bones is about five times greater than
number of cases have been recorded in which cancer of the skin of the
number of cases of general paralysis of the insane. The spirochaete may
number of foreigners, but not the army staff. Besides these, there
number of his own party. In 1893 a grave industrial crisis fell upon the
number of his years. Thus the vessels of a comparatively young man who
number of states necessary to establish the new Constitution. Attempts
number of the beast, 666; that his part in the great affair of setting
number of the leucocytes succumb, and, becoming degenerated, set free
number of votes as Jefferson; as neither had a majority the election was
number the king could increase by the appointment of his favorites, as
numbers of most bacteria. Any lowering of the vitality of the
numbers three and seven are the basis of everything. He advised me not
numbers. The great centers of commerce and finance on the seaboard
numerous batteries ranged on the slopes of the Pratzen Heights,
numerous minor islands scattered about in the neighborhood. "It would be
numerous oozing blood vessels. On removing the packing on the fifth or
numerous they are, while the less their direct participation in the
numerous, they had early begun to exercise an influence on the course of
numerous; but the Republicans were not daunted. "We know," said Lincoln,
nurse to have the aching spot rubbed or kissed, and it feels better
nurse's daughter--at her own breast, the husband standing by and
nurse. Complete recovery is the rule, but when the muscles are weak and
nursed by her, even although she may never have shown symptoms of the
nursed no hatred against anyone, and only desired that the plan,
nurses, are specially liable to be overlooked, if the possibility of
nut, and the fibro-fatty tissue of which they are composed may be
nutrition of the paralysed muscles is further improved by electricity.
nutrition of the skin is depressed by any interference with its
o'clock, but it was already five minutes to ten, and the girls were
o'clock. He dismounted and went up into the porch of a large country
o'clock. The sun, a red ball through the dust, burned and scorched his
oatfield in the gap between Semenovsk and the Knoll Battery, where
oath of loyalty to the union. He then announced that when, in any of the
oats combined; the copper of Montana sold for more than all the cereals
obediently and was about to go but at that instant there came into the
obey the law. It was not until a third election was held that compliance
obeying the doctor's orders?
object it is necessary that... The first column marches... The
object of our observation lies, the more doubtful does the free will
object of the surgeon is to promote the natural reparative process by
object of which is to drain the lymph by embedding a number of silk
object that lay on the salver. It was the Order of St. George of the
object the maintenance of the balance of power of Europe, and it would
object to hate. Pierre became the latter. Many other orators spoke
object, do we favour the occurrence of ideal repair.
objected to the Swedish general's views more warmly than anyone
objects are to maintain the general health at the highest possible
objects of scientific medicine. The two great branches of the healing
obligation. She could not write, because she could not conceive the
obligations incurred by the several states in support of the Revolution.
obligations to the victors. Damages done to shipping by submarines and
obligations to those who served on the field of battle or on the seas.
obligatory and irreproachable idleness is the lot of a whole class-
oblige him to retreat, retaining in our hands an important part of the
obliged the historians, after they had apparently rejected the
obliged them with the loan of a petticoat to be used as a curtain, and
obliged to fall back on power--the force he had denied--and to
obliged, as formerly, to hurry off their shipments during the winter by
oblique impact of a bullet. The bruising of the vessel wall, especially
oblique movements deduced by him from the history of Frederick the
obliterate the blood vessels in it, the scar that is left becomes
obliterate the cavity of the joint. The resulting stiffness, therefore,
obliterated the skin and cellular tissues become hypertrophied, and the
obliterated, the distinction into tables and diploe is lost, and, while
obliterated. This does not prove that the operation is useless, as the
obliterating the bony prominences by filling up the natural hollows. It
obliteration of the medullary canal. Hyperostosis and sclerosis are
obliteration of the naevoid tissue by cicatricial contraction without
observance of the proprieties--a deputation.
observation, the disfigurement, which was the only subject of complaint,
observe only the muscular nervous activity, but in man we observe
observe the hands of the watch, and the valves and wheels of the
observe--(1) Its _base_ or _floor_, noting the presence or absence of
observed an affection of the eyes, known as _chronic interstitial
observed chiefly in the bones of the leg. Where there are two parallel
observed in Speranski, and by the diversity of lines of argument he
observed in children, especially in the knee, the lesion being in the
observed in leprosy, and from the resulting loss of portions of the
observed in ossification from the periosteum.
observed this form of tuberculous disease in the gastrocnemius and in
observed--especially in the knee. Without apparent cause, the joint
observed. Some see it as a force directly inherent in heroes, as the
observed: "Undoubtedly the government can wisely do much more ... to
observers of the course of events had long foreseen that a flood of
observers, was increased with the advent of the steam engine and the
observing the results of the tuberculin test or the effects of
observing those around him, began crossing himself with the hand
obstacle in the way of other nations which desire to improve the
obstructed and the limb becomes congested. In the lower extremity the
obstructed gradually, and the establishment of a collateral circulation
obstruction is usually in the upper part of the posterior tibial artery,
obstruction to the lymph stream, and in such cases the lymph, including
obtain a post on the commander in chief's staff. Berg and Boris,
obtain this he started for the country next day.
obtainable at operations--from the omentum, for example, otherwise the
obtained a complete and permanent control over the legislation of
obtained a compromise. The British government, moved by a hint from the
obtained a place by the cannon from where he hoped to see the
obtained by resecting the portion of bone which is the seat of the
obtained; from which it followed that the limit fixed for Napoleon's
obtains the chance to show the stuff that is in him when compared with
obvious feature; the other, in which bunches of distended and tortuous
obviously favoring the well-to-do, sowed seeds of bitterness which
obviously trying to restrain within the bounds of decorum the
occasion by the refusal of the Senate to ratify the treaty. Evidently it
occasion even Monroe, former opponent of the Constitution, forgot to
occasion for it to be alleged that he had been the first to leave
occasional and evanescent, and is usually the result of some extra
occasional islands of cartilage in the wall of such cysts is responsible
occasionally met with, the joints becoming the seat of a painless
occasionally met with. The secondary changes in joints which are the
occasionally rings a little bell to inform the catcher of his
occasionally, when the interchange of blood between an aneurysm and the
occasions, and of his orders during the battle not being as good as
occiput to the heels; the muscles acting on the trunk should be braced
occludes the lumen temporarily or even permanently, and in rare cases
occluding blood-clot or the young fibrous tissue may become
occupation of Moscow by the enemy and its destruction by fire, the
occupations in the country, his journey to Ryazan; he remembered the
occupations of late had been the preparation of some papers he meant
occupations, or about absent friends; or the condition may assume the
occupied by American troops pending the formal treaty of peace. On
occupied by the Emperors and their retinues.
occupied her all day. She spent the night of the fourteenth as
occupied. Even the mountain valleys ... were claimed by sturdy pioneers.
occupies the place?" asked Prince Andrew.
occupy as much space as possible, but others striving to do the same
occupy the Floridas within sixty days. Without waiting for an answer to
occupy the position and prepare for an attack."
occur during secondary syphilis simultaneously with the skin eruptions,
occur in any of the main arterial trunks. As the sac of the aneurysm
occur in old persons, the term senile being here restricted to that
occur in one or in both eyes, one after the other, from three to eight
occur in those who are gouty or are the subjects of oxaluric dyspepsia.
occur in wounds by needles, awls, forks, or thorns. The implanted
occur into the skin, presenting the appearance of bruises, into the
occur most frequently as the patient is dropping off to sleep; the
occur much more frequently in the Foot Guards. Then just think what
occur on the face and in the vicinity of joints, and may be mistaken for
occur, and the fact that the part is dead may be overlooked.
occur--in the knee with flexion, in the hip with flexion and adduction.
occurred and the oxygenation of the blood is defective. In the
occurred on the _distal_ side of the ligature. While it may happen that
occurred to him of the cabalistic significance of his name in
occurred, as long as the injured person was not guilty of willful
occurred, the historians provided cunningly devised evidence of the
occurrence depends on the capacity of staphylococci to lie latent in the
occurrence is known as _embolism_. The commonest forms of embolus are
occurrence of endocarditis, as indicated by alterations in the heart
occurrence of red lines along the course of the lymphatics of the limb.
occurrence of suppuration the disease becomes more active, and abscesses
occurrence of the disease is favoured, and its features are aggravated,
occurrence on the same side as the injury, of facial spasm, rapidly
occurrence, and play a considerable part in the production of what is
occurrence. The papers recorded about four hundred in two years,
occurring in young women--are among the most malignant of tumours. The
occurs also during the administration of a general anaesthetic,
occurs as readily against the lymph stream as with it. He compares the
occurs during the period of reaction--that is, within the first twelve
occurs in association with the different forms of peripheral neuritis,
occurs in typhoid fever, especially in the later stages of the disease,
odium of the Alien and Sedition laws, in addition to responsibility for
odontoma, growing in the nasal cavity or in the maxillary sinus, have
odour of many ulcers renders the patient a source of annoyance and
odour. (3) The _edges_, noting particularly whether or not the marginal
odour. The chronic and intractable character of the ulcer is due to
oedema of the arm, with pain, numbness, and muscular weakness, may result
oedema of the face, the eyes becoming closed up, and the features
oedema of the glottis in burns about the neck and mouth has already been
oedema of the glottis, which may prove fatal.
oedema of the overlying cellular tissue and skin.
oedema subsiding in about twenty-four hours and the constitutional
oedema--the so-called _angio-neurotic oedema_. The vascularity varies with
oedematous, and a blister may form. This bursts and exposes the papillae
oedematous, and the seat of burning pain. To the touch it is firm, hot,
of 1814. War clouds still hung on the European horizon and the conflict
of 1865 the amendment was ratified. The house was not divided against
of 1908 by condemning all devices designed to deprive any one of the
of 1912, the dissenters within the Republican party added the prefix
of 1914 made many concessions to organized labor. It declared that "the
of American arms was none the less appreciated in Washington where,
of American citizens on the high seas, which are not justified by the
of American democracy. President Roosevelt doubtless summed up the
of American ships, and the impressment of sailors--were not touched,
of American ships. It was only on the urgent insistence of President
of American trade, the searching of American ships, or the support of
of Americans got a taste, a strong taste, of actual fighting in the
of Americans in his Majesty's army exceeded the number of troops
of Boston, kindling a fire on Beacon Hill, summoned the countryside to
of Catherine's day, ordered the standards that had been captured to be
of Chateaubriand, Talleyrand, Madame de Stael, and the others,
of Cossacks. Evidently the affair was over and, though not big, had
of Count Bezukhov's death. She said the count had died as she would
of Denisov's affairs, Rostov rode to Tilsit with the letter to the
of Europe were warned not to interfere with the independence or the
of Foulis, or an elastic bandage, or the screw tourniquet of Petit.
of French arms, the sham empire in Mexico collapsed like a house of
of General Washington, in council with the unpretentious Franklin, or at
of Indiana. It provided that no citizen should be deprived of the vote
of Jefferson and Madison, having the necessary majority, granted the
of June, 1812, the forces of Western Europe crossed the Russian
of Kansas--into the forlorn desert where the wicked would cease from
of Kiev ware. "These--yes, these must go among the carpets," she said,
of Maine, a vigorous and popular leader but a man under fire from the
of Massachusetts, disturbed by the growth of discontent all about him,
of May 1, 1915, Americans were astounded to see in the newspapers an
of Michigan, a territory ten times the size of Connecticut, announced
of Moscow and the position of our army, round which he had ridden.
of Moscow the same things began to be said. These reasons were the
of Moscow, and thousands of carts conveyed the inhabitants and their
of Napoleon into the depths of the country was not the result of any
of New England, the iron masters of Connecticut, New Jersey, and
of New York and the election of 1844 by giving a qualified approval of
of Ostrovna. Still laughing and talking, the officers began
of Philadelphia; the Amorys, Hancocks, and Faneuils of Boston; and the
of Quebec southward to the Ohio River, and established, in this western
of Replacement or Refund" described in paragraph 1.F.3, the Project
of Replacement or Refund" described in paragraph 1.F.3, the Project
of Representatives it was readily agreed that the members should be
of Representatives, captured the Senate as well. The popular verdict,
of Representatives, it was agreed, was to be elected directly by the
of Representatives, open all the certificates, and the votes shall then
of Representatives. Clay, who stood at the bottom of the poll, threw his
of Representatives; but the Senate may propose or concur with amendments
of Russia and destroy their army--it is quite clear that the battle of
of Saragossa and considering the possibility of defending Moscow in
of Scarpa's triangle, but the movements are not restricted in directions
of Sergey Kuzmich and at the same time his eyes glanced toward his
of State opened by the Emperor, and he spoke of it enthusiastically.
of Suvorov giving his saber to Bagration in Italy, and the
of Tennessee--still outside the pale, into five military districts, each
of Thomas Hooker from Newtown blazed the way into the Connecticut River
of Vasili the Beatified and under the Borovitski gate, back up the
of Virginia by inviting the colonies to elect delegates to a Congress to
of West Point, who had rendered distinguished service on the field of
of Western bacon, pork, mules, and grain. The Mississippi River and its
of Western states over the seaboard, completed the legal steps necessary
of _buried sutures_ of catgut or other absorbable material. For the
of _phlebitis_ and of the peripheral nerves--_neuritis_. Also in the
of a _newly divided nerve_, _e.g._ the common peroneal behind the head
of a battle not gained by the attacking side in eight hours, after all
of a brilliant victory, of the occupation of the town of Wischau and
of a broken heart. The lesson of his discomfiture seemed to be that
of a carious tooth, and spreads to the lower jaw. A swelling is slowly
of a church who, availing themselves of the absence of the chief
of a count. As George III was temporarily insane, the measure received
of a diamond-shaped ulcer raised above the surroundings. (6) In relation
of a dispute was unanimous, the members of the League affected by it
of a field. Instead of the moving horses and hussars' backs, he saw
of a general debate. At no time could anything like the required
of a governor-general less bloodthirsty in his methods, a change in the
of a kind no longer in general use. Prince Andrew remembered the story
of a locomotive to clear the snow from the rails in front: they
of a loose body between the articular surfaces. Their presence may be
of a malignant tumour. The most useful factor in diagnosis is the entire
of a man who was nothing to him.... "I should perhaps have done the
of a mixed nerve vary according to the destination of the nerve bundles
of a modern method for avoiding the arbitrament of war.
of a nerve-trunk necessarily vary with the functions of the affected
of a new case, when the epiphyses are separated and displaced, and the
of a new growth arising in the marrow, they differ in their arrangement
of a new urban democracy that was to make common cause with the farmers
of a pea being inserted under the infant's binder. In older children the
of a phalanx or metacarpal bone may resemble the dactylitis resulting
of a portion of cancerous tumour into the tissues, has never been known
of a present for the pilgrims, Princess Mary prepared a pilgrim's
of a reddish-brown colour. It affects chiefly the buttocks and thighs,
of a reply to which all the rest will be incomprehensible--is: what is
of a rheumatic type referred to the bones. There is a moderate degree of
of a shrinkage in the volume of money, this enormous mass of borrowers,
of a small corner of the world called Europe.
of a subject, she did not stop talking, but chattered about the
of a truce and a capitulation, he detected a ruse and wrote the
of a tumour, or that it may alter the characters of a tumour which
of a week or ten days the tube of radium is removed by pulling on the
of a week or ten days there is a gradual return to the normal. Such
of abduction and rotation. In the treatment of this affection the arm
of abduction of the thumb. The flexor carpi ulnaris may also be
of abolition. Moreover, remembering the old fight on the United States
of absorption of the framework of the bone; the marrow spaces and
of action by way of the blood-stream, or through an infection of the
of advancing civilization. Within twenty years, the territory, boasting
of affairs. The price of weapons, of gold, of carts and horses, kept
of age, physically capable of reading, who cannot read the English
of agriculture was the fisheries. This industry, started by hardy
of alkaloids, act immediately on their entrance into the circulation,
of all on the twenty-fourth of August at Shevardino and on the
of all the comforts of cleanliness and all the refinements of life,
of all the commanders. And then that happy moment, that Toulon for
of all the figures on it: the sun, the moon, a hammer, a plumb line, a
of all the immigrants into Pennsylvania between the opening of the
of all the known participants, but with a more remote event we already
of all the possible directions because in it there were fewest
of all the slaves in the Southern states. To the debt must be added
of all the soldiers turned toward the women, and while the vehicle was
of all was one common expression of joy at the commencement of the
of amendments for immediate submission to the states.
of amusing scenes they had witnessed during the campaign, and
of an aggregation of dilated capillaries in the substance of the skin.
of an incubation period of from three to five weeks, when the sore is
of an irritant, usually bacterial or toxic, brought to the glands by the
of anger and walking up to the regiment wished to find a further
of antibodies to neutralise the infection. The anti-diphtheritic and the
of anxiety. In that state the popular vote for the delegates to the
of any organisms that may be circulating in the blood, and partly
of armaments; adjustment of colonial claims in the interest of the
of attacking that what had been discussed at the council--the coming
of awards, his correspondence with Petersburg, and so on. But the
of bacteria, in describing the process by which the protective influence
of bacteria, putrefactive or otherwise; and the term _antiseptic_ is
of bank notes, the money capital available for agriculture and industry
of bathing and of the liquid, vibrating globe, and he sank into
of battle, and by the sight of the gallant Apsherons, his comrades
of bayonets and cloudlets of smoke in the morning sun, there now
of being in the way when she was with them. Natasha grew pale, in a
of bells and the joyous voices of the crowd that filled the whole
of bishops and archbishops to bind them to the seat of power in London.
of blood _per se_ is less when the artery concerned is amenable to
of blood cysts. Sometimes the arterial vessels are so dilated as to
of blood in the tumour, and on the presence of the products of
of blood or serum--as in amputation stumps or after excision of the
of bluish cloth, which contrasted with the others. "What have you been
of bone when the necrotic process has implicated the jaws. The mouth
of bone, as may occur in comminuted fractures of the humerus. The
of bone, in the knee-joint, for example, the patella or one of the
of bone; this is easily done as the bone is spongy, and at an early
of bones, the disease more often erupts in relation to the reflection of
of branchial clefts, or in the abdomen from unobliterated foetal ducts
of bringing Cuba into the union to offset the free states. An
of broken estates who had come to America to improve their fortunes. The
of bursitis and becomes distended with fluid, it may mask the underlying
of calamity in the days of Washington and Hamilton declared the nation
of cartilage are left behind. In multiple chondromas of the hand, when
of carts carrying men who had been wounded in the engagement the day
of child labor, the exclusion of Oriental labor, old-age pensions, and
of circumstances driven into the uplands where the soil was thin and the
of circumstances. But at the same time just this aim demands the
of cleverness and knowledge. Prince Andrew watched the commander
of commanding both sides of the Danube, so that should the enemy not
of common sensation in the bones, as a result of which there is an
of communications, recross the river lower down, and frustrate his
of compromise with the South, so often proposed by men on both sides
of concessions and attacks the political fever quickly died away, and
of conjugal fidelity to a man who on his part, by entering the married
of conscience..." Pierre paced the room several times in silence.
of contempt so forceful as the popular saying: "not worth a
of contributions to meet its bills. It could also order the
of corn, scrutinized the strips of ryefield which here and there
of correspondence between the internal and the surface temperature of
of cotton and tobacco. The social affairs of the planter's family
of countless voices, the discussion of these vital matters went on in
of crutches is helpful in taking the strain off the affected limb. When
of dark-brown or black tissue covering its base; the edges are
of defending their institutions. Particularly was this true of the last
of defending, protecting, and securing the British colonies and
of deglutition are specially involved--the so-called tetanus
of delegates "fresh from the people," as Jackson was wont to say. In
of delegates to conventions chosen for the purpose of drafting new
of democracy, while playing havoc with the old order in state
of diplomatic considerations concerning the terms of the anticipated
of disease and starvation. Stories of the atrocities, bad enough in
of disease in the bone.
of dishonesty and various irregularities. Nicholas went out into the
of dollars' worth of the continental and state bonds had passed out of
of doubtful value; bankruptcies were frequent. The connection between
of drain should be inserted. In the fingers the incisions should be made
of dread was in the air. It was evident that the affair so lightly
of dry gangrene. It is liable, however, especially in the lower
of dull, aching, nocturnal pains, especially in the neck and back.
of duty. In the manufacturing districts of the North, the panic was
of each week are appointed as the chief market days and to that end
of eight hundred thousand men--the best in the world and led by the
of emptiness and decay mingling with the smell of honey. There are
of enterprise which always accompany the opening of a campaign.
of equal length. In the forearm or leg, where there are two parallel
of established reputation in the historical field, gave to the public an
of estimating the efficacy of treatment. The object aimed at is to
of everyday life astonished the doctor. He felt Prince Andrew's pulse,
of exasperation. "Don't you hear it's His Majesty the Emperor's
of fear, and the thought that he might be killed or badly wounded
of fear. On the contrary he gazed joyfully, his eyes moist with tears,
of federal funds for internal improvements, so vital to the exchange of
of fibroma occur in the skin. A soft pedunculated fibroma, about the
of fibrous tissue, or may bind the bones so closely together as to
of finely powdered boracic acid, and the leg, from foot to knee,
of fire and had descended into the dip, he was met by some of the
of firing. Drawing himself up, he viewed the field of battle opening
of fluid or of granulations in the joint, the involuntary contraction of
of food and clothing to the destitute and the renting of abandoned and
of foreign policy, the attention of Russian society was at that time
of forgiveness of injuries and love of our neighbors, the law in honor
of fraternal advice expressed the opinion that his severity to his
of free will to inevitability, that is, of consciousness to the laws
of freedom and a certain measure of inevitability. And always the more
of freedom and inevitability in themselves, and then ranging the
of freedom to the islands.
of freight could be easily handled. Moreover, the rate charged for
of from eighteen to twenty feet from the muzzle, the scattering is
of frontal or supraorbital pain. The eye waters and is hypersensitive,
of getting in someone's way again, galloped after the adjutant.
of government came in the war of independence.
of government. The thirteen states were united in common bonds under the
of grain. The miners who go a thousand feet into the earth or climb two
of granulation tissue or of connective tissue may form. The edges become
of great strength to the Federalists and Jefferson, though committed to
of greatest pain. The bowels should be well opened by castor oil or by
of hate against the French, Thomas Paine replied to Burke in another of
of he would bring round to the superstitiousness of old maids, or
of headache and pains in the limbs, the temperature rises to 104 o or
of healthy granulations and before the inevitable contraction of scar
of healthy tissue beyond the apparent margin of the growth must be
of hemiplegia from interference with the blood supply of the brain.
of her and fear at the absence of a moral barrier between them.
of her colonial trade which Spain consistently sought to maintain, the
of her friendships or enmities.... Why forego the advantages of so
of her husband and son, sat playing patience with the old
of her own on the subject.
of her vision. Now that she knew that the renewal of Natasha's
of high rank and importance, who was the first to arrive at her
of him, Prince Andrew rode round the whole fortified camp and, by
of his accustomed groove he seemed to have lost the sense of his own
of his adroit maneuvers and the agility with which he capered about on
of his arbitrary course, however, his hand was stayed. The news came
of his attack on the bank. That institution, once denounced by every
of his being with their party. The countess had seldom been so angry
of his career, the latter just beginning his, argued cogently in favor
of his children's relations with their mother. The harmony between him
of his coat and trousers, the prince undressed, sat down heavily on
of his collar that had been wrenched loose with a bit of the cloth.
of his diplomatic career in comparison with Pierre's happiness. The
of his father's. The field marshal made an appointment to see him,
of his in the diplomatic service.
of his legs in their well-fitting Hessian boots, Nicholas told the
of his marshals. He gazed silently at the hills which seemed to rise
of his neighbor. As to the first pair of gloves, a man's, he said that
of his opponents, the frankness of his falsehoods, and the dazzling
of his plan. He proposed that the federal government should call in all
of his pretty little mouth just as the little princess used to do.
of his quiet face made Princess Mary stop short on the threshold.
of his regiment could not be found without selling one of the estates.
of his ultimate recovery. When the disease does prove fatal, it is from
of his visit, "is it true that the Dowager Empress wants Baron Funke
of his wife. Besides this the general opinion of all who had known him
of history. In each case history was rewritten and the past rediscovered
of honey and venom, and the warm whiffs of crowded life, comes an odor
of honor, trust, or profit under the United States: but the party
of how one day soon after his marriage he came out of the bedroom into
of how to get away quickly to her own room to make out the problem
of humanity and of the peoples, the first question--in the absence
of hyperaemia, exposure to the X-rays, and the employment of blisters,
of immense savings by the union of many plants under one management. In
of imperfect venous return in the causation of such ulcers is evidenced
of imperfectly calcified bone which can be cut with a knife. The young
of importance, to use the popular phrase,--"Does the Constitution follow
of imposing taxes within the colonies; at the same time it authorized
of inability to carry out the particular movement by which the sprain
of independence and certain cash payments. The rights and property of
of induration. (4) On the external aspect of the prepuce or on the skin
of infection in the shape of bacilli and of characteristic giant and
of infection, as it is almost certain to end in failure. The ends should
of inflammation--hence the terms "cold" and "chronic" applied to the
of inhabitants in those states, whatever part of the world may have been
of initiating laws; but the final word both in law-making and
of interest on a part of the bonds and the deferring of interest on
of internal improvements. The Western tiller of the soil was as eager
of iodine 1 oz. to the quart), or by the application of lint saturated
of isolated bands, sometimes in the form of a close fibrous union
of it. He gave orders to investigate the matter. Gabriel Ivanovich
of it. If the whole activity of the leaders serves as the expression
of it. Telyanin took the purse and began carelessly slipping it into
of it. The only question is, has it been destroyed or not? If not,
of its forms; waxy disease of the liver, kidneys, or intestine; less
of its tail disappeared into the skirt of the wood. At the same
of its villi and fringes. When the fatty fringes are developed to an
of joints, characterised by the prominence of subjective symptoms and
of joyous hopes for the future. She had merely become more
of labor's contribution to winning the war was embodied in the treaty of
of laminated clot. The development of the collateral circulation which
of land as the test for political rights until 1850 and the latter until
of languages, the respect shown him by the French, his simplicity, his
of large pearls, entered the adjoining box rustling her heavy silk
of laws requiring militia service, and free land in the West.
of leucocytes in the blood throughout the circulatory system. This
of life as before; but at the end of the fourth month of their
of life continually occurred in the captain's stories) and the Pole
of life to the laws of reason.
of life without which the count and countess could not conceive of
of liquefaction and suppuration support the diagnosis of tubercle. If
of little avail. From among the numerous means suggested, the following
of little faith thought the country could never pay--was reckoned at a
of love such as filled her heart. While she sat in the carriage beside
of lymph and the emigration of leucocytes. The lymph contains the
of lymph, which transudes into the meshes of the connective tissue
of malignant disease the number of leucocytes is increased to 15,000 or
of man's free will and partly of the law of inevitability.
of man, or the very cruel wars and executions resulting from the
of manhood suffrage in New York, cited the riots of the British working
of many people, some one of the opinions or wishes expressed is sure
of many years. On examining the joint, it is usually found to contain
of married life: a white dressing gown, his wife at the tea table, his
of me. I could not resist the sight of the grandeur and glory with
of men acting in time and in relation to one another, to explain the
of men and women who would otherwise have been indifferent to the
of men from the army and abolishing many offices.
of men had come from the east to the west, slaying their fellows.
of men, and the right of married women to their own earnings. Labor
of men. And the light shineth in darkness; and the darkness
of mere existence. After the first clearings were opened in the forests
of migration, one westward from the sea and the other southward from the
of millionaires the downfall of our republic.
of movement. The extension of the ossification into the synovial
of mucous patches or of catarrh, and as a result the child's cry is
of multiple, soft, projecting tumours, scattered all over the body,
of muscular sprain are the "labourer's" or "golfer's back," affecting
of mutual interest. The function of the shop committee was to consider
of my brothers, this war has deprived me of one of the associations
of nerves_, are described elsewhere. Fibroid tumours of the uterus are
of new bone moves with the affected muscle, it causes little
of oblivion over the Hartford convention, delivered a reply to Hayne
of office became alarmed at the clamor of new men for their positions.
of old people may, if irritated, become the seat of epithelioma. A warty
of old standing at the shoulder. It is most liable to occur when the
of old. Though the members of the House of Commons were elected by
of omission. The time-honored stories of exploration and the
of one of the "914" preparations in _early primary cases_ an initial
of one of the larger long bones takes about six weeks to unite, and
of one of the men like a child.
of one of the neighbouring bones. It occurs with greater frequency after
of operations; for example, in the removal of tumours or diseased glands
of opinion as to the method of regeneration. The Wallerian doctrine is
of organisms in the atmosphere. In teaching clinics, therefore, the risk
of our commerce, and our credit in the Indies, at the price of Canada,
of oxygenated blood reaches the heart to enable it to maintain an
of pain, tenderness, and redness, simulate tuberculosis, but the absence
of pain, to free them from their adhesions, and to resect enough of the
of pallor. For the first thirty-six to forty-eight hours there is
of parties was going on among the staff of the army. A was undermining
of pathological fracture--as, for example, in the shaft of the femur or
of patient, whose home surroundings tend to favour the progress of the
of peace, of moral support, and the same sense being at home here in
of people all having about the same amount of this world's goods and
of people who took part in the common action. It only seemed to
of perfume, and admiring his partner, himself, and the fine outlines
of periosteum and capsular ligament, is resected to allow of the
of pity and disgust pressed the wet, painfully sobbing child to
of plants, notices that the bee helps in this work, and may say that
of police, after reporting that he had executed the instructions he
of politeness modestly placed himself at the disposal of the circle in
of politics. In the direction of affairs, the Republicans took the
of potters; we need them; the clay is ready and the dishes wanted.... We
of power--and say plainly that that was the result of Napoleon's will.
of practical politics. Coming upon the political scene in the early
of prosperity at the end of that decade, construction was renewed with
of public lands were dedicated to the construction of storage dams and
of putting the whole column on the alert, so he sent Tikhon
of pyogenic and tuberculous arthritis. Wasting of the muscles,
of pyogenic bacteria, which not only produce their toxins at the primary
of railways and industry by land grants, and the development of internal
of railways, land, mines, mills, and other means of production. The
of re-starting the original disease. The giving way of adhesions may be
of reality, he heard the boom, boom, boom of firing, the thud of
of reconstruction called forth by the war, they resorted to the national
of reconstruction, felt the necessity for a more businesslike management
of reform. The charges were usually exaggerated; often wholly false; but
of regeneration, and in them the reparative process may result in almost
of resection with twisting or tearing of the nerve from its central
of responding to painful cutaneous stimuli and to the extremes of heat
of retracing the steps taken the year before. Grenville refused.
of retrospection, which regards all the past as a preparation for
of revenue in the Treasury in 1883, they anticipated popular clamor by
of riding by the road to the place to which he had been sent, he had
of safeguarding their free exercise and enjoyment." The die was cast;
of saints; now seized all the private carts in Moscow and on one
of scene and the advice of Moscow doctors would be good for her.
of scribes and journalists to pour out criticism on the Americans and
of secondary foci of suppuration in different parts of the body. Toxins
of sending reinforcements. He swore on his honor that the Russians
of senile gangrene, the level at which the limb is removed depending
of septic phlebitis in the marrow.
of several thousand men could produce. The lights spread farther and
of severe inflammation with high temperature. The significance of
of shots retreated. In the highest army circles from midday on the
of sick and wounded had been abandoned on the other side of the Danube
of skiagrams to differentiate the condition from syphilitic and from
of skin are scorched or stained, the discoloured area showing an
of skin on the dorsum of the fingers, hand and forearm, the bridge of
of slavery," he said, "are considerations belonging to the states. What
of slow progress and follows the course of the lymphatics. From the
of small shot or pellets leave the muzzle of the gun as a solid mass
of small size--as, for example, on the sole of the foot--the femoral
of soldiers and many pieces of cannon. This was the crowning insult to
of some days, if anaphylaxis has been established by the first dose, the
of some proclamation of the Tsar's and of an oath to the Tsar Paul
of speech and of the press--and only for that reason did he obtain
of speech, uttering the word amant as casually as any other word, "and
of spongy bone, the spaces of which are filled with red marrow. The
of spores ingested into the alimentary canal in meat or milk derived
of stamped papers. In fact, the Sons of Liberty carried their operations
of starvation lay dead by the hundreds, the relief which charity
of state politics, who did not catch the grand national style of their
of states by a son of old Virginia, John Marshall, Chief Justice of the
of statesmen, there was swiftly rising such a tide in the affairs of
of steam in the boiler, he has no right to stop in his search for
of sterile saline solution and then aspirating the blood-stained fluid.
of strategy and tactics, as the Germans did. But the French troops
of such a life vanished after the engagement of Andrew and Natasha and
of such efforts the enemy had fled--experienced a similar feeling of
of such risks as fracture of the bone--which is often rarefied--or
of support. Half a century had to elapse before the American Federation
of suppuration or of gangrene, or the toxins absorbed into the
of sweat stand out on the brow, the features are drawn, the eyes
of syphilis necessitates the consideration of the _soft sore_, _soft
of syphilis, but it is still used to supplement the effect of the
of taking anything from them, often gave them the last of their
of talking? As it is we have worn the poor girl out," said Marya
of temperature. Fluctuation becomes evident and superficial, and the
of tendons from their grooves, is seldom met with except in the ulnar
of that battery led the French to suppose that here--in the center-
of that body in the spring of 1787. Washington, Hamilton, Mifflin, and
of that cause he saw the beginning of "the overthrow of all law, all
of that civil servant in order to restore the daughter to her mother
of that colony with England and the Indies. Wilmington and Philadelphia
of that prisoner enhanced his own importance as a Russian hero. The
of that proud word "justice." All the complex laws of man centered for
of that state. The Court, however, faced the issue squarely. It held
of the "Atlantic Monthly," declined a poem from Julia Ward Howe on the
of the "romance of invention" and the "captains of industry."
of the "three estates"--the clergy, nobility, and commoners. Acting
of the Allies, the battleships of the United States were always ready to
of the American Federation of Labor as well as of the general public. At
of the American People_, Vol. IV, pp. 1-87; Elson, pp. 498-501.
of the American Revolution, likewise sprang directly from the
of the American navy was limited mainly to helping in the campaign that
of the American people were engaged in agriculture and lived in the
of the Archduke Ferdinand and Mack, and Kutuzov, not considering
of the Austrian army, and then give it to his excellency."
of the Boxer rebellion in Peking in 1900, were but signs and symbols of
of the British navy that prevented Holland, Spain, and France from
of the Brothers, began going to the Club again, drank a great deal,
of the Carolinas, the manufacturers of Pennsylvania, the importers of
of the Circular Letter, ordered the assembly to rescind its appeal. On
of the Civil War some of them began to protest vigorously against the
of the Confederate soldiers." The whole South was called "the Empire"
of the Constitution and so much of paragraph two of the same Section as
of the Constitution should be read and re-read in the light of the
of the Cossacks' shanties and of horses tethered together could be
of the Creator, whose every action, though generally
of the Dakotas, the Ojibways, and the Sioux. Like Michigan and
of the Declaration of Independence, changed in some slight particulars,
of the Democrats. So it came about that the hero of Buena Vista,
of the Eastern lines. It required twenty-five days for a passenger to
of the Emperor's severity regarding duels at that time, neither the
of the Emperor."
of the English colonies, which told him of the two centuries required to
of the French Revolution and the controversies accompanying it,
of the French Revolution resulting from the doctrine of the equality
of the French agencies, and the French explorers--Marquette, Joliet, and
of the French assumed a still more tragic character, with men
of the French was unguarded were merely final indications that it
of the French were coming down upon them and that his regiment was
of the French, and almost every day of the stay at Tilsit, French
of the French, and the Minister of War does not even care to hear
of the French, was eager to help in disrupting the American republic; if
of the French; and petitions for instant action flooded in upon
of the Frenchmen with the gunners ended, whether the red-haired gunner
of the Friends, William Penn, to whom it was granted in 1681 and in
of the Great Northern and allied lines, was one of the most forceful
of the Guards he went with firm quick steps to the reception room.
of the Guards, irreproachably washed, brushed, and buttoned, held
of the Life Guards, who had been losing that evening, climbed on the
of the Lodge, told the password, and at last was permitted to sit
of the Louisiana territory--was the product of circumstances rather than
of the Masonic statutes, "be kindly and courteous," recurred to him.
of the Molasses Act had been utterly neglected; but this Sugar Act had
of the North in the markets of London, Paris, and Amsterdam, many an
of the Northwest territory where free farmers were producing annually
of the Northwest territory.
of the Note.
of the Pacific quickly exercised a powerful influence on world affairs
of the Polish Uhlans, a handsome old man, flushed and, fumbling in his
of the Polish general. To the Polish general he replied to the same
of the President, who held a mallet in his hand. Let into the wall was
of the Railway Union, Eugene V. Debs, or his assistants to interfere
of the Revolution general progress or anything else--then it is
of the Revolution.
of the Rostovs! Well, Mr. Hussar, and what regiment do you serve
of the Rostovs' house was littered with wisps of hay and with dung
of the Russian army really began to improve from the time of that
of the Russian army, about which Napoleon was so concerned, produced
of the Russian people, after the enemy had been destroyed and Russia
of the Russian war, "half were Austrians, Prussians, Saxons, Poles,
of the Russians--and being like all Frenchmen unable to imagine
of the Ryazan serfs' quitrents. Of what is she thinking? Why is she so
of the South as "solid," it did not escape close observers that in a
of the South, and to some extent in New York. The proprietor was in fact
of the Square, one side of which symbolized God, another moral things,
of the Third District, and my only way of avoiding active service is
of the Treasury of the United States. They shall in all cases, except
of the Treasury of the United States; and all such laws shall be subject
of the Union. Oklahoma, long an Indian reservation, had been opened for
of the United Colonies and to give the assent of Virginia to the act of
of the United States to grant independence "as soon as a stable
of the United States under the Constitution. It was a successful attempt
of the United States, reserving to the States respectively the
of the United States, shall have engaged in insurrection or rebellion
of the United States. In the disorders many American citizens lost their
of the United States." Mississippi answered: "It is disunion by
of the United States; if he approve he shall sign it, but if not he
of the United States_, Sections 86-87; Elson, _History of the United
of the United States_, pp. 210-220.
of the Vilkavisski forest and flowing over the three bridges thrown
of the Virginia assembly, in its turn, was the answer of the royal
of the _Tribune_ was gutted; negroes were seized, hanged, and shot; the
of the abscess are thick and rigid, or when its contents are under
of the acquired disease; the difference is partly due to the fact that
of the affected part. The lesion consists in inflammatory hyperplasia of
of the age produced Napoleon's power. But Napoleon's power
of the antagonistic muscles taking place before that of the muscle which
of the ante-bellum days inevitably dissolved; the South became more and
of the anti-anthrax serum introduced by Sclavo. The initial dose is 40
of the area involved, as well as pain and tenderness. The temperature
of the argument on the mint law it was distinctly said by one speaker at
of the arm. The abnormal position of the limb may persist although the
of the army at Cambridge. In January, 1776, after bitter disappointments
of the army at Vilna. Those about him said that he became
of the army into the hands of a better informed and more skillful
of the army to the other.
of the army. Indeed, fighting actually began upon the high seas and went
of the arterial wall; a tiny thrombus of platelets and thrombus forms at
of the artery, and repeated slight strains, which are so liable to occur
of the aspirin type are to be preferred, and these may be followed by
of the bachelor circles in which he moved.
of the bacillus itself by appropriate methods of staining makes the
of the backwardness of a people," said Napoleon, turning to
of the balloons that were to destroy the French, and despite all the
of the beast: for it is the number of a man; and his number is Six
of the bed raised on blocks 10 or 12 inches high, and the limb
of the best and wisest men.
of the best known is the partial or complete rupture of the aponeurosis
of the bleeding when it is incised or ulcerates through the skin, and
of the bleeding, it should be remembered that the rupture of a vein does
of the blood in the sac, or only to allow of the formation of a red
of the blood of men and horses, from the little puffs of smoke on
of the blood that rushed to his heart at the thought. "I will fall
of the blood vessels concerned in its formation.
of the blood-stream and irritation of the endothelium of the vessel wall
of the body. Chilblains are met with chiefly on the fingers and toes in
of the body. The period during which the patient is liable to suffer
of the bondmen. Radical abolitionists had advocated that the slaves when
of the bone in length may be interfered with. Sometimes the separated
of the bone presents a poor contrast to the soft parts, and no trace of
of the bone. It has been divided in accidental wounds,--by a scythe, for
of the bones become irregularly deformed (Fig. 162). Sometimes, and
of the bones, the patient complains of pains, which are worst at night.
of the boy's agitation while Pierre was speaking struck her
of the breast, for example--the intervening lymph vessels should be
of the bridges over the Niemen, deafened continually by incessant
of the brotherhood of men united in the aim of supporting one
of the cartilage, which appears as if it had been painted over with
of the cause of her sadness, and because she was feeling well. She was
of the center that was conducting a gigantic war, and he was glad to
of the central tubercle of each cusp.
of the city and its regular life restored.
of the climate," said he.
of the cloud, tearing its edge. Everything grew bright and
of the collection of duties and customs on colonial imports and exports
of the colonists were land owners. Thus the assemblies, in spite of the
of the column, gave him the order to advance.
of the comet, and especially since the beginning of the war.
of the complaints of the French as to the nonobservance of the
of the condition known as _gummatous infiltration_ or _syphilitic
of the conditions under which their power was entrusted to them; or
of the cone and its base. The soldier himself does the stabbing,
of the cotton gin and textile machinery created a market for cotton
of the council differently. It seemed to her that it was only a
of the country sustained from manufactures. "This," runs the official
of the country. It was accompanied by conditions similar to those which
of the country. They saw Rhode Island and North Carolina still outside
of the country." It authorized the dismissal of any officer of the
of the court scandals contained in the biographies of a Napoleon or
of the crowd with the other.
of the current, the intervening tissues apparently escaping injury.
of the cutaneous nerves. The deeper portion of the true skin is known as
of the cyst can be squeezed through the opening. The wall of the cyst is
of the cyst may die and degenerate, or the cyst may increase in size
of the cyst, and the contents consist of the pent-up secretion of mucous
of the dangers in the war zone and notifying them that any who ventured
of the debt at face value, but that was only an incident in the
of the deed, we never get a conception of freedom in time. For if I
of the digastric muscles, and receive lymph from the lips. It is rare
of the digastric, and rests in the angle between the internal jugular
of the disease, and as this takes place rapidly, that is, in a day or
of the disease, the result of examination with the X-rays, and the
of the disordered finances of the kingdom. The debt stood at the highest
of the dragoon who dealt the blow, the look of silent, timid
of the drums, he recognized that mysterious, callous force which
of the drums.
of the early settlers, had grown from a straggling camp of log huts into
of the earth, in history it is the independence of personality--free
of the elbow it may be injured in fractures or dislocations, or it may
of the election were astounding as compared with the Free-soil failure
of the electors shall be the Vice-President. But if there should remain
of the engagement and within an hour seventeen of the forty men of the
of the entrenchments.
of the evening when the rewards bestowed by the Emperor were
of the event not in the power of one man, but in the interaction of
of the extensor tendon close to its insertion into the terminal
of the extremists were rejected but the convention solemnly went on
of the face and scalp. Suppuration may ensue and be followed by cure of
of the fact that half the prisoners--with whom the Russians did not
of the fauces, and tonsils. In addition to mucous patches, there may be
of the federal government for manufactured goods at unrestricted prices
of the federal government; they reduced expenses by discharging hundreds
of the femoral or popliteal artery, when patches of skin may die over
of the few centers of great riches. Compared with the opulence that
of the fibula, produces no tingling, but when in about three weeks
of the fifth and sixth ribs or its walls may be contracted,
of the fifth metatarsal and the external malleolus.
of the final, desperate chance. At a signal from a bugle an army of men
of the fingers. The prognosis is usually favourable, as recovery is the
of the fire and a soldier in a peaked cap and blue overcoat, lit up by
of the fire, but one would occasionally raise himself on an elbow
of the first group so enrolled were chosen by lot the soldiers for the
of the flexor tendons.
of the foot, and severe pain. According to Paget, the dead part remains
of the foot, and so on.
of the forces had already made itself felt in Petersburg, was
of the forces of Western Europe began, and in 1812 these forces-
of the forearm and ulnar area of the hand. Injury of the lateral and
of the front line as an American sector. In March, General Pershing
of the frontier that were gone. Of far more consequence was the
of the future.
of the game, finds that the more he considers his play the more surely
of the game, the officers saw some wagons approaching with fifteen
of the gateway.
of the globe, and the pupil is slow to dilate when shaded from the
of the government at many points he believed to be necessary to
of the government should be elected directly by the voters; still fewer
of the governor. As a professor, a writer on historical and political
of the great companies were generally broken up and sold in small lots.
of the greater cause. Is it a question of securing votes to ratify the
of the gully. She clicked her teeth (Karay no longer had her by the
of the hand and fingers.
of the hand or forearm, or of the foot or leg, bleeding may be arrested
of the hand.
of the handle, let it go again, and went to the window from which he
of the hands of the watch.
of the hands which show the time, so the result of all the complicated
of the handsome young aide-de-camp with a smile.
of the hard palate; Hutchinson's teeth; opacities of the cornea from
of the heart"--a statement which, though gathered from an unknown
of the highest and best human attributes--love, poetry, tenderness,
of the highest court in the land, that could be done only by an
of the hill and that he had already passed it. He would not soon
of the historical accounts. On the contrary it is a very mild
of the hive more closely says that the bee gathers pollen dust to feed
of the holy fathers of the Society of Jesus?"
of the horse he was riding, and sometimes, when he came within six
of the horsemen and fell somewhere beyond them. The hussars did not
of the hounds came the deep tones of the wolf call from Daniel's
of the hour. John Witherspoon, provost of the College of New Jersey,
of the house through the closed doors came the sound of difficult
of the hunter's rifle as he brought down his evening meal. "During the
of the huntsman who had sighted him, having been the nearest, were the
of the icons. 'Michael,' he says, 'come here and bow down to his feet;
of the ilium.
of the imperial staff, Quartermaster General Prince Volkonski, as well
of the inauguration, but never forgave him for being elected.
of the increased crowd, dropped behind and returned to his tavern.
of the individual tissues.
of the infected material. The wound must be freely opened, all
of the inflammatory exudate, in which they are washed out.
of the inflammatory reaction is brought into play, we shall assume the
of the inhabitants of the district.
of the injunction in labor disputes, and prescribing trial by jury in
of the injured vessel are presumably healthy, but they form no part of
of the integument, which is uncomplicated by loss of tissue, by the
of the intellectual essence of Petersburg," as she herself put it.
of the intermuscular septa" (Cathcart) (Fig. 19). When the whole
of the internal carotid artery and cavernous sinus, which is often
of the intestinal tract, shows a great tendency to invade any organ or
of the ischium_, when enlarged as a trade disease, is known as
of the jaw, particularly when met with in a young adult, should suggest
of the jaw. Fibrous odontomas have been mistaken for sarcoma, and
of the joint in front of the tendon of the biceps (Fig. 61). The
of the joint, practically never result in ankylosis.
of the just, and mercifully fulfill the desires of Your Majesty."
of the kidney and temporarily increase its blood supply, but in the
of the kidney may also give rise to metastases in bone.
of the last one at Borodino.
of the last two or three days' march. They are almost disbanded.
of the lawyers. "Must I shoot a simple-minded soldier boy who deserts,
of the leather cushion and seeing nothing but that cushion, and her
of the leg, or with an obstinate form of dermatitis (_varicose eczema_),
of the legislature lower qualifications were required.
of the lesion, and does not even involve all the nerve fibres. In the
of the letters sent through the embassy and all the searches made, his
of the ligaments, the stability of the joint is lost, and it becomes
of the limbs some form of splint should be added to prevent movement.
of the line (the Guards) was already in action.
of the line and was being at once transferred to the Guards as a
of the lipping of one of the articular margins being detached by injury.
of the little girl he had saved.
of the locality and surroundings--fruit gardens, stone fences, tiled
of the long German carts six or more pale, dirty, bandaged men were
of the long bones--tubercle, syphilitic gumma, and Brodie's abscess,
of the lumen of the arteries by disease of their coats, or the blocking
of the lymphatics, described by Sampson Handley, has already been
of the main vessel by an embolus.
of the maladies of those organs. This simple thought could not occur
of the man to the world and the clearness of our perception of the
of the manufacture and sale of intoxicating liquors as beverages. This
of the mass of the troops. A similar relation of people to one another
of the meadow beside an oatfield, with head bowed and arms behind
of the meaning of the force producing historical events and termed
of the median line upon the rectus capitis anticus major muscle and in
of the medical treatment, in the depths of her heart she hoped that
of the men was audible.
of the men; the others tried to swim on, some in the saddle and some
of the metropolitan police force, as federal civil service commissioner
of the middle horse, sank in the snow, which was dry and glittered
of the mighty arm being stricken powerless, but all the generals and
of the militia; he levied troops for defense and enforced martial law in
of the moist type and spreads rapidly.
of the most conservative of states, embarked on the experiment of
of the most powerful and energetic leaders in the struggle of the giants
of the most striking and definite examples is an army.
of the mouth are excessive drinkers and smokers.
of the mouth, or even the jaws, may become gangrenous and the teeth fall
of the mouth. The history of the mother relative to repeated
of the mummers.
of the muscle or tendon may become fixed by adhesions to adjacent
of the muscles of the larynx which it supplies. The vagus, the phrenic,
of the nail (Fig. 9, b). A small focus of suppuration forms under the
of the nation and the salvation of Europe!"
of the nation. A third prescribed for coal miners in Alaska an
of the national government, not confidence in it--this is the ideal that
of the nations and of humanity and not the narration of episodes in
of the nations? Adorable! It is enough to make one's head whirl! It is
of the natural sciences in this matter is merely to serve as an
of the nature of a scratch or a cut, and after a long incubation period
of the neck and applied his foot and knee to his behind with great
of the nerve in the buttock, thigh, or leg. It may be comparatively
of the nerve this bundle can be readily dissected up and its identity
of the nerve, while the neurolemma and the myelin act as insulating
of the new system and share in its control. Finally, with a view to
of the new world with the old along the bed of the Atlantic, McCormick
of the nineteenth March, and her downy little lip rose from old habit,
of the nose and its accessory cavities, the auditory (Eustachian) tube,
of the noxa. It is exceptional for the irritant to reach the gland
of the obnoxious laws, but in vain. All they could wring from the prime
of the official release dates, leaving time for better editing.
of the official release dates, leaving time for better editing.
of the old prince had not disturbed the order of things in the
of the one fought on the twenty-sixth.
of the open field, developed in the course of time a national industry
of the opponents of the government's measures. They had predicted that
of the orbit or nose, or may fill up the external auditory meatus,
of the orderlies and servants.
of the ossifying junction by means of a drill, gouge, or trephine. If
of the overlying skin. Skiagrams show that a considerable deposit of
of the part, the greater is the amount of swelling--witness the marked
of the parties, the animation produced inevitably by ardent debate had a
of the parts of the body which are most often affected in this
of the party, and commended "the splendid diplomatic victories of our
of the passages.
of the patient being laid up. For two or three days he refuses food, is
of the patient must be treated on the same lines as in other neuroses.
of the patient, by abolishing the spasms, and enabling the attendants to
of the peaceful settlement of international disputes. The subject was
of the penis itself. (5) At either end of the torn fraenum, in the form
of the people has by tacit agreement prescribed to them. But what this
of the people of Russia, or of the direction of affairs in Paris, or
of the people peaceably to assemble and petition the government for a
of the people were for the American cause and not more than one-third
of the people will be trampled upon; the poor man's justice will be lost
of the people's will, as some historians suppose, then all the details
of the peristalsis of the bowel, leading to thirst, dry, furred tongue,
of the phalanges. A similar deformity of the thumb is sometimes met
of the pharynx, tonsils, and palate are well marked, and small, circular
of the politicians to use public offices as mere rewards for partisan
of the population in Texas, they raised the standard of revolt in 1836
of the possible discomforts and gastric disturbance which may attend a
of the potato.
of the power to appoint its members. The storm was brewing. In the
of the preceding election. Prominent men like Longfellow, Washington
of the primary lesion in man, and the condition may, during the early
of the printed ballot, there was still no secrecy about elections. Each
of the probe, or, more accurately, by injecting the sinus with a paste
of the process. We have found that by painting with linimentum iodi, a
of the products of putrefaction for a considerable time, and are not
of the profits derived from their sale as slaves.
of the pupil on the right side may result from pressure on the
of the radium employed, but are moved about every second day or so in
of the rates of railways and telegraph companies; repeal of the specie
of the raw materials and of the food for manufacturers; in the
of the rays.
of the regiment Kutuzov had reviewed at Braunau and in which
of the regiment. The horse of an ammunition cart put its leg over a
of the relationship of the animal to the human subject. The eye of the
of the removal of the foreign body and the necessary disinfection.
of the republic is at stake, it would be treason to our trust not to
of the responsibility for its commission." It called upon the German
of the rete Malpighii close to the cut edge begin to sprout on to the
of the revolt, intent upon provoking American interference, laid waste
of the rising generation like Henry Cabot Lodge, of Massachusetts, and
of the risk of exposure to cold, the use of hot-bottles, and of placing
of the road between two rows of birch trees.
of the room, to the corner darkened by the icons that hung there.
of the room. Pierre went close up to him, but Davout, evidently
of the routes running through the Hudson and Mohawk valleys and along
of the sacro-iliac joint; they project into the pelvis and press on the
of the same family. They are smooth, rounded, or discoid cysts, varying
of the saphena and its valves are intact, and only the more distal veins
of the scalp, face, and neck, for example, heal more quickly than those
of the scapula.
of the scapula. The whole plexus may suffer, but more frequently the
of the sea voyage. To overcome this difficulty a plan was worked out
of the secreting glands may be reproduced.
of the serfs as impracticable, he arranged for the erection of large
of the sexes. Delicate, easily abraded surfaces are then brought into
of the shaft in length. While all epiphysial cartilages contribute to
of the shaft of one of the long bones--usually the femur--from violence
of the shafts of the long bones. It is easy to understand the curvature
of the ship, and that we were led into error by the fact that we
of the shoulder, are familiar examples of this injury.
of the shoulder. There is rarely any call for operative treatment, as
of the sixth cervical vertebra; the temporal against the temporal
of the skeleton most often affected are the articular ends of the long
of the skin and cellular tissue of an extremity in association with
of the skin over the prepatellar or olecranon bursa, and in neglected
of the skin to the underlying fascia.
of the skin, incisions may be made, if asepsis can be assured. The blood
of the skin, such as the hair follicles, the sweat and sebaceous glands,
of the skin, which are of a greenish hue. A tough greyish-black slough
of the skin. One variety, known as the "tomato tumour," which apparently
of the skin; an abscess in the breast from organisms which have passed
of the slaves and their proposed enfranchisement made prominent the
of the sleigh and sprawled there. It wasn't a case of urging them
of the sleigh.
of the slope by the pond, where no one could see her. She did not know
of the small saphena system. Sometimes both systems are involved, and
of the soft parts coming together.
of the soldiers, evidently afraid that Pierre might want to take
of the spine, or from the symptoms of grave and persistent joint-disease
of the staphylococci, less frequently a streptococcus, and still less
of the state of things there, and spoke of the estimate an architect
of the state, the answer should be a declaration of independence. In a
of the states, and the enforcement of the laws." The party that
of the states. The state legislatures, under a decision rendered by the
of the stretchers, and love of the sun and of life, all merged into
of the sun bathed the top of the opposite slope with yet another
of the superficial lymphatics. In the course of a week, small, firm
of the surface within the area drained by them. Tuberculous infection
of the surface, and in rare cases the joint has become the seat of
of the surrounding area, by preventing the contraction which is such an
of the swelling, although it arrests the pulsation, does not produce any
of the swollen condition of the limb, and because there are already
of the swollen, thickened, and white edges, and presents a glazed
of the synovial membrane of a joint or tendon sheath. We have not been
of the tax collectors, as the Revolutionists thirty years before had
of the temperature. The arrest of the inflammation and its resolution
of the temple of Solomon. Pierre respected this class of Brothers to
of the tenderness she had been feeling for him vanished instantly
of the tendon itself. These fibroblasts ultimately develop into typical
of the tendon, and redness and oedema of the skin. If there is an
of the territory was admitted to the union as the state of Oregon,
of the thigh. If this is not sufficient to bring the ends into
of the third company!"
of the three armies had its own commander in chief, but there was no
of the tissues around an artery. The septic process causes softening and
of the tissues. The missiles frequently lodge and carry portions of the
of the town where the headquarters and the diplomatic corps were
of the toxins. Under such conditions the tension should be relieved and
of the tramp class, who, in addition to being exposed to cold by
of the treaty did not express their purpose explicitly, the Alliance was
of the true skin were specially advocated by Wolff and are often
of the true skin--cutis-grafting.
of the tumour after the method described in connection with sarcoma--and
of the tumour being scraped out, and care must be taken that no nodules
of the tumour in a malignant form.
of the tumour undergo colloid degeneration, a _colloid cancer_ results;
of the twentieth century were well named "the age of the muckrakers."
of the ulcer and soaked in black wash is applied and covered with
of the union.[1] They knew by what small margins the Constitution had
of the urethritis, but are most frequently met with from the eighteenth
of the verses.
of the vertebrae, the clinical appearances are those of a soft, fluid
of the vessel and so occludes the lumen. A bright-red or a white heat
of the vessel wall and leads to the formation of an aneurysm.
of the vessel, from which free bleeding takes place, as the conditions
of the vice-King's division will open a heavy fire on seeing the
of the victory that had been gained. Prince Andrew introduced his
of the vital questions of the day. This was a reference to the Dred
of the wall, toward the Znamenka.
of the war not only was there no wish on the Russian side to draw
of the war; they took Philadelphia and retained it until threatened by
of the water. Such was, long afterward, the judgment of the conservative
of the west at the end of the eighteenth century and their drive
of the white population. Moreover it does not appear that those planters
of the whole army! "I needn't have been in such a hurry to pray
of the whole campaign were attained: the transition from retreat to
of the whole people. But Smolensk was burned by its own
of the wicked be exalted against the destiny of those Thou hast
of the wills of all who take part in the events, and that a Napoleon's
of the world have been changed. To historians who believe that
of the wound. It usually occurs in patients who have had prophylactic
of the wrist and fingers, and the supinators. There is a characteristic
of the wrist; in the supinated position, by that portion of the
of their affiliation with monopolies equally unworthy of the suffrages
of their betrayal of the Bourbon cause. The sovereigns! Why, they
of their deliberate choosing. It was not the lack of land for his
of their interests in the form of higher wages, shorter days, and
of their interests. They served on committees that inquired into the
of them Pierre had met in Petersburg society. In the President's chair
of them experienced in actual campaigns. The armies of King George
of them of the official class--who denounced the merchants, lawyers, and
of them were from Ohio--though Grant had been in Illinois when the
of them. But when Denisov explained that his purpose was to kill the
of these infinitesimals) can we hope to arrive at the laws of history.
of these is the well-known _white swelling_ or _tumor albus_ (Wiseman,
of these measures has diminished to a remarkable degree the recurrence
of these ulcers become the seat of epithelioma, due, in Neve's opinion,
of thirty years, and been nine years a citizen of the United States, and
of this cicatrix results in condensation of the surrounding structures
of this inert material is necessary before the tissues can be irrigated
of this law, declared this ancient and honorable instrument for the
of this war was that the old prince never spoke of it, did not
of this. In alcoholic neuritis there is great tenderness of the muscles.
of those concerned in the event become and the more manifest the law
of those voices, amid the square masses of troops standing
of those who do not live upon public plunder." "The United States
of time the foot becomes inverted and the toes are pointed--pes
of time, and the greater or lesser dependence on the causes in
of times before: how the late princess had given birth to Princess
of town who had the best horses, and promised to assist him in every
of tuberculosis. _The deep inguinal glands_ lie on the medial side of
of tuberculosis_ the reader is referred to text-books on medicine.
of turning to a high school manual for information about the art of
of twenty; Sonya a girl of sixteen with all the charm of an opening
of two or more States, or parts of States, without the consent of the
of unconciousness and oblivion which in the opinion of Napoleon's
of union with the Anglicans. In each town a separate congregation was
of varicose veins. It is chiefly met with in hospital practice. The want
of view, presented themselves to the men of that day; but to us, to
of vodka for the men from me," he added so that the soldiers could
of waiting for authority from Washington, the Californians held a
of war were with the agile forces of Nippon. In this struggle, it seems,
of war. God grant that the Corsican monster who is destroying the
of warfare. Little did they realize the magnitude of the task before
of warm light)--were so beautiful that very often in spite of the
of water for much longer periods than fully developed bacteria. The
of what had happened during those last days and during the first
of what happiness it would be to die--not in saving the Emperor's life
of what they were saying, she softly left the room and went to the
of what to do with the newly emancipated slaves. That problem, often put
of which is hidden in the unknown but at the other end of which a
of which is washed off with absolute alcohol, and the wound either
of which one is on the Mokhovaya Street and the other at the Provision
of which results from the conception of freedom? That is a question
of which the base with the largest diameter consists of the rank and
of which will represent the commander in chief.
of whom are we afraid? I am not to blame that the Minister is
of wonder at her spirituality and at the lofty moral world, almost
of wounded, now at the cart by which he was standing, in which two
of wounds produced by modern weapons. For further details the reader is
of years ago by all the religious and philosophic theories--that
of young connective tissue which circumscribes or encapsulates the
of your misfortune." He seemed to emphasize the last word, as if to
of, and until you have ceased to love the woman of your choice and
of, the carriage.
of, you fool?" added the other--"A real fool!"
of," continued Napoleon--hardly able to keep pace in words with the
of. In historic events the rule forbidding us to eat of the fruit of
of. Instead of an offensive, the plan of which, carefully prepared
off American trade, but control of the sea did not seriously affect the
off alone to the Guards' camp to find his old playmate. Rostov had not
off and then we'll rest. The Tsar won't forget your service. It is
off from all the world. Prince Andrew was the first to move away,
off from the joint it may suffer independently, and when distended with
off from the use of English manufactures, the women engaged within their
off his wet felt cloak in a corner of the room, and without greeting
off into the surrounding bone. The gumma may be completely absorbed or
off on the line of Kutuzov's retreat. If he reached Znaim before the
off somewhere with them, shouts of delight and triumph arose among the
off the track into the snow, Pierre looked down at his feet, then
off their conversation and quit that corner in the sitting room, but
off their linstocks, and an officer gave the word "Fire!" This was
off this burden as quickly as possible, on the third day after his
off till another day one of the big guerrilla detachments will
off to markets on the east and west coasts.
off to the left onto the new Kaluga road and began to enter
off, and instead of granulations being formed, the tissues exposed on
off, the huntsmen were already nearing it. Rostov, having finally
off, they were not to be seen. It seemed to the count that things were
off. The others all followed, dispirited and shamefaced, and only much
offended because he had not been invited to attend the council of war,
offended country for the loss of Moscow. You have experienced my
offended, ma chere! On behalf of the whole family I beg you to come,
offenders entitled to their full rights in law. In his speech to the
offenders under the Sedition Act. Their failure to convict Justice Chase
offending one another. But the regiments, both cavalry and infantry,
offer me negotiations! But what is the aim of your alliance with
offer the golden opportunity. On the 22d, the immortal document was
offered food, clothing, and shelter; the former slaves gave their labor
offered him his own house. The Minister of War came up and
offered neither glory nor profit. Having indulged in the usual
offered to the Senate a compromise granting concessions to both sides;
offering an all-water route from New York City to the Great Lakes and
offering eighty thousand rubles for the forest."
offering to enforce the laws as made, if elected. Clay's followers
office and given two officials a thrashing, and dislocated the arm
office holders were sometimes retained after the establishment of
office of Secretary of State in 1844, authorizing him to negotiate the
office under the United States, shall be a member of either House during
office, the Republicans could not escape the inevitable consequences of
office, the same shall devolve on the Vice-President, and the Congress
officer and at once went to meet the major.
officer and then at the other.
officer by his collar. Our fugitives returned, the battalions
officer catching sight of Bagration rushed shouting after the crowd of
officer fell, not so much from the blow--which had but slightly cut
officer had come with news that the French were already near
officer had told him the whole field could be seen. Here he
officer in the American navy, with authority from Washington, placed
officer in the white uniform of the Horse Guards.
officer lying on the earth wall with his back turned as if he were
officer of the suite by the arm. "Look! A man has fallen! Fallen,
officer on the Kirghiz horse (who performed the duties of an adjutant)
officer pointing to the soldiers. "The officers don't keep them in
officer sent to inspect the locality comes in and gives a report quite
officer snatched a little food at a comrade's, and rode again to the
officer still sat in the same way, bent double, in a pool of blood
officer was admitted and immediately saw all the chief generals of the
officer with the dimple. And I remember how my arm paused when I
officer's command took the two convicts who stood first in the row.
officer's face had already sealed the order. The count looked around
officer's hat and seemed quite exhausted. On approaching the fire he
officer's horse, almost knocking it over, and at the same instant
officer's report, and began deliberately to examine the whole
officer, returning from the advanced detachment, rode up to Murat
officer, the senator, and in general with whatever speech he had
officer, with his face still more flushed, commanded the men more
officers acting under the authority of the crown. Systematic supervision
officers and the colonists over the disposition of western lands had
officers became animated. The Guardsmen told Rostov of their march and
officers from the men, and see the standard flapping against its
officers in the colonies were to be made independent of the legislatures
officers of the Guard and from French headquarters were dining and
officers of the United States.
officers ran up to him. From the right side of his abdomen, blood
officers was the safest, and though he would have been glad to be of
officers without exception, he read the same dismay, horror, and
officers!' But it's not all the same to us! Am I not right, Denisov?
officers' shed, he had stayed in the shed where he was first put.
officers' wards, consisting of three rooms, the doors of which stood
officers, soldiers, and militiamen began running forward along the
officers, were the cause of the conflagrations. After marching through
officers," continued the staff captain, "and Bogdanich" (the colonel
officers. Now what was the colonel to do? Have the officer tried and
officers. Prince Andrew lay on his chest with his face in the grass,
officers; and shall have the sole power of impeachment.
offices and the seekers after them constituted a veritable political
official came out addressed him, one hand placed in the breast of
official censor and limited to the publication of religious works. Forty
official censor. When the Puritans were in power, the popular party,
official report that our army had been defeated. A week after the
official, that is, furnished by the government, not by party workers; it
officially refused by the French government.
officials. A third measure was the Tea Act of July 2, 1767, aimed at the
officials. He chose as Secretary of the Treasury, Alexander Hamilton,
officials. The legislature also used its power over money grants to
often a wounded animal, hearing a rustle, rushes straight at the
often albuminuria. Leucocytosis is usually well marked before the
often come nowadays as it is, and this girl of mine," said the count
often dry and coated with a black crust down the centre, while the sides
often extends to the adjacent skin, fat, and muscle; in cancer of the
often have the opportunity of observing that the exit wound is larger,
often indicated in adults than in children, because after the age of
often insidious, and are attended with so few symptoms that the disease
often involuntary, movement. As examples may be cited the rupture of
often is, contaminated by the discharge from mucous patches or other
often markedly diseased. In some cases the existence of the glycosuria
often met with in the sac of an aneurysm (Fig. 72). When rapidly formed
often no exit wound. In the thorax, for example, if a rib is struck, the
often of service. Operative interference is indicated when the disease
often sensitive and reticent regarding the fact, and it may only be
often set in motion destructive forces of the most terrible character.
often situated on the sole of the foot or in the matrix of the nail of
often spoke of government as founded on the consent of the governed, did
oftenest on the face, and is believed to be due to an organism, although
oil, left in for twelve hours or so, forms an emulsion with the bismuth,
oil-silk. If the ulcer tends to spread in area or in depth, it should be
ointment (made up by the chemist in paper packets) is rubbed for fifteen
ointment. In multiple boils on the trunk and limbs, lysol or boracic
ointments of the red oxide of mercury, ammoniated mercury, or oleate of
old Northwest territory--the wilderness of Jefferson's time--had taken
old countess' voice from the drawing room.
old enemy Bonaparte against our old ally the Emperor of Austria, and
old father, and entering the military service, my dear. And there
old force. In the uniform of the Preobrazhensk regiment--white
old lady's maid was as full of rapturous admiration as the Rostovs'
old man noticed a face thrust out of the carriage window gazing at
old missions rang out the time of day. The chaffering Red Man bartering
old nurse, or with "God's folk" who sometimes came by the back door to
old persons. The original wound has long since healed, and beyond a
old practice of relying on quotas furnished by the state legislatures
old prince to get up, Tikhon came to call the young prince to his
old retainers of the Bourbons knew how to make, and approached him,
old road, or that new path so attractively shown him by the Masons, on
old state of Missouri. He brought suit for his liberty on the ground
old woman! Where has she run off to? And how am I to find the
old, although the difference is so small that it can only be
old, noncommissioned officer ran out of the ranks and taking him by
old-fashioned drawing room with its old furniture resembled the solemn
older men, the curiosity of the uninitiated, the reserve of the
oldest rose. Marya Dmitrievna paused at the door. Tall and stout,
olecranon. It may originate as an inflammation of the olecranon bursa,
omen, particularly when the general symptoms are severe. In some cases
ominous warnings were well founded, saying: "I believe the struggle now
omitted to bring Napoleon his waterproof boots on the twenty-fourth
on April 7, 1913. He invited the cooperation of all "forward-looking
on European powers, he ranged himself squarely on the side of those that
on Germany, the government established the principle of equal pay for
on June 18, 1812, the declaration of war on Great Britain. In
on June 7, the Virginia delegation in the Congress moved that "these
on Sonya, felt for the first time the sorrowful side of the news.
on Sundays and taught school on week days. They led in the discussion of
on a campaign of hatred against all aliens in the Celestial empire,
on a distant expedition, starting from the oak grove where there was
on a downward slope, lay a field of spring rye. To the right, beyond a
on a hot day takes a final run before plunging into the water. The
on a little way. "What's the matter?" he asked.
on a single executive chosen indirectly by electors selected as the
on account of sex, following the language of the fifteenth amendment
on active service. Nicholas was somewhere with the army and had not
on all sides. But the liveliest attention was attracted by occurrences
on and will meet them with the fire of the whole battalion'--and
on at the crossing. And why are they dawdling there?"
on being polite to the French and lay down their arms at the first
on blocks, so that the ulcer lies on a higher level than the heart.
on both aspects of the bone as well as in the marrow.
on both sides. But neither Anna Mikhaylovna nor the footman nor the
on by the three bridges to the other side.
on compression of the main artery. The origin of the tumour from bone
on duty said in a whisper, "To the right, at the window."
on duty, Kozlovski, who was sitting at the window with a book.
on earth than a tree can resist its growth. The history of territorial
on educational methods. They were for the most part quite
on expeditiously, unnecessary things were left, and the most
on foundations already laid. The establishment of a national system of
on her father, noticed his silence, and was struck by the fact that
on her head, holding a dish and evidently awaiting the entrance of the
on high-backed chairs at a large table under the portrait of the
on him by the doctors, clergy, and relatives of the family. Prince
on his knee, groaned, and slipped down into the arms of the Cossacks
on his knees in the naive attitude of an Egyptian statue, and
on his own authority ordered the troops to occupy the high ground.
on his will, then evidently a cold affecting the manifestation of
on holy days to church and after the service to jails and prisons on
on incomes wherever found and not apportioned among the states according
on interference with the circulation, it is to be borne in mind that the
on it, laid across two barrels). Davout took the packet and read the
on it, they also stepped on the raft.
on its edge. The Cossack was sharpening the saber under the wagon.
on man--a happiness of the soul alone, the happiness of loving.
on opening the Fourth Liberty Loan campaign, "the constitution of the
on or for this work, so the Project (and you!) can copy and
on or for this work, so the Project (and you!) can copy and
on quiet farms as the border advanced against the setting sun. Others
on reading to the end, without raising his eyes at the opening of
on seeing the baggage trains that impeded the army, he was (Thiers
on some substance in the cells of the nature of glycogen. This reaction
on that same fourteenth of June they defeated the Spaniards. My
on that seven of hearts. On the previous Sunday the old count had
on the French Revolution_ and Paine's _Rights of Man_.
on the French, galloped along the front as hard as his horse could go,
on the Povarskaya, so well known to all Moscow. The countess herself
on the President's advice, declared war also on that "vassal of the
on the Rostovs, and Natasha, very glad of this diversion, having
on the arm of a colonel of hussars, a man of importance to them
on the arm said:
on the back of her neck.
on the center sofa. The bigwigs, the most respected members of the
on the characters of a malignant growth ("secondary malignant neuroma,"
on the cheek, as a salivary fistula; beside the inner angle of the eye,
on the contrary at that meeting to bind him to her forever.
on the correctness or falsity of some newly emerging opinion and for
on the currency question, it is not surprising that there was some
on the dead and wounded, on the frightened, exhausted, and
on the dorsal surface of the wrist and forearm are often followed by
on the dusty writing table in the deathlike stillness of the study,
on the eve of the Revolution, maintained in every colony. Any subject in
on the face of the man addressing him. Rostopchin grew confused and
on the field at Schon Grabern. Young Rostov's ecstatic voice could
on the field of Olmutz where Bolkonski had seen him for the first time
on the field of battle. There were still the same suffering,
on the flanks of the battery that is to bombard the entrenchment on
on the floor and walls of the hive. Instead of a neatly glued floor,
on the front of her little shawl and, still kneeling on the floor, set
on the garden paths, and horses and calves were straying in the
on the general nature of the American system. The Constitution, ran his
on the ground floor, and clapping Pierre on the shoulder ran with
on the hands, and are often multiple, occurring in clusters or in
on the head with the full swing of a bludgeon. It hurt a little, but
on the higher ground it was clearing, but nothing could be seen of
on the horizon. Far in the distance in that birch and fir forest to
on the instant by the fact that our men or theirs run or do not run,
on the land owned the soil they tilled.
on the large coil of wire is more extensive.
on the lower third of the leg, and is often associated with the presence
on the map, with a certain number of troops on this and that side in a
on the neck. They spoke of most ordinary things, yet she felt that
on the new foundation.
on the nose. The _sebaceous adenoma_, which originates from the
on the older South where the raising of slaves for the market became a
on the other fifteen were lost. Consequently the four were equal to
on the other hand, have a high degree of resistance. Not only do they
on the other hand, it is very inadvisable to permit any foreign power to
on the other hand, was vigorously applied. Several editors of Republican
on the other. Its signs, to use the language of a Republican orator in
on the palmar aspect of the fingers, and vary in size from a split pea
on the part of certain great trusts; those responsible should be
on the part of railways. This measure was loosely enforced and the
on the pharynx and larynx, and on the hypoglossal nerve. Aneurysm of the
on the portfolio, and changed her grip.
on the principle of the Compromise of 1850; namely, that the people in
on the protests of English planters in the Barbadoes and Jamaica,
on the prowl for booty fell in with the Emperor and very nearly
on the raised platform of the cannon, and reproached those others
on the recommendation of party workers, but on the basis of competitive
on the right brachial plexus causes shooting pain down the arm and
on the right than on the left side, and is usually situated either at
on the same legal footing as in the South. In New York approximately one
on the same lines as in other acute infective diseases.
on the same lines as similar eruptions of other origin. As local
on the same principle.
on the scene. Shortly after his arrival they made confidential
on the sciatic nerve from sitting on a hard bench, can be elicited on
on the seat the old prince used to like to sit on, and beside him
on the shoulder. "Well, does no one speak French in this
on the skin surface, leading to the formation of a sebaceous horn
on the soil. The Northwest territory alone almost equaled in area all
on the soil. The acute Southern observer just quoted, De Bow, admitted
on the spot indicated to him. He made no reply on his father's
on the staff, excited by the memory of the easy victory at Tarutino,
on the state of the Union, and recommend to their consideration such
on the supposition that he was drunk.
on the surface like that seen in psoriasis. The co-existence of scaly
on the surface. Sometimes there is an elongated sinuous film which has
on the table, beside her lay Anatole's letter. Sonya picked it up
on the tissues of the body and a scald which results from the action of
on the transport, of the message Petya had brought, and his own
on the trunk or the neck, Klapp's suction bells may be used, small
on the wall. (The most precious ones, with which some family tradition
on the way unexpected movements of the enemy--that cannot be foreseen-
on the whole right in her territorial claims against Venezuela.
on their career with a single issue, the abolition of the liquor
on their heedless passions. Moreover, nothing was decided by the
on their way to Paris. On the same day, Great Britain, anxiously
on them for the benefit of the Northern mill owners.
on those who can best afford to pay instead of laying it on the farmers
on tiptoe, and going to the door of the conservatory where he slept
on to Nicholas the flattering things Princess Mary said of him and
on to make some preparations and to be ready to receive the sovereign.
on to place an heroic torch in the hands of their own people, it is
on to the end. Berthier wrote to his Emperor (we know how far
on to the pistol and screamed hoarsely, evidently with some heroic
on what was passing in Lobnoe Place that no one answered him. The
on which he was making the bast shoe, and two little girls, running
on which it rests and which no human power can destroy, is the
on which the Duc de Bassano based his refusal to deliver them to him
on which the battle was fought had not been foreseen and that the
on which the institutions of state and church are erected.
on without a formal declaration of war until the year 1800. By that time
on would laugh at him, and thrust his head into the shirt hurriedly.
on!" Rostov shouted, when the sleigh was only three houses from his
on!" innumerable voices suddenly shouted after the ball had struck the
on, his excitement subsiding under the delightful interest of his
on, there was no holding them in till we reached the place. The devils
on, warming to his subject, "that the Emperor himself would not be
once adopted just the expression she saw on the maid of honor's
once cultivated land are stripped of every vestige of fencing. The
once more called from Mount Vernon to take his old position at the head
once moved his forces to attack the center and outflank both the
once recognized the shorter and younger man in the white uniform: it
once that the process of regeneration had already taken place in
once the foreign troops were in possession of the Chinese capital,
once!" she said, appalled at the thought of being left in the hands of
once, but pricked his ears listening to the shouting and trampling
once, not only comfortably, but handsomely too, without the help of
once, to embrace the man she loved, to speak and hear from him words
once," said the assistant hurriedly. "Let us go, your honor."
once. "You know it won't do to leave your posts like this. The
once. He drove through the town seeking Anatole Kuragin, at the
once. He sat rather sideways in the armchair next to the countess,
one Supreme Court, and in such inferior courts as the Congress may from
one another and the revolving pulleys whirr with the rapidity of their
one another in surprise. Then came the prayer just received from the
one another in the wilderness of Pennsylvania or on the Plains of
one another, and the visitors try to guess from these glances who,
one another. It is rarely the seat of pain or tenderness. It most often
one another. The cavities result either from the new formation of lymph
one aspect of the expansion which finally carried the peoples, the
one authority or the other. They were for the enforcement of the
one billion dollars streamed from the printing presses, to fall in value
one feels as if one were in the country."
one foot half across the room, and seeming not to notice the chairs
one foot on the ground, the other being caught in the stirrup. His
one foot rapidly against the other. In the stalls everyone clapped and
one from His Highness the Archduke Ferdinand and here are these," he
one grain of the powder. Three of these are given daily in the first
one hand and the South and West on the other, rather than between the
one he considered the "love of clodhoppers" and the other the "love of
one hundred millions. The iron industries of West Virginia and Alabama
one in the hall. "Oh God! Is everyone all right?" he thought, stopping
one is pua' as on the first day of cweation... Who's that now? Send
one looks at the place where a familiar portrait hangs. "Sorrow is
one main division runs towards each of the extremities, and terminates
one man, would have found it impossible to make the story of the
one minute," said the resolute Dunyasha taking a needle that was stuck
one must dance." He stepped forward in the direction Pierre indicated.
one of his commissions and ordered the small closed carriage for her.
one of my eyes was sore but now I am on the lookout with both.
one of the colonies secured a popular assembly.
one of the cutaneous nerves (Fig. 88). The disease appears in the form
one of the extensors of the thumb, the extensor carpi radialis longus
one of the independent powers of the earth.
one of the ladies.
one of the large veins in the neck is wounded, the effects of
one of the lodges over the road purposely laden with snow.
one of the maids who was present. (Mary Bogdanovna was a midwife
one of the most instructive phenomena in history.
one of the officers as he went: "Have these gentlemen attended to
one of the staff who asked where he was going.
one of the stupidest women in the world," thought Pierre, "is regarded
one of the swaying pontoon bridges to the farther side, turned sharply
one of the toes. It but rarely, however, assumes the dry, shrivelling
one of them did yesterday, and the French will come and take me by
one of those in closest attendance on the Emperor, went up to him
one of us will go and bwing in more wecwuits, and the sov'weign" (that
one of which was occupied by Prince Andrew. The wounded man was much
one owns a United States copyright in these works, so the Foundation
one owns a United States copyright in these works, so the Foundation
one part of the body is continuously pressed upon for any length of
one patient to another through neglect of antiseptic precautions. The
one plan, Armfeldt another, and they are all good and all bad, and the
one possible way of dealing with it. The necessity of the conception
one quite at home, and from habit immediately lay down on the sofa,
one replied, and the four simply looked at one another. She lingered
one respect. Their land hunger was never appeased. Each had the eye of
one side and disappear in the thicket. After going through the wood
one side and the women on the other--who with beaming faces had come
one side of the question for a solution of the whole problem.
one still more of the general sorrow.
one that the purchase of Louisiana was undesirable.
one thing there were delays and blunders on the part of the British
one thing we are interested in here," said the spirit of the place.
one thought the war would extend farther than the western, the Polish,
one time held the former governor of New Jersey and the mayor of New
one time the count thought of giving her the Ryazan estate or of
one to four days and the opening closed with a Michel's clip or a
one took any notice of his being out of harmony with the general mood.
one upon the other should be possible and all infection must be
one western river valley owned 17,000,000 acres; but when the good land
one wing with the other, Prince Andrew met Mademoiselle Bourienne
one wish--that the frightful thing that had to happen should happen
one would have to... the Metropolitan himself... and even then it
one year's mercurial inunction--a piece of mercurial ointment the size
one year, 1907. The men who turned sheep and cattle to graze on the
one's needs, while great freedom in the choice of occupation--such
one's way, and far from spoiling the high tone and general
one, began biting me. I lifted it up, but the higher I lifted it the
one, means must be taken to counteract it. This done, the condition of
one, now by another, of the guests. To each of them he made some
one, the white one!"
one--a domination based on the application or threat of physical
one-fifteenth of the population, exerted an influence all out of
one-fifth of the American people supported the insurrection and that
one-half of the colored children of school age. While in many respects
one-half of the credits of the nation for the benefit of debtors"--and
one-third of the members go out at a time while two-thirds remained in
one-third of the whole population is supported, directly, or indirectly,
one. During the stage of bacterial inflammation, reparative processes
one. Since the world began and men have killed one another no one
one. That is the only difference between them." He said this smiling
one. The question is that of saving Russia. Is it better to give up
one. The triumph of the ministry was complete. "What passed in Boston,"
one." Jefferson Davis saw in the affair "the invasion of a state by a
ones as he said this. She seemed to be trying to fathom the hidden
ones for the countess."
ones. And also the Abbe Morio. Do you know that profound thinker? He
oneself up or move to another place, because of the crowd. One of
only Broussier had been there at that time and now the whole French
only Nicholas, but even Natasha understood the meaning of his puckered
only Sonya, Nicholas, and Natasha, but even the old countess, who-
only a few dissenting votes, declaring the existence of a state of war
only be attained by conflict, and (3) The attainment of the chief
only because at the broken bridge across that river the calamities
only capable of acting as a model, or, at the most, as a scaffolding for
only discovered accidentally. When the abscess is evacuated, healing
only do we know this ourselves, but Christ, the Son of God, came
only eventually found, like a lost pin, by the skill--and apparently
only five too much, and five was represented by e, the very letter
only got as far as Great Mytishchi. At ten o'clock that evening the
only happy to have had the opportunity of making your acquaintance.
only has no action been taken against the enemy or for the relief of
only heard them splashing through the unseen mud.
only in a mouse of the same variety as that from which the graft was
only in so far as they undergo fatty atrophy from disuse of the limb, or
only in the polling places; and it was marked in secret. The first state
only in the soul of the frightened yet happy and enraptured Natasha,
only in the square, but everywhere--on the slopes and on the roofs. As
only in the thought of him, he was living a real life, seeing new
only interested in the affair with the commissariat officers. On
only just come back! We've been into the French camp."
only make all the mess they can, because they have nothing in their
only now have I understood all the happiness of life. No, I shall
only of what was there on the hilltop, and kept constantly looking
only one respect was the severity of the Democratic policy relaxed. An
only peasants to fight, we should not have let the enemy come so far,"
only saw everywhere the unfamiliar faces of various military men of
only seem worse than previous ones because the battle of Borodino
only separated from the oxygen of the air by a thin layer of epidermis
only spreads along the medulla, but it invades the spongy bone
only suppositions, which seemed important to the younger men but not
only that organized failure, the Democratic party, but all the wandering
only the Mississippi outlet at stake, Jefferson sent his friend, James
only the sum of those wills first tolerated and then destroyed them.
only their special trade problems. In the central labor union, printers,
only to a limited extent; while in osseous ankylosis the joint is
only to convince you of the Gospel truth which has become for me a
only to meet a firm denial by the supporters of the act. Chief Justice
only to tell the truth.
only we abstain from attributing to the activity of the mass aims that
only when, after stepping over the red baize at the entrance, she
only with different species, but in the same species at different times
only, and a quite unexpected, chance of saving the army. On
onset of the pain may follow over-exertion and exposure to cold and wet,
onset, varies with the extent and seat of the injury, and with the
onset. The symptoms of the disease are so characteristic that there is
onto the ice and into the water and oftenest of all among the crowd
onwards) sensation returns and the formation of elastic tissue beneath
ooze and freshness of the pond. He longed to get into that water,
oozing of blood is arrested by packing the cavity for a few minutes with
oozing surface and yields elements that cause coagulation of the blood
open country, but through the village. At one spot he stopped and
open it. Mavra Kuzminichna went to the gate.
open mouth foul-smelling saliva, streaked with blood, escapes; the face
open space visible from both sides and was fought in the simplest
open to the South.... Armed resistance was out of the question. And yet
open waters and that therefore the whole of the North Sea was a military
open, and on the threshold appeared the handsome figure of the
open. There were beds in these rooms and the sick and wounded officers
opened his eye as a miller wakes up when the soporific drone of the
opened his eyes again and stared vacantly into the darkness around
opened the door of their box. The music sounded louder and through the
opened up with the chisel or trephine. In cases attended with
opened, the will and letter will be delivered to the Emperor, and
opening an abscess can scarcely be exaggerated, and the rapidity with
opening and of the opening in the popliteal fascia. Such pouches, being
opening and the patient allowed to stand up, so long as the great
opening in it; a posterior or subscapular group lies along the line of
opening into it. In this way a communication between the artery and the
opening is made in the nail it is apt to be blocked by granulations.
opening of the new century were outstripping the latter in the
opening of the twentieth century neither the hopes of the emancipators
opening of the twentieth century, facilities were provided for more than
opening of the western granary produced momentous results. The
opening prayer to the last motion before the house, every act, every
opening specially made for the purpose. In aseptic wounds the tube may
opening the Mississippi Valley down to the Gulf.
opening up of the wound is almost immediately followed by a fall in the
openings or through an abnormal opening in the parietes, constituting a
openings ultimately fuse and the large adherent greyish-white slough is
openly arrived at; absolute freedom of navigation upon the seas; the
openly avowed his faith in the desirability of occasional popular
opera he described to Dolokhov with the air of a connoisseur the
operate great public works, such as the Panama and Erie canals; to
operating in the North. By 1890 the two orders claimed over three
operating room and at the bedside, that the carrying out of surgical
operating upon bones, the space left between the divided tissues becomes
operating, and then to amputate immediately above the dead part.
operating-room must be warm--not less than 70 o F.--and the patient
operating-table. There is reason to believe that the so-called
operation for cancer of the breast.
operation is required; for example, in disease of the lymph glands for
operation of decapsulation of the kidney a new capsule is formed, and
operation of stitching the ends of the divided nerve after the wound has
operation of the Homestead law passed in 1862. This measure practically
operation or accidental wounds; and the scars resulting from burns,
operation so as to leave the prepatellar anastomosis intact by retaining
operation that the clinical phenomena associated with varix appear. The
operation the silk is again boiled for ten minutes in the same solution,
operation, and, it may be, not till after the skin edges have united.
operation, for example, may be apparently normal except that the wound
operation, is told off to carry out the preliminary purification, and to
operation. The bone is laid open and scraped or resected according to
operation; the ulcer should be excised, and the raw surface covered with
operation; under a local anaesthetic, the ruptured tendon is exposed and
operations and the arrangement of the gardens and completely
operations for un-united fracture. In all of these the marrow is exposed
operations of the resumption act the following year, a revival of
operations on the thyreoid gland, the spasms are of a jerking character,
operations the skin is shaved dry and dehydrated with spirit, after
operations. An operation was looked upon as a last resource, and the
operations. The banks of Louisiana, South Carolina, Georgia, and
operative measures dealing with the sac and the adjacent segment of the
operative treatment is called for. The younger the patient the clearer
operative treatment, although in either case the affected finger is
operator's left hand exerting traction on the skin behind, the hands of
ophthalmia. The tubercle bacillus has rarely been found, but we have
opinion contrary to the general one. Meeting Helene at a ball she
opinion favorable to the American cause. Moreover, they had to combat
opinion of Taney and the dissent of Curtis in Macdonald, _Documentary
opinion of the United States would justify this government in taking
opinion of the country was evidently unsettled and fluctuating. It was
opinion on the subject. Helene with an uneasy smile looked at his
opinion sure to carry him off. But on the seventh day he ate with
opinion was divided. When France fell under the military dominion of
opinion which had that day originated among the higher French
opinion, a bold and eloquent pamphleteer broke in upon the hesitating
opinion, so truly discern the importance of the people's view of the
opinion, so useful to the United States when a combination of powers to
opinion, the people of the country gradually divided into two parties:
opinion, they were unlawful; he forced the Episcopal service upon the
opinion," said she, turning to the young man who, having come quite
opinion. They accepted in 1787 the Ordinance which excluded slavery from
opinions, decided in favor of the proposal. In 1791 the bill
opponent will accept them," said Nesvitski (who like the others
opponents being excluded from the elections. Before these bodies those
opponents, they now dared to repeal the Missouri Compromise. The leader
opportunities of his high office for the promotion of personal ends."
opportunities to fix the problem.
opportunities to fix the problem.
opportunity offered by the outbreak of the war between England and her
opportunity to fight a battle 'on his own hand' as the Germans say. He
opposed in many quarters. People of certain nationalities already in the
opposed the Revolution at all stages.
opposing armies had suffered in the former war from Austerlitz to
opposing batteries of the enemy.
opposing each other, the men disperse, attack singly, run away when
opposing the extension of slavery to the territories. John C. Fremont,
opposite flank, and at the head of them Rostov recognized Napoleon. It
opposite side and blocking the streets and alleys, while endless
opposite wall of the sac, and the pulsation of the aneurysm imparts a
opposite. Pierre spoke little but examined the new faces, and ate a
opposition of ominous strength. The whole gamut of taxation was run.
opposition to a kind of power, the exercise of which in former periods
opposition to the Crown in England, had learned many lessons. Taking a
opposition to the Stamp Act and its accompanying measure, the Quartering
opposition to what was taking place, the lightning of hidden fire
opposition. Weaknesses within, as well as foes from without, started the
oppressed people; had wept over the plumage and neglected the dying
oppression at home. It means the strong arm which has ever been fatal to
oppression by which federal judges, in contempt of the laws of states
opsonic power of the blood. When such means are not available, the
opsonins which act on the bacteria and render them less able to resist
optimism. Far-sighted leaders could see that the tide of democracy was
or "expansion" of the bone results in the cortex being represented by a
or "potato nose" are of the nature of sebaceous adenoma, and are removed
or PGLAF), owns a compilation copyright in the collection of Project
or PGLAF), owns a compilation copyright in the collection of Project
or Philadelphia, skirted the coasts, visited small ports, and sailed up
or Rome, had there occurred in the affairs of a nation a social
or X-rays yield the best results. The effect is soon shown by the
or _purulent_, when suppuration has occurred. The protective effects of
or a 6 per cent. solution of gum acacia, is a useful expedient. The
or a _tingling_ pain; while the implication of a serous membrane such as
or a chance of delay and flight when the longed-for moment comes and
or a commander--as equivalent to the sum of many individual wills;
or a shell burst in the midst of that dense throng, killing some and
or abridged by the United States or any State on account of sex.
or anyone from the staff, he bristled up immediately and grew
or anywhere else, neither Barclay nor the Emperor, neither Pfuel nor
or around them in the thick fog, the Russians exchanged shots with the
or arrest the natural process of repair.
or bacteria. As it passes through a gland the lymph is brought into
or because he had slept through the night, he had crept by day into
or bought under mortgage, to the more irksome wage labor under white
or by law.... The party leader is elected by no one, accountable to no
or cat. The virus appears to be communicated through the saliva of the
or chronicle appeared within the next thirty years or more. Benjamin
or conspiracy in restraint of trade and commerce among the several
or dagger? But that is all the same! 'It is not I but the hand of
or descent of the road the crowds were yet denser and the din of
or disease. The cells of the damaged tissues, under the influence of
or divisions, conquer--that is, kill or take captive--all the
or eloquent in conversation, but he had the faculty, so invaluable
or encounters with the perishing enemy. Dokhturov went to
or even absent. This is also the case when the sac contains a
or even for some hours, and as they pass off the parts become hyperaemic
or even from hour to hour, according to the progress of the case.
or even noticed. Most of the people at that time paid no attention
or even of a breed or any definite color did not seem to trouble the
or even tympanitic. Patches of coppery or purple colour appear on the
or face; or on the mucous membrane of the mouth, nose, or eye. The
or femur; or by a gradual increase in the size of the head,
or fibula of the other limb. In a cellular sarcoma of the humerus of a
or flex the joint completely. In many cases a clear account is given of
or fluctuating, and to assume the characters of a cold abscess. The pus
or for the expression of our theoretical views, but for the happiness,
or for the rest of his life.
or impossible if the parts are matted from former suppuration. If it is
or imprison those who disobey his injunction, the penalty being
or in combination. The condition is observed chiefly in the extremities
or in front of the lateral malleolus; the patient is unable to move the
or in that resulting from the operation--for example, the radial nerve
or in the diseased part. The bandage is only applied for a few hours
or in the soft parts, is much rarer than secondary cancer. Its removal
or inner aspect of the cheek. The child lies prostrated, and from the
or it may spread to the joint from one of the bones.
or kidney disease, these affections must first be treated. Locally, the
or lacerated. The depth of punctured wounds greatly exceeds their width,
or localised foci of tuberculosis may develop in the tissues in which
or make out anything of what was happening: there in the smoke men
or may invade the bursa secondarily. In exceptional cases the
or metal may lodge in the tissues, and favour the occurrence of
or more abscesses in the muscle substance. Repair may be associated with
or more acres, each the seat of a homestead. There was a striking
or more of the bundle is then resected.
or more sinuses, the passage of a probe which strikes bare bone affords
or more years before, may present a slightly raised induration on the
or morphin, by keeping the patient quiet, may prove useful in preventing
or new growth of fibrous tissue, which commences in relation to the
or no pain, but the fingers tend to be stiff and weak, and to become
or nodulated (Figs. 138 and 139). A cartilaginous exostosis in the
or not there is any prospect of the bone straightening naturally. Under
or not with the arrangements. Next to Weyrother sat Count Langeron
or notice either the spring or the sunshine.
or numbness in the leg or foot.
or of chemical affinity, or of the vital force, forms the content of
or of the faradic current over the line of the phrenic nerve, just above
or of the one way of saving Russia. Everything came about
or on both sides, a result of unequal growth between the bones of the
or opium, must be given in large doses. Chloral is perhaps the best, and
or pharynx, oedema of the glottis is a dangerous complication, entailing
or plain--were habitual subjects of jest to those about her. The
or preventing the passage of bacteria and their products into the
or profit under the United States, shall be appointed an elector.[7] The
or prolonged pyrexia becomes a source of danger, the use of hot or cold
or purpose of any man had transferred the contest from the forum to the
or read. But under the influence of wine he said to himself: "It
or retire. An order must be given him at once, that instant. And the
or ruptured. Elongation of the adhesions may be effected by
or saying why he had entered. The most solemn mystery in the world
or short the period of time, however intelligible or
or sleep, grew visibly thinner, coughed, and, as the doctors made them
or so, the symptoms completely disappear. As a rule these attacks are
or spots before the eyes; and rushing, buzzing, or ringing sounds in the
or strip of rubber tissue, is introduced, and the subsequent treatment
or stroma, in which respect a sarcoma resembles the connective tissue of
or such a chicken anywhere. Anisya Fedorovna left the room.
or symmetrical gangrene, is supposed to be due to spasm of the
or tear anyone to pieces, but faced its fate, feeling within it the
or the Russians. Napoleon stopped his horse and again fell into the
or the balance of power in Europe, or a certain kind of European
or the basilar artery, and appears to be more frequently associated with
or the future. It was as if Prince Andrew would have liked to
or the onset of constitutional symptoms, determines the diagnosis of
or the priest's laborer Mikolka.
or the signs of _ischaemia_ may develop; the muscles lose their
or three friends--you among them--and as for the rest I only care
or till the last warrior in our valiant ranks has perished. From
or to arrest the flow of blood through the aneurysm so that the blood
or to die. There is no other way for me," the letter began. Then he
or to the people.
or torn by one of the fragments at the time of the injury, or at a later
or turn be confined to state control, drew the slave system and its
or twice a day according to circumstances. This apparatus acts in the
or two after the operation; this may be done by fixing a large
or two carts. Well, what of it... do what's necessary..." said the
or two inches broad can readily be cut. The patient is given a general
or upper arm, the skin in those regions being pliable and comparatively
or wantonness to inspect the inside of his neighbor's house, may get a
or water-bags, and must be kept absolutely dry. The skin should be
or when suture is impracticable, the artery should be tied above and
or when the war or any general political affairs were discussed on the
or with bone grafts; or the wall of bone on one side of the cavity may
or without melon-seed bodies, or of uniform thickening of the wall of
or without such additional division of the contracted soft parts as will
or, if the granulating surface is flush with the skin, healing may be
or, if torn across, to join the ends after paring the bruised edges. If
or, in the course of a few days when it becomes evident that the
or, it may be, destroyed, by the primary disease, the stress falls on
orators the task of reaching the people in their home towns. Parades,
orbit and conjunctiva, and from the mucous membranes.
orchestra, but shouldn't we get the gypsy singers as well? You
ordained that the Austrian army should maneuver the previous year on
order Natasha knew so well, the deacon brought out a small stool,
order all the superfluous vehicles to be burned, as he had done with
order already prevails in consequence of its activity. The
order and did not leave the battery. He decided to have the guns
order and enable the residents of the city to resume their daily
order for an expensive funeral. The Military Governor of Moscow, who
order had been subverted. To political chaos was added the havoc wrought
order his camp bed to be set up in the glass gallery, another day he
order if you prefer it. I beg you to leave the town and break off
order in the island and "establishing by the free action of the people
order of involvement of the different groups of muscles, it is not
order of the day to the army.
order of the day. Prince Andrew apparently knew this as well as
order that every part of the tumour may be efficiently radiated. If the
order to be written out which the former commander in chief, to
order to hide our shame. We have paid for the right to look at the
order to retreat carries us past the turn to the Kaluga road. And
order to show that they are not at all impatient for their food. The
order to stop and fire the bridge."
order to the contrary, but that if she stayed they would serve her
order. Elections were held under the supervision of American officers,
order. The meeting was a full one. After the usual ceremonies Pierre
order; and strange as it may seem to suppose that the slaughter of
ordered General Zachary Taylor to move beyond the Nueces in defense of
ordered him to occupy all the houses one after another. Pierre, who
ordered his groom to get the horses ready and to call him early in the
ordered the butler who was handing things round. "That's not forbidden
ordered the destruction of sugar plantations and railway connections and
ordered the observance of the rule of neutrality. He declined to act on
ordered the portrait to be carried outside his tent, that the Old
ordered to turn back to the right. Several thousand cavalry crossed in
ordered up after four o'clock. The people did not at once realize
ordering wars, campaigns, and battles, now reflected the restless
orderlies. Much of it true. But when Napoleon asked him whether the
orderly by the shoulders and knocking him against the wall.
orderly officers of the Guard and line regiments, Russian and
orderly, pleased at the importance of the mission entrusted to him,
orderly, running behind the cart and fumbling in the back of it.
orderly. "Has something happened?" he added, surprised at the
orders at home about the preparations for their departure.
orders for the evacuation of Kaluga--a retreat beyond which town
orders had been carried out and in what state were the serfs whom
orders of Vladimir and Anna, and he still filled the quiet and
orders to attack the French. But this adjutant returned half an hour
orders to find and execute the incendiaries. And the scoundrel
orders to the club steward and to the famous Feoktist, the Club's head
orders were to abandon the wounded, many of them dragged themselves
orders), yet the troops marched gaily, as they always do when going
orders, to go against the French, and they shouted something about
orders. Vasilchikov and Platov had already seen the count and
ordinary connective tissue _pari passu_ with the absorption of the fat.
ordinary form of embezzlement or forgery." The time had come, he added,
ordinary forms of commercial glass also may be shown up by the X-rays.
ordinary language as the lowest depth of baseness which every child is
ordinary lupus of the toes or dorsum of the foot, from which the
ordinary times, the more impassioned he became in these moments of
ordnance and those resulting in the course of blasting operations from
organ such as the liver, it may become encapsulated by fibrous tissue,
organic act for Porto Rico, making both houses of the legislature
organism is the _bacillus of malignant oedema_ or _vibrion septique_ of
organism, all having the common character, however, that abundant
organism--commonly the _streptococcus pyogenes_--into the cellular
organism; and the X-rays and radium, combined with the administration of
organismal contamination of the serum or of the apparatus by means of
organisms by swabbing the throat with strong antiseptic solutions, such
organisms get the upper hand and disease results. When the organisms
organisms is increased. On the other hand, there is reason to believe
organization known as the "Noble Order of the Knights of Labor." It was
organization of territorial government in the regions west of Iowa and
organization, appealing directly for the labor vote--namely, the
organization, placing all their stocks in the hands of trustees, among
organizations bound together by the newspapers, the telegraph, and the
organizations sprang up among working women. The mill girls of Lowell,
organizations, among which the Ku Klux Klan and the White Camelia were
organized as one colony in 1663 under the government and patronage of
organized by Benjamin Franklin, reflected the spirit of toleration by
organized capital and organized labor loomed upon the horizon. Their
organized labor might take in the United States. It was, however, soon
organized that same year open resistance to the government of the state.
organized the distribution of goods left behind by the French. The
organized, the male members choosing the pastor, the teachers, and the
organs as the brain or the larynx. They are remarkably amenable to
organs, especially during convalescence from typhoid fever. Like the
organs. Albuminuria, ascites, oedema of the lower limbs, clubbing of the
organs. The disease is more common in certain parts of Australia and in
organs; or the condition may be an involuntary imitation of the symptoms
origin. Its occurrence may be inferred, if in the course of a
origin. This would appear to be the case in many tumours of blood
original number, the French entered Moscow in good marching order.
original settlement of America, so in the opening of the West, great
originated in the days when the king of England was "lord of these
originates from _the sweat glands_, is met with on the scalp and face in
originates, and not infrequently more than one vessel shares in the
originating from the remains of the notochord in the region of the
originating in the bone.
orphan girl. From the point of view of the old countess and of society
osseous foci in the vicinity of joints; but if they are near the surface
osseous tissue derived from the subjacent cancellous spaces.
ossification are met with in muscle as the result of a single or of
ossification, may take on active growth and exhibit the features of a
ossification, throw a dark shadow with the X-rays; unaltered cartilage
ossification. The affected bones lose their rigidity, so that they are
ossifying junction and tapers off along the shaft. The infection not
ossifying junction than in the compact bone of the shaft.
ossifying junctions of the long bones should be examined for areas of
ossifying nucleus in the epiphysis, and the ossifying junction or
osteoblasts in the adjacent marrow and in the deeper layer of the
osteoma_ is really an ossified chondroma, and is met with at the ends of
osteomas and lipomas--which are hereditary in the same sense as
osteomyelitis always originates in the marrow.
osteomyelitis fibrosa, fragilitas ossium, and diseases of the nervous
osteomyelitis resulting from the action of attenuated organisms are the
osteomyelitis. The trabecular framework of the bone undergoes erosion
osteomyelitis_ occur, and are characterised by the formation in the
other Russian columns were moving in the same direction. Every soldier
other Russians who gazed at the French with fear and curiosity, paid
other adjutants, and had taken him to Vienna and given him the more
other answer than the one Prince Andrew gave to this naive question.
other at cabinet meetings, and nothing short of the grave and dignified
other beneath the aponeurosis of the gluteus maximus; the latter is not
other colonies where Andros had been operating, the old course of
other day that we were shedding our blood to obtain the constitutions
other diseases of bone, but may also yield information as to the
other end of the room. She and the countess and Sonya were standing by
other end of the shed was saying, with a strong emphasis on the word
other end of the shed. "So you've come, you rascal? She remembers...
other end of the village. The colonel said that the commander of the
other groom, a daring horseman and keen rider to hounds. Before the
other hand, the disease may show itself clinically as a tumour of bone,
other hand, the glycosuria may diminish or may even disappear after
other he stroked the delicate mustache he had grown, moving his
other infections, and the conditions attending life in tropical
other influences was the cause of an event; but how a book, Le Contrat
other is the passion for destruction.
other mode of ratification may be proposed by the Congress; provided
other of the adjacent bones. In the most severe forms, and especially
other of the contending powers of Europe, the Republicans chose a middle
other of the drugs of which sulphonal, trional, and veronal are
other of the forms of whitlow to be described.
other of the intertarsal joints. It is usually smaller, flatter, and
other of the joint structures with _staphylococci_ or _streptococci_,
other of the joints. The static equilibrium may be disturbed by such
other of the preceding groups, the next question to ask is, In what
other officers. They also composed the voters in the town meeting, where
other part may be inserted in the gap. A new sheath may be provided for
other particular conditions. Beyond Vyazma the French army instead
other parts may be treated by excision or scraping with the sharp spoon.
other parts of the body which give a clue to the nature of the
other persons.[3] The actual enumeration shall be made within three
other political conflicts in American history, not excepting the fateful
other reasons, the number depending on the endless diversity of points
other results in a deviation of the hand or foot to one side.
other side of the question and you will see that your duty, on the
other states to take proper means to preserve their rights and the
other things, the question whether the act establishing the second
other troops in front of him and that the enemy must be at least six
other two. The members of this party, chiefly civilians and to whom
other vessels were to be paid for on the basis of ton for ton.
other wars, produced results wholly unforeseen. In the first place, it
other was already unwinding the band on the second leg. In this way,
other with the Rockefellers. The Vanderbilts are closely allied with the
other, and their final fusion takes place by the further development of
other. The interest, the pecuniary interest of the Northern
other. The possibility of the transformation of a benign into a
others dried up. He called for Taras the gardener, but no one replied.
others in that of Emperor Paul, others again in the new uniforms of
others shrank. It empowered its representatives in the Congress to
others some five times. He entered the room softly. The little
others tens, will have the following significance:
others through contractility of the protoplasm. The great majority
others was a lubricant the wheels of her machine needed to make them
others were recognized. The further the campaign progressed the more
others were the cause of the Russian failures, it is still
others were violations of power. Evidently the explanations
others who carry weights on the shoulder, and may be the seat of
others, united Europe to arm against the disturber of its peace. All
others, while themselves losing four, so that on the one side four and
others, who ran from the entrenchment. They had to hold their noses
others. The patient complains of a burning sensation, but little of
others: the earliest possible payment of the national debt; regulation
otherwise healthy that loose bodies causing the classical symptoms and
otherwise. (3) The connection between cause and effect has no
otkupshchik. The other was the mayor, a man with a thin sallow face
ought not to do. But at the very time he was expressing this
ought to be an order about the prisoners that day. Sokolov, one of the
ought to be hanged--the brigands!..."
ought to have an explanation with Natasha and tell her that the old
our Cossack scouts were moving. Suddenly on the road at the top of the
our Secretary of State was careful to announce: "The United States
our affairs. Is it for my own pleasure that I am at the farm or in the
our army's campfires dimly glowing in the fog, could be seen behind
our days a girl has so much freedom that the pleasure of being courted
our eyes, it suddenly seemed quite clear and obvious to him that the
our friends and poor. Well then, this!" and he tore up the note, and
our grief. Then, at the moment of our loss, these thoughts could not
our history; the date of a new revolution as much needed as the old
our ken, may we discern the sequence of experiences in the lives of
our lines of communication. The battle was fought and thousands were
our lodge. Apart from the fact that he had asked me several times
our most gracious sovereign lord, the Emperor Alexander Pavlovich;
our public schools embraces three distinct treatments of the subject.
our right. Below the height on which the Kiev regiment was
our sovereign and desires the ruin of us all. So I write you
our stories are the stories of men who have been under the enemy's
our troops, where he could never have expected the enemy to be.
ourselves that every bit of it is occasioned by the forward movement
ourselves to the consideration of the local lesion as it occurs in the
ourselves, dear prince," said the little princess (of course, in
out Reading in 1748. Another current of migration was directed by the
out again, then another, and all along the French line on the hill
out against the "rage for speculating in and forestalling of land on the
out alongside, and blew our way, the maid called out 'Fire!' and we
out amid the smoke that screened it. On the sloping descent to the
out among the soldiers, a swelling of the arms, legs, and face,
out and I have no money, so I was going to ask the count..."
out at him from the window.
out before him from the hill, and with his whole soul followed the
out by an expert pathologist. For the purpose he is supplied with from 5
out decrees and orders, communicating the President's lightest wish or
out for itself the best position for a general engagement and found
out from that room and taking Natasha by the arm said something to
out from the hot house carrying in their skirts plums they had plucked
out his hand to the lad.
out in Spain and Italy. The spirit of the conference is reflected in the
out into the hall with a pleasant sense of intimacy with his master
out like cords. "You are mad, I tell you. I won't allow it. The
out like cords. He was knocking the back of his head against the
out of all this, showing all the news we have had of the movements
out of his garden a cow that had trampled down the beds he had
out of over a million and a half; the Free Soil vote of the next
out of temptation she slipped quietly behind one of the columns. In
out of the carriage window and looked back and then forward at the
out of the carts to make room for wounded men whom the count in the
out of the field and vest the ownership and management of municipal
out of the inability or unwillingness of the Venezuelan government to
out of the little bottles and boxes of which Madame Schoss who was
out of the question, "I am in love with your brother once for all and,
out of the room, and then, leaving "God's folk" to finish their tea,
out of the room.
out of the room.
out of the room. Rugay, his back still muddy, came into the room and
out of the sea of mist and on which the Russian troops were moving
out of the state of poverty and dependence into which his servitude
out of the tent. The night was dark and damp, a scarcely perceptible
out of the town past the cathedral on the right, where a service was
out of the town. Other peasants, having heard of their comrades'
out of the window.
out of the yard onto the uneven roadway; the other vehicles jolted
out of your way! Do go somewhere, anywhere... to the devil!" he
out on the stairs. On a banister post stood a tallow candle which
out onto the snow. She was sitting on some bundles a little behind the
out splendidly all the same," he added, winking at Vera.
out such a plan in which the enemy's position was assumed to be known,
out that when the cheaper things not worth taking had nearly all
out the "iron horse" on "iron highways," Slater building spinning mills
out the glad tidings; couriers swiftly carried the news to the uttermost
out the order of the day for tomorrow. And you," he continued,
out the paternal intentions of His Majesty the Emperor and King and to
out the people to use the railways, the steamships, the houses, and the
out the scar, and along with it the ends of the nerves pressed upon.
out the troops to suppress "the Whisky Rebellion." Then the movement
out to the voters by party workers. Any one could tell from the color of
out upon a new course. She imposed taxes upon the colonists, regulated
out whether there was any hay to be had in the villages.
out with antiseptic lotions, is attended with the risk of further
out, and if, as is frequently the case, there is a communication with
out, are even more bewildered than he, and do not say the words they
out, full of well-being and prosperity for all. The European system
out, the concurrence of innumerable circumstances was needed without
out, was due to the bad state of their affairs. Sonya was nearly
out, was the final proof that events had matured. The tightly coiled
out, while under the supervision of the countess and the solicitude of
out-patients the child is kept off its feet by the use of a light wooden
out. He said that Murat was spending the night less than a mile from
out. The constitutional disturbance is severe, the temperature raised,
out; but at the same time he like the soldiers realized all the
outburst of denunciation. The merchants of the seaboard cities took the
outcome, bitterly opposed by some Eastern leaders who feared the triumph
outer angle of the orbit, form rounded, definitely limited tumours over
outer fibrous coat is twisted into a cord which occludes the end of the
outer ledge of the third floor window with his legs hanging out.
outflow goes on more slowly, and the gradually increasing pressure
outlays and the original holders paid the difference; others said that
outlet for British goods and capital, was paralyzed. The heavy debts due
outlet to the sea by the Mississippi was as essential to the pioneers of
outline. Other pathogenic organisms are also present and aid the
outlying regions. A historian of Deseret, as the colony was called by
outposts advanced into the Kentucky country, the strife with the natives
outposts to the uttermost parts of the earth--Europe, Africa, and the
outright by King George presented few problems of management to the
outright to railway companies. These vast grants from the federal
outside and above it and especially in the woods and fields to the
outside the United States.  U.S. laws alone swamp our small staff.
outside the United States.  U.S. laws alone swamp our small staff.
outside the hospital. He seemed to try to forget that old life and was
outside the scar; the prognosis is therefore better than in epithelioma
outside, and flames were visible through the cracks of the shed, but
outside, is known as the _external clot_, while the portion which
outside. The subject of independence was constantly being raised. "Are
outside; for example in sloughing sore-throat, the separation of a
outskirts of the wood ran out of it, the different companies getting
outspoken than ever. His leadership in the party was so widely
outstanding fact of the new. The situation was extraordinary. The
outstanding figures of the modern age, Woodrow Wilson.
outstripped, if measured in mere dollars, the results of railway
outvying everyone else, and was at all the balls and parties of the
outwardly he continued to live in the same old way, inwardly he
oven fell before the cast-iron cooking stove. Happiness and sorrow,
over a bone, is adherent to it. The features of the tertiary ulcer,
over a pillow or sand-bag, or by the method suggested by Macewen, in
over a pole on the ground and had nearly fallen, coming his way. It
over a radius of forty miles all the peasants were moving away and
over all the territory drained by the Ohio River. Having asserted this
over any wound or sinus that may be present. The process of cure takes a
over beamed with irrepressible delight.) "It's in the Emperor's
over by their former bondmen under the tutelage of Republican leaders.
over eight years of age. Henry Moon drew attention to a change in the
over fifty years of age who suffer from glycosuria. The arteries are
over her and about to crush her was some terrible misfortune, the
over his temples, with expressionless face was moving the trunks,
over one hundred millions took the place of the old trust; and the
over the British government's head. This law, failing in its purpose,
over the affected tendon, and a sensation of crepitation or friction
over the anatomical limits of the bursa, and is usually most marked over
over the articular surfaces. This may result in the formation of
over the battlefield had given final orders to strengthen the
over the black field up the hillside. To keep to the road which
over the bleeding point.
over the buttock or sacrum, probably because of their greater
over the calf. There may be one or more ulcers, and also scars of
over the colonies--executive, legislative, and judicial--must all be
over the corona. (2) At the orifice of the prepuce the primary lesion
over the horrible details, but Natasha insisted that he should not
over the labor market which enabled it to break even the strongest trade
over the line of suture in the vessel wall. If infection be excluded,
over the lives and property of citizens, deemed necessary to the
over the opening ceremonies with fine urbanity, thoroughly enjoying the
over the radial side of the forearm.
over the rivers Inn (at Braunau) and Traun (near Linz). On October
over the sacrum, the sacro-iliac joint, or the aponeurosis of the lumbar
over the saddle with a supple youthful movement, stood for a moment in
over the serous cavities--abdomen, thorax, or skull--are, other things
over the skin does not cause the colour to disappear as in ordinary
over the squadron. Rostov raised his saber, ready to strike, but at
over the strings, something seemed to snap.
over the surface, and the ulcer heals. As a rule, the patient suffers
over the tumour becomes thinned and stretched, until finally a slough
over the use of injunctions in labor controversies. An injunction is a
over their admission to the union, "ringing an alarm bell in the night,"
over their heads, and bound them to the post.
over their saddles and turned their horses away. The accountant
over with a layer of coagulated blood and lymph. In the course of a few
over, kissed him silently on the lips, and hurried away.
over," Anna Pavlovna continued. "The sovereigns will not be able to
over-corrected (R. Jones). Murphy advises resection of the radius and
over-growths as are of the nature of simple hypertrophy or local
over-stretched. The prognosis is less favourable in the supra-clavicular
over." And after stumbling a few staggering steps right up to the
overall, and the gloved hands are rinsed in lotion before and at
overalls sterilised by steam. To avoid the risk of infection from dust,
overborne in a long debate. The boundary was fixed, and Michigan, though
overcame the enormous power of Great Britain," a saying of ex-President
overcoat and on foot, stood at the corner of Ilyinka Street,
overcoat, the spectacled doctor came up to Prince Andrew, wiping his
overcome the invading organisms and their products. The chief danger to
overestimated. For many a century the English had employed their fine
overestimated. Victory in the West meant severing the Confederacy and
overgrown horny layer is pared away, and the part painted daily with a
overgrowth may result in the formation of a circumscribed tumour, or may
overgrowth of fibrous tissue of the nature of keloid (p 401).
overgrowth of the fatty fringes of the synovial sheath, a condition
overgrowth of the fringes of the synovial membrane, and may consist
overgrowth of the soft tissues along the edge of the nail. It is most
overgrowth of the surface epithelium, pigmentation, and the formation of
overhead the old familiar cornice with a bit of plaster broken off,
overhear them. The commander in chief listened to what was being
overland transportation difficult and costly, the many rivers and
overlooked. The bounty of a lavish government, for example, made
overlying skin and dilatation of the superficial veins.
overlying skin give rise to fungating ulcers. The treatment consists in
overlying skin is perforated and septic infection is superadded, the
overlying skin is still intact, the best treatment is excision. If the
overlying skin may initiate the curative process.
overlying skin, but movable on the deeper structures. The orifice of the
overlying the artery and transmitting its pulsation.
overpowered by a feeling of desire while stooping over the snuffbox at
overstretching and partial rupture of the fibres of a muscle or its
overthrow the French, and all clamored for action.
overthrowing the aristocracy which George III had manipulated with such
ovoid areas in which the skin is thickened and raised above the surface;
owe it that this barrier was removed. Having satisfied himself that the
owed his position to the quiet and adept management of Jackson rather
owed its first impressive buildings to the civic patriotism of Horace
owed to Northern creditors before the war were overdue and payment was
own condition,--as, for example, during the heat of a battle or in the
own exceptional kindness and extraordinary intelligence, the more so
own fate, a covenant of enduring peace--these were the ideals for which
own feelings. But much as all the rest laughed, talked, and joked,
own governors, blandly forgetting that the English government in which
own habit of ridiculing the Masonic beliefs--"I am afraid I am very
own initiative and without his sovereign's assent, that the Emperor
own lodging, and kept them for some weeks while the old man was
own mud-bespattered breeches. The German landlady, hearing Rostov's
own room. When she heard of his arrival she almost ran into the
own set the Germans called Kutuzov) "is making himself very
own stills. The new revenue law meant that federal officers would now
own story, "is that the sergeant in charge of the cannon which was
own way across the sea. Others bound themselves out for a term of years
own way heartily wished Natasha well. As she was leaving the Rostovs
own, Andrew Jackson, the Hero of New Orleans and President of the United
own, the general's three-cornered hat, and held it, pulling at the
own, without help or guidance. The universal experience of ages,
own--there were many secondary personages accompanying the army
own. The naval officer spoke in a particularly sonorous, musical,
owned by the London Company, was tilled in common by the settlers. No
owned by the city but leased for operation.
owners of the various ranches which were swept into one estate."
owners to corporations. At the end of the nineteenth century, the whole
oxidation of the tissues; and (3) _the liver_, which stores and delivers
oxide of mercury or the dilute nitrate of mercury ointment, and one
oxygen, manure, and plow were made effective--the peasant laborer.
paced angrily up and down the room. What so affected him was Kutuzov's
paced up and down from the border of one patch to another, at the edge
paced up and down the room. He understood what she was weeping
paces away when she saw him, and to her too he was not the Nicholas
paces farther along the edge of the wood stood Mitka, the count's
paces of them, the black figures of hussars, but in the distance was
pacing up and down the drawing room, waiting for the household to
pacing up and down the room, when Natasha, her face distorted by
packed and allowed to heal from the bottom.
packed full and with the horses harnessed, stood at the front door.
packed into the vehicles.
packing industry as stable as the production of cotton or corn, and gave
packing the last of his things. Dolokhov was counting the money and
packing--press on the lid, and made desperate efforts herself.
pad, shaking the hare for the blood to drip off, and anxiously
paid by the state. In determining all questions, each state had one
paid out of funds raised independently. It invited the other colonies,
paid taxes, without reference to the value of their property. Three,
pain and swelling of the joint. In some cases there is sickness, and
pain and tenderness in the gland, which at the same time becomes fixed
pain in the lower limb--sometimes below, sometimes above the knee. This
pain in the part, and the patient becomes pale, cold, and faint. If a
pain is increased, the band has been applied too tightly. The hyperaemia
pain may be obtained by its repetition. The ophthalmic division should
pain shooting up the nerve.
pain, and is chiefly concerned about the disfigurement. Nothing is more
pain, but is in constant terror of its return, and the face wears an
pain, muscular cramp, and weakness of the leg.
pain, which usually radiates to the periphery of the nerve affected.
pain. If the part becomes blue, cold, or painful, or if any existing
painful contact. Everything: a carriage passing rapidly in the street,
painful swelling rapidly appears in the region of the injury, and, where
painful, although tender on pressure. While the swelling often remains
painful, and swollen, the swelling spreading to the dorsum. The
painful, and tender, and suppuration occurs in about one-fourth of the
painfully undecided on the matter himself, eventually left the visitor
pains_ are the result of sudden involuntary movements of the joint. They
painted on the part with a brush. Several paintings are often required
painted over the parts, or a large fly-blister (emplastrum cantharidis)
pair of man's gloves he was to wear at the meetings, and finally of
pairs, are called _diplococci_, of which the bacteria of gonorrhoea and
palatal portions of the upper jaws, the vomer, turbinate, and other
pale and leaned against the wall to keep from falling. To see him,
pale, the pupils dilate, respiration becomes laboured, and although the
pale-blue scarf, the little princess walked twice round her, now
palings surrounding the church. From the words of his comrades who saw
palliated. The patient must be kept absolutely quiet and free from all
palliative measures, or by ligation of the artery above and below the
palliative, as it is obviously impossible to restore to the vessels
palliative. Salicylates are only of service during the exacerbations
palm and dandling him. A blissful bright smile was fixed on the baby's
palm and dorsum of the hand to the ulnar side of a line drawn
palm and the patient is unable to extend it. The treatment consists in
palm, the mushroom, and even the oak, which blossom into full growth
palpable infractions the state is duty bound to interpose its authority
palpated as firm, tender cords. The neighbouring glands, also, are
palpation a peculiar sensation, not unlike the crepitus of fracture.
palpation the bodies moving under the fingers yield a sensation as of
palpitating as he rode forward beside Schmidt with the bullets merrily
pamphlets about women came in increasing numbers from the press. Lydia
pamphlets, broadsides, and newspapers. When the art of printing was
pamphlets, posters, and handbills. Every public forum, from the great
panes were broken, and of the trees in tubs some were overturned and
panic of 1873 checked railway enterprise for a while. With the revival
panting the old man fell into that state of fury in which he sometimes
panting to catch up with his company. A cannon ball, cleaving the air,
paper has come from the Tsar!' so they began looking for him," here
paper money by the colonial legislatures. The new ministry provided a
paper money by the states; it could not intervene to put down domestic
papers and still taking no notice of the special messenger.
papers designed to weld together and advance the interests of particular
papers, joined with the merchants. Aristocratic colonial Whigs, who had
papers, though generally favorable to the Entente Allies, opened their
papers," said one of the nursemaids to Prince Andrew who was sitting
papillary granulations, which are beginning to fill up the cavity. At
papilloma and the adenoma; the malignant, the carcinoma or cancer.
parade... I am the first to apologize, you know me!... He was very
paragraph: "The higher planting class that under the old system gave so
parallel with the surface and used with a short, rapid, sawing movement,
paralysed limbs the growth from the epiphyses is usually little short of
paralysed the knee can be flexed by the sartorius and gracilis. The
paralyses may develop, affecting particularly the nerves of the palatal
paralysis is as complete as if the whole trunk had been cut across. The
paralysis of the deltoid follows upon an injury of the shoulder, it is
paralysis of the interosseous muscles attached to them; the little and
paralysis of the lumbricals; all the fingers are flexed at the
paralysis of the serratus is usually combined with paralysis of the
paralytic symptoms from disease of the cerebral arteries.
paralyzing blows at the scattered bands that constituted the American
paraplegia, which may involve the lower or all four extremities. On the
parasites living at the expense of the organism, multiplying
parchment or thin cardboard; its localisation in the posterior parts of
parchment, but if it invades the cavernous tissue there is a dense mass
pardons for offences against the United States, except in cases of
parent suffers from secondary syphilis the infection is almost
parent tumour may become separated and be carried off in the lymph or
parleys had taken place, came the report of musketry.
parotid tumour." Mucous polypus of the nose, which is often described as
parotid, or the thyreoid.
part beyond; but such cases are rare, as are also those due to the
part depending upon an overgrowth of the skin and subcutaneous cellular
part in open meetings. Here they encountered difficulties. The
part in the action itself and that their activity is exclusively
part in the contest over the Constitution of 1776, were able to force
part in the great game of spoliation now going on." Heavy damages were
part in the retreat but of losing in that retreat all I held dear--not
part is hot and itchy, but the patient does not complain of great pain.
part is then massaged for a few minutes, and the massage is repeated
part like the rest, Dron was made village Elder and overseer of
part of European powers that might easily lead to the temporary or
part of the body, and may not be discovered till the patient is some
part of the body, but are most frequent in the upper part of the leg
part of the body, the most satisfactory method is complete removal, by
part of the body. It also affects parts covered by mucous membrane, such
part of the city passed absolutely into the control of the mob. Not
part of the expenses?" The answer was brief: "That is not the case; the
part of the five years' occupancy required. As the soldiers of the
part of the law of the land. These amendments provided, among other
part of the leg, and is due to interference with the nutrition of the
part of the lymph from the posterior wall of the pharynx, the interior
part of the patient, because the articular surfaces and ligaments are
part of the thigh, the hamstrings are also paralysed. The limb is at
part of the tibia. The superficial position of this last branch and its
part of tongue, and the alae nasi, and from the pre-auricular glands. The
part, and the inflammatory reaction is not only compatible with the
part, but only by the pleasure that just perceptibly lit up her
part, in a sense the most essential part, of the peace settlement
part, or even the whole body when the trunk is affected, in a bath of
part. "The first and great requisite for the restoration of injured
part. The limb may be placed on pillows, or the foot of the bed raised
partial extrusion of the dead bone may cause complications, as when a
participate in pyogenic infections entering through the skin of the toes
participate in the events, and who always combine in such a way that
participated in the existing rebellion," on condition that they take an
particle of matter cannot tell us that it does not feel the law of
particles in the pus confirms the medullary origin of the suppuration.
particles of bone are present also. The presence of fat and bony
particular States and the acceptance of Congress, become the seat of the
particular craft whose interests were clearly the same. To prepare for
particular part of it. The chief thing in his eyes was not the
particularly about the toe-nails and on the scrotum. The treatment
particularly fresh and attractive. The music became more and more
particularly grave symptom. Bullae form on the skin, and the tissues
particularly if the patient is intoxicated when the rupture takes place
particularly if there is no history forthcoming of the entrance of the
particularly in the knee. The fringes, especially when they assume the
particularly on whisky; these they quickly abolished, to the intense
particularly prone to pass into the condition known as callous.
particularly strong in the South and West; and the Farmers' Alliance,
particularly the accessory, the vagus, and the phrenic. The
particularly those along the posterior border of the sterno-mastoid,
particularly westward through the Mohawk Valley. New Jersey was early
parties in America. The followers of Hamilton, now proud of the name
parties, and to place himself at the head of the nation and empire.
parties, the growth of the West, the second war with England, and the
parties. She had quite abandoned the hope of getting married. She
partisan contests of the succeeding decades. This society, which
partitions disappear, and the spaces are thrown into one. The tendon is
partly because of the number of different kinds of endothelium from
partly blocked sebaceous follicle is sometimes visible, and the contents
partly disappear on pressure and when the patient lies down.
partly extended by the interossei and lumbricals. There is also
partly from an increased pain in his head and partly at the unpleasant
partly on the difference in their anatomical structure, and partly on
partner round to her seat, he executed the final pas, raising his soft
partner, fanning herself and smiling over the fan.
partners to Sonya, she did not cease dancing all the evening. She
partnerships and individual owners. The growth of these gigantic
parts are insensitive an anaesthetic is not required. After the ulcer has
parts being protected from the irritant action of the scarlet-red by a
parts of the Bohemian mountains, defending himself against superior
parts of the body or by spread from adjacent tissues, as _secondary_. A
parts of the body, such as the lungs, joints, or muscles.
parts of the body. In this way a _general tuberculosis_ may be set up,
parts of the cord.
parts of the naevus with a fine-pointed thermo-cautery, with the object
parts of the primary lesion, from papules on the skin, or from blisters
parts of the skeleton, but the local development of the disease appears
parts of the tumour, spicules, needles, and plates, often exhibiting a
parts round the joint.
parts without arresting in any way the inflow of arterial blood (Fig. 6).
parts, hard paraffin, sufficient to give the consistence of butter). The
parts, often rough and mountainous, where stood primeval forests of the
parts, or when operative treatment is contra-indicated, the use of
parts, stitch marks may be avoided by approximating the edges with
parts, such as the eyelid or lip, or by fixing parts and preventing the
party gave up the ghost, its sponsors returning to their former
party if the Kansas-Nebraska Bill should pass. At a second meeting a
party kept "alive the passions and resentments of the late civil war to
party loyalty could bridge. As the spokesman of the West, Douglas knew
party of abuses should remain loyal to it and do their work "on the
party, casting aside the old and reputable name of Republican, boldly
party, under the leadership of Lafayette, established, not a republic as
party," ran an appeal to the voters of South Carolina during the
party. The Kaiser, William II, and the Crown Prince were the symbols of
party; but he was no Mugwump. From the first he vehemently preached the
pas une barque de Charon."* There was talk of all the government
pas, mon vieux!"* added he, clapping the scared and silent Gerasim
pass before there is pronounced disability. The earliest symptom is
pass by them, when a soldier came up and took hold of the
pass if only the coachman went to the chemist's in the Arbat and got a
pass it on into the lowest cervical glands and the main lymph trunk.
pass the next session, but kept up their fight on the force laws until
pass the time."
pass through the skin and lodge in the subcutaneous tissue, or may even
passage and will hold her back by force and will and not let the
passage of the sutures.
passage, in German, from the Archduke Ferdinand's letter:
passage-at-arms with Germany over the Monroe Doctrine. This clash grew
passage. From the host's room came the sounds of a child crying, the
passed along the lines and an adjutant ran to look for the missing
passed and the doctor had only been afraid of gangrene. That danger
passed by the fire. One of them stumbled.
passed five stringent measures, known in American history as the five
passed it to the servant and got up. All rose and continuing to talk
passed on July 6, 1898, annexed the islands to the United States and
passed out of power, and the government of the country was intrusted to
passed resolutions on May 16, 1769, declaring that the sole right of
passed so as to surround the bleeding vessel a short distance from its
passed the company, a blue-eyed soldier involuntarily attracted
passed under the direct rule of the crown in 1624, when the charter of
passed, the Pavlograd division was ordered to advance. In Wischau
passengers beyond its own borders. The power of regulating interstate
passengers. In the fourth place, it was understood that a belligerent
passengers. The application of these measures, however, was limited
passing along the motor nerves are unaffected.
passing at foot pace all the soldiers' remarks related to the two
passing in a pair of dressing forceps and expanding the blades. A tube,
passing now between himself and that lofty infinite sky with the
passing through the parts, as a result of arterio-sclerosis or other
passing years, until at last the final collision between the two ideals
passion and stifles truth. On the one hand there is fear and regret
passion but in your own heart. The source of blessedness is not
passion for the presidency, and, to reach his goal, it was necessary to
passion, shouting: "Arnauts!" ("Arnauts" was the Tsarevich's
passion," said the latter.
passionately in love, left at the beginning of January to rejoin his
passionately repents. I will do all I can to arrange the match between
passions at headquarters. For the Pavlograd hussars, however, the
passions within the limits of virtue. Our order should provide means
passive movements are employed. The reaction of degeneration can rarely
passive movements of the limb--the hip being flexed while the knee is
passive movements, and the use of the galvanic current. When deformity
past has added so much to the wealth, the development of resources, and
past him in the darkness. He was continually imagining that a cannon
past him with bags and charges. The guns of that battery were being
past the count, and it was with this that Daniel's voice was heard
past them. From the left, over fields and bushes, those large balls of
paste. If the purification is considered satisfactory the wound may be
pastilles. The room was crowded with small pieces of furniture,
patch of skin, present at or appearing shortly after birth. The colour
patch, also asked them to dinner. Sometimes on his way back from the
patches and condylomata of the secondary period. It is best stained by
patches and ulcers, the sore throat may be characterised by a bluish
patches of leucoplakia on the tongue, cheek, or palate.
patches, ran in to meet the visitors, treading heavily, and vainly
patella, and that between the aponeurosis of the gluteus maximus and the
path of the French. All the artful maneuvers suggested by our generals
path was not blocked, it could not carry across the frontier more than
pathetic face brightly lit up by the blaze, he felt a painful prick at
pathetic importance of these last moments of meeting between the
pathogenic organisms, and occurs in the tissues in the form of small,
pathological changes are the same as in infantile rickets, but are for
pathological conditions, are associated with an increase in the number
pathological fracture is a frequent result. The small round-celled
pathological varieties, but as the walls of the artery are not diseased,
patience and time, they will do it all. But the advisers n'entendent
patience. Nastasya Ivanovna the buffoon sat with a sad face at the
patient almost loses the use of it; in some cases this would appear to
patient becomes pale and anaemic, the temperature may rise to 102 o or
patient breaks into a profuse sweat. The temperature may fall several
patient complains of persistent aching and stiffness over the buttock,
patient dies with symptoms of diabetic coma within a few days of the
patient does not raise the heel from the ground in walking, it is
patient experiences a feeling of stiffness and tightness throughout the
patient has taken a toxic dose of the drug; they are clonic in
patient is aware of the displacement taking place, and is unable to
patient is examined in the upright posture. In advanced cases, bead-like
patient is ill and feverish, and the pain may be so severe as to prevent
patient is in a negative phase, as a certain amount of the opsonin in
patient is unable to dorsiflex the foot and cannot lift his toes off the
patient liable to serious haemorrhage from even the most trivial
patient looks ill, and is either unable to sleep or the sleep is
patient may become delirious, especially during the night. Leucocytosis
patient may walk fairly well. On grasping the joint while it is being
patient may with benefit rest the limb in an elevated position for a few
patient must also be taken into account; the bread-winner, under
patient occupies, is usually sufficient to suggest the diagnosis of
patient referring all the symptoms to the joint.
patient sleeps, the hallucinations and tremors cease, and he gradually
patient suddenly manifests toxic symptoms of the nature of profound
patient to enter one of the public services, even although no symptoms
patient, if necessary, being held up by the heels. All tight clothing,
patient, mountain air or that of the sea coast may be preferred. In view
patient. On account of the extreme restlessness, there is often great
patient. That the area of tenderness corresponds to the area of
patient. The appetite is lost; there may be sickness and vomiting and
patient. The toxins interfere with the nerve-centres in the medulla that
patients in the tertiary stage of syphilis are inoculated with the virus
patients who are not extremely debilitated the slough may be excised,
patients, and are largely due to disuse of the limb; they are recovered
patriotic hatred of the French.
patriotism alone does not make it immortal. Neither does the vigor of
patriotism of the Russian people. Another general stood in a martial
patrol of French Uhlans appeared from round the corner. The Uhlans
patronage at the dancers.
patronage but stood on an equal footing with the highest of those of
patronizing talent and virtue: raising worthy men from the dust and
patted Berg on the shoulder, and with parental authority superintended
patted his favorite, Rostov, on the shoulder.
patted the little girl with his white hand and kissed her. And that
patting Pierre on the shoulder. "What a thing to say!" he exclaimed.
paunch resting against the other which was doubled under him. He
paused. "I am going because the life I am leading here does not suit
pausing, went into the study, giving instructions to his adjutant as
paw into the narrow neck of a jug, and having seized a handful of nuts
pay for the whole?"
pay the tax. In Pennsylvania, some of them sacked and burned the houses
pay, had not softened their disposition but had on the contrary
paying a tax. This, responded Napoleon, was the height of insolence, and
paying no attention to the varying quality of the pasturage in
paying such honor to Bagration was the best way of expressing
payment of debts, or to impair the obligation of contracts. Men heavily
payment of twenty million dollars to Spain by the United States for the
peace nor war, neither an advance nor a defensive camp at the Drissa
peace of Europe may be overthrown by the angel whom it has pleased the
peace such lofty notions of executive prerogative. The entire body of
peace with Mexico contained the promise of at least three more. Thus, as
peace, George III acknowledged the independence of the United States.
peace, and prosperity of the people of the Philippine Islands." Nothing
peace, and that the Minister should command the army, does not love
peace," runs the preamble to the labor section of the treaty, "and such
peace. In the treaty drawn at the close of the war the first part was a
peaceful occupations, the cavalry feeding the horses and the
peaks to the sides and, holding his gloves in his hand and walking
pearls and coiffure, and admired the beauty of the shoulders and the
pearls. While Natasha was fixing her gaze on her for the second time
peasant carts in your yard. Please let me have one, I will pay the man
peasant coat, the pistol, and his announcement to the Rostovs that
peasant sees the devil in the locomotive; others as a force
peasant's coat. He grasped a musket and took aim at the French.
peasants Karp and Vlas (who after the French had evacuated Moscow
peasants and Dron the village elder, and mentally applying to them the
peasants in the steppe region round Bogucharovo were, it was
peasants that the unfolding of the oak buds is the cause of the cold
peasants--streamed into Moscow as blood flows to the heart.
pecked the grains that fell. Some crows, scenting blood, flew among
pectoralis minor, along the medial side of the axillary vein, and an
peculiar to each are present in greater or less degree. In the limbs
peculiar to the host. Many bacteria have only the power of living upon
peculiarities. Thus, in virtue of the size and character of the cells,
pedunculated, and so acquire a limited range of movement. The pedicle
pedunculated, this is comparatively easy. When a bone, such as the
peering into the darkness.
peg on which to hang the prince's favorite topic, he looked
pelvis or in the buttock, and is sometimes associated with disease of
pelvis perforates the wall of the urinary bladder.
pelvis, the lumbar spine, and the hip-joints.
pelvis, there is usually great enlargement of the bones, and when
penetrate into the cutting and there it was cold and damp, but above
penetrate to the essence of any historic event--which lies in the
penis at or close to the site of his original sore. This relapsed
penis has been amputated and the urine has infiltrated the scrotal
pennies and dollars of the masses as well as the thousands of the rich
pensions for widows, the control of housing in the cities--these and a
people Pierre knew as the meekest and quietest of men walked away
people and of being worried by the curiosity of officers and
people and the privileges of citizens. In the autumn of 1791, Louis XVI
people are saying," said some of the mob pointing to the tall youth.
people argued that American citizens had been duly warned of the danger
people at the Three Hills to fight the French and now, to get rid of
people at the ball.
people awaited the enemy unconcernedly, did not riot or become excited
people away and not leave them with the enemy, and there is an order
people but to the home. She waited on the old countess, petted and
people conceived by the bankers of the world. Moreover, they went on,
people crowded in front of the conflagration. In the middle of the
people each might hope for help from his fellows and the definite
people feel at the approach of those in authority. The prisoners
people fill the vacancies by election as the legislature may direct.
people had been inclined to avoid him. Now a smile at the joy of
people had come to see him that evening: the secretary of a committee,
people had produced nearly half a billion dollars in wealth since the
people he is connected with and the more power he has over others, the
people in one great political body. "However various may be the tribes
people in the East, would fall mainly upon the beneficiaries of
people is transferred to the rulers conditionally, under definite
people learning self-reliance and self-government. The attempts to
people of the United States, the resources of the country were first
people of the capital--that the Emperor should leave the army.
people of the place and that he might now be lying, recovering or
people really had made the house stuffy.
people sat with the old, the young with the young, and the hostess
people that had formed in France unites into one group with the
people to historic persons may perhaps explain much in the domain of
people's inclinations, allurement by the grandeur of the preparations,
people's will, but as results of the ill-directed will of one or
people, Cossacks, and a traveling carriage of the Governor's. At the
people, and the sight of the swaying smoke, now gathering into thick
people, reviews were constantly held and rewards distributed. The
people, the occurrence of thrombosis leads to cure of the condition by
people, who were all pressing toward the one spot, could sighs,
people," like Andrew Jackson, it was intolerable, all the more so
people," was the most significant feature of the eighteenth century. The
people. He was interrupted several times by applause. When the
people. In regard to the migration of the peoples it does not enter
people. The lady who, afraid of being stopped by Count Rostopchin's
people. Yet the agitation undoubtedly ran deeper than the ballot box.
people... Aren't they afraid of sinning?..." said the same mob now,
people: the activity of the leaders represents the activity of the
people; and answerable to the people. The people of the United States
people; and looking at the footmen, who were bringing in silver and
people; but the power of picking candidates for their approval passed
peoples of Central Europe. The strength of the justification of the
per cent., and the amount injected about 2 c.c.; a general, or
percolating through sand--spread irresistibly through the city in
percussing over _growing_ axis cylinders. Tapping over the proximal end
percussion, or by compressing the bone between the fingers and thumb.
perfect composure, waiting for a display of the eccentricities his
perfect one's self. And to attain this end, we have the light called
perfect restitution to the normal. More complex structures, on the other
perfect rule for the direction and government of all men."
perfect, adhesions forming between the opposing surfaces.
perfection, and in the possibility of active brotherly love among men,
perfectly rational and virtuous man. Had Speranski sprung from the
perfectly regular, and are characteristic in that they remain the same
perfectly silent. His bosom seemed to inhale not air but the
perfectly well until the spasms begin. If careful observations be made,
perforate the wall of a vein or other important structure. Any debris
perforated and a cold abscess, often much larger than the gland from
perforated in many places and the solid organs lacerated.
perforates the fibrous layer of the periosteum, invading and infecting
perforates the muscle. The deep cervical glands are commonly infected by
perforation of the nerve-trunk. One of the most constant symptoms is the
perforations often occur through the skin, and a thin, watery discharge,
perform any forward pushing movements; on attempting either of these the
perform pushing movements below the level of the shoulder. If the
perform the noblest role on earth, and he is so virtuous and noble
performance of the action and our judgment of it.
performances, instructed our minister at Madrid to warn the Spanish
performed some distance above the torn tissues, as there is considerable
performed sufficiently high to ensure a free vascular supply to the
performed this operation with cure of the aneurysm on thirty-nine
performing the action the less they can command and the more
perfume, and the creaking of her corset as she moved. He did not see
perhaps, the most discordant. The presence of the enemy allays the most
peri-articular tissues, resulting from colloid degeneration of the
perineum, fistulae frequently complicate stricture of the urethra.
period during which the band is kept on each day is diminished; but the
period of the campaign that the historians tell us how Miloradovich
period of the early skin eruptions. The patient complains, especially at
period opened with successes for the British. They captured Savannah,
period than others. Those at the knee, for example, contribute more to
period that the contractions persist. Opinions vary as to the
period, have passed, and my resolution is firmer than ever. If the
period. The granulation tissue frequently forms a definite swelling or
periods in the life of nations during which various powers arise
periods of days or weeks during which the symptoms abate, but as the
periods without further change. It is possible that the tuberculous
periods--for example, during the treatment of fractures of the leg or
periosteal gumma breaks down and invades the skin, a syphilitic ulcer is
periosteum by tubercle bacilli conveyed through the arteries; it is
periosteum gives way, and an abscess forms in the soft parts; and if
periosteum may be localised and result in the formation of a
periosteum of the long bones, the diploe of the skull, the pelvis,
periosteum on the graft is not essential, but, by favouring the
periosteum, and at first form a projection on the surface, but later
periosteum, so that in time the bone is increased in girth, and is said
periosteum. The shaft of a long bone may be reproduced after having been
periosteum; and _growth fever_, in which the child complains of vague
peripheral capillaries--reversal of the circulation--but the clinical
peripheral segment, in which, however, the new axis cylinders do not
periphery of the colony are elongated, pear-shaped, hyaline, _club-like
perish! Sooner be our name blotted out from the record of nations!"
perish. Do they think we're dogs?" voices in the crowd were heard
perished in the fire, and demanded relief. And Count Rostopchin
perishes, the French when they left Moscow had inevitably to perish
peritendinous and perimuscular cellular tissue which is subject to the
peritoneum from off the iliac fossa (extra-peritoneal operation), or by
peritoneum, the intestine, the kidney, prostate and testis, and in the
permanent alliances with any portion of the foreign world.... Taking
permanent changes easily recognised on examination with the
permanent hospital and arrangements would be made for the sick, and
permanent one, for at any subsequent period, if the part affected is
permanent peace in the island--these were the grounds for action that
permanent teeth, they are not available for diagnosis until the child is
permanently altered in shape, the frontal and parietal eminences
permanently occludes the vessel as above described. The ligature and the
permanganate of potash rubbed into the wound until it is black, or
permeation has spread thus far. He claims support for the permeation
permission of the copyright holder found at the beginning of this work.
permission of the copyright holder found at the beginning of this work.
permission, after the blow she had received, to remain for a few weeks
permission. Yet all the same this information astonished and irritated
permit of dislocating the joint, are specially to be recommended, as
permit of the limb being placed in the attitude desired.
permitted Confederate cruisers, including the famous _Alabama_, built in
permitted a certain percentage of the voters to compel any officer, at
permitted to anybody now a days!" shouted the publican, picking up his
permitted to swim the river with his Uhlans instead of seeking a ford.
permitted to take part in elections. By this act in the name of the
permitted to vote. Madison replied that the state legislatures, which
permutations. In all these plottings the subject of intrigue was
peroxide of hydrogen applied with the object of destroying the poison by
perpetual peace and the abolition of war, and secondly, by the fact
perplexity to the unfamiliar Polish accent and not realizing that
perplexity. The countess and Sonya cried from pity for Natasha and
persist because of the presence of tuberculous tissue in its wall, and
persist in the body for a long time after infection; its presence has
persistence may become serious. It takes place into the superficial
persistent than the roseoles. They vary in size and distribution, being
persists as long as any active tubercle remains in the tissues, and is
person of Moses Austin of Connecticut, hearing of this good news in the
person of life, liberty or property without due process of law." The
person to the War Department in the dead of night to take counsel with
person who used "abusive language about the government or institutions
person), were Nicholas and Sonya, the niece. Sonya was a slender
person, but for permission to serve in the army.
personage than James G. Blaine. The difficulty, however, lay in
personages who, in their opinion, caused what they describe as the
personal activity of any soldier, merely coincided with the laws
personal interests of the moment so much transcend the general
personal interview was refused, and instead of the Sovereign, Prince
personal property--jewels, money, furniture, and the like--became her
personal property; they had repealed the charter of an endowed college
personal responsibility they had all come to the governor to ask how
personal will to it. The hatred and contempt of the crowd punish
personalities, and the less was it possible to arrive at any general
personally insulted. Barclay de Tolly tried to command the army in the
personally it would be a pleasure to hand over the supreme command
personally, but the project will speak for itself."
personally, constant control over the colonies was exercised by royal
persons accused of crimes or trial beyond the seas, and beseeching the
persons accused of murder in connection with the enforcement of the law.
persons in each State, excluding Indians not taxed. But when the right
persons in the town.
persons is merely a paraphrase--a restatement of the question in other
persons rather than the powers of government. Thus he became the
persons suffering from syphilitic lesions of the mouth also contains the
persons who fall into the fire. Large blood vessels, nerve-trunks,
persons with the masses.
perspiring and stained with blood and powder. The cannon balls flew
perspiring faces of the crew bustling round the guns, from the sight
persuade the countess to get away as quickly as possible, she would
persuaded to accept the unequivocal indorsement of the gold standard
petitioning their government to aid the South by breaking the blockade.
petitions, memorials, and addresses respecting the plantations. In 1696
petty events, such for instance as all those which led the French
petulantly exclaimed that the United States was "a brigand
peuples*--as Alexander expressed it in the last letter he wrote him-
phagedaena occurs, the prepuce must be slit open along the dorsum, or if
phalanges and metacarpal bones. When growing in the interior of a bone
pharyngeal lymphoid tissue and tonsils, and by way of the lymph vessels
pharynx or larynx and the associated lymph glands in the neck, and be
pharynx to the nasal cavities, causing blocking of the nares, with a
phase by making both houses elective. Thus, by the steady pursuit of a
phase, the war was confined mainly to the North. The outstanding
phases--the first lasting until the treaty of alliance with France, in
phenomenon, or to say that the will of many men is expressed by the
philanthropy is all very well of course. The aim is excellent but in
philanthropy, in Freemasonry, in the dissipations of town life, in
philosophers, and poets). Secondly, it is assumed that the goal toward
phlebitis of the transverse sinus.
photographs show enlargement of the bone, the periosteum being raised
photographs. The curving of the long bones, which is such a striking
phrase "Project Gutenberg" appears, or with which the phrase "Project
phrase "Project Gutenberg" appears, or with which the phrase "Project
phrase, "the children of tender years," followed as a matter of course.
phrase--the system they call 'invisible government.' For I don't know
phrase: "Born and educated in this country, I glory in the name of
physical and mental condition of the men, the facilities for affording
physical fatigue far better than many very muscular men, and on the
physical weariness of his aged body and of the necessity of physical
physically it is those who submit to the power. But as the moral
physician of the Queen of Spain had prescribed small doses of a
physiological conditions of the tissues which attend upon advancing
physiological, psychological, and historical causes of the action, and
picked up the scrap of a grenade that had killed an aide-de-camp
picket line--the officers had been unable to keep sight-seers away.
pictures had been taken down. There were trunks in the rooms, and hay,
pictures that caught and held the attention of millions of readers.
picturesque than the other; the serfs everywhere seemed thriving and
picturesqueness of the chimney stacks and tumble-down walls of the
picturing fearlessly the political rings and machines which dominated
piece of gauze kept in position by drawing the prepuce over it, or by a
pieces, after which the wound rapidly heals and resumes a normal
piercing yelp, fell with its head on the ground, bleeding from a
piety and virtue, and thereby try with all our might to combat the
pigment may be present in the urine. When recurrence takes place in or
pigment throughout the tissues. There is no putrefaction, and therefore
pigment; on its surface, and in parts of the articular cartilage, there
pigmentation of the skin and with multiple tumours of the nerve-trunks.
pigmentation of the skin is seen on the front of the legs of women from
pigmentation of the skin of the face, neck, and trunk, similar to those
pigmentation of the skin.
pigmented mole which has been subjected to irritation. The primary
pilgrims who visited her without the prince's knowledge. The longer
pilgrims, gave him her most radiant looks, but even the one-year-old
pillars and drove up the avenue leading to the house as if he were
pillows each smaller than the one below. Natasha jumped on it, sank
pillows. His hands were symmetrically placed on the green silk
pinched, but could see nothing except the people about him.
pineapple ice. Before the ices, champagne was served round. The band
pink or salmon colour from the formation in it of new blood vessels. The
pinkish-white, fleshy appearance, resembling the slowly growing forms of
pint of saline solution should be introduced into the rectum, and 10 to
pioneering in the Northwest and on the middle border. As the long
pioneers of English and Scotch-Irish descent, the latter in great
pioneers of Kentucky to action a generation earlier. The uncertainty as
pioneers of the Northwest Territory a hundred years before, they carried
pioneers were swarming over the country. Farmers from the adjoining
pioneers who first opened the country. The discovery of gold in
pistol and, instead of firing it, flung it at the Frenchman and ran
pistols of the "toy" order. These injuries will be described with
pistols. He rode up to Kirsten. The staff captain on his broad-backed,
piteously, and his moaning sounded terrible in the darkness of the
pitied the grief felt by the subjects he was abandoning, latterly,
pitied. She has no one, no one. To tell the truth, I don't need her,
pitiful groans from all sides and the torturing pain in his thigh,
pitted, grooved, and worm-eaten appearance, except on the periosteal
pity her and how could he speak like that in her presence? The only
pity the miserable man who stood before him, but the task he had begun
place a mile and a half from the house.)
place among the great American state papers; and when Lincoln of
place arranged near the watchman's hut in the forest, and told the
place at the periphery. Along the line of the junction between the
place because the commanders not merely all recognized the position to
place before them. From the tents came now loud angry cries and now
place by the time the primary lesion has acquired its characteristic
place for the spokesmen of the two warring powers. Roosevelt presided
place in agriculture. Until 1860 the chief staples sold by America were
place in consequence of the increased average duration of life; a larger
place in the North. Its signs were gigantic factories, huge aggregations
place lay in the personal struggle between himself and Alexander.)
place of democracy; the tariff breeds trusts; let us destroy therefore
place of party conflicts, the congressional caucus selected as the
place than that in which the two Houses shall be sitting.
place the man's action occupies in time. That is the ground which
place the right of suffrage. This is the best general standard which can
place through the belly of a muscle, the ends retract, the amount of
place towards the side on which the wound of infection exists. Less
place unequally, and may go on more rapidly in one half of the disc than
place until the dead bone is removed, and the usefulness of the finger
place without the formation of a haematoma as the arterial blood finds
place your money on the cards or I may get muddled in the reckoning."
place! We passed close to the park and saw two deer... and what a
place, and in the process toxins are formed by the organisms, a certain
place, immediately under the icons, sat Barclay de Tolly, his high
place, it put the new banking system under the control of a federal
place, leaving a dull-red surface, over which in the course of several
place, moreover, among the wisest and weightiest treatises on government
place, the House of Lords was composed mainly of hereditary nobles whose
place, titles to lands bought by individuals remained uncertain in the
place. A splinter driven underneath the nail causes great pain, and if
place. By the use of specially strong clamps, such as the angiotribes of
place. In some cases the passage of masses of free cocci in the
placed by historians among the fifteen decisive battles of the world,
placed his hand on the gate as if to leave.
placed if only to let us close the shop...."
placed in the hair, the hair combed up, and the blue scarf arranged
placed in the sitting posture so as to empty the veins, and, instead of
placed on the Moscow nobility. He was answered by a voice which
placed on the use of autogenous vaccines.
placed our forces at the disposal of General Foch, commander-in-chief of
placed the paper money on a gold basis. Within twenty years silver was
places and new people that interested him. The more interesting his
places of power and responsibility." They alleged that the Republican
places purchased by the consent of the legislature of the State in which
places the farmers from the countryside learned of British policies and
places. The hussars began carefully aligning their horses. Silence
placid temperament, being also upset by all the delay, confusion,
placing himself before the icon he began to say his evening prayers.
placing it in the attitude of greatest ease; they also disappear under
placing the hand over the swelling, and a blowing, systolic murmur may
plain occupied by the Prince d'Eckmuhl will open fire on the
plain that the commander admired his regiment, rejoiced in it, and
plain that the enemy was everywhere in flight and that there could and
plain we may make to ourselves the connection between the man and
plainly say that the campaign of 1812 and other things they do not
plainly visible as if but a stone's throw away, and the movements of
plait, sighed, and went on her short, bare feet along the path. Pierre
plait, was pulling it straight and sniffing at her singed hair. The
plaiting slippers out of cloth selvedges. He looked up at the
plan was adopted to lure Napoleon into the depths of Russia, and
plan, were already up and astir. The smoke of the campfires, into
planks were clear and specific: the abolition of imprisonment for debt,
planks, beams, and battens, and led him into one of them. In the
planning in every part of the varied activity that finally crowned
plans made by the engineers. Having the towns ready and railway and
plans to Kutuzov's quarters where the council of war was to be held.
plant. For these reasons, the Federation declared company unions and
plantation while the General was at the front and went north to face the
plantations had once stood. The skilled freedmen turned to agriculture
plantations in European markets, and navigation acts might confine the
plantations in such a way as to foster the commercial and business
plantations to Europe. "If the Northern states will consult their
planted, should run to the gate and hit the cow on the head. The
planters and manufacturers. Accordingly lines were flung down along the
planters of the West and South were heavily in debt to the East for
planters, finding a market at the neighboring mills, began to look
planters, keepers of lonely posts on the plain and the desert, stage
planters. The tariff by creating a home market and increasing
planting system which had direct commercial relations with the North and
planting system, reasserted itself. Before these forces the plantation
planting. Slavery kept out the white immigrants who might have supplied
plants in the city itself. This idea was extensively applied to electric
plashed against something. The Cossacks and Dolokhov galloped after
plaster of Paris. As a result of this uratic infiltration, the cartilage
plates, knives, and glasses mingled with the animated hum of several
plates. In some cases it is not necessary to remove the bullet.
platform of 1860 characterized the dogma that the Constitution carried
plaudits of his countrymen did not set at rest all the political turmoil
play the most important part in producing tissue necrosis, their
played "Uncle" once more, running his fingers skillfully over the
played a game of boston, and at night she had the newspapers or a
played an important part in the strategy of all those who sought to
played continually round the two corners of the mouth; this,
played its own part, and before it had finished the melody merged with
played the piece over again. Anisya Fedorovna's smiling face
played with the hair of the bared heads and with the ribbons
player, in spite of the burden of his equipment, rushed out to the
playing at blindman's buff with the pursuing army. At the Berezina
playing boston at the clubs. With an incessant hum of voices the crowd
playing the part of a doctor who hinders by his medicines--a role he
playing with the ball of worsted as a kitten should.
plays a part in determining the local death.
plea of sorting the deceased's books and papers, only in search of
pleasant face, drew her chair nearer to that of the countess.
pleasant smell. I have the honor to be one of your wife's adorers.
pleasant with the invigorating freshness of the morning frost still in
pleasant, refined ways, and the state of dove-like purity she was
pleasantly. Every visitor who came to the house paid his tribute to
please him. The result of that battle had been deplorable. Napoleon
please, but I say definitely that you must let me enter the army,
pleased!" And he held out his hand to the captain.
pleasing little blonde, the wife of one of the provincial officials.
pleasing task for a sympathetic President, the protection of American
pleasurable and exhilarating effect on Rostov than the previous sounds
pleasure a piece of bread with some tea, and the doctor noticed that
pleasure that for the first time since his arrival Prince Andrew was
pleasure to him, and he thought of the horse, of the morning, of the
pleasure was based as much on the fact that the news had arrived on
pleasure), the footmen began popping corks and filling the champagne
pleasure," he solemnly urged in his speech against the writs of
pleasures and advantages of service under members of the Imperial
pleura, and bronchial tubes, or the brain, the disease is not amenable
pleura. Rupture may take place externally, into the shoulder-joint, or
pleurisy--especially in burns of the thorax; or meningitis and
plight of the French or because of it, they wished to punish the floor
plight. To maintain the gold reserve, President Cleveland felt compelled
plows, and machinery. Nearly all the goods which they bought in Europe
plug is introduced, the walls of the cavity consist of raw tissue with
plum trees had been torn off with the fruit. An old peasant whom
plume, till the general asked him to restore it. All his
plumes flowing and his gems and gold lace glittering in the bright
plump white hands deftly took from it the bottles and various hors
plump white hands--the fate of Russia. Prince Andrew was struck by the
plunder were stopped by the authorities and made to cart the corpses
plundered it in their turn. They continued what the French had
plundering by the Russians, with which the reoccupation of the city
plunge him into the depths of unknown and undefined misery. That could
plunging, swaying gait into the crowd and stopped behind the priest.
pneumococcus of Fraenkel, are being met with in increasing numbers. The
pneumonia which is prone to follow on severe operations in the mouth and
pneumonia, but in a number of instances, especially among children, the
pneumonia--_Fraenkel's pneumococcus_ (one of the diplococci) (Fig. 5)
poetic atmosphere of love which pervaded the Rostov household that
poetic world and the look she felt upon her made that world still more
poetry. But just as doubts of the real value of paper money arise
point in the history of the country. More revenue was absolutely
point is that this opinion was widely held in the South and with the
point of entrance of the current are charred to a greater or lesser
point. Ask Denisov whether it is not out of the question for a cadet
point. Why was he in the yard of a burning house where witnesses had
pointed halfway down his chest) "and go and eat potatoes with the
pointed in one direction. Even the Prohibitionists, who in 1872 started
pointed out the national character of the union, and announced his
pointed sharply to the right, far away in the broken ground--"That's
pointed to the assistant), "keep on here. Some five of us doctors have
pointed to the girls--"tomorrow I'll take them first to the Iberian
pointing at a soldier in the ranks of the third company in a greatcoat
pointing out the French to the cavalry.
pointing over the earthwork.
pointing to his shoulders, tried to impress on the soldiers the fact
pointing to the Cossack.
pointing to the broken sealing wax and pens.
pointing to the fichu with a happy and kindly smile.
pointing to the flying soldiers; but at that instant, as if to
pointing to the windows of the house that gleamed invitingly in the
points along the coast and gave ready access to the American centers of
points are often well illustrated in cases of black eye, where the blood
points may excite a paroxysm. In typical cases the patient is unable to
points of attachment to the skeleton, and are known as false exostoses;
points; this is notably the case in the lower extremity after ligation
poisoning resulting from the absorption into the blood of the toxic
poisoning_, for example, the spasms come on immediately after the
poisonous products from the tumour. The patient loses appetite, becomes
pole of a galvanic battery is attached to the wire, and the negative
pole placed over the patient's back. A current, varying in strength from
police. Neither could the architect Michael Ivanovich, who on being
policies and conduct of their leaders. In 1872, the dissenters, calling
policies as injurious to the planting interests.
policies were united with domestic issues to make up the warp and woof
policies, it was clear that the West was to have the candidates. This
policies. In October they indorsed Mr. La Follette as "the logical
policy of England was both moderate and liberal. Furthermore, the
policy of the United States to maintain the two metals on a parity with
policy the opportunity of securing free homesteads in the West. The
policy written into the Navigation Acts.
policy, he strengthened the hold of the United States upon the
policy." In that very year Congress, recognizing the importance of the
poliomyelitis, or injury of the spinal cord or nerve-trunks.
political and social topics were ended and the time had come for
political debate. In 1800 the Federalists were utterly vanquished by the
political dissensions arose, and by 1872 the experiment had come to an
political enfranchisement the leading issue. Rather did it emphasize the
political independence of all the associated nations. They were to
political issues or political parties. On the contrary, from time to
political parties appeared full armed upon the scene: the Federalists
political parties to endorse and carry through Congress the federal
political persuasion," to use the current phrase.
political philosophy, and the arts of war, government, and diplomacy
political power at Washington. "By the aid of various associated
political principles and passed on the findings of that scrutiny in
political prisoners. The general policy, however, he defended in homely
political theory of business during the generation that followed the
political unity, in patriotism, in the balance of power, or in
political wrong, if done as alleged, by the people of a state and by the
political. Never, save perhaps in some of the civil conflicts of Greece
politicians sow dissensions in the army and among civilians? Lincoln
politicians. Indeed, the decade that followed the Civil War was marred
politics at Washington. Moreover the disposition of land, mineral
politics became "bad form" among fashionable women. The clerks and
politics showed that the distant Oregon country, larger in area than New
politics than in business, Stephen A. Douglas. The swift movement of
politics, as well as in the field of foreign relations, the outcome of
politics, came a call for the abolition of the old method of nominating
politics, so the leaders in business enterprise had theirs. It was
politics. An ex-President of the United States proposed that the people
politics. One faction, the Industrial Workers of the World, founded in
polled about 900,000 votes, more than double the number received four
pollicis, but the movement may be simulated by the long flexor and
poly-articular disease; and it is also met with in the joints of the
polygamy were raised in the colony and at the seat of authority three
pond had risen visibly more than a foot, flooding the dam, because
pond. Petya was galloping along the courtyard, but instead of
pond. The ice gave way under one of the foremost soldiers, and one leg
poor against the rich." In declaring the income tax unconstitutional, he
poor man, had not the five rubles that would make him happy.
poor resources I have for entertaining a woman used to the best
poor were growing poorer. He asserted that, on the contrary, the average
popliteal artery in association with fracture of the femur, or of the
popliteal artery or the cavity of the knee-joint, or a sequestrum of the
popular antipathy to the British government. Favors extended to
popular government; he called for war, relentless war, upon the French
popular in the labor world. One of them provided compensation for
popular plays, "Figaro" and "The Barber of Seville." These two men had
popular protest. The Stamp Act was signed on March 22, 1765. On May 30,
popular referendum abolished the liquor traffic within its borders. By
popular vote, they did not speak for the mass of English people. Great
popularly known as the Greenbackers, favoring a continued re-issue of
population is examined, the more surprising is the fact that such an
population of the United States had passed to the Ohio Valley. Missouri,
population of the territory was not less than one hundred thousand; the
population. Even in the Middle colonies of Delaware and Pennsylvania
population. Oppressed by their financial burdens and discouraged by the
population. The states ratified the amendment and early in 1913 it was
population. Tyler, impressed by the plea, appointed Calhoun to the
populations concerned; fair and friendly treatment of Russia; the
populations; the other was to provide that direct taxes should be
populous states, took up the gauntlet which Paterson had thrown down. It
porch he met two of the landed gentry, one of whom he knew. This
porch of the Emperor's house.
porch to question him, and immediately after the elder had given a few
porch. The gentlemen of the Emperor's suite ran down the stairs and
porch. The major-domo stood at the porch talking to an elderly orderly
porridge and carrying fuel. He sent for an officer. The officer
porridge cookers. In one company dinner was ready, and the soldiers
portages for the settlers and their families from the states "back
portages from Philadelphia to Pittsburgh, completing the last link in
portend all kinds of woes and the end of the world. In Pierre,
porter were all sitting in the cellar, listening. The roar of guns,
portfolio were the only sounds audible, but it was evident that if the
portion may be excised. Local causes, such as involvement of the nerve
portion of the American people lived in towns. Countrymen back from the
portion of the New England people sprang from this original stock.
portion of the diaphysis.
portion of the nation's business passed into the hands of corporations.
portion of the nerve above the tumour, or, when this is impracticable,
portion of the pectoralis major may be transplanted to the lower angle
portion of the vein.
portion of them were Protestants. The language, the law, and the
portion of tissue from one part of the body to another; the tissue
portion yields before the pressure of the blood, and a sacculated
portions of the French army--first Murat's (the vice-king's), then
portions of the epidermis into the underlying connective tissue, as may
portions of the maxilla removed unnecessarily. Any circumscribed tumour
portions of thrombi or of fibrinous formations on the valves of the
portmanteau and my dressing gown. The Emperor proposes to give all
portmanteau into the vehicle, "we are to move on still farther. The
portmanteau with some difficulty out of the front door.
portmanteaus and not greeting anyone. "The young ladies'? There to the
portrait and gave her attention chiefly to the box for cards.
portrait on the lid which Pierre had had done by a miniaturist in
portrait, rose, and recalled de Beausset and the officer on duty. He
ports as Liverpool and Bristol. The statistical records of that time are
ports held by alien powers except the few free ports; and that there
ports, paying duties to the government and commissions to merchants
ports. By supplementary orders, the entire British official force in
ports. Their action was followed by the rupture of diplomatic relations;
position and acquaintances, tried to fathom the character of the
position as much as possible so as to be nearer to the soldiers and
position from the village of Novoe to Utitsa, and consequently had
position in clear and ringing phrases: "In accepting by the treaty of
position in the regiment, devoted himself entirely to the pleasures
position localised by means of the X-rays, all devitalised and
position of affairs on the left flank as Barclay had ordered him to
position of the Shevardino Redoubt. That redoubt was quite senseless
position of the administration was very clearly stated by President
position of the army at Fili and assume that the commander in chief
position of the bundles for the various groups of muscles, so that in a
position on seeing Boris. The one who was writing and whom Boris
position on the field of Borodino.
position on the left flank and the shifting of the whole field of
position ought to have made that effort, for as long as the Russians
position presents itself in the form of an aimless and senseless
position that had been chosen, criticizing not the position itself
position to the sinuses in the skin, in passing a probe down one of the
position was increased by the fact that the Russian commanders--not
position where the enemy will not soon attack him. Forty eight guns
position where the operations would take place was familiar in all its
position with the leg elevated, preferably before getting out of bed in
position, and in young subjects the growth of the limb may be interfered
position, and the least attempt at movement causes severe pain; the
position, stretching out and beating her head against the wall.
position. By the chair stood the priests, their long hair falling over
position. In recent cases the arm may be placed in the extended position
positions they had passed were stronger, and that the position at
positions, but it formed no check on the practice of rewarding party
positive and outspoken. "The state of feeling here," wrote Mr. Hay, then
positive pole is placed in the centre of the tumour, while the negative
possess few of the external decorations which have so much influence in
possessed by vital cells of reacting to the irritation caused by injury
possession of him. He leaned his whole massive body across the table.
possession of ranges. At length, however, both had to go, as the
possession of the ocean. From that moment we must marry ourselves to the
possessions out by the other gates. In spite of Rostopchin's
possessor of the finest fortune in Russia. It is rumored that Prince
possibilities of unloading this or that and letting the wounded have
possibility of anyone seeing her without being enchanted. The aunt
possibility of being useful and in the possibility of happiness or
possibility of his having been picked up on the battlefield by the
possibility of, and passionately desired, the regeneration of the
possibility; others talked of a battle but also disbelieved in the
possible because of the want of definition and encapsulation, but it is
possible from the history and from the nature of the enlargement. Signs
possible from the political and clever talk which everyone addressed
possible in the regiment.
possible line of action--the one Kutuzov and the general mass of the
possible malice on any innocent citizen on the merest suspicion, and to
possible no one will ask me, that I shall not be among the first to
possible of a just obligation shall be paid." The Monroe Doctrine was
possible representation in Congress, and at the same time to restrain
possible that the enemy's forces confronting you are so considerable
possible the work of railway promoters. By the year 1872 the Federal
possible to find the laws of a war in the personal activity of a
possible to put it right." And now he again seemed to be saying the
possible to remove some of the more disfiguring of the bony masses.
possible to retain many troops; for with the army entrusted to you,
possible!" said he, in the tone of a servant who wants to remain
possible, as it is apt to increase the excitement and exhaust the
possible, be dealt with before operating on the joint.
possible, but only which was the better match and how the matter would
possible, from the features of the wound, to arrive at an approximately
possible, we are of opinion that the embolic form of staphylococcal
possible. And the farther we go back in examining events the less
possible. The ship moves independently with its own enormous motion,
possibly run out--went round above the ravine.
post in the commissariat department in that town.
post made a half turn and went past it at a measured pace. The
post-house overseers, the peasants on the roads and in the villages-
post-operative haematemesis--the best means of arresting the vomiting is
post-scarlatinal rheumatism or gonorrhoea. The affection is known as
posted on the official Project Gutenberg-tm web site (www.gutenberg.net),
posted on the official Project Gutenberg-tm web site (www.gutenberg.org),
posted with permission of the copyright holder), the work can be copied
posted with permission of the copyright holder), the work can be copied
posterior auricular (mastoid) glands_ lie over the mastoid process, and
posterior cord of the brachial plexus.
posterior nerve roots, the nerves within the vertebral canal, and the
posterior triangle of the neck. If this fails to give relief, the more
posterity who view the thing that happened in all its magnitude and
postilions, and scullions stood at the gate, staring at the wounded.
postmaster's book. Bazdeev had been one of the best-known Freemasons
posts in the government, he treated with scant courtesy, preferring
potassium and mercury, and the local application of black wash. When the
potassium iodide twice daily. The injections may be repeated two months
potassium, 1 part; distilled water, 100 parts. At the end of eight days
potent force in the origin and growth of self-government in a land far
pouched varicose vein--the blood coagulates _en masse_, and the clot
pouches project from the side of the vein. These pouches vary in size
poultice or the wearing of infected underclothing.
poultices are then applied until the spread of the disease is arrested.
pour her own knowledge quickly and easily into the child--who was
pour out to him his indignation against the French and especially
poured out of a sack, dashed gaily across the brook toward the camp.
poverty from the old countess. Nicholas felt himself irredeemably
poverty, misery, slums, dirt, and disease almost beyond imagination. The
powder alone sometimes causes irritation of the bowels, it should be
powder to the front, and carrying dispatches at the peril of their
power and affection. Indeed, a large part of the rank and file had been
power and prestige of the federal government were enhanced beyond
power and the sympathies, interests, and prejudices of nations and their
power because Napoleon had a bad cold on the twenty-fourth of August
power had come in the year 1812 when the French emperor was forty-two.
power in the executive and legislative branches of the government, he
power in the muscles supplied by the divided nerve. The muscles rapidly
power of the first rank.
power only because they fulfill the will of the people which has
power only conditionally on carrying out the program that the will
power that threatened to dominate Europe and the World.
power to coin money and it forbade the states to make anything but gold
power to enforce this clause by appropriate legislation. Since the
power unobtrusively to bind the hands of the protectors of disorder
power, as a willful aggression upon its rights and interests, the
power, in which most people see the chief interest of home politics.
power," for the first time. Perhaps at this late day, it is useless to
power--assume at the council table of the world?"
power. Healthy tissues can resist the invasion of a certain number of
power. Women surmounted even greater difficulties than the men in the
power; but no one could fix the hour of the great event. Until 1763 the
power; that is, evil practices and corrupt conduct on the part of some
powerful Sioux Indians whose enormous reservation blocked the advance of
powerful agencies to supervise the colonies were created. At the same
powerful arms hanging down (she had handed her reticule to the
powerful influence exerted on them while he lived by the count's
powerful person, prepared to furnish or secure the capital, collect the
powerfully aided the Revolution, though it was not the sole cause of
powerless. It is often pale at first--hence the term "white gangrene"
powers in 1889 undertook a protectorate over the islands. But joint
powers of the world. Democracy, the right of nations to determine their
powers, although they all involved the American colonies in struggles
powers, each one of which ratified the instrument before it was put into
powers, it added that any alterations proposed should be referred to the
powers. In England, sympathy with the United States was from the first
powers." The effect of this declaration was immediate and profound. Men
pp. 267-289. The compromise laws in Macdonald, _Documentary Source Book
pp. 92-107; Rhodes, _History of the United States_, Vol. VII, pp. 1-29,
practical considerations. In 1824, when personal rivalry had taken the
practical interest, he insisted, which should bind the colonies to the
practical interests its fate was thus linked with the destiny of all
practical, that of organizing workingmen into craft unions for the
practically negligible, and the risk of anaphylactic shock attending
practice from the theory only proved to him the accuracy of his
practice has been to perform amputation well above the growth, and this
practice of treating with the Indians as independent nations was
practice this rule transferred the selection of Senators to secret
practice to this contention; but Monroe submitted the issue to his
practice, and it became necessary to bring an attorney all the way from
practice. The patient lying on a couch, the limb is raised about
practised with success in the hip, knee, elbow, and temporo-mandibular
pray as Natasha and I used to as children, that the snow might turn
prayer book, now kneeling before the icon stand. To her surprise and
prayer. All these things were repeatedly interrupted by the
preach--out of the pulpit first, and finally in it.
precautions against the general drunkenness to be expected on the
precedes it is due to the fact that when the event has taken place and
precedes the fatal issue, which may take place in from five to
preceding death of the bone is highly characteristic of tuberculosis.
precious little missy! Ooh!" lamented Aniska, who at the sight of
precisely the same conditions, and not only at the same hour but at
precisely the same conditions, feels that without this irrational
precisely the same expression; while the youngest, the one with the
precision the trunk from which an aneurysm at the root of the neck
precision, that Anisya Fedorovna, who had at once handed her the
predecessor in the use of public office for political purposes. If any
predictions were being justified. Part of the Russian force had
predilection for the tibia, sternum, and skull. They differ from
predisposed to if the groove is shallow as a result of imperfect
predisposed to it by disease of the arteries.
predominance of the North, made determined efforts to introduce
predominance of the cellular elements over the intercellular substance
predominate. The anaerobe most constantly present is the _bacillus
predominate; the patient is dull and listless, or he may be restless and
prefect of the French Emperor's palace, arrived at Napoleon's quarters
preferable and more advantageous to live in the count's house than
preferably by shelling it out from the investing nerve sheath or
preferments, are in the disposal or election of the people."
preferred the open country above the compromise line. With incredible
preferred to be subjects of King George. Just what proportion of the
preformed cyst, or from the saccular pouching of a varicose vein.
pregnancy, and the administration to the child after its birth of food
pregnancy. The importance of the wearing of tight garters as a factor in
preliminaries of the new Campo Formio are to be drawn up."
preliminary ligation of the main artery above the seat of operation--for
preliminary to their being removed by the phagocytes. Numerous
premises, Southern leaders drew the logical conclusion that the entire
preparation for a winter campaign and, on the other, the character
preparation swept over all the troops.
preparation). The growth of epithelium may be stimulated by a 6 to 8 per
preparations for leaving Moscow, all confirmed the supposition that
preparations had been made, the same dispositions, and the same
preparations has diminished the importance of mercury in the treatment
preparations made for the sacrament of unction, and in his house there
preparations of the "606" or "914" groups or to full doses of iodide of
preparations, such as hemoplastin, may be employed. We have removed the
prepare recommendations for legislative action. The result, after a
prepared dead cultures of the causative organisms, and is based on the
prepared many fine things he meant to say to the gentleman-in-waiting.
prepared the onlookers for what was to follow. As soon as the
prepared the surprise, having placed something on the chairs and
prepared to administer to all those who resisted its authority. The
prepared to go out with the others.
prepared to seize on a neighboring territory for the end of extending
prepared to urge serious modifications in the Constitution. "If there be
preparing for an inspection anywhere in the heart of Russia.
prepatellar and subdeltoid bursae, or in one of the bursae over the great
prepuce that the induration of syphilis is liable to be mistaken for
prepuce, and if there are abrasions on the surface with which it comes
prescribed a great variety of medicines for all the diseases known
prescribed by law, sustained by taxes imposed on all, and favored by the
prescribed in the military code, which he and the others knew in the
presence expressed their wonder at how it had all happened, and at the
presence he seemed not to notice. He enlivened the whole party. The
presence in the wall of the abscess and of the sinus, of tuberculous
presence of the _filaria Bancrofti_ in the vessels, and is observed
presence of the disease at a stage before the bone is altered
presence of the living God, if by your legislation you seek to drive us
presence of...?" He pointed to the two peasants who kept as close to
presence, and the women who were breathlessly longing to be asked to
presence, evidently unable to repress his vexation, after the
presence, passed in step before the Emperors and their suites at a
presence. "Now listen," she said to the count. "What do you want
presence. The chief points in the differential diagnosis from acute
present I am free and am all right. Only I haven't the least idea what
present boundaries, it received the coveted statehood in 1867.
present he had brought from the Empress, on two chairs directly in
present in enormous numbers scattered throughout the marrow. The parts
present in the lower extremity, namely, extension of the foot and leg
present in this situation in the condition known as bunion.
present is only play. The fact is that those men with whom you have
present itself again. And this very absence of an aim gave him the
present no further manifestations of the inherited taint.
present the rights of America among the powers of the world. Only a
present themselves. The deeper we delve in search of these causes
present war, with the air of a man who knows beforehand that all
present, the patient should be submitted to the Pasteur treatment.
present, the wound should be opened up sufficiently to admit of thorough
present. The lesion consists in an overgrowth of epidermis which often
presentation of man's life in which the union of these two
presentation); A.H. Stone, _Studies in the American Race Problem_
presented arms, another group of horsemen galloped up to the
presented for redemption and the gold was quickly carried out at the
presented itself to her mind for the first time and she did not know
presented knotty problems. It was finally agreed that the German
presented such startling diversities that only the eye of faith could
presented themselves. He imagined all sorts of movements of the
presented to him thus with the simplicity of Columbus' egg. He was
presented to the Emperor Francis; he remembered the Minister of War,
presented to the civilian surgeon. Save in its broadest principles, the
presented, to the effect that Congress had no constitutional warrant for
presenting his petition. If he could only see the Emperor he would
presenting itself to the old count was to apply for an official
presenting many of the characters of a subcutaneous haemangioma, but it
presents and dinner parties to the whole district on name days;
presents the same characters as those resulting from embolism. It tends
presents two clinical varieties. In the first of these, it occurs in the
preservation of the rights of the Indians against fraud and abuses.
preservation of the union; it will give a balance of power to the South
preside: And no person shall be convicted without the concurrence of
presidency and an issue for the campaign, warmly supported the
presidency as he did the Constitution. Strict constructionists of the
president to enforce the laws. Congress was given power to select a
president. A portion of the Texan soldiers took their stand in the
presidential campaign of 1920 opened. The Republicans, while condemning
presidential candidate, Mr. Charles E. Hughes, speaking for the
presidential elections of the period.
pressed close to the wall to let Pierre and Anna Mikhaylovna pass
pressed him still harder with proofs of the impossibility and above
pressed it upon the attention of the country. In his inaugural address
pressed through Congress in 1886 a bill providing for the issue of paper
pressed upon as it hooks round the arch of the aorta, and hoarseness of
pressed upon his countrymen the necessity of uniting East and West by a
pressed upon the debtors. Where such debts were secured by mortgages on
presses on the vertebrae and erodes them, the symptoms simulate those of
presses, which lasted until 1755. In the other colonies where there was
pressing on the trachea. In the axilla also the cystic tumour may attain
pressing the hands of Prince Andrew and Boris. "You know I should be
pressing the head of a pin till it hurt her dainty finger, was
pressing the old man's hand went with him into the castle.
pressure as the cause of the pain by a cervical rib, a tumour, or an
pressure of ill-fitting boots, and are met with chiefly on the toes and
pressure of the blood.
pressure of the column of venous blood.
pressure of the contained blood. The leakage may occur in drops, or as a
pressure of the effused blood occludes the veins and leads to congestion
pressure of the probe. The macerated bone presents a rough, eroded
pressure on the growers of cotton and tobacco and the other great
pressure on the pelvic veins, such as a tumour, persistent
pressure on the structures in the neck, similar to those produced by
pressure upon the nerve fibres, sometimes resulting in their
pressure, and in the case of a limb to elevate it. Should the haemorrhage
pressure, and in the fact that it can be massaged away (Stockman). It
pressure, perforating ulcers are met with on the sides and dorsum of the
pressure, torsion, or ligature, as the accumulation of blood in a wound
pressure--for example, in the hip-joint, on the superior aspect of the
pressure. If the stitches be cut, pus escapes, the wound gapes, and its
presumptive evidence of the occurrence of necrosis. Where there are one
presupposable that it is the lieutenant colonel himself," said the
pretended to be concerned about the army, each was thinking only of
pretending to sleep, the sounds his nose emitted during the reading
pretext for aggression. In fact, the ambassador, as he himself has
pretext of sending papers to the Emperor, dispatched these Polish
pretext. The fact is he has come to see Count Cyril Vladimirovich,
prevail in the slums of large towns.
prevail upon the Supreme Court of the United States to declare such laws
prevail, the infection tends to spread into the tissues surrounding
prevail; the frame of the civil government is unhinged; a governor, if
prevailed, free and universal education, laws protecting the safety and
prevailed. Four great Liberty Loans were floated, all the agencies of
prevailed. Natasha's grief began to be overlaid by the impressions
prevailed. She drew her brother's attention to the maid who was
prevails and those in which form prevails. To the latter--as
prevent her feeling grief for her brother with full force; on the
prevent its spread. Alcohol is used to cleanse the broken surface, and
prevent syncope. Attempts to withdraw the air by suction, and the
prevent the further production of toxins in the wound, and to neutralise
prevent the gauze sticking to the skin.
prevent the heaping up of enormous fortunes. The next year, to the
prevent the ingress and egress of all ships; but such a blockade, to be
prevent the occurrence of ankylosis.
prevent the renomination of Mr. Taft. As early as January 21, 1911, they
prevented as far as is possible. For instance, the constituent bones of
prevented by cleansing of the skin and by the use of clean under-linen.
prevented from healing by the rigidity of the chest wall, and will only
preventing reaction. It is in the general appearance of the patient and
preventing the access of organisms to wounds or of counteracting their
prevention of septic infection. There is rarely any urgency in the
prevents regurgitation. Valves are absent from the superior and inferior
prevents rejoicing in the sight of your most gracious presence. I
prevents the development of bacteria in the skin secretions.
previous chapter--measures which vested the supervision of elections in
previous day, and her talk with Dron and at the meeting, had
previous performance Semenova had fallen down on the stage.
previous summer and had lost her way in the big forest. She
previous traditions of war. The burning of towns and villages, the
previously darkened room startled her. In the room were her nurse
previously formed plans, the only conclusion to be drawn is that those
preying upon American merchantmen. Was it not as early as 1844 that the
price of the goods they had to buy and was thus in fact a tribute laid
price put upon his head. Still he kept on the path of "action." Aided by
price. Then came the resumption of specie payment, which, in effect,
prices--that is, the cost of living--began to go down, creditors
pricking its ears at the noise and looking at the lights. The shouting
pride, and the more he pitied his friend the more did he think with
pride, the vested rights of state and village politicians in their
priding herself on her independence of thought. "God is the same every
primacy in lumber had passed from the Great Lakes region to the South.
primaries was still advancing everywhere, a demand for the popular
primaries, the initiative, referendum, and recall, popular election of
primary focus admits of removal, the prognosis is more favourable.
primary indication is to elevate the limb in order to facilitate the
primary lesion may take the form of condylomata. Indurated oedema, with
primary multiple growths are occasionally met with in the skin and in
primary union, above described, is to be looked upon as the type of all
primary, and the recall of elective officials. In an address before the
primary, and then they bound the legislatures to abide by the popular
prince had changed in appearance only by the loss of a tooth, which
prince in Persia, where he killed the Shah's brother. Now all the
prince who, able to appreciate at a glance her superiority to the
prince's death, noticed an agitation among the peasants, and that
prince's personal adjutant, Zherkov, an orderly officer, the staff
prince's room. The doctor came out with an agitated face and said
prince's things in my bedroom," said he to the servant who was
princes, sought an asylum in America, carrying with them to the land of
princess begged them to walk up. The first person who came to meet the
princess did not take her father away before the fifteenth, he could
princess had caught a glimpse of the man she had known and loved,
princess that it might not occur to her to speak of his share in the
princess was not unwell, but had such an overpowering fear of the
princess went in with the drink she had prepared according to
princess which had lost all dignity, and at the twitching cheeks of
princess with the expression women assume when they suppose they are
princess' health and then led Pierre along a stone passage. The
princess, he saw which way the wind was blowing, and his low opinion
princess, indicating her to the gentlemen, said: "Voila Marie!"
principal agents in the process of phagocytosis (p. 22), and together
principal of debts. Thus the first chapter was written in the long
principal. Public creditors were in despair, as the market value of
principally in the unnaturalness of his relation to the woman and in a
principals nor their seconds suffered for it. But the story of the
principle in government. Although the effusive, almost maudlin, language
principle of eternal love revealed to him, the more he unconsciously
principle of love, the more he renounced life and the more
principle was extended in 1898 and again in 1913, and under the
principle which is fundamentally just and vital to the successful
principles by which nations were bound. Among them the following were of
principles in harmony with the spirit of the times, undertake the
principles of taxation." Even the Eastern Republicans were hardly as
principles of the English constitution under which they all lived. When
principles of the shipping act of 1916, ships and shipyards were brought
principles the governments addressed by Mr. Hay, finally acceded with
principles, the Republicans, under the leadership of William McKinley in
principles. These were, in short: "peace without victory"; the right of
principles." So the bitter controversy ran on through many exciting
printed matter--has the question of the freedom of will been put on
printing and writing paper to the Valley will be a blessing to
printing anything displeasing to the colonial governments. In 1721 the
priority) "that that senseless young man was spoiled by the depraved
prisoner to escape from all this horror and misery; but on the one
prisoner, the one next to Pierre, was led away--alone. Pierre did
prisoner?" each was thinking. But the French officer was evidently
prisoners and guns secured, the booty divided--not without some
prisoners and marking off each hundred with a chalk line on the gate.
prisoners and read out the sentence in Russian and in French.
prisoners at a trot. The expression on all faces showed the tension
prisoners should be kept separate from the rest, had long since been
prisoners were had up for a second examination, were the hardest of
prisoners, it was found that in the bustle of leaving Moscow one
prisoners. From all sides came shouts of command, and from the left
prisons, government offices, churches, and cathedrals. The longer
private affair with which neither the President nor any private citizen
private banks. Two years later, Congress defied the lobby of the express
private correspondence. The Spanish government was compelled to recall
private fortunes of great magnitude," the Populists and the Democrats
private interests, and they were the very people whose activities at
privateers which, in spite of the disasters of the Nile and Trafalgar,
privileges and immunities of citizens in the several States.
privileges and immunities of citizens of the United States, and declared
privileges harmful to the service; that honor, l'honneur, is either
privileges have attained the same end," returned Prince Andrew. "Every
privileges in the new order then being created. Hannah Lee Corbin, the
privileges. The last soldier was not withdrawn from the last Southern
probability death is similarly due to the action of some poison produced
probability of an uprising in the city? The inhabitants were leaving
probable that the cysts are derived from the caverns by breaking down
probable that the infection has spread from the neck along the
probable that the infection is conveyed to the foetus by the placental
probably a toxic, factor in its production, otherwise the affection
probably aggravated by the absorption of poisonous substances produced
probably caused by some substance produced by the micro-organisms.
probably depends on its depressing action on the heart and its
probably neutralised by the antibodies in circulation, while those
probably to strengthen the front line. The smoke of the first shot had
probe into the post-office department revealed the malodorous "star
problem was raised, representatives of the small states, led by William
problem: the recognition of independence, assistance in establishing
problems and learned to cooperate with one another in enforcing the
problems beyond the Alleghanies. The West was rising in population and
problems connected with the growth of trusts and railways, the
problems of the day; they appeared before legislative assemblies to
problems of the modern age can be approached without an understanding of
procedure and to the end of his days believed that the new drift into
procedure he quit the practice, followed by Washington and Adams, of
procedure is liable to be followed by the formation of an aneurysm.
proceedings now. Now is the seed-time of Continental union, faith, and
proceeds applied to the cause of the Revolution.
process (zygoma) in front of the ear; and the facial against the
process begins in the arterial walls, and spreads thence to the
process in causing erosion of the artery. In pre-Listerian days, the
process is associated with a putrid discharge--ozaena--the destruction of
process may go, however, and its effects on the part implicated and on
process of erosion by which the dead bone has been separated from the
process of the sixth cervical vertebra--the "carotid tubercle"--has been
process some days after the accident.
process, cause pain on putting the heel to the ground.
processes are usually more advanced in the areas most exposed to
processes concerned in ossification, excepting the deposition of lime
processes constitute what is known as the _temporary arrest of
processes, as well as to counteract the local and general effects of the
processes, suggesting the claws of a crab. It is essentially a fibroma
procession. On entering the ballroom the regular hum of voices,
processions, and monster demonstrations filled the land with politics.
proclaimed America to be an asylum for the oppressed of all countries
proclaimed by South Carolina before death carried him away at the ripe
proclaimed it "the right and duty of Congress to prohibit in the
proclaimed the neutrality of the United States, the sympathies of a
proclaimed. Twelve months later the amendment went into effect.
proclaiming hostilities, the administration set forth the causes which
proclamation appeared about two months ago. The count was informed
proclamation courte et energique, he himself was still the same: he
proclamation of amnesty to nearly all who had been in arms against the
proclamation vested the power of licensing trade with the Indians,
proclamation was issued as a war measure, adopted by the President as
produce at the same intervals hold for the same time, but which
produce buyers, in the first instance, and through them to the farmers
produce localised lesions; while the chain-forms--_streptococci_--give
produce of such duties ... towards defraying the expenses of defending,
produce of the estate.
produce southward to the plantations and outward to Europe. Therefore,
produce the destructive lesions of the skin, mucous membranes, and
produce.'" The conclusion was inexorable: either the South must control
produced "the great event." An unexpected collision beyond the thought
produced a strong impression on Prince Andrew on the Wednesday, when
produced by pressure as well as those which enable the patient to
produced by prolonged contact with hot metal or caustics. Burns of the
produced by the extravasated blood is usually sufficient to arrest the
produced by the others so devitalise the tissue cells, and diminish
produced by the will of Alexander. But the universal historian
produced from the folds of her frock.
produced the Liberal Republican outbreak in the seventies and the
produced, which when transferred to the body of a susceptible animal
produces conditions which favour their growth. When the organisms become
producing a mild attack, which protects him from the natural disease.
producing or intensifying the condition.
production of commodities by promoting the efficiency and happiness of
production of naval stores, rice, sugar, tobacco, and cotton, the
production of varix in the veins of the lower extremity.
production, local necrosis of tissue may take place, either in the form
products of pyogenic bacteria. These products, which are of the nature
products of the soil. The government has taken the following steps
products which cause the induration. The use of elastic pressure or of
profession to take up the dangerous cause.
professions of law and medicine. By the rapid growth of public high
professions; of their hereditary wealth and of their culture." The act
profile he saw under her bonnet as by the feeling of solicitude,
profit by their example. If that be treason, make the most of it."
profit from exclusive ownership, and produce by common labor the food
profits at the end kept the business thriving. Huge stocks of cottons,
profits of which went to the common good. Encountering for the first
profits, had formerly been willing to take the risk were now restrained
profound thought. The round, steady, hawk's eyes looked before him
profoundly altered. In the tibia, for example, the shaft is bowed
profuse diarrhoea; and the patient emaciates rapidly. The skin is
profuse haemorrhage takes place when the umbilical cord separates. As a
profuse ichorous discharge from the nostrils, and sometimes severe
progenitors, the writers of universal histories, for if historical
prognosis is grave. (2) The situation of the burn is important. Burns
program of concessions presented by Spain. At the very moment when his
program of economic measures demanded in the North was without exception
program of the government, and it reminded other powers that the
program" of the Republican administration. The Democrats denounced the
progress all through the eighteenth century.
progress is quite visible from hour to hour, and may be traced by the
progress more rapidly, and also lack the characteristic margin. The
progress of American financiers toward national independence. The
progress of the action, but all these reports were false, both because
progress of the reparative process are to be found in a clean-cut wound
progress of time became the prevailing doctrine of the planting
progress, looks for these conditions in the greatness, wealth,
progress, the value of domestic manufactures including mines and
progresses more rapidly than it does in the cervical glands, and almost
progresses slowly, and finally reaches a free surface--generally the
progressing in the direction of calcification, and this is followed by
progressing, and remains high during the febrile period, but there is no
progression, as it suddenly gives way whenever the knee is flexed.
progression; and that crossing of the Berezina about which so much has
progressive disease involving the articular surfaces.
progressive nations. With a view to improving the business
progressive, and has as its primary object the expulsion of the irritant
progressively harder until its consistence is that of bone. If the mass
prohibited by it to the States, are reserved to the States respectively,
prohibited the labor of children under a certain age in the industries
prohibited. The excretory organs are encouraged to act by the liberal
prohibiting the free exercise thereof; or abridging the freedom of
prohibitive; the Sugar Act of 1764 was clearly intended as a revenue
project a desecration of the sacrament of marriage, but there were not
project from the inner table and press upon the brain.
project into the cavity of the joint, are often pedunculated, and may
projected audience is one hundred million readers.  If the value
projected audience is one hundred million readers.  If the value
projectiles from the booming of the reports, glanced at the tiresomely
projecting from the surface at a right angle.
projecting lobulated tumour, which, when situated in the palm, resembles
projection in front, the deformity is known as "pigeon-breast."
projection of tuberculous granulation tissue into the joint following
projections or "spurs" sometimes occur on the under surface of the
projections, and slipping between the legs of the generals she
projects into the lumen of the vessel is known as the _internal clot_,
proliferating cells of the perichondrium. Cartilage being a non-vascular
proliferation of the endothelium and increase in the connective tissue
proliferation of the intra-muscular connective tissue and a gradual
proliferative changes in the fixed tissue cells. These changes are
prolong the disease, which then assumes the characters of what has been
prolonged administration of tuberculin, and by repeated exposures to the
prolonged intervals between the attacks, but rapidly tend to become more
prolonged, were often accompanied by violence, the organization alarmed
promener,"* she used to say. Often seeing the success she had with
prominence he sprang into national fame by his exploit at the battle of
prominent feature of acquired syphilis, especially in the form of the
prominent position--the heroes of history. But we need only
prominent symptom, and is largely referable to the pressure of the
prominent when the hand is flexed towards the palm. Its appearance is
prominent--almost like the pad of a boxing-glove--for some time, but
prominently displaying the sentence set forth in paragraph 1.E.1 with
prominently displaying the sentence set forth in paragraph 1.E.1 with
promise of "home rule" for Cuba. There is no doubt that the Spanish
promise of rising high in the military profession, so to an even
promise to put an end to slavery agitation and to crush the abolition
promised a steady reduction of duties. To cap the climax, Jackson's
promised in her heart to do better and to accomplish the impossible-
promised land to have the strength to move.
promised me only the day before yesterday not to forget Boris. But
promised the united support of all sections. It prepared an address to
promised to dump on the American market, suddenly, an immense amount of
promote the disappearance of oedema.
promote the world-wide effort of labor to improve social conditions.
promoted captain, and when the regiment was put on war footing with an
pronouncing the name so that Nicholas at once understood that Anna
proof of this is the corresponding decrease of the Russian army.
propagandists; and the patriot newspapers founded and managed by women.
property in Cuba to which the Republicans referred in their platform
property in slaves insecure and thus destroy the institution. This
property of attracting one another, that is, leaving aside the
property qualifications on the right to vote. Broadly speaking, these
property tax apportioned among the states, only to meet the failure that
property would be safe in Missouri. Along the western shore of the
property, exceeded all bounds of decency, and once more raised the old
property. As it was doubtful whether Congress had the power to enact
prophecy was being prepared even in Federalist strongholds by the rise
prophesied in protests loud and long from every quarter of the
prophet's pride. "I always said he was the only man capable of
proportion become the subjects of housemaid's knee.
proportion of cases the condition is hereditary; not only may several
proportion of persons now reach the age at which cancer is frequent.
proportion of spindles annually put into operation. Moreover, the cotton
proportion to the census or enumeration hereinbefore directed to be
proportion to the efforts of that fatal force to crush him, there grew
proportion to the present forces. The soldiers, who are worn out
proportion to the square of the distance from its aim. Kutuzov's
proportion to their population. They were the centers of wealth, for one
proportion to their strength as measured at the polls. Even as it was,
proportion which such number of disfranchised citizens bears to the
proportion which the number of such male citizens shall bear to the
proportionate to the amount of movement to which the bone is subjected
proportioned to the idiosyncrasies of the patient, and it is advisable,
proposal to move troops by night from the right to the left flank to
proposal to praise the administration of the Democratic President,
propose to accept permanent dependency of any kind in the New. If they
propose what we find necessary." Hamilton, reminding the delegates that
propose? To place the vicious vagrant, the wandering Arabs, the Tartar
proposed a long list of reservations which touched upon many of the
proposed certain amendments to the Constitution and adjourned. At the
proposed going to his estates in the south and there attending to
proposed that the new national legislature consist of two houses, the
proposed to take the girls with her. Natasha, pleading a headache,
proposed to the Allied Powers that they enter into peace negotiations, a
proposing some scheme or other and has crawled into the enemy's picket
proposing to the United States a tripartite treaty guaranteeing Spain in
proposition Hamilton set his face like flint. He maintained that the
proposition that a strong Senate was needed to check the "turbulence" of
propositions before it, one to remove the chief grounds for South
proprietor's goods and packing them on the carts, and Dron,
proprietor, or proprietary. As the name, associated with the word
proprietor. In the second place, every estate was kept intact under the
propriety of American action in Hawaii. For the purpose of making an
proptosis, with danger to the function of the globe. The results of
prosecution of the armed conflict, was withheld from the government. The
prosecutions were not numerous, they aroused a keen resentment. The
prospect of any great change and that all the danger he spoke of
prospect that infection has been overcome, the wound may be at once
prosperity among ourselves, agree to adopt the following laws and
prosperity of business. At the same time they resisted government
prosperity, as they thought, upon the sale of their staple to English
prosperous banks. Finding an unfavorable reception in the South, the new
prostrated himself before the Gates of the Temple. And really, the
protect industry against the foreign manufacturer. Such was the
protect it against that disease. The most important of these antibodies
protect the PROJECT GUTENBERG-tm concept and trademark.  Project
protect the PROJECT GUTENBERG-tm concept and trademark.  Project
protect the property or lives of resident American citizens or to comply
protected from injury and irritation in the substance of an internal
protecting and securing the said colonies and plantations ... and for
protection against the agitators, the enforcement of its rights in the
protection had been on the defensive. The tariff act of 1857 imposed
protection of American industries. The first revenue act of 1789, though
protection of civil liberties, the _habeas corpus_, suspended throughout
protection. "We propose," said one of them, "to place a part of the
protection. When the colonies were established, both merchants and
protective barrier which tends to prevent the spread of the organisms
protective leucocytosis, and also of stimulating the formation of scar
protective processes, and it usually continues until the condition
protective substances, the bactericidal power of which may be many times
protective tariffs, a sound monetary and banking system, the promotion
protegee Natasha and Prince Andrew accentuated his gloom by the
protest against the currency of the idea. Nevertheless, the truth is
protest against the methods used by the political parties in nominating
protested Balashev, "but permit me to observe that I have the honor to
protested a third. "We, 'the low-born,'" sarcastically wrote a fourth,
protested against arresting people for "talking against the war." This
protested, Napoleon's brother fumed, French newspapers objected; but the
protests Presidents from the seaboard expressed a new spirit of dissent
protests made by his generals in the name of military discipline. Do
protests of the American minister in London, was later regretted. By an
protocol was bitterly resented by the Spanish agents. It was with
protopathic insensibility are illustrated in Fig. 91. The division of
protoplasm to complete disorganisation of the cell elements.
prove locally destructive, and, in such situations as the larynx, even
prove that I remember the family's goodness to me and that I love
prove to Your Majesty by the sacrifice of their lives how devoted they
proved to be the irrepressible conflict over it. He believed that
proved to be the solution. It was agreed that not all the slaves but
proverb says," remarked Shinshin, moving his pipe to the other side of
proves fatal by rupture, and intracranial haemorrhage. The treatment is
proves fatal from the absorption of toxins into the circulation.
proves instantly fatal. In non-fatal cases the patient suffers from a
provided for the creation of local committees to enforce the rules. Such
provided for the sale of the redeemed lands to actual settlers. Finally
provided that the powers not delegated to the United States by the
provided with a pedicle; if the pedicle becomes twisted, the tumour
providing for temporary territorial government to be followed by the
providing for the arbitration of disputes which were "justiciable" in
province are in the habit of carrying a fire-basket suspended from the
province in which the prince's estate lay considered it his duty to
province who appeared to be doing the honors of the district, but
provinces now occupied by the enemy, and thereby averting danger
provinces the governor, the judges, and the high officers fled in haste,
provinces" at the mercy of Congress, to be governed under such laws as
provinces; Prince Andrew was abroad; so Pierre had not the opportunity
provincial Marshal of the Nobility sent an official to Princess Mary
provincial dignity, and the scarcity of men with a large outlook upon
proving that he was prepared to sacrifice himself for the common good.
provision also useful in the North, where indentured servants were about
provision for the support of public credit, Hamilton insisted, would
provision in the Constitution that Congress shall make no law abridging
provision in the Constitution, presidential electors were required to
provision of this agreement shall not void the remaining provisions.
provision of this agreement shall not void the remaining provisions.
provision requiring each prospective voter to read a section of the
provision stood clear in the document; but judicial ingenuity had
provision was made for the return of runaway slaves; Congress had the
provision--this in spite of the decision of the Supreme Court in 1895
provisions excluding thousands of male citizens from the ballot did not,
provisions for themselves, so that the army might have its future
provisions, except the ban on slavery, were applied to the territory
provisions, the sick, and the wounded.
proximal phalanges are supported, the second and third phalanges may be
proximally. The flexor carpi radialis can then be joined up with the
proximity to the Emperor shocked Rostov. Rostov saw how the
proximity to the bone render it liable to injury.
puberty. On the other hand, an increased activity of growth may be shown
public affairs. It was a schoolmaster, Thomas Dorr, who led the popular
public affairs. They had led the riots against the Stamp Act, overturned
public already straining at the leash.
public appointments, passing the autumn and spring in the fields on
public control, and that the issue of stocks and bonds must be approved
public domain works in creating the Project Gutenberg-tm
public domain works in creating the Project Gutenberg-tm
public favor. He was in the bloom of youth; his person and address were
public houses and cookshops. Prices too that day indicated the state
public life again until the days of secession, when he espoused the
public. The President himself repeatedly declared that a general
publicist as the most significant fact in the modern world.
puddles!" said the esaul, screwing up his glittering eyes.
puerperal women, or the separation of the umbilical cord in infants
puerperium uncomplicated, the number of leucocytes regains the normal in
pulled Pierre by the arm and pointed to a round, graveled space
pulley of the hall door squeaked from the cold as it let in the
pulling one end of a mop while a French soldier tugged at the other.
pulling the skirt straight and shifting the pins from one side of
pulling the straps over their heads, unstrapping their overcoats and
pulp, the structure of which resembles sarcoma; the bones are reduced to
pulpit; at social gatherings and around the camp fires; in county
pulpits on their side. They formed, as it were, a mighty union for the
pulsation in the arteries.
pulsation or bruit, and the tumour is but slightly compressible. The
pulsation returns at once, but several beats are required before the sac
pulse becomes feeble, soft, and rapid, and the patient is dull and
pulse tracing shows that the normal impulse and dicrotic waves are lost,
pulses beyond are lost. The limb becomes cold, numb, insensitive, and
pumped from the wells of Pennsylvania in the summer of 1859, made new
punctually to the appointed hour. Everyone sitting in this antechamber
punctured wounds, are liable to be followed by the formation of an
punctures around the main central wound. As the range increases, these
pungent, sweetly bitter scent. Nothing remained of the previous
punish him for those words, bullets flew hissing across the regiment
punished according to circumstances. As soon as the new state
punishment for crime whereof the party shall have been duly convicted,
pupil, were the first couple. Noiselessly, skillfully stepping with
purchase land for former bondmen the sum of $800,000 was appropriated;
purchase of the islands of St. John and St. Thomas in the West Indies,
purchased from Denisov, rode past too, at the rear of his squadron-
purchaser has turned up for the Moscow estate and for the house. If
purchasers. Some who held this opinion urged that the speculators who
purchases of silver by the government for coinage into dollars. So
purchasing the rights of the old French company which, under the
purely traumatic, the pyogenic, gonorrhoeal, tuberculous, and
purification, a slow form of moist gangrene sets in, and the slough
purified, become the sources of infection.
purify the skin do not collect under the patient and remain in contact
purifying the wounds of entrance and exit and the surrounding skin, and
purple velvet gown with a high collar, came into the room beaming with
purple, his eyes were rolled back so that only the whites were seen,
purpose of obstructing the exercise of the rights enjoyed under federal
purpose of reducing the long hours of labor for women, safeguarding "the
purpose of revising the Articles of Confederation." Jealous of its own
purpose of revising the Articles of Confederation." They cited also
purpose of the war to be the salvation of the union and disavowing any
purpose shall consist of a member or members from two-thirds of the
purpose to vex us. The Archduke Karl does nothing, the Archduke
purpose. In the first place, the Senators were not to be chosen directly
purpose. The first was a feeling of the necessity of sacrifice and
purpose. When the tension is extreme, Lister's button suture may be
purposes of the delegates, because Congress and the state legislatures
purse that sank into the sofa. "As for us, Count, we get along on
pursing up his lips. The man who had wished to stop the affair ran
pursuing the Russian rearguard he came upon the left flank of the
pursuit of happiness; (2) the purpose of government is to secure these
pursuit of the flying Russians. In this way two cavalry regiments
pursuit--the chase--for which his father kept a large establishment.
pursuits of our citizens in different parts of the union, it has so
purulent. As the term synovitis merely refers to the tissue involved, it
pus accumulates under the periosteum and lifts it up from the bone. The
pus erupts through their respective capsules. In the deeply placed
pus escapes until the foreign body is removed.
pus forms in the axillary space, the treatment consists in making free
pus is found to be sterile, it is usually safe to assume that the
pus is found, the opening in the bone is extended along the shaft as far
pus, and the surface of the synovial membrane resembles the wall of a
pus, broken-down blood-clot, and sloughs. The edges are inflamed,
pushed over the mountains from Virginia and the Carolinas, there were
pushed the guns and wagons themselves. Whips cracked, hoofs slipped,
pushing back his chair, he rose from the table.
pustules are of large size, and, after breaking on the surface, give
put an end to the system of representative government in whatever
put an end to war. All through the United States the people spoke of the
put down the guitar, and went to the drawing room.
put her head out into the damp night air, and the countess saw her
put in jeopardy. Their protest was therefore vigorous. They cited the
put in the dancer. "As they turned them over one seemed still alive
put into execution. Natasha had promised to come out to Kuragin at the
put it into effect? How shall it be amended in the future?
put that question than God gave her the answer in her own heart.
put to the test, _e.g._ colloidal suspensions of selenium, but without
putrefaction and hospital air. On the stairs he met a Russian army
putting on the gloves, preferably by a method which dehydrates the skin.
putting them down. When they've been put down, the war with Buonaparte
putting up the finger with the middle joint strongly flexed. In
puzzled by the clamor on both sides, followed their example without
puzzled. On looking into the Constitution he found not a line
pyaemia. Gummatous disease in the wall of the orbit may cause
pyaemia. The diagnosis is established by the recognition of the bacillus.
pyogenic bacteria are invariably present in these blisters. Burns of the
pyogenic diseases are due to infection with the staphylococcus aureus,
pyogenic infection is established by bacteriological examination of the
pyogenic infection, the best results are obtained from the hyperaemic
pyogenic infections. The limb is immobilised in such an attitude that
pyogenic or tuberculous origin, and is usually attended with the
quadratus, as there is less likelihood of the formation of adhesions
quaint little tufts. He entered the room, looking restlessly and
qualification as an alternative to the freehold. Virginia and North
qualification on the suffrage and gave the vote to all free white males.
qualifications and had feared with genuine alarm the "mobs of the great
qualifications for it--the kind of good-natured, fussy shallowness
qualifications for the governor and members of the legislature.
qualifications requisite for electors of the most numerous branch of the
qualifications were thoughtlessly imposed at the outset or considered of
quality I value most in people. As to his inheritance and the part
quality. The granulations are small and smooth, and of a pale yellow or
quantities; and Great Britain, by an act in 1750, encouraged the
quantity and quality of the fluids taken by the patient.
quantity in its entirety as being the greater or lesser desire to
quantity of blood present in it, and the more superficial the affected
quarrel of yesterday and the question presented itself whether he
quarrel, long the subject of high dispute, need not concern us to-day.
quarter, the Republicans, in renominating McKinley, set forth their
quarter. The country desires peace and the Senate ought not to delay, it
quartered. "Le patriotisme feroce de Rostopchine" and the barbarity of
quartermaster appeared with an order to move on to the little town
quartermaster for the money."
quartermasters who met the regiment announced that all the huts were
quarters for the staff officers, carrying out the French corpses
quarters to meet her old nurse and the maidservants who came running
quarters torches and candles were burning and no one slept. The old
quarters, the regiment began to move: the soldiers ran from the fires,
queen to her throne." Such being his matured conviction, though the
queen. The king waved his right arm and, evidently nervous, sang
quell the uprising; and when that task was accomplished, the state
question about the roads, the traveler had closed his eyes. His
question and blushed. She felt all the time that by talking to him she
question him. The man announced that the Tsar had been driven in a
question made a special appeal to them and they organized to demand the
question occupied the center of interest. As of old, the farmers and
question of a national suffrage for the first time in our history.
question of adjournment) shall be presented to the President of the
question of how to get the greatest gratification from one's dinner,
question of operation should be considered. The undesirable results of
question of slavery in the new territories was raised. Again
question of the cause of the movement of the bodies, he expressed
question of the meaning of power, seem to consider that the collective
question of the war with Austria, and unconsciously jumped from the
question of what to sacrifice for; the fact of sacrificing in itself
question still remains unanswered, and to the former power of monarchs
question to move her to the country, and so the countess had been sent
question whether the law of Congress prohibiting slavery north of 36 o
question, are like plasterers set to plaster one side of the walls
question, surgical treatment is confined to causing coagulation of the
question. Now by the fact of Lauriston and Barthelemi having been
question: "When, when did the abandonment of Moscow become inevitable?
questionable warrant from the Constitution, like all such paper, quickly
questions addressed to him. Alpatych moved forward and next time the
questions generally. Though they had not been summoned for the
questions intelligently, if only in a whisper. The face is pale, beads
questions on which he wished to hear the opinion of the gentlemen
questions put to him by the officers, and, like a man desperately
questions that had tormented Grant's administration. Gomez, the leader
quick or the enemy will bring up his guns to use grapeshot."
quick, resolute steps toward the crowd. And the nearer he drew to it
quickly caught up the object of contention and ran into the bedroom.
quickly from the terrible sensations amid which he had lived that
quickly occupied by large planters and their slaves engaged in the
quickly repacking, deciding that the inferior Russian carpets and
quickly through the rise in land values that Washington was moved to cry
quickly to Mavra Kuzminichna, who stood talking compassionately to the
quickly to hide them and left the room.
quickly, went out of the shed, and began to walk about.
quiet in which they both tried to listen to the stern and dreadful
quiet sound of throbbing activity, like the sound of boiling water,
quiet steps in and out of the bedroom glanced at the princess and
quiet. At the close of the day this message came: '$135,000 of notes
quietest, clambered onto it, seized it by the mane, and turning out
quietly and respectfully that the prince gave him a searching glance.
quietly in her former place. It was dark in the room especially
quilt, the palms downward. When Pierre came up the count was gazing
quilt, was growing cold on the bare floor.
quite a definite address, and that if a letter reached the Grand
quite apart from, and unconnected with, the battle. It was as if the
quite at your service. You belong to the gentry?" he concluded with
quite change the whole war and make it less cruel. As it is we have
quite contrary to Christian simplicity. Let us rather read the
quite different from Natasha's. She was putting away the things that
quite different. Had she been like this when he entered the day before
quite independently of the growth of the body, and there is no natural
quite insensitive, and many of them are unknown to the patient. As a
quite knew what she was about, went across the room to where Pierre
quite recovered the philanthropic mood in which he had left
quite the contrary. What did it matter to him--who then alone amid a
quite well yet and still weak, went to Moscow with Petya and the
quoits and skittles. The general trend of the campaign was rarely
quoting one of his own mots, releasing the wrinkles on his forehead,
rabbit is also susceptible to inoculation from syphilitic lesions; the
rabble, that is the poor people, and the price of commodities. An
rabid animal. It most commonly follows the bite or lick of a rabid dog
rabies. The incubation period averages about forty days, but varies from
racking his brains over it. Had he been asked what he thought of the
radial, are liable to be contused or torn is dislocation of the head of
radiating scars at the angles of the mouth; perforation or destruction
radicals in possession of the convention executed in large numbers
radicals within its own ranks, and political questions, the Federation
radium is not available, the affected area is repeatedly exposed to the
rage against the whole system. The legislatures of Virginia, North
ragged, and weary of the campaign, felt at the sight of an army
rail outlet to the sea for Raleigh, Columbia, Atlanta, Chattanooga,
railroad corporations, including the Erie, Michigan Central, and the
railroads, in our offices and ports of trade, on our farms, and on the
railway and other corporations, the protection of public health, the
railway companies in selling large blocks of land received from the
railways New York, Boston, and Philadelphia were linked with the
railways also, the movement to curb the trusts soon had spokesmen at
railways and other utilities and the formation of cooperative societies
railways and towns in advance of the people, is seen in an advertisement
railways and trusts pervaded the ranks of the Republicans and Democrats.
railways as would have dazed the authors of the national road bill half
railways broke in upon the undertaking before it was half finished.
railways engaged in interstate commerce and vested in the hands of the
railways of the country were largely manned by foreign labor, still
railways, mines, and mills of the country. This doctrine, so
railways, the vital interests of all citizens were put in jeopardy.
raining harder than before. The saturated road no longer absorbed
raise and support armies and a navy. It could employ the state militia
raise fervent prayers to Heaven that the Almighty may exalt the race
raise revenues for the continental treasury, but the states, burdened
raise the arm in front of the body above the level of the shoulder or to
raised as though about to smile, and once on coming out of the
raised by those who were holding him under the armpits, and of his
raised for the defense of the fatherland, all Russians from the
raised from anterior abdominal wall. The lateral edges of the flap are
raised from the green quilt the hand that was free, and turning
raised from the new case with an elevator, and with the chisel or gouge
raised her voice, and sometimes pulled him by the arm and put him in
raised over the footlights, and from horns and contrabass came deep
raised problems of the first magnitude.
raised under the quilt for his shoulders, she imagined a horrible body
raised white papules resembling warts, especially towards the centre of
raised, and by the time the chill has passed off its maximum has been
raised, bright-red, papillary or villous surface. When the disease
raised, the outlook is hopeful; but when the pulse becomes small and
raised. At the entrance to the Arbat Square an immense expanse of dark
raising his eyes, looked down at the shirt and examined the seams.
raising his head and pointing to the plan of the building, "tell me
ramify chiefly in the outer coat. They are also well supplied with
ran almost at a trot through the deserted streets toward the Yauza
ran down his back. Again he glanced at the ranks. Probably many had
ran forward shading his eyes with his small hand to look at the
ran mainly along party lines; but the Republicans were themselves
ran off to their companies, the sergeants major began bustling (the
ran rapidly over the wide space, but he only saw that the hitherto
ran their political reasoning, the interests of the two sections were
ran up, begging a little fire for the infantry.
ranchers with an instinct for water, like that of the miner for metal,
range of its educational activities and the bitterness of its tone all
ranged the seas. American ships destined for the Continent, if they
ranging from 15,000 to 20,000. In children under one year of age, the
rank and honor nearly on a par with those of the Congress."
ranks all along the regiment. Another time, general attention was
ranks shouting. The train drivers and orderlies harnessed and packed
ranks. The old party leaders, particularly of Tammany Hall, the
rapid steps to the village.
rapid, noisy little waves of the Enns, which rippling and eddying
rapidity of motion, produced on Pierre the usual animating effects
rapidity with which it reaches the circulating blood, being most marked
rapidity, so that in the course of months it may cause crippling of
rapidity, the limb becoming enormously swollen, painful, and crepitant
rapidity. Affections of the heart-valves and of the pericardium are
rapidity. Within a few hours the peritoneal surfaces are glued together
rapidity; factories were closed; idle men thronged the streets hunting
rapidly enlarges to the size of a walnut, and may then persist for a
rapidly established intimacy with the French marshals, and so
rapidly growing share. The old home of Jacksonian democracy, where
rapidly round the company. He noticed the change in the little
rapidly slipping one little foot against the other, pushed off her
rapidly that the local changes indicative of gangrene have not time to
rapidly to meet her with a look of emotion. This was the countess. She
rapidly, quite forgetting the part he had intended to play. "He is
rapidly. As soon as a few settlements were well established, the
rapidly. When the pressure over the saphenous opening is removed, the
rapidly; all was silent and then from the study the sound was heard of
rapiers according to all the rules of the art of fencing. The
rapture of married bliss, Boris could not utter the decisive words,
rapturously and gratefully of the merits of her son and the
rare cases a localised abscess forms in the vein and points towards the
rare type of loose body, the surface of the synovial membrane is studded
rare. We have only seen them once--in a case of rodent cancer in the
rarefaction of the cancellous tissue in the vicinity of the joints; in
rarely takes place, although there is often an attempt at union by the
rate as the child, or more slowly. There is a decided tendency to
rate, until in October, at the end of the war, the debt stood at
rate-fixing untouched, much to the discontent of farmers and shippers.
rates fixed and the orders issued by that body. This measure was quickly
rates other than those published, and laid penalties upon the officers
rates. But the larger problem of the relation of the freedmen to the
rather than abolishing, the system of chattel servitude. The invention
rather than of what the generals were disputing about.
rather than the labors of Jesuit missionaries and French rangers, that
rather than the new national government, but in practice they added
rather tremulous voice to read the sheet from the beginning.
ratification of the Constitution; and a majority of them had served as
ratification of the Jay treaty twelve years later. In the third place,
ratification, and it was the spring of 1781, a few months before the
ratification. On August 28, 1920, the thirty-sixth state, Tennessee,
ratified as an amendment to the Constitution by the legislatures of the
ratified the treaty. In December, 1803, the French flag was hauled down
ratify the instrument to put it into effect. On April 30, 1789, George
ratifying the same.
ration of vodka. The campfires crackled and the soldiers' songs
rationally to direct his efforts towards the correction or removal of
rattling of wheels on the cobblestones, and the brilliant, hot
ravine, he even saw the hounds, and was expecting a fox to show itself
ravines and the copses, which at the end of August had still been
raw surface. The soft parts divided by the incision are sutured in
rays of the bright sun, rising slightly to the left behind Pierre,
rays shone into the open window, lighting up the room and part of
rays show a dark shadow corresponding to the ossified portion of the
rays, but to avoid damage to the adjacent and overlying tissues.
re-establishing les bons principes, and to the diplomatists of that
re-formed, and the French who had nearly cut our left flank in half
re-use it under the terms of the Project Gutenberg License included
re-use it under the terms of the Project Gutenberg License included
re-use it under the terms of the Project Gutenberg License included
re-use it under the terms of the Project Gutenberg License included
reach Smolensk, still less could he contemplate the burning of Moscow,
reach no clear solution of what puzzled him so, the wheel of fortune
reach the Pavlograd regiment, which was presumably somewhere in the
reach the bottom. Perhaps it was just the Cossack, Likhachev, who
reach the distal portions of the limbs.
reach the peripheral terminations in muscle and skin, and in course of
reached Braunau had halted half a mile from the town, waiting to be
reached Murat's detachment and the battle had not yet begun. In
reached Petersburg simultaneously with the Emperor's return--was
reached Vilna on the eleventh, and in his traveling sleigh drove
reached Voronezh in the middle of September. Princess Mary, having
reached across the table to clink glasses with the count, with the
reached by their own reasoning, repeated the argument he had already
reached by this procedure, the bone should be drilled in different
reached her from inside and outside the room and did not move. First
reached in value the cotton crop of 1850, the Ohio Valley furnished a
reached the Smolensk road they ran holding the clapper of their bell
reached the battery at which Prince Andrew had been when he examined
reached the farthest links of that chain. The tales passing from mouth
reached the foot of the knoll he was met by a dense crowd of Russian
reached the frontier of Louisiana. There they paused; but only for a
reached the landing. "I'd better go to my own room."
reached the walls of Smolensk.
reached. When the regeneration of the axis cylinders is complete,
reaches a free surface and ruptures externally. The direction in which
reaches it. The septic element must be eliminated by disinfecting the
reaches the matrix, and a drop or two of pus forms beneath the nail,
reaching the broad river Viliya, he stopped near a regiment of
reaching the raft first--stepped quickly forward to meet Alexander and
reaching the soft parts by the new bone formed by the periosteum. The
reaction against the worsening of their position they were all
reaction in the tissues in which it lodges, in the form of hyperaemia,
reaction occurred and the sovereigns once again all began to oppress
reaction of degeneration confirms the diagnosis of neuritis. In
reaction of degeneration develops, an operation may be performed, the
reaction of degeneration. In the common form of paralysis resulting from
reaction of the tissue elements to the irritant, and constitute the
reaction out of all proportion to the local lesion.
reaction. All the well-known people of that period, from Alexander and
reaction. Those who had championed the popular cause were imprisoned,
read Poor Liza aloud to her, and more than once interrupted the
read aloud. It was the eldest who was reading--the one who had met
read and discussed, together with the latest of Vasili Lvovich
read at the Empress'.) The art of his reading was supposed to lie in
read out the dispositions for the impending battle, under a heading
readers who still employ the old terms, these are given in brackets
readiness to give anything asked of him (he received the allowance
reading because of the emotions that choked him. Meeting at large
reading the Lives of the Saints. On hearing that Prince Andrew had
reading the first words of the Gospel: "In the beginning was the
reading the psalms.
reading these documents, and he wrote to the German that, despite
reading..." He showed her the broadsheet. "Count Rostopchin writes
ready for them at the arsenal: sabers, pistols, and muskets which
ready popular appeal. As late as 1884, a leader expressed the hope that
ready to carry out all the doctor's injunctions with precision, and
ready to die in defense of the hive. There is no longer the measured
ready to embrace the countess at the appropriate moment.
ready to help at any point where the conversation might happen to
ready to keep his word by preparing for the use of military and naval
ready to restore the Southern states. As the months went by, the
ready to weep. What about? His former love? The little princess? His
ready, and on all their faces he recognized the same eagerness that
ready. Napoleon was to enter the town next day. Pierre still
real strength removed and transferred to the Emperor. Toll,
real thoughts with the bitter conviction that he would not be
real war, but only a sort of puppet show at which the men of the day
real, living, and distinct group, but who were now for the most part
realise the gravity of his condition; sometimes there is delirium.
reality, like the retreat from Fili, it did not suggest itself to
realize because the fear was so much the stronger feeling. The
realize the significance of his appearance before her now. Prince
realize vividly his love devotion to the sovereign, Rostov pictured to
realized that it was the real living Natasha, and he was not surprised
realized. When he entered the Rostovs' drawing room Natasha was in her
really all the same to me when my son's fate is at stake." The
really galloped from the field of battle with the pale and terrified
really healed. From the absence of lymphatics in scar tissue, the
really was suffering at that moment. When the captain went out and
realm of statecraft was accomplished on the field of battle.
reaping, in place of the coveted revenue, rebellion.
reappeared in the doorway and behind hers other faces...
rear guard remained in the Dorogomilov suburb, where they had ample
reared almost throwing the major, and galloped aside. The horse's
rearguard all the freshness of atmosphere of the French army, which
reason he could not understand how the man who put them there behind
reason to burn the houses--in any case a troublesome and dangerous
reason to suspect the presence of infection. Glass or rubber tubes are
reason, but the love which I--while dying--first experienced when I
reason, fled back: they made a dash for the Kaluga road, and (after
reason, they had opposed the tariff of 1816 calculated to increase
reasonable thing for him to do--themselves turned to the right and
reasonableness. If the old man came round it would be all the better
reasoning was as follows: in every civilized society one portion of the
reasoning, is the supreme law of the land; it limits and binds all who
reasoning. There was no doubt about the purpose of this law, for it was
reasons for this are simple. The strategy of a campaign or of a single
reasons to rejoice or grieve over that occurrence independently of the
reassured as to the general course of affairs and as to the man to
rebellion against the United States, or any claim for the loss or
rebels against fate and in spite of the pleasures and distractions
recall it with satisfaction, because the self-sacrifice that fills
recall of this minister the British government selected another no less
recall them and the bright and boundless horizons they had
recalled Petya's mad action at the battle of Vyazma, where instead
recalled did not arouse the same poetic feeling as they experienced.
recalled in all its detail the night at Bald Hills before he had the
recalled to what desperate straits the colonial leaders were put in
receded to 156,000, affording all the outward signs for the belief that
receding line of candles reflected in the glasses and expecting
receive a refund of the money (if any) you paid for it by sending a
receive a refund of the money (if any) you paid for it by sending a
receive an equal share of the produce. At Plymouth, the Pilgrims
receive appropriate treatment. The diet should be simple and easily
receive lymph from the leg and foot; from them the lymph passes to the
receive the American minister, treated him in a humiliating way, and
receive the honor.
receive the work electronically in lieu of a refund.  If the second copy
receive the work electronically in lieu of a refund.  If the second copy
received an appointment on the headquarters staff, left for Turkey.
received and read the then famous rescript of the Emperor Alexander
received another letter about the Preussisch-Eylau battle from
received but was not yet in print, and Pierre, who was at the
received fifty dollars a year from it. Before the war each dollar would
received from the commander in chief of Moscow, via Yaroslavl, the sad
received him graciously, and promised to inform the Emperor. A few
received his receipt, he left at the end of November, without taking
received in return a pledge of loyalty from the Federation. Recognition
received in the Countess Bezukhova's salon was regarded as a diploma
received no communication from you, yet on the first of September I
received the largest vote yet cast for a presidential candidate. The
received the news with delight, he could not resist the temptation.
received the work on a physical medium, you must return the medium with
received the work on a physical medium, you must return the medium with
received tidings that the French had unexpectedly advanced, and had
received. The Emperor gave his consent. The aides-de-camp collected
receives her zealous sons into her arms, and through the gathering
receiving from all sides declarations of the people's loyalty, that
receiving it, you can receive a refund of the money (if any)
receiving it, you can receive a refund of the money (if any)
receiving the news he immediately dispatched Adjutant General
recent burn, or blood-stained, as in the blisters commonly accompanying
recent observers, notably John Fraser, do not accept the presence of
reception at Brunn. In the Emperors' suite were the picked young
reception over. The band played the polonaise in vogue at that time on
reception room where they had left Prince Vasili and the eldest
receptions and balls, the same French theater, the same court
recesses may not be overlooked. After removal of the pus, the wall of
recited to "a candid world." The remedies for the evils which they
reckon seriously with the enemy on the sea and make plans based upon the
reckoned that the convoy had fifteen hundred men. Denisov had two
reckoned that, if the South were to work up her own cotton, she would
reckoned with by the narrow Republican majority. As the resolution
reckoned, nearly six million people or about one-sixth of the population
reckoning up twenty to thirty rubles received for the most part in
recognisable, and before the joint assumes the deformed features which
recognise the position of a joint on passive movement (joint-sensation),
recognised according to whether the organisms concerned reach their seat
recognised as in men; it is usually met with on the labia; the
recognised at birth. The first symptom noticed is tenderness in the
recognised by the cessation of oozing from the divided vessels before
recognised in a skiagram. The soft parts of the heel are turned forwards
recognised in a vein, a finger should be placed over the vessel on the
recognised unless the bone is exposed by opening up the stump or the
recognised when it is pressed upon with the flat of the hand, and, more
recognised, especially in the knee, by the crepitating sensation
recognised, with a palpable thrill and a systolic bruit, loudest at the
recognised--(a) The _fibrous_, in which there are adhesions between
recognition as an independent power. Davis believed that the industrial
recognition of a gonorrhoeal discharge or of threads in the urine.
recognition or nonrecognition of something absolute, serving as the
recognizable. In the society in which Prince Andrew lived he had never
recognize any of them. It was not merely Dimmler and the Rostovs she
recognize his genius as the only explanation of the war carried on
recognize how erroneous is the specialist historians' view of the
recognize it as the resultant of the forces, that is, he has to
recognized Pierre in the darkness by his white hat.
recognized as a lawful authority and entitled to protection under the
recognized by the United States, held a precarious position which he
recognized the Panama revolutionists, their attention was drawn to the
recognized the importance of forming strong ties with the agrarian West
recognized the independence of Cuba and disclaimed "any disposition or
recognized the same facts. He said: "In the early days of the
recognized this fact. Some of the delegates, like Hamilton and Madison,
recognized. It was said to be unfair to make the employer pay for
recognizing his rights, and the killing of millions in Russia for
recognizing the former commander of Rostov's division, smiled and
recognizing the voice of his young prince.
recollection of how he was put in the sleigh or of the first three
recollection of the old prince, of Princess Mary, of the theater,
recommend through the Council to the several associated governments the
recommendation of Lincoln, transmitted to the states the thirteenth
recommendation to Bagration which the old countess at Anna
recommends the administration over long periods of guaiacol carbonate,
recompense for himself, democracy may subsist; not elsewhere." Amid the
reconciliation hopeless and independence inevitable." The news of this
reconciliation in the spring and summer of 1775, it had firmly resolved
reconstruction as the former slaves. On the day of emancipation, they
reconstruction in the South was slow and arduous. The first battle in
reconstruction program was clearly going to pieces, and the Supreme
reconstruction," also resorted to a famous provision known as "the
record their condemnation of the suspension of the _habeas corpus_ act,
record to the effect that acts of Congress in violation of the
record, "was exclusive of the number engaged in the production of many
recorded cases there is a dislocation of the head of the radius on one
recorded in which a _cartilaginous tumour_ growing from the synovial
records of the colonial period show that boatload after boatload left
records. They are written as with a sunbeam in the whole volume of human
recourse may be had to the use of an exploring needle.
recover. In regard to which I humbly submit my report, with the
recovered from as the child improves in health.
recovered his former position after the campaign, had returned to
recovered their former rights. During the same year, 1896, Idaho
recovering from the "sleeping" condition induced by prolonged pressure
recovers. In other cases the temperature rises, the pulse becomes rapid,
recovery usually takes place, but slight opacities, especially in the
recovery, every effort should be made to maintain the nutrition of the
recrudescence of rickets which had been present in childhood. The
recruiting. None of them had yet seen the manifesto, but they all knew
recruitment so as to avoid active service. The old prince and his
recruits were found. The advocates of a high protective tariff and the
rectum and large intestine, and these should be treated on the same
recumbent position, with the foot of the bed raised to facilitate the
recur, the wound must be reopened, and ligatures applied to the bleeding
recurrence of boils about the neck, re-infection frequently takes place
recurrence or from metastases in the lungs or elsewhere. Following
recurrence, so that high amputation is the only treatment to be
recurrent pulsation may only be temporary; the formation of laminated
recurs. This does not necessarily imply failure to cure, as the
red campfires were growing paler and dying down. High up in the
red corpuscles, setting free haemoglobin which lodges in the epithelial
red corpuscles; while, if a blood-clot be broken down and the debris
red halo round the candle, and heard the rustle of the cockroaches and
red was running through the marsh. The French were evidently firing
red, ragged, and everted, and the ulcer increases in size by spreading
red-spotted Erza passed them, got within a length, flew at the hare
red; in the majority there is a considerable dash of blue, especially in
redder faces, the guests returned to the drawing room and to the
reddish-brown mist. Heavy night dews alone refreshed the earth. The
redeem his pledge to end wars by forming a League of Nations to keep the
redeem in coin the United States legal tender notes then outstanding on
redemption of the desert areas of the West. The proceeds from the sale
redness of the skin, especially over a superficial bone, such as the
redness to contrast more than usual with his gray hair. At the ladies'
redness, and swelling along the line of a venous trunk, and a rapidly
redoubled their efforts to preserve the equality of the states. The
redoubt and come into line with the rest of the forces.
redoubt but had begun the attack next morning, no one would have
redoubt while the divisions of Morand and Gerard were to advance
redounded to the advantage of American shipbuilders and the producers
reduced by the systematic use of rubber gloves by house-surgeons,
reduced the number of warships. They had objected to excise taxes,
reduced to the ranks, took a French officer prisoner in my presence
reduced to the ranks; Anatole was in the army somewhere in the
reduces the immediate loss of blood to a minimum, and the bleeding from
reducing it to the slenderest proportions; the formation of bone from
reduction of the dislocation, the range of movement gradually diminishes
redundant granulations at the mouth of the sinus. If a sinus passes
refer to the essence of man's free will but its manifestation in the
reference must be made to the influence of irritation. This is probably
reference of the measure to the voters at the polls for approval or
reference to any apportionment among the states on the basis of
referendum allows citizens who disapprove any act passed by the
referred not to her but to the movements of Mademoiselle Bourienne's
referred to Anatole as a "pupil") "for the sake of my beautiful
referred to has been followed by such an amount of improvement that the
referred to looting by the Russian troops. At the end of the report
referred to the fact that the Emperor Napoleon had resented the demand
referred to works on military surgery. Experience has shown that the
referred to. (3) Children are more liable to succumb to shock during the
referring to the Frenchmen who had made the demands as "Mr. X, Mr. Y,
referring to the Saxony china dishes.
refine ores. The ranches supplied sheep and cattle for the packing
reflect anew on the meaning of the phenomena of life; but knowing by
reflect on or command what would result from the common activity;
reflected the provincial and agricultural interest.
reflected, "there is no riding round it now. I must look for the
reflected, glancing at those near him and at the troops who were
reflection from the others. All was blended into one brilliant
reflections on the unsatisfactory results of the battles at Krasnoe,
reflections, she suddenly came into his mind as she was at the moments
reflex interference with the trophic innervation of the muscles. It is
reform designed to meet it, which characterized the opening years of the
reformed, no regeneration of secreting tissue takes place. After the
reformers added harsh and acrid criticism of the old parties and
reformers in his own party. The Democrats on their side were able to
reformers, "we must make attractive careers in the government work for
reforming party cordially welcomed and courted him, the first place
reforms were being pushed forward with the greatest energy. That
reforms, such as the initiative, referendum, and recall, the abolition
refrain from lifting, nor is the air in which I lifted it the same
refrained from seizing Chinese territory or ports. Moreover, the
refresh, and support me in the path of virtue. In his presence doubt
refreshed by inhaling the aromatic autumn air, when even the nights
refund.  If you received the work electronically, the person or entity
refund.  If you received the work electronically, the person or entity
refuse Iogel and asked Sonya to dance. Denisov sat down by the old
refuse a truce and sent his adjutant to Kutuzov to report the offer he
refuse another, or all the carts and one's own carriages as well.
refuse my brother?" And in all this Princess Mary saw the hand of
refuse the wounded who asked for a lift.
refused and were fired upon by the national guard. This "massacre," as
refused to let the country forget that the Democratic candidate, Grover
refused to ratify the treaty. World politics then became an issue in the
refuted the charge that the retreat through New Jersey was a disaster
regard as syphilitic any lesion which happens to be located on the
regard as the cause of their sufferings. Deprived of power and
regard, and so on the date set the promise was fulfilled. The
regarded as being of the nature of reactions against accumulations of
regarded as dating from an early period of foetal life. Unlike the
regarded as forming the deeper layer of the periosteum.
regarded as merely a hindrance and obstacle to the impending war.
regarded as the key to the whole position.
regarded as the primary lesion of a second attack of syphilis, but the
regarded as the settled policy of the country." With equal confidence,
regarded as useless and harmful--gave his approval, that is, to the
regarded many things as impossible. The small bands that had started
regarded the activity of those men as representing the activity of the
regarded the appointment of a large number of federal judges during the
regarded. So that the greater the conception of necessity the
regardless of the presence of strangers and in a particularly resolute
regenerated to any but a moderate degree. If the ends of a divided
regiment and are expecting him every day. The count wanted to leave
regiment without charging anything for the show.
regiment, am fond of the officers, and I fancy the men also like me. I
regiment, in comparison with others that had reached Braunau at the
regiment, nor about the general state of affairs, and when Rostov
regiment, saying he was not such a fool as to slave at the front
regiment; so the worse the condition it was in, the better pleased the
regimental commander, but now that the commander in chief addressed
regimental commander, overtaking the third company on its way to its
regimental life, Rostov felt the joy and relief a tired man feels on
regimental matters without looking at the Russian general.
regimental music and now the roar of many voices shouting "Hurrah!" to
regimental music he heard from the left side of the field, and felt
regiments began to disperse among the wealthy and deserted houses, the
regiments none at all, as reported by the division commanders,
regiments saluting, and this sound rapidly came nearer along the whole
region of Kentucky or the rich, black soil of Illinois--the painted
region of the face, neck, or flexures of joints, much deformity and
region of the groin in disease of the spine or pelvis, where there may
region of the mouth or nose, or from an operation wound in this area.
region of the shoulder. The vessel may be damaged by the head of a
region was merely one of the territories of the United States, the
region, and may be connected with one or other of the extensor tendons.
region, the last in the history of America, was marked by all the frenzy
region; a Samoan island was brought under the flag; and the Hawaiian
regret at being prevented from taking part in the coming battle, but
regret at leaving home for the first time in his life on bad terms
regretting not having done so, she again passed in fancy to the time
regular army, and besides this, nine men in every thousand for the
regular tap of the heel and creak of the toe as gladly as she had to
regular tramp of feet beating the ground in unison, one seemed to hear
regularly on his bare back. The man shrieked unnaturally. A stout
regulars enlisted for the war, thoroughly trained and paid according to
regulate interstate and foreign commerce and commerce with the Indians.
regulate the balance between the production and the loss of body heat.
regulate the complicated rates of railway companies; to safeguard health
regulation by the government. This, he contended, would preserve the
regulation came from the West. There the farmers, in the early
regulation, that the formation of utility companies should be under
regulations until such time as the United States of America extend their
reheat the samovar for the doctor when the latter awoke.
rein in, and turning back drew up at the crossing of the old
reinforced in the same year by a law creating a Federal Trade Commission
reinforcements when they already have half the army directed against a
reins, he galloped after the general, causing the staff officers to
reins, were all wet, slippery, and sodden, like the ground and the
rejected that theory as vigorously as they rejected the doctrines of an
rejected, leaving the President a choice between war and compromise.
rejected. And this was not the result of logical reasoning but was a
rejected. Not at all changed in his opinion by the outcome of his
rejoice at his success. In the course of conversation he mentioned
rejoice in them now! And yet really the anxiety is greater now than
relapses occur after the treatment with alcohol, renewed freedom from
related to the epiphysial cartilage, and it was suggested by Virchow
related with gusto how in Galicia he had managed to deal with the
relates to the filling of vacancies; proclaimed May 31, 1913.
relating to the condition of the troops on their arrival, and the
relating to the court.
relating to the personage he was referring to.
relating to the young man's recent loss by the death of Count Bezukhov
relation of the forces of nature to inevitability, or of the essence
relation to _epithelioma of a mucous surface_--for example, the palate,
relation to the New South that Cincinnati, Chicago, Cleveland, and
relation to the bones of the fingers, where it may become adherent and
relations had been given to understand that the fate of the young girl
relations in the industrial world. In brief, the American Federation of
relations of the colonists to the Indians. The problem was presented in
relations to which she had to reply; the room in which little Nicholas
relations with Austria and the hope of an alliance with her.
relations with the outlying dominions. These were furthermore
relations, the Rostovs, with whom she stayed when in the town and
relationships of the capsule and synovial membrane to the surrounding
relative decline. Thousands of farmers cultivating land of the lower
relative importance of the two factors in the causation of the
relaxation of the dartos during the first few hours after operation
relaxation of the muscular coat.
relay of horses had been sent up the highroad to meet the German
release him. These measures were not confined to the theater of war nor
release them from the Land Bank, but would probably never even inquire
released the men, refused to make the required apology for the incident.
released, the face and the neck as low down as the level of the
releasing from the flogging bench a stout man with red whiskers, in
relentless campaign, to carry a motion rescinding the rule.
relentless in its pursuit of Confederates, pushed through the fourteenth
reliable than either of these, the mobility, the tumour slipping away
reliance can be placed on the presence or absence of a scar on the
relief and the expression of its mother's sympathy while she rubs
relief is experienced from the use of a long splint, or slinging the leg
relief may last for from six months to three years; if the pain returns,
relieve the oppressed, to create greater equality of opportunity, to
relieving pain and in arresting the progress of the infection. If the
relieving symptoms and complications; removal of one of the tumours is
religion and growing prosperous in the manufacture of fine linen and
religion and learning might be cherished on the frontier as in the
religion, abridging the freedom of speech or of the press or the right
religious and economic reasons sent them across the sea. Their Scotch
religious faith. By one of the strange fortunes of history, this
religious toleration to the Catholics in Canada, extended the boundaries
reluctant to say more in the presence of a stranger.
reluctantly, on what he thought right. The steward promised to do
remain freely available for generations to come.  In 2001, the Project
remain freely available for generations to come.  In 2001, the Project
remain here, while I myself go away leaving them to the mercy of the
remain hidden below the mucous membrane and give no evidence of their
remain in contact, they become united, and the conducting paths are
remain stunted throughout life as in rickety dwarfs (Fig. 133), or the
remain viable in the dry state for long periods, even up to a year, but
remain with him during the battle or to join the rearguard and have an
remainder of the Louisiana territory was transferred to Spain and French
remainder, as the creditors threatened, he re-entered the government
remained before him with the force of reality and drew nearer.
remained behind, and the monotonous tramp of thousands of feet
remained in force, and only the presence of visitors hindered his
remained in the caleche, but at Mytishchi the wounded man himself
remained in the future.
remained in the room and persistently talked about Moscow amusements
remained in the same place and without answering drew out a
remained intact and that during Napoleon's occupation the
remained last at the Augezd dam, rallying the regiments, saving what
remained near the post, and no one drove him away.
remained on the couch or on the lounge chair in the drawing room and
remained on the farther side of the bridge facing the enemy, who could
remained silent. And what do you think, Count? The next day it was not
remaining alone in the little room, he walked up and down for a long
remaining long unaffected. In a considerable number of the recorded
remains as a _sinus_. The persistence of suppuration is due to the
remains circumscribed, has the same characters as a pathological
remains incomprehensible. And yet more incomprehensible is the
remains intact. The middle coat contracts and retracts, and the
remains of the papular eruption. The term _ecthyma_ is applied when the
remains perfectly dry being left undisturbed. The value of a general
remark of the count's, or even the manifesto itself should no better
remark that a movement through the woods was dangerous and might
remark to him, pointing to the gallant Apsherons.
remarkable feature of the condition is that the effusion into the joint
remarkable for their tenacity of life, and for the resistance they offer
remarkable form of the disease is sometimes met with, to which the term
remarkable how completely even the most deformed joints may recover
remarkable resemblance to the preceding movement from west to east.
remarkable. In such cases the X-rays will reveal the presence of the
remarkably intelligent woman, they talked with the same ecstasy in
remarked the old prince. "There in Petersburg they are always writing-
remarked the old soldier, yawning.
remarked, the friends of good government considered "every institution
remarks in two languages could be heard. They were looking at the glow
remarks were tossed aside each time like a cork thrown out of the
remedied by getting rid of contributing causes and by disinfecting the
remedied by osteotomy or by a wedge-shaped resection of the bone, with
remedies. In severe cases the application of hot cloths over the heart,
remedy in the act of 1763, which declared void all colonial laws
remember having heard the slightest sound of the shots. He only saw
remember how we and Nicholas, all three of us, talked in the sitting
remember that from the beginning to the end the British ministry at home
remember the recent days of patriotic elation and ardor, hard to
remember, yes, I remember you with the standard!" said Kutuzov, and
remembered a general impression of the misfortunes and sufferings of
remembered only the dull gray weather now rainy and now snowy,
remembered that Anatole Kuragin was expecting the usual set for
remembered the days when he first loved her. He thought of her
remembered the general plan sent him from Petersburg) "they have
remembered the last interview he had had with the old prince at the
remembered the meadow, the wormwood, the field, the whirling black
remembered the moment at the ambulance station when, at the sight of
remembered, a system of central control over the colonies, but Americans
reminder of winter. On entering the forest the horses began to snort
remnant, especially after the Berezina, on which (in consequence of
remnants of the once glorious Spanish empire--the island of Cuba.
removal by operation is necessarily incomplete, the prospect of cure is
removal from the army does not produce the slightest stir--a blind man
removal from the body. Noguchi has succeeded in obtaining pure cultures
removal into the hut had made him groan aloud and again lose
removal of irritation by the escape of pus, and the casting off of
removal of pellets from the tissues.
removal of the bone--a procedure known as _cheilotomy_. Loose bodies and
removal of the damaged ends, should be united by sutures. When it is
removal of the diseased tissues. In the knee, excision is rarely
removal of the limb. Every surgeon can recall cases in which a timely
removal of the scapula was followed two years later by metastases and
removal only by the difficult process of impeachment. After a law had
remove all the holy relics, the gunpowder, munitions, and money, and
remove pressure from prominent parts. Absolute dryness of the skin is
remove the taxpaying limitation on the suffrage: "What does the delegate
remove the tuberculous tissue with the sharp spoon or knife, and treat
remove the unhealthy granulations lining it, by means of the sharp
remove them, the base or neck of the tumour is perforated in many
removed after he lies down at night. In this way the vessels are never
removed and he is appointed... "Well and then?" asked the other voice.
removed at the same time.
removed it from the control of authorities locally elected. It provided
removed, and in tumours near the surface of the body, the overlying skin
removed; the thread is brought out at the drain-opening, and at the end
removing the clothing, the whole of the burned area is gently, but
removing the dead part.
removing the embolus. The artery is exposed at the seat of impaction
removing them by surgical measures, and has led to the practice of
render amputation compulsory in the majority of such cases.
rendered to the Creator for His help and for the victory.
rendering ligation of the vessel in the ordinary way well-nigh
rendering the opinion of the Court, Marshall cited no precedents. He
rendering them aseptic, on account of the uncertainty as to their depth,
renders the skin pliant and movable so that it can be pinched up between
renewed confidence to the development of the policies he had so far
rent the country in 1800 when Jefferson rode a popular wave to victory,
rents from lands sold to farmers. By the outbreak of the Revolution
reopening of the government mints of the world to silver would bring it
reopening the ancient contest; they made no attempt to reduce Southern
reorganized. The posts left vacant by Bagration, who had been
repair. In highly vascular parts, such as the face, the reparative
repair. Of these, one of the most important is the presence of
repaired with exuberant callus. The new bone may be in the form of
reparative process, presenting analogies with the union of fracture.
repealed the Embargo law and substituted a Non-intercourse act
repeat after someone who read aloud an oath of fidelity to the laws of
repeated from the opening words of the manifesto:
repeated gentle stretching of the nerve. This may be carried out by
repeated injury. Ossification in the crureus or vastus lateralis muscle
repeated it. Princess Mary had sought the meaning of his words in
repeated minor injuries affecting the joint and its vicinity, such as
repeated one and the same thing a hundred times, remarked to his
repeated requests to be told the whole truth, expressed ill-will on
repeated the words he uttered.
repeated the words of a prayer, but she could not pray. She felt
repeated these words the captain wiped his eyes and gave himself a
repeated, accentuating the u: "I think, however, now that he lays down
repeated; the pain attending them diminishes, but the joint becomes the
repeating in a low voice the same words several times over.
repeating pertinaciously while he shook Pierre by the shoulder without
repeating the procedure. From two to eight or ten sittings may be
repeating the words: "For our country's welfare? Well, what is it?
repelled him. The tune he was whistling, his gait, and the gesture
repetition of the German general's demand that he should join forces
repetition of the Texas affair in a small theater, was immediately
replace those who had been killed, and before the men had had food and
replaced by connective tissue, which forms a bond of union between the
replaced by fibrous tissue, which permanently occludes the end of the
replaced by others from a reserve gun carriage, the wounded were
replacement and absorption of the muscle fibres. The bone is spongy in
replacing them by a new conception, and the logic of the situation has
replenished, the slain reckoned up, new officers appointed to
replied Boris, betraying neither annoyance at the prince's brusque
replied Michaud in a decided tone, but glancing at the Emperor he
replied Platon, and at once resumed the story he had begun.
replied that the order was to shoot those who lagged behind. Pierre
replied that the question was not whether they were new or old but
replied that, if possession was the object of the invasion, he could
replied the peasant, moving away.
replied to the countess' inquiry about Caulaincourt. "Looks as if he
replied: "I think the battle will be lost, and so I told Count Tolstoy
replies of a man who, watching the movements of a herd of cattle and
replies the sound of cries and blows were heard. On returning to lunch
replies to both generals. Then he told him all he knew of the French
reply from anyone. The question for him now was: "Have I really
reply in the same tone.
reply to his look, and went still faster along the passage.
reply, but hardly had he uttered the word Poltava before
reply--which he would not have received, for the princess was unable
reply. Nicholas felt the situation to be intolerable and went to
report directed the commander in chief's attention to some standards
report of a shot, and our troops could be seen hurrying to the
report of my brother's betrothal to the little Rostova. I do not think
report of the Russian losses, among which figured the names of
report on the position of affairs. Everything precious and valuable
report, and a bullet whizzing high up in the mist with a plaintive
report. A briefer treatment in Elson, _History of the United States_,
report. The battle had begun! Prince Andrew turned his horse and
reported direct to him. He wrote to Arakcheev, the Emperor's
reported of another that: "The priest whom I found and invited to
reported the incident to a general on the staff.  The state of
reported to him, and then joined the adjutants listening to what the
reported to their French countrymen marvelous tales. At the frugal table
reporting matters to the higher command, to attack and seize that
reports current in town she learned how the Rostovs were situated, and
reports followed at intervals, and the bullets passed somewhere in the
reports of the Russians still holding their ground--a terrible feeling
reports of the cruelty of the enemy and of the war were contradicted
reports revealed that over twenty per cent of the men of the draft army
reports were written on the twentieth, and during all this time not
reprehensible than attempts "to array class against class, 'the classes
representation in the House. Southern leaders, while protesting against
representation of the state in Congress shall be reduced in the
representation to states in the Senate and to population in the House,
representative but one of the great century, and that it is his own
representative he considered himself to be, in the following words:
representative of the national war but to die, and Kutuzov died.
representative to the provincial legislature. The tenants on the New
representative; and until such enumeration shall be made, the State of
representatives among the states according to their respective
representatives of the "aristocracy" made their last successful stand.
representatives of the minor and dissenting parties, he dignified by a
representatives of this party, wrote a letter to the Emperor which
representatives to serve on the board of directors who managed the
represented among the early colonists?
represented as the product of many forces, can no longer, it would
represented by a fibrous cord, the cut end of which is often slightly
represented by the diagonal of a parallelogram of forces.
represented the terrestrial globe and the stick in his other hand a
represented. Some were impatient with mild devices; the majority favored
representing Great Britain, settled the long-standing dispute between
representing every shade of opinion proclaimed the government an
reprieves; he was head of the highest court; he was commander-in-chief
reprimand from the Emperor for having moved his army along the
reproach that boy in the fur-lined coat had turned upon him. "But I
reproach, and envy of another's health. Rostov went to the middle of
reproachful envious eyes that were fixed upon him, and went out of the
reproachful tone of a man who has repeated the same thing more than
reproachfully to the man who had spoken of frozen feet.
reproduces the local signs and symptoms. Where the connective tissue is
republic adrift upon the stormy sea of international politics without a
republic in order to enforce the payment of its obligations; for such a
republic is born a pigmy," wrote the Spanish ambassador to his royal
republic, Jefferson believed to be agriculture. The spirit of
republic. As women were now admittedly earning their own way in the
republic. Fortunes were made and lost gambling on the prices of public
republic. Only by the most vigorous action was Governor Bowdoin able to
republican principle, not then introduced into all the states, of the
repugnance, and closing his eyes quickly fell back on the carriage
repulsed, Campan wounded, and Davout killed; yet at the very time
repulsed, he had lost more than half his men. He said the attack had
repulsion rising up in her for the whole household, because they
request that he would take no part in the matter, Rostov agreed to
request, of the work in its original "Plain Vanilla ASCII" or other
request, of the work in its original "Plain Vanilla ASCII" or other
requesting him to join up with their divisions to attack the convoy.
require secrecy; and the yeas and nays of the members of either House on
required Congress to make both gold and silver the money of the land,
required by the Constitution; the suppression of the abolitionists; and
required by the magnitude of the military task. It was fortune that
required to bring it about appeared to be a treaty annexing Texas to the
required to pay the huge sum of $15,500,000 to cover the damages wrought
required to relieve the pain.
requires to be considered in relation to the conditions present in each
requiring millions and even billions of capital. The banks, once an
requiring the nomination of candidates for the Senate by the direct
requisitions from the king to the colonial assemblies for supplies, but
rescript to Field Marshal Prince Saltykov, in which he insisted on the
resecting portions of them, in relieving the spasm. In a case of spastic
resection of the shaft is also indicated if the opening of the medullary
resemblance to his beautiful sister, but yet more by the fact that
resemblance to the normal tissues of the body. They grow slowly, and are
resemble a rod--_bacilli_; (3) the spiral or wavy forms--_spirilla_.
resemble coarse leather. On the wall of the chest this condition is
resemble drum-sticks, and the thumb the clapper of a bell. The nails are
resembles an imitation of the French military code and from the
resembling a perforating ulcer of the foot.
resembling that of the corpus luteum. It originates in the corium and
resembling that of the pyogenic arthritis of infants. This has been
resembling that on the thin Frenchman's face, Pierre pushed his way in
resembling the line separating the living from the dead--lay between
resembling the shell of a limpet. If the crust is detached, a sharply
resembling those of urticaria--may appear on the body, but they usually
resented the presence of this "traitor" in Paris, and Louis had to be
reservation. The absence of suffering, the satisfaction of one's needs
reservations or objections. The next day the treaty was presented to the
reservations which would impair its essential integrity." The Democratic
reserve board composed entirely of government officials. To prevent the
reserve law of December, 1913. This measure, one of the most interesting
reserve tomorrow," he thought. "I'll ask leave to go to the front,
reserved because in the depth of my soul I feel too near to him
reserves to break the enemy's line, and a cavalry attack by "the men
reserving to the federal government the ownership of coal, water power,
residual because it has its origin in the remains of the original
resignation to the will of God. "If you do not understand these
resignation, or inability to discharge the powers and duties of the said
resist the Stamp Act to the bitter end. These popular societies were
resistance on opinion in England was telling. Commerce with the colonies
resistance under the banner of a state would not be rebellion or
resistance unlawful, riotous, and treasonable. The correct way, in their
resistance." Editorially, the New York _Times_ declared: "It is a
resisted by dense bone, which obliterates the medullary canal. Although
resisted, preferring to rely upon the cheaper service rendered by
resisting power of the system to pathogenic organisms, an artificial
resolute in the discharge of duty, ran out and touching Pierre lightly
resolute. He ran round to the other side of the lodge and was about to
resolutely working his way with his elbows, but the woman just in
resolution declaring that the policy to be adopted in the Philippines
resolution in the Emperor's eyes, Michaud--quoique etranger, russe
resolution passed by Congress on July 22, 1861, declaring the sole
resolution turning to the sergeant major. "Tell them to send me to
resolution, did not disturb the good humor of those who again cheered
resolutions and by the New England Federalists during the war of 1812,
resolutions and proceedings of the colonists denying such authority were
resolutions condemning the acts as unconstitutional and calling upon the
resolutions that Patrick Henry uttered the immortal challenge: "Caesar
resolved to take only two thousand and leave the rest to repay the
resort. Maine, separated from the parent state of Massachusetts, was
resorted to an ingenious parliamentary trick. To the appropriation bill
resounded even more merrily than on the previous night. Denisov
resounded on the planks of the bridge, and the squadron, officers in
resounded. The column moved forward without knowing where and
resounding parquet but treading with each step from the heel to the
resounding voice, apparently to preclude the possibility of not
resources created hundreds of huge fortunes which made the accumulations
resources, human and material, were mobilized. The navy was enlarged, a
resources, in industry, and in armed forces. By the blockade of Southern
respect to Kutuzov, could so create an impression that the old
respected less than the others forced his way in to see him and,
respectful attention of a relative. The count, pipe in hand, was
respectful expression, looked observantly and sympathetically at the
respectfully over the outstretched hand and not keeping it waiting a
respectfully received the blessing first of one and then of another
respectfully to her, and seated herself in an armchair beside the
respectfully when the Military Governor, having stayed about half an
respecting Great Britain put them in danger of prison. The Sedition law,
respects to the aunt and then brought back to the general circle.
respects. Whole sections of the poorest land went almost out of
respiration deeper and more regular; the temperature rises to 100 o F. or
respiration is irregular, shallow, and sighing; and the temperature may
respiration produce a rise and fall in the stream which may resemble
respiration, so that the patient not only has the greatest difficulty in
respiration. Unless the patient is in hospital with skilled assistance
responded Oliver Ellsworth, the distinguished spokesman of Connecticut.
responded to his greeting. When the Emperor's health was drunk,
responded to the challenge. The convention of the Old Dominion, on May
response in Congress. Under the leadership of Senator Newlands, of
response in the towns of the East where the old aristocracy had been put
response to the President's summons to arms in a war "for democracy" and
responsibility for all the calamities that would follow the
responsibility. These temporary aims are like the broom fixed in front
responsible for the formation of aneurysm.
responsible for the mischief, or to obtain a history of some antecedent
responsible for the reaction that led Congress to abandon Lincoln's
rest as the chief of natural therapeutic agents was the theme of John
rest from life's turmoil, for in his mind the memory of Joseph
rest is lost. We seized the children. But not Katie! Ooh! O
rest of the army, which--as was learned from spies and prisoners-
rest of the household, and the whole family moved from Marya
rest of the mummers seated themselves in the other two sleighs.
rest of the world for such manufactures as are produced in the mother
rest submissively under British guns until the searching party had pried
rest until the end of his administration was in sight. He then listened
rest upon it, the more Masonic ground on which he stood gave way under
rest, and the little countess could be driven home in a trap."
rest, as at the anus or at the angle of the mouth, they are apt to
rest, went in to dinner. He was seated in the place of honor between
rest. Many have died last days on the road or at the bivouacs. This
rest. On the march from Vyazma to Tsarevo-Zaymishche he rode his light
rested on the little princess. She felt, as courtiers do when the Tsar
resting his head on his elbow lay silent beside the campfire,
resting in his study. Sonya sat in the drawing room at the round
resting on the back of a chair, especially in the deep sleep of
restoration of Belgium; righting the wrong done to France in 1871 in the
restoration of Poland, and the reaction of 1820 and later) also
restoration of public credit. In view of the jealousies of the states it
restoration of the Bourbons plainly assert that these events were
restoration of the functions of the limb, and to the prevention of
restoration of the monarchy, control of the press was once more placed
restore peace and give independence to the island." The American
restore the duchy of Oldenburg; for had he not wished to serve, and
restored by ingrowth from the margins, and there is evidence that some
restored the spirit if not the entire letter of self-government. In the
restoring the condition of affairs before Grenville and Townshend
restrain his wish for a gallop across a level field; and in the same
restraining his tears of pity for the Emperor, he rode on in utter
restraints of trade" until after the French war, when the British
restrict the term to inflammation in the first of these situations.
restricted to the removal of the main tumour. They are not encapsulated,
restricted to the removal or division of any mass of bone that
restricting the weight, dignity, and activity of the national
restriction of the spoils system, the enlargement of direct popular
restriction on the suffrage, though lowered slightly in some states, was
restrictions on the states would not be dead letters, the federal
restrictions. Rumors of the war with Bonaparte and his invasion were
restrictive laws was that of June 29, 1767, which placed the enforcement
rests only on his heels and occiput--the position of _opisthotonos_.
rests, and a campfire was built before it. They beat the tattoo,
result but the battle would still not take place. It would not take
result for the Russians was, and was bound to be, that we were brought
result for the most part from yielding of the softened bones under the
result from pressure on nerves. Such bones as the sternum and vertebrae
result from spasm of the urethral muscles, and necessitate the use of
result from the general and local therapeutics available at such places
result from ulcerated lesions of the scalp. The _nail-folds_
result in occlusion of the pupil and permanent impairment or loss of
result in the formation of a haematoma.
result in the formation of chalky tumours, sometimes of considerable
result in the formation of visible nodular swellings, varying in size
result is that the bones may never attain their normal length, and they
result of a twelve years' agitation, passed the Married Woman's Property
result of accidental stabs and of suicidal or homicidal injuries. The
result of accidental wounds, especially above the wrist, where the
result of his own wrongdoing, and at the bottom of his heart he had
result of injury or disease, it is capable of being reproduced, the
result of progressive increase in size of the tumour, or progressive
result of pyogenic infection following upon sloughing of the overlying
result of the constrained, activity of man? That is a question for
result of the displacement of occluding clots, and in many cases the
result that the muscular tone is diminished and there is a marked fall
result when one half of the epiphysial cartilage is destroyed and the
result, for example, of increased activity of the pituitary in
resultant equal to a thousand times A--the historian is again
resulted chiefly from the Emperor's presence in the army with his
resulted in necrosis at the sawn section of the bone. (Anatomical
resulting from chronic ulcer with venous congestion of the leg, and the
resulting from haemorrhage depends as much on the rapidity with which the
resulting from several other forces, like the movement of the
resulting from the _sudden_ occlusion of the main artery of a part,
resulting from the alternate action of cold and heat on the distal parts
resulting from the circular constriction of a limb _in utero_ by
resulting from the extension of a purulent blister beneath the nail
resulting from toxin absorption, and it is difficult to estimate the
resulting in the formation of cysts.
resulting movement being attended with severe pain, wakens the patient
resulting, will least interfere with its usefulness. The elbow, for
results depended upon the making of new laws, his progress was slow.
results from some primary source of pyogenic infection in the skin. This
results from the _infection of a wound_. In exceptional instances,
results in deformity and shortening of the limb (Fig. 119).
resumed their places and the service continued. During this interval
resumed, and no longer in the unpleasantly hostile tone of Nicholas'
resumption act of 1875; the issue of legal tender notes by the
retain discharges, entirely fail to meet the indications for the
retain their normal temperature, the pulse is unchanged, and there is no
retained full self-government on the eve of the Revolution. They alone
retainers, shouted authoritatively that the superfluous ones should
retains its sovereignty, freedom, and independence." The Constitution
retaliated by his Berlin Decree of November, 1806, blockading the
retaliation followed. So alarming did the clashes become that in 1870
reticule and, having given them to the rosy Natasha, who beamed with
retire from the army, but wrote to his parents that he was sorry
retire more to the left and more to the south, worrying the enemy from
retire. Prince Andrew took out his notebook and, leaning on the
retired naval man was speaking very boldly, as was evident from the
retired naval officer, was speaking in one of the rooms, and a small
retract and contract--for example, in the scalp, in the penis, and in
retraction depending on the length of the muscle, and the extent of its
retraction of the muscular coat, instead of diminishing the calibre of
retreat and leave the pickets."
retreat by the Smolensk road.
retreat of our rear guard (that is, immediately after the fight at
retreat we have lost by fatigue and left in the hospital more than
retreat, or was it the evening before, when I had a nap and told
retreat, the burning of Moscow, the capture of marauders, the
retreated beyond the dip in the ground, as a heavy fire had been
retreating against their will. A few minutes after the Emperor had
retreating soldiers, ordering them back. Bagration rode up to the
retreating without a battle, namely the evacuation and burning of
retreating, which is the only thing we need fear, or he is changing
retreats after battles, the blow dealt at Borodino and the renewed
retrieving the Rostovs' affairs was by Nicholas marrying a rich woman,
return at once. But when he saw the French and saw Tikhon and
return circulation in the large veins, and so to increase the flow of
return from the long trading voyage in the Pacific.
return it to the blood stream by way of the thoracic duct. These lymph
return to the Company the regular import duties, levied in England, on
return to the general and eternal source." These thoughts seemed to
return to the normal, some of the extravasated blood being organised,
return to your work, your houses, your shops, where the protection
returned and choosing an opportune moment, ventured to draw the
returned and entered his shop. On seeing the soldiers he was about
returned from the council, tired and exhausted but eager and proud
returned to Petersburg both the magnate and the prince were there, and
returned to the group where the vicomte was still talking, and again
returned to the middle of the stage, and began jumping and striking
returned to the patient with a more tranquil mind.
returned to their places one after the other before the service was
returned, and over the bottle of wine conversation between the three
returning from the theater, had had supper and were grouped round
returning to his hobby; "tell me how the Germans have taught you to
returning to the subject of "advisers" which evidently occupied him.
reveal the significance of railways for American life. It does not
revealed a long list of abuses committed by the railways against
revealed by the historic journey of Zebulon Pike in 1805 and by American
revealed in the collections of women's letters, articles, songs, dramas,
revealed to him; but most of all, he felt joyful that the moment had
revealed to me. Adonai is the name of the creator of the world. Elohim
revealed. He was now concerned only with the nearest practical matters
revealing the softened portion of catgut, which can be pulled out in
revenue with which to pay off the public debt; consequently it thought
revenues and also meeting the most extravagant demands of the
reverberating, filling the whole empty ballroom, and slowly dying
reverent tenderness with which Natasha spoke of him, the boy, who
reverential faces, emptied them, rolling the vodka in their mouths,
reverse. I lived for glory.--And after all what is glory? The same
revising the tariff on the theory that it ought to be reformed by its
revision." The Democrats made much of the implication and the
revoir!"--and she left the hall.
revoir, Beauche; I'll keep the best palace in Moscow for you! Au
revoir. Good luck!... Did you see the Emperor? Vive l'Empereur!...
revoked the Massachusetts charter of 1691 and provided furthermore that
revolt the French had been encouraged by the outcome of the American
revolt, Aguinaldo, had been invited to join the American forces in
revolting. And the escort, as if afraid, in the grievous condition
revolution in it. To depart from the authorization laid down by the
revolution in the union, changing public policies and constitutional
revolution that followed the war."
revolution, headed by Americans, broke out, ending in the overthrow of
revolution, were drawn into the path that led to the great decision. In
revolution. The ruling class, the law, and the government of the old
revolutionary elements. Ordinarily the provincial convention was merely
revolutionary in tone, called down upon the extremists the condemnation
revolutionary movement. The contest between the rebels and the Spanish
revolves quietly is one of the most essential parts of the machine,
reward was the enactment in 1914 of a federal law exempting trade unions
rewarded, the name of Nicholas Rostov, awarded a St. George's Cross of
rheumatism, or may manifest all the symptoms of acute septicaemia or
rhythmic beat of hoofs and the jingling of showy cavalry in blue, red,
rich in political experience and endowed with deep insight into the
richness. The chief goal of this effort was high profits for the
ridden round the Drissa fortifications with the Emperor and had
ridden round the position not only do not help matters, but hinder.
ride and especially by the sound of the bullets.
ride round the neighboring villages with Ilyin; he let Lavrushka
ridge, due to periphlebitis, may be detected on each side of the vein.
rifle bullets are met with in the field during active warfare, and fall
rigging of his ship, so the soldier always has around him the same
right and then to the left, and took up the bottle. Anatole brought
right angles to the shaft, it is pathognomic.
right as the Russian historians who maintain that Napoleon was drawn
right beyond the dragoons, the officer of the suite pointed out to
right boot also and was going to tuck up the other trouser leg to save
right flank against the French, were actions distinct from the main
right flank and drive it into the Bohemian mountains according to
right flank now that it is nearly four o'clock and the battle is lost?
right have we to argue? We cannot comprehend either the Emperor's or
right in not wishing to be the first to call.
right of all, so it will be the duty of some [states] to prepare
right of review and nullification, are irrevocably bound by the
right of the village and began firing them at Tushin's battery.
right of way through the public domain, twenty sections of land with
right the Guards were entering the misty region with a sound of
right through it--set off with Ilyin in the lessening rain and the
right to be heard on it. In 1846 the "Daughters of Temperance" formed a
right to construct the long-discussed canal, in return for a guarantee
right way to meet the problem, Burke concluded, was to accept the
right! Twenty-one rubles," he said, pointing to the figure
right, friend, stay here at the staff and tomorrow we'll have a talk."
right, it is advantageous to attack the enemy's latter wing especially
right, the Emperor could not answer such a question. The troops are
righteousness, for the strengthening of the heart by faith and hope,
rightless condition in colonial times. The founders of America brought
rights judges, deliberately selected by Jackson for the bench, began to
rights of "citizenesses" as well as the rights of "citizens" were
rights of landlords by assuring to the public "reasonable rents" for
rights of the people.
rights, forests, and water power was also in the hands of national
rights, the relations of husband and wife and their freedom and
rights, there is every reason for believing that in the beginning they
rights. Still other states, while closely restricting the suffrage,
rights; (3) governments derive their just powers from the consent of the
rigid, so that the body assumes a statuesque attitude (_orthotonos_).
rigidity to the prepuce, which is most apparent when it is rolled back
rigors of the awful winter at Valley Forge--an inspiration to her
ring fingers are hyper-extended at these joints in consequence of the
ring fingers--claw-hand or _main en griffe_. On flexing the wrist, the
ring half an inch broad, about an inch in front of the peripheral tender
ring, cried from the window: "Come here; part the bets!" This was
ringing staccato laugh--a laugh such as one hears on the stage.
ringing, and prolonged yells. On the other table, round which many
ringing, the engine moving, or of the winds of spring. To that I
ripe old culture of the mother country, he often sent his sons to Oxford
rise in the temperature of the part (2 o to 3 o F.), with redness and
rise of small towns and villages which gave diversity to the life of the
rise to a progressive impairment of health known as the _cancerous
rise to an abdominal tumour; or it may grow from the extra-peritoneal
rise to emboli. The larger the varix the greater is the tendency for a
rise to fresh areas of pus formation. The organs above named are the
rise to secondary growths, especially in the lungs.
rise to superficial ulcers; the discharge from the ulcer often dries up
rise to suppuration. Similarly, a calculus in one of the salivary ducts
rise to the symptoms of loose body. Lipomas are also met with growing
rise. They have torn my body. The kingdom of God will be overthrown...
risen from the table and was pacing the room, Natasha following him
risen that separate individuals, without orders, dealt blows at the
rises gradually the chill is usually slight and may be unobserved. Even
rises to 103 o or 104 o F., the pulse becomes feeble and rapid, and other
rising all over the world and could not be stayed. Naturally the country
rising in amount to sixty per cent of the net income in excess of
rising, but the value of paper money and city articles kept falling,
risk insurance acts allowances were made for the families of enlisted
risk of leaving swabs in the peritoneal cavity, large square pads of
risk of sloughing of the flaps.
river and forever banished from the fort and live there or starve." Even
river to our side before we recross to the other. At last our enemy.
river under the eyes of the man who sat on the log and was not even
river, added daily to their numbers and the growing settlements all
river, saw the pensive face of the Emperor Alexander as he sat in
river--and on the right a porch. There were people at the entrance:
riverside and across the Stone Bridge, were Ney's troops and
road and go to Tarutino, which was between the roads along which those
road for the Russians from Krems to Znaim.
road not far from the shed, and looking in that direction Prince
road planted with birch trees on each side, following the infantry and
road. But the baggage trains stretched out so that the last of
road. Kutuzov replied to this letter as he had done to the one
road. Pierre stopped, being pressed against the side of the cutting in
road. Since then, and until evening, the party had the movements of
roads ending in the Mississippi Valley in 1860 were extended and
roads was so natural that even the Russian marauders moved in that
roamed the plain and desert and more than one powerful tribe disputed
roar of cannon carried the news to outlying counties, fireworks lighted
robust he ordered about those weaker than himself. The soldier they
rode a little to one side and looked round with a frown. Along the
rode away from the mound and disappeared.
rode down the street at a gallop. Beside himself with enthusiasm,
rode past the limbers to the farthest cannon.
rode to the Pavlograd commander. The commanders met with polite bows
rode to the clearing from which Denisov had reconnoitered the French
rode to the keeper's lodge. No one at the stone entrance gates of
rode to the right.
rode toward his young master, with the fox tied to his crupper.
rode up to the watchhouse. In the twilight saddled horses could be
rode up, looked at the entrenchment, and went on again. Just behind it
role in the spread of tuberculosis, the clinical recognition of the
role played by them in interfering with the natural process of repair,
roll call for that very evening. But despite all these measures the
rolled softly over the straw beneath the windows, Anna Mikhaylovna,
rolling and crackling of musketry was heard, and much farther to the
rolling noise was heard which seemed to him louder than the most
rolling out the words, quite independently of their meaning, in a loud
romantic event. "A helpless girl overwhelmed with grief, left to the
roofs of fairy buildings and the shrill yells of some animals. And
roofs, and hills in the distance--and despite the fact that the
room a short handsome general with a red face was dancing the trepak
room adjoining the count's reception room. It was one of those
room and at the people in it. Round a long table covered with black
room and found the count with it in his hand, sobbing and laughing
room at nine in the morning.
room from the door at which she had been listening.
room in his own bed. He felt that only in the ordinary conditions of
room leading his hostess by the hand but not keeping time to the
room rushed forward and descended the staircase.
room that Count Rostov had called, the princess showed no confusion,
room to choose two ladies for the figure.
room where the clavichord stood.
room where the council was assembled.
room with the air of a happy conqueror who has attained the object
room with the required papers. Kutuzov and the Austrian member of
room without a word. But at the door he stopped and then retraced
room, and often talked with her about the old prince and criticized
room, at the sound of the disconnected talk, the rustling of
room, one straight on into what had been the drawing room, and
room, ran to her father unobserved by her mother. The dark-eyed little
room, where the princesses spent most of their time, he greeted the
room, with the delight boys feel at the sight of a military elder
room. Everything from the table napkins to the silver, china, and
room. The adjutant came out to the porch and asked Prince Andrew to
room. The main army was on the other side of Moscow or beyond it.
room. The princess, looking excited and nervous, her face flushed in
rooms in the house.
rooms saw the same thing there. He stood still, looking silently
root would so cover with their living verdure the grief that weighed
rose and coming up to Prince Andrew took him along to the other end of
rose and went out onto the balcony. The people, with Petya among them,
rose from under the roofs of the houses. He met more people in the
rose to eminence in the profession of law. Without the martial gifts or
rose, and a ball flew whistling over the heads of the hussar squadron.
rose, went to the door of the reception room and peeped through the
rosy, golden tinted light and long dark shadows. The forest at the
rotation of crops. Nearly all the settlers were of native American stock
rotund stomach, white leather breeches tightly fitting the fat
rough life, he rose by masterly efforts to the highest judicial honor
rough-and-ready justice of lynch law. During the course of the debate on
roughly that of the human body. Extreme or prolonged cold paralyses but
roughness due to fibrillation of the articular cartilages causes coarse
roughness of the way. Occasionally he glanced at the familiar crowd
round again but went limping up the hill.
round and clapping Rostov on the shoulder with his big hand.
round arm, altered in shape by its pressure on the table, now at her
round as if in search of something. On his way to the aunt he bowed to
round at the faces of his suite, young and animated as his own.
round her first thing and carry her to the sleigh."
round her. Petya ran in at the same time.
round in alarm at the noisy party under the shadow of the porch roof.
round it and those who admitted that they did not know what upheld the
round significantly at the other generals. But one could not tell from
round the abbe. Another, of young people, was grouped round the
round the bone obscures the sharp margins so that the bone becomes
round the clavichord and harp. Julie by general request played
round the piles of the bridge chased each other along. Looking on
round the room taking his partner with him. He glided silently on
round the tables in a dirty little room sat some ten factory hands.
round to see Anna Semenovna, it's quite near in the Dogs' Square,
round to the soldiers standing at the entrance, and in a loud voice of
round, moved across the room.
round, semi-translucent bodies, about the size of a pin-head or less,
round-faced peasant gravely, pointing with a significant wink at the
rounded area in the position of the tumour, which must be differentiated
rounded out the continental domain, its very existence as a nation was
rounded swelling. The tumour tissue, when exposed by dissection, is of a
rounded, eternal personification of the spirit of simplicity and
roundly condemning such Progressive doctrines as the recall of judges.
roused from her reverie by the talk of the maids in the next room
route frauds"--the deliberate overpayment of certain mail carriers whose
route is the most satisfactory method of treatment. Extirpation of the
row and the affair may end badly."
rows of gray cloaks were already visible through the smoke, and an
rows of pomaded heads in the stalls and then at the seminude women
rows of statues in niches) and looking significantly at the lady's old
rows of the crowd.
royal against British interlopers. The traders cut their way through
royal arrogance. On the other hand, many Americans of German descent, in
royal authority remains in the Northern colonies." "Here," echoed the
royal governors were curtly ordered to the front to do their full duty
royal provinces in 1776, with governors appointed by the king. Virginia
royalist and clerical writers by a vigorous censorship. After the
rubbed into the sore several times a day. If the surface is unbroken, it
rubbed with gauze, and the serum that exudes on pressure is collected
rubbing his bald head and angrily pulling back toward him the little
rubbing the face vigorously with a rough towel. The application of
rubbish, larvae, and corpses, others back to the heap, or why they
rubbishy German, that Denisov was a hero, the esaul a hero, and Tikhon
rubles and the rider beyond all price! Yes, one would have to search
ruffled hair, sat at the clavichord striking chords with his short
ruffling his hair against the muslin of the curtain.
ruinous to the Russians and salutary for the French. If the position
ruinous. A few years later a similar blow was given to the iron
rule in the Old World. One of these, Alexis de Tocqueville, a French
rule of William Penn as the proprietary colony of Delaware.
rule the first evidence is the occurrence of long-continued and
rule" there emerged what was long known as the "solid South"--a South
rule, the bowels are constipated. There is frequently albuminuria, and
rule, the slough which forms is comparatively small and superficial,
ruled it. It was not the governor; it was not the legislature; it was
ruler, or a party leader. So that the greater part of the events of
ruler, was Pugachev a representative of the will of the people? If
rulers of the world can oppose no reasonable ideal to the insensate
rules and regulations respecting the territory or other property
rules of decorum, pushed forward to the detriment of their toilets.
rules of international law or required under the principle of
rules, in spite of the fact that to some highly placed Russians it
rulings and decisions upon them, were written the real history of
rum in his hand was approaching the window, from which the light of
rum without taking it from my mouth, sitting outside the window on
rumbled over the tree stumps and branches and splashed through the
rumbling beneath the archway. Beside Petya stood a peasant woman, a
rumor that had spread by the fact that the Emperor's carriage had
rumored, in touch with the French, received leaflets from them that
run along the hall and up the warped steps of the familiar
run the gantlet of both houses and the executive, it was subject to
run to the standard.
run without interruption from a nerve cell or _neuron_ in the brain or
runners and cut up by rough-shod hoofs, the marks of which were
running away, and looked at the messenger. Bolkhovitinov was
running from right to left across the road. One of them fell in the
running like a pair of carriage horses, and began to overtake the
running on too long and am at the end of my second sheet. Good-by,
running to me of her own accord in the evening and tell me everything.
running to the door and the noise of a chair falling over, and a
rupture and also to cure by the formation of laminated clot; natural
rupture gazed at her son with terror, but in the obstinacy and
rupture of the muscle, and has been observed chiefly in cavalry
ruptured. The middle coat, or _tunica media_, consists of non-striped
ruptures at its junction with the belly of the muscle (Fig. 108). The
rush of blood, according to the extent of the erosion, the size of the
rush out more dead than alive just in the things she is wearing; if
rushed downhill in full cry after the hare, and from all sides the
rushed forward onto the hunter's gun, reached him, turned back, and
rushed from the room with a moan either of pain or sorrow.
rushed off headlong. He had been lying in the stubble, but in front of
rushed out and seeing Prince Andrew stopped, hesitating on the
rushed to the campfire. They were quarreling and fighting desperately,
rushed toward the balcony.
rushed toward the crowd. The tall youth, against whom he stumbled,
rushing at the cadet to restrain him.
rushing to his face. "How can you judge the Emperor's actions? What
rustle of starched petticoats and the whispering and laughter of
saber them...Whom? The hussars... Ah, the hussars with mustaches.
saber, and shouted rudely at the Russian general, asking: was he
saber, he sank on the snow beside it. His left hand was bloody; he
saber--a present from his father who had brought it from the siege
sabre--"sabre-blade" deformity (Fig. 132). The diffuse thickening all
sabretache having become entangled in the saddle. Where our men
sac (Anel, 1710) or at a distance above (John Hunter, 1785). The
sac at the level of Poupart's ligament.
sac having been obtained by opening the abdomen. Ligation of the aorta
sac is difficult and dangerous, especially when the aneurysm has spread
sac, where it coils up into an open meshwork (Fig. 73). The positive
sac. White thrombus forms on the rough surface produced, and leads to
sacculated aneurysm, with the addition that there is a scar in the
sacked the houses of the king's officers, and tore up the stamped paper.
sacrament, not as they generally prepared for it in the Rostov
sacred citadel, having supplied themselves with guns from the arsenal,
sacred, utilizes religion for the aggrandizement of the great man.
sacrifice himself for love and a feeling of envy of the legitimate
sacrifice? And why expose his own children in the battle? I would
sacrificed myself. But only the base, the vile succeed! I know who has
sacrificed, and after accidents, such as avulsion of the scalp by
sad smile between Nicholas, Pierre, Natasha, and Countess Mary was the
saddle. On all sides, the hussars were busy with the dragoons; one was
saddled upon the country Hamilton's fiscal system and the British
saddles, stood near them and there too the dogs were lying. The
sadly and timidly, and lowering his head shifted his feet on the step.
safe to say that the Louisiana territory included what is now Arkansas,
safeguard for the world the principle of equal and impartial trade with
safeguarded in the opening line by the declaration that each acted "in
safety, protection, and happiness, always with the condition precedent,
saffron-yellow whites moved restlessly near the lower eyelids.
sagacious smile. "I knew I was in the right so I kept silent; was
sages and heroes of their revolution were born and bred subjects of the
said "the man of profound intellect." "Why shouldn't S--S--get the
said 'on the march' it meant in greatcoats?" said he reproachfully
said Berg. "The army is burning with a spirit of heroism and the
said Bilibin as he came out to meet Prince Andrew. "Franz, put the
said Bolkhovitinov, unable to see in the dark who was speaking but
said Natasha in the tone of one being deprived of her property. "Well,
said Paulucci, as the Emperor mounted the steps and noticing Prince
said Pierre (as those who examine the actions of any government have
said Prince Andrew, as he entered the study, rubbing his small white
said Shinshin, laughing ironically and mixing the most ordinary
said a few words in the elder's presence about loyalty to the Tsar and
said an old maid who lived with the Melyukovs, during supper.
said he with a sense of shame and wishing to change the subject. "I am
said he. "Now for trouble!" Rostov looked out of the window and saw
said he. "We want to give the Senate new juridical powers, but we have
said in her smile. When her partner left her Natasha ran across the
said more. "To search far," he said, turning back the skirt of his
said nothing to Boris and, evidently unable to suppress the thoughts
said nothing. She felt that Sonya was speaking the truth, that there
said one of the men.
said she, uttering the word with peculiar assurance and unconcern,
said so and I am beginning to experience it. But the Guards, Rapp, the
said something, and two of his aides-de-camp galloped off to the
said such unpleasant things to the officer that it was all Denisov
said that "a government of the people, by the people, for the people
said that no one was to be allowed to leave the city, others on the
said that the fiscal system must be reorganized and the accounts
said that the loss of Moscow is not the loss of Russia. In reply to
said that the prince was at home, and showed him into a clean little
said that the troops that had entered Forminsk that day were the
said that till the evening, heaven knows what might not have happened.
said the Marshal, meeting her at the house door.
said the countess smiling.
said the countess, indignant that they should have dared to treat this
said the countess.
said the countess. "But I am in great need of this sum."
said the day he died. While talking to Tikhon he asked about me twice.
said the doctor with evident satisfaction. "Prussian doctors have been
said the officer, addressing the esaul while Denisov was reading the
said the old prince to Prince Vasili.
said the old soldier dismally to a comrade, "you'll forget to
said the princess in a tone of entreaty.
said the princess in the same petulantly playful tone in which she had
said the princess, ignoring his question. "Now I know! Yes; if I
said the stern old Brown glancing upward to the eternal hills on his way
said the teacher.
said to have already entered Vitebsk, the old prince remembered his
said to her mother, who conscious that they had been on the brink of a
said to her, went to the looking glass and arranged her hair and
said to himself, "the Kiev grenadiers and the Podolsk chasseurs must
said to the great powers, in the summer of 1900, "is to seek a solution
said was so strange that one could not take it in. But then the
said, "and make easy the way for them, and then see what an influx of
said, "men work, not for themselves, not as partners in the old way in
said, "the dirt began to fly." After surmounting formidable
said, a serious library, and he made it a rule to read through all the
said, and to doubt the correctness of that decision would be to risk
said, coming from the window and giving Rostov a large envelope. In it
said, holding the casement and not closing it. "With lanterns. Most
said, nodding to the aide-de-camp.
said, to let the lassies enjoy themselves for the last time.
said, was the only person really attached to him.
said. "He's a German, but a nice fellow all the same.... But he's a
said. And smilingly raising a finger at him, she left the room.
sail and row a five-ton scow up the river at a speed of from ten to
sailors and driven them into the British navy.
sailors from Europe, long before the landing of the Pilgrims, flourished
sailors were thrown out of employment while the prices of foreign goods
sake think of us!" cried his wife, referring to the rumors of war
sales filled all the passages and alleys of the Bazaar. But there were
salicylates are given for the relief of pain, and for this purpose drugs
salient at St. Mihiel. By this time General Pershing was ready for the
salient in April, soon was engaged with the enemy, "taking with splendid
saline solution is forced in by the syringe. The iodoform is injected by
saline solution with adrenalin should be slowly introduced into the
saline solution. The introduction of saline solution into the veins or
salivation occurs, the drinking of hot water and the taking of hot baths
sallow-faced, short, stout woman, the Empress Mother, with her smile
salon, or because those who were deceived found pleasure in the
salons. That life of the salons is unchanging. Since the year 1805
salt, nor bring them the keys of the city.
salts being deposited among the muscle fibres in concentric rings.
salts, occur to an exaggerated degree. The cartilage of the epiphysial
salute according to all the rules of art, and, presenting the hilt
salute but like a priest's benediction, approached the general. Though
salute reined in his horse before the Emperor.
same August the Emperor was thrown from his caleche, injured his
same as Pierre remembered it three months before, when the count had
same capacity for varying expression and the same prevalent appearance
same character he approaches for the thousandth time the action that
same class as himself and possessed the same breeding and
same company dog Jack, and the same commanders. The sailor rarely
same conditions and with the same character he will do the same
same expression of agitated surprise and guilt she went about the
same face on the catafalque, and the encounter he had with Zubov
same family. They are considered in greater detail in the chapter
same food as Gerasim. The other was that vague and quite Russian
same for history as the recognition of a free force moving the
same form of dressing should be continued till the slough has separated
same in all tissues, but the extent to which different tissues can carry
same in every detail. He entered through the gates with their stone
same law of love and forgiveness, a priest, gave the soldier a cross
same method, high school texts on algebra and geometry would include the
same mind he began explaining the advantages and disadvantages of
same moment he saw smoke, blood, and the pale, scared faces of the
same nature as the process of suppuration, only that the purulent
same neighborhood. And so it was decided to send the letters and money
same parts of the face; it is equally chronic, and may partly heal. It
same path. And if history has for its object the study of the movement
same pathological conditions as the tendon sheaths proper.
same place on the Poklonny Hill awaiting the deputation. His speech to
same pleasant composure and the same veiled look in his eyes with
same remark on the same day in different circles. But he was so busy
same remember that the future belongs to us."
same scale as under the old prince.
same state of excitement as when she had slammed the door of her room.
same stories for perhaps the fourth time. It is worse than useless. It
same submissive, expressionless look with which he had listened to the
same time it was agreed that the remainder of the vast Louisiana
same time or in succession. The lesion consists in a gummatous
same time the discharge is lessened. Good results are also reported from
same time there was drawn westward through the rest of the Louisiana
same time, and the participation of American troops in the suppression
same union of majesty and mildness.... And the feeling of enthusiasm
same way as the old-fashioned _dry cup_, and is more convenient and
same way does the force of free will form the content of history.
same way stands on guard for the old view, and accuses the new view of
same way the term _aseptic_ conveys the idea of freedom from all forms
same way the universal historians sometimes, when it pleases them
samovar and the tea cakes; only one thing was lacking that he had
samovar, though it was not at all the time for tea.
sands. The magnificent triumph of the pro-slavery Democrats in 1852
sang the air of the chorus so that Sonya should catch it. "Where
sang the quartette, "The Brook," with which everyone was delighted.
sanguinary. And all made ready for that battle. The cries from the
sank gently onto the sheet spread over the hay on the side nearest the
sank wells into the dry sand and were rewarded with gushers that "soused
sap and undermine the rulings of Marshall. The protective tariff, under
saphena system alone is involved, the veins fill again very slowly from
sapping the foundations of a sound currency system. Large amounts of
sarcastic smile and the freedom of Pierre's remarks. Only Count Rostov
sarcastically that the Commission had existed for a hundred and
sarcoma; the ossification in muscle is uniformly hard, while the sarcoma
sarcoma_ by the formation of calcified areas in the stroma. These
sarcomas are among the most malignant tumours of bone, growing with
sarcomatous tissue, which invades the overlying soft parts. The
sarcomatous tumours can usually be distinguished from aneurysm by the
sashes emerged from the cathedral doors. "Hurrah! hurrah!" shouted the
sat almost at the middle of the table. Facing them sat Pierre,
sat among them and could not utter a word. He hugged the first soldier
sat at the window, uneasily watching the people who drove past and
sat by the drawingroom window all the morning as if expecting
sat down in the lady's chair, placing his huge hands symmetrically
sat down on a sofa in the next room.
sat down on it before the portrait. At a single gesture from him
sat in their accustomed places: Nicholas beside the stove at a small
sat listening, slightly smiling, with his head on one side. The air
satellites. As the tumour increases in size, the sarcomatous tissue
satire on the nation:
satisfaction as it used to. On the contrary it tormented her more than
satisfaction at the sight of all this movement in their drawing
satisfaction of the farmers. They had protested against the heavy cost
satisfactorily. Boris, during the campaign, had made the
satisfactory _treatment_ is to resect sub-periosteally the diseased
satisfactory so far as the cure of the neuralgia is concerned. There is
satisfactory: (1) The gut is soaked in juniper oil for at least a month;
satisfied with him?" he asked the regimental commander.
satisfied with the day's success--a success exceeding his
satisfied with the form in which he had expressed his thoughts, but
satisfying the irresistible human need for sleep. He really was
sausage-shaped, and is constricted opposite the annular ligament.
savage in their denunciation of the tax. But all this labor was wasted.
savages were supported by the fur-trading interests that centred at
save Russia and that that was why, against the Emperor's wish and by
save myself?" he thought. He rode on to the region where the
save the child. She had now become quiet and, clinging with her little
save the fatherland and similar unnatural exploits, but unobtrusively,
save the world!"
saved by compromise. The bargain this time consisted of an exchange of
saved him was the very thing that was destroying the French army,
saved his army, for then already it bore within itself the germs of
saved money, gone West, and taken up a homestead. Now the free lands
saved. But he saw nothing. Above him there was now nothing but the
saving his life, he went with him into the room.
saving the patient. The limb must be amputated well beyond the apparent
saving their fatherland, or weeping over its downfall. The tales and
savings and profits of the nation and in financing new as well as old
savored of the frontier, as any one may know who reads Peter
saw Anatole Kuragin with an arm thrown across the back of his chair,
saw an intervention of Providence in this meeting of the princess
saw arriving at the entrance to dine with the Emperor and the court
saw himself reflected in his wife. He felt the good and bad within
saw how fixed and rooted in the nature of things was the American
saw in the United States only roughness and ignorance. She lamented the
saw that the Massacre of St. Bartholomew was due to Charles IX's
saw that the horsemen did not dismount and that the wolf shook herself
saw the beloved features that were so deeply engraved on his memory.
saw the coldness and malevolence with which the old prince received
saw the dragoons near and that they were galloping in disorder; he
saw the picket ropes of the roan horses, when Lavrushka gleefully
saw the threatened ruin of the country under the Articles of
say Mass cleaned and locked up the church. That night the doors were
say an unpleasant thing to a man's face, to say what the other,
say in what the peculiarity of the horse and rider lay, yet at first
say it, and only blushed till the tears came, and lowered his eyes.
say it. If you refuse him on my account, I must tell you the whole
say more to the frightened and shamefaced count, he lashed the heaving
say no more she began to tell of how at Potsdam the impious
say, that Mary is not to blame, but those to blame--the one to
say. When Prince Andrew entered the room Magnitski's words were
saying I began picturing to myself the condition of my inner man and
saying a word to anyone, took his cap and left the house by the back
saying as he moved from the gun, when a strange, unfamiliar voice
saying that Napoleon felt the danger of extending his line, that he
saying that it was madness to leave a height which commanded the
saying that the French were only some twenty-five miles away, that
saying that the war is over, that the Emperor Francis is arranging a
saying, "stops at the water's edge."
saying, he was gazing now at the sovereign and now at the men
saying, that "from the nature of things soldiers quartered in a populous
saying. Suddenly, however, he was struck by a voice coming from the
sayings were prepared in the inner laboratory of his mind in a
says the devil moves it. Another man says the locomotive moves because
says, "was not an act of sudden passion nor the work of one man or one
says, 'Make me whole,' says he, 'and I'll give thee what the Tsar
says: 'Prince, you are being deceived, here are the French!' Murat,
says: 'We don't love people so much for the good they have done us, as
sca'cwow? Call the quahtehmasteh," he shouted to Lavrushka.
scab-covered feet. (The horseflesh was appetizing and nourishing,
scaffolding on which the granulation tissue is built up. The ligature
scale. For this reason, President Wilson summoned the whole people of
scale; the progress is much more rapid, involving in the course of
scales creeping along the walls), and the heat and smoke and
scaly, and as they are due to infiltration of the skin they are more
scandalous, and malicious writing ... against the government of the
scant leisure for the cultivation of the arts and sciences. There was
scanty and delicate, the tumour is soft and brain-like, and is described
scapula or mandible, is involved, it is better to excise the bone, or at
scar may broaden, become raised above the surface, and assume a
scar or in stretching or excising a portion of the nerve affected.
scar tissue around it. As a sinus will persist until the obstacle to
scar, the use of _radium_ is to be preferred. The tube of radium is
scarcely felt, the worst was the state of his bare, raw, and
scarcely move, trotted with much effort to the column presented to
scarcely swayed by the breeze. Everything was in blossom, the
scarcely to pit on pressure; this is in part due to the formation of new
scarcity of labor, nevertheless, made impossible the triumph of the huge
scathing criticisms of the present. For them all, that old-fashioned
scatter, and the young wolves were bigger than dogs. It was the best
scattered about the world and like herself were garnering the last
scattered as the Federalists had been more than a generation before.
scattered fragments of the army he left behind.
scattered here and there among the birches was an unpleasant
scattered over the hyperaemic area, and contain a clear yellowish or
scattered over the trunk and limbs, and are probably the result of
scattered over the whole place were dragging logs and brushwood and
scene of the previous contest. Scars of this nature are frequently
scented, and shining head, and complacently seated himself on the
scepter in one hand and an orb in the other. Well, he took that icon
scheme and the king disapproved it for the reason, Franklin said, that
scheme, and that if there were now any difficulties the whole fault
scheme, which Washington regarded as far short of justice to the
school books, woman suffrage, heavy income taxes, and the referendum.
school manual. This, too, ordinarily follows the beaten path, giving
schools in which girls enjoyed the same rights as boys, education was
sciatic and other large nerves of the limbs.
science--which he himself has invented but which is for him the
sciences have proceeded. When Newton enunciated the law of gravity
sciences, for the arts, for literature, or even for the statesmanlike
scientific and rational basis. Recognising the "beneficent intention" of
sclerosed, and the medullary canal is obliterated. When the infection
sclerosis may be undone, and rarefaction may even proceed beyond the
sclerosis with obliteration of the medullary canal, and the surface is
sclerosis, and if, following upon this, there is caseation of the
score, when Dolokhov, slamming down the pack of cards, put it aside
scorn and sarcasm to the bitter end.
scouting, killed one hare and wounded another. Following the wounded
scouting--was not available. Besides, as a result of the frequent
scrambled the soldiers and militiamen.
scrape away the granulations until the young fibrous tissue underneath
scrape away the superficial layer of the granulations, the young fibrous
scraped with the sharp spoon. The _ray treatment_ includes the use of
scraped, and in the same order in which they had entered but with
scraping with the sharp spoon.
scratch of a pin, the extraction of a tooth, or after the operation of
scratched his back and made a movement of the lips resembling a smile.
screaming, on the ground, and again looking at the Frenchman and the
screams, and groans mingled in a general hubbub, then the firing
screen before the choir on the left side, and a feeling, new to her,
screw could not get in or out, but went on turning uselessly in the
screwed up his seeing eye to scrutinize the messenger more
scrotum should be supported against the abdominal wall by a triangular
scrotum. On dissection, the swelling is found to be made up of dilated,
scruple to depose the head of the Catholic Church--yet all keep
scrupulously than ever. The soldiers handed up the charges, turned,
scrutinize closely colonial business. The chief duties of the board were
scurf, or drops of perspiration falling from the head, the surgeon and
sea and the combined French and American forces on land.
sea are the underlying necessity of all prosperity." Thus spoke Woodrow
sea down below, but higher up at the village of Schlappanitz where
sea power sank into the background and the ocean was again white with
sea, on the other hand, offered an easy means of transportation between
seaboard states and to transform the region of the Great Lakes into an
seaboard. The other towns were straggling villages. Williamsburg,
seacoast and soil." A Boston newspaper declared that the union was
seamen and their courage as fighting men. They raised the rates of
search into the reasons of government, some women began to take thought
search of the life, wild and free, where the rifle supplied the game and
searched and analyzed, the copyright letters written, etc.   Our
searched and analyzed, the copyright letters written, etc.   Our
searching for a way to reduce armaments and avoid the bloody and costly
seas are open," he said, "the produce of the South may pour anywhere
seas themselves and settled in America, as in the case of Massachusetts,
seas, and offences against the law of nations;
seas, sent her fleet to unite with the forces of Spain, France, and
seas. Less spectacular, and more distinctive, were the deeds of the
seat of epithelioma--_lupus epithelioma_--usually of the exuberant or
seat of infection, but themselves enter the blood-stream and are carried
seat of infection; for instance, in disease of the wrist, it is put on
seat of inoculation, the immediately surrounding skin becomes swollen
seat of operation. To ensure uniform strips being cut, the razor is kept
seat of paralytic contracture are considered with the surgery of the
seat of permanent changes: the synovial membrane is thickened,
seat, its origin, the time at which it occurs, and other circumstances.
seated in the House of Lords as the Earl of Chatham, his severe illness
seated in the drawing room, helped to receive and entertain the
seats, their knees, and at the back of their necks. In the midst of
sebaceous and sweat glands. If the external orifice becomes occluded,
sebaceous gland. After the separation of the core the boil heals
sebaceous glands, forms a projecting tumour on the face or scalp, and
secede from the union, the Confederate states had merely attempted to
seceded in April; but fifty-five of the one hundred and forty-three
secession but "the male citizens of said state, twenty-one years old and
secession from coming back to power. At the same time there were
secession withdrawing from the union. Bells were rung exultantly, the
secession. Henry Clay, the great compromiser, came to the rescue and in
secession; and they were stripped of the support of the prostrate
seclusion quite overshadowed by the trifling cares that engrossed
second and third decades. There is evidence that the irritation caused
second column marches... The third column marches..." and so on,
second couple to enter the circle. Prince Andrew was one of the best
second day of the disease, redness and swelling of the mucous membrane
second day or later, according to circumstances, the tube is removed,
second inauguration, he was shot by an anarchist while attending the
second or third day it disappears, without showing any of the chromatic
second place, there developed schemes of industrial insurance in the
second time of her victory," referring to the fact that Japan, ten years
second, stamped on the spot clanking his spurs, whirled rapidly round,
second-grade posts in the lodge, to try, while diverting the
secondary and tertiary stages of the disease. The primary lesion is in
secondary nodules or of a diffuse thickening, so that the skin comes to
secondary period the lesion usually consists in effusion into the
secondary suture if necessary. Exposure to the sunshine on the seashore
secondary to a Growth in the Sole of the Foot.]
secondary, so that during the remainder of his life the patient is
secondly, the army under Bagration, and thirdly, the one commanded
secret society favoring prohibition. They dared to criticize the
secretary of the Russian Embassy, do not feel any need in token of
secretary, "anxiety reigned in the office of the Treasury. Hour after
secreting gland tissue (adenoma). The theory that tumours originate from
secreting glands of the body, but it is much more common in some
section amid the regimental wagons and horses which were standing in a
section and gave a decided bent to the economic and political life of
section it is of a greyish-blue colour and semi-translucent. The tumour
section of the committee for the revision of the laws. At
section present a granular appearance due to overgrowth of the
sectional, more and more national. The South was drawn into the main
sections and free from those state traditions which ran back to the
sections made from the edge or floor of the ulcer.
sections of the country. Their candidates polled more than a million
sections of the mountain and coast states.
sections who feared the dominance of commercial and manufacturing
sections: the National Farmers' Alliance and Industrial Union,
sects made the dominance of any single denomination impossible; and in
secular matters were determined. The union of church and government was
secular subjects. His literary style, perhaps the best of his time,
secure them by ligature. In advanced cases the accessible arteries--such
secured by the friends of free soil, there came in 1848 the sudden
secured his second boot and was slapping one boot against the other.
secured to an inflamed colon by making an artificial anus in the caecum;
secured. Balked but not defeated, the advocates of annexation drew up a
secured; the resolution was carried and transmitted to the states for
securing a certain number of signatures among the voters, to require the
securing a cross-fire action of the radium rays, both from within and
securing the approval of both houses of Congress for the funding of the
securities while the patriot army, half clothed, was freezing at Valley
security behind them. You need only forget to ask how the will of
see Helene, then she turned to Pierre with the same words of welcome
see all this and not feel sad? But 'the maggot gnaws the cabbage,
see for the tears of joy that filled his eyes, concentrated all his
see him at the same time as an adjutant who informed the count that
see him till the next day) and to the insistence of Bennigsen,
see him, and smiled at him unnaturally. He did not ask about the
see how the South was able to embark on secession and war with such
see only a coincidence of occurrences such as happens with all the
see only the general historic interest of that time and do not see all
see or understand it? And then there are you and the children and
see that they are living better than before. The yard full of
see that they had been observed. He was sorry for the pretty
see the Emperor immediately!" thought Rostov and galloped on.
see the valves opening and wheels turning; but I have no right to
see them, went to the back porch and out through the gate.
see through you and three yards into the ground under you," he
see what the blackguards have looted.... There! See what that one
see whether it was firmly plaited, and grasping his by the hand.
seed, is contained the germ of all despotism and of all tyranny.
seeing a vision of the country in summertime mingled with memories
seeing that all is lost if the sergeant is allowed to speak, turns
seeing the King of Rome, the son and heir of their adored monarch.
seeing the prince was lying on the sofa, looked at him, noticed his
seeing the salver, glanced around in dismay, as though seeking help.
seeing the shell fly past and fall into the ranks of the supports.
seeing the stern expression of the adjutant who was also looking
seeing these peasants, who were evidently still amused by the
seek to fathom what He has been pleased to conceal from us, the sooner
seekers, and the new institution was soon denounced as vigorously as
seem not to notice one another. When having limbered up the only two
seem to be a matter of indifference whether we understand the
seem to me as free as the life of a contemporary, the consequences
seem to us, though already questionably, to be the outcome of their
seemed an hour. Suddenly the broad muscles and lines of the count's
seemed as if the very light of the candles was focused on those two
seemed ashamed of the hussar of the line.
seemed even quieter and more diffident than usual. The guests were
seemed filled with the rattle of the wheels and the sensation of
seemed greatly interested in the state of the Prussian army. As soon
seemed like personal spite against each of the prisoners, in
seemed positive. The Articles of Confederation were still in effect.
seemed still to hear the sound of his own words: "Cut him down! I
seemed that no horses could be had even for the carriages, much less
seemed that the Revolution, so auspiciously begun, had degenerated into
seemed that the ball the hussars were giving in honor of the Polish
seemed that we all left the room and something strange happened. We
seemed the memory of a remote event long past.
seemed the most natural course--a direct retreat on Nizhni-Novgorod.
seemed the only thing that could be done, just as a quarter of an hour
seemed to Napoleon) only for the purpose of securing an armed peace,
seemed to awake as from a dream. He ordered the militiamen to be
seemed to be Poles--all under the Russian crown--but here they're
seemed to be fixed in the sky and felt that something new was
seemed to fill the whole wood and carried far beyond out into the open
seemed to hang, were as little voluntary as the actions of any soldier
seemed to her the best in the world, so also that song, at that
seemed to him that he was chosen to give a new direction to the
seemed to his listeners, but quite relevantly to the course of his own
seemed to the pioneers that, without support from the British in Canada,
seemed unattainable, had at last been realized. In the clear morning
seems bad, and vice versa. And what is more, we find at one and the
seems perhaps trivial. That, however, is not the test of its
seems to be specially prone to ensue on operations on the face, the
seen Kuragin, he could not now regain the feeling he then had, but was
seen before. Having taken a kerchief from the cupboard, Willarski
seen below to the left.
seen by the microscope it occurs in grape-like clusters, fission of the
seen by the surgeon, such as the weak, the inflamed, and the callous
seen everywhere, in front and to the right and left. All this was
seen her for the first time at the ball in 1810, with her slender neck
seen him since we acted together at the Rumyantsovs' theatricals. I
seen how or with whom Raevski came onto the dam. And even those who
seen in the Square, there was a striking contradiction: the general
seen in the macerated specimen are often mistaken for disease
seen in the town.
seen on the faces at the foot of the hill at Mozhaysk and
seen on the inner aspect of the cheeks, the soft palate, uvula, pillars
seen returning to the Kremlin. Among the Old Guard disorder and
seen spreading in over the granulations as a fine bluish-white pellicle,
seen that soldier lying alone in the hayfield. Now, seated on the
seen the enemy's columns and guns. Our advanced line, already in
seen the light, come here? What do you seek from us? Wisdom, virtue,
seen the previous evening at Boris'--ran forward and, bowing
seen you. Very glad! Go back to your rooms, Princess. Go!" said the
seen, and Cossacks and hussars who had rigged up rough shelters in the
seen, had that day been forwarded by courier to the commander in
seen. Behind the hut the dark shapes of the two wagons with their
seething in the smoke, and the roar of cannon and musketry did not
seize her by the ears. It was evident to the dogs, the hunters, and to
seize it by the throat in a death grip!" A thousand times during
seize some horsecloths, though he had told him the Russians were
seize the first fortification. General Campan's division did not seize
seized by an unreasoning panic--it occurred to him that the child
seized her prey, the hare moved and darted along the balk between
seized him, rolled over like a ball. The hare arched his back and
seized in the harbor of Charleston. The British answer was more force.
seized the countess' hands and kissed a knuckle of the little
seized the hussar and began lifting him.
seized with terror. The thought that both her sons were at the war,
seizes the letters, opens them, and reads those from the Emperor
seizing the transports, Major Denisov, being drunk, went to the
seizure of the Duke of Oldenburg's territory, and the Russian Note,
seizure of transports, and the guerrilla war were all departures
seldom to be recommended. In the treatment of epistaxis or bleeding from
selected by that method began to pour in upon the floors of Congress;
selected by the Assembly from time to time.
selected their candidate, and the Republicans followed the example. In
selected. All over the country similar meetings were held and political
self, and the flourishing of his saber, the soldiers all continued
self-complacent happiness that one sees on the face of a boy happily
self-confident and refined expression on the faces of those present he
self-confident to the point of martyrdom as only Germans are,
self-confident, Prince Andrew thought. Dessalles, the tutor he had
self-derision genuinely Russian. Bilibin wrote that the obligation
self-educated, the American cause drew great strength in the trials of
self-government, and at its close they were free to follow the general
self-government, and commercial improvement. The only remaining question
self-possessed, entered the drawing room elegantly dressed in the
self-preservation, he clutched the crupper of his saddle and, spurring
self-respect, but admit that the time and place are very badly chosen.
self-sacrifice, patriotic devotion, despair, grief, and the heroism of
selfish and interested principles, whether in pursuit of the offices or
seller, and ship owner at New Haven when the news of Lexington called
selling the forests in the province of Kostroma, the land lower down
semi-fluid jelly, and if this change takes place throughout the tumour
semi-membranosus and the medial head of the gastrocnemius_ is most
semicircle round something where the ball had fallen, and an old
semifluid consistence. The pure myxoma is extremely rare, and
senate of the state the members of which were apportioned among the
senator shall have one vote. The electors in each State shall have the
senators and representatives, shall be prescribed in each State by the
senators from each State, chosen by the legislature thereof, for six
send him a message," said the count. "Oh dear! Oh dear! How happy it
send-off given him by the commander in chief and his fellow
send." And changing the subject, Kutuzov began to speak of the Turkish
sending a request within 30 days of receiving it to the person
sending a request within 30 days of receiving it to the person
sending a shock of alarm to every center and section of the young
sending the Chief Justice, John Jay, on a pacific mission to England.
sending the Emperor an icon of the Venerable Sergius. It was
sends his wife to seek the great man's mercy; the Emperor of Austria
senior in the company, might easily succeed to the post; how popular
sensation being elicited as far down as the young axis cylinders have
sensation from the movement of the melon-seed bodies. In the sheath of
sensation of her kiss, inhaled the frosty air with a full breast
sensation, haematuria, and melaena are among the other symptoms that may
sensation, similar to that experienced in the foot, when it is
sense of beginning anew pictured to himself the blissful,
sense of disgust the minutest details of this humiliating scene he
sense of freedom. She was in the same black dress with soft folds
sense of superiority over her good, conscientious husband, who all the
sense of the duty that now bound him to her forever. The present
sense, engaged in a negative work: that of "keeping the rascals out."
senseless crowd understood the whole tremendous significance of what
senselessness. Now, however, he had learned to see the great, eternal,
sensibility is represented by the shaded area. The parts insensitive to
sensitive by the abnormal conditions of their blood supply. In
sensitive in feelings, studious in habits, he was no man for the rough
sensitive papillae of the corium. Corns are due to the friction and
sensory phenomena following operations for the repair of divided nerves.
sent for Mademoiselle Bourienne and went with her to the drawing room.
sent for instructions... From the Consistory, from the Senate, from
sent his favorite officer to the commander in chief with that news.
sent instead of our dear Wintzingerode you would have captured the
sent that printed army order and Nicholas' letter to the Rostovs,
sent to Moscow. The story told about him at Count Rostov's was true.
sent to Rhode Island to discover the offenders and bring them to
sent to Washington as a memento, was accepted as "a token of the
sent to demand the withdrawal of the soldiers. The governor hesitated
sent to execute an order. The officer on duty, a handsome, elegantly
sent to look for them, arrived to fetch Natasha and Petya. The count
sent to procure remounts, but that letter did not set the countess
sent to serve as a soldier after the duel with Dolokhov." And the
sent to the countess; about 70,00 went for interest on debts. The
sent to their assistance. The majority struggled back to the bank from
sent with the news of this victory to the Austrian court, now no
sent, and by the reports of the guerrillas, Kutuzov was almost sure
sentence as from the attempts the vice-King made to execute the orders
sentence to the effect that the President of the United States, to be
sentence: "Governments derive their just powers from the consent of the
sentenced him to death? Not the men on the commission that had first
sentiment for the Constitution, even though they could not vote for
sentiment of the great majority of citizens when he demanded the
sentiment of the people when he stated to the peace commissioners on the
sentiments of sweetness and strength which are the finest flowers of
sentiments," he seemed to be saying, "so much the worse for you!"
separate and independent congregation before they came to America. The
separate and united whole, though each of the groups was rapidly
separate group, the Republican convention at Chicago was fated to be
separate system of blood vessels, derived from the arteries which supply
separate the vessels concerned and to close the opening in each by
separate welfare by the formation of a compact and union that will
separated and becomes impacted as an embolus in the artery beyond,
separated by the living mass of moving infantry, Vaska Denisov, red
separated from the rest of the French army they might easily be
separated him from the tortoise, the tortoise has covered one tenth of
separated--hence the facility with which the pus spreads along the
separately or two at a time. "In couples," replied the officer in
separates, the cheek is perforated.
separation between the ends may be considerable.
separation from Great Britain. There was nothing in the sphere of
separation of an epiphysis. There is also the risk of fat embolism, and
separation of the dead bone, drainage should be improved, and the
separation usually takes place through the young bone of the ossifying
separation. The sequestrum is separated from the living bone by a clear
separation. When the resolution was carried the British flag on the
septic infection. The term _bullet-bubo_ has been applied to them, and
septic irritation. While any of the glands in the body may be affected,
septic wound on the chest wall or in the neck. In some cases it is
septic; and it may accompany septic infection of the genital tract in
septicaemia, this condition is due to pyogenic bacteria, the
septicaemia. When the deep lymph vessels alone are involved, the
sequestra may be found embedded in the granulation tissue. The sinus
sequestra. The limb having been rendered bloodless, existing sinuses are
sequestration of epithelial cells during the process of cicatrisation.
sequestrum derived from the trigone of the femur perforates the
sequestrum, and the amount of new bone on the surface. Finally the
serfs carrying out the things were treading heavily on the parquet
serfs' manorial labor had been diminished, and heard the touching
serfs, or himself, only one ought to know the state of affairs in
serfs--made some concessions. Continuing to represent the liberation
sergeant major who came upon the men who were hauling their burden.
sergeant to be arrested. Come, you must own that this affair of the
sergeant was an impostor, that he had lied, and that the whole Russian
sergeant, seeing that the French troops were running onto the
serges, kerseys, and linsey-woolseys which served for the common wear."
series of experiments and arguments proves to him that the complete
series of parallel grooves corresponding to the lines of friction
series of restrictions known as the Platt amendment, limiting her power
serious collisions seem to have occurred; and in the days of the
serious deformity, and considerable portions of the jaws may be lost by
serious dispute. Even the delegates from the small states agreed with
serious expression. But the author himself took the verses and began
serious matter, a vexing issue that grew out of Civil War diplomacy. The
serious operation of resecting the posterior roots of the affected
seriously alarmed about the rapidly expanding French dominion in the
seriously crippled, especially when the tendon sheaths and bursae also
seriously embarrassed, as the suitor could not but know; and above
seriously interfered with,--as, for example, when the axillary contents
sero-fibrinous exudate. There are no reactive changes in the synovial
sero-purulent discharge. The edges are slightly inflamed, and show no
serous_ and _purulent synovitis_--there is the usual general reaction,
serpent of the south.... Nor is the equinoctial heat more discouraging
serratus anterior escape. There is paralysis of the sympathetic fibres
serum and a few pus cells, and as this dries on the edges it forms scabs
serum exudes, and, drying, forms a thick scab. Under this scab the skin
serum has proved of less value in the treatment of erysipelas than might
serum. The immunity produced by injections of antitoxic sera lasts only
servant announced that the carriage was ready, and Marya Dmitrievna
servants fell into line. The masters rode together. "Uncle," Rostov,
servants in scarlet liveries moved round the table, the clatter of
servants into the places of responsibility. Everywhere on land and sea,
servants ran noisily about the house and yard, shouting and disputing.
servants that Pierre could no longer see the reddish-yellow face
servants was very high. The Baltimores, Penns, Carterets, and other
servants who were to leave Moscow. The loaded carts were still
servants. The footman who had gone to announce them was stopped by
served a double purpose. It interested his own country in the naval
served in the 1805 campaign, had been recruiting up to strength in
served the Tsar and my countwy honowably and have not stolen! And am I
served to confirm his opinion that he was the chosen leader of the
serves a thief right. Use the hatchet!... What--still alive?"
service and all their resources, human and material, thrown into the
service and was familiar with the difficulties encountered by royal
service by election..." thought he. But now the campaign was
service in the "second line of defense." Mrs. Washington managed the
service reform was approved. The Australian ballot, popular election of
service, he accepted a post in Moscow in that service, doffed the
service, to be at Tilsit on the occasion of this interview between the
service," said the prince disdainfully. "Why his son is coming I don't
service--these things, induced by the necessity of resisting outside
service. On April 30, 1789, he took the oath of office at Federal Hall
service. On the one side they struck at the spoils system; at the right
service. Such is the story of the chief American military leaders, and
service. The victory is complete and Russia will not forget you! Honor
service. Under the gleaming icons stood a long invalid chair, and in
service. Unhappily the measure struck a mortal blow at the principle of
services during the war of 1812. When days of peace returned he was
services. He took the glove in silence from the aide-de-camp, and
serving our Tsar and our country, rejoicing in the successes and
servitude and tenantry and in the direction of the freehold; that is,
session, flung open the doors and presented to the Americans the
sessions of the court.
set at naught the rules of civilized warfare upon the sea. Warnings from
set eagerly to work at the new task of placing the wounded in the
set forth clearly in the title: "An act for granting certain duties in
set forth in the General Terms of Use part of this license, apply to
set forth in the General Terms of Use part of this license, apply to
set no industry in motion. Even in the early stages of modern business,
set out to look for the child, so crowded was it now with people and
set the merchant free and give him a compensation that had been
set the serfs to work. Say that everything out of the hothouses must
set to work two cases were standing open in the ballroom, one almost
set up and sustain democratic institutions. They preferred rather the
setting for this new scene in the westward movement was thrown out in a
settle among them. In 1850 the colony was so populous and prosperous
settle as free mechanics in the towns. For many a bondman the gamble
settle that micro-organisms disturb the health of the patient. In
settle the seaboard region. To practical men, his prophecy did not seem
settle with the villain. We must punish the villain who has caused the
settled down comfortably beside the fire.
settled down on the cold ground, but the majority marched all night
settled down to the enjoyment of their hard-earned victory, President
settled for the moment; it may have to be reconsidered from day to day,
settled with "Uncle" where they should set on the hounds, and having
settled. In that circle the Moscow enthusiasm--news of which had
settlement as the last word. "The people, especially the business men of
settlement of international disputes. This treaty, the President offered
settlement thus developed two distinct types of people engaged in the
settlement to white men in 1889. The rush upon the fertile lands of this
settlement. The Boxers, a Chinese association, had for some time carried
settlement. The more adventurous were continually moving west and
settlers with lawful titles to the lands they had purchased, sometimes
settlers, the companies and proprietors having colonies in America
settlers. The Van Rensselaer, the Van Cortlandt, and the Livingston
settling the interior and upland regions. There they cleared the land,
seven be dealt to the right rather than to the left, might deprive him
seven he needed was lying uppermost, the first card in the pack. He
seven members from each state chosen as the legislature might direct and
seven miles away from the French. At Grunth also some apprehension and
seven of hearts with a torn corner, which he had picked up from the
seven pillars and steps of the Temple, the seven sciences, the seven
seven years after the surrender at Appomattox, it did pass the general
seventeenth day of September in the year of our Lord one thousand seven
seventh year, the deformities are apt to be permanent. It may be noted
several States, as provided in the Constitution, within seven years from
several Western states, anxious to preserve the soil for American
several adjutants met him with news of the successful result of the
several batteries of artillery up to those heights to strengthen the
several days, even although the erysipelas has not overstepped the ring.
several different roads available for the French, and one would have
several events united in making it the center of a political storm.
several for his walk, we are unconscious of any contradiction. The
several generations of the same family, and is often multiple, there
several hours. It is met with in the course of severe illnesses,
several joints may suffer at the same time. In most cases the joint
several joints. The course of the disease as met with in persons past
several men came running up the avenue with frightened faces.
several occasions seen diabetic coma supervene and the patient die
several of the soldier prisoners tunneled under the wall and ran away,
several officers of wide experience, and remained loyally throughout the
several other men of the same kind hiding in the shadow of the house
several persons, briskly turning a shoulder to the orator at the end
several schemes employed, namely, the "grandfather clause," was held to
several times went to the door and listened, wishing to enter but
several voices at once began answering the interpreter. A French
severally penetrated the interior with artificial lines until they have
severe cases destructive changes ensue with remarkable rapidity. The
severe cases the median and ulnar nerves are also the seat of
severe fighting of the war and pressed forward steadily against the most
severe forms the joint may be permanently damaged as a result of fibrous
severe handicaps. They found the fertile lands of the coast and river
severe pain that he avoids taking food. In some cases the suffering is
severe pain which the alcohol causes may be lessened, after the needle
severe pain, gradually extending from behind the angle of the jaw on to
severe pain, if relief is not afforded by the repeated application of
severe set-back, falling far behind the vote of 1912.
severed from Massachusetts in 1679, and Georgia, surrendered by the
severity of the condition. If the pulse remains firm, full, and regular,
severity of the gonorrhoea and the incidence of joint disease. In women,
severity of the spasms, he should be placed in a quiet room, and every
severity, with the formation of bullae, and end in dry gangrene. As a
severity. Trismus is the most marked and constant form of spasm; and
shabby dressing gown, copying out the original transaction of the
shading off into the surroundings. In the macerated bone there is a
shadow of the sequestrum.
shadow which barely replaces that of the original bone, in parts it may
shadow, the other half brightly lit by the sun. Alpatych looked out of
shadows. Bang, bang! went the first sleigh over a cradle hole in the
shaft and each of the epiphyses a disc of actively growing
shaft becomes surrounded by a sheath or case of new bone, known as the
shaft of the bone, and the epiphysis only indirectly. The young bone is
shaft, and tapering off above. The periosteum is more easily detached,
shaft, flattening of the crest, or a more uniform increase in thickness
shaft, the lower one quiescent, the upper one active and increasing in
shaft, while the chondro-sarcoma more often originates at the
shaft; but in the region of the ossifying junction it is raised with
shafts of bones rather than the articular ends, and in the comparative
shake, as if driving away the weakness which assailed him at this
shaken!' And truly though the enemy was twice stronger than we, we
shaking and swaying, came to a stop. The carriage steps clattered as
shaking his head in perplexity--perhaps because the banner really
shall America--first among the nations of the earth in wealth and
shall all meet at the Karagins'! Please come! No! Really, eh?" said
shall be determined by yeas and nays, and the names of the persons
shall exist within the United States, or any place subject to their
shall have been committed; but when not committed within any State, the
shall have original jurisdiction. In all the other cases before
shall in like manner choose the President. But in choosing the
shall kill him, or he will hit me in the head, or elbow, or knee.
shall not perish from the earth."
shall not trade with the rest of the world for such manufactures as we
shall rest and spend the night," and during the first day's journey
shall sign and certify, and transmit sealed to the seat of the
shall then be counted;--The person having the greatest number of votes
shame and arrested in his presence, fully alive now to the impropriety
shamefully to secure the return of its supporters to Congress. The
shape of a #V#, the lower jaw is square instead of rounded in outline,
shape of the "bonanza farm" devoted mainly to wheat and corn and
shape, and the solid form is rarely larger than a hazel-nut. The nerve
shape, the convex aspect being smooth like an articular surface, the
shaped alveoli. If the alveoli are large and the intervening stroma is
shapely shoulders, back, and bosom--which in the fashion of those days
shaping of events the commander in chief is in the midst of a most
share in all political offices, honors, and emoluments; the right to
share with you the burden of putting an end to it. We will consent that
shared the same reminiscences.
sharp and vigorous terms. "As we are not willing," ran the platform, "to
sharp pain is felt over the back of the wrist. The prominence of the
sharpest political battles in American history. The issue turned on
sharply defined distribution of the coloration is attributed to the
sharply with those of England. Among the earliest of these measures may
sharply, with a slight trembling of the lower jaw, "I can't prevent
sharpshooters in front of our columns. The colonel at the head of
shattered at the battles of the Nile and Trafalgar. War on Great
shawl draped over one shoulder, came into the space left vacant for
shawls sat behind the apron under the leather hood of the vehicle.
she contemplated between Anatole and the little princess'
she could see the raised hood of Prince Andrew's caleche. She did
she declared the blockade to be none the less "effective" because her
she did not stir. She was in just the same position in which Marya
she fail to notice that the Emperor talked a long time with the French
she for the first time vividly imagined what was in store for her
she had been brought up in the most aristocratic circles.
she had dwelt for the first fortnight. She received letters from her
she had none of the advantages and pleasures of city life. She did not
she had regarded with surprise and amusement at Otradnoe, was just the
she had seen and noticed long ago at the ball in Petersburg. He was
she has millions. Oh yes, that's the French ambassador himself!" she
she heard her mother praying and sighing and the creaking of her bed
she heard through the door, made her immediately forget herself and
she is dressed! Lovely! And that stout one in spectacles is the
she knew had the peculiar property of conducing to cheerfulness in the
she knew let her have the keys of the catacombs, and how she, taking
she leaned out from behind the apron and, waving her thin arms from
she lived, the more experience and observation she had of life, the
she loves him! She probably opened the letter without knowing who it
she made a demand on Pierre that he should, all the same, prefer her
she might she would still be told the same. All the way she had sat
she must be on the chest in the passage. The chest in the passage
she must see him. She passed the valet, the snuff fell from the candle
she not been able sometimes to scold the invalid for not strictly
she raised her hand to Prince Andrew's shoulder. They were the
she said with external dignity and coldness, though she felt the tears
she sat down with her foot under her on the bed that had been made
she saw an indistinct shape in the corner, and mistook his knees
she saw him before her with the expression that was on his face as
she saw nothing. She began blinking rapidly and moved away from the
she says," voices in the crowd were heard saying.
she should marry. The question was no longer whether this was
she show no signs of secrecy or shame, on the contrary, with
she suddenly rose and with her heavy tread went up to the table. She
she understood all the gravity of her friend's trouble.
she was jealous of Sonya, of the governess, and of every woman, pretty
she was satisfied with the party. She replied in her usual simple
she whispered to herself. A smile lit up her face but at the same time
she who was dancing that first turn of the waltz.
sheath of the palm, elongated or sausage-shaped in the extensors of the
sheath; gummata are met with during the tertiary period.
sheathed it. The Cossacks were untying their horses and tightening
sheaths about the wrist and ankle. It may occur in a mild form, with
sheaths of nerves. The term _fibrositis_ was applied to it by Gowers in
shed with them, giving final orders to the adjutant. After they had
shed?" the expression of his face seemed to say. The chief pleasure
sheep raisers had an almost free run of the plains, using public lands
sheep were broken up into small plots. The cowboy and ranchman vanished.
sheep, the dog, or the horse, have proved useful. If fresh serum is not
shelters were rigged up for the officers, caldrons were being
shifting about, the German ambassador on September 1, 1915, sent a brief
shifting the baby he gave him to the nurse.
shining. The centre becomes depressed, while the margins extend in the
ship he is holding on to. But as soon as a storm arises and the sea
ship was built at New Amsterdam, and by the middle of that century
shipbuilding in the colonies, where the abundance of raw materials gave
shipbuilding on the Great Lakes helped to compensate for the decline of
shipbuilding was the most important. The abundance of fir for masts, oak
shipments. The banking facilities at the East are doing as much to draw
shipped by way of the canals in the spring.... These moneyed facilities
shipped to New York _via_ Chicago. The Illinois canal has not only swept
shippers and travelers. The result was the interstate commerce act of
shipping on the high seas. On January 28, a German raider sank the
ships and kept British merchantmen in constant anxiety. Not until the
ships carried slaves to the Southern colonies and the produce of the
ships, supply the stores, and assemble the settlers necessary to found
shipwrights, calkers, rope makers, and other artisans of the seaport
shipyards were scattered along the New England coast at Newburyport,
shirt out over the fire, and not waiting for an answer he gave a grunt
shirt," the Republicans refused to surrender a slogan which made such a
shock came in due time. It was what the French called "le hourra de
shock in an ordinary burn of corresponding severity. The parts at the
shock which may even prove fatal. The conditions which render a person
shone strangely. Now that the terrible din of the guns had ceased a
shone the moon, nearly at its full, in a pale, almost starless, spring
shoot or horsemen to ride down the Russian infantry--all such orders
shoots of the young oats, or why when the wind carried away a
shop committee. If the members of the shop committee decided in favor of
shop. She had taken a cab and driven home by a side street and the
shopkeepers whom the landlords regarded with genuine horror. The initial
shore had no difficulty in agreeing that "the Scriptures do hold forth a
shorn of some of the land she claimed, came into the union in 1837.
short hair was wet and matted on the forehead, but his face, though
short lull, renewed in an acute form the commercial difficulties that
short man had left the room. "We have heard of your prowess. But
short of military pressure could bring the warring revolutionists to
short pause, again rising and again pacing the room, "tomorrow you
short sturdy figure with the sinewy hairy hand and stumpy fingers in
short years that lay ahead it was their fate to double the territory of
short, we retreat after the battle but send a courier to Petersburg
shortened the term of service; but the principle was older than the
shortening is usually ascribed to absence of the first phalanx, but it
shortening of the soft parts around a joint--muscles, tendons,
shortly afterward. In Pennsylvania, the mechanics, by taking an active
shortly precedes death. The discovery of such collections of organisms
shortsighted delight at the misery of others, and doubts and
shot gleamed in the darkness. This was the last French attack and
shot may scatter widely through the contained viscera, and there is
shot which opened the Seven Years' War, known in America as the French
shot, or driven out of the land. Men of attainments and distinction,
shot. And the risk to which he would expose his life by carrying out
shots. The sensation of those terrible whistling sounds and of the
should accompany him to the army in Moldavia, to which the old general
should at once be cauterised with caustic potash, the actual cautery, or
should attribute the direction the herd takes to what animal happens
should be added to those intrusted to Congress by the Articles of
should be bare. In the midst of the song cries were heard, and
should be built. One group in Congress favored the route through
should be carried out to prevent the formation of adhesions. After
should be carried out, provided the condition is sufficiently limited to
should be completed as speedily and as bloodlessly as possible. The
should be deprived of the right to vote "on account of race, color, or
should be destroyed with the cautery.
should be dressed. Princess Mary's self-esteem was wounded by the fact
should be elected by popular vote, and declared it to be the intention
should be elected by voters having the "qualifications requisite for
should be explained in what this new force consists, for the whole
should be had to grafting. In large hairy moles of the face whose size
should be halted, the Austrian argued that not he, but the higher
should be insisted upon, and half-dram doses of the alkaline sulphates
should be interfered with; the maxillary and mandibular divisions should
should be lost to the home; and secondly, from his hussar point of
should be maintained at a right angle to the body, the arm being rotated
should be no discrimination in railway and port charges among the
should be re-established by suture within five or six days of the
should be referred to the Hague Court or to special international
should be removed at the amputation by squeezing the vessel from above
should be removed with the scissors at the same time that the abscess is
should be scraped with the sharp spoon, and cauterised.
should be served first. After dinner, when the footman handed coffee
should be shaved. The skin is then dehydrated by washing with methylated
should be slowly introduced into the rectum; this is repeated, if
should be sorry to leave the regiment. If I decline the honor of being
should be stinted in no respect, the nation was called upon to place its
should be sutured to each other, and as the proximal end is retracted
should be withheld, unless failing of the pulse strongly indicates its
should be? That's right! The great thing is the serving, that's it."
should drink large quantities of milk, which also increases the
should first be carefully and skillfully prepared, and then told the
should go back in the sleigh with Dimmler, and Sonya with Nicholas and
should have done the same, then why this duel, this murder? Either I
should have moved his army to the Kaluga road long before reaching
should have reached a definition of inevitability by the laws of
should likewise be subjected to a closer scrutiny by the public. For
should make too good a target for the French, besides I am afraid I
should much like to be an adjutant and not remain at the front."
should not be fought, and that a new war should not be begun nor the
should not justify your confidence and the honor you have done me in
should occupy the farm for five years before his title was finally
should or should not do, but the standard was quite firm and
should overlap and confine the end of the sleeve of the sterilised
should reign but not command the army, and that the only way out of
should stiffness occur there will be the least interference with
should take part in an argument between the general and the colonel on
should wish nothing but to relive it all from the beginning."
shoulder causes over-stretching of the anterior branches (primary
shoulder should be elevated so that no traction is exerted on the
shoulder, hip, and spine. It is due to a protective contraction of the
shoulders and eyes, almost closing the latter, sighed, and moved
shoulders, moved slowly along the road on his white horse. One of
shoulders. Anna Mikhaylovna with just the same movement raised her
shoulders. He had the air of a man happily performing one of the
shoulders. Sonya stood ready dressed in the middle of the room and,
shoulders. When it occurs on the face or anterior part of the neck it is
shout was threateningly repeated and he heard the click of the man's
shouted "Hurrah!" in exactly the same voice in which he had shouted it
shouted "bravo!" Then one of the men went into a corner of the
shouted Denisov, suddenly, turning purple and rushing at the man
shouted Nicholas, banging the table--very little to the point as it
shouted at him. It seemed to Petya that at the moment the shot was
shouted different people and the people dashed in pursuit of the trap.
shouted so that his voice rang far through the rooms.
shouted the regimental commander, thrusting forward his jaw and
shouted to his master, "The count has come!" and Denisov, who had been
shouted to the count who was going to kiss her hand. "You're half
shouted, "and then I shall reserve the right to state my opinion also.
shouted, not looking Boris in the face.
shouting "Hurrah!" pursued them so far beyond the battery that it
shouting and even a little themselves--and it was on this that the
shouting and fighting, not at all as the gunner and the Frenchman with
shouting and singing in the street; cockroaches rustled on the
shouting to his men. "Go round! Wait for the infantry!" he exclaimed
shouts of the mob, the count began to repent. He remembered with
shouts that used to seem so terrible to the soldiers, despite his
shouts, 'Hurrah!' And only in the ranks can one serve with assurance
shouts. These sounds made his spirits rise, but at the same time he
show proliferation of endothelial cells, the formation of numerous giant
showed Pierre clearly for the first time that the French would enter
showed a paper she held in her hand--with the verses Nicholas had
showed him her album. Boris sketched two trees in the album and wrote:
showed itself in the expression of Denisov's face and the
showed me a letter in which the parade of the French in Vienna was
showed them a paper addressed to Major Denisov from the regimental
shower shells on the Russian fleches and redoubts. This could not be
showing any trace of their syphilitic inheritance, the majority retain
showing dark green beside the fence. And even that ruined and befouled
showing off his courage, had ridden on to the planks of the bridge:
showing out of the ground that looked like asparagus, which, for
showing that children do grow imperceptibly from the cradle to
showing that he took heed of what was being reported to him. The
showing the white ball of the eye he had lost, Kutuzov walked with
showing under his square-set cap the hair smoothly brushed forward
shown him only the combative side of her nature; but now he seemed
shown him. You can undertake the theater, I society, and you,
shown into the Emperor's study that the latter at once asked:
shown that the blockhead thinks nothing of her and looks only at
shown the door leading downstairs), "only it won't be accepted."
shown to the best room, which Dolokhov had taken for that evening.
shrank from the driving rain and gazed anxiously before him. His
shrieked the princess, now quite changed. "And what does she come
shrieks of laughter rose from the whole regiment. But such
shrill, harsh voice. "The road is not swept for the princess my
shrine of the Mother of God and to Madame Suppert-Roguet, who was so
shrine of the Mother of God, and then we'll drive to the
shrink from speaking of civil war again. Fortunately, in the end, the
shriveled old hands were folded and on the finger of one of them
shrugged his and raised his hand to the kerchief, as if wishing to
shrugging their shoulders but not venturing to utter the implied word-
shudder to learn of the abandonment of the city in which her greatness
shuddered at the sound and then, smiling at his own sensations,
shuffling along in his galoshes as far as the door and stopped and
shut herself into a room adjoining the drawing room, occupied
shut it out of a vast section of the Louisiana territory.
shying and snorting horse and, accompanied by the dogs yelping at her,
shyly entered the shed followed by an adjutant and the regimental
shyness, which she imagined must be the same toward everyone as it was
sick man, probably a Cossack to judge by the cut of his hair. The
sickle. Clearings scattered through the woods spread out into a great
side and flourishing the whip.
side and my body on the other. I looked round and saw Brother A.
side every effort was made to hinder the only thing that could save
side of his activity. And the more we perceive of these influences the
side of it. Through the smoke glimpses could be caught of something
side of it. When subcutaneous and related to the smaller unnamed
side of the affair again involuntarily centered round a single
side of the corridor.
side of the knee it may incapacitate the patient from riding. When
side of the leg and foot. Sensibility to deep touch is only lost over a
side of the minister's bent bald head with its gray temples. He went
side of the sagittal suture, which appears as a deep groove--the
side of the thrombus with a view to preventing embolism is seldom
side to side, had drawn nearer to the young woman and taking his hands
side with the spur, and how the well-trained horse looked round
side, and on the twenty-sixth the battle of Borodino itself took
side, or, as is sometimes the case, on both sides, is a symptom of
side--_pleurosthotonos_--is not uncommon, the arching usually taking
sides I find not only sympathy but a somewhat eager desire that 'the
sides at the boundary of what they might not mention--brought before
sides drowned the sick man's groans.
sides, all trying to head the wolf, but it vanished into the wood
sides, emerged onto the Kaluga road.
sides, swaying as one mass with them in the center and rendering it
sides, the frightened baby began to cry, and people crowded silently
sideways felt the pulse and reflected a moment. The sick man was given
sideways to the officer.
siege of Savannah and De Kalb at Camden. Kosciusko survived the American
sifted out of the army day by day. All the physically or morally
sigh he could not suppress, as they passed out of the palace.
sighed, kissed her, and immediately began to cry. The princess
sight even for an instant of the chase. The hare they had started
sight of him?" Not one of the innumerable speeches addressed to the
sight of the enemy's lines, which all day long had yielded ground to
sight--children abandoned, some in the flames... One was snatched
sighted the French Guards marching along the road to Borovsk. From all
sighted the hare--and not without agitation he looked round and
sign and certify, and transmit sealed to the seat of the government of
sign and, in the other hand, the money to pay his salary. Then, with sly
sign it, allowing it to become a law, on the lapse of ten days, without
sign of the cross, saying to herself that even if she did not
sign or a nod from him making and undoing the fortunes of the humble and
sign the test of loyalty, frequently known as the "association test."
signal for a radical departure from the Articles on this point was given
signatures from the treaty.
signed by the governor, and transmitted to the other states for their
signed with Great Britain in 1783, brought the definite cession of the
signed. The Emperors exchanged decorations: Alexander received the
significance for them of the glow they were watching. Sighs were
significance of the "demonetization" of silver; but within a few years
significance of the factor, and if we recognize this unknown
significance of what had happened. He alone then understood the
significance. It must be considered in relation to the growth of English
significance. Others, particularly the bank, he fiercely assailed. More
significance. The higher a man stands on the social ladder, the more
significant history. Before the end of the eighteenth century, the
significant in that Pierce was pitted against a hero of the Mexican War,
significant part in the disposition of forces. The Appalachian ranges,
significantly that he did not "care a hang what they say about it on the
signing the Tariff Bill of 1828, soon known as the "Tariff of
signs is that the patient has periodically a sudden catch in his
signs of severe blood-poisoning appear: vomiting, diarrhoea, pains in the
signs to the footmen, and anxiously glancing from the clock to the
signs we possess, and is often present before pain is experienced by the
signs were: Lauriston's mission; the abundance of provisions at
signs, and pass words; "so that no spy of the boss can find his way into
silence in a tavern on the bank of the Niemen awaiting Napoleon's
silence. "In the first place, there must have been such a confusion
silenced; business prostrate; our homes covered with mortgages; and the
silent corridor the sound of several hands knocking at the front
silent! Our sovereign alone has protested against the seizure of the
silent?' 'Vewy good!' Then he says: 'Go and give a weceipt to the
silently and attentively for nearly a minute with the steady gaze of a
silently aside, marveling at "the old gentleman's" conceited
silently at the flooding waters glittering in the setting sun.
silently at the spreading flames of the second fire in the distance.
silently several times up and down the room, his fat shoulders
silently to table. The footmen drew back the chairs and pushed them up
silhouetted against the horizon and was pierced beyond Valuevo by
silk ligature around the artery likewise favoured the changes that lead
silver as the remedy. The creditors, on the other hand, naturally
silver at the ratio of sixteen to one.
silver cake basket as the Panins had at their party. Everything was
silver continued to fall. Then the advocates of inflation declared that
silver election. Thus vindicated at the polls, McKinley turned with
silver in fabulous quantities were unearthed by the restless prospectors
silver, copper, coal, and other minerals. In Nevada and Montana the
silver, gave his powerful support to the gold standard and insisted on
silverware, china, and cutlery he bought in English markets. Loving the
silvery light of the full moon fell on the floor. Dimmler had finished
similar condition may implicate the fascia lata of the thigh, or the
similar in kind whatever the irritant may be. The extent to which the
similar local effects, injure the general health and ultimately cause
similar masses of infantry in different uniforms; now was heard the
similar to that of lymph-follicular tissue, and the _alveolar sarcoma_
similar to that which female Magdalenes have, based on the same hope
similar to the Legion d'honneur of the great Emperor Napoleon, not
similarly, though in Moscow in the month of October there was no
simple and easily stated. "It is the duty of the government," they
simple language of the people, not in the sonorous rhetoric which
simple objects of those who launched the nation on that course, like all
simple, and direct; but we have earnestly sought to stretch the
simple, and equally efficient. The day before operation the skin, after
simple, particularly the subject of federal appropriations in aid of
simple. Both sections were agricultural--the producers of raw materials
simplest and most ordinary of men, and said the simplest and most
simpletons.") L'amour which the Frenchman worshiped consisted
simplicity--had brought no rude shock to the course of affairs at the
simplicity--here among these people gave him almost the status of a
simply directed toward arousing in the masses his own feeling of
simply to be farther away from the wounded man.
simply to petition the Emperor for pardon. They say great rewards will
simply, and truly carrying out the great work which saved Russia.
simply, organically, and therefore in the way that always produces the
simultaneously from the front.
since 1811 Russian forces had been similarly drawn. On the twelfth
since Prince Andrew had casually mentioned that no one nursed the sick
since been taken off, onto the farther bank, and reharnessed. The
since everyone must have personal hopes, Princess Mary in the
since he had left. All the others let him go, and he ran to her.
since the landing of the Pilgrims. The account of this progress is a
sincere conviction that he alone had experienced and known all the
sincerity of that speech, the feeling of majestic triumph combined
sinful human race, and his own progress to the highest degree of
sing. At the end of the third verse as the last note died away, twenty
singing loudly; yet through their shouting the voice of his benefactor
singing, and hissing continually around them. He spoke in the tone
single cavity and does not normally communicate with the shoulder-joint,
single division there was now the whole French army marching from
single drop of blood shall be shed there in opposition to the laws of
single gesture. She caught the unfinished word in its flight and
single money account or the number of quarters of flour in any of
singlehanded a poorhouse the order had founded in Petersburg.
singly and timidly in the direction of his trap.
singular power, commanding, by the use of simple and homely language,
sinister purposes of Napoleon, withdrew their troops and left the field
sinking to his knees in the muddy field, and all one could see was
sinus. A probe passed into the sinus strikes carious bone. Small
sinus_, the sequel of suppurative osteomyelitis, compound fracture, or
sinuses it usually passes through a cloaca and strikes the dead bone
sinuses. When the abscess is allowed to burst, or is opened and becomes
sir, for shame! It would be better if you went to the war."
sister of "Lighthorse" Harry Lee, protested to her brother against the
sit here. Three times we reached the guns and three times we were
sit still. She did not herself know how or why the exclamation escaped
site of former salmon patches, may persist, and the disease occasionally
sitting about in groups; they greeted Pierre and spoke of the town
sitting at home reading a book and trying to fathom the significance
sitting at tea with Bilibin. "The fete is for tomorrow. How is your
sitting for that purpose, they shall be on oath or affirmation. When the
sitting here in almost the same positions as before, whispering to one
sitting huddled up feet and all in the corner of the sofa, tearing and
sitting in the shadow at the other side of the fire.
sitting motionless before the glass, looking at her face, and saw in
sitting naked at the other side of the fire, warming his thin yellow
sitting on the trail of a gun carriage. A Cossack who accompanied
sitting up, fluttered under the dark roof of the penthouse. The
sitting. He had often before, during the last six weeks, remained
situated as to be pressed upon by the boot.
situated behind a valve in a varicose vein or in the terminal end of a
situated in the neck, thorax, or skull. Sudden fatal _syncope_ is not
situated in the subcutaneous tissue may destroy the overlying skin so
situated over the origin of the trapezius from the superior curved line,
situated superficially--for example, in the breast tissue--the affected
situated within the sac of a prepuce which cannot be retracted. If the
situation and nature of the tumour, which may have important bearings on
situation did not grow more serious but on the contrary became even
situation of the incision and the means taken to drain the cavity,
situation of the lesion.
situation. Certain varieties--such as the atrophic cancer of the breast
situation. In the gullet, for example, it usually causes death by
situation. The foremost Frenchman, the one with the hooked nose, was
situation. The idea of marrying some rich woman, which was suggested
situations, such as the thigh and perineum, they tend to become
situations. The new bone on the surface sometimes takes the form of a
situations; the insertion of a tube of radium after removal of the
six in number--lie along the lower order of the mandible from the
six weeks of the injury, if indeed it is not permanently arrested, but,
six years the National Labor Union continued to hold conferences and
sixteen hundred rubles, but the necessity of going back on his word.
sixteen millions. To the pleas of humanity which made such an effective
sixteen to one. If the issue had been squarely presented in 1890, there
sixteen who had recently joined the regiment, was now in the same
sixteenth empowered Congress to lay an income tax. The seventeenth
sixth day, the surface is found to be covered with minute, red,
size and becomes tense when the child cries.
size and shape of the wound; the entrance wound is increased in size and
size from time to time; but with the addition of peri-adenitis they
size of a cherry, and when these burst sinuses or ulcers result. If the
size of a pea, is commonly met with, especially on the neck and trunk;
size of the group. During the ten-year preparatory period this man had
size required for his goods and stock, and drift down the current to his
skeleton results from defective growth of bone at the ossifying
skeleton, and, as it is associated with softening and bending of the
skeleton. The lime salts are absorbed, the bones lose their rigidity and
skepticism as to what was happening in the world. Little Nicholas
skill nor the ingenuity of the slaves. As the returns were quick, they
skillful than before. Even the enemy was the same as at Austerlitz and
skillfully changed the subject. He asked him to tell them how and
skin and nail; the nail is cut evenly, and the groove between it and the
skin and subcutaneous cellular tissue; it is seldom met with in the
skin and the coppery colour of the eruption. At the anus the papules
skin appears, it indicates that the needles are too near the surface, or
skin around the ulcer, fulfils the same object.
skin bacteria, which attack the tissues devitalised by the erysipelas. A
skin becomes livid and finally gives way. If the case is left to nature,
skin flap on the dorsum of the hand appears rather thick and
skin grafts, before dealing with the veins.
skin is darkly pigmented; in the case of deep ulcers, the scar is
skin is destroyed and the caseated tissue of the gumma exposed.
skin is raised from the abdominal wall and the hand is passed beneath it
skin is well stretched and kept flat and perfectly steady, the
skin lesion. They are papules occurring on those parts of the body where
skin of the patient before operation, reliance is to be placed chiefly
skin or lying loose on the surface, the greater the range the wider
skin or of a mucous membrane, they tend to project from the surface, and
skin or upon an exploratory incision. Once the skin is broken the tumour
skin red and tense. Within a few hours, blood is extravasated in the
skin sloughs and pus escapes, after which the fever usually remits and
skin threatens to give way, or if the vitality of the limb is seriously
skin under the influence of friction and pressure, as was demonstrated
skin, and bullae containing blood-stained serum form on the surface. The
skin, they may assume the form of peeling patches in the palms, or may
skin-grafting; the sources of mucous membrane are limited and the
skin-grafts according to the size of the gap.
skin. It rarely extends to the lymph glands, and of all tuberculous
skin. Or, again, the hands of those who render first aid, the water used
skin. The incompetence of the valves allows the pressure in the varicose
skin. When the instrument transfixes a part, the edges of the wound of
skin_ in the form of brown spots or patches scattered over the trunk.
skins were in danger? And besides, the fate of the Fatherland did
skull and the bones of the face, which are primarily developed in
skull, a coffin, the Gospel--it seemed to him that he had expected all
skull, from lesions of the scalp or of the cranial bones
skull_, following the distribution of the fifth nerve, has seen
sky and the real stars were unnoticed. The sky was black and dreary,
sky--the lofty sky, not clear yet still immeasurably lofty, with
sky. Prince Andrew leaned his elbows on the window ledge and his
sky. There was no wind, and the men choked in that motionless
slanting rays of the sun, and the songs of the cavalrymen vividly
slaughter one another; all the faces expressed hesitation, and the
slaughtered men, but by that intangible force called the spirit of the
slave revolt in 1831 which ended in the murder of a number of men,
slaveholding class has become the governing power in each of the
slaveholding states and it practically chooses thirty of the sixty-two
slavery advocates of the Far South and the so-called pro-slavery
slavery and the convention, Fiske, pp. 256-266; and (4) the frame of
slavery and the planting system, the Republicans were also adroit in
slavery but all its badges of misery and servitude. On the same side
slavery in the national government. "A party," he said, "is in one sense
slavery in the territories governed by it. Acting on this advice he
slavery in the territories he opposed with all his strength. Of his
slavery in the territories, the Republicans went on record in favor of a
slavery in the territories.
slavery into the territories as "a dangerous political heresy at
slavery it was inevitable that the great estate should give way before
slavery should be sanctioned or excluded. Under the Constitution,
slavery should exist in the places subject to its jurisdiction. Upon
slavery to the planters. California was admitted as a free state under a
slavery would have been found only in the country are now found, with a
slavery, thus repudiating the Wilmot Proviso without guaranteeing
slavery? I ask whether as a people we can stand forth in the sight of
slaves and tilled the soil with their own hands, but they labored under
slaves the rights of white citizens in the matter of making contracts,
slaves, favored prohibiting the traffic in them; but South Carolina was
slaves--plunging into utter bankruptcy the Southern financiers who had
sleeker by his easy life in Moscow, entered the room.
sleep, and in spite of his cold which had grown worse from the
sleep. And meanwhile, the very next morning after the battle, the
sleeping castle. But though externally all remained as of old, the
sleeping in the open air, are ill-fed and generally debilitated. The
sleeping on the bare damp earth with one side growing chilled while
sleeping with the arm resting on the back of a chair or the edge of a
sleepless night, Prince Andrew when he drove up to the palace felt
sleeves despite the cold wind, swarmed in these earthworks like a host
sleigh, galloped on alone, abandoning his companions. The others who
sleigh, lifted his eyes to him, handed him the report and began
sleigh. The same happy, smiling Circassian, with mustache and
sleigh; Dimmler, his wife, and Petya, into the old count's, and the
slender but graceful and muscular arms and neck. By the grace of her
slices of bone, as this involves sacrifice of the cortex and periosteum.
slight degree of elevation of the limb is an advantage, but it must not
slight haemorrhages from a septic wound in the vicinity of a large blood
slight itchiness or pain shooting along the nerves of the part, shows no
slight violence, such as striking the tip of the extended finger against
slight," continued Nicholas. "We must hope for the best, and I am
slightest jar--even the shaking of the bed--may cause agony. The joint
slightest touch or by heat, and the patient usually learns for himself
slightest variation of note in the cries of the dogs.
slightly as treading heavily he stepped down from the carriage just as
slightly catching the curtain of the cot. Each made the other a
slightly flexed at the knees, and are rotated out as well as curved; the
slightly oedematous. The effused blood is soon reabsorbed.
slightly pushed away the bald head. Vera, Natasha, Sonya, and Petya
slightly to the lady and turned to him. Hardly had Balashev begun to
slightly trembling in the rays of the evening sun. Neither gnarled
slim neck shaking with sobs and throbbing against the window frame.
slim, supple, bare feet. The boards of the floor creaked. Stepping
slipped into the water. He tried to right himself but fell in up to
slippers and jumped onto the bed the countess had feared might
slipping past him into the Bazaar passage. "Stop, you rascals!"
slips of the flexor sublimis attached to them and supplied by the median
slit up along the dorsum to admit of the ointment being applied. If
slope of the trench, he observed the faces of those around him.
slough be formed. The duration of the sitting is determined by the
slough may implicate the wall of an artery and be followed by serious
slough produced by the charring of the tissues is sometimes attended
sloughing of the overlying soft parts. Many examples of this variety of
sloughing of the prepuce--a condition known as _phagedaena_. The
sloughing of the tissues, "606" preparations must be injected
sloughing, cut away, and the patient should have frequent sitz baths of
sloughs of a yellow or black colour. The pain in these burns is
sloughs separate. The outstanding feature of this period is _toxaemia_,
sloughs, the dead portion should be cut away, as its separation is
slow in separating. When the sequestrum involves an articular surface it
slow progress, and by the frequency with which it is associated with
slowing or stagnation of the blood-stream, and interference with the
slowly and on sufferance were they admitted to the province; but when
slowly and remains confined to the cervical glands for two or more
slowly escapes into the surrounding tissues, gradually displacing and
slowly fills again when the pressure is relaxed, and it swells up when
slowly moving amid the rows of soldiers and of other vehicles, had
slowness of their advance. The Emperor intended to join the army
sluiceways to hold water and divert it as needed to the thirsty sands.
small bodies of men and women, "united in solemn covenants with the
small but distinctly visible enemy column was moving down the hill,
small cloud rose from the hill and was borne in a streak to the left
small debts the existence of which no one had suspected. The debts
small incisions are made, under local anaesthesia, to relieve the tension
small lots. So it happened that the freehold of modest proportions
small newly built lodge close to the pond. Anton, a man who had looked
small portion of the nail is removed, the opening is blocked by
small states but between the planting section founded on slave labor and
small table tea things and supper dishes stood in disorder, and in the
small though active minority rejected the League of Nations in its
small top boots. And Natasha felt that this costume, the very one
small vessels that follows the removal of the tourniquet is avoided.
small vessels, but it is applicable to even the largest arteries. In
small well-lit anteroom where they took off their cloaks without the
small, rapid, and irregular, delirium followed by coma ensues, and the
smaller duct on the right side--the right lymphatic duct. The duct or
smaller than the corresponding parts of the opposite side.
smaller the conception of freedom and vice versa.
smaller, firmer, less expansile, and less compressible; the murmur and
smart. It was cold and dark. The officers were hurriedly drinking
smeared with a 6 to 8 per cent. ointment of scarlet-red, the surrounding
smell and the sound that meet the beekeeper are not the same. To the
smells of honey like the others, and bees fly in and out in the same
smile among the crowd, with all of whom he was acquainted. He too
smile and well-timed jests reconciled the antagonists. The Masonic
smile as they watched him from the knoll.
smile at the young pilgrim.
smile betraying her sympathy for the "daredevil," as she called
smile disclosed the fresh gap between his teeth to which Prince Andrew
smile of a doctor to whom an old wife wishes to explain the
smile on his face, he was telling the ladies about last Wednesday's
smile, ambling lightly up to the count's niece. "I have come, and am
smile, and engaged the smiling Julie in a confidential conversation
smile, and pronouncing the phrase "knocked out" with ringing
smile, talked to her about her native land. When he saw the pretty
smile, yielding to the entreaties of the festive company to drive
smiled at him with the egotism of joy.
smiled ironically on hearing that the sovereign was inspecting the
smiled now the same happy smile as then when he had looked into her
smiled triumphantly, proudly, and with sly merriment, the fear that
smiled), "that's what the French are, Monsieur Pierre, aren't they?"
smiled, and with dimples in her rosy cheeks followed him into the
smiled. She was the Countess Bezukhova, Pierre's wife, and the
smiling birch trees. Only the dead-looking evergreen firs dotted about
smiling joyfully; and snatching the shawl from the footman, whom he
smiling radiantly and applauding the players. The young people had
smiling sweetly. It was the third time that day that, with an ecstatic
smilingly at the recollection and turning to Makarin who gazed
smithy, hearing the sounds of revelry in the tavern and supposing it
smoke of the battlefield. From all sides adjutants continued to arrive
smoke of the campfires, and all that was around him changed and seemed
smoke showing the spot where it burst.
smoke that curled up from the rotating black ball. "I cannot, I do not
smoking gun, and of Karataev's absence at this halt--and he was on the
smooth on the surface, and abnormally light.
smoothly brushed head. He looked the Rostovs from under his brows
smuggled into Cuba. American soldiers of fortune joined their ranks. The
smugglers one day in 1772, the armed ship, _Gaspee_, ran ashore and was
snatch the prey from under our noses," thought Denisov, continually
sniffed at it, and stamped his foot twice on the floor as a signal.
snipped off with scissors. In milder cases, the warts usually disappear
snoring of Platon who lay beside him, and he felt that the world
snoring of the prince, who was in his large study. From the far side
snow of the road, and each of the other sleighs jolted in the same
snow were fluttering in that light. Tushin had not returned, the
snow. From that sleigh one could hear the shouts, laughter, and voices
snowy draft. Princess Mary shuddered; her nurse, putting down the
snuffbox while trying to hear what was being said at the other table.
snuffbox, while the tears kept coming into her eyes. Anna Mikhaylovna,
so also in history the new view says: "It is true that we are not
so arranged as to make pressure on the artery above the erosion. The
so as not to wake the countess who had fallen asleep only toward
so as to lead to the desired result, namely a conviction. As soon as
so audibly that the coachman asked him:
so called chances accompany him everywhere. The disfavor into which he
so continuous that the House of Representatives, forgetting its
so do you too! To the health of Alexander the First! Hurrah!"
so few of their ships escaped the hawk-eyed British navy to operate in
so for friendship's sake he is leaving the university and me, his
so great that the patient only obtains sleep by the use of hypnotics,
so had he not been hindered, first, by his membership of the Society
so he could not but tremble and his heart stand still at the imminence
so he pities the boy.' I'll show them tomorrow whether I'm a boy. Will
so irritate and destroy the tissues as to lead to an actual increase in
so long as the skin retains its normal appearance, the term "blind
so many sympathizers. Moreover, Bowdoin and several members of the
so much as the mental capacity of those who had chosen it. Others
so much at the captain as at those who were laughing, among whom
so on account of the hostile tone the countess could not help adopting
so on. But all this was only talk; in reality (though the Council of
so on. Men went from the west to the east killing their fellow men,
so rapidly that the protective emigration of leucocytes fails to take
so recently built. It multiplied the number of industrial workers and
so soften the wall of the vessel as to lead to aneurysmal dilatation. It
so strong that he could lift the back of the carriage from behind, sat
so that I would give my life for them, and the others I'd throttle
so that it is thickened, raised above the surface, and of a brownish-red
so that it was all the harder for the Emperor to turn it elsewhere.
so that she felt herself surrounded on all sides by the acrid scent of
so that small twigs may become enlarged to the size of the median, while
so that the air escapes through the nose in speaking, giving to the
so that the lumen of the cut ends is diminished, and at the same time
so thought Rostov and most of the officers after the review.
so weakened that it readily ruptures. The best treatment is to resect
so well and have the greatest respect for them."
so wide, that it requires the greatest care and the most watchful
so with the same object in view he came to Moscow. There he wavered
so, but I am still so weak that I love my life, the meaning of which
so," etc. And as usual nothing happened in accord with the
so-and-so.' He went to the next one. 'From whom did you get it?' and
so-called _exostosis bursata_. The bursa may be derived from the
so-called _leg ulcer_, which occurs most frequently on the front and
so-called laws of war is the action of scattered groups against men
sob. The countess exchanged a look with Sonya.
sobbing in the schoolroom? I shall never forget it: I felt sad and
sobs and ran from the room.
sobs. Her face was pale and rigid. Only in the lower part of it
sobs. The count was lighting his pipe and did not notice his son's
social legislation, including the prohibition of child labor and minimum
social welfare. The Progressive Republicans, impressed by these
social, had the effect of making Frenchmen begin to drown one
socialistic theories and attended strictly to the business of organizing
societies, after the fashion of French political clubs, arose in the
society scandals, the weather, and Countess Apraksina. Now and then
society was so profoundly affected by the Civil War and economic
society woman to be buried in the country during the best years of her
society, love of a woman, the Fatherland itself--how important these
society, more especially of the feminine society, in which I have
society, was to accompany them to the ball.
society. She provoked the jealousy of the elderly magnate and told him
sodden from moisture, as in "soft corns" between the toes. A bursa may
soft forehead was moist. Prince Andrew touched the head with his hand;
soft glitter the waters of the distant Danube shone. And fairer
soft palate and pharynx, and that associated with lead poisoning the
soft parts are divided, and the bone is resected.
soft parts in contact with the bone.
soft parts that closely overlie a bone, such as the skull, the tibia, or
soft parts with the sharp spoon and scissors, and to gouge or chisel
soft parts, including the nail, should be reflected towards the dorsum
soft policy in dealing with his American subjects. "The die is cast," he
soft tissues are pressed against the edge of the nail, the skin gives
soft to the touch, and of the consistence of firm fat. In exceptional
soft, and serene expression. In her face there was none of the
soft, projects as a cone beyond the level of the rest of the swollen
soft, the acetabular portions are pushed inwards by the femora bearing
soft, tremulous voice, and in the weary eyes that looked over her
softening of the heart, and a consciousness that something great and
softening or liquefaction which result in the formation of cystic
softening, or of bony hardness. The skin moves freely over it, except in
soil of the older states, the restless subjects of King Cotton quickly
soil produce migrations of peoples, the foundations on which history
soil seemed well suited to slavery and the planters expected to extend
soirees as before--such as she alone had the gift of arranging--at
soldier left the frontier forts under the terms of the Jay treaty of
soldier under the arms to place him on a stretcher that had been
soldier with a wagon, who was pressing onto the infantrymen who were
soldier with the sores immediately turned away and went on with what
soldier's mind that the relative strength of the armies had changed
soldier, mimicking the general who had ridden away. "I'd shoot them,
soldier, with his clear blue eyes, stepped forward from the ranks,
soldiers and officers advanced to the gate. In the gateway lay three
soldiers attend to the voice of their commander, or would they,
soldiers called before the ranks.
soldiers crowding and hurrying across the bridge, ascending on the
soldiers did not understand. One was taller than the other; he wore an
soldiers excitedly try to get beyond the interests of their
soldiers in the shed with Pierre, was dying, and Pierre told the
soldiers in their greatcoats were ranged in lines, the sergeants major
soldiers of his army whether they had taken part in the battle or not,
soldiers of the escort had raised their muskets, fired, and run
soldiers ran to the rear they returned immediately and hastily. At
soldiers run in the direction of the drum as formerly, but made
soldiers surrounded the Frenchmen, spread a greatcoat on the ground
soldiers than usual to the colonies, and the ink was hardly dry on the
soldiers who were loading, hauling the guns, and continually running
soldiers, and carried him to the hut. Ramballe put his arms around
soldiers, did not produce quick results. It was near the close of the
soldiers, orderlies, and officers. All along the sides of the road
soldiers, paced up and down the battery under fire as calmly as if
soldiers, sailors, officers, money, and supplies, is known to all the
soldiers, taking advantage of the stoppage and congestion, turned back
soldiers. "Stop them!" he shouted, and at the same moment, probably
soldiers. Friendly relations were resumed with the Mexican government
soldiers. From France came young Lafayette and the stern De Kalb, from
soldiers. If it causes inconvenience the bone may be removed by
sole aim was to unite them, though uniting the armies was no advantage
sole of the foot a perforating ulcer may develop. Arthropathies are
sole of the foot. A corn is usually hard, dry, and white; but it may be
sole purpose of developing a body of small freeholders in the West. It
solemn resolution in 1914 the National Federation of Women's Clubs,
solemn warning to the Mexican government protesting against the
solemnly from behind a cloud, and the cupolas and crosses, the
solemnly near by on the right.
solemnly registered in the treaty of 1778. Accordingly it refused to
solfa exercises in the music room. He knew that she had not sung since
solicitude the fortunes of the Spanish king to whom, at the close of the
solitary shot and the brilliance of the bright sunshine merged in a
solitary, although certain forms, such as the chondroma, may be multiple
solitude (he tried several times to fix his attention on the Masonic
solution into the cellular tissue--for example, under the mamma, into
solution of one per cent. novocain into the line of the lateral and
some accounts with the horse dealers. When he had finished that
some bushes right among the French and, as Denisov had witnessed
some cases the tumour is diminished by pressing the blood out of it, but
some cases to ascending neuritis. The treatment consists in excising the
some complication occurs, such as suppuration or fracture. With the
some consolation in the admission of Vermont because the balance of
some dozen men nearest to him," thought he, "the rest could not have
some dried bread with her, had spent two days in the catacombs with
some entrenchments being thrown up, the freshly dug clay of which
some fifteen millions a year pleasure-seeking in the alluring cities and
some fighting during the French and Indian War, but his military
some five hundred paces in front of the knoll and below it. This was
some form of injury which divides all the coats of the artery. The walls
some frothy blood escapes from the wound. The patient instantly becomes
some hairs painfully in the knot. Then he drew his face down, kissed
some in the sitting room, some in the library.
some induration around the wound and a slight tenderness on pressure
some inspection business," remarked the visitor.
some muscular effort or strain, it is attended with the usual signs of
some not. This whole mass droned and jostled in confusion under the
some of his generals had taken their stand, but even from the
some of the French threw down their arms and ran out of the bushes
some of the contents of the cyst through a fine needle. They are usually
some of the economic advantages of the trust.
some of the high officers expressed a reluctance at fighting against
some of the larger joints, and not infrequently the smaller ones also,
some of the other organisms that are known to be pyogenic, such as the
some of the radicals had hoped, but a "liberal" middle-class monarchy
some of the scenes and themes of the novel by Harriet Beecher Stowe,
some of the ship's magazines, the worst suspicions seemed confirmed. If
some of their claims respecting boundaries and fisheries, the American
some of them draw the line and strike the harpoon on the coast of
some of them incensed at the heavy taxes on their operations and others
some project or other. Just look how he treats the ladies! There's one
some secondary operation, _e.g._, for the removal of a foreign body, or
some surgeons advocate the expectant method of treatment, waiting for a
some time in the gateway, Petya tried to move forward in front of
some time in the shop.
some time served in the Continental Congress and eighteen were members
some time to the Emperor.
some twenty years the Confederation was active and it continued to hold
some, considered dangerous. In a desperate case massage of the heart
some. The great thing is to live in harmony...."
someone outside himself had spoken them, though the impressions of
someone who had risen and was sniffing in the dark passage.
someone's copse to take wood, how he had been caught by the keeper,
someone, now working herself up to tears with the imaginary words of
someone. (Prince Bagration did not ask about the guns on the left
someone. The old countess had not yet come. But now steps were heard
something and went away. It seemed to Pierre that even the prince
something around the workman. The lower jaw of an old Frenchman with a
something badly and sat down on a crimson throne. The maiden who had
something big, that splashed into the water.
something cracked, shouts were heard, and the troyka flew along the
something else that would decide the matter--something independent
something from one to another, and a page--the same one Rostov had
something important and clever. Now the general had begun such a
something in her reticule. "Besides, the trousseau is ready, so
something new and joyful stirred in his soul. He felt happy and at the
something new and stern showed round the mouth.
something on the candlestick.
something shameful he had done the day before. That something shameful
something soothing in the knitting of stockings. The needles clicked
something still funnier. Most of the anecdotes, if not relating to the
something sweet. Would you like some?..." and Petya ran out into the
something there but that no shots were being fired from the battery.
something to drink, there was a stir around him, then the people
something to his legs in the darkness, and though Pierre could not see
something to say, but failed. Boris on the contrary at once found
something to the general, who looked through his field glass.
something was wrong and that to discuss the bad news was difficult,
something white by the door--the statue of a sphinx, which also
something with his hand. Looking more closely Pierre recognized the
something, repeating the same words several times. She could not
something. All I care about is to enjoy seeing the chase, is it not
sometimes Russians, but when he looked again with the naked eye, he
sometimes also to the soldiers. Looking at their boots he several
sometimes applicable to the early appearances, which closely resemble
sometimes arrests the bleeding.
sometimes ascribing to the party, in accordance with ancient political
sometimes been the means of bringing about a cure.
sometimes bilateral. The injured limb is rendered useless for
sometimes by palpable enlargement of the superficial nerve-trunks
sometimes curving of the bone. Under less favourable conditions, the
sometimes developed over the heart and large arteries. The swelling is
sometimes given to the peasants. She also knew that neither her father
sometimes hydrocephalus, and the head is characteristically enlarged.
sometimes in the daytime and sometimes at the dead of night. Notices
sometimes met with on the median aspect of the head of the metatarsal
sometimes necessary to let the pus out by one or more small incisions
sometimes several men were torn from the regiment in a minute and
sometimes soothing to the patient, but when the vessels in the inflamed
sometimes stopping short, gesticulating, and lisping: "the position in
sometimes the very opposite of what they order occurs.
sometimes unexpectedly long (one recorded from the femoral artery
sometimes with pyogenic diplo- and streptococci. According to the mode of
somewhat higher in the vegetable scale than ordinary bacteria--the
somewhat more than 20,000 people. New York, the "commercial capital of
son Anatole is accompanying me on his way to the army, so I hope you
son and seizing the little princess' arm as if she would have run away
son by both hands, he cried, "Now I've got you, so take the sleigh and
son seemed to have changed roles since the campaign of 1805. The old
son was accustomed to understand him. He led him to the desk, raised
son's tutor, Prince Andrew again joined warmly in the conversation
son; Sonya, the count's fifteen-year-old niece, and little Petya,
song proceeding from the house.
sons lying dead. After many consultations and conversations, the count
soon as Petya found himself in the square he clearly heard the sound
soon as he tried to continue the conversation he had begun with
soon as it is recognised. In those projecting from the surface of a
soon as it reaches rich pastures, so did the army disperse all over
soon as the French entered. But the French entered and still Pierre
soon as the paralysis of the war was over, the South caught the
soon as they left the place where the balls and bullets were flying
soon as we know the cause prompting the action we can foretell the
soon as, driving through the town, he saw the Iberian shrine with
soon attain a large size, filling up the axilla, and displacing the
soon be back again from the army and would certainly write to his
soon be brought before Napoleon himself. But instead of that, at the
soon entered the race and outdistanced New York, though unable to equal
soon found him equal to the shrewdest in negotiation and action.
soon found that gold had been undervalued. When again in 1834 the ratio
soon left their game and came over to the samovar, yielding to the
soon put an end. Following the precedent set by Congress under the
soon rivaled those of the Appalachian area. Copper, lead, gold, and
soon seen at elections. The freedman, into whose inexperienced hand the
soon?" she thought when she reflected on the change. But when she
sooner as he had been detained at the palace. He did not say that
sordid and unworthy plea fails when brought to the test of facts. The
sore and the breath foul, the mercury should be stopped for a time. If
sore are those first affected, for example, the epitrochlear or axillary
sore throat and affections of the eyes. The local lesions are to be
sore throat. Sometimes it is more persistent, as in the enlargement
sore, after which it will be managed on the lines already laid down.
sore. The base of a callous ulcer lies at some distance below the level
sores on the toes of old persons are always to be looked upon with
sorrow or discord in the family that has been so good to me (she
sorrow. His kind, honest eyes, with the tears rising in them when
sorry and almost ashamed as she felt to leave Natasha alone, yet the
sorry to have now to forgo the charity of this house.
sort of merriment. But beneath the slope, by the cart with the wounded
sort of victory which is defined by the capture of pieces of
sort out the stinging and tormenting thoughts that confused his
sort. Of necessity the lives and the ships of neutrals, as well as of
sorts of tempting wares. The Pavlograds held feast after feast,
sought a way out of the deadlock.
sought the ballot at their hands. Gains by this process were painfully
sought to bar the door to the "unpleasant and irritating business of
sought to break the yoke imposed upon him by the platform, saying that
sought to exorcise the evil spirit of partisanship by inviting their
soul to that Eternal and Unfathomable, whose presence above the
soul. He paced through the ballroom, waited till everyone had come,
souls of the worshipers. The gates of the sanctuary screen were
sound in the darkness of the night. The gloom that enveloped the
sound of a drum and shouts of command, and from the battery one saw
sound of cannon and musketry ahead of him. The firing grew louder
sound of horse's hoofs approaching at a trot along the line of hussars
sound of kissing. When Prince Andrew went in the two princesses, who
sound of the oft-repeated passage of the sonata. Prince Andrew stopped
sound of the old man angrily blowing his nose. Hardly had Prince
sound of these voices, the inattentive way Kozlovski looked at him,
sound of voices, the tramping feet, the horses' hoofs moving in mud,
sound which immediately broke off. The door of the private room opened
sounded all along the lines.
sounded and you'll be in a pretty position without your boots!" (The
sounded the first note of colonial alarm.
sounds and the development of murmurs, may cause widespread infective
sounds before, now heard nothing else. On the right of the battery
sounds. He heard footsteps in the darkness and a black figure
source of income for the crown as well as for the proprietors. Wherever
source of infection, and in the indolent forms of lymphadenitis this
source. In Pennsylvania, the quit rents brought a handsome annual
sources of irritation. The spasms may be diminished by means of chloral
sources, and the incomprehensible surrender of whole corps without
south of the Ohio, ceded by North Carolina to the national government,
south, on the banks of the Delaware River, a Swedish commercial company
southeast, a desperate struggle with the Tuscaroras called forth the
sovereign and the Fatherland, but it turns out that I am serving
sovereign powers of the earth.
sovereign powers. The treaty of peace with Great Britain named them all
sovereign rights were extended it became the high duty of the government
sovereign's bodyguard. Bennigsen was a landlord in the Vilna
sovereign, who had trusted worthless and insignificant people. But the
sovereign--the king of England. The English Parliament made laws for
sovereign. It was a unique chance to show his devotion to the
sovereigns; the position seems to them insoluble. But the wave they
sovereignty" so celebrated in Southern oratory, had gone the way of all
sovereignty. The gauntlet was thus thrown down at the feet of the
space, time, and cause lies in renouncing the direct feeling of the
space. And therefore so long as not all the conditions influencing men
space. It is characterised by the usual symptoms, and is treated by
spaces of the sub-epithelial connective tissue, become compressed and
spaces or vessels, or from the dilatation of those which already exist;
spaces with lymphocytes and plasma cells, but also to the formation of
spacious and had rooms for the house serfs and apartments for
spanning a continent with the telegraph, Cyrus Field linking the markets
sparkled with so many stars that one did not wish to look up at the
sparkling black-agate eyes at the frightened and happy Natasha.
sparkling diamonds, she passed between the men who made way for her,
sparks which set Moscow on fire, and the frosts--and instead of
spasm, the patient experiences a distressing sensation as if he were
spastic paralysis he succeeded in picking out in the nerve-trunk of the
speak before a look of amazement appeared on the Emperor's face. He
speak in the tone of decided refusal and disagreement in which he
speak the English language, at least without an accent. The necessity of
speak the whole truth.
speak to him. He drew nearer and saw that the old man had only one leg
speak. The regiment was also a home, and as unalterably dear and
speaking French. He opened his eyes. Above him again was the same
speaking in a louder tone and more hurriedly than before. During the
speaking of his wife's debts. And Pierre decided that the steward's
speaking of this as of a settled matter. About the same time he
speaking to her. The kindhearted countess was the more vexed with
speaking to someone in the adjoining room.
speaking, and with eager curiosity all the bootmakers joined the
speaking, but at this point, evidently not liking the officer's
speaking, no cause for surprise. Since the foundation of our republic
speaks of Lily, but I say, no--the princess! Do you want me to do
special celebration of the season.
special character. The faces of the unimportant people awaiting
special enclosure to feed and that becomes twice as fat as the
special of his own. The difference between his former and present self
special stimulus to the rapid settlement of Western lands which swept
special tendency to break down and ulcerate on the surface (Figs. 102
special trains and addressing literally millions of people in the open
specially well seen in the extensor and adductor muscles of the thigh in
specie payment, the advocates of free silver were a power to be reckoned
specific organisms. We have seen nothing to substantiate the belief that
specifically stated that they were assembled for "the sole and express
specimen, the sequestrum appears small in proportion to the large cavity
specimen," he grumbled to himself. What angered him was that the
spectacle. But the visitors did not reflect that besides the couple of
spectacles Sonya read all that the countess meant to convey with these
spectacles were slipping off but unable to let go of the mane and
spectacles" (that was how Petya described his namesake, the new
speech before the Supreme Court, "is communistic in its purposes and
speech delivered in the Senate in 1878, that, as the Constitution
speech from excitement, asked the aide-de-camp whether he would be
speech, or of the press; or the right of the people peaceably to
speeches, public or private, of the advocates of this war," he contended
speed and now to stay the enormous, popular tide that bore him along
speeding along the wires. Prepared for the event, the editor of the
speedy and public trial, by an impartial jury of the State and district
spend the eve of that day in his usual way. He examined the
spent after he was wounded, the more deeply he penetrated into the new
spent every day and whole days at the Karagins', and every day on
spent his childhood. Riding past the pond where there used always to
spent the evening at Count Kochubey's. He told the count of his
spent the evening at the Melyukovs', the girls went to their
spent the night ten miles from Olmutz and next morning were to come
spent the whole day on horseback inspecting the locality,
spermatic cord (varicocele), and in the veins of the anal canal
spheno-occipital synchondrosis or in the sacro-coccygeal region.
spinal anaesthesia there is no lowering of the blood pressure.
spine and of the fingers as well as in the temporo-mandibular joint. In
spinning among small centers prevented the congestion that had
spinning continued to be done in the home. The Dutch of New Netherland,
spinning jenny and the loom to other hands.
spirit and obtained that manner which the pas de chale* would, one
spirit of independence which led Dissenters to revolt in the Old World,
spirit of partisanship, saying that in government "of the popular
spirit of the people.
spirit, that prevented the grand union of monarchs from making open war
spirit, the truly antique valor of the Russian army, which they--which
spirit." To the "democratic licentiousness of the state legislatures,"
spirits had risen, like his own, at the firing, and went back at a
spirochaete, but small numbers have been found in the peripheral parts of
spirochaete. In animals the disease has been transmitted by material from
spirochaetes, repeated applications of the test furnish a valuable means
spite of all this it is the highest class, respected by everyone.
spite of his extreme youth his departure for the army was a great
splashing in the mud, defiled in fours and moved along the broad
spleen, and liver, may be the seat of secondary nodules.
splendid Russian troops and their commander of the laurels they have
splint applied to the lateral aspect of each lower extremity, and
splint is removed the skin pressed upon is found to be of a pale yellow
splint, and a Bier's bandage applied to the upper arm. Operative
splintered portions of his thighbone had been extracted, the torn
spoiled the children, was always ready to render the small services
spoiled. But am I really to abandon forever the joy of Prince Andrew's
spoke in abrupt sentences. "The whole company can bear witness. I
spoke not of personal matters but of the universal questions of life
spoke of it, but apart from the ordinary staid and respectful good
spoke of the danger threatening the empire and of the hopes he
spoke of the sayings and doings of their commander, the Grand Duke,
spoke of waiting for the arrival of commissioners of conciliation. "Is
spoke of what he knew might interest the old lady and that she could
spoke to him about the princess (as she did when he was mentioned) and
spoken of as _caries of the articular surface_. The occurrence of
spoken such pathetic words to the son, or Pierre, whom it had been
spoken to Hippolyte in the drawing room and which was so plainly
spoken, but rather in something else--in the expression of face and
sponging, or even the cold bath, is preferable to the administration of
spongy crust on the surface.
sponsors to secure the requisite two-thirds vote.
spontaneous displacement of the bones, and this may amount to
spontaneously. The arm is to be kept at rest, with the affected muscles
spontaneously. The solitary flat-topped wart which occurs on the face
spoon, and the part afterwards cauterised. As a rule, amputation well
spoon, or to excise it bodily. To encourage healing from the bottom the
spoon, to get rid of the tuberculous tissue with which it is lined. In
spot came the sound of a horn, with the signal agreed on in case of
spot chosen by Napoleon, with the guns of Pernetti and Fouche; which
spot indicated, holding away with one finger the coat collar which
spot where Nicholas had placed the kiss.
sprain," affecting the flexors of the hip; and the "jumper's and
sprang from the apes. They say this, not at all suspecting that
sprang onto the box of the moving coach which jolted as it passed
sprang out of the Union Pacific, the Northern Pacific, the Southern
sprang up a hundredfold in the North.
spread is limited by the attachments of the axillary fascia, and the pus
spread of boils may be unwittingly promoted by the use of a domestic
spread of cancer to that of an invisible annular ringworm. The growing
spread of the process that may take place is chiefly influenced by the
spread out again more evenly, and the clerk led Petya--pale and
spread over the fertile lands of Berks and Lancaster counties, laying
spread terror and desolation through the land. "What a scene," he
spread through the ranks. How such a consciousness is communicated
spread through the whole town. This was terrible! What a position
spread to all Europe. In his _Reflections on the French Revolution_,
spread to the adjacent joint.
spread under the transverse carpal ligament, the incision must be made
spread, creeping over the skin with a serpiginous, crescentic, or
spreading, and mingling with one another. He could also, by the
spreading, and thus gave us time to retreat. The retirement of the
spreads along the medullary canal for a varying distance, and also
spreads both in area and in depth, until the muscles and often the
spreads deeper and deeper, till eventually the bone or joint is reached,
spreads in and covers over its surface. In course of time the epithelium
spreads into the common flexor sheath under the transverse carpal
spreads slowly up the limb by way of the lymph vessels, and as these are
spreads the entire cornea assumes the appearance of ground glass. The
spreads towards the palm of the hand. The finger becomes red, swollen,
spreads up the leg to just below the knee before signs of arrestment
spreads widely through the tissues, exerting great pressure on the
spring of 1775 brought forth from the king of England a proclamation:
spring was released, the clock began to whirr and the chimes to
springs of human action. Three of them had served in the Stamp Act
springtime. The members and guests of the Club wandered hither and
spurred Bedouin twice and successfully put him to the showy trot in
squadron and shouted in a hoarse voice to the men to look to their
squadron commander, had a board, lying on piles at the end opposite
squadron, entered the room.
squadron, halted, spoke to the commander of the regiment, and rode
squadron, the Emperor's eyes met Rostov's and rested on them for not
square of the distance. At the last post station before Otradnoe he
squarely. She would like to be married to all three at the same time,"
squeaking on its runners as though freezing to the snow, its
squealing in the garden. Perhaps it's his brat that the fellow is
squeeze below the shoulder. Pierre went with Anna Mikhaylovna into the
stab his bare breast with the sword I held to it. I could not be
stab, the communication with the vein may involve the main trunk of the
staff but was himself a new arrival. The lieutenant colonel turned
staff with a sincere desire to act on this advice. In the evening he
staff, among them the staff officer and Zherkov, who had been twice
staffs. It looked as if by that slight motion the army itself was
stage at which treatment is instituted. In the milder forms recovery is
stage of the game there were similar mistakes and that none of his
stage of the process.
stage, as it does not appear until the disease has become generalised
stage, one or more years after the initial spinal symptoms, they may
stage, the tuberculous tissue being replaced by scar tissue. Recovery is
stage. The cymbals and horns in the orchestra struck up more loudly,
stagecoach and the tallow candle which Washington and Franklin had
stages the differential diagnosis is exceedingly difficult. In many
stages the usual symptoms of inflammation are present. Increased
stages, their knapsacks conveyed on carts, and the Austrian
staggered out of the study.
staggered through the Revolution like a pauper who knows not how his
staggering crops of corn, wheat, bacon, and wool. The two great canal
staggering on his thin legs, advanced into the middle of the room.
staggering, and singing some incoherent song, and approached the
stain well. In older pus cells the outline is irregular, the protoplasm
stained a brown or reddish-brown colour, due to the action of the iodine
staircase. The well-known old door handle, which always angered the
stairs arrangements, became known as "the kitchen cabinet." Under the
stairs, and went in at the open door. There was no one in the
stale part. Anna Pavlovna Scherer on the contrary, despite her forty
stalls. In the front, in the very center, leaning back against the
stamped with one foot, bounded from the floor like a ball, and flew
standard for the national currency. Not until 1900 did they take that
standard, and to introduce into the system therapeutic agents which will
standard, won the nomination, and wrote a platform vigorously attacking
standardized civilization of electric lights and bathtubs. By the end of
standards); if the matter concerned some brief conflict in which
standing at the door for half an hour repeating the same words to
standing before him, that he was out of humor, as was sometimes the
standing before him, wearing aprons like the Rhetor's and holding
standing beside a green caisson shouted at him, but only when the
standing by the ammunition wagon.
standing by the guns shouted some words of command to the officer, and
standing in that room, and his valet was buttoning on to the back of
standing in the stirrups, trotted a Cossack. The officer, a very young
standing in the yard. Two of them had been uncorded and a wounded
standing it is not so simple, because other muscles, the spinati, the
standing joke among the hussar officers.
standing near the commander in chief and had taken it to his
standing on the battle field of a war waged to preserve the nation, he
standing on the fence and pointing me to a broad avenue and garden,
standing on the highest possible pinnacle of human power with the
standing settling up for the game. She looked at him and, screwing
standing together out of range of the shots, watching, now the small
standing up, on which lay an open exercise book, and the lathe with
staphylococcus albus from the skin of the patient when this has been
staphylococcus aureus, the streptococcus, and the bacillus coli
staphylococcus aureus, which enters the orifices of the ducts of the
staphylococcus, it is capable of lying latent in the tissues for long
staples and "cotton was king." These were standard crops. The methods of
staples of the South, went only from $165,000,000, in round figures, to
staples of the country; and the same state of things will recur in the
stared with curiosity at a Russian uniform, and came out at the
starring the puddles near the ferry, but Pierre and Andrew, to the
starry sky between the dark roofs of two penthouses.
starry sky presented itself to his eyes. Almost in the center of it,
stars on his breast. He seemed to have grown thinner since the
start singing with her. They sang together and everyone in the theater
start the affair without knowing for certain how many there are. I
started and bent forward in exactly the same manner. Nesvitski laughed
started on his journey, looking round at the fields of yellow rye
started the horses, the off pole horse tugged at his collar, the
started. But they had still to call at the Taurida Gardens.
starting in a lymph gland, appears in the neck, axilla, or groin as a
starting-point of cancer; and in the larynx or rectum the healing of the
starting-point, the anaesthesia produced by the ergotin preventing the
starting. Natasha was not in the room.
startling figures. The whole export trade of England, including that to
starvation wages and indifferent to the conditions of living, they
starvation, they adopted resolutions favoring the North instead of
starvation; in the larynx or thyreoid, by suffocation; in the intestine,
state courts in passing upon the constitutionality of laws has remained
state during the greater part of the forty years of my acquaintance with
state his views plainly to the Emperor? Is it possible that on account
state in the world, and therefore as an Englishman always knows what
state itself, must be given by them, or by the legislative and executive
state of Mississippi and granted tax exempt status by the Internal
state of Mississippi and granted tax exempt status by the Internal
state of Missouri. Thus vindicated at the polls, he became more
state of affairs quite unlike that which obtained in the Ohio Valley in
state of frenzy, once more showing the lengths to which men could go in
state of the political thermometer of legitimate Petersburg court
state of things to him in the very worst light, pointing out the
state questions the lawfulness of any act of the federal government, it
state ratifying conventions. Only one man of influence in the new
state service, related to people in the service. It seemed that in
state south of the line of the Potomac and Ohio rivers, except in
state to understand what was being read. He managed to follow only the
state was the first in the union to adopt the direct primary for
state without faith in the religious significance of marriage,
state, (b) family duties, (c) relations with my friends, and the
state, political and strategic. Each step of the retreat was
state-wide purposes. The idea spread, rapidly in the West, more slowly
state_, are carried out on the usual lines.
statecraft. These forces, all cumulative, drove the colonists, so
stated his belief that, while a syphilitic infant may convey the disease
stated with evident satisfaction. "The colonies must either triumph or
statehood. Congress, then Republican, looked with reluctance upon the
statehood. Under the authority of an act of Congress in 1816 the
stateliness the greater the pain and shame in her soul. She knew for
statement as to the force on which the authority of some particular
statement is or how applicable to the other colonies, no study has as
statement of the terms on which hostilities could be brought to a close.
statement was correct. Alpatych was not at home, he had gone to the
states "to impair the obligation of contracts." The more venturous of
states and individuals in obedience to the laws and treaties of the
states be necessary, as under the Articles, for the adoption and
states clamored for equal rights in the union. The large states vowed
states could appeal for the protection of their rights or through which
states equal in power as under the Articles or on the broader and deeper
states from which they came. Prepared for self-government, the Iowans
states in the minority and surrendering the federal government wholly to
states is perpetual, ran Lincoln's simple argument in the first
states named, a body of voters, qualified under the law as it stood
states on the basis of population, counting three-fifths of the slaves.
states on the seaboard had forgotten about the havoc wrought during the
states passed resolutions condemning the decision and the Republican
states respectively or to the people. Seven years later, the eleventh
states to their obligations under the Constitution, was flouted; states'
states up to the very boundaries of Canada. Zeal for the national cause,
states were one after another restored to the union by the grace of
states who are loyal to the United States," and proceed to the
states, and the valley of the Willamette waving with wheat sown by
states, approved the Articles. This plan of union, though it was all
states, but between the commercial North and the planting South. From
states, by legislative action, gave women the right to vote for
states, cannot hold competition with foreign manufactures without the
states, mainly in the West, had adopted it for general purposes, and
states, the rainfall was so slight that the ordinary crops to which the
states," all equal in rights and dignity, each wearing the "jewel of
states. The first of these was the purchase of Florida from Spain. The
states. This action, denounced at the time by our government as a grave
states. This was revealed by the figures for 1910. The gold, silver,
states. To them were added the migratory Germans as well. Now for the
states." It is true that the Democratic candidate, General McClellan,
statesmen as they watched the growth of their population, wealth, and
statesmen of the Old World, to all outward signs at least, seemed
statesmen there were stout friends of the American cause like David
statesmen were found to undertake the experiment. England therefore set
station gave fresh orders to accelerate the movement of his troops
station. He did not regain consciousness till late in the day, when
stationed and the two Emperors were living with their suites,
stationed on the Pratzen Heights.
stationed, in the hollow where the rivulet flowed, the soul-stirring
stationed. Beyond Valuevo the road disappeared into a yellowing forest
stations, at inns, and in the landowner's snuggery, maidservants had
status with the IRS.
status with the IRS.
statutory officers of the state and the other of the party leaders; they
stay and I'll see." The old prince snorted. "Let her marry, it's all
staying at the merchant Bronnikov's house, in the Square not far
staying the night.
staying the whole evening, I hope?"
steadily and ceaselessly on all sides. With the exception of the aunt,
steadily beneath the bow over its head, with no thought of
steadily growing, as the progress of home industries redoubled the zeal
steadily towards its goal. While the Sugar Act was under consideration
steady hand, pursued the path of negotiation, Spain proving more pliable
stealthily prowling about the combs, and the short home bees,
steam boilers or pipes, the breaking of machinery, and similar accidents
steamboat connections formed with the rest of the world, they carried
steamboats which appeared on the Ohio about 1810, three years after
steel, cloth, and other military and naval supplies as well as the
steel, lumber, hemp, and in fact all of the essential commodities
steer Makar Alexeevich by the elbows back to the door.
step in the first stages of the French Revolution greeted with applause
step was thus taken in breaking down the privileges of the landed
step, and feeling too feeble to break the meshes or to set to work
step. It agreed to stop the importation of British goods into America,
stepmother. Secondly because, as far as I know, that girl is not the
stepped forward and, stooping over the dying man, beckoned to
stepped softly over the carpet and went out into the waiting room.
steps he followed the maid, overtook her, and came out on the
steps in the "reception room"--as Denisov called that part of the hut-
steps to the door and grasped the cold door handle.
steps were cut out and these formed the entrance and vestibule. The
steps were necessary: not to allow the troops to loot, to prepare
steps, and so said the youths and maidens themselves as they danced
steps, pausing at the door for an instant as if struggling with
steps. Natasha lying on the sofa, her head hidden in her hands, and
sterilisation of the skin is difficult to attain, and where it is
sterilisation should be periodically tested. The two chief agencies at
steriliser and placed on a sterilised towel within reach of the surgeon
sterling representative of the true American spirit." This was not
stern expressions on the faces he had seen in passing, were lit up for
stern look replied: "Because you are alive and thinking of the living,
sterno-mastoid muscle, and surround the accessory nerve before it
sterno-mastoid muscle. They drain the various groups of glands which lie
sternum, and bodies of the vertebrae is occupied by a reddish gelatinous
sternum--with an increased area of dulness on percussion. With the
steward came to inform him that the money needed for the equipment
steward for his part tried to pretend to the count that he
steward respected him and jestingly called him "the Minister."
steward was the more readily your object might be attained," he said
steward, and again began giving orders. A light footstep and the
stewards the blood rushed to his face and his fists began to clench,
stick in the anteroom.
sticking out, and in the middle of which his wife's nightcap was
stiff finger is likely to interfere with the patient's occupation.
stiff. Masses of chalk form in and around the joint, and those in the
stiffness and deformity by movements and massage, and the use of hot-air
stiffness, especially in the morning after rest, which passes off
stiffness, it will be most serviceable to the patient. Immobilisation
still belonged to nobody and had no name. The French called it Azor;
still better; and, according to the idiosyncrasies of the individual
still cherished their old notions about divine right. With the
still distracted by memories of the dead past and uncertain as to the
still do the right thing.
still falling from the trees. Near the watchman's hut the black shapes
still farther back picket ropes and artillerymen's bonfires. To the
still fewer, and so on to the highest military command which is
still further by transferring the flap of skin first to one part of the
still gazing at the infant's face listened to his regular breathing.
still hanging in the balance.
still harder, and tends to shrink and to draw in the surrounding parts,
still he was lifted and laid on the stretcher.
still in course of construction. Round the house was a garden newly
still intact. There may be a feeling of weight in the limb, and in the
still listened, shaking his head disapprovingly. In the middle of
still lived, the Dred Scott decision stood as written in the book, but
still looked upon the sale of public lands as an important source of
still looked with her beautiful eyes full of tears at the door through
still moist. As they left the tavern in the twilight of the dawn,
still more clearly expressed in the smile with which he listened to
still more dependent on the use of radium or of the X-rays. Finally,
still more full of genius and Russia would have been lost and the face
still more irritating decree--the Orders in Council of 1807. It modified
still more memorable Dartmouth College case, he annulled an act of the
still more provoked at the thought that our forces were retreating
still more to the south and to cross from the Tula to the Kaluga
still more with the strain. One hand moved as if to clutch the
still occupied forts on Lake Erie pending the execution of the terms of
still on the throne, could be readily blown into flame.
still outstanding. Congress was unable to pay either the interest or the
still possessed the tenacious endurance and vigor of hardy old age.
still prominent in the party councils, but they were swamped by hundreds
still remembered with deep gratitude the aid of the French in the war
still say that the theater of war is Poland and the enemy will never
still seemed to descend evenly and imperceptibly toward the earth, the
still shouted when the princess, as if lost in a fog, had already
still surrounded by the magic plain bathed in moonlight and spangled
still take all the most necessary things."
still the same misty darkness. "Why not?... It might easily happen,"
still the same.
still to get dressed and they had to call at the Taurida Gardens.
still undressed, ran off to clear the men out of the pond.
still were the faraway blue mountains beyond the river, the nunnery,
still wide reaches of untilled soil. The Alabama and Mississippi regions
still young the tendency is for the disease to advance with considerable
stimulated reflexly by dashing cold water over the face or chest, or by
stimulus is withdrawn. The best-known example of this is the increase in
stir up insubordination or disloyalty in the army and navy; and those
stirred against them many of the clergy who, accustomed to having women
stirred the wrath of Virginia by summoning her to the bar of the Supreme
stirrup with trembling hands, threw his body across the saddle,
stirrups and sank back again. The soldiers without turning their heads
stitches in its neighbourhood. In the lower animals the grafting of
stock on easy terms and thus become part owners in the concern. This
stock--making $110,000,000 in all. If the amount due the United States
stock. This surmise is well sustained by the constant appearance of
stockholders in that instance became the voters and the governor, the
stocking she was knitting, went to the window and leaning out tried to
stockings, and, if the symptoms persist, the corn should be removed.
stocks on hand. It threatened with ruin the business of all those who
stomach, waddled out into the porch. He put on his hat with its
stone on stone with the cooperation of all, by the millions of
stone-built Kremlin had died away the French heard a strange sound
stoned in the street and hissed from the platform. Their meeting places
stoned; the German ambassador, one of the most cordially despised
stones of the pavement.
stood and from which Prince Andrew was surveying the position, was the
stood at attention when the officer arrived, but at a sign resumed his
stood at the entrance.
stood beside the throne with her hair down. She sang something
stood by the campfire listening to the talk.
stood constantly at the head of the bed.
stood erect with staring eyes. The Englishman looked on sideways,
stood for all those specific measures which favored the enlargement and
stood for nearly forty years, until repudiated by the Supreme Court in
stood found increasing favor among the people. State after state by
stood free, but empty-handed, the owners of no tools or property, the
stood guard, the last of them having been just admitted to furnish
stood in front of the house to which Balashev was conducted, and now
stood in the midst of an overgrown garden and, after a glance at his
stood just inside the door, trying to speak softly and not move, for
stood seven large candlesticks like those used in churches. Two of the
stood still. The smoke, rendered denser by the mist, prevented him
stood waiting by the door.
stood with the candle. Yes, it was he, pale, thin, with a changed
stools, is one of the best known examples: it is not uncommonly met with
stop bleeding by reducing the force of the heart's action.
stopped behind the Emperor. The Emperor Francis, a rosy, long faced
stopped her in the middle of the room and, amid general silence,
stopped him and inquired where the commander and officers were. The
stopped short, flushed till he perspired, but still got out the words,
stopped the company." Dolokhov breathed heavily from weariness and
stopped, facing the Cossack, and examined him with attentive
stopping Claparede and sending Friant now, the order was carried out
stopping Serbian agitation for independence, Austria-Hungary laid the
stopping where overtaken by the enemy and fighting rearguard actions
stored in warehouses for the lack of markets. So he looked to the Orient
storerooms similar men were busy among the provisions, and in the
stores are to be taken, and the chief of the hospitals asks where
stores, and rum in their wake. "Home from Californy!" rang the cry in
stories of the new regions they traversed. Then came the regular
stories over and over again to the same audience.
stories. Denisov was moodily silent all the evening.
storm at the square, cut his way in, slashed right and left, how his
storm of rain and hail. In general, the summer of 1812 was
storm of war destroyed it. By the irony of fate the thirteenth amendment
stormed at me, as the saying is, stormed and stormed and stormed! It
stormed by a Paris crowd and destroyed. On the night of August 4, the
storms often wiped out all signs of the route; hunger and thirst did
story that had no connection with the previous conversation. For a few
stout colonel who was standing in the meadow, he gave him some message
stout needle carrying a double thread of silkworm gut; some of the
stout, and cod-liver oil. The last is specially beneficial in patients
stragglers by the way, Bagration came out on the Vienna-Znaim road
stragglers. Everything was in good order except the boots.
straight appeal to the patriotism of the Northern voters." They
straight at him, but with a look the significance of which could not
straight at the sentinel. "Je vous demande si le colonel est ici."*
straight in the eyes, "you know the saying, 'Lucky in love, unlucky at
straight into Pierre's face. He glanced at the dirty innyard in the
straight into his eyes, and his nearness, self-assurance, and the
straight ticket in the election. For twenty years he adhered to this
straight to the castle. In spite of the severe frost some hundred
straight to the review, reaching the field at Olmutz by ten o'clock.
straight to the shed where his horses and trap were. The coachman
straight up to the crowd standing there. The crowd unexpectedly
straight, the bridges were strong and had handrails. Everything bore
straight. The curvature probably resulted from exaggerated growth in
straightforward. Some rascally speculators had profited from the funding
strain or over-use of the tendon, there would appear to be some other,
straining each faculty to understand the essential points of the
strains of the merriest music. Trap-ta-ta-tap! cracked the shots,
strait-jacket cunningly fashioned to strangle growth." He viewed the
strands or nodules can be detected on palpating the relaxed muscles. The
strange an event. In the English Club, where all who were
strange and memorable an impression on him. In the forest the
strange attire appeared at the door. Willarski, stepping toward him,
strange distinctness the faces of the people crowding at the
strange lady. Prince Vasili in front of the door, near the invalid
strange order she brought them until the count himself, in his
strange that Petya thought the French would immediately detect their
strange, pretty, unfamiliar people--the one with fine eyebrows and
strangers to the life and traditions of the South.
strangest and most contradictory rumors were current in the town. Some
strangest chances--from among all the seething French parties, and
strangulated hernia, appendicitis, or perforation in any part of the
strapping it to the saddle. Their horses, bridled and with high
strapping, of hot-air baths, or the making of multiple incisions in the
strategic points in the Caribbean for sea power. This project, long
strategic position of the islands, especially in relation to Haiti and
strategic position. It was the law-making body, and it could, moreover,
strategic positions in industry. When they failed to secure the
strategical goal which was our highest hope was gained. We had cut the
strategically the position of the army was very favorable.
strategist and the conqueror of Napoleon? Had he not seen the
strategy followed by the commanders of the opposing forces are clear
stratum lucidum, the stratum granulosum, and the rete Malpighii or
straw covered street and turned into the wide courtyard of Count Cyril
straw-coloured fluid, the _liquor puris_ or pus serum, closely
straying too far from the road, and heard his friend the captain
streaks of normal skin between them. The punctate nature of the
stream of European immigration flowed North and West, not South. The
stream of national life. The separatist forces which produced the
stream; stricture results only in the exceptional cases in which the
streams forming the Ohio. Though they were warned by George Washington,
street railways, electric light plants, and other utilities in the great
street where the house was.
street, by the Nikulins'!"
street, something exploded, and the street was shrouded in smoke.
street. The tune, played with precision and in exact time, began to
streets Pierre felt stifled by the smoke which seemed to hang over the
streets between the rioters and the police. Business stopped and a large
streets of Moscow by Durosnel's order to put a stop to the pillage,
streets of the Transmoskva ward and the Kaluga road converge, and
streets to see the city and, hearing that everything had been
strength and completeness amid the conditions of court life and far
strength and vitality--the strength which in that vast space amid
strength for conflict with the French, (2) to defeat them, and (3)
strength of all the former ones, and aid me to enter that temple of
strength of mind. This day the horrible appearance of the
strength to the federal government; accordingly they began to pay it off
strength to the task.
strength, the Republicans held the presidency from 1869 to 1885. The
strengthen the Church of England in America and the transformation of
strengthened in them the traits of character the old prince called
streptococci may be obtained from the blood. In pneumococcal and typhoid
streptococci--take on an overgrowth, which continues until the part
streptococci. The presence of anaerobic organisms introduces the
stressing the word "God" so unnaturally and so unpleasantly that
stretch, as in bending down to put on the shoes, such movements also
stretched across the desert. St. Joseph on the Missouri was the terminus
stretched along the highroad in the midst of a young copse in which
stretched and closely adherent to the cyst wall as a result of friction
stretched away into the distance. These were troops of Beauharnais'
stretched by interpretation, was not binding in international law; the
stretched, or torn away from their connections with the spinal medulla.
stretched, the limb becomes weak and unstable, and the patient complains
stretchers came into view before Rostov. And the fear of death and
stretches from Yuma to Tucson, that the metamorphosis of Arizona is
stretches of land were cleared or prepared for the plow, they were laid
stretching of the ligaments which normally retain the bones in position,
stretching of the scar, it is advisable to unite the different
stretching through the Confederacy to Northern Alabama, divided the
strict pursuance of the uniform decisions of the Supreme Court for
strictest command to the uttermost part of the country. Resolutely and
strictly speaking, absorption, of the existing bone, as is well seen in
strictly to obey. You said the bridge would be burned, but who would
strident tones. They accused the gold advocates of being the aggressors
strides and in a loud voice began boldly demonstrating the necessity
strides from one gun to another with a frowning face. The young
stridulous or metallic or sibilant, and there is marked indrawing of the
striking in the case of certain innocent tumours--particularly multiple
striking is the analogy between the colonial vassalage to which the
strings. The Service before everything. Thanks, thanks!" And he went
strip of red cloth spread out on it; but just then the crowd swayed
stripped the French king of his royal prerogatives and based the
stripped the colonists of the right to choose their chief executive. In
stripped their section of capital to support their cause. So the
stripping of the periosteum and thrombosis of the blood vessels of the
stripping themselves naked to steam the lice out of their shirts.
strips of bast were hanging on the broken and withered branch of a
strong enough), and in applying it well in front of the disease. To
strong he was (in his perception the two were one and the same)-
strong in the practice of self-government and could dispense with the
strong in the western communities. In the very beginning, it led to the
strong measures to sustain opinion favorable to the administration's
strong opposition and, on March 18, reluctantly signed by the king, now
strong unions, friendly to the Federation, though not affiliated with
strong was the sentiment that a two-thirds majority was mustered after
strong, handsome, and fertile woman. The old fire very rarely
strong, joyful sensations, and chiefly of the complete peace of mind
strong," said Pierre. "I should like to start from the Moskva River
strongly as it had done then. He recalled all the words spoken at that
strongly deprecated attacks by local interests on the federal treasury.
strongly enough, and because Miloradovich had not yet arrived with the
strongly predisposes to the formation of bed-sores. Prolonged and
strongly. She listened to every word about the victory of Moses over
struck Vereshchagin on the head with the blunt side of his saber.
struck by the abolition of slavery. The second and third came with the
struck by the fact that the Emperor seemed confused and blushed as
struck by the totally altered and unexpectedly rapturous and tender
struck his breast at the words "Russian army"), "I tell you frankly
struck up the pistol Makar Alexeevich at last got his fingers on the
struck, from the ground on which he lay, from any portion of his
struck. By removing the covering from the point of the bullet, as is
structural peculiarities of bone, however, and the important changes
structure of the parent tumour is reproduced.
structures in their vicinity,--and notably to the internal jugular
structures of the combs, but no longer in their former state of
structures, and if the distal portion of a muscle is deprived of its
structures, by causing syncope, by rupture, or from the occurrence of
structures, such as the trachea, oesophagus, or great veins, and symptoms
struggle between life and death, in which death gained the victory. It
struggle in Kansas he hurried to the frontier, gun and dagger in hand,
struggle of 1860. Immense sums of money were contributed to the funds of
struggle with the tissues, tubercle bacilli receive considerable support
struggles, their rights, and their place in the economy of the nation
struggling with death, and he knew that the result of a battle is
stubborn resistance from the enemy. On the 6th of November, reported
studies of politics or political economy.... In the four quarters of the
study in the Kremlin, giving detailed and exact orders as to
study of a mere narrative calls mainly for the use of the memory. We
study of history in the lower grades. If mathematicians followed the
study the effects of increasing the hyperaemia by artificial means. As a
study the skillful tactics and aims of Napoleon and his army from
study to the room behind, where his French valet and others were
stuff. Such magnanimity and sensibility are like the magnanimity and
stuffed with paper. The prince allowed no one at Bald Hills to drive
stumbled on him in the fog, hearing no encouraging word from their
stumbled on the French army.
stumbled, and fell on his hands. The others outstripped him.
stump if pressure is put upon it. The treatment of any nervous disease
stupefaction on their pale frightened faces. The youngest child, a boy
stupid and happy expression--the same man who had rushed out of the
styled himself--who was fond of parleys with the French, sent envoys
sub-glenoid dislocation, or in fracture of the neck of the scapula or of
sub-normal; and the respiration rapid, shallow, and sighing in
sub-periosteal resection is the procedure of choice, saving the
sub-periosteally or its interior is cleared out with the sharp spoon and
subcapsular enucleation is performed, followed by the insertion of
subcarbonate, and following its track with the X-rays (Fig. 35).
subclavian difficult or impossible. It may extend beneath the clavicle
subclavian. On account of the smaller amount of elastic and muscular
subcutaneous fat of the buttock is the most accessible; it may be
subcutaneous injection; the intravenous administration of neo-salvarsan
subcutaneous or of the thecal variety, but in some cases the
subcutaneous tissue and involves the muscles; while in those of the
subcutaneous tissue may break through the skin, forming indolent ulcers
subcutaneous tissue, the muscles, and other parts, are not uncommon, and
subcutaneous tissue; the edges of the punctures are ecchymosed, and the
subcutaneously is sufficient for the initial dose; if a longer period
subdue the essentially English population beyond the Atlantic made
subdued chanting of deep bass voices, and in the intervals sighs and
subjacent bone. When the disease begins as a synovitis, the synovial
subjacent bone; the cartilage may be detached in portions of
subjacent growth by direct continuity or by way of the lymphatics. Both
subject for the same offence to be twice put in jeopardy of life or
subject of metaphysics, even the manifestation of the force of free
subject of the war and without leaders. The Moscovites felt that
subject to laws which determine that life. But the same man apart from
subject to the jurisdiction thereof, are citizens of the United States
subject to the law.
subject to the trademark license, especially commercial
subject to the trademark license, especially commercial
subject, but the count returned to his troubles.
subject, denouncing slavery as a nefarious institution and the curse of
subject, leaving the decision, however, to "an enlightened people and
subject; Bennigsen, rather more of a soldier than the others, but
subjected to extreme cold, are brought into warm surroundings. The first
subjection of that man's will to the Deity, history cannot without
subjection of the will of a nation to some chosen man and the
subjects of the prince's attacks and ridicule. Whatever was spoken
subjects, and the president of Princeton University, Mr. Wilson had
subjects. When the service was over the governor's wife beckoned him
submarine menace. The Democrats, on their side, renominated President
submarines without warning and without safety of the lives of
submarines. Special effort was made to stimulate the production of
submarines. The number of enlisted men and officers for the army was
submission of the measure to the people at an election. If the bill thus
submission the sad choice of a variety of evils--a ravaged country, a
submission to the will of God; you cannot escape from Him. And they
submission, and the whole hospital, with arms and legs torn off and
submissively unbent the corner of his card and, instead of the six
submit his will to those who knew the indubitable truth.) He forgot
submit to arbitration or inquiry by the Council all disputes which could
submit to the Bourbons. Experience shows us that whatever event occurs
submit, and Vasili Dmitrich doesn't want to. You know the auditor told
submit. An army gains a victory, and at once the rights of the
submit.... If we take the resolute part, they will undoubtedly be very
submits to them and never resists the laws of gravity or
submitted to the Emperor. He thought of the meetings of a committee of
submitting with evident reluctance to the duty imposed by his
subordinates demanded that of him; but when listening to the reports
subordinates, and went into everything down to the minutest details
subordinates. "The mob is terrible--disgusting," he said to himself in
subscribed the same amount as the others.
subscriptions amounting to more than two hundred million dollars. The
subsequent contraction of the cicatricial tissue, the scar is usually
subsequent dictatorship and Empire, or all the things that produced
subsequently spreads to the other structures of the joint. Organisms may
subsequently termed his sufferings, but which at the time he
subsided within its shores and seemed to have become calm. But the
subsided, active and passive movements are employed to prevent the
subsistence. Even the herds that supplied Eastern cities with milk were
substance in their several communities, look to the federal, rather than
substance is protruded through the rent. It has been observed chiefly in
substance of the news.
substance of the synovial membrane. The mode of infection is the same as
substance which has been destroyed. In wounds of the liver, for example,
substitute for it money made of metal that has not the specific
substitute for the unknown x itself the conditions under which that
substitute. Except when infection occurs, the drain is removed in from
substituted, except in Georgia, a senate; while the lower house, or
subversive of the peace and harmony of the country."
subversive of the principles of warfare." The note closed with a clear
succeeded in pacifying his comrades.) Some of the prisoners who had
succeeded in setting it on fire and the French batteries were now
succeeds. He sat motionless, looking at the heights visible above
success in reaching the Emperor--he even thought how surprised
success which attends the Hunterian operation is evidenced by the fact
success which your intellect, military talent, and the courage of
success: the concentration of batteries on one point, an attack by
successes of the American experiment were used as arguments in favor of
successes to the predestined goal, an innumerable sequence of
successful in arresting the spread; in more severe cases amputation is
successful than the proximal ligature, and is therefore restricted to
successful, the resulting tissue changes subserve the process of repair,
successful. (2) Reactionary haemorrhage after the initial shock has
successfully cannonading the French, our artillerymen only noticed
successfully employed in the treatment of aneurysm near the bifurcation.
successfully practised also in aneurysm of the subclavian, carotid, and
successfully, evoking memories of the best times of her youth and
succession of boils is due to spread of the infection, the cocci from
succession, forming tumours much larger than the primary growth.
successive attacks tend to become less acute but last longer, and the
successive expansions by which we have grown to be the strongest nation
successor was to approve a drastic step in the direction of free trade.
successors, making the "third term doctrine" a part of American
succumbs to superadded septic infection. When, from its situation, the
such a combination of men, money, and materials as the North could
such a deduction is indubitable, as indubitable as the deduction
such a degree of atheroma as would interfere with the successful
such a feat possible: it was the attack in which he was said to have
such a nation," he said to Pierre. "You, who have suffered so from the
such a time of the year.
such an extent as to cause stasis, and by concentrating the local action
such and such people wrote such and such books? Of the immense
such as achondroplasia and osteomyelitis fibrosa. The condition is one
such as blisters, and exposure to the _Finsen light_ and other forms of
such as often occurs when receiving friends for the first time in
such as silk ligatures or fragments of bone, are embedded in the
such as the "Conway cabal," the cowardice of Lee at Monmouth, even the
such as the currency, the tariff, and national banking; and the
such as the flat bones of the skull and the maxilla, are not reproduced.
such as the issuance of paper money? (9) Shall the approval of all the
such as the knee and elbow, the influence of movement is shown by a
such as the median or radial (musculo-spiral) nerve.
such as the skull, the scapula, or the ilium, suppuration usually occurs
such as the stomach, intestine, urinary bladder, and prostate. In the
such as the tibia, than in those more deeply placed such as the upper
such as the urachus or Meckel's diverticulum, will be described in their
such as was responsible for the coming of the Irish, may likewise be
such general diseases as tend to raise the blood-pressure--for example,
such haste that he upset his coach and dislocated his arm. The king and
such irritation results in dilatation of the vessels of the part,
such is the people's will. He alone during the retreat of the French
such love," said Prince Andrew. "It is not at all the same feeling
such men as he who decide the fate of nations," added Bolkonski with a
such men for discerning the higher laws.
such mobile tissue elements as may be derived from, the parent tissue
such moments one reviews the past and plans for the future. Prince
such organs as the pancreas. Haemorrhage from the stomach and intestine,
such pressure. There may be cerebral symptoms from interference with the
such sources, and the disease is said to be most common during the
such structures aside without dividing them. In the abdomen and chest,
such surfaces with the sharp spoon, squeezing or even of washing them
such the combinations by which the manufacturing party, acting upon the
such was their lot in all other colonies. Their fate depended upon the
such wise policies firmly pursued by the government, he concluded, were
such, for example, as the subcutaneous cellular tissue, the bones, or
sucked and swallowed the cold snow, his lips quivered but
sudden alteration in the size, shape, and tension of the aneurysm,
sudden onset of severe pain and swelling in and around the joint, with
suddenly Sonya pushed away the glass she was holding and covered her
suddenly banished the shadows of the past. "Now tell us about
suddenly became unnaturally merry and chattered incessantly to the
suddenly began to wail as they looked at the fires--the smoke and even
suddenly felt guilty and grew timid on catching the expression of
suddenly from the next room were heard the footsteps of boys and girls
suddenly replied the irate colonel. "If you vere in the cavalry..."
suddenly rise to the realm of metaphysics. (This last resource was one
suddenly she began to cry and was hurrying from the room.
suddenly the whole world centered for him on anticipation of the
suffer from indigestion, constipation, and oxaluria--in fact, the same
suffer from inherited syphilis, it is almost invariably the case that
suffered from syphilis. Certain slight but important signs may give the
suffering in view of the common calamity, the same feeling that had
suffering of women under this government and such is now the necessity
suffering to the patient, crippling and incapacitating him for his work,
suffering, and the nearness of death aroused in him. Looking into
suffering, as it had been when he reeled and sank on the snow.
suffering, they frequently give rise to profuse haemorrhage from the
suffering. Mademoiselle Bourienne was the same coquettish,
suffering. The contents may be clear yellow serum or watery pus;
suffering. They satisfied the need seen in its most elementary form in
sufferings or with their relief. The pangs began again and Mary
suffers a complete defeat the nation is quite subjugated.
suffers pain and is disabled until the tendon is replaced. Reduction is
sufficed to observe the enemy. Thirdly, as proof that the position
suffices, the skin being punctured with a tenotomy knife, and, as
sufficient merely to count the aggregate number of leucocytes present. A
sufficient regeneration of the essential tissue elements to "carry on";
sufficient. The Whigs who nominated him shrewdly refused to adopt a
sufficiently large to produce a slight degree of poisoning by the drug
sufficiently prepared. My benefactor then explained to me fully the
suffocation, in the intestine causing obstruction of the bowels, or in
suffrage believed themselves on the high road to success when the Civil
suffrage, especially in the Far South. Special rooms were set aside for
suffrage, suggested disfranchisement as a remedy. Under the influence
suffrage. In the same year the National Education Association, speaking
suffrage; and a graduated income tax, "placing the burden of government
sugar and molasses imported into the colonies from foreign
sugar or albumen in the urine the conditions on which these depend must
suggest analogies with new growths. The best known of these are the
suggest the possibility of anthrax infection.
suggested by Virchow, is supported by the fact that in a large
suggested that protection should be limited to the articles of domestic
suggested to the state legislature in 1785 the advisability of a
suggested, loyal persons duly qualified under the law existing before
suggesting the removal of deposits from private banks and the
suggestion of a highly efficient agency of the crown. All this was in
suggestion of marriage with a woman whose husband was alive, as the
suggestion that was treated as a mere political maneuver by the opposing
suggestions of selling the fine ancestral Rostov house and estate near
suggests that it is of the nature of a senile degeneration. It is
suicidal," commented a New York newspaper, "for America, on the
suitable and in some respects a brilliant match for the dowerless,
suitable for ligation are cases in which the aneurysm is circumscribed
suitable partner, herself offered to dance the mazurka with Boris.
suite, and the boyish face Rostov, breathless with excitement and
suite, ordered four light guns to be moved forward to fire at the
suite. Behind Prince Bagration rode an officer of the suite, the
sulphide of iron resulting from decomposition of the blood pigment.
sum awarded in excess of the legitimate claims, returned the balance in
sum it up, the political theories of the Republican party for three
summarized under five heads: (1) The territorial settlement in Europe;
summed up his philosophy. He was engaged in a war to save the union, and
summed up: the recovery of the South from the ruin of the Civil War, the
summer evening he had spent with a beautiful Polish lady on the
summer morning after the storm; drops still continued to fall, but
summer of 1900 the revolt flamed up in deeds of cruelty. Missionaries
summer resorts of the North.
summer villa at Sokolniki. The anteroom and reception room of his
summer! The log churches of Indiana or Illinois--the quaint missions of
summer, in your big study, on the blue sofa, the confidential sofa?
summer. The avowed purpose was to arrest "the course of aggression" and,
summoned from all sections of the country for the harvests. The mineral
sumptuous but cold apartments known to Pierre only from the front
sun began to set. The baggage carts drew up close together and the men
sun had sunk half below the horizon and an evening frost was
sun never shone on a cause of greater worth. 'Tis not the affair of a
sun, but toward evening the sky cleared again and the sun set in
sun; and in its price he found the test of his prosperity.
sung, and long before she again sang, as she did that evening. The
sunk in the font but had floated.
sunken, and the cheeks hollow. The lips and ears are pallid; the skin of
sunshine patriot will, in this crisis, shrink from the service of his
sunshine, the horses galloped quickly, and on both sides of the road
sunshine. But I shall spare her. On the ancient monuments of barbarism
super. Instead of serried rows of bees sealing up every gap in the
superadded infection with micro-organisms. Although the bacteria do not
superadded infection with pyogenic organisms exposes the patient to the
superb abilities or his sincere devotion to the national idea. All will
superb confidence. At the end of his second term he insisted on
superb," because fifty thousand corpses lay there, but even on the
superficial abscess, for example a bubo, or an abscess in the breast or
superficial bones, such as the tibia, there is enlargement, and it may
superficial branch in the upper two-thirds of the forearm produces no
superficial branch of the nerve, but it is a striking fact, that so long
superficial bursae, if the sac is not tensely filled with fluid. The
superficial glands through their relations to the genitals are
superficial lymphangitis with nodular thickening of the lymphatics
superficial red lines are absent, but the limb becomes greatly swollen
superficial ulcers, for example in gonorrhoeal urethritis, the
superficial, may be felt to be swollen. The associated muscles are
superfluity of the comforts of life destroys all joy in satisfying
superfluous steam to blow off when the pressure exceeds a certain
superfluous was hanging on his benumbed left arm. The wrist felt as if
superintended the placing of the guns and looked at the Kremlin
superintendent had said, and looking at the departing trap.
superintendent of the work, should in an access of zeal plaster over
superior being. The very qualities that had been a hindrance, if not
superior officers, the militiamen and soldiers continued their prayers
superior or from the inferior gluteal artery, but by the time it forms a
supernumerary or webbed fingers, and appear in members of the same
supersensitiveness which appears to be induced by the injection of
superstition that the fewer the people who know of it the less a woman
supervision of elections and the Northern politicians protested against
supervision. The land hunger of the white farmer, once checked by the
supervision. This was finally effected by the Hay-Pauncefote treaty of
supinated. The long axis of the muscle, instead of being parallel with
supper tonight to my friends--come to the English Hotel.
supper: he went round the table in a merry mood, sitting down now by
supping at midnight and staying till three in the morning. Julie never
supplanted them both in agrarian economy. The West became the granary of
supplement to the operative treatment of cancer.
supplemented by staining films of the blood with a watery solution of
supplemented by the reconstruction acts, laid under the ban most of the
supplemented the older histories by showing what an important part women
supplication" for the repeal of the Stamp Act.
supplied by the affected arteries. In large trunks, by diminishing the
supplied by the median. Sensibility is affected over the medial surface
supplied by the nerve are immediately paralysed, the area to which it
supplied by the nerve; the injury, therefore, is liable to be over
supplied the chief consolation of her life. This comforting dream
supplied the flourishing distilleries of Massachusetts, Rhode Island,
supplies caused the army to turn still further south to the Tula road.
supplies the basis of the movement of all humanity, just as a
supplies to prosecute the war. The few Whigs in the House of
supplies, the writers who sustained the American spirit, and the women
supply an explanation and has taken the first sign that occurs to
supply of oxygen to the brain and to the muscles produces muscular
supply of the parts beyond may be completely restored. This is known as
supply the whole army for six months. Yet Napoleon, that greatest of
supply, the result of tetanic contraction of the minute vessels, such as
supply. In 1650, thirty years after the introduction of slavery, there
supply. The problem of manning industries became a pressing matter, and
supplying the inflamed part.
supplying the muscle is bruised at the same time, as may occur in the
support Spain was more than possible, removed all fears as to the
support also in Petersburg and from the chancellor, Rumyantsev, who,
support in the Declaration of Independence. Was it not said that all men
support of all the unions. There was some dissent. The Socialist party
support of the government or had sold supplies for the Revolutionary
support of the peasants. Catholic in religion, they had been compelled
support, here in the battery where a small number of men busy at their
supported by a cage, and the foot maintained at right angles to the leg
supported by oath or affirmation, and particularly describing the place
supported him in politics--"pet banks," as they were styled at the
supporters of Clay. The platform of the party, however, embraced all the
suppose," said the Emperor growing more and more animated; "but should
supposed, put there to defend the position, but were in a concealed
supposing that Pierre had heard of it long before. All this at the
suppress the congress, and substitute American military authority. In
suppressed smile of kindliness puckered the soldier's lips as he put
suppressed the ideas of the Revolution and the general temper of the
suppurating, there is little or no discharge and the surrounding
suppuration and sloughing of the gland tissue and overlying skin.
suppuration ensues, a sinus forms, and persists until the foreign body
suppuration in the bile-ducts or liver, and in many other abdominal
suppuration occurs it is apt to infect the hip-joint and to terminate
suppuration, and this may be the means of drawing attention to the
suppuration, but it is common to have the formation of a cold abscess,
suppuration, marked oedema of the skin and the occurrence of rigors and
suppuration, the separated ends of the tendon become adherent to
suppuration, the swelling is incised and drained, and if there is a
suppurative process may, however, spread to the tendon sheaths, or even
supra-clavicular region, the child crying when this part is touched or
supremacy in the South; the continued discussion of the old questions,
supremacy was established at the polls, and the last federal soldier
supreme commander of all the forces, and the Emperor did not assume
sure that everyone was submissive, but that all the same it was
sure that he really was the King of Naples that when, on the eve of
surface after some time, and at a considerable distance from the seat of
surface at a considerable distance from its seat of origin. The best
surface becomes detached and is moulded into melon-seed bodies by the
surface covered by squamous epithelium, such as the skin, or the mucous
surface epidermis. It may be sessile or pedunculated hard or soft. The
surface is characteristic, and when it takes the form of spicules at
surface of one of the bones, but how this is detached still remains a
surface of the articular cartilage "like ivy growing on a wall."
surface of the bone at the site of reflection of the synovial membrane,
surface of the bone it is often spoken of as an _exostosis_. It grows
surface of the wall, sprinkled with snow and creaking with frost,
surface of the wound in a steady ooze. This form of bleeding is serious
surface of the wound there is a microscopic layer of bruised and
surface of the wound, and by their proliferation gradually cover the
surface, oedema of the overlying skin is frequently present, and the skin
surface, or into the cellular tissue. The first haemorrhage is often
surface. Adrenalin and turpentine are the most useful drugs for this
surface. The swelling increases in size, the firm brawny centre becomes
surface; when the bleeding takes place into the tissues or into a cavity
surfaces are usually involved, and the nasal orifices may be narrowed or
surfaces causes them to adhere, capillary loops pass from one to the
surfaces may lead to the formation of adhesions, sometimes in the form
surfaces or from other parts of the body (Fig. 1).
surfaces undergo degenerative changes. The primary change involves the
surgeon, and on recognizing Pierre he told the Cossack who occupied
surgeon, may discover the loose body and feel it roll beneath his
surgery of warfare is a thing apart from the general surgery of civil
surgical actinomycosis are sarcoma, tubercle, and syphilis. In the early
surgical actinomycosis. Infection takes place, as a rule, along the side
surgical pathology; they obviously consist of a portion of the articular
surmise. The courtiers explained the Emperor's neglect of him by His
surprise and annoyance of the countess, had for some unaccountable
surprise and delight would find in his wife's ideas and actions the
surprise and somewhat to his satisfaction, that in the depth of her
surprise the French at dawn, falling like an avalanche on their
surprise, and noticing the glance he turned on Natasha as he rose.
surprise. He was struck by the change in him. His words were kindly
surprised Pierre. The Grand Master began answering him, and Pierre
surprised and alarmed at the feeling she was aware of in herself. "And
surprised at the rapidity of his success and at the inability of
surprised at the surprise expressed by those who had never
surprised how badly the Note was worded," remarked Count Rostopchin in
surprised when I tell her how I've seen the Emperor?) Natasha...
surrender of Cornwallis at Yorktown, when Maryland, the last of the
surrender of General Lee at Appomattox, the "National Labor Union" was
surrender of most of the Prussian fortresses had been received, when
surrender on the slightest decent pretext, such pretexts did not
surrender our civilization or to convert the Republic into an empire, we
surrendered her other rights in the Northwest.
surrendered the next year and, after trying some minor restrictions for
surrendered, but those who got across the river fled farther. Their
surrounded by pages, aides-de-camp, and an escort, along the road to
surrounded by round and spindle cells. The cut surface of the tumour
surrounded by the soldiers.
surrounded him, and led him to the drawing room. It was at first
surrounded him. He looked attentively around at the circle of
surrounded the icon. Behind the priest and a chanter stood the
surrounded the sovereign seemed directed merely to making him spend
surrounding bone to such an extent that the shaft undergoes pathological
surrounding bone, and simultaneously new bone is formed on the surface;
surrounding connective tissue, and probably also from the divided ends
surrounding parts are oedematous and swollen, blisters form, and the skin
surrounding parts. In cancer of the breast, for example, the disease
surrounding the battery and gazed at what was going on around him with
surrounding the tooth sac, which encapsulates the tooth and prevents its
surrounding the tumour and with the overlying skin, which becomes
surrounding the vessel, and the elements of the clot, are ultimately
surrounding this, and then the cortical bone, and is only prevented from
surrounding tissue, as well as the underlying fibrous tissue, and
surrounding tissues, and externally. If the sheath of the vessel is not
surrounding tissues; they are rarely multiple at the outset, but show a
surroundings. (6) The _part of the body_ on which it occurs, because
surroundings; when fixed to the mandible they form a swelling of
surrounds vessels and nerves, and may lead to destruction of the skin,
surveying the guests, and leisurely arranged her wide sleeves as if
survive immersion in water for prolonged periods. They resist the action
survived the process of intimidation. Southern leaders now devised new
suspect that the wound is not aseptic.
suspected from the clinical course, the absence of improvement from
suspend the government and laws of the country, exile the president,
suspended, and the old imperial constitution, as it stood before the
suspense and softening of heart in the presence of the unfathomable
suspense occasioned the Emperor.
suspicion and treated with the greatest care; and the urine should be
sustain for more than half a century a movement to improve the public
sustained, were on the point of recognizing the independence of the
sustained. At the moment of injury the patient experiences a sensation
suture"--is left loose to permit of withdrawal of the gauze after
suture. If this is impracticable, the artery is tied above and below the
sutured, and if this is impossible owing to loss of tissue, the gap may
sutures of fine catgut. Where the skin is loose, as, for example, in the
sutures. If any cavity exists in the deeper part of the wound it should
suturing of the ends of the nerve is extremely painful, an anaesthetic is
swabbing the throat with a piece of aseptic--not antiseptic--cotton wool
swallow fluid, or even by the sound of running water.
swallowed, are especially apt to lodge about the pharynx and pass to the
swallowing, and often earache; and the patient speaks with a nasal
swamps, breaking new ground, and planting from year to year the same
swaying on the soft springs of the carriage, he turned to Prince
sweat glands or sebaceous follicles, or in the foetal residues of
sweat, and mucous glands, nails, teeth, nipples, and mammary glands. The
sweating may be taken to indicate the formation of pus.
sweeter still to think that the wish to understand everything is
swell up, disintegrate, and finally disappear. Both the conducting and
swelling corresponding to the distended capsule of the joint, and on
swelling first appeared, of the direction in which it has progressed, of
swelling forms in the armpit and extends on to the chest wall. It is
swelling gradually tapers off along the shaft. On firm pressure, fine
swelling in the region of the ossifying junction, with oedema of the
swelling is found over one of the bones, usually the femur, accompanied
swelling is not as defined as in sarcoma, nor does it ever assume the
swelling is situated beneath the deep fascia, that it becomes firm and
swelling of slow development, or over the phalanx of a finger as a small
swelling on the lateral aspect of the ankle; the peroneus longus by
swelling tails off gradually along the shaft. As time goes on there is
swelling which lies in its vicinity, but the pulsation is not
swelling, which may attain the size of half a walnut, is tense and hard
swellings are sometimes to be detected over the position of the valves,
swellings in the neck.
swellings may, by appropriate manipulation, be moved from the artery and
swept by the bees with the fanning of their wings, there is a floor
swiftly following, drove the country like a ship before a gale straight
swiftly sailing as if unveiling the stars. Sometimes it looked as if
swiftness, they spread farms westward from the Mississippi. With Yankee
swing in the states. Washington in 1910, California in 1911, Oregon,
swollen and slightly flexed. Pain is not a prominent feature, and the
swollen or bulbous, and is also incorporated with the scar tissue of
swollen, oedematous, and tense. The skin is at first glazed, and perhaps
swollen, the swelling assuming the shape of the distended synovial sac,
sword knot. The Don horse he was riding was one he had bought from a
sword, which, in accord with the Club custom, he had given up to the
symmetrical distribution, freedom from pain, the free mobility of the
symmetrically around the anterior fontanelle, or may extend along either
sympathetic nerves and ganglia, as well as the continuations of the
sympathetic systems. The nerves are diffusely and unequally thickened,
sympathetic. Death may take place from rupture, or from pressure on the
sympathies. They forgot their wrath over the Jay treaty and joined with
sympathize with what Pierre was saying, but could not. The latter
sympathizers were ready to let the Confederate states go in peace; that
sympathy and warmly championed their rights. Outside of the circle of
sympathy. Three of them, Austria, Prussia, and Russia, under the
symphysis to the angle, the posterior ones (paramandibular) being
symptom is numbness in the part, followed by a sense of weight,
symptom, hence the term _adiposis dolorosa_ (Dercum). These multiple
symptom; the tumour is fusiform, firm, and regular in outline, and when
symptoms and in the general health.
symptoms are slight, mobility is little impaired, and yet the deformity
symptoms depend upon the acuteness of the condition, the nature of the
symptoms of irritation or paralysis in the area of distribution of the
symptoms of the bloodless state, and the blood is rapidly regenerated.
symptoms of toxaemia. We have observed a case in which both the hip and
symptoms or signs, and if the pus is aspirated without delay the joint
symptoms predominate, there is an absence of suppuration, and the pains
symptoms rapidly improving. Wolff and Wiewiorowski, on the other hand,
symptoms when Belova would again be deaf, the snuff damp, and the
symptoms, and attention may only be called to the condition by the
symptoms, but they are more often met with in the ataxic stage, when the
symptoms. On no account should the affected joints be kept at rest by
synchronously with the systole of the heart. In vascular parts--for
synonymous, and are employed when a serous effusion into the joint is
synovial membrane along with mucoid degeneration of the peri-synovial
synovial membrane in about equal proportion, and that in the hip the
synovial membrane of the adjacent joint with which its cavity sometimes
synovial membrane or in one of the bones, whence the disease
synovial membrane, and attended with an accumulation of pus in the
synovial membrane, and from the marrow of the subjacent bone; it
synovial membrane, in the shoulder in the downward prolongation along
synovial tuberculosis the joint is entirely filled up by the diffuse
synovitis; _sero-fibrinous_, as in certain varieties of peritonitis, the
syphilis and with valvular disease of the heart than are external
syphilis are common, those of the tertiary period are by comparison
syphilis the reaction is positive in every case. A positive reaction may
syphilis, changes occur as a result of the narrowing of the lumen of the
syphilis, crusts are got rid of in the first instance by means of a
syphilis, from an innocent tumour, and from a cancer. The points on
syphilis, sometimes as a uniform increase in the girth of the
syphilis. A solitary, indolent sore occurring on the lip, eyelid,
syphilis; and from the malignant or anthrax pustule by the absence of
syphilitic affections of the synovial membrane of joints. During the
syphilitic affections. The lesions in infancy--epiphysitis, bossing of
syphilitic inheritance as the infection of one twin and the escape of
syphilitic lesions in the mouth and throat, and is then a dangerous
syphilitic sore. While the saliva itself is innocuous, it can be, and
syphilitic stigmata, especially in the eyes. The knees are the joints
system in your community with the feudal system of land tenure.
system lasted and planting was the major interest, the South was bound
system of church and state. The Anglican faith and worship were
system of government constructed? (2) Shall the government be founded on
system of the Far South and Southwest where masters were ever moving and
system or may be confined to particular areas. In the smaller arteries
system run with the motor nerves, and pass to muscles, tendons, and
system under their "Fundamental Orders" of 1639, and the entire colony
system, inaugurated by Jacksonian Democracy, in turn placed all the
system, such as the abdominal or thoracic viscera. It is to be borne in
system--the cultivation of tobacco, rice, cotton, and sugar cane--and in
system. In 1837 the National Women's Anti-Slavery Convention met in New
system. In the county seats, once dominated by the planters, business
system. Massachusetts abandoned it in 1780. In the same year,
system; the South had to create one. The North had a scheme of taxation
systematic examination of the other long bones will often reveal the
systematic forms of fibromatosis met with in the central nervous system
systems--the Erie connecting New York City with the waterways of the
systems. As other settlers poured into the West the problem of the
systolic thrill may be detected, but the presence of a murmur is neither
tabes. The completeness of the analgesia of the articular structures
table and went as usual to thank the old countess, Countess Mary
table that he had pushed away. "But... in short, the fact is... you
table where his tea was handed to him; Milka, the old gray borzoi
table, a child's table, and the little chair on which Prince Andrew
table, copying a design for embroidery. The countess was playing
table, on the icons, and on the walls, and a big fly flopped at the
table--the so-called "drunkard's palsy"; and from the pressure of a
table. "What are you thumping the table for?" she demanded of the
table. The whole consultation passed more than quietly. After all
tables and the same chandelier with a cover over it; but someone had
tactful wife. Pierre during the last two years, as a result of his
tactile sensation. The root of the neck should be examined to exclude
taint. The patient often presents other lesions of a tuberculous
take a direct part in the activity to devise considerations,
take any active part in life. The attempt to eat is attended with such
take firm root and become recognized as the leading source of the labor
take him away from surroundings in which, protected from all the
take in the full significance of the words he heard.
take it off, but let it drop again. The five minutes spent with his
take it!' 'Yes, let's!' say the others. And off they go and take the
take it..." He threw it on the table. "I have an old father and
take marshals, sitting on a sofa by the fire! That is true, but
take my sabretache..."--"Keep to the right, your honor, there are
take part in it by self-sacrifice and heroism were the most useless
take part--transfer the will of the people to a new ruler? In
take place from gradual failure of the heart's action or from syncope
take possession, even temporarily, of the customs houses of an American
take steps to prevent "the recurrence of anything so obviously
take the cubs from under your very nose."
take the form of a diffuse fibromatosis.
take the landlord's grain," said a voice at the back of the crowd.
take things not belonging to them. Crowds of the kind seen at cheap
taken a lively interest in the contest. In 1895 President Cleveland saw
taken back to his place, and the rows of troops on both sides of the
taken by other sciences. Instead of first defining the conceptions
taken ergot medicinally over long periods. The gangrene, which attacks
taken for the army or have died--this is such a year! It's not a
taken for the cleansing of the surgeon's hands. Hair-covered parts
taken from the open and untaxed current of the Mississippi the commerce
taken from them; even the soldiers, usually pitiless enough, instead
taken high rank among the mining regions of the country.
taken in the direction of independent government, the patriots devised
taken into the stomach.
taken on active growth and pressed injuriously on the cords of the
taken on myself the role of Natalie Rostova's knight at all, and
taken part in the battle of Vyazma, Petya had been in a constant state
taken part in, and for the first time in his life the possibility of
taken place in the relative strength of the two armies--both in spirit
taken to have it localised by the X-rays, preferably by stereoscopic
taken while passing through Moscow, he left the kvass to Morel and
taken with the others to a house where a French general with a white
taken, and all this for the beaux yeux* of His Sardinian Majesty.
taken, it was not his fault but the corporal's who had sent him to
taken. Georgia responded: "We abhor the doctrine of nullification as
taken. Iron ore of every quality was found, the chief beds being in
taken: banners, cannon, and two enemy generals. For the first time,
takes an oath to support the Constitution, swears that he will support
takes place after an operation for the removal of cancer, the recurrent
takes place better than after ligation. In the case of smaller trunks,
takes place either in the form of separate foci in the interior of the
takes place outside the body, probably because free oxygen is necessary
takes place towards the free surface, and goes on until the gap is
takes place. In the kidney also, repair mainly takes place by
takes the form of a globular cyst, the wall of which consists of skin,
taking a glass from the table he went up to Pierre.
taking her hand led her up the rickety wooden steps of the porch.
taking him prisoner of war and putting an end to all hopes for the
taking his eyes from the plan of the building.
taking his eyes from the window and from Dolokhov's back. Anatole
taking his papers from under his pillow he went to the window, where
taking origin in the marrow or from the periosteum of the alveolar
taking origin in the scalp, ear, or throat.
taking place along the renal vein until it projects into the vena cava.
taking possession of the gateway to the Mississippi as well as the St.
taking some bags of flour himself and throwing them into the street.
taking the arm of Pierre whom he had promoted to be a Frenchman for
taking the view that slavery was wrong, but that they could not do
taking thought about colonial affairs bored both of them so that the
taking up his table napkin he pushed back the tumbler and wineglass
taking. The officers followed to check the soldiers and were
tale as to something new, and the quiet rapture Karataev evidently
talent, energy, and spirit of the South.
tales. Listening to the story of the struggle between love and duty,
talk business. Have you been to the Horse Guards?"
talk of the soldiers, was now occupied by the marshal, the Duke of
talk with her husband that for her it was the surest sign of something
talkative, or actually delirious. The tongue is dry and coated, the lips
talkative. "Can you imagine it?" and he began describing how the
talked about worldly vanities. He told me of the Emperor's new
talked among themselves and sometimes laughed. Nearest of all to the
talked to her for a long time of the love of God, of Christ, of the
talked to the men (the commanders, as we saw at the council of war,
talked to the old prince.
talked, and kissed him at the same time. Only his mother was not
talking about him in the presence of that Frenchwoman," thought
talking broken Russian to the servants, but was still the same
talking in low tones and wearing ball dresses. The mirrors on the
talking noisily. Something was boiling in a small cauldron at the edge
talking or coughing in the vicinity of a wound, a simple mask may be
talking to him about politics. Prince Andrew and the others gathered
talking to him with particular warmth and the Emperor, with his head
talking to the ladies and listened to her. In the midst of a phrase he
talking to them about matters unconnected with the battle.
talking, as well as the quartermaster. Lavrushka was saying
tapped every locality of the West and South. To the railways were added
tariff and sustaining the principle of the Virginia resolutions but
tariff issue was threatening to split the country into parties again.
tariff reductions, they were sharply informed that the party had
tariff tended to align the manufacturing East against the agricultural
tariff would, by encouraging the building of factories, create a home
tariff. The Republicans taunted them with being "babes in the woods."
tariffs and trade discriminations should be longer endured. When the
tariffs might interfere with the free exchange of the produce of
tarso-metatarsal or at the ankle joint. If these be passed, it usually
tattoo with their feet to warm themselves, gathering round the fires
tattooing, are taken up by the phagocytes, and in course of time
taught to be ashamed of--even that act finds justification in the
tawny tint in her complexion and especially in the color of her
tax on large incomes; this owing to the heavy concentration of rich
tax out of their pockets. All the bitterness which farmers felt against
tax-deductible to the maximum extent permitted by law.  As fund-raising
tax-deductible to the maximum extent permitted by law.  As fund-raising
taxation and the currency; a bank is of appropriate use in the exercise
taxation to large incomes. In the press of circumstances, a compromise
taxation. Never before in the annals of civilization has an attempt been
taxes and other dues. Then could the friends of easy money rejoice:
taxes and the issuance of paper money. It was with difficulty that an
taxes consumers for the benefit of manufacturers is, in effect, a
taxes imposed upon the productions of their industry. If, under these
taxes, at their pleasure, upon the foreign imports of the planter, no
tea and breakfasting, the soldiers, munching biscuit and beating a
tea trade which the Americans carried on illegally with foreigners. This
tea, and only awaited Prince Bagration to begin the council. At last
tearing herself out of this silence she ran to the servants'
tearless eyes, she locked her in; and having given orders to the
tears began to fall. Prince Andrew turned away and began pacing the
tears choked him, and leaning his elbows on the window sill be began
tears rising to his eyes. The little fellow, giving Pierre no time
teeth, and again rose and bounded forward, followed at the distance of
teeth, but it lifted all the more sweetly, and was especially charming
telegraph poles, and they laid a heavy tribute upon the forests for
telegraphs. At the same time they approved the initiative, referendum,
tell me of their victories over the Russians, and would pretend to
tell the Emperor--without putting him in the terrible position of
tell the little countess!"
tell whether the nerve is torn across or merely compressed. The patient
tell you for the tenth time that if the letter to the Emperor and
telling of the condition in which she had found Prince Andrew. But
telling us that from the commencement of the campaign a Scythian war
telling. He found the Cossacks, inquired for the regiment operating
tells a man to consider the nature of the danger and the means of
tells me that the war has ruined you. That is our common misfortune,
temperature chart forms a fairly reliable index of the state of the
temperature falls to normal or below it, and the patient breaks into a
temperature may remain subnormal throughout, the virulence of the toxins
temperature of 130 o to 145 o C. (= 266 o to 293 o F.). The articles to be
temperature of about 100 o F.; the injection of pituitary extract. The
temperature of the type known as hectic fever (Fig. 11).
temperature rises quickly, often with a rigor, and remains high; the
temperature rises to 103 o or 104 o F., although in very severe cases the
temperature, unless at the same time the cause is removed. When severe
temperature, which may amount to 8 o or 10 o F., the parts becoming pale
temperature. The surrounding inflammation subsides, the discharge of pus
temperature; certain changes in the pulse rate and the respiration;
temple reared which is to be a worthy dwelling place of the Great
temporarily arrests the bleeding. That part of the clot which lies
temporarily controlling haemorrhage is by pressure applied with the
temporarily with use of the limb. As time goes on, the range of movement
temporary improvement of the circulation in the kidney may serve to tide
temporary occupation might turn into a permanent occupation. The only
temptations of the devil. Thrust them aside as she would, questions
temptations of the devil? How am I to renounce forever these vile
ten days, according to the nature of the case.
ten o'clock all had been brought into due order. The ranks were
ten thousand people were still in Moscow on the first and second of
ten years. It was in the midst of this crisis that measures of taxation
tenacious of life than the common pyogenic bacteria. In a dry state, for
tenaciously provincial in their habits, in the direction of nationalism.
tend to disappear when the cause ceases to act.
tend to fuse with one another at their margins, giving the appearance of
tend to perforate the periosteal capsule and invade the soft parts.
tend to surround the bone (Fig. 150), and to invade its interior,
tendencies. Whatever share the East had in shaping laws and framing
tendency for patches of skin at some distance from the primary seat of
tendency to bleed, with the formation of clots, which dry and form a
tendency to pass far beyond the point at which they gain an entrance to
tendency to pathological fracture. It is difficult also in the absence
tendency to the formation of a thrombus; the other in which the
tendency, namely, a steady growth in the practice of self-government.
tender area being the actively spreading zone which lies about half an
tender filial affection with the majestic benevolence of a monarch. He
tender in the payment of debts. Once more the country was flooded by
tender in the payment of debts. The state legislatures had enacted laws
tender murmur, so that the wail fell quite at random on one word and
tender points being its emergence from the greater sciatic foramen, the
tender, fixed, and matted to one another. In the glands of the groin the
tendered to Spain the good offices of the United States as mediator in
tenderly embraced the Empress Marie Louise--who regarded him as her
tenderness along the line of the affected vein, and the skin over it is
tenderness at the seat of rupture, and the patient is unable to raise
tenderness for his son which he had hoped to reawaken by caressing the
tenderness, and glancing at Pierre she went out of the room.
tendinitis. It is met with most frequently in the tendo-calcaneus in
tendo-calcaneus is detached from the calcaneus, the bursa dissected out,
tendo-calcaneus--_Achillo-dynia_--and results from the pressure of
tendon cells, and the fibres which they form constitute the new tendon
tendon of the thumb.
tendon sheaths and bursae, and is then of an orange-yellow colour, the
tendon sheaths through the blood-stream, as in the gouty, gonorrhoeal,
tendon sheaths, the process may spread into the forearm--directly in the
tendon, which normally forms the ulnar border of the snuff-box,
tendon; if the interval is too wide to admit of their being approximated
tendons are repaired. The wound is then partly closed, provision being
tendons in their sheaths, interfering with the movements of the fingers.
tends to burrow on to the chest wall beneath the pectoral muscles, and
tends to delay the healing of open wounds. The existence of grave
tends to grow forwards between the layers of the mesentery and to give
tends to increase in size by progressive liquefaction of the inner
teno-synovitis, although the most prominent etiological factor is a
teno-synovitis. The opposed surfaces of the tendon and its sheath are
tenotomy of the biceps tendon. Cases have been observed of paralysis of
tenotomy, the end nearer the muscle fibres is drawn away from the other,
tense in the extended position. As a rule it causes little
tense, and in the case of the elbow may be red and fiery as in
tension within the abscess, is the dominant symptom. At first it is
term _exfoliation_ is sometimes employed to indicate the separation or
term applied by Jonathan Hutchinson to the primary lesion of syphilis
term of any senator chosen before it becomes valid as part of the
term of years to repay the sum advanced. This system was called
terminal portion twisted round several times. The object is to tear the
terminal segments of the digits hypertrophied. The fingers come to
terminating fatally in which the _section_ revealed only one metastasis,
termination. The _prognosis_ therefore in cases of secondary haemorrhage
terms for thirty years, and understanding the mood he was in
terms imposed by the copyright holder.  Additional terms will be linked
terms imposed by the copyright holder.  Additional terms will be linked
terms of the progression could be determined mathematically. The
terms of this agreement, you may obtain a refund from the person or
terms of this agreement, you may obtain a refund from the person or
terms that, unless the Imperial German Government consented to
terms with all the sovereigns of Europe and particularly with our own,
terms. The more enterprising and the more fortunate who started life as
terrible conflict over the division of spoils in Manchuria. The fortunes
terrible order seemed to him equivalent to resigning the command of
terrible voice that the whole house heard it with horror. God knows
terrible, was prepared to accept the offer; but Lincoln, remembering his
terribly tormenting fear of death--the end--but now he no longer
terrific thunder, and he looked round. There was some smoke, and the
terrified Metivier with his shock of black hair, and the prince in his
terrified her, just as the mere thought of it made him turn pale and
territorial legislature; they were deprived of the ballot by Congress in
territories bought by common blood; the return of runaway slaves as
territories for all time. Douglas won the election to the Senate; but
territories of the far Southwest. Thus scouts and pioneers continued the
territories, the District of Columbia, the forts and other property
territories, the Dred Scott decision of 1857, the Lincoln-Douglas
territory in an unending drift, "squatting" on the land. Without so much
territory north of the parallel of 36 o 30' should be, like the old
territory of New Mexico created, subject to the provision that all or
territory, organized in 1861, had been looked upon as the home of the
terror infected the men.
terror-stricken face, and again at the arm, and on his face a
test, and by the fact that they usually disappear on removing the
testimony of two witnesses to the same overt act, or on confession in
tetanus, and the prognosis is favourable. It must not be confused with
tetanus, or the paralyses that follow diphtheria.
tetanus. The sooner the serum is given after the injury, the more
text in the Gospel which (as it seemed to him) plainly remarriage
textbook on the Constitution that has ever been printed. It takes its
than a month had recently died in the Rostovs' house at Yaroslavl, and
than an alliance between England and the Anglo-men of this country,
than any of the millions they ruled over.
than any other, because he imagines that he knows the truth-
than anyone, led the guests into the drawing room, and seated them
than anything in the world. But now they wanted her to sacrifice the
than by any spectacular triumphs did the advocates of manhood suffrage
than by the enemy, came with jingling spurs up the steps of the porch,
than doubled. While the boundaries of the purchase were uncertain, it is
than estrangement. Charles James Fox gave the colonies his generous
than even the cavalry saddles or Junot's baggage. They understood that
than ever to the markets of the world. Coincident with this progress was
than females, in the proportion of two to one.
than generous welcome. Little realizing the perils lurking in a
than in her ball dress. She and all the Rostov family welcomed him
than in spring, when everything shines so brightly in the rare clear
than in the thoracic aorta. While any of the large branches in the
than intravenous injections, the administration is simpler.
than it had been in Moscow. All around lay the flesh of different
than let the French have it.
than normal, and in course of time the current may cease (_stasis_), and
than normal, and the vessel moves bodily with each pulsation. It must be
than normal, the temperature falling to that of the surrounding
than ours, and that he was writing in haste from the field of battle
than reason, of the justice of his opinion.
than she had been the day before; but that day as he looked at her
than simple. The immense house on the old stone foundations was of
than ten seconds he stood not moving from the spot or realizing the
than that inflicted by a single bullet, the deflection of the pellets
than that. Paper money may deceive the ignorant, but nobody is
than the canals and railways, the difference could be overcome by the
than the combined areas of France and Germany. As a salve to the wound,
than the hard. In certain fibromas--in those, for example, which grow
than the ordinary hypodermic needle. The preparation usually employed
than the others present, suddenly pushed forward with a scared and
than the proposal for a higher tariff to take the place of the law of
than the sound of his opponent's voice.
than the staphylococcus, so that pus formation takes place more slowly.
than those described above, and is chiefly met with in the joints of the
than to his own personal qualities. The men of the frontier did not care
than you, my advice is to let the matter drop. Well then, on Friday
thank him for. On the contrary, it seemed to her certain that had he
thank you! You must have a rest. Be at the levee tomorrow after the
thanked," thought the overseer, "the storm has blown over!"
thankless task--had arrived. Taft accepted the inevitable and called
thanks to that most powerful engine of ignorance, the diffusion of
that "the newspapers are largely subsidized or muzzled; public opinion
that "to protect a woman who was being insulted was the duty of
that Abraham Lincoln of Illinois was the most "available" candidate. He
that Berg, having generously offered to disturb the symmetry of an
that Borodino had been occupied and the bridge over the Kolocha was in
that Catherine Petrovna would play valses and the ecossaise on the
that Denisov had said was clever and to the point. What the general
that Great Britain would yield none of her claims. After hearing the
that Helene had great success and was honored was by the special
that I knew in the past. The whole world is now for me divided into
that I was in Moscow in my house, in the big sitting room, and
that Iogel (the dancing master) gave for his pupils durings the
that King James had been dethroned by his angry subjects, and the people
that Kutuzov would be the man to satisfy all requirements.
that Napoleon wished to come to Moscow, grew angry, abused the
that Napoleon with the naked eye could distinguish a mounted man
that Natasha saw. She felt agitated and tormented, and the cause of
that Pierre addressed his remarks chiefly to the good-natured
that Pierre distinctly heard the pleasantly human voice of the Emperor
that Prince Andrew, after surviving the battle of Borodino for more
that Princess Mary was in Moscow. The death, sufferings, and last days
that Scott had not been free anywhere and that, besides, the Missouri
that Senators should be chosen by the legislatures of the states. In
that a different world had now taken possession of her--the life of
that a stupid person gets the better of cleverer ones, Helene-
that a time would come when there would be no more wars. The old
that accompanied it. The railway company he declared to be a public
that adopted all the army methods and had infantry, artillery, staffs,
that after division at the elbow, except that in uncomplicated cases
that again the infantry.
that all that happened to the ram did not happen accidentally, and
that although the bacilli have effected a lodgment and have inaugurated
that altogether at the election held in the middle of his term. The
that an effort should be made to purchase the island from Spain. In case
that are paralysed, so that the grasp of the hand is feeble, and the
that arise directly or indirectly from any of the following which you do
that arise directly or indirectly from any of the following which you do
that as he was responsible for the delay he ought to bear the whole
that associated with epithelioma. In difficult cases the prepuce must be
that at a party, a real evening party, subtle allusions to the
that at the positive pole nitric acid, and at the negative pole caustic
that attend the relapse of the infective process.
that became necessary to preserve the Southern balance of power.
that besides these things the action of every historic character has
that brought neither relief nor honor. Beset by the clamor that arose on
that case, he urged upon the states the improvement of highways. Did the
that ceases to exist, but the French army of six hundred thousand, and
that chamber the Republicans had a slight majority and a two-thirds vote
that chamber. Blocked by the Republican Senate they accepted a
that characterise the syphilitic condition being the infiltration of the
that characterized the whites in general. They had never been accustomed
that charming age when a girl is no longer a child, though the child
that connection appears to free. How should the past life of nations
that corporation in crushing competition. About the same time Lincoln
that could accrue from the entire Philippine trade for years to come....
that could be wrung from the reluctant states, provided for neither a
that covered the dam, the pond, and the bank.
that covered the planks of the bridge. Sometimes through the
that craft. By the eve of the Civil War there were four or five powerful
that crossway. From all sides, like the roar of the sea, were heard
that day in a dull and wretched mood. At nine in the morning, he heard
that day sent a manservant to the Vozdvizhenka to ascertain whether he
that day, especially by the mysterious fulfillment she had just seen
that demand became generally known and the dignity of France was
that denied them the right to worship God according to the dictates of
that dirty pool like carp stuffed into a watering can, and the
that drawing room were gathered, by the Emperor's wish, not a military
that drunken imbecile had seized the loaded pistol which they had
that drunken imbecile to account. The Frenchman listened in silence
that eighty per cent of the votes of the Federation had been cast for
that elapses between the occurrence of infection and the appearance of
that employed for the subclavian artery, and the nerves are sought for
that enacted in 1890 the first measure--the Sherman Anti-Trust
that end Kutuzov's activity was directed during the whole campaign
that even immense fortunes, on the whole, represented positive benefits
that even the prim visitor could not help joining in.
that everyone believed in the merit and usefulness of his deed, and he
that everyone ducked. It flopped into something moist, and the general
that evidently important news had reached the Emperor otherwise than
that example, but everybody understood that the old man was
that exists between the expression of someone's will and the execution
that followed proved that the commander in chief at that moment was
that for the senile form. Success has followed opening the artery and
that fraudulent stocks and bonds were sold to the innocent public. It
that from Smolensk onwards he wished to stop, knew the danger of his
that from the fateful moment in March, 1775, when Edmund Burke unfolded
that gentleman--evidently not sharing Boris' conception of the
that given to the immigrants in the early days. By 1890 all the free
that guided the event.
that had advanced furthest along the new course was the place in which
that had already once been given in detail: "and tell the hussars that
that had become habitual to him in speaking of the present war.
that had been foreseen, the Russian army of thirty-five thousand men
that had been thrown on the steep incline to make it something like
that had fallen the previous day--the day of the battle. Reviewing his
that had happened the evening before? "Yes, yes! All that has
that had in Jackson's day repudiated nullification as leading to "the
that had made Panama a plague spot. Finally, in 1904, as the President
that had occupied him from the time he joined the army. He rode across
that had till then concealed the unknown was lifted from his spiritual
that half-hour Rostov cast eager and restless glances over the edge of
that happy day in inactivity, was all the more depressed.
that has been reckoned among the powerful orations of all time--a plea
that have been interrupted. Within their area of distribution the
that have been mentioned as increasing the liability to tuberculous
that he and Prince Andrew understood the insignificance of the
that he did not meddle in business affairs. But once the countess
that he expected to end the campaign by occupying Moscow as he had
that he forgot the sovereigns' presence. "Lads, it's not the first
that he had grieved me. Afterwards in the evening when I gave him
that he had no connections in the city and was a stranger there. In
that he himself was going to don a uniform and ride at the head of his
that he was doing the right thing, Prince Vasili did everything to get
that he was not specifically authorized by the Constitution to do.
that he was talking to the Emperor himself, to that very Emperor who
that he was the quartermaster of the regiment and his commander had
that he will stake his life on it that the enemy will not enter
that he would leave that night for the army at Mozhaysk, and that
that he would place himself at the head of the army, gather round
that held the taper.
that her mother was still praying she ran on tiptoe to the bed and,
that here he was in contact with the springs that set in motion the
that his answers did not express his personal views but the general
that his arm drops powerless and limp like a rag, and the horror of
that his information is incorrect and that the real course of the
that his residence in the free territory made him free. This raised the
that if only he could attain it, it would be the end of all things.
that if she did not go away it was all the same to him. He declared
that immediate efforts be made for a cessation of hostilities, to the
that in spite of all the unpleasantness he had to endure he would
that in the Otradnoe avenue and at the window that moonlight night had
that in the army, besides the subordination and discipline
that in the group was the very man who had killed the other
that in the larger nerve-trunks the nerve bundles for special groups of
that in the previous twenty years nearly a million and a half had found
that increased the productivity of their labor. Was the output of food
that instant the trooper Nikitenko, who was galloping ahead, shot away
that is always exciting, especially to the young.
that is occurring. Moment by moment the event is imperceptibly shaping
that is separated, and with it the tendon of the deep flexor, which
that is, alone and in full view of the Emperor.
that it cannot be brought down into contact with the distal end, in
that it cannot be shelled out. There is no endothelial lining, and the
that it is one of the memorable landmarks in the history of a political
that it never entered her head that the relations between him and
that it plainly and indubitably proved the fallacy of all the plans
that it was "revolutionary in character, subversive of the Constitution
that it was a letter from him--from the man she loved. Yes, she
that it was due to the power of some other person. Besides this,
that it was humiliating to look at the French, Rostov began shouting
that it was organized into a territory of the United States and brought
that it was useless to talk to the old man; that he would never
that it would be a bad thing to enter a family against the father's
that leader." This is what historians of the first class say--those
that may be present, keeping the parts warm by wrapping them in cotton
that might destroy him occurred to his mind. The Russians might fall
that moment the French who were attacking, suddenly and without any
that moment this conversation began, contrary to all the laws of logic
that morning of his name day the prince was in one of his worst moods.
that moves sufficed to destroy the whole cosmography of the
that neither in the field of commercial enterprise nor in that of
that night had listened at the door. In a suffering and weary voice he
that no amendment which may be made prior to the year one thousand eight
that no fresh war could improve the position or add to the glory of
that nobody was right or wrong, the future held nothing, and there was
that none of the cyst wall be left behind. In large and adherent wens an
that not a logical answer and not at all a reply to them. The answer
that not only would the count never be able to find out whether all
that now surrounds me. The moment in which the first movement was made
that obtained in 1812, and the Russian army in its pursuit of the
that of Carrel, is adopted. Sometimes the wound is treated with bismuth,
that of a monastery), Prince Andrew, who was rather late, found the
that of beauty. But the princess never saw the beautiful expression of
that of new-mown hay, can be detected in the breath and may pervade the
that of normal bone right up to the clear area. In many respects the
that of the fluid displaced.
that of the industrial East than like that of the planting South.
that of the poor printer, was on trial! The verdict for Zenger, when it
that of veins, but are more abundantly provided with valves. Along the
that on and after January 1, 1879, "the Secretary of the Treasury shall
that on tea, it in no way relaxed its resolve to enforce the other
that on the point of their powers he had no scruples. With the issue
that one could stand up in the middle of the trench and could even sit
that one noticed how fast the troyka was flying. Nicholas looked back.
that one's companion is the only man besides oneself capable of
that only the mass held the army together. The Russians, on the
that order the servants set to work at this new task with pleasure and
that orders from him were not now needed, that the whole affair,
that originating in the membrane. This estimate, so far as the actual
that our exalted ideas of the prowess of British regular troops had not
that particular power to be the one absolute and real power, and
that peace was really Kutuzov's; this Chichagov was the first to
that permit of the primary healing of wounds, with which of course the
that point of view he gazed at the Oriental beauty he had not seen
that produced large revenues from numerous sources; the South had to
that regiment, the welfare of the men and the necessity of receiving
that relieved her soul. She now saw his face before her. And not the
that resemble myeloma, are all attended with the formation of new bone
that scoundrel admitted? She was the cause of it all. With her, he
that sea of troops the more was he overcome by restless agitation
that she could say the emptiest and stupidest things and everybody
that she did not try to hide the fact that she was no longer sad,
that she loved for the first and only time in her life and felt that
that she remembered the light failing through that crack once before
that she still kept awake at night so as not to miss the proper time
that since the nursing mothers were no longer sent to work on his
that slavery was in itself right. He taunted the Northern Democrats with
that small detachments defeat larger ones, obscurely admits the
that society had entered the simple feeling of the attraction of a
that soldiers were dispersing among the shops while crowds of
that somebody would have to bear the whole responsibility for all that
that someone must be responsible for it, Toll galloped up to the
that space there was, on the one side, a demonstration made by the
that speak with equal power in the human soul: one very reasonably
that special parts of the spinal medulla must be implicated in the
that squatter sovereignty was the mildest kind of compromise acceptable
that stage in the life of a society woman when she feels that her last
that sting and burn the language of prudence and caution. Is it a matter
that stood in his way, threw himself on the sofa.
that sum. "He's begun to go a little lame on the left foreleg," he
that the Austrian troops, under the direction of so skillful a
that the Council and Senate are estates of the realm, he said that the
that the Dred Scott decision settled the question of slavery in the
that the Emperor Alexander has surrounded himself with my personal
that the Emperor Alexander wished for peace, but would not enter
that the French retreat from Moscow was a series of victories for
that the French were not all captured or destroyed when our three
that the French, after crossing the bridge at Vienna, were advancing
that the Frenchwoman blushed and went away without a word. When he
that the General Assembly of the colony alone had the right to lay taxes
that the Ismaylov regiment was quartered for the night ten miles
that the Rhetor had to repeat his question.
that the Shevardino Redoubt was an advanced post--whereas in reality
that the United States should "go into the League," without closing the
that the Wassermann test is a reliable means of establishing a diagnosis
that the abolitionists were a mere handful, that emancipation might
that the action had begun. But all was still quiet. A damp dull autumn
that the appearance of several authorities, their struggles and
that the army supplies were for the most part stored along the Oka
that the arrival of a suitor agitated her, and still more so by both
that the axis cylinders in the central end grow downwards, and enter the
that the battle was lost and despite the fact that for an army to have
that the best of families can expect to have for years and of course can
that the blood flows down again, and so a vicious circle is established.
that the blood supply to the integument is being cut off, and is an
that the cause of events lies in intellectual activity, only by a
that the collective will of the people is always transferred to the
that the colonies should help to bear the burden which fell so heavily
that the colonies were to be taxed instead by act of Parliament.
that the colonists, already restive under their administration, had no
that the combatant who so sensibly employed the best and simplest
that the commander in chief would inspect the regiment on the march.
that the commander in chief would otherwise be dissatisfied. On
that the condition has been described as a "chondromatosis" and is
that the constant application of cold wet cloths allays the pain. The
that the continuity of the bone is maintained only by tumour tissue, and
that the corner of the field he stood on was well-known and familiar
that the count held him up as a pattern to the other guests. Berg with
that the countess, your wife..."
that the cyst may originate from a minute portion of synovial membrane
that the deformities become less and less frequent with each year. Those
that the diffusion of knowledge among the masses was making steady
that the disease has been inherited. It is possible, however, for them
that the doctrines of the rights of man were "new fangled," Paine
that the dresses would not be ready, or that something would not be
that the duke asked for more troops.
that the epithelium of the skin grows in and lines the track leading
that the events depended on those commands. But examining the events
that the force bills were nothing but devices created by the Republicans
that the general who signed that capitulation had no right to do so,
that the general, whom he had greatly respected till then, was a
that the government was as likely as any private employer to oppress
that the hounds were fit (Daniel himself wished to go hunting),
that the infection is conveyed to the ovum through the seminal fluid at
that the joints have entirely recovered, but in a small proportion of
that the king and Parliament therefore had undoubted authority to make
that the king of England held his crown in contempt of the democratic
that the kitten had settled down only to spring up with more energy
that the leading figures in history are heroes, that is, men gifted
that the least accident might now--with the fight balanced on such a
that the less attractive a woman is the more constant she is likely to
that the maid could hardly get her hair plaited, and she was
that the man was himself drowning, that the mother was hungry, that
that the members of Congress were "obscure, pettifogging attorneys,
that the mere presence of the Emperor paralyzed the action of fifty
that the methods of civilized life might take the place of the
that the minister and his son had arrived, but the appearance of
that the moment had come she was filled with dread of what she might
that the muscles are inserted and drag on the perichondrium when
that the necessity of relinquishing that role and abandoning Moscow
that the new Constitution should go into effect when ratified by nine
that the only way for him to obtain a right over her was to marry her.
that the people of that region were almost uniformly marked by the
that the policy pursued by the Republican administration in disposing of
that the priest who met him with the cross oppressed the peasants by
that the prince had had a seizure paralyzing his right side.
that the prince was in a bad humor, stood awaiting him; Mademoiselle
that the princess grew still kinder. The younger sisters also became
that the prisoner was simply a lunatic. "This is a beautiful country,"
that the products of certain organisms antagonise one another--for
that the question of his wife's guilt which had been tormenting him
that the revolutionary leaders were not prepared for any radical
that the scoliosis due to rickets has little tendency towards recovery.
that the screams of the crowd and the shrieks of the woman were due to
that the soldier shouting "Brothers!" was a prisoner, and that another
that the sovereign was coming to the capital for consultation with his
that the strange lady, the aide-de-camp, and some of the servants, all
that the substance of the tumour is exposed. The fungating masses thus
that the table nearly broke down and the tumblers on it jumped
that the time had come for them to enjoy the privileges of a
that the truth of life has been revealed to me only to show me that
that the upper as well as the lower house of the Philippine legislature
that the urine is passed with pain and difficulty and in a minute
that the very ideas of 1789 were arrested in their development by
that the wall readily tears when seized with an artery-forceps,
that the war begun by no wish of mine may finish as quickly as
that the wound was mortal. But he needed further proofs and it was
that their case was hopeful. In their platform of 1872, for example, the
that their obligations ended with the payment of any wages they saw fit
that theory. If the conditions under which power is entrusted
that there is a _dissociated paralysis_ within the distribution of the
that they had been a minority of the voters in 1860 and warned by the
that they have become infected with sarcoma for the enlargement may
that they shall, at the earliest moment when the central government
that they too in the depths of their souls understand it as I do,
that they were brought nearer to the destruction of their whole
that this maiden was nothing else than a representation of the Song of
that this ram, who instead of getting into the general fold every
that this system of land tenure became the dominant feature of a large
that this was the wife of the priest whose home it was, and that she
that those limits are very near together; that the person in a bed
that though there was danger, he had hopes of the effect of this
that time notorious among the rakes and scapegraces of Petersburg.
that tissues might be taken from the operating theatre and kept in cold
that tomorrow's battle would be the most terrible of all he had
that under the administration of William Pitt, the imperial genius of
that unless a prompt remedy is applied the troops will no longer be
that used to hang in long clusters down to the floor of the hive,
that very moment they heard through the darkness the challenge: "Qui
that villages were in a state of the greatest poverty. He did not know
that voice, clear, not grandiloquent but mild, in which only the
that war. On the contrary, the deviations made from his theory were,
that was as yet burning only at one end, just below the roof, and
that was not pretty, but neither Mademoiselle Bourienne nor the little
that was the affair of the sovereign, but as far as she personally was
that way the first words that entered his head. "It may turn out
that we, the commanders, far from having to urge the men on or
that were in the huts, and dragging away boards, dry wood, and
that were to take some of the wounded away, shouts, curses, and
that when both hands are placed over the swelling they are separated
that when half Russia had been conquered and the inhabitants were
that when he saw the great mass of Muscovites who had donned uniform
that when the collateral circulation was well established, the leakage
that when the increased intra-thoracic pressure is transmitted to these
that which forms when the ulcer is allowed to heal without such aid.
that which has accumulated in the vessels of the limb, may escape in
that will diminish the force of the stream through the main artery, for
that worried him all the way. He thought angrily of the pleasure he
that year a band of Villa's men raided the town of Columbus, New Mexico,
that's all that's left me!" And at the same time he said in a
that's my legs, and that is the door, but why is it always
that's nonsense, the chief thing is not to forget the important
that's not the point. Between ourselves, mon cher, do you belong to
that's what the Emperor is! It is I, Ramballe, who tell you so.... I
that, as the British admiralty had ordered the use of neutral flags by
that, at the end of a week, when the grafts should have united, the
that, except occasionally in the border states, never gave an electoral
that, from the point of view of observation, reason and the will are
that, taken by surprise, the French had thrown down their muskets
that, there are inns of accommodation the whole distance on the
that, whereas the Constitution intended the President to be an
that, while the North was not abolitionist, it was passionately set
that. We may be mistaken. What I say is: 'Join hands, you who love the
that. What will be the result? That I shall be the laughingstock of
thatch from the roofs, for the campfires, or wattle fences to serve
thatched roofs in place of fodder, and sat down to dine round the
the  of  and  to  in  I  that  was  his  he  it  with  is  for  as  had  you  not  be  her  on  at  by  which  have  or  from  this  him  but  all  she  they  were  my  are  me  one  their  so  an  said  them  we  who  would  been  will  no  when  there  if  more  out  up  into  do  any  your  what  has  man  could  other  than  our  some  very  time  upon  about  may  its  only  now  like  little  then  can  should  made  did  us  such  a  great  before  must  two  these  see  know  over  much  down  after  first  mr  good  men  
the "force bills" lapsed into desultory skirmishing. When in 1894 the
the "force bills." As a Republican Senate blocked immediate repeal, they
the "general welfare." The concrete objects covered by that broad term
the "hold-over" Democrats and Populists still enjoyed a power out of
the "man of great merit." The latter was very attentive to Anna
the "mechanicks in union" in New York protested against putting the new
the "pacific" intentions of most of the powers assembled.
the 3rd Corps who, not satisfied with taking from the unfortunate
the A B C of war or of politics, and that Bonaparte was an
the Abbe Morio? He is a most interesting man."
the Allied armies. The first division, which entered the Montdidier
the Allies, immediate provision was made for increasing the number of
the Almighty Hand, hitherto unseen, was becoming manifest in all
the Almighty lay the duties of wife and mother upon me I
the American Federation of Labor sought, first of all, to be very
the American Revolution?
the American marine on the high seas. In response to this stimulus
the American people were to pour out their blood and treasure.
the Americans that it was without power to tax them. On the contrary, it
the Anglican Church was established by law. In New England the Puritans
the Appalachians and the Mississippi. He also had before him the history
the Appalachians. Adams did not get a single electoral vote in the South
the Armada, but still presenting an imposing front to the British
the Army Orders by heart and know the Regulations as well as I do
the Articles of Confederation had neither the strength nor the resources
the Articles of Confederation was drifting into dissolution. Patriots,
the Articles of Confederation. Provincial jealousies delayed
the Atlantic in five days or the still swifter airplane, in fifteen
the Atlantic.... I even go so far as to say that, terrible as war may
the Baltic Provinces--and I can live in Petersburg on my pay, and with
the Berezina, beyond Vilna, and farther still.
the Bergs beneath her, could be cruel enough to refuse such an
the Bergs' house, not at ten but at fifteen minutes to eight.
the Bible. The cry was caught by the assembled multitude and given back.
the Boulogne expedition.
the British army by the thousands or in other ways aided the royal
the British colonies and plantations in America ... for applying the
the British generals. He was a stern but reasonable disciplinarian. He
the British government concluded a treaty with the Landgrave of
the British navy kept the channel open, transports were constantly
the British rules would be subject to seizure and confiscation by French
the British state and laid down a test of allegiance to the new order.
the Brotherhood was merely to be intimate and in favor with members of
the Caribbean. The supervision of finances in Santo Domingo, inaugurated
the Carolinas and made heavy calls upon them all for troops. The answer,
the Caucasus, and by the Russians in 1812.
the Chinese government should be permitted to extend its tariffs to all
the Christmas holidays and Sonya's love, had opened out to him a vista
the Civil War with regard to Mexico.
the Club from the day it was founded. To him the Club entrusted the
the Club or to pay calls?" All men seemed so pitiful, so poor, in
the Commons were equally vain. The ministry was firm in its course and
the Confederacy and their white supporters might be permitted to share
the Congress may by general laws prescribe the manner in which such
the Congress to call a national convention to take into account the
the Constitution had been re-read in the light of the Civil War. The
the Constitution of the United States is not a strait jacket but a
the Constitution, bewildered by many proposals and unable to agree on
the Constitution, slavery was lawful in all the Northern states except
the Constitution, which he had helped to make and interpret, he was now
the Constitution. In June, 1919, the requisite two-thirds vote was
the Constitution? To this baffling question Douglas lamely replied that
the Cossacks, and all who were in the camp, undressed and only just
the Council Chamber to demand "work or bread," and the frightened mayor
the Court remarked that it could not take charge of and operate the
the Crimean bridge and some were already debouching into the Kaluga
the Cumberland Gap and by branches extended into the Cumberland valley
the Czar, Nicholas II, fated to die in one of the terrible holocausts
the Danube, marching on us, you, and your lines of communication."
the Declaration of Independence, even if splendidly phrased, and paper
the Declaration of Independence, sprang into public view by winning a
the Democratic candidate. Again in 1912 the same policy was pursued. The
the Democratic leader of the state, rose in revolt, drove the ringleader
the Democratic platform.
the Democratic ranks. On other occasions, the contests between factions
the Democrats from all the Republicans. There were Republicans who
the Democrats under the leadership of a man destined to be one of the
the Department of Labor was established in 1913 the enforcement of the
the Dingley bill and the position of many industries had been altered
the Directory had been overthrown. A treaty was readily made with
the Dred Scott case.
the East and of Western Europe. The scoop shovel once used to handle
the East because Napoleon wished it and a man who says that this
the East poured through it in an endless stream. The swift growth of
the Eastern States, advanced by the New York houses on produce to be
the Eastern cities, newly enfranchised, also looked upon him as their
the Eighth Company as a shelter from the north, propped up by musket
the Elder?" he cried furiously.
the Emperor Alexander was clearly heard. He gave the words of
the Emperor Francis. He vividly imagined the casual questions that
the Emperor Napoleon if we take this bridge, so let us three go and
the Emperor about him; so that in the case of his death--and he is
the Emperor and would recommend him for a St. George's Cross. When
the Emperor did not assume the title of commander in chief, but
the Emperor from Petersburg. Before the news of the abandonment of
the Emperor gave him, he now found further confirmation of this
the Emperor had a plateful of biscuits brought him and began
the Emperor had kept him, and Prince Andrew noticed this affectation
the Emperor had said so-and-so and this minister so-and-so, seemed
the Emperor himself rode round his bivouacs. The soldiers, on seeing
the Emperor placed on Moscow and especially on its illustrious
the Emperor quickly, his face suddenly flushing.
the Emperor reappeared talking to the hostess. A young man, looking
the Emperor turned from him, took a couple of steps, stopped, came
the Emperor was and to explain frankly to some gentleman-in-waiting
the Emperor was conferring on him. The Empress' chamberlain invited
the Emperor was invited to act as hostess. Count Bennigsen, being a
the Emperor's birthday as on the fact of the victory itself. It was
the Emperor's dislike of Kutuzov, after a short deliberation they
the Emperor's displeasure at the poor success of our forces and the
the Emperor's room by which Dolgorukov had entered--a short man in
the Emperor's voice.
the Emperor, now Denisov, and now Moscow memories--and he again
the Emperor, the wishes he supposed the Emperor to hold, and the
the Emperor.
the Emperor.
the Emperor. He received Bolkonski stiffly and coldly and told him
the Emperor. The countess took up a position in one of the front
the Emperor?"
the Empress' Field." said clearly and distinctly.
the English government announced that the Germans wore sowing mines in
the English taxpayers were thankful for any promise of relief, and
the Enns, an officer, in a cloak and with a type of face different
the Erie opened in 1825 was the most noteworthy; and by the railways,
the Essen corps arrived and Prussia took our side.
the Eternal Architect of the universe, and of the courage with which
the Extremities.
the Faceted Palace in the Kremlin; others insisted that as the
the Far West was not left to the tedious processes of time. It was
the Federalists found it necessary to agree upon their favorites before
the Federalists in shouting: "Millions for defense, not a cent for
the First Degree, and a dinner had been arranged for the evening,
the Fourth Class for courage shown in the Ostrovna affair, and in
the Freedmen's Bureau to take care of refugees. It authorized the issue
the French Emperor's love and habit of war coinciding with his
the French Revolution, and so on. Without each of these causes nothing
the French army moved rapidly toward those Pratzen Heights which
the French army retires beyond the Niemen."
the French army was beaten and preparing for flight. But these were
the French army, so long lost sight of, was doing; the boldness with
the French army--and sometimes shook that tree itself. By October,
the French concern were then bought, and the final details settled. A
the French drummer boy. "Have you had that youngster with you long?"
the French drummer boy. "It's capital for us here, but what of him?
the French general, officers, and men changed to one of determined
the French grenadier.
the French had been retaken, but that Prince Bagration was wounded.
the French had captured the fleches and the village of Semenovsk,
the French had given battle at Borodino, did not achieve its purpose
the French held at that time. For that, only very simple and easy
the French in Spain, was much appreciated when he related it at
the French into the heart of the country, but from their first entry
the French position. Our infantry were stationed there, and at the
the French remained the more these forms of town life perished,
the French sentences which to them were meaningless, with an air of
the French statesman, Thiers, carried a copy of their paper into the
the French streamed from the press, while subsidized newspapers kept the
the French sword and pouch. "I have taken an officer prisoner. I
the French to throng to the place that had formerly been Moscow. But
the French were beaten, that the enemy was flying and must be driven
the French were not to blame in the matter. Moscow was set on fire
the French without attacking. It was necessary to let the French reach
the French, and thirdly by the fact that a large Russian army was
the French, he attended to the removal of the guns.
the French, searching for food, killed one another, sacked their own
the French, when our own army had melted away to half before
the French--who from being foes had suddenly become friends--that
the French.
the French. Dorokhov's report about Broussier's division, the
the Frenchman had pushed away, was sitting near the fire patting
the Frenchman in the frieze gown who meanwhile, swaying slowly from
the Frenchwoman. She wrote to Prince Andrew about the reception of his
the Friday. When he awoke on the Thursday, Savelich came to ask him
the German landlord.
the German village of Salzeneck. The best quarters in the village were
the Germans early in November. In January, 1918, they took over a part
the Grand Master. Great Architect of Nature, help me to find the
the Great Lakes, the other through Philadelphia and Pennsylvania and
the Great's old cudgel out of the museum and belabor them in the
the Grossvater. Her father asked her to come home, but she begged to
the Guard, and a page of Napoleon's, a young lad of an old
the Guards to the field of battle, afraid of letting a ready victim
the Guards won't be in action," he added as if in apology.
the Guards, wore medals, and held some special lucrative posts in
the Guards?" asked Napoleon sternly.
the Gulf to Chicago, the Illinois Central part of the project being a
the Hebrew, in which the first nine letters denote units and the
the Hofkriegsrath were sitting at the table on which a plan was spread
the Homestead Act of 1862 granting free lands to settlers. The Homestead
the Horse Guards that amazed the French themselves. Rostov was
the Horse Guards.
the House of Commons.
the House of Representatives a resolution to the effect that, as an
the House of Representatives by the requisite two-thirds vote
the House of Representatives, could keep Missouri with slavery out of
the House of Representatives, enacted in 1890 a tariff law imposing the
the House of Representatives. The yoke of indecision was broken. The
the Indians, and the lands surveyed for sale, the way was prepared for
the Kaluga road. So it is impossible to understand by what reasoning
the Kentucky region as the harbor of Boston to the merchant princes of
the Knights of the East and of Jerusalem, and he responded in the same
the Kolocha, and had he not then ordered an immediate attack on the
the Kremlin Square with its snow undisturbed by vehicles, the sleigh
the Kremlin and in Posnyakov's house were closed again at once because
the Ku Klux was officially dissolved by the "Grand Wizard" in 1869.
the Linen Factories because he was comfortable there, that at
the Lodge, he had heard that a rumor of his duel had reached the
the London Company was annulled. The Massachusetts Bay corporation lost
the Lord ... by virtue of which we hold ourselves strictly tied to all
the Lord's Prayer. So, Count, there never is any negligence in my
the Marshal had insisted on Princess Mary's leaving at once, as it was
the Mason. "Yes, I never thought of it, but I have led a
the Masonic aprons and insignia he saw the uniforms and decorations at
the Masons?" he went on severely, as though there were something wrong
the Massachusetts Bay Company. A new document issued seven years later
the Mexican War brought California under the Stars and Stripes. They had
the Middle West, in the Eastern cities, and in Southern states. Then
the Minister (meaning Barclay). For God's sake send me somewhere
the Minister of Foreign Affairs, Prince Adam Czartoryski.... It is
the Minister of War but also his Most August Majesty the Emperor and
the Minister of War, Count Arakcheev.
the Minister of War."
the Minister. I am not merely civil to him but obey him like a
the Mississippi River, which Daniel Boone, the intrepid hunter, had
the Mississippi Valley was open to the Gulf, the initiative taken out of
the Mississippi Valley. Pennsylvania, alarmed by the advantages
the Mississippi a tier of new states, reaching from the Gulf of Mexico
the Mississippi, except New Orleans, passed under the British flag. The
the Monroe Doctrine this action meant that the United States, while not
the Mormons, estimated in 1895 that by the labor of their hands the
the Moroseyka, the Lubyanka, and Pokrovka Streets. Others quartered
the Moscow streets. He liked to hear those wild, tipsy shouts behind
the New York _Workingman's Advocate_ shortly afterward. These
the Niemen when the enemy was already at the Dnieper, but Princess
the North and the many smaller rivers in the South made it possible for
the North, the property of the loyalists was confiscated and the
the North," it was repeatedly said, "will not fight." As to disparity in
the North. The former by climate and soil was dedicated to a planting
the North? What were the social results?
the Northeast into all parts of the country. Small business concerns
the Northern Democrats boldly confronted with a platform declaring that
the Northern and Middle states are capable of producing but which, owing
the Northwest for its foodstuffs, began to battle for independence.
the Northwest territory forever and also the Missouri Compromise, which
the Occident? Nor is it inappropriate in this connection to recall the
the Ohio Land Company, a New England concern, acquired a million and a
the Old World and to find free homes in America. Thousands, like the
the Order of St. Anne for the last maneuvers; strange as it was to
the Order. The candles were then extinguished and some spirit lighted,
the Ordinance, Congress added the sixth article forbidding slavery and
the Oregon controversy with England, namely in 1844, the United States
the Orient_.
the Pacific Coast, the broad empire of Texas added to the planting
the Pacific slope. In comparison with the middle border, this region
the Pacific. At any rate, the sweep of the United States to the shores
the Pennsylvania assembly held in one hand a bill for the executive to
the Pennsylvania border. King William's War (1689-1697), Queen Anne's
the Petersburg Berezina plan would be attributed to Kutuzov led to
the Petersburg plan) special hopes had been placed by the Russians,
the Pole Przebyszewski and of the Frenchman Langeron, Kutuzov's
the Polish provinces. Your army is grumbling."
the Pope himself would hear of her and would send her a certain
the Prater... True, we have no Prater here..."
the President to endure alone the buffets of political fortune.
the President's next diplomatic stroke was unmarred by censure of any
the President, with the fine irony of diplomacy, complimented him
the Presidents in that period, except John Quincy Adams, had taken part
the Princes Bolkonski, opposite which hung another such frame with a
the Progressives accepted, Charles E. Hughes, an associate justice of
the Prussian and Scottish lodges. I told him everything as best I
the Prussian army and was aide-de-camp to a very important personage.
the Prussians. The Prussians are our faithful allies who have only
the Pullman strike, as its candidate, called for public ownership of all
the Puritan revolutionists; Puritans, in turn, dispatched after the
the Puritans were still more ruthless. When a mania of persecution swept
the Red Men still wielded the tomahawk and the scalping knife. It was
the Red Men would soon be subdued.
the Republican candidate, broke the record by carrying Tennessee as well
the Republican party." So persistent were such attacks that the
the Republican sections, even invaded Democratic territory, carrying the
the Republican ticket; but this was readily overlooked. Hayes and
the Republicans for many years kept a keen eye upon the maintenance of
the Republicans got full control of both houses--a dominion of the
the Republicans; they received from the former very specific and cordial
the Revolution although they deplored many of the events associated with
the Revolution, of the ideas of 1789 and so forth, and at another
the Revolution, who had been paid for their services in land warrants
the Revolution.
the Revolution. He had served in the war for independence, in the
the Revolutionary army. He had suffered with Washington at Valley Forge.
the Rhetor's instructions. The Mason drew the shirt back from Pierre's
the Rogozhski gate?" thought he. Just then Mavra Kuzminichna
the Roman and French codes into Russian, and he felt ashamed of
the Rostov family, many fears that the invitation would not arrive,
the Rostovs and spent the rest of the day there.
the Rostovs got out of their carriage at the chapel, the sultry air,
the Rostovs had known from childhood, and who had now become a wealthy
the Rostovs of Bolkonski, Pierre could not refrain from making them
the Rostovs' being announced, the old prince had shouted that he did
the Rostovs' box--her whole bosom completely exposed--beckoned the old
the Rostovs' house and of his childish love for Natasha was unpleasant
the Rostovs' position and his own, he decided that the time had come
the Rostovs. He had been in Moscow several times, and had passed
the Russian army, but might in other circumstances have led to its
the Russian army, we picture that army without any leaders, it could
the Russian army. Many heroes have been described to us in verse and
the Russian entrenchments, and the places where, in line with them,
the Russian left wing, Napoleon said it should not be done, without
the Russian line shone through the smoke. The weather was calm, and
the Russian prisoners with that detachment, Dolokhov said:
the Russian side. Though the condition and numbers of the French
the Russian troops were quietly encamped at Tarutino, a change had
the Russian with his heir the Tsarevich, and the Austrian with the
the Russians made that effort, and the flame of battle burned slowly
the Russians moved his army across the Kolocha. And the Russians,
the Russians possessed would have been required.
the Russians stared at Pierre because they could not make out to
the Russians, and projects of giving battle, and above all the
the Russians. But it was not really so. It appears so to us because we
the Saar was placed under inter-allied control to be exploited under
the Scotch nourished for many years enjoying in peace their own form of
the Scotch-Irish, Presbyterians in belief, English in tongue. Both
the Scriptures not only an inspiration to religious conduct, but also a
the Sedition law null and void, as violating the federal Constitution.
the Senate and House of Representatives, according to the rules and
the Senate and in the end the whole scheme of the national Constitution
the Senate at Washington. By 1910 three-fourths of the states had
the Senate chairs in the Senate Square, and cook themselves meals
the Senate, declared it to be a duty of the United States to take part
the Senate, shall appoint ambassadors, other public ministers and
the Senate, shall, before it become a law, be presented to the President
the Smolensk highroad crowded with troops. Nearer at hand glittered
the Son...?"
the South as contrary to the planting interest. They were constantly
the South was the division between the parties fairly definite; this
the South were to be readmitted. It therefore proceeded to pass a series
the South, almost without exception, looked upon the protective tariff
the South, in particular.
the South, we read of tiny schoolhouses, where boys, and sometimes
the South--that great power which had furnished leadership of undoubted
the South. As if to add bitterness to gall and wormwood, the fourteenth
the South. Between 1860 and 1870 the number of manufacturing
the Southern Pacific and its subsidiary corporations. In September the
the Southern colonies grew alarmed. In 1710, Virginia sought to curtail
the Spanish ambassador at Washington, expressing contempt for the
the Spanish war exercised a marked influence. It introduced at once
the Square.
the Stamp Act Congress and the Massachusetts Circular. Macdonald, pp.
the Stamp Act. Then it veered again and renewed its policy of
the Stars and Stripes and the Union Jack should wave together over an
the States shall be necessary to a choice. In every case, after the
the Stone, Moskva, and Yauza bridges.
the Straits of Magellan, San Francisco, Australia, the Philippines,
the Sukharev tower, do you remember?"
the Supreme Court and stringently enforced.
the Supreme Court had settled the question of constitutionality by the
the Supreme Court, who had been especially severe in his attacks upon
the Susquehanna early in the following century, and iron masters then
the Swedes of Delaware, and the Scotch-Irish of the interior "were not
the Torzhok estate with the children, your excellency."
the Townshend Acts. It provided, however, for the strict, even the
the Transylvania Company. They even carried their protests into the
the Treasury to withdraw the greenbacks from circulation. The paper
the Treasury, Jefferson intervened at this point. By skillful management
the Tree of Knowledge is specially applicable. Only unconscious action
the Tsar's hand and he felt that he must not give way. He sprang
the Tsar, who still remained in the same attitude of indecision.
the Tsarevich should not be with the army. Do you know what he said to
the Turkish wars Hostilities are ended, we can shake one another's
the US Internal Revenue Service as a 501(c)(3) organization with EIN
the US Internal Revenue Service as a 501(c)(3) organization with EIN
the Uhlans, bullets came from the front, whining and whistling, but
the Union. All such foes of the human race," solemnly announced the
the United States Bank. When the Senate protested against this arbitrary
the United States and will form a new epoch in our political course....
the United States conceded that it was in the wrong. It surrendered the
the United States entered into a new era. Until this time the
the United States incurred in the Revolutionary War--a debt which those
the United States to join them, and, on meeting a polite refusal, they
the United States to make every sacrifice necessary for victory.
the United States, I will hang the first man I can lay my hands on
the United States, directed to the president of the Senate. The
the United States, especially as that could be done without conceding
the United States, or as a member of any State legislature, or as an
the United States.
the United States.
the United States. England, France, and Italy were represented by their
the United States. It completely reverses all the political relations of
the United States. President Harrison looked with favor on the proposal,
the United States. The sentinels of the frontier answered. Davy
the United States." Then he considered the slave power in the Supreme
the United States; but it was not until December 7 that Congress, acting
the United States?
the United States_, Vol. VIII, pp. 1-12.
the United States_, pp. 184-194.
the United States_, pp. 383-388.
the University, from the Foundling Hospital, the Suffragan has sent...
the Virgin's Field, to the left of the nunnery, as far as a kitchen
the Virginia House of Burgesses passed a set of resolutions declaring
the Vozdvizhenka Street, which had remained uninjured and needed
the West Indies, the colonists paid for English manufactures. So an
the West Indies. As the industry developed, mills were erected for the
the West and South. On the contrary, by advocating government assistance
the West and the older home of Federalism in the East. The nationalism
the West to vote against candidates for President, who would not approve
the West took its place on the English dinner table by the side of bread
the West, and the South. In the first sphere of action the chief events
the West, the Federalists, with a few conspicuous exceptions, opposed
the West. The time so dreaded by Jefferson had arrived. People were
the Western states. Of the output of flour and grist mills, which almost
the Western trade and in 1857 had trains running into St. Louis.
the White House in his own coach, taken the oath with quiet dignity,
the Wilson tariff bill laid a tax upon all incomes of $4000 a year or
the Wonder-Worker on his breast, and his way of speaking and
the X-ray appearances or by an exploratory incision.
the X-rays. The symptoms are referred to the joint, because it is there
the _Little Belt_, a British sloop, suspected of being the guilty party.
the _Lusitania_, a British steamer, sailed from New York for Liverpool.
the _femoral artery_ above the origin of its deep branch, the death of
the _femoral_ below the origin of its deep branch or the _popliteal
the _melanotic sarcoma_, which is brown or black. The _psammoma_ is a
the _small_ and the _large spindle-celled_, the _giant-celled_ and the
the _subungual exostosis_--is described and figured on p. 404. Bony
the abdominal cavity is filled with a fluid practically devoid of
the abdominal wall until it is wanted; this has been carried out with
the abolition of the bank, the country was plunged into one of the most
the abscess is scraped with the Volkmann spoon or with Barker's flushing
the abscess may be employed. An incision is made through the skin and
the abscess reaches the surface, the skin becomes of a dusky red or
the abscess, there are no symptoms of poisoning. The abscess varies in
the absence of any primary stage, the infection being a general one from
the absence of infection is said to be _aseptic_, and under these
the absence of pathological changes. Although most frequently met with
the absorption of inflammatory products and in overcoming adhesions and
the abuses that had grown up.
the access of fresh organisms, aided by mechanical irritation from
the accountant, "but he feels a pain in the pit of his stomach
the accumulation of the secretion of the epithelial cells, or as a
the accumulation of the toxic products of bacterial action tends to
the accumulation of wealth he did not pretend to ignore, but he believed
the acquired disease, but as they affect bones which are still actively
the acromion, and the upper part or roof is rolled up in the same
the action and its investigation, and according to the greater or
the action did Prince Bagration, still hearing the cannonade in the
the action had begun on the right flank and the French were already
the action of the muscle is impaired, and the patient complains of pain
the actively virtuous life of which he had been dreaming since he
the activity of a diseased kidney may be diminished by regulating the
the actors and actresses were robbed.
the addition of pyogenic infection may also be concerned in the failure
the adductor longus. An oval swelling forms in the upper part of the
the adjacent bones, or lesions of the nerves.
the adjacent joint is implicated, the surgeon may be misled by the
the adjacent joint.
the adjacent joint. The veins of the marrow are of large calibre and are
the adjutant had been told that the French had been repulsed, the
the adjutant was heard. Natasha sat up.
the adjutant with a smile. At those words Kutuzov looked round. He was
the adjutant, three houses off.
the adjutant.
the advance on Moscow, nor did Alexander and the Russian commanders
the advancing spring and summer seasons, they were driven northward
the advancing streptococci are thereby arrested. Several coats of the
the advantage seemed to him entirely just. Creditors had suffered heavy
the advantages and disadvantages of the position, the state of the
the advantages are far less than in the infantry. Just consider my own
the advocates of despotism to find that we are incapable of governing
the affairs in Spain.
the affairs of Texas was a dispute with Great Britain over the
the affected arteries, these lesions give rise to clinical features of
the affected part, resulting from such causes as the gradual narrowing
the affected segment of tendon.
the affected side the wave is smaller in volume, and delayed in time. A
the affected veins, and in an inherent weakness in the vessel walls.
the affection takes the form of an indolent painless swelling, the
the afternoon."
the age of twenty-five years, and been seven years a citizen of the
the aid of Missouri, to gain possession of the Mississippi Valley, the
the aid of a cannula with a terminal aperture.
the aid of his own knowledge and by talks with experts, tried to
the aim of the officer who wished to go into action to distinguish
the air of a subordinate who obeys without reasoning. With an
the air, the blood and serum exuded on its surface may dry and form a
the air.
the alert all through the dinner, replied that just as "all roads lead
the alighting board, instead of the former spirituous fragrant smell
the allegory apparently seemed to Napoleon, as it had done to all
the allurements instinct had formerly taught her to use would now be
the almshouse and the lunatic asylum, could be seen some people in
the ambitions of Southern statesmen. On the contrary, they also
the ambulance with that maniac's bullet in my body?"
the amount which could be bought when it fixed the price at $2 an acre
the ancient and honorable term selected by Jefferson and his party, now
the ancient capital, but according to your last report you have even
the ancient dignity which thou hast lost."
the aneurysm a hollow insulated needle, through the lumen of which from
the aneurysm increases in size it forms adhesions to surrounding
the aneurysm. Cartilage, on the other hand, being elastic, yields before
the angel's face reminded them strangely of the little princess. But
the angle of the mouth the condylomatous patches may spread to the
the angry and stinging reproaches he meant to address to Kutuzov for
the animal did not after all suffer from rabies, and that the patient
the animated company that assembled at her house, without incurring
the animated sounds of her father's voice and another's--a woman's-
the ankylosis results from some infective condition such as tuberculosis
the annual profits. In other instances, employees were allowed to buy
the annulment of the old charter of Massachusetts which conferred so
the answer.
the answers to these questions, as was only too evident, did not
the anterior branch of the first dorsal nerve. In typical cases all the
the anteroom and downstairs into the yard.
the anteroom. To her remarks about his mother's health he made no
the anterooms of many important men, and the different types of such
the anus, as a fistula-in-ano. Intestinal fistulae are sometimes met with
the apartments assigned to Prince Vasili.
the appetite is impaired, the patient is easily tired, and there may be
the applicable state law.  The invalidity or unenforceability of any
the applicable state law.  The invalidity or unenforceability of any
the application of Corrigan's button. When such treatment fails the
the application of carbon dioxide snow, especially when this follows
the application of the X-rays or of radium to inhibit the growth of the
the appointed place.
the appointed time.
the appointment of such inferior officers, as they think proper, in the
the approach of the French fleet; and they captured and held both
the approaching enemy farther off. At the same instant the sun came
the architect.
the ardor of a soldier. Later, as a member of Congress, a representative
the area of bone that comes to form the base of the ulcer projects as a
the argument advanced by some modern scholars to the effect that the
the argument that the Constitution authorized no such laws. Jackson,
the arid soil, the management of property, and the upbuilding of
the arm and forearm hang close to the side, with the forearm extended
the arm is abducted (Dawbarn's sign). It is liable to traumatic
the arm is moved. The attitude may be that of the Erb-Duchenne type, or
the arm, and he may be unable to flex the elbow when the forearm is
the armpits and dragging along a little old man in a uniform and
the arms of the doctor, who held her up.
the arms, munitions, supplies, and transportation required in the
the army and the reasons that have induced you to take this melancholy
the army caused by the rapidity of the advance had become evident,
the army ever deeper and deeper. When water is spilled on dry ground
the army has gone? Eh, what people! 'Against God's might our hands
the army he commanded from attacking and a battle had taken place.
the army he would give an opinion at the war council which would be
the army nothing but flogging, drilling, and Military Settlements; the
the army to exterminate these scoundrels. We too will take part..."
the army when he was needed there--now when his part was played out,
the army without a battle.
the army would be separated from its supplies by the broad river
the army's foraging operations, provision trains, and hospitals. When-
the army, another, a ninth party, was being formed and was beginning
the army, growing more incoherent and more diffused, mingling with
the army," and which constitutes the sinew of war, Kutuzov's words,
the army. And not only did he love power to which he was accustomed
the army. Behind, before, and on both sides, crowds of militiamen with
the army. The brilliant qualities of the soldiers of the army sent
the arterial angiomas.
the arterial coats, combined, in most cases, with a loss of elasticity
the arteries reflexly contract, so that the quantity of blood entering
the arteries. The disease may commence in the synovial membrane or in
the artery beyond--distal ligation.
the artery makes no difference in the size or tension of the swelling.
the artery tends to become dilated, and to form a thick-walled sac,
the artery that is presumably healthy and where relations are
the artery, causes the wound in the vessel to gape; by completing the
the artery; from a "pulsating aorta"; and from spinal caries; much help
the articular surfaces, and it may be also the ends of the bones, are
the articular surfaces, reparative and hypertrophic changes are taking
the articulation. The pain, stiffness, and effusion into the joint which
the artillery could be faintly heard. The men were forbidden to talk
the asepticity of the wound, it is better treated by the open method,
the assistant on the skin in front, one above and the other below the
the astounding fact that the white laboring population, divorced from
the attack of the phagocytes, as well as the various protective
the attack with music and with drums beating, and killed and lost
the attacks the limbs are kept rigidly extended. The clonic spasms may
the attacks to become milder as the virulence of the organisms becomes
the attainment of certain ends--the greatness of Russia or of
the attempt of a people who had never had experience in such matters to
the attention of the people to three subjects of lasting interest. He
the author's remark.
the authorities of the state. The convention answered by a brief
the authorities.
the authorities. 'I have taken six lives,' he says (he was a great
the avoidance of a battle (which we could not have refrained from
the axilla, or under the skin of the back.
the axillary group. The epi-trochlear gland is sometimes enlarged in
the bacilli being usually derived from some pre-existing focus in the
the bacillus coli communis, the gonococcus, the pneumococcus, or the
the back rooms where a cork and various dressing gowns and male
the bad reception I had encountered, and of my rupture with the
the baggage wagons had all crossed, the crush was less, and the last
the balance between life and death may be turned by the most trivial
the balance of power into the hands of the few colored voters who
the balance. With a capital of from two to three hundred dollars a
the balk onto the ryefield, again put on speed still more viciously,
the ball of invasion that had advanced with such momentum rolled on
the ballot dropped into the box, or from some mark on the outside of the
the ballroom were suddenly filled by the domestic serfs--the men on
the band and the white trousers of a battalion marching to parade, the
the bandage off his eyes and glanced around him. The room was in black
the bandage was again removed and more than ten voices said
the bank, hesitating to step onto the ice. The general on horseback at
the banner and stumbled over it. Several of those present laughed.
the baron, "we will finish this conversation elsewhere--at a ball
the barrel. It also increases the penetrating power of the missile, but
the barrier. Dolokhov walked slowly without raising his pistol,
the baseness of England, and so on. History shows us that these
the battery and Pierre ran down the slope stumbling over the dead
the battery still with that same smile, trying not to obstruct the
the battery they could be seen running back past it carrying their
the battery; two guns were smashed and cannon balls fell more and more
the battle of Austerlitz, but wore a tight new uniform with Russian
the battle of Austerlitz: nine tenths of the men in the Russian army
the battle of Borodino, there was a soiree, the chief feature of which
the battle of Manila Bay in 1898, that Commodore Perry with an adequate
the battle of Manila Bay, not ten thousand people in the United States
the battle royal in Massachusetts, ending in ratification in February by
the battle was actually fought, this position, protected by the
the battle would have been won. To speak of what would have happened
the battle would have taken place where we expected it. In that case
the battlefield and, addressing him, again used the epithet "young
the battlefield could be seen.
the battlefield galloped up.
the battlefield.
the battlefield.
the beast of the Apocalypse now seemed to him meaningless and even
the bed, and appeared to be meditating as he looked contemptuously
the bed, and putting on his spectacles he began reading. Only now in
the bed, pale and dry eyed, and was gazing at the icons and whispering
the bed. "Ugh, how hard it is! Oh, that this toil might end and you
the bedclothes. It is not necessarily attended by fever or by muscular
the bedroom in his dressing gown, where he found his wife still at her
the beginning of the nineteenth century lies in the movement of the
the beginning. It will be but the stepping stone to others larger and
the bell determining a flow of blood into the tissues enclosed within it
the bench and the lieutenant colonel sat down beside him.
the bench at the gate awaiting his Serene Highness, as everyone now
the benefit of manufacturers.
the best American talent; we must train those applying for admission and
the best French families. He is one of the genuine emigres, the good
the best and happiest moments of his life--especially his earliest
the best chance of a lasting cure.
the best drains; but where it is desirable to leave little mark, a few
the best local application is a solution of chromic acid--10 grains to
the best match in Russia, had sunk greatly in the esteem of society
the best results are reached when there is a combination of the
the best results it is necessary that the efficiency of our methods of
the better and roomier part of Andrew Savostyanov's hut. The men,
the better. It will at any rate be understood all the sooner that
the big masters of commerce, the heads of railroad corporations and of
the bill, is "a very satisfactory advance in our policy of extending to
the bills which poured in upon the bankrupt government. When his own
the bills, and enact laws protecting American industry and commerce.
the birch trees cawing impatiently. Around the tents, over more than
the birch trees, occasionally plucking leaves from a branch that met
the birches that formed the forest, it was ten times as thick and
the biscuits were being doled out at the rate of half a pound a man
the biscuits. He did not know why, but he had to have a biscuit from
the bishop's house before Mass.
the bladder, or the uterus.
the bleeding indicates the size of the damaged vessel, and the colour of
the blessings of liberty and civilization upon all the rescued peoples.
the blockade of Southern ports inaugurated by Lincoln in April, 1861,
the blonde. One is sorry for the husband, really...."
the blood and the nature of the flow denote whether an artery or a vein
the blood in the vessels may even coagulate (_thrombosis_). Coincidently
the blood is used up in neutralising the substances injected, and this
the blood itself, such as occur, for example, in certain toxaemias, also
the blood rush to his heart with a thud. Denisov rode past him,
the blood stream, must usually overcome the resistance of several
the blood, or through the overlying skin.
the blood, the tissues are imperfectly oxygenated, and the patient
the blood--which favour the formation of thrombi.
the blood-stream from some focus of infection elsewhere in the body.
the blood-stream rarely show themselves clinically until late in the
the blood-stream. Tuberculous nodules are found disseminated throughout
the blood. These valves are composed of semilunar folds of the tunica
the bloodstained post, he leaned back and, not being comfortable in
the bloom of life, escaped from reality into a world of delirium.
the blue uniforms and groups with horses, easily recognizable as
the boat hook no longer reaches the moving vessel, and suddenly the
the bodice before the door opened and Countess Bezukhova, dressed in a
the body by way of the mucous surfaces, the organisms being either
the body for the transformation of energy. This mechanism consists of
the body of a greyish colour, cold, and clammy. The pulse is rapid,
the body, and is known clinically as a _rigor_. When the temperature
the body, resembling in these respects the most malignant forms of
the body--as, for example, in the subcutaneous or submucous cellular
the body.
the body. In colour they present every tint from purple to brilliant
the body. Others, on the contrary--for example, the tubercle bacillus
the body. Tumours that are structurally alike may show variations in
the bond between her own body and soul.
the bond, there remained three final questions. How shall the
the bone and into its interior, where the progress of the cancer is
the bone by way of the blood vessels and lymphatics, and gives rise to
the bone complicated with pyogenic infection, specific remedies have
the bone marrow, the substance of muscles, the heart and pericardium,
the bone produced by slight violence.
the bone, and is described as "boring." It is aggravated by use of the
the bone, which is hard in some parts, and doughy and elastic in others.
the bone--hyperostosis.
the bones and joints imparts to the disease the features of pyaemia. The
the bones becoming denser and heavier than normal. In the flat bones of
the bones most commonly affected; the limb, moreover, hangs useless at
the bones of animals buried with prehistoric man.
the bones of deeply seated joints, such as the hip or shoulder, the
the bones of the extremities--or it may be confined to a single bone,
the bones of the hand, as syphilitic dactylitis, and in the bones of the
the bones.
the bones. The state of the general health may necessitate operation as
the book.
the booty on which the Cossacks fell. Here as at Tarutino they went
the boundary strip in sixteen paces. A whizz and a thud! Five paces
the bounties of the government, are ever more active and vigilant than
the bow turned to Anna Mikhaylovna, answering her query by a
the boyars had already taken definite shape in his imagination. That
the brachialis muscle as a sequel of dislocation of the elbow. After
the brain or meninges, or from general streptococcal infection.
the brain. In the living subject, by using a fine needle-like electrode
the branchial clefts. Tubulo-dermoids present the same structure as skin
the brazen clatter of the polished shining cannon that quivered on the
the break caused by cares for the present, seemed already to belong to
the break-up of the great estates, some of which had come down from the
the breaking down and liquefaction of the diseased gland may be avoided
the breaking down of adhesions, which aroused latent organisms.
the breast, liver, uterus, prostate, colon, and rectum; hyper-nephroma
the breast, the infection of the axillary glands is an important
the breast--or they may be derived from tumours situated elsewhere. The
the breast; those on the left side also in cancer of the stomach. The
the brick oven in the larger room. Malasha looked down from the oven
the bridge and not let us cross? But it will please our sovereign
the bridge did not take his eyes off the women till they had passed.
the bridge he saw equally uniform living waves of soldiers, shoulder
the bridge he saw two unlimbered guns, the infantry crossing the
the bridge not knowing what to do. There was no one to hew down (as he
the bridge over the Enns, and then guessed that the card that came
the bridge, uphill where the clay had been liquefied by the rain, past
the bridge.
the bright firelight stepped two strangely clad human figures clinging
the brink of some rivulet and by kindling a fire they may soon dress
the broad foundation of the people.
the bronchial glands at the root of the lung. From these, infection
the brothels," and with these words Marya Dmitrievna, turning up her
the buffalo, the main food supply of the wild Indians, had made them
the buffoon, who was coming toward her in a woman's jacket.
the bullet and smoke and powder-staining and scorching are more marked
the bump comforts it. The doctors were of use to Natasha because
the burden of accidents from the unfortunate victims. In the first
the burdens of wars among the members and provided for a congress of
the bursa; the tuberculous granulation tissue may break down into a cold
the buttock and thigh with long steel needles. Six or eight needles are
the buttocks and snuffles there is no difficulty in recognising the
the buzzing of the fly that flopped against his pillow and his face.
the by-products of metabolism.
the calamities of Moscow to him or to himself? Still less could it
the calcaneus.
the calcaneus_ may become inflamed--especially as a result of
the calf served up with sauce. They talk to us of the rules of war, of
the calm, luxurious life of Petersburg, concerned only about
the campaign and who did not know Russian, yet felt deeply moved (as
the campaign, I should feel dishonored, not only in my comrades'
the campaign, but of Dokhturov nothing or very little is said and that
the campaign, had gained the confidence of his superiors by his
the campaign. It had been neither at Pultusk nor at Preussisch-Eylau
the campaign. Moved by the Democratic demand for a drastic reduction, he
the campaign. The Frenchman, confusing the Austrians with the
the campaign?" he asked.
the campaigns of Austerlitz and of 1807 Rostov knew by experience that
the campfires were blazing on all sides ready for cooking, the wood
the cancer that has not broken down. The central ulcer may temporarily
the candle with her hand stooped carefully with a supple and exact
the candlestick of which the cockroaches that had been gnawing it were
the capsular and other ligaments, and may be made to grate upon one
the captain when he makes his round, he will do anything for you."
the captain's reply to the Wurttemberg hussar in German. When he had
the capture of a whole French squadron. The day was bright and sunny
the carabineers.
the carpets. "Now press, Petya! Press, Vasilich, press hard!" she
the carriage horses on their heads, turning them aside, others
the carriage.
the carriages, the caleche, and the phaeton, all crossed themselves as
the cart and remained motionless a long while sunk in thought.
the cart had probably been wounded in the cheek. His whole head was
the cartilage causes pitting and perforation of the cartilage and makes
the carts.
the carts. (4) Similar measures will be taken that peasants with their
the case of Cohens _vs._ Virginia.
the case of a servant who cut her finger with a broken spittoon
the case of a skillful rider and, slightly bending over, disengaged
the case of children to several ounces in large abscesses in adults. The
the case of the tibia, from erythema nodosum. Tenderness localised to
the case of the wrist the newly formed connective tissue may fix the
the case recorded by Pagenstecher, where a professional athlete, while
the case with a thoroughly attractive woman, her defect--the shortness
the case with his bony fingers, tuned the guitar and settled himself
the caskets in which they are sterilised by means of sterilised forceps,
the castle, as well as a guard of honor of the Semenov regiment.
the casual tone of a man dealing with a subject quite familiar to him.
the catheter.
the cattle ranch embracing tens of thousands of acres. Again it was a
the cattle ranges and hundreds of farms were conducted like factories in
the cause of his coldness.
the cause of his dispositions not being as well planned as on former
the cause of justice against the enemy of the human race. Anna
the cause of the confusion, turned away with indifference, as if to
the cause of the war was Napoleon's ambition; to the Duke of
the cause of this movement, by what laws was it governed? asks the
the cause.
the cause. The man who explains the movement of the locomotive by
the causes of phenomena--the old method of history is moving.
the causes which impelled the American colonists to separate from
the cavities of joints, and in the interior of serous cavities, for
the cavity by the open method.
the cavity is lined by a thin film of granulation tissue which erodes
the ceded territories by Congress. The great decision had been made. Its
the celebrated grandee of Catherine's court, Count Bezukhov.
the cellars and stores containing army supplies. Others have disgraced
the cells containing dead brood and honey an angry buzzing can
the cellular tissue is loose, may attain a considerable size. The
the center of the battlefield. On the field between Borodino and the
the centers of discontent. Merchants again agreed not to import British
the central black eschar and of the circumstances which attend upon
the central nervous system.
the centre, exposing a smooth raw surface devoid of granulations.
the century it had been adopted by nearly all the states in the union.
the century the American frontier had disappeared. The wild, primitive
the chair she had just vacated. "You have made the place warm, I
the chairs, the orators spoke one after another and sometimes two
the changes are sometimes remarkably symmetrical (Fig. 135). The bones
the character of Paul I of Russia who recognizes his government;
the characters met with in secondary anaemia. The spleen, liver, testes,
the characters of his patients in general, and especially of the
the chemical elements of dissolution.
the chief aim of all at headquarters--because, as he alleged, he
the chief results?
the chief source from which workers were recruited for the factories of
the child is some days old, but attention is usually drawn to them
the child should lie on a firm mattress, or, to allow of its being taken
the child struggles or cries. From a cold abscess it is diagnosed by the
the children, in the special sense they attached to it.) "Why does she
the choir.
the chronic fear of civilians in Congress and to wring from that
the chronic inflammations of the synovial membrane of joints, of tendon
the cicatricial tissue may be ultimately replaced by bone.
the cicatrix. There is no pain, and the surrounding parts are healthy.
the circulating blood increase greatly in numbers (_leucocytosis_), as
the circulation and ultimately becoming impacted in a blood vessel. This
the circulation, specific antitoxic sera are employed in certain forms
the circulation. When possible, the primary focus of infection should be
the cities, gave the whole country a fresh shock. Six years later Henry
the city administration, should select a manager to do this. The scheme
the city through Tver, Kaluga, and Dorogomilov gates. Faster and
the city was given the right to buy and operate the system if it desired
the city where peasants can bring their surplus supplies and the
the clavichord.
the clavichord. As soon as Nicholas entered, he was enfolded in that
the clavicle, may be called for.
the clergy and nobility and resolved themselves into a national
the clerk. "The Kiev Grenadiers, Podolian..."
the clinical features are those of an acute cellulitis and deeply seated
the clinical picture may assume the form of a _hydrops_, or of an
the cloak with which he was covered and, making wry faces at the
the close of his service in 1909, President Roosevelt, in messages,
the closure of all sugar factories. The work of ruin was completed by
the clothes in which he had slept without undressing felt
the clouds were passing, and a clear black sky appeared. Sometimes
the coarser varieties, were making it to sell. In the place of
the coast all the way from Maryland to Georgia, was fed by two streams
the coast of Brazil. No sea but what is vexed by their fisheries. No
the coats of the vessel are stretched and form the sac of the aneurysm,
the coffin--the Marshal, the village Elder, peasant women--and all
the cold from outside and a feeling of gaiety, crowded, at first
the cold of the least of the transport soldiers.
the collections for the poor, and they intrigue, the Astraea Lodge
the collective will of a people to certain historical personages is an
the college from King George long before. That charter, he declared, was
the colleges, trades, and professions; equal suffrage; the right to
the colonel and carried them out. It was pitiful to see them, boys,"
the colonel of his battalion, his steward, his major-domo, and various
the colonel's demand he made up his mind that he must have recourse to
the colonel, closely--to find in his face confirmation of his own
the colonies advising them to adopt a new form of government for
the colonies between 1763 and 1765. Explain each in detail.
the colonies if that hazardous enterprise could be accomplished at all.
the colonies were ordered not to approve any colonial law imposing a
the colonies were sustained only by huge outlays of money. Paper
the colonies, paid from the British treasury, and independent of all
the colonies, the clergy, at least in the beginning, formed the only
the colonies, the revenue derived from the duties to be applied toward
the colonies, was, in 1704, $6,509,000. On the eve of the American
the colonies. Of their labors a poet has sung:
the colonies. These two limitations on American freedom and enterprise
the colonies? Why?
the colonists could read. Through the newspapers, pamphlets, and
the colonists were united in spirit by many common ties. The major
the colonists, the woolen, hat, and iron industries, were laid under the
the colonists--an utter impossibility because that spirit was grounded
the colonists.
the color of muddy water. At times a sort of mist descended, and
the combined characters of all. A burn is classified in terms of its
the combined movement of flexion and supination, slight limitation of
the command "Attention!" and rode up to the Emperors with a salute.
the command of the first army, and a request to the duke--whom he said
the command to the general next in seniority, Count Buxhowden,
the commander in chief (which would be very difficult), he would not
the commander in chief's feet without upsetting the old man by
the commander in chief, and from the noisy laughter of the Cossacks
the commander in chief, who attracted the attention of all the
the commander with a tone of suffering in his voice, while there
the commanders of some large divisions with staffs also knew of this
the commanding general to prepare a register of voters for the election
the commencement of the action balls and shells began flying all
the commercial North. Thus he anticipated by nearly three-quarters of a
the commercial policies of England which followed it had accentuated the
the commercial world. The destruction of silver as money and the
the committee sat facing Bagration and, as the very personification of
the committee. I do not approve of it," said Arakcheev, rising and
the common carotid, the brachial, or the popliteal, has been partly
the common carotid, the temporary application of a ligature or clamp is
the common enterprise.
the common fatherland. I should have demanded the freedom of all
the common good, which served as a guide to self-government until
the common or external iliac, reached either by reflecting the
the common origin of the extensors and supinators; the "sprinter's
the commonest manifestations of the disease is the occurrence of
the communal experiment lasted for five years, the results were similar
the communication between the artery and vein, and, after separating the
the comparison to a cucumber is deserved. In some cases the tibia is
the competition of foreign labor, both of men and women, left the
the conception of complete freedom in man, for a being uninfluenced by
the conception of the ancients as to the direct participation of the
the concern of a day, a year or an age; posterity is involved in the
the condition has subsided, the limb is massaged and evenly bandaged to
the condition is relieved by elevation of the limb, but not nearly to
the condition to the normal, and _repair_ ensues after the manner
the conditions any one of which taken separately may seem to be the
the conditions of the circulation through them.
the conditions present in individual cases; in searching for a foreign
the conduct of "civilized warfare," casting a somewhat lurid light upon
the conduct of our agents in the island. In 1921 President Wilson was
the conduct of the militiamen was far from professional; but thousands
the condyle. It may retain this position, or it may slip backwards and
the condyles of the femur. It may be months or even years before the
the conflict in Europe raised fundamental questions respecting rights of
the connective tissue; the new tissue differs from normal fibrous tissue
the consciousness that the insult was not yet avenged, that his rancor
the consciousness that they had captured part of the battlefield and
the consent of the Congress, accept of any present, emolument, office,
the consent of the owner, nor in time of war, but in a manner to be
the conspiracy is crowned with success.
the constitutional element present, as the gouty and the diabetic ulcer;
the construction of this edifice of needles, he also saw by glimpses a
the contempt with which Rostov, from his fighting army point of
the contents may resemble the pus of an ordinary abscess.
the contents removed, the wall scraped, and the wound closed.
the contents show the coloration due to liberated iodine. When the
the contest--a tender rejected by the Spanish government with the broad
the continent of Europe had to pass through a British port paying custom
the continent, felt constrained to enact a land settlement measure
the contrary nourish contempt for him. O God, grant that in his
the contrary she even appeared shy of her unquestionable and all too
the contrary, far from helping their parents, were generally a
the contrary, my dear sir, it is only in the midst of worldly cares
the contrary..."
the convention should not meddle with slavery. "The morality or wisdom
the convention voted first one way and then another; finally it agreed
the convention were widely circulated in this country and abroad.
the conversation in French.
the conversation she noticed "Granddad" give Bennigsen a quick, subtle
the conversation, "almost all the aristocracy has already gone over to
the convoy and had uttered those solemn words about saving a child;
the cook.
the copse across which our men, regardless of orders, were running and
the copyright status of any work in any country outside the United
the copyright status of any work in any country outside the United
the cord where it'll get rubbed? I don't like that way of doing
the corner came Daniel the head huntsman and head kennelman, a gray,
the corner. Having put him in the corner she would herself begin to
the corners of his mouth read to the Austrian general the following
the corporation he saw a new stage in the development of American
the corporation that furnished the capital and leadership in the
the corporation to meet at one place, the representative idea was
the corps of prisoners, and when our men were not always getting
the corpses over the parapet.
the cortex through the Haversian canals and anastomose with those
the cost of their own defense. At this juncture there came into
the cot where she was standing, "better wait a bit... later..."
the cough I caught there, I should be ready to begin again. I pity
the coughing of the musicians were heard from the gallery.
the councilors should be appointed by the king, that all judges should
the count and countess respectfully conversing with the prior, who was
the count and moving toward the porch.
the count in his dressing gown every day, he invariably became
the count or Bolkonski, who might arrive at any moment, if they knew
the count sternly.
the count's face stirred. Once more Pierre looked questioningly at
the count's generosity, he was instructing in reading, writing, and
the count's niece, entered with a cold, stern face. The length of
the count's patriotism, Natasha jumped up from her place and ran to
the count's services, his request would be granted?..."
the count, bowing and looking round uneasily as if afraid the old
the count, coming as it did in the form of a simple note with an order
the count, dying with laughter.
the count, money and all things necessary for the uniform and
the count, who was looking inquiringly at him.
the count.
the count. He has, no doubt, forgotten it and will wish to destroy it.
the count. This person was a gray-bearded old man in a woman's
the countess in, while maids rushed with cushions and bundles from the
the countess was writing to her son.
the countess, silently and minutely studied her childhood's suitor. He
the countess, turning to little Nicholas who was coming in with
the countess, with a smile.
the country against the war hero, General Winfield Scott, on whom the
the country and the hatred of the French that all sons of the
the country at the President's command. Under these acts, he issued new
the country ever since, and all looked with curiosity at a fiancee who
the country that summer of 1812.
the country there early existed, among those more or less
the country they had in abundance, and in battles such as were fought
the country, making inevitable a continental nation; to give the
the country, the issuance of paper money, under definite safeguards, was
the country," says Elson, "were utterly weary of the agitation and they
the countryside and put everything to fire and sword. The
the countryside--"See, our infantrymen have already got there. Look
the course he had marked out for himself, leaving "the public nuisance"
the course of events remain unexecuted. Only the possible ones get
the course of his campaign Lincoln had uttered his trenchant saying that
the course of the battle and not one of his orders during the fight
the course of the vessels. When the lymphatic network in the skin is
the course of time slave labor became the foundation of the system. The
the course taken by the fight, and that course never can be known in
the court of the Dowager Empress, who was a friend and relation of the
the courtiers, and by the Emperor himself, it occurred to one of the
the courts. No President before or since ever entertained in times of
the crackling of wood fires near and afar, merged into one tremulous
the crafty conduct of Bismarck, and so on. The Napoleonic wars still
the creaking of carts and gun carriages, the tramp of horses, the
the creation of twelve federal reserve banks, one in each of twelve
the crow flies to Borodino, so that Napoleon could not see what was
the crowd and caps were doffed.
the crowd by the gate, gone up to a cart with a hood constructed of
the crowd rushed impetuously toward the embankment to watch the
the crowd, they had got wedged in at the approach to the dam and,
the crowd. Some of the peasants said that these new arrivals were
the crowd: "this rabble they have roused by their folly! They want a
the crown or to owners whose serfs paid quitrent and could work
the crown. The Whigs, who were composed mainly of the smaller
the crown. This "olive branch" was accompanied by a resolution assuring
the crows that sat on the carrion. The dog was merrier and sleeker
the cruelty of his rupture with her. "If only it were possible for
the crusts are prominent, dark in colour, and conical in shape, roughly
the culprits, but the officer sternly checked them.
the cured stage of osteomyelitis fibrosa.
the current rumors from all sides and gave superficial and hasty
the curtain of smoke that had concealed the hollow, driven by a rising
the curvatures that have no such cause; for example, we have seen
the custom to amputate the limb; an attempt should be made to avoid this
the cut ends of the nerves. When there has been suppuration, and
the cyst approaches the surface, and it is then also that percussion
the cyst, or an offensive fungating ulcer forms which may be mistaken
the cystic variety is the tendency the tumour tissue exhibits to project
the dale.
the damage to the tissues, may be so great that gangrene ensues.
the damaged nerves and muscles should be maintained by massage, baths,
the damaged part and its surroundings, and applying dry, non-irritating
the damaged vessel being ligated above and below the puncture. In some
the dancers, who--having decided once for all that being disguised, no
the danger threatening her son would not soon be over. Shinshin,
the dark.
the dashboard with snow, Anatole and his constant companion Makarin
the date at which the miscarriage occurs becoming later as the virus in
the date of the submission hereof to the States by the Congress.
the daughter. "Boris says his soul finds repose at your house. He
the day after that.
the day before, a soldier was lying athwart the rows of scented hay,
the day in the nursery, taking a mother's place to her little nephew
the day the old prince died the Marshal went away, promising to return
the day's council, at which the party of the young had triumphed.
the day, Wolzogen returned from Barclay and said that General
the days of nullification. The distinguished leader of the Whigs, Daniel
the days of the barber-surgeons,--usually as a result of the artery
the dead men, ran to catch up his line and, falling into step with a
the death and destruction which it brought in its train. So for the
the death of "King Caucus." Their clamor was effective. Under their
the death of Joseph Alexeevich, the news of which reached him almost
the debt remained and both interest and principal had to be paid.
the debts of the states, found a national bank, lay heavy taxes to pay
the decades following the American Revolution. But travelers of the time
the decisive moment of battle had come when Kutuzov would be destroyed
the declaration from Petersburg gave him particular pleasure, and that
the declarations of their opponents, were able to view them as idle
the decomposition of the contents is the result of the presence of
the deep and tender sorrow expressed in all her features agitated
the deep bell of the sleigh ringing farther and farther off, the black
the deep snow. He held the pistol in his right hand at arm's length,
the deepest reflections to say a civil word to someone who comes in
the defective work may elect to provide a replacement copy in lieu of a
the defective work may elect to provide a replacement copy in lieu of a
the defects of the Articles of Confederation?
the defense of the city; amazed also at the novel outlook revealed
the defense, the succor, and the victory of them that put their
the defensive processes going on in the tissues. If these measures fail,
the delegates decided that the Constitution should be sent to Congress
the delegates had gained political experience as governors of states.
the delight Nicholas felt when he escaped from the region covered by
the demand was intensified when it was found that many of the leaders
the density of the shadow of the bone in the areas affected.
the dentist, and he should brush them after every meal, using an
the deposit of lime salts in the young connective tissue and the
the deposit of new bone on the periosteal surface; later, there is the
the deposit on its inner aspect of blood-clot, which may eventually
the depression that grew out of the misfortunes in the early days of the
the depth of a whole spiritual world foreign to him was an
the depth of his soul he was glad she was remaining at home and had
the depth of my soul I agreed with him. Talking of my family affairs
the descent of the high steep hill, down which a winding road led
the desire for vengeance, or any feeling of that kind, but
the destruction of "Thy Jerusalem," and she prayed to God with the
the destruction of the heap, something indestructible, which though
the destruction varies according to the way in which the tubercle
the destructive process gradually spreads, and the patient eventually
the destructive process is extending at another.
the details."
the devastating storm of 1901, and confronted by the difficult problems
the development of the _collateral circulation_.
the devices adopted was that of the "company union." In one of the
the devil himself! When you get there you'll find out what those
the devil! There, don't let us be cross, old fellow!"
the dew-besprinkled dust of the road, on the walls of the houses, on
the diagnosis an easy one. We have observed two cases of this affection
the diameter of the bone.
the diaphysis, and spreads along the medulla to a variable extent; it is
the difference is merely one of degree. Frost-bite affects chiefly the
the different expression he saw on other faces--an expression that
the different forms of club-foot; over the angular projection in Pott's
the different stages overlap one another, and the lesions of one stage
the differential diagnosis between these is rarely completed until the
the digit concerned. In the hand, it is usually brought about by the
the dinner sat silent, glancing with a frightened look now at her
the direct road from there to Moscow passed. Balashev, who was on
the direction the troops would now have to take. A sixth group was
the discharge of dynamite or other explosives, or from the bursting of
the discharge of pus continues, and the track opening on the skin
the discoloration of the skin passing through the same series of changes
the discoloured area increases in size, and becomes successively green,
the discomfort and the risks from infection which its presence involves.
the discovery of these purposes, the more obvious it becomes, that the
the discovery that he did so delighted them.
the discretion of the state legislatures. The legislatures, in turn,
the discussion of it to state politics.
the disease being communicated to the offspring; so that if either
the disease continues to progress in spite of a fair trial of
the disease having commenced in the synovial membrane, slowly spreads to
the disease is most often met with in the cervical groups which derive
the disease known as _multiple myeloma_, the interior of the ribs,
the disease may prove fatal from absorption of toxins, involvement of
the disease which prove fatal, but with the milder forms in which the
the disease, and with the joint affected.
the disinfection has not been complete, a Bier's constricting bandage
the dismemberment of that empire and we do not think that the public
the disorders were pronounced. The huge debt incurred during the war was
the dispositions for the battle were written down from his dictation.
the disrespectful manner of the exhausted clerk, the fact that the
the distal end. The blood is dark red under ordinary conditions, but may
the distance that ought to separate them at that moment. Natasha
the distinguished explorer, was named for the presidency. The results
the distribution of the facial nerve. It is characterised by the
the distribution of the nation's wealth and resources.
the distribution of the trigeminal or superficial cervical nerves. There
the ditch. One with a white plume in his hat seemed familiar to
the divided ends of the nerve and placing them under the most favourable
the divisions regiments, and battalions by heart.
the doctor told his wife (who had ceased to smile so happily, and
the doctor's wife.
the dogs whose notes were familiar to him, by the way the voices of
the domestic life of the inhabitants is less intimate. Pfeiler, who has
the door and the sound of footsteps.
the door at that moment and down the steps into the yard.
the door behind him.
the door learned that another letter had been delivered.
the door of the ballroom.
the door with her knitting. Princess Mary took a book and began
the door, Rostov saw that the sick and wounded were lying on the floor
the door, and tried to open it. Someone was holding it shut.
the door.
the dorsal aspect of the carpus, usually towards its radial side (Fig. 60).
the dorsum of the foot. This is especially liable to occur when the
the dorsum. These lesions are specially apt to occur in those who smoke,
the drama of the World War, this nation has been a world power,
the dramatic and heroic aspects of war; but the long judgment of history
the drawing room to hear him in the study talking in a loud animated
the drawing room with some maps which he spread on a table, and put
the drawing room, and the serfs had something served to them in the
the drawing room, looked at Princess Mary in bewildered surprise.
the drawing room, where he embraced the count, kissed the hands of
the drawing room--that of love--boundless love for him, for her, and
the drawing room. Pierre dressed hurriedly and, instead of going to
the drawing room. She gave it to him and, unpleasant as it was to
the drawing room. The prince stood still; his lively glittering eyes
the drawing room? Even if I like him I can't now be myself with
the dressing stations the grass and earth were soaked with blood for a
the drive and the door stood open. Grass had already begun to grow
the driver's seat to pull up.
the dry season, wagons laden with goods could easily pass along it into
the dry, sandy, uncultivated veldt of South Africa, bullet wounds seldom
the duel he did not go to his bedroom but, as he often did, remained
the dull, moist veil of mist. Nicholas went out into the wet and muddy
the dupes of pretended patriots.... I have been too republican
the dusty road came priests in their vestments--one little old man
the dusty writing table, and, having laid the manuscripts before
the duty of the federal government to protect them. The delegates who
the dying leaps and shudders of a mortally wounded animal. Very
the early days before the opening of the Erie Canal.
the early decades of the eighteenth century both the Carolinas were
the earth, a man, a gun, a horse), from the sight of all these
the earth, its white light, and its long uplifted tail, shone the
the earth, taking its part in shaping their international relations.
the earth.
the earth. Behind it were seven hundred miles of hunger-stricken,
the easy path of giving away arable land and selling forest and mineral
the ecclesiastical point of view, and that her directors were making
the economist, is of little concern to the historian. The historical
the edentulous jaw and in the neck of the femur of a person advanced in
the edge of the forest where it reached out to Shamshevo, to have a
the edge of the forest.
the edges and floor of the ulcer, and its surface is often covered with
the edges drawn together, provision being made at the ends for further
the edges of the gap cannot be brought together with sutures, recourse
the edges of the wound, and securely fixed in position so that no
the edges of the wound.
the edges the epithelium has proliferated and is covering over the newly
the effect that no troops should be used to sustain the Republican
the effect those batteries produced.
the effort was premature.
the eighth cervical and first dorsal nerves.
the elbow dragged him to his company. The crowd of Russians and
the elbow or knee, and progressive flexion of the joint. The affected
the elbow, the brachial artery being accidentally punctured in
the elbow. At the lateral side of the median nerve, where it lies in
the elbow. There is, as a rule, no loss of sensibility, but complaint
the elderly lady, even betraying some impatience, she gave him an
the elders and Nicholas, who had also come to the table. "My God, my
the elders.
the eldest princess at the door asking whether she might come in.
the eldest princess, and moved with her to the side of the room
the election of national officers? (4) What shall be the qualifications
the election officers. As an alternative, the payment of taxes or the
the election, and they adopted a colonial device--the pre-election
the election. Men were dismissed from public and private places on
the elections of the nobility; but he considered himself entitled to
the electrical reactions are altered, the muscles degenerate, and
the embryo. It occurs also on the trunk in situations where the lateral
the embryo. The typical sarcoma consists chiefly of immature or
the employees, besides becoming stockholders, secured the right to elect
the employer and the employees immediately involved in it. When,
the employer had been guilty of some extraordinary negligence. Even in
the employers attended the conferences of the men to talk over matters
the end came. On the morning of November 11, the order to cease firing
the end of the "era of good feeling" inaugurated by the collapse of the
the end of the campaign, for he had seen at Smolensk the state in
the end of the decade left no remnant of the labor political parties.
the end of the eighteenth century there were a couple of dozen men
the end of the meal. He winked at the butler, whispered directions
the end of the second week.
the end of their term the next year they opened the door for North and
the endless cartloads he sold for the prince, nor a single shock of
the ends does not affect the degeneration of the distal segment. The
the ends of an accidentally divided tendon are at once brought into
the ends of long bones, and particularly from tuberculosis, syphilis,
the ends of the bone are thus brought about which can be recognised
the enemy could be heard from the hill. There was no one now between
the enemy in full strength at Borodino--defeated at Krasnoe and the
the enemy probably was, for something could be descried. On the
the enemy under the Emperor's command. Commanded by the Emperor
the enemy's fleet twice lets him slip past. When, intoxicated by the
the enemy's flight, these orderly masses returned thence as
the enemy's side (always followed by a ball flying past and striking
the enemy's. The ground to the right--along the course of the
the enemy--with which the Russians fought, the only consequence of
the enemy."
the enemy..."
the ensuing election, he carried all the free states except New Jersey.
the enterprise attacked by the British and French decrees. American
the enterprise for direction and the skilled labor were wanting. The
the entire American population on the eve of the Revolution.
the entire absence of joint lesions in others, would favour the view
the entire cotton output.
the entire country in the Far West. In the wake of the pathfinders went
the entire republic "in a state of military occupation." He proceeded to
the entire surface of the body is involved, even in a mild degree, the
the entrance of arterial blood into the dilated veins causes them to
the entrance to the dam raised his hand and opened his mouth to
the entrance, to serve as a table. On each side of the trench, the
the enucleation of the tumour, or the affected portion of bone is
the epidermis dies and can then be pared away. The unskilful paring of
the epiphysial cartilage from which they take origin, and constitute
the epiphysis is liable to be separated--_epiphysiolysis_. The
the equal of this strange, dear, clever man whom even my father
the equality nature ordains, creates an odious distinction between
the equipage. The woman screamed piercingly. Seeing Prince Andrew
the erosion proceeds uniformly, the cavity is spherical or oval; if it
the eruption of small-pox.
the escape of discharge from a focus of tubercle in a bone or a lymph
the essential constituents of a joint. The more important of these are
the essential significance of the presence of the Emperor and of all
the establishment of civil government under the "organic act" passed by
the estate of a Polish count in the Vilkavisski forest.
the evening and under the influence of wine--followed all that was
the evening of Anna Pavlovna's soiree. The matter was mentioned to the
the evening, brought him to Moscow by daybreak, and driven him back
the evening, however, as the wife's face grew more flushed and
the evening, when it may rise to 99 o F., and is at its lowest between
the evenings. She blushed continually and was irritable. It seemed
the event that was happening or coincided with it.
the events from 1914 to 1917.
the events that disturbed Washington. On the contrary it put forth many
the events then occuring lay in the national feeling which he
the events. His actions--without the smallest deviation--were all
the evidences of it come to me. The royal family by habit and tradition
the excellence of their judgment as well as the fullness of their
the excited, alien face of that man, his bayonet hanging down, holding
the exclusion or limitation of consequential damages, so the
the exclusion or limitation of consequential damages, so the
the executive authority of each State shall issue writs of election to
the executive branch should be chosen by the Congress but did not state
the executive to make provision for the support of the administration,
the exercise of appellate power, the king in council acting as a court
the exhausted fields and the clay hills of the Southern states came
the existing regulation of the suffrage? A regulation which, instead of
the experiment that he can act as he pleases. Every man, savage or
the exploration of waterways, the opening of trade, and even the
the expression of the will of someone endowed with power, but that
the expression of will in any action, our own or another's, the
the expulsion of American forces from New York and their retreat through
the expulsion of the French proved that the winning of a battle does
the extension of railways. It is easy to relate that there were 30,000
the extent of the disease, and the raw surfaces swabbed with 1 per cent.
the extent to which in their opinion these persons have promoted or
the external coat, which in the majority of cases constitutes the sac.
the external ear, accidentally separated from the body, if accurately
the external jugular vein, and receives lymph from the occipital and
the external world, however inaccessible it may be to us, however long
the external world, standing outside of time and independent of cause,
the exudate with its contained toxins removed by making an incision into
the eye of an enormous monster. Perhaps he was really sitting on a
the eyeball. There may be, in addition, congestion and oedema of the
the face of the majestic Emperor. Casually, while surveying the
the face there is a risk of lymphatic and of general pyogenic infection.
the face. Overgrowths in relation to the cutaneous nerves, especially
the face. There is also swelling over the gland, and eventually
the face; his eyes continually wandered from one object to another.
the faces of the other hospital patients, but it was not this that
the fact that General Ermolov, coming up to the crowd and learning
the fact that God, the government, and Carnegie help those who help
the fact that the old count suspected her and that her husband to whom
the fact that there are some respects in which men are obviously not
the fact that there is a diminution in the number of blood-plates, it
the fact that they found it very hot. Pierre, however, felt excited,
the facts and the historical accounts only arises because the
the fair at Vyazma every year and smilingly offer it to her,
the false charge that he had been a party to a "corrupt bargain" with
the false note in them. "Allow me to tell you, your excellency, that
the false path historical science has followed are due solely to the
the familiar weariness of his expression were still the same. He was
the family Natasha seemed livelier than usual, but she was far less
the family as a whole. Like a cat, she had attached herself not to the
the family felt some constraint in intercourse with Prince Andrew;
the family group broke up.
the family, but was kept all summer in Moscow by his new duties.
the family, the whole question resolves itself into not eating more
the family.
the famous man's personality.
the farmers need credit? Banks must be established close at hand to
the farmers of the Northwest, favored it from the beginning and pressed
the farmers, masters of the ax and plow, with their wives who shared
the farmers. Attempts to have the Supreme Court of the United States
the farther edge of the clearing. The seconds, measuring the paces,
the farther he left Moscow behind and the deeper he plunged into
the farther he went the more disorganized they were. The highroad on
the farther side of the river.
the fashion of the men of Hartford, Windsor, and Wethersfield in old
the fashion, but who for that very reason appear to be the warmest
the fate of battles had arrived. Would this disorderly crowd of
the favorite resource of party orators. The Democrats insisted that "the
the fear of death. It stood behind the door. But just when he was
the feather bed. Natasha began consoling her, but her face showed that
the federal Constitution providing for the popular election of Senators.
the federal Constitution, adopted in 1868, definitely put women aside by
the federal Supreme Court who, as governor of New York, had won a
the federal amendment. In 1916, for the first time, a leading
the federal government, was included in the long list.
the feeble voice of the commander in chief was heard. The regiment
the feebleness of age, "Bolkonski!" he whispered, pointing to the
the feelings of others, and had he at all understood what Pierre's
the feet near a fire. Attempts have been made to improve the peripheral
the felt boots approached the unseen bend of the staircase more
the femoral glands.
the femoral lymph glands. The operative treatment is influenced by the
the femoral vein, and sometimes within the femoral canal. They receive
the femur and the acetabulum are markedly altered in size and shape.
the ferocity to wound them with their sabers, as I have repeatedly
the fever he had suffered from in the hospital in Moscow, and as he
the field artillery should be placed.
the field of battle, who though still in some confusion were less
the field of industry calling for technical skill, it appears, from the
the fields), "there is no truth, all is false and evil; but in the
the fifteen, and therefore 4x = 15y. Consequently x/y = 15/4. This
the final discomfiture of King George and Lord North, it is necessary to
the final step. He felt ashamed; he felt that he was occupying someone
the finger and thumb.
the fingers are crippled and useless, exposure to the X-rays should be
the fire and pressed it there!"
the fire felt that she too must give expression to her feelings.
the fire, for Moscow had to burn as every village, factory, or house
the fire, was kneeling beside it stirring its contents with a ramrod.
the fire.
the firing produced the chief beauty of the spectacle.
the firing was, he began to look for the general and his staff where
the firm pressure of the lean sinewy hand, showed that the prince
the first Continental Congress and had fled to England when he saw its
the first army, a place, as Berg said, "very agreeable and well en
the first decades of the nineteenth century, books, articles, and
the first dentition, sometimes at the second dentition, and sometimes at
the first few months of life; after this they usually grow at the same
the first fortification but was driven back, for on emerging from
the first glance at Natasha's face, and wept on her shoulder with
the first immigrants were forced by circumstances to derive their
the first man--a mystery on which perhaps the fate of mankind depends.
the first moment of receiving the news of his son's intentions had
the first movement in the west--Paris--and subsides.
the first not only what had been said but also what Kutuzov would have
the first of you who moves forward." Little Nicholas turned to look at
the first person in this house; she's my best friend," cried the
the first place, it continued the prohibition on the issuance of notes
the first really immense American fortunes were made. Henry Adams, the
the first return of sensation averaged 65 days. According to Purves
the first second. "A baby? What baby...? Why is there a baby there? Or
the first stages with them had been captured by Cossacks, the other
the first thought of this filled her heart with gladness.
the first time in more than one hundred fifty years, a meeting of the
the first time permitting himself to kiss her hand.
the first time, that he may not make a mistake and fall into the
the first time.
the first to be called back to life from that realm of sorrow in which
the first to begin the explanation Sonya expected.
the first to regenerate after division.
the first transaction a loss.... We must have landless men for a manless
the first turn of the tourniquet must be rapidly and tightly applied to
the first violin:
the first year of the war to $1,153,000,000 in the last year, the
the fiscal measures of the government was redoubled. In the western
the fixation of the jaw sometimes associated with a wisdom-tooth
the fixed eyes and the pallor of the cheeks, the same expression was
the flag let it fall from his hands. It swayed and fell, but caught on
the flag?"--had been answered by the Supreme Court of the United States.
the flames of which could be seen in the failing twilight--and as if
the flap is assured of its blood supply, the piers of the bridge are
the fleches grew so dense that it covered the whole approach on that
the flesh, but for many years unvexed by political troubles or the
the flints, he was now afraid to speak out.
the floor of the ulcer are destroyed by the bacterial toxins, with the
the flowers. Only then did she remember how she must behave at a ball,
the fluid in the joint and injected into the subcutaneous cellular
the focus is not sufficiently limited to admit of this, the infected
the focus is often surrounded by tissues or fluids which have been
the following was written:
the following year, the government was given a drastic power over the
the font, and awaited the termination of the ceremony. He looked up
the foot; and injuries of such specially innervated parts as the testis,
the footprints left on the meadow by the mowers, then he counted his
the force bill.
the force of its own momentum now seemingly increased in inverse
the forceps at the end of an operation no further haemorrhage takes
the forearm or to abduct the arm, and in most cases to flex the forearm.
the forest two wagons loaded with cavalry saddles, which had stuck
the forest. Among the trees a man with long legs and long, swinging
the form of a fund to be applied to the education of Chinese students in
the form of an indurated papule, in every respect resembling the
the formalities necessary for a divorce, which would be explained to
the formation of granulation tissue comprising characteristic tissue
the formation of laminated clot, which gradually increases in amount
the formation of nodules or masses of cartilage--_ecchondroses_--which
the former founded a seminary at Troy, New York; and the latter made the
the former, but Anna Pavlovna--who was in the excited condition of a
the forthcoming battle from right to left--maintained their extended
the fortified camp at Drissa; the second army was retreating, trying
the forty-ninth parallel instead of "fifty-four forty," and give it
the foundation for that equality of intercourse, simplicity of manners,
the foundations of the union.
the four crystal glasses engraved with the count's monogram that stood
the fourth year, and of the third class at the expiration of the sixth
the free laborers of Europe; and under the slave system conflicts
the free white population nor the wealth of the North. There were,
the freedom of speech or of the press. Even many Federalists feared the
the friction of snow, or may resemble the creaking of new
the friends of that section came to its aid. To offset the magnet
the frieze gown stopped in front of the beautiful Armenian girl and
the front line and had unexpectedly to go into action. Rostov
the front line followed them across and the last Cossacks quitted
the front or from the back of the vessel. It may exert pressure on the
the front ranks carried it swaying to the very steps of the porch. The
the front row of the circle not far from the Rostovs. Baron Firhoff
the front, but at Durrenstein, where I was, our attack began after
the front. Dron on the contrary retired to the rear and the crowd drew
the front. I held my sword in my left hand, Count. All our family--the
the frontal and parietal eminences are unduly prominent. There is
the frontal bone, sternum, tibiae, and ulnae, and localised tenderness on
the frontier agriculturalist who had to be near a market before he could
the frontier. The discovery of gold in the Black Hills, however, marked
the frontiers of France) talked in Vienna and by these conversations
the fruits of his own labor, did the colony prosper. In Plymouth, where
the functional results are usually better than those following upon
the funeral. With drooping eyes and frequent blushes she told him
the further absorption of toxins can be prevented. In many cases this
the future Countess Bezukhova. But you will understand that I have
the future by amendments duly adopted even in case it did not approve
the future. In the neighboring state of Virginia, Madison led a movement
the ganglion cells of the solar plexus; (5) oedema and degeneration of
the gap is filled by fibrous tissue, but towards the periphery of the
the gasping men.
the gate and by Morel, who came to say that some Wurttemberg hussars
the gates and began pitching their camp in the Senate Square. Out of
the gauze, there is applied a thick layer of cotton wool, and the whole
the general condition of the patient improves after the injection, it
the general put before him for signature a paper relating to the
the general settlement at Paris in 1919, our government, while
the general smile that usually brightened her face. Pierre knew that
the general symptoms become manifest.
the general texture is finely porous, there may be areas as dense as
the general, in Russian, speaking with the French intonation he
the general, turning to an artillery officer. "Have a little fun to
the generals and statesmen of the day. The old prince seemed convinced
the generals criticizing the position of the troops behind the hill,
the generals in the crowded hut, feeling embarrassed as he always
the generals to pass the three officers quite easily, but Zherkov,
the generals was reporting to him where the guns and prisoners had
the generals who drove past was an acquaintance of the Rostovs', and
the genitals, and other parts which are constantly moist. It is
the genius Napoleon and, suddenly recognizing him as a brigand, sent
the genius--of Murat.
the gentlefolk rode up to him at a footpace; the hounds that were
the gentlemen of the Tsar's suite by his poor French.
the girl, with the same artificial smile, and the princess found
the gist of the business was evaded. He recalled his labors on the
the gist of the matter lay in that.
the gland and infects the cellular tissue. The cervical fascia is
the glands may be looked upon as an important line of defence, retarding
the glands of mucous membranes and skin. The epithelial cells are not
the glands, where they give rise to disease.
the glasses, and stood with their muddy boots on the satin-covered
the gloom, but a dark sea swelling and gradually subsiding after a
the gloomy thoughts that oppressed Sonya. She was glad to find
the gonorrhoeal nature of the discharge must be established by
the government as a machinery of corruption and personal influence."
the government at Washington was put to the test. For some time it had
the government of Germany." Yet the challenge came. Between February 26
the government of the United States. Along with the agitation of opinion
the government of the others, and to that one, too, which is unelected
the government offices were removed, this was only done on the
the government should "scale the debt" by redeeming, not at full value
the government. This class included now Irish who revolted against
the government: chemists, engineers, architects, nurses, surgeons,
the governors did not give up the case as hopeless. Instead they evolved
the grace of God sanctifying me. And tears came into my eyes, and I
the gradual reduction of the duties until by 1842 they would reach the
the graft and the success of the transplantation. Macewen maintains that
the grain she wished to give. She was glad such cares presented
the grandson of the Great Catherine! As you know, I am quite
the granulation tissue by which they are surrounded large multinuclear
the granulations share in the oedema, and there is an abundant serous
the grave breach of diplomatic courtesy committed by breaking open
the gravest of crimes."
the great American republic. In the third place, they believed that
the great Revolution raised questionings about the status of women. The
the great increase in the size of one of the long bones and its uneven
the great iron centers of the world. Virginia began iron working in the
the great majority who act from disinterested and patriotic impulses.
the great toe (Fig. 107). It raises the nail and may be accompanied by
the great toe undergoes changes characteristic of arthritis deformans.
the great toe, the femoral and inguinal glands become enlarged in
the great tuberosity, just external to the inter-tubercular (bicipital)
the greater part of the enemy's opened out from this battery. Just
the groin from epithelioma of the penis, scrotum, or vulva. In cancer of
the groin where there already exists a considerable degree of
the groin, the diagnosis of primary syphilis is not difficult. Owing,
the ground as fast as the horses could draw it, but for a long time
the ground slip away from under his feet, so that he positively did
the ground that the House did not share in the treaty-making power.
the ground was more open and level than elsewhere. It was evident to
the ground with his hand, and bowed his white head with a deep sigh.
the ground). Let us assume that this program was possible and had then
the ground--she grabbed at some biscuits but her hand did not reach
the ground. At the same instant he was dazzled by a great flash of
the growling of a bear, and general commotion. Some eight or nine
the growth in the power of the popular legislative assembly. Each
the growth of mill towns. The labor of women was transferred from the
the growth of what they called "a money power" and planters in all
the guard of honor, a fine set of Grenadiers mostly wearing
the guest of honor and hero of the Austrian campaign, Prince
the guests to approach her after the old prince had gone out and
the guests. "The vicomte is a wonderful raconteur," said she to
the guiltlessness of Dolokhov, who had no reason to preserve the honor
the gummatous lesions and the fibrosis of tertiary syphilis are directly
the gummatous tissue is first exposed by the destruction of the skin or
the guns round. Prince Andrew and the battalion were already within
the guns, and the bridge is taken! But what is best of all," he went
the habit of passions, and in place of an intellect (grouping events
the habits of the military? The aim of war is murder; the methods of
the haemorrhage is controlled by an elastic tourniquet applied
the hair; they tend to pass off spontaneously; and they disappear
the hand of his betrothed in silence, looking at her beautiful bosom
the hand. This clinical point is best tested by placing the palm of the
the hands of Southern commanders in the West, and the way prepared for
the hands of the French. The Russians retreat and abandon their
the hands of the French. The adjutant asked whether Napoleon wished
the hands of the working people, where it properly belongs,"
the hands of those who had originally subscribed their funds to the
the happiest, merriest times for him and the whole family. Nicholas
the happy conquerors were masters in it and were patronizing him.
the happy faces of the lovers. "That's happiness!"
the harbor of New York and impressed a seaman alleged to be an American
the hazards of the new world. Soldiers were required for defense and
the head and leg by bullets. Around him, eagerly listening to his
the head of the Kursk regiment at Schon Grabern--and he would have
the head of the bone is readily shown in a skiagram.
the head of the coming movement and bear the responsibility for all
the healthy urinary tract without doing any damage, but if the pelvis of
the hearts and minds of those who heard him speak or read his printed
the hearts of her sons!' Isn't it so, Papa?" said he.
the heavy hand of the government fell upon the leaders; but the spirit
the heavy tread of the soldiers who were keeping step with him. He
the heel without pain. The injury is of little importance, and if the
the hero in this scene. Great herds of cattle were bred in Texas; with
the hidden, kindly sides of her character.
the high body of a coach standing before the porch, the small glow
the high price offered them, but burned it instead.
the highest axillary glands. They are frequently infected in cancer of
the highest degree the faculty of divining the needs and instincts
the highest instructions--here..." and he handed a paper to
the highest of all privileges."
the highest point of exactitude. He always came to table under
the highest spheres did all these schemes, crossings, and
the highest, we see a law by which men, to take associated action,
the highroad.
the highways. Atlanta, the city to which Sherman applied the torch, lay
the hill (one shattered gun and one unicorn were left behind),
the hill could have made so gross and palpable a blunder.
the hill one after the other. Their colonel, Karl Bogdanich
the hill preceded by its singers. Coming up toward him was a train
the hill. The fog that was dispersing on the hill lay still more
the hills, and the narrow valleys conspired to keep the farms within a
the hindmost of these men wearing similar shakos was a Russian hussar.
the hip, the knee being maintained in the extended position. These
the hip-joint, with which it communicates, and upwards, projecting
the historians reach the conclusion that this maneuver was a
the historians was good and beneficent? Their activity would not
the historians' usual expedient when anything does not fit their
the historical accounts a whole series of innumerable, diverse, and
the histories of culture, to which all general histories tend more and
the history books say he did) the position of the Russians from Utitsa
the history of the life of the peoples.
the holiday so noticeable as in Marya Dmitrievna's broad, stern
the homes and farms that stand in the names of the actual occupants have
the homes of rich and poor alike, if spared the torch, had been
the honor of the flag... Well, never mind, it's true I'm to blame,
the honor to choose me to be their marshal; it was all I could do to
the honored guests sat, everyone seemed to be in high spirits and
the hood. "Foo! You are cold! Now take off your things, quick!" she
the horizon of the twentieth century lie consequences as yet undreamed
the horse of the hussar near him pricked their ears at these shouts.
the horses near by, could be heard low voices which seemed to be
the horses of a convoy wagon became restive at the end of the
the horses were already galloping. Rostov heard the thud of their
the horses were harnessed. They were both pale, and the superintendent
the horses, and often became unreasonably angry with his servant and
the hounds, but changed to the cry of ulyulyu, and above the others
the hour of their distress. They openly declared that their rights did
the house and along the path that led to the back porch. He knew Sonya
the house and of those who came to see them was glad to see only one
the house, beyond the gates, a group of undertakers, who hid
the house? Why carry you off as if you were some gypsy singing
the houses in Povarskaya Street. Natasha was evidently pleased to be
the howitzers of Dessaix's and Friant's divisions, will move
the howitzers of the Guard's artillery against either one or other
the huge family coach in which she had traveled to Voronezh, a
the human mind can discern. The higher the human intellect rises in
the human subject. This capacity depends upon two sets of factors--(1)
the humerus, inclines downwards and outwards. When the patient is asked
the humerus. In miners, who work for long periods lying on the side, the
the humiliation of England. But these justifications have a very
the humiliation suffered in the burning of the Capitol by the British.
the hunt, now doubled, moved on.
the hunt, sent a pack of hounds and huntsmen on ahead to find the
the huntsmen approached, receded, and rose, he realized what was
the hurrahs of Charleston, folded up her flag and came into the union.
the husband infecting the wife, the possibility of his conveying the
the hussar beside him.
the hussar shouted back.
the hussar who had the prisoner, rode to the left across a ravine to
the hussars did not understand what was said to them in French.
the hussars formed line for roll call, kept things in order, groomed
the hussars.
the hut he again regained consciousness, and while drinking tea once
the hypertonus and spasms are localised to the muscles in the vicinity
the hypodermic injection of emetin hydrochloride in  1/2-grain doses.
the hypothetical welfare of other people.
the ice-covered water and did not, surrender.
the ice. Crowds of soldiers from the dam began running onto the frozen
the icon stand, a young lad with a long nose and long hair, wearing
the icon. They, those strange men he had not previously known, stood
the idea of leaving the quiet country could ever enter his head. It
the idea often occurred to me: 'This is fate.' Especially if you
the idea that terrible things might happen in the Mississippi Valley.
the idea.
the idea. She consulted a Russian priest as to the possibility of
the ideas that prevailed among Southern leaders. First of all, they
the ill effects last longer. Women, on the whole, stand loss of blood
the imaginations of a dozen people. It could not exist because it
the immigrants. They came with a rush. Young New Englanders, weary of
the impatience to do what they had been assembled for, which usually
the imperial headquarters staff. In attendance on him was the head
the important order entrusted to him. It was already past eight
the importation by placing a duty of $5 on each slave. This effort was
the impress of these arguments.
the impression "Marie" produced on the visitors. And she saw
the impression his news of a victory would create, or recalling the
the impression made by the young lad.
the impressions he had become accustomed to during the last few months
the inauguration of Washington to the election of Lincoln the sectional
the incessant crackling of the flames talking and shouting could be
the income from them. Julie saw Boris' indecision, and sometimes the
the increase of power to this nation--the asylum of the oppressed of all
the independent existence of Prussia.
the individual coats, however, being thinner. The inner coat is less
the individual tissues and organs, as they vary widely according to the
the individual tissues carrying the process to the furthest degree of
the induration under treatment, make it very likely that the lesion is
the industrial centers, starving from unemployment, begged for relief.
the industrial centers. There they crowded--nay, overcrowded--into
the infantry sank ankle-deep in that soft, choking, hot dust that
the infantry, and having reached the village of Gruntersdorf they
the infected tissues.
the infection, as they have become less frequent and less severe since
the infection.
the infiltration may be so superficial that it resembles a layer of
the inflamed tissues, and applying a suction bell. When the exudate has
the inflammatory reaction depend for the most part upon the transudation
the inflammatory reaction, and the protective action of the leucocytosis
the influence of extended suffrage in the disposition of public
the influence of the fright the Cossacks had given him he at once
the inguinal glands in gonorrhoea and soft sore; and in the cervical
the inhabitants of a territory, by "unfriendly legislation," might make
the inhabitants were Dissenters. Against the protests of the Catholics
the inhabitants. The woolen industry was largely in the hands of women
the initial haemorrhage is rapidly fatal, as for example when the
the injection may be repeated in twenty-four hours. Drainage by tube or
the injection may be repeated. The strength of the alcohol should be 85
the injection of alcohol into the semilunar ganglion.
the injection of an irritant acid secretion, the exact nature of which
the injury, from gradual stretching of the fibrous cicatrix by which the
the injury, the presumption is that the occlusion was due to pressure
the inner layers of which are undergoing caseation and disintegration,
the inner struggle to conquer that fear, all his dreams of
the innervation of the blood vessels, but they are also capable of
the innocent chondroma and the malignant chondro-sarcoma are met with.
the innovations, turned to him expecting his sympathy in their
the insignificance of that supposed power, turns away from it, and
the instant when it seemed that the incomprehensible was revealing
the institution. In the course of a few years there appeared
the instrument employed. It is most intense in regions where the skin is
the instrument itself; even if it is a compact among all the states the
the instrument; (2) different forms of aneurysm may result from the
the insufficient components, another unexplained force affecting the
the insulating elements are thus lost. The degeneration in the central
the integument, there is always more or less bruising of the parts
the intellectual lights of Petersburg were gathered there and, like
the intercostal nerves, and is excited by movement of the chest, as in
the interest he took in, other people. The difference, and sometimes
the interests of the whole empire or grants of lands by a colonial
the interior of individual glands, and some time may elapse before the
the interosseous membrane, or better still, through the pronator
the interpreter was speaking Russian, did not understand what was
the intervals between the applications of the bell the part is covered
the intervening stroma is abundant and composed of dense fibrous tissue,
the intestine. The symptoms of collapse are aggravated if toxin
the intimate connection of the deep fascia with the periosteum over the
the intra-dermal injection. It is said to be most efficacious in the
the introduction of protective substances obtained from an animal which
the investing peritoneum.
the iodides of sodium and potassium. On account of their depressing
the iris is discoloured and reacts sluggishly to light, and there is a
the iron regime of Frederick the Great, came over from Prussia, joined
the irrigated districts were valued at approximately $100,000,000.
the islands.
the issuance of paper money, lotteries, the floating of loans,
the issue was withdrawn from diplomacy and placed in charge of Congress.
the issues of the day. Never had such crowds been seen at political
the isthmus was then a part of Colombia, President Roosevelt proceeded
the joint becoming more and more restricted and painful. There is
the joint by the blood-stream, but the destructive changes tend to be
the joint contains pus. This is observed chiefly in chronic disease of
the joint interval having been filled up. The minor changes are best
the joint is kept rigid for long periods, secondary contracture may
the joint, or of impairment of function--usually an inability to extend
the joint--very often the knee--becomes filled with a serous or
the joint.
the joint. Eburnation of the articular surfaces is shown by increase in
the joint. The joint lesions may be the only evidence of metastasis, or
the joints are involved. In its early stages the disease is amenable to
the joints of the fingers the disease is remarkably symmetrical, and
the journey itself, forgetting its object. But as she approached
the joy. One is always, always anxious! Especially just at this age,
the joys and vexations he derived from that world, to her so remote
the judgment of battle. Federal control over the affairs of states,
the judgment of history is that it was a case of the biter bitten. They
the juniper oil is then removed by ether and alcohol, and the gut
the kidney lose their vitality quickly after death and are therefore
the kidney, liver, or brain, usually result from organisms carried in
the kidney, the ureter, or the bladder is the seat of stone, they give
the kind had happened to her she was regarded in that light, and had
the king and carried on its operations under his supervision and
the king of England claimed all revenues collected in this form from the
the king of Spain in his troubles at home, thus preparing the way for
the king of support at all hazards in suppressing the rebellion and by
the knee in cases of long-standing hydrops. It was suggested by Morrant
the knee the ganglion is usually multilocular, and consists of a
the knee, to find even the popliteal artery plugged by a clot. This
the knee-joint of middle-aged adults, especially women. They are usually
the knee-joint, this should be closed with sutures.
the knee. A bullet, no doubt. I congratulate you, Count, on your
the knee; but there is considerable risk of gangrene recurring in the
the knife or scissors, cutting until the tissue bleeds freely, after
the knoll where he had spent over an hour, and of that family circle
the knuckles, then the next knuckle, whispering, "January, February,
the ladies' toilets and the gold and silver of the men's epaulets;
the lady looked round and, meeting the count's eyes, nodded to him and
the lady would get on together. The husband, however, did not seem
the lamp inside was a human skull with its cavities and teeth. After
the lances and the unfolded standards fluttered against their
the land if they are set free? It is easy to write laws, but difficult
the land of any person dying intestate--that is, without any will
the land was nearly all held in great estates, each owned by a single
the land with fire and sword. By a proclamation of November 6, 1895, he
the land. "By degrees it was seen that even the Lord's people could not
the land; and the judges in every State shall be bound thereby, anything
the landless banker or merchant could not. It is not surprising,
the landowner's house he had visited the night before with Dolokhov.
the lapse of twenty years, and that any import tax should not exceed $10
the large drawing room. Prince Vasili came up to Pierre with languid
the larger joints there is "lipping" of the articular margins,
the larger vessels. The divided vessel having been caught with forceps
the largest landowner of the province. Temptations to Pierre's
the last and next balls, about theatricals, and who would meet whom,
the last battle, as though all were in a conspiracy of silence. The
the last days of her girlhood, but I know what she is like every
the last days of his administration, Mr. Taft felt compelled to issue a
the last days of their retreat, of Karataev's illness and his death.
the last dryly spoken words: "I will detain you no longer, General;
the last few days many of the men have been seen to throw away their
the last five years, was in Moscow, but proved to be quite alien to
the last time with his mattock. In historic events the so-called great
the last time, but only on condition that he went to Moscow as
the last to regenerate.
the last to unite. In the upper limb the more active epiphyses are at
the late count--the kingdom of heaven be his!--and we have lived under
the lateral margins of the flap are raised sufficiently to enable them
the latest fashion. But in spite of that she seemed to be
the latest posterity." Diplomacy as well as martial valor had its
the latest war news, and when the ten minutes required by propriety
the lathe, and, approaching the table, summoned his daughter. He never
the latissimus dorsi or the sacrospinalis (erector spinae); the
the latter came in late that night. "I did not expect this! I did
the latter looked in after supper, he pretended to be asleep, and
the latter ran back again with his men.
the latter's good-natured naivete was so boundless that sometimes even
the latter) in silence. He finished a couple of bottles of wine by
the law courts are closed; things have to be put in order, and we will
the law from the statute book. The anger of the silver faction knew no
the law had been systematically evaded. In 1882 Congress made another
the law of primogeniture.
the laws of inevitability to which it is subject (from the fact that
the laws of statistics, geography, political economy, comparative
the laws of your country in addition to the terms of this agreement
the laws of your country in addition to the terms of this agreement
the lead of Mikulicz, a considerable number of permanent cures have been
the leadership of Northern capitalists, and new through service opened
the leading loyalists were prominent officials of the old order,
the leaf, gave it to Kozlovski, stepped quickly to the window, and
the least discomfort--a significant fact in diagnosis. The cavity is
the least hesitation. He never felt any hesitation in dealing with the
the least prudence, to follow their mercantile employments and not
the ledger must be recorded many a cruel and bloody conflict as the
the leech is slow to bite, may be smeared with cream. The leech is
the left flank. The sagacious Barclay de Tolly, seeing crowds of
the left from that village, amid the smoke, was something resembling a
the left the ground was more level; there were fields of grain, and
the left! Wait a bit." But the soldiers, crowded together shoulder
the left, which will have forty guns in all directed against it.
the left-flank columns had already descended.
the leg often leads to changes in the underlying bones. The periosteum
the legal basis of the general European settlement.
the legal heir to everything and you won't get anything. You must
the legal tender notes as they came into the Treasury in payment of
the legal tenders. The beginnings were disappointing; but two years
the legislature and was likely to choose those who favored his claims.
the legislature took advantage of the opportunity to make terms in the
the length and breadth of the land. The power of the government was also
the length of limb than do those at the hip or ankle, and they are also
the lesion assumes the characters of a purulent arthritis, which, from
the lesions produced being like those of severe burns. The resulting
the less dangerous she became to men, and the more freely they could
the lessons he had had in life, allowed himself to believe in the
the letter away, and leaning his elbows on the table he drew toward
the letter to her father. The next day the old prince said to her
the letter.
the letter.
the letters of John Hay, Secretary of State. In August of 1898 he had
the level of section enlarge and their inter-communication becomes more
the lid, drew out a drawer, and took out an exercise book filled
the life of the peoples.
the life of the peoples. And the history of the Godfreys and the
the life of the settlers until they could gather harvests of their own.
the life she preferred? What did it matter to anybody, and
the ligament, the patient is unable to extend the limb completely, the
the ligaments that have been overstretched. In cases in which there has
the light that falls on the things about him--we see that each of
the lights of shops, houses, and street lamps, fine carriages, and all
the limb can be saved. In examining the limb, attention should first be
the limb extends as high as the middle or upper third of the thigh. When
the limb in the "sling position," and resists movements in the direction
the limb is firmly bandaged from below upwards, and kept in an elevated
the limb is reduced to a minimum. With the limb still elevated the
the limb may not be used for any purpose; physiological rest may be
the limb, it may be insufficient for its adequate nourishment; it may be
the limb. If, when the patient first comes under observation, the limb
the line between public and private interest. Land was given outright to
the line of an artery of a globular swelling, which pulsates. The
the line of carriages, the Rostovs' carriage drove up to the
the line of the natural creases of the skin. In exposing the glands the
the line that had so sharply divided the two armies?" he asked himself
the lint the young ladies prepared and that never reached the wounded,
the lip or mouth; or the pre-auricular gland in chancre of the eyelid or
the lip, and of the tongue. The part played by injury is doubtful. It
the lips are affected, the mouth may be distorted or seriously
the lips.
the little children failed to understand this and avoided her.
the little man with a condescending and good-natured smile. "Les
the little princess with a pleased smile, as to an intimate
the little princess' face, an expression of childish fear of
the liver, and they are rarely symmetrical. They are usually aggressive
the lives of individuals, it too, setting aside the conception of
the lives of the peasantry of those parts the mysterious undercurrents
the loathsome creature in disgust." Sydney Smith, editor of the
the local constabulary under American authority. In taking this action,
the local features of malignant disease, and in a gland removed for
the lodge room to betray his fellows," as the Knights put it. In form
the log cabins of the frontier; she traveled in stagecoaches, canal
the long bones (Fig. 52). From the fact that it projects from the
the long bones, its favourite site being the upper end of the tibia.
the long bones; the pain may be so severe as to prevent sleep and to
the long flexor and the short abductor of the thumb; the paralysis of
the long table laid for twenty persons, at which the whole household
the long tendon of origin. There is pain and tenderness in front of the
the looking glass.
the lookout with both'?" asked Pierre.
the looting and re-establish discipline.
the loss of Philadelphia, the defeat at Germantown, and the retirement
the loss of chyle may be of little moment, as the discharge usually
the lower and higher beings, in this vast harmonious multitude of
the lower cervical and upper thoracic segments. Except that the joint
the lower end of the humerus, in fractures of both bones of the forearm,
the lower end of the radius and lower end of the tibia, and at the
the lower extremity. In hallux valgus, the metatarso-phalangeal joint of
the lower house. Four devices were finally selected to accomplish this
the lower limbs and spine, the arms appear unnaturally long; the head
the lower than in the upper limb, because, from the functional point of
the lower to the upper lip, from one labium majus to the other, from the
the lumen of a tubular organ, such as the appendix or the Fallopian tube
the lumen without causing rupture of its coats. It often happens,
the lumen; outside of this a layer of delicate connective tissue; and
the lunatic asylum..." All night long such announcements were
the lungs, spleen, liver, kidneys, pleura, brain, synovial membranes, or
the lymph glands, the chief seats of secondary growths are the liver,
the lymph plexuses that ramify in the deep fascia, a method of spread
the lymph to a healthy region above, and thus enable it to enter the
the lymphoid tissue throughout the body; (6) cloudy swelling of the
the macerated bone "the surface is covered with irregular,
the machine cannot conceive that the small connecting cogwheel which
the maid of honor's hand to his lips, kissed it, and swung it to and
the maids.
the main Russian forces were concentrated. Twice they had attempted to
the main nerves of the part are "blocked" by injection of a local
the main supply. "By 1770, tide-water Virginia was full to overflowing
the main trunks of the maxillary and mandibular divisions, should be
the maintenance of law and order, and for the establishment of good
the major-domo made a significant and stern gesture to them both to go
the majority of viper or adder bites the constitutional disturbance is
the makers of Kentucky's first constitution swept aside the landed
the man in relation to everything coexisting with him. This is what
the man she loved or been cruelly deceived by him. Though nothing of
the man was indeed a liberal, but of views quite different from his
the man with a grievance, they attempted to settle the matter with the
the man.
the mandible, and remain confined to it, the gland reaching the size of
the manifestations of the secondary stage, and histologically there is
the marauder? Pierre answered that he "was protecting a woman," and
the march and in camp, he endeared himself to his men by sharing their
the march began. The artillery and baggage wagons moved noiselessly
the march, rode to his father's estate where he had been born and
the march. Cossacks, foot and horse soldiers, wagons, caissons, and
the march: in their greatcoats, and packs, and without any preparation
the margin of the latter it becomes continuous with the capsule of the
the margins and partly from the remains of skin glands which have not
the margins of the blue area become of a violet hue, and as time goes on
the margins of the tongue and on the tonsils. In the absence of mucous
the marriage was to be postponed for a year. "But why a year? Why a
the marriage. When the count was already leaving the room, Princess
the marrow in osteomyelitis fibrosa.
the marrow of long bones, and of again becoming active and causing a
the marrow of one of the adjacent bones, and the relative frequency of
the marrow, or the epiphysial cartilage.
the marshal to the least soldier, that place was not the Vozdvizhenka,
the marshals. His eye fell on Pierre's large and striking figure,
the martial spirit of Jackson, he slipped more easily into the social
the masses to riot?
the master builders of America an advantage over those of the mother
the master who made it. To know Him is hard.... For ages, from our
the matrix of the articular cartilage, it may be in streaks or patches
the matter depended on my personal wishes, the will of His Majesty the
the matter to the count. Pity these wounded men as one might, it was
the matter up with the ambassador, this time with even more firmness; he
the matter with him and remembered being wounded and how was when he
the matter with you? You must be ill to shiver like that," he added,
the maxim of the sovereignty of the people with the divine right,
the mazurka at the Arkharovs' ball, talked about the war with Field
the meaning of all... one must harness... my wife is getting
the meaning of her excited, resolute, unnatural look the day before
the meaning of the situation and set off to the court at Versailles with
the meaning of the words and made no kind of deduction from or
the meaning of this bombardment.
the means by which we can assist our Fatherland! I imagine," he went
the means were at hand in town meetings, provincial legislatures, and
the measures the government has adopted to re-establish order and
the media, fails to take place, and bleeding goes on into the
the medial epi-condyle, and other and smaller glands may lie along the
the medial side of the knee, the angle of the scapula, and the heel.
the medial side of the popliteal space. It is flaccid in the flexed, and
the medullary canal of the femur or in the diploe of the skull occurring
the medullary spaces being occupied by sarcomatous cells in place of
the melancholy mood of the hostess, and then amused himself with
the member of the Hofkriegsrath mildly and attentively.
the membrane is becoming separated and thrown off. This is best done
the membrane. Or it may take place in the central area, by the
the membranes of the brain. The _chordoma_ is a rare form of tumour
the men and to set them an example, walked about among the ranks,
the men and women had separated as in church. All were silently
the men had no boots--was so simple, while what they proposed was so
the men of long service and conservative minds. In 1910, the insurgents
the men should be in their greatcoats and in marching order, and
the men who, as is always the case, hesitated about lifting the
the men with great precision and formality.
the merchants before tears gushed from his eyes and he concluded in
the merchants in the lead, who chafed at the restraints imposed on their
the merit of the virtuous act, or the freedom of the apparently
the middle border. Beyond the Rockies, California, Oregon, and Nevada
the middle of a field without rhyme or reason. It's all those damned
the middle of his talk and gazing intently with his laughing, kindly
the middle of the drawing room on the first chair he had come
the middle of the night three soldiers, having brought some
the middle of the stream, and the Uhlans caught hold of one another as
the middle third of the thigh, the patient dying before the spread can
the midst of the momentary silence that ensued, "Count! One God is
the midst of the service the voices of the priests suddenly ceased,
the mighty. His lawful cabinet of advisers, filling all of the high
the mild rule of proprietors until it became a state in the American
the milder course. The President, learning of this refusal, called the
the mileage of all the Southern states in 1860 did not equal that of
the military. The chief attraction of military service has consisted
the mines and operate them until the strike could be settled. He then
the mines, and settle upon Western lands. In a word the Republicans
the minister's son was, with his rosy cheeks and dark eyebrows, and
the mirror her eyes full of tears and her mouth quivering, ready to
the mist, and his cold face wore that special look of confident,
the mist-enveloped hollow near Borodino, so along the entire line
the mist. From information he had received the evening before, from
the mob I gave them a victim and at the same time punished a
the modern history of Europe, though to the chroniclers of the
the mole, who often made him feel confused by her smiles and her own
the moment he entered. She did not smile or nod, but only gazed
the moment of conception. If a series of children, one after the other,
the moment of making the effort to lift those legs up and turn over on
the moment when the first report was heard a fourth was seen. Then two
the money for? As if that money could add a hair's breadth to
the money," and he threw the purse to him and ran out of the inn.
the mood in which he had just been speaking. She thought he was
the moral beauty of what he was told clear to himself. Karataev had no
the more Alpatych felt that this unreasonable action might produce
the more advantageous. Whether it was right or wrong to remarry
the more convinced that it was necessary.
the more heated became the disputes, culminating in shouts and
the more of them we find; and each separate cause or whole series of
the more prolonged action of any form of intense heat. Large, black, dry
the more uneasy grew the countess. She began to think she would
the morning of the twenty-fifth without a position for our left flank,
the morning. Additional support is given to the veins if the bandage is
the morning. In this letter she said briefly that all their
the morocco cushion at which Princess Mary was looking. The flow of
the most beautiful of them all, our Marya Antonovna! And how simply
the most important personages of the town. This was Malvintseva,
the most important point of the battle.
the most important variety. The outstanding feature is the existence in
the most intimate friend of the Bezukhov household since Helene's
the most likely sources of wound infection is the hands of the surgeon
the most melancholy law of necessity, but considered themselves heroes
the most part by any rival learning.... As a mere literary monument, the
the most part confined to the ossifying junctions, especially those
the most part they sat quietly in their places and were silent, or, if
the most part to be spoken at a moment of victory and triumph,
the most prominent. The first of these societies appeared in Tennessee
the most rapid method of removing the disease. The social status of the
the most typical clinical pictures of this condition. The onset is
the mother becomes attenuated. Eventually a child is carried to full
the mother has been infected.
the mother. "Ah, my dear, I can't tell you how fond I have grown of
the motion both of Achilles and of the tortoise was continuous.
the mouth of her Suez." On the mainland American power was strengthened
the mouth or throat, and by the characteristic, stone-like induration of
the mouth over a period of several weeks.
the mouths of those around him is not at once represented as a great
the movement of the engine.
the movement of those waves will be the only perceptible motion.
the mud. The esaul gave some orders to his men. Petya held his horse
the multitudinous activities of American business energy or to appraise
the murder of the Duc d'Enghien. The vicomte said that the Duc
the murderers, even more dreadful because of their disquiet. And he
the murmur on another. This reading, as was always the case at Anna
the muscle is taking place (active muscle-sensation). The fibres of this
the muscle is thrown into contraction. If untreated, a hard, fibrous
the muscle; the surrounding tissues are indurated, and central caseation
the muscles of the leg are paralysed; if the section is in the upper
the muskets of the nearest soldiers. The soldiers started firing
the muster call. But the roll of the drums did not make the looting
the muzzle the pellets begin to disperse so that there are separate
the mysterious gorges, and the pine forests veiled in the mist of
the nail or of the matrix beneath it. The commonest form of onychia has
the nail--which corresponds to the stratum corneum--raising it from its
the nail-fold; the infection spreads slowly beneath the fold until it
the name _ganglionic neuroma_ is applied. These tumours are rare, and
the name days and birthdays of the hosts, as many as a hundred
the name his fancy gave to the farthest gun of the battery, which
the name of King George. Their confidence was soon strengthened by the
the name of the Court replied: "The present assault upon capital is but
the name of the disease suggests.
the name of the entire Court the doctrine that the judges have the power
the names of its candidates. On election day, these papers were handed
the narrow margin of 187 votes to 168. In the spring came the news that
the nasal bones, so that when the child grows up there results a
the nasal mucous membrane may become involved. The disease often runs a
the nation as a great collection of individuals, companies, and labor
the nation the attention which its importance warranted.
the nation's life consists.
the national capital and emancipated from local interests and
the national convention. Several members of the House of
the national forces liable to military duty all able-bodied male
the national forest available for agriculture were opened to settlers.
the national government and its economic measures, or it must declare,
the national government. Statesmen like Calhoun denounced it; poets like
the national war. And only that feeling placed him on that highest
the nations of the earth in the opening of that empire to the trade of
the native government, the abolition of the primitive monarchy, and the
the nature of burns. In old people with enfeebled circulation mere
the nature of degeneration cysts arising in the capsule of joints, in
the nature of the "trust," which was to play such an unique role in the
the nature of which is unknown; they sometimes occur in an epidemic form
the navigable rivers to trade with local merchants who had for exchange
the navy necessary to resist any invasion of American trade. Moreover,
the nearest anatomical group of glands should be removed with the tumour
the nearest commander, contrary to Napoleon's instructions, moved them
the nearest lymph glands, and they may themselves become the seat of
the nearest lymph glands. These correspond to the inflamed vessels, and
the necessary resistance. The common carotid, for example, is pressed
the necessity of frequently changing the application. The addition of a
the necessity of submitting, for a time, to this new order of things
the neck, she kissed her on the throat. In her behavior to her
the need for protecting the rights of freedmen against hostile
the nerve as a result of prolonged acute flexion of the knee in certain
the nerve at the elbow, or even at the axilla, does not increase the
the nerve filaments of the underlying skin. Granulations spring up to
the nerve injury is due, not to pressure on or laceration of the nerves
the nerve sheaths, with haemorrhage, but in severe cases partial or
the nerve, and appears to be due to the cutting off of the fibres from
the nerve, and the nerve may also be involved as a result of disease in
the nerve-supply of the superficial tissues predisposes to ulceration.
the nerve.
the nerves with antitoxin and so preventing the passage of toxins
the neurolemma or sheath of Schwann. Between the neurolemma and the axis
the neurolemma. The axis cylinder is the essential conducting structure
the new President calmly assured the planters that "the general
the new church he had built, and then receive visitors who would
the new commander in chief. Two orderlies, a courier and a major-domo,
the new dresses everyone put on, there were no special festivities,
the new guard--both officers and men--he was not as interesting as
the new histories of the culture of that period.
the new laws. "We have the power to tax them," said one of the ministry,
the new nation in the process of making. When the first Continental
the new national government by making all public creditors, men of
the new order of things.
the new order. On his arrival at Charleston, he was greeted with fervor
the new organization was simple. It sought to bring all laborers,
the new ship of state so proudly launched a few years before was
the news he had been told after his rescue, about the death of
the news that Dolokhov was soon coming and that all was well with him.
the news which I have inspires me yet more.
the news. Ten minutes later Sonya came to Marya Dmitrievna.
the next higher grades of the army, and so on to the apex, the point
the next room, marching stiffly, and drew up in front of Rostov.
the next year, when General Grant, supplied with almost unlimited men
the night before the battle, the figure of the insignificant little
the night with me and we'll arrange a game of cards. Of course you
the night--some repairing their footgear, some smoking pipes, and some
the night."
the nightshirt over his dried-up old body and gray-haired chest. "I
the nineteenth century, an American characteristic, in marked contrast
the nod she accorded to the lowest hierarchy in her drawing room.
the normal as result from mal-development, injury, or disease, or
the normal bone in contact with it.
the normal, the bones become large and bulky, their surfaces rough and
the normal. The result of interference with growth is more injurious in
the nose may take place, in which case the discharge becomes peculiarly
the nose, of haemorrhage from the socket of a tooth, and sometimes from
the number of glands in the axilla which takes place during lactation;
the number of its servants with kingdoms and states of old. The effect
the number of leucocytes in the circulating blood is abnormally
the number of people taking part in it the more rapidly was the wealth
the number of their free white inhabitants. For obvious reasons the
the number of those conditions is as infinite as the infinity of
the numerous manors or the huge landed estates granted by the crown, the
the nurse's and Dunyasha's protests she went out into the porch; Dron,
the nurse, as she stood in one of the doorways.
the oak is budding. But though I do not know what causes the cold
the object of arresting the spread of the disease, or of removing or
the observation that the small tumour is cystic, and that it follows the
the occasion and were therefore awkward.
the occluded segment of the vessel is represented by a fibrous cord. In
the occupant of the White House.
the occurrence of thrombosis, and to lead to profuse and it may be
the offenders. Against the protests of President Carranza, American
the offensive acts of Parliament.
the offensive nature of the discharge. A similar epithelioma may arise
the offensive.
the officer and addressed him in French.
the officer had to say, took the papers from him without a word.
the officer in charge to have them decently dressed and tidied up
the officer.
the officers and men of the Old Guard who had run up to see the
the officers, crack jokes, sit on the cannon, and meanwhile a French
the officers. In the stillness around him his slowly uttered words
the old America inherited from the fathers. They even stimulated the
the old bonds, certificates of indebtedness, and other promises to pay
the old conception of the movements of the bodies, but without
the old count's with a trotter from the Orlov stud as shaft horse, the
the old count, and would stand for a long time holding the clothes and
the old days there had been a large class of white yeomen who owned no
the old dog with its felted hair hanging from its thigh was within
the old home. The famous post of Detroit was growing into a flourishing
the old lady next to her and glanced angrily at her daughter, and
the old legislative assembly freed from all royalist sympathizers and
the old man in the white dressing gown looked out.
the old man's bald head shining in the sun and seeing by the
the old man, "say so, my dear sir." And he suddenly smiled, in an
the old man, extended his arms and embraced him. And this embrace too,
the old prince's face.
the old prince, of whom she was always afraid, came into her room with
the old woman with a sense of relief at having performed a vexatious
the old-fashioned seton. The skin and cyst wall are transfixed by a
the older sections of the country. What contrasts indeed! The blue grass
the older settlements. New York was invaded by Puritans from New England
the one hand the French had occupied Moscow. On the other Kutuzov felt
the one hand, of leaving portions behind which may keep up the
the one he knelt on when praying on Trinity Sunday, and placed it
the one receiving the highest number of votes to be President and the
the one that will result from it will be as victorious! However,
the one thing I have faith in! Our good and wonderful sovereign has to
the one thing he could not foresee was what happened--the insane,
the one way and manner of farming which produced good results.
the only indication was that three out of their huge retinue
the only means of saving life.
the only one that could save the army, and how he alone would be
the only question left was that of fixing the ratio between them. He
the only sure happiness in life."
the opening of negotiations through commissioners to be sent to America.
the opening of the twentieth century the nation, which a hundred years
the opera nor even listen to the music; she saw only the painted
the opera, she gave a loud exclamation, flushed, and ran out of the
the opinion, in writing, of the principal officer in each of the
the opportunity for large speculative purchases continued to attract
the opportunity of joining in the general current of recollections.
the opposing surfaces, which may be in the form of loose isolated bands
the orbit and endanger other nerves in this region. Harris recommends
the orbit, the scrotum and perineum, and on the chest wall. A blue or
the order to collect provisions, took also horses, carriages, and
the order to shoot them which had been announced to them. As if in
the order was to shoot them) was not merely incomprehensible but
the orderlies looked at him as if they wished to impress on him that a
the orders had all been given and were now being executed.
the organ to become enlarged, uneven, and indurated. This has even been
the organism most frequently present. _Septic_ lymphangitis is commonly
the organisms constantly present in such situations are liable to prove
the organisms gaining access through an abrasion, and spreading by the
the organisms lodge. Many tuberculous patients are to be regarded as
the organization of the greatest combinations and trusts the world had
the orifice of the urethra is rare, and, being concealed from view, it
the original boil obtaining access to adjacent hair follicles. The
the original home of the Republican party; but historians generally
the original possessions of the United States. In the Northwest
the original thirteen states combined, except Georgia, and its system of
the original wound may require to be enlarged in an upward direction.
the ossifying junction at one end of the diaphysis; it may commence at
the ossifying junction is the most valuable diagnostic sign of
the ossifying junctions of the long bones, they tend, as the shaft
the other end sat the count, with the hussar colonel on his left and
the other fare, was splendid, yet he could not feel quite at ease till
the other feel it. Apart from the advantage he derived from Anatole,
the other five years before. At Anna Pavlovna's they talked with
the other hand, conservatives like Chancellor Kent, the stout opponent
the other room.
the other side of the Enns the enemy's horse patrols could be
the other side of the room. "How young-looking he is!"
the other side of the street. He heard nothing and saw nothing of what
the other side sat Count Ostermann-Tolstoy, seemingly absorbed in
the other side with their bayonets and guns.
the other side.
the other soldiers. He stood looking about him, when suddenly he heard
the other states combined. New York City had become the money market of
the other two tables. On the nearest one sat a Tartar, probably a
the other was warming; and that when he had put on tight dancing shoes
the other window and ceased talking when Vera entered. Sonya and
the other, awkwardly, like a child at a dancing lesson.
the other.
the other. Beneath the trees grewsome kind of lush, wet, bushy
the other. Healing is more rapid when the edges are in contact, when
the other. In the male the possibility of infection taking place is
the others as ninety-nine to one, consisted of men who desired neither
the others without waiting for all the carriages to pass, and he began
the ounce--painted on with a brush once daily. If this fails, the
the outcome in Kansas.
the outfits; the distinctive hat that made its way up from Mexico may or
the output, at least enough to determine in a large measure the prices
the outset. It must clearly be understood that any form of gangrene may
the outset. The spirochaete is demonstrated in incredible numbers in the
the outspread line of Cossacks two wagons, drawn by French horses
the outspread map, occasionally glancing along the road to Moscow from
the overlying skin or mucous membrane, and thus give rise to bleeding
the overlying soft parts, its spread being influenced by the anatomical
the overlying tissues. If left to himself, the patient tends to maintain
the owner refused to sell, they concluded, with a menacing flourish, "by
the owners of shops through the formation of cooperative industries. For
the pace set by New England. While Maryland, Virginia, and South
the pain and other symptoms are relieved. The pus may contain blood and
the pain in his wounded leg, gazed with wide-open eyes at this strange
the pain was immediately followed by a feeling of release from the
the palmar aspect of the wrist.
the pan. Rostov turned his horse and galloped back. Four more
the panorama spread out before him. From the twenty-sixth of August to
the paper currency of unsound banks chartered by the states, to the
the papers all in due form--the authorities I mean--time passed. The
the papers and it was the first time he had heard Villeneuve's name.
the papers his father had brought from town. The old prince went up to
the papilloma has been subjected to irritation and has ulcerated. The
the paralysis is usually compensated for by other muscles.
the parasite, lymphocytes and plasma cells being the elements chiefly
the part becomes red and swollen; there is continuous pain, which soon
the part is handled. The spread of the disease is so rapid that its
the part of a secretary rather than commander in the army. My
the part of railways; such as discriminating in charges between one
the part should be kept at rest, and the position should be adjusted so
the part, especially where this is loose and lax, as in the region of
the part.
the participation of Count Rostopchin and his broadsheets. The
the parties of Rumyantsev, the French, Marya Fedorovna, the Tsarevich,
the parting which she seemed hardly able to bear. Though the
the parts about the temple, cheek, eyelids, and auricle, and are
the parts, lest the clot be displaced and embolism occur. To avoid
the party of Hamilton, Washington, Adams, the party of the grand nation,
the party ranging from the lowest township committee to the national
the party responsible for their freedom. In this branch of politics,
the passing of time. The self-sufficiency of the pioneer was broken down
the passions; but we must strive to direct them to a noble aim, and it
the password.... I am asking you if the colonel is here."
the past, letting it be understood how was the present; and every
the past, understood nothing of the present, and all he saw and
the past.
the past. As President Roosevelt later said in speaking of the great
the past. Now she could remember it and weep or pray.
the patella in the anterior flap. The most satisfactory operation in
the patella, although, inflicted by a blunt instrument, may have all the
the patella, in the attempt to avoid falling backwards. The injury is
the patella; in the majority of cases the continuity of the quadriceps
the path of virtue," said the Mason.
the patient becomes exhausted, and usually dies of some intercurrent
the patient being secluded from her friends and placed in charge of a
the patient has to carry him over the period during which he is
the patient into whose tissues it is introduced. So long as a person is
the patient is confined to bed between blankets, the limb is wrapped in
the patient is obliged to lie up. The temperature is often raised (101 o
the patient lies, not in the reactive changes that constitute the
the patient must be overhauled; its administration is contra-indicated
the patient must take systematic exercises of all kinds, especially such
the patient over a critical period of renal insufficiency.
the patient resists the least attempt at movement. In others, the
the patient shivers violently, while the skin becomes cold, pale, and
the patient should rarely have less than 150 grains in twenty-four
the patient's attention is diverted, the pain and stiffness may
the patient, the hands of the surgeon, and knives and other instruments
the patient.
the patriot forces together?" asks Beveridge in his _Life of John
the patronage of an important personage whose complete confidence he
the patronage of home products still more loyally.
the payment of the salaries and other expenses of royal colonial
the peasant in the knitted cap who, stepping lightly with outturned
the peasants had and increased the number by all possible means. He
the pelvic bones, and from an abscess or a mass of enlarged lymph glands
the people could not bear. They were uniformly in favor of relaxing the
the people of Oregon territory," runs the preamble to their compact,
the people of the United States in the most favorable light possible.
the people of the earth a position different from that which they have
the people that their liberties are the gift of God? Are they not to be
the people to read--the famous Cotton Mather having three hundred and
the people with an abandon that was considered reckless in his time.
the people's will cannot be verified, for it never occurred.
the people, the old colonial governments broke down. From the royal
the people, we have found that they and their orders were dependent on
the people," the abbe was saying. "It is only necessary for one
the people.
the people. Reluctantly they yielded, sometimes granting popular
the performance was proceeding, he walked deliberately down the
the peri-articular structures there may be contracture in an undesirable
the period of excitement is over, the severity of the shock is all the
the period of growth, but becomes thin and less vascular when the
the periosteal surface is usually followed by the formation of a cold
the periosteum does not keep pace with the absorption and replacement
the periosteum or bone. Bed-sores over the sacrum sometimes implicate
the peripheral nerves, all sources of irritation, such as ill-fitting
the peripheral portion of the slough, from the blisters, and from the
the peripheral zone of tenderness. Red streaks appear along the lines of
the peritoneal cavity, or by slow leakage into the retro-peritoneal
the permanent molars, and may attain considerable dimensions.
the permanent teeth. The mucous membrane of the larynx may be the seat
the peronei or other tendons about the ankle, the swelling is
the persistence of suppuration in spite of free drainage, but it is not
the persistence of the lesion, its want of resemblance to anything else,
the person the dying man wished to see, her own admission was assured.
the personal bond between the owner and the employees was substituted a
the personal human interests that people had. Yet in reality those
the petition will certainly be granted. Pierre will get everything
the petting and spoiling of children. "You want to make him"--little
the phenomena we are examining.
the phrase "better late than never" on his lips.
the physical law of gravity, their enormous mass drew the individual
the picture of his death, which she felt she could not contemplate
the piece but still sat softly running his fingers over the strings,
the pilgrims and the solitude which refreshed her at Bald Hills--and
the pistol next day. Makar Alexeevich came twice that evening
the pituitary and thyreoid; the diluted toxins of certain
the place where the hottest musket fire and cannonade were heard.
the placing of the greenbacks on a gold basis had itself worked a
the plain of Borodino.
the plan under which the affairs of Porto Rico were conducted by
the plans of George III.
the plans--the probability of Chichagov, Kutuzov, and Wittgenstein
the play of expression on the face of the man who had been able to
the pleas of the abolitionist found no widespread response among the
the pleasure of her saint's-day fete, turned away at once and
the pleasure of spending the evening with you."
the pleura or peritoneum gives rise to a pain of a sharp, _stabbing_
the plexiform neuroma, occasionally originate in pigmented moles. Soldau
the pocket of his riding breeches, with his eyebrows lifted and his
the pockmarked peasant woman with the little girl, and when the patrol
the point of greatest tenderness on pressure. After the inflammation has
the point where the intima is punctured.
the policeman.
the policy of the government had been to encourage the coming of the
the polite Austrian adjutant, Bilibin, and last night's
the political contest for white supremacy was won outside the halls of
the political conventions of 1920 in which women sat as delegates, made
the political news. It became particularly animated toward the end
the political platforms did but reflect the confusion of mind prevailing
the polls. Thus the whites steadily recovered their dominance. Nothing
the popliteal lymph glands, and may endanger the knee-joint. It is also
the popular convention convoked in September, 1792. The monarchy was
the population of a large provincial town. Half the men fell out of
the porch took out a clean pocket handkerchief and tied a knot in it.
the porch, and the post by the side of the pavement. He sprang out
the porch. Prince Andrew got out of the carriage, helped his little
the portrait of the boy piercing the terrestrial globe with a toy
the ports of the seaboard or for Europe. The land journeys over the
the position formerly occupied by New England alone. It was supplying
the position from which we always contemplate it. The commander in
the position of Russia. It was said that the Emperor was leaving the
the position of that insignificant individual was such as could
the position of the enemy's army differently. People accustomed to
the position would be for the Emperor and his court to leave the army;
the possibilities of establishing intimacy with each of those present,
the possibility of an odontoma. Skiagrams often give useful information
the possibility of the existence of any laws for the whole of
the post stood rows of French troops in blue uniforms with red
the posterior mediastinum, behind the peritoneum, in the pleural cavity
the posterior triangle, above the clavicle. They receive lymph from the
the powders he had prescribed a fortnight previously.
the power and wish to inculpate him, this expedient of an inquiry
the power of judges to issue injunctions in labor disputes be limited by
the power that moves peoples? To this, modern history laboriously
the powers of Europe in a military expedition and a diplomatic
the powers of the world.
the practical obstacles in the way of uniform self-government for a
the practice as an exercise of arbitrary power which had cost one king
the preceding noise the sound of their old voices saying one after
the preparations for it with unparalleled solemnity. This Kutuzov
the presence of a sequestrum with one or more discharging sinuses; owing
the presence of carious bone or of a sequestrum. The health may be
the presence of condylomata, and of fissuring and scarring at the angles
the present circumstances something else is needed."
the present requirements of the frontiersmen even if it did not allay
the present. I can't bear this waiting and I shall cry in a minute!"
the preservation of my father's house in Moscow, or the glory of the
the presidential campaign. On the Republican side everything seemed to
the pressure exerted by a dislocated bone or by excessive callus, and
the pressure of the dislocated head of the humerus; occasionally from
the pressure of the extravasated blood causes the skin to slough and,
the pressure, so that the intervertebral discs or the costal cartilages
the pretensions of Parliament and the ministers dependent upon it. His
the previous evening and early in the morning of the first of
the previous evening. There was room enough in the wide corridor for
the priest was a man of very severe and lofty life. There were never
the primary area before they are arrested in the lymphatics, and thus
the primary growth is a lympho-sarcoma and is situated in the tonsil,
the primary lesion at the site of inoculation. Its limits may be stated
the prince rapidly.
the prince sternly; "I'm afraid you write much nonsense. I'll read the
the prince was sharp and invariably exacting, so that without being
the prince's orders.
the prince, one window frame was removed in each room as soon as the
the prince.
the princess and hastily adjusting his lorgnette, as if without this
the princess' order.
the princess' part toward her future sister-in-law and a wish that
the princess' room, a carriage containing Pierre (who had been sent
the princess, a certain confusion and dissension had arisen among
the princess, and they were both speaking in excited whispers.
the princess, his cousin, at Moscow, concerning Dolokhov's intimacy
the princess, with the doctor, and with all the people he now met,
the princess.
the princess. At last an old, cross looking footman came and announced
the principal guests. He was just going to take it when Dolokhov,
the principle of non-intervention by Congress with slavery in the states
the principle of the trade union; namely, that only by collective
the principle that offices should be open to all and distributed
the prisoners jammed close together had to stand for some hours at
the prisoners, and that one of their comrades, a German soldier, had
the problems of the new age appeared in the appointment of specialists,
the problems presented by the Indian and French menace that the
the process of analysis and enters on the new process of the
the process of coalescence of two cutaneous surfaces in development.
the process with deep concern; they knew that one of its main objects
the proclamation," said the adjutant. "The young man is in prison
the produce of the soil, not upon the profits of trade. This very fact
the producers.
the product of a number of forces that happened to converge about 1763.
the production of healthy granulation tissue.
the production of varicose veins has been exaggerated, although it must
the profits of the venture. It was organized under royal authority; it
the profunda branch is usually traumatic in origin, and is more common
the program sellers, they all three went along the corridor to the
the progress of his affairs, took advantage of the armistice to get
the prohibition of slavery in the Louisiana territory north of the line
the prolonged approximation of their points of attachment, or from
the prominence of the heel, the balls of the toes, the projecting base
the prominent clinical feature. Hydrops may occur apart from
the prompt collection of debts within their borders--an evil which
the pronated position, by the brachio-radialis and long radial extensor
the pronator teres are also affected. The patient is unable to supinate
the property common to all bodies from the infinitely large to the
the proportion such persons bore to the voting population.
the proposition that revenue must be provided to pay current expenses
the protection of American citizens and property, the injuries to
the protective barrier of leucocytes is broken down, and the
the protective tariff of 1816, they declared that Congress had power to
the provender which might have saved it from starvation, disintegrated
the provinces in which order had been restored. Six years later, under
the provincials the meaning of union likewise instructed them in the art
the provisions."
the proximal side of the junction, and these by slowly eating into the
the prying eyes of the people all literature "not mete for them to
the psoas--in the latter muscle apart from tuberculous disease in the
the public lands shall be appropriated to this object.... I deprecate
the publican to the smith and back again as if considering whom he
the pulsation ceases, and compression of the artery on the cardiac side
the pulse becomes small and fluttering; the tongue becomes dry and
the pulse, added: "You are not well, my dear fellow. Think what you
the purpose of building up the British merchant marine and navy--arms so
the purpose of the bee's existence. Another, observing the migration
the purposes of its framers. It kept in operation the mills and furnaces
the purse undah the pillow," he said, and went out to the
the purse.
the pus is also to be avoided, lest the protective zone be broken down
the pus is mixed with broken-down blood-clot, and finally free
the pus is mixed with mucus--_muco-pus_.
the pus, and on bacteriological examination are found to be swarming
the quadriceps extensor in attempting to regain the balance when falling
the qualification down to the payment of a small tax. Vermont came into
the question is dealt with, that for history this question does not
the question of methods of election had to be decided. As to the House
the question of those fifty thousand men who were left in hospitals
the question, which has another, opposite, side, based on the
the questions raised by the Spanish War became one of the first issues
the questions that had haunted him, but because his conception of
the radicals had in Massachusetts raised the standard of revolt against
the radius, and in fracture of the neck of the bone. The deep branch may
the raft and talked.
the railroad was "almost entirely destroyed, except the road bed and
the ramrod. His brown morose face with frowning brows was clearly
the ranchers ... have constituted a highly impressive class."
the range of fire, they would have remained there for a long time
the range of their investigation.
the rank (for he did nothing), that Prince Vasili had procured for
the ranks," said the captain softly.
the ranks. A morose soldier marching on the left turned his eyes on
the rapidity, as well as on the mode, in which it causes death. Some
the rare moments when the old fire did kindle in her handsome, fully
the rattle of musketry and a muffled shout almost behind them in the
the rattle of wheels, the tramp of feet, and incessant shouts of anger
the ravine toward the ryefield and away from Nicholas.
the raw materials for the thriving rum industry of New England. These
the raw materials which they had gathered in from neighboring farms.
the raw surface scraped, and then painted with iodine.
the raw surface, and the wound closed. If there is any reason to doubt
the reaction is practically always positive. In the tertiary stage also
the reader went on, and then paused ("Do you see," shouted the youth
the readiness with which the sarcomatous cells are carried off and
the reading, the Uhlan interrupted Denisov.
the real division in the convention was not between the large and the
the reappearance of French troops who had for a time lost touch with
the rear and reached the front ranks, carrying them off their feet and
the reasons that convinced him that Metivier was a spy. Though these
the reception hall: Michael Ivanovich, Mademoiselle Bourienne,
the reception room, not knowing what to do with his hands; he was more
the reckless daring of American sailors in that naval contest with Great
the records of time. The secret of its greatness lies in the simple fact
the rectum. They are ill-developed or absent also in the iliac and
the recuperative process varies. Simple structures, such as skin,
the recurrence of haemorrhage.
the red-nosed captain and his drawn-in stomach, and mimicked his
the reflex apparatus of the whole cord. As the toxin spreads it causes
the reformers to the critics of American institutions. Nor were they the
the regiment I'd... Ah well, I'll show that in action, and for me
the regiment was much surprised at the commander in chief's order to
the regiment, all was clear and simple. The whole world was divided
the regiment, and Bogdanich knows it. Oh, we do prize it, old
the regiment, or in general of that other free life which was going on
the regimental commander on horseback and some ten men of his company,
the region of the axillary nerve.
the region of the knee. Frequently a large branch establishes a
the reign of Elizabeth, censorship of the press became a part of royal
the reins and started of his own accord.
the reins, and he moved off accompanied by an irregularly swaying
the reins.
the relation of the people to their rulers.
the removal of inert masses of caseous material, in disease of bone for
the removal of sequestra, or in disease of joints to improve the
the removal of which would have benefited the patient.
the reparative changes go on extremely slowly. _Suppuration_ may occur
the repeal of the Silver Purchase Act, thus alienating an increasing
the reply she wrote, also in French:
the representation of those states in Congress, it had to begin by
the representative principle and "undermine and overthrow the bulwarks
the requirements. In Massachusetts, for instance, the vote was granted
the rescue. Pierre had managed to start a conversation with the abbe
the resolutions into effect. Furthermore the United States disclaimed
the rest of the troops who were on their way from Vienna, and with
the rest of what went on, having made up his mind once for all that
the rest of you. Let me live like a man and think of my soul and of
the rest was night in which the influence of discipline cannot be
the rest. And the rest was no concern of his. In the regiment,
the restless and eternal movement of mankind upon the surface of the
the restoration of Serbia and Rumania; the readjustment of the Turkish
the restoration of function in the capacity to flex the fingers is
the restoration of the balance of power between the North and the South.
the restoration of the king to full power under the protection of the
the restraining act of March 30, 1775, which in effect destroyed the
the result that gross deformities are produced, particularly in the
the result that when a stimulus reaches the ganglia a motor discharge
the resulting anaesthesia lasting for twenty-four to forty-eight hours.
the resulting injury resemble an incised wound; while from more rounded
the results were totaled in a series of compromise measures, all of
the reticular portion, and is largely composed of adipose tissue.
the retraction of the muscular coat causes the opening to gape, with the
the return of former Confederates to practical, if not official, power;
the return stream may, however, be so forcible as to prevent coagulation
the revenue needed to pay the interest on the funded debt. It so
the ribs it is more satisfactory to remove the diseased portion of bone
the rich lands awaiting the plow of the white man. Down the great river
the richest of the officers now that he had received his money, bought
the right and high up in the sky was the sickle of the waning moon and
the right carotid and its branches are diminished and delayed. Pressure
the right light.... In my opinion perpetual peace is possible but--I
the right of friendly nations to offer the services of mediation to
the right of petition to the crown, condemning the transportation of
the right of the road, the cross and belfry of the Kolocha Monastery
the right of the road.
the right side of the field fully satisfied his expectations.
the right sounded oftener and nearer. As soon as Tushin with his guns,
the right thing was at an end, and they were already admiring her.
the right to call upon the state legislatures for the sinews of
the right to regulate his life and that of the whole family exactly as
the right to vote on the acceptance or rejection of a fundamental law
the right to vote, its representation in Congress should be reduced in
the right wing are heard. The sharpshooters of Morand's division and
the right, Denisov stopped.
the rights of American citizens. Finally after much discussion and
the rights of states and think of their commonwealths with affection,
the rise of Populism and the growth of labor disputes as the signs of a
the rise of a new agency of government to express the will of America.
the river between himself and the main body of the French. On the
the river flowed was formed by the rising ground only half a mile
the river, and so it is."
the river, and the Crimean estate, in order to make it possible: all
the river, grew into a thriving commercial city, including among its
the river, then at the dog who was pretending to be in earnest about
the road and the sappy leaves. The left side of the forest was dark in
the road before them was safe from Cossacks.
the road passed through the forest; the dew was imperceptible on the
the road to the right beyond the Dnieper--which was the only
the road, and began riding up the hill at a gallop toward the point
the road. As he approached Smolensk he heard the sounds of distant
the rods, would have done, for he had nothing that either the sergeant
the role of conquering heroes with your 'brows bound with oak.'"
the role played by the frontier in the American Revolution. The action
the room a few minutes later. "Now our Natasha has come to life. You
the room and began to say something in French. The Governor's face
the room and looking through the open doors into the two adjoining
the room the prince again began speaking about his son, about the war,
the room with rapid steps. Now he seemed to see her in the early
the room.
the room.
the room. Denisov silently watched Lavrushka's movements, and when the
the room. It was clear that he thought it necessary to interest
the room. No one spoke and the only sounds heard were the clatter of
the room.... Nicholas had been prepared for resistance, but had not at
the room?" she thought. "Perhaps he would then have said to me what he
the rooms with him to show him where to set up the bed for that night.
the root of the neck is called in this connection--care must be taken
the root of the neck or near the bifurcation. It is the aneurysm most
the round face of a Rostov, entered the yard.
the royal lawyers did but confirm rights and habits of self-government
the rug and began reading to him from a manuscript book an explanation
the ruin of Russia. She was agitated and incessantly tortured by the
the rule, with more or less complete restoration of function. In more
the rulers of these unknown conditions on which the will of the people
the ruling class of the South the natural outcome of the great economic
the rural police having come to Bogucharovo urged the same thing,
the rustle and tramp of the French troops already beginning to move to
the ruthless Spanish general, Weyler, who concentrated the inhabitants
the saber never had been sharpened.) "Can you do it?"
the sac is probably the best method of treatment, especially in those of
the sac of the aneurysm. The sac consists of the condensed and thickened
the sac. We have had cases under observation in which the treatment
the sacrament. The dying man lay as lifeless and immovable as
the sacrum and, it may happen that, not being expected to recover, the
the sad memories of old age, but poetic, youthful ones--those
the saddles and Junot's spoon might be of some use, but that cold
the safest plan is to treat the case as one of diphtheria.
the safety and the happiness of the people lurked in great inequalities
the sails of merchantmen.
the saints. "I'd pray awhile to one, ponder awhile, then go on to
the saltpeter flavor of the gunpowder they used instead of salt was
the salute and unable to repress the smile of delight induced by his
the same State claiming lands under grants of different States;--and
the same and always a fraud? There is no spring, no sun, no happiness!
the same as ever, only showing still more irritability and
the same as when an artery is ruptured, excepting that of aneurysm, and
the same cleanliness, the same stillness reigned there, and inside
the same conclusion by another road, that is, to recognize (1) nations
the same craftsmen in different cities. The printers of New York,
the same degree; in time the tissues become so hard and tense as
the same disease (Kocher). In acute rheumatism, however, the joint
the same feeling of unpleasant awakening from the hurry and
the same general characters as shell wounds. Fragments of stone, coal,
the same his serf and huntsman.
the same is done by a concourse of people, allowing those who do not
the same kind of talk, and at last all stopped. As often happens,
the same manner as it had been ratified nearly four score years before.
the same manner, but the results are inferior to those obtained by
the same minute. With those about him, from his daughter to his serfs,
the same moment his kindly eyes grew moist with tears of joy and
the same mood. All alike were taciturn and morose. Talk was rarely
the same order the name of Prince Andrew Bolkonski, appointed to the
the same principles as govern the treatment of other infected wounds.
the same properties and characters, save that its growth on artificial
the same sense of ridicule and perplexity she herself experienced, but
the same shall be, for the erection of forts, magazines, arsenals,
the same speed, but they kept increasing their pace, so that some of
the same state as Natasha and was therefore surprised on entering
the same state in which they happen to be at any given period as more
the same thing: "It is time I understood her and made up my mind
the same time he explained to Congress that he desired no conflict with
the same time was glad he had surprised her at it and that she would
the same time, and that the Italian's cure consisted in removing
the same timid faces, only somewhat older. Princess Mary was still the
the same to me!" he screamed in the same piercing tone as when parting
the same to me: it hurts the same whichever finger gets bitten. But if
the same voice as in the regiment, but Rostov noticed sadly that under
the same way as silk.
the same way the entry of the famished army into the rich and deserted
the same!" Pierre often indulged in reflections of this sort,
the same, she knew that they were on the verge of a quarrel.
the same. And attempts in this direction have already been made.
the same. You'll be all right anywhere. But look here: give up
the same?" and he turned inquiringly to Balashev, and evidently this
the sands of Arabia. The Teutonic tribes, from their home beyond the
the sanitary conditions of the mills, the pressure of foreign
the sartorius in the thigh, furnish examples of muscles in which the
the savior of the Constitution. Hayes and Garfield, though lesser lights
the scale in the battle between the tissues and the bacteria. Age is an
the scapula is unduly prominent, and there is impairment in the power of
the scar and bring the edges of the gap together.
the scar tissue. It consists of branching axis cylinders running in all
the scarf and looking at her with her head bent first on one side
the scene of the previous and of the impending battle. Some Cossacks
the scene, they found much of the land immediately upon the seaboard
the schemes of reconstruction.
the science explaining the whole creation and man's place in it. To
the sclerosed bone perforated with a drill or trephine.
the sclerosis around Brodie's abscess gives a dense shadow in which the
the scope of our society, let the mot d'ordre be not virtue alone
the scoundrels!"
the scraping of chairs. Then one of those conversations began which
the screaming children the mummers, covering their faces and
the screams came.
the screams of those that were being trampled on and of those who
the sea, they will turn to the running battles, the narrow escapes, and
the sealing wax and quill pens his hands came upon on his uncle's
the search for evidence, and finally agreed to the proposition that the
the seas, claimed the right to seize American produce bound for French
the season; so that by the the time it reached Vilna it numbered
the seat of pain--_arthralgia_--which is worse at night. In the
the seat of power at Washington. Its democratic temper evoked a cordial
the seat of puncture. If the bulk of the full dose is large, it should
the seat of pyogenic infection and of traumatic or trade bursitis, the
the seat.
the sebaceous glands and hair follicles. They are commonly met with in
the second of September, that is from the battle of Borodino to the
the secondary manifestations make their appearance, that is, for several
the secreting tissue is gradually replaced by connective tissue and the
the sect. "We want," proclaimed President Young to all the earth, "a
the sections dealing with the regions in which they occur.
the segment of bone is resected and a portion of the tibia or fibula
the self-government accorded to states. As soon as a few thousand
the senator, but thought it necessary on this occasion to address
the sense of patriotism that weaned men away from mere allegiance to
the separation of sloughs, or to promote the growth of granulations. In
the septic process to the wall of the artery and the consequent erosion
the sequestrum lies loose in a cavity lined by tuberculous granulation
the sequestrum present a serrated or worm-eaten appearance due to the
the sequestrum presents along its margins and on its deep surface a
the sequestrum takes place more rapidly in the spongy bone of the
the serfs, punishments were to be admonitory and not corporal, and
the seriousness of his stupid smile, could not but give him a moment's
the servants to try to get them a lift out of Moscow. The major-domo
the service he would run away. And next day, Count Ilya Rostov--though
the setting out of the table for boston. The general sat down by Count
the settlement of America was merely a part. And it was, moreover, only
the settlement of America was the religious brotherhood, or
the settlement of claims filed by the citizens of both countries; the
the settlers dwelt peacefully at New Haven under their "Fundamental
the seven virtues, corresponding to the seven steps of Solomon's
the seventh and fourteenth days, and lasts till the wound heals, its
the several State legislatures, and all executive and judicial officers,
the severity of the infective process and consequently to the patient's
the shade of the nearest house, on a bench which one Cossack had run
the shade, the right side glittered in the sunlight, wet and shiny and
the shadows the wax figures would throw on the wall, when they heard
the shafts of the bones are thickened, and the soft tissues of the
the shape of the synovial sac. The stiffness and the cracking on
the shawl had been adjusted he kept his arm around her for a long
the sheath from one compartment to the other, and this may yield
the sheath is slack or torn, it is tightened up or closed with catgut
the shed full of animation, but on seeing Prince Andrew's face he felt
the shed, and on returning stopped by the door to play with a little
the shelter of the regimental commander, higher than and different
the shield of the Monroe Doctrine between the Western Hemisphere and
the ships to sail out of Hampton Roads and circle the earth by way of
the shirt.
the shot heard from that spot, of the dog's howl, of the guilty
the shoulder and wrist, and these also are the last to unite.
the shoulder, and said that he was very grateful, but that it was
the shoulder, and then went up to the table where Prince Andrew,
the shoulder, the spinati muscles are paralysed and wasted, the spine of
the shoulder. Some weeks or months after the injury, the patient
the shouts of hawkers, the light and gay summer clothes of the
the shrine of the saint. And now I'm from Kolyazin, master, where a
the shuffling of feet were the only sounds that could be heard. Anna
the shutters the moonlight, as if it had long been watching for
the sick and wounded, yet the stand made at Krems and the victory over
the sick man, nor turn to look at him, but stood frowning by the
the side as if paralysed, and the condition was formerly described as
the sides of his good horse, Bedouin, and sitting as though falling
the sight of the dancing soldier and the gay and smartly marching men.
the sight of the enemy suddenly seized him. He stopped at the
the sign of the eagle, began to address the assembled people," were
the signet ring, and Zherkov, uneasily glancing at them all, and
the significance of the burning of Moscow, and looked at the fires
the silence, looked at Natasha and at Princess Mary. They had
the simple and solemn mystery of death that had been accomplished in
the simpler the action we are observing and the less complex the
the simplest and most familiar. As a general on duty on Kutuzov's
the sinews of war for the contest with the Napoleonic empire. The
the sister of James Otis, who measured her pen with the British
the sister with the mole.
the situations which correspond to the various clefts and fissures of
the six rubbers he watched her and his friend.
the size of hemp seed. Healing frequently occurs in the centre of the
the size of the sore. Interference with the nutrition of a part by oedema
the size, shape, and velocity of the missile, the range at which the
the skilled labor for industry.
the skin and in mucous membranes--for example, cancer of the skin, of
the skin and wound secretions--an advantage it has over Martin's rubber
the skin in the axilla, or in the mouth. Sometimes the thermometer is
the skin is frozen with ethyl-chloride and a small incision made, after
the skin is habitually moist, and especially where two skin surfaces are
the skin is invaded by the naevoid tissue over the whole extent of the
the skin is reached the current is turned off. The punctures are covered
the skin may even slough, and the clinical features may therefore come
the skin, and is due to the introduction of infective matter at the root
the skin, in the stomach and large intestine, in the breast, the uterus,
the skin, the razor passing through the tips of the papillae, which
the skin--for example, over the front of the tibia or around the
the skin. It is usually about the size of a crown-piece, but it may
the skull or by a punctured wound of the orbit. In other cases they are
the skull suggests that the disappearance of the osseous tissue is
the skull, and craniotabes--have been referred to in the chapter on
the skull, or the tibia--the tissue of which it is composed is apt to
the skull, the absorption may result in the entire disappearance of
the sky to which Pierre had pointed, and for the first time since
the sky, the dawn merging with the afterglow of sunset, was visible.
the sky. A red glow as of a conflagration spread above the horizon
the slain were continually being dragged away and the wounded
the slain, the weeping voice of nature cries ''tis time to part.' ...
the slave power.
the slaveholder's exposition of the Constitution." Such was the Northern
the slaves, was alone worthy of protecting the union and uplifting the
the sleek cavalry passed, before a carriage drawn by six gray horses
the sleepiness that kept coming over him. An enormous space, with
the sleeve turned up to the elbow, trying unnaturally to spread out
the sleigh bore to the right, drew up at an entrance, and Rostov saw
the slippery ice that covered the millpool.
the slope of the hill amid the smoke a Russian battery that was
the small farm owned outright and tilled by the possessor and his
the small farm. The plantation was in fact founded on slavery. It was
the small farmer, swept Arkansas into the main current of planting
the small farmers of the South and as they beheld the menace of
the small farmers were driven steadily from the seaboard into the
the small foot shod in a Tartar boot embroidered with silver, and
the smallest connection with the event itself.
the smoke of campfires--the soldiers' kitchens.
the smoke that is carried back has noticed that the wheels do not
the smoke, letting it escape from his handsome mouth in rings. This
the smoking ruins of Semenovsk, which had been burned down, could be
the snapping whip of the teamster urging forward his horses or the crack
the snow, greedily bit at it, again raised his head, adjusted himself,
the snow.
the snow. On the contrary the greater the heat the more solidified the
the snows maintained the life of this original, peculiar, and unique
the so-called battle of the three Emperors--that is to say, a slow
the sobs in her throat. Hard as she had tried to prepare herself,
the soft parts. The periosteum, which is thick and easily separable, is
the soft snowbanks that bordered both sides of the path. The prince
the soil were either tenants or laborers for wages.
the soil, already exceeded the number of slaves on Southern farms and
the soil, still kept out in the fields by groundless fear, listen!
the soldier Platoche to whom he had given a shirt to sew was in that
the soldier was in the ranks, and so on. Similarly a man who committed
the soldier who told stories called it Femgalka; Karataev and others
the soldier who was driving the woman's vehicle for trying to get
the soldier who was holding their horses.
the soldier. "Turn back with your slut!"
the soldiers at the battle of Borodino. He had sought it in
the soldiers became aware that in front, behind, and on all sides,
the soldiers quite bewildered. They unlocked their shops and locked
the soldiers to change into their greatcoats. The company commanders
the soldiers were convicted and lightly punished.
the soldiers who fired, or transported provisions and guns--should
the soldiers who formed the picket line on either side, there were
the soldiers' campfire were placed on a bent sheet of iron on the
the soldiers' faces and unnatural warlike solemnity on those of the
the soldiers, when landowners lodged petitions for compensation.
the soldiers, who moved that they might hear better what he was
the soldiers. The company marched on gaily. The soldiers' voices could
the sole and dorsiflexion of the toes. Areas of caries or necrosis occur
the son had followed him like an eagle, three steps at a time.
the son of his old friend and the possessor of such enormous wealth,
the son of poor frontier parents, a pioneer who in his youth had labored
the son.
the sore is recommended by C. H. Mills. If the sores spread in spite of
the sore throat may take the form of rapidly spreading, penetrating
the sound as of a frightful explosion struck his ear, and at the
the sound men made as they crossed themselves were heard.
the sound of hoofs and wheels. Amid the general rumble, the groans and
the sound of that sentence: "Contez nous cela, Vicomte."
the sound of voices and the shouts of command. The whole air reeked
the sound of voices was heard.
the sound of wheels and footsteps heard by the outposts during the
the sounds of her own voice. Passing a mirror she glanced into it.
the source of toxin production, offers the only means of saving the
the sources of the Mississippi River and penetrated the Spanish
the southeast, to parts where none of them had ever been. They set off
the southern Pacific, nearer to Australia than to California. This
the southern and eastern shores of Ireland for the New World.
the sovereign for refusing the command of the army, yet blamed him for
the sovereign went out with Balashev. Arakcheev looked at the
the spaces of which are packed with leucocytes. The glands act as
the specific virus of a particular disease (the _antigen_) and the
the spectacle of two powerful nations choosing the way of peaceful
the sphere of national politics, Grover Cleveland, then governor of New
the sphere of power in which he had so lately moved--and after several
the spinal medulla, such as tabes. Gluteal fibrositis may be mistaken
the spine, pelvis, or hip. The position of the abscess in relation to
the spirit of liberty in many a stirring poem. Songs, ballads, plays,
the spirit of peculation. Members of Congress, it was found, accepted
the spurs on his rapid, agile feet, while at every third beat his
the squadron and the enemy except a few scattered skirmishers. An
the squadron may be recommended for honors and he may get a ribbon.
the squadron; but when he had gone more than halfway he began to
the staff captain in his deep bass, calmly stroking his long mustache.
the staff captain's question by a disapproving shake of his head.
the staff captain, "but we old fellows, who have grown up in and,
the staff captain.
the staff of his division to explain his violence at the
the staff that evening, to the officer of the Horse Guards,
the staff, was holding a paper in his hand, and called over all the
the staff?"
the stairs and embraced his sister.
the stalls, and the curtain rose.
the stand that such taxes should be laid in order to bring about a more
the staphylococcus; it forms a whitish growth.
the state above the nation in the Kentucky resolutions of 1798,
the state government has not been any man authorized by the constitution
the state government, for the satisfaction of their claims.
the state legislatures, but to conventions held in the states for the
the state legislatures.
the state of his affairs. He did not know at all how much he had, what
the state of the soldiers' boots. More than half the men's boots
the state rose from about $5,800,000 to $24,000,000, and millions of the
the state, plantations tilled by bondmen spread out in broad expanses.
the state, rather than the national government, as the proper center of
the states to do their full duty. To him the Articles of Confederation
the states to pay their quotas of money into the treasury, only to be
the statesmen in France and England, rather than the colonists in
the steady decline of her sea power since the days of the Armada and
the step the silence continued. Only among the back rows of the
the steps and voices of new arrivals in the vestibule.
the sterno-mastoid muscle, some of them lying beneath the muscle. They
the stifling atmosphere of the town, and the Rostovs did not move to
the still greater unimportance of death, the meaning of which no one
the stillness of the night, reading it by the faint light under the
the stimulating influence of a June morning, and could not refrain
the stirrup as if loathe to part from his horse, and at last sprang
the storeroom. A third case was needed and servants had gone to
the story and not only said nothing to encourage Zdrzhinski's
the story of Western opportunity in this vein: "You see your children
the story prevented her from going on with it.
the story), and how Rostopchin let him go and assured the people
the strange cruelty that impels men to kill one another, but she did
the strange lightness he experienced, almost comprehensible and
the stranger, but by the time he had made up his mind to ask him a
the strangest fancies unexpectedly and disconnectedly passed through
the straw in the cornfield. All seemed fully absorbed in these
the stream to the Crescent City. In a few cases small ocean-going
the street mounted on a rather small sorrel horse. A huge suite of
the street to the knoll from which he had looked at the field of
the street, and the adjutant's unceasing moans could still be heard.
the street. Inside the shed Alpatych and the coachman arranged the
the strength of all New England to the field and ended in his own
the strength of conviction with which he spoke. Kutuzov looked down at
the strength of the leader, Martin Van Buren; four years afterward it
the strength that always comes from organization, it soon found itself
the stretcher into which his head had sunk deep and again his
the strikers gave up the battle, defeated but not subdued. To cap the
the striking feature of American business life, one of the most
the striking of the blow or the death of Napoleon, but with
the striking phases of industrialism.
the striped muscles of the body are replaced by bone, and all movements,
the stripes on their bodies heal, and they are happy as before. But it
the stroke, came up to the prince, bowing his bald head resignedly
the stronger! I know very well that Count Nicholas is too young ever
the struggling colonies, although official requests for them were
the struggling men, and the fate of the red-haired gunner, who had
the stubborn defense of Bunker Hill, showed that it could make British
the stud farms at which Nicholas might procure horses, recommended
the sub-deltoid bursa.
the subcutaneous cellular tissue (Fig. 9, d). In some cases both
the subdivision of the soil and the great equality of condition," as
the subjacent marrow. The pus perforates the periosteum, and makes its
the subject of bankruptcies throughout the United States;
the subject of her request and must not be shown before the request
the subject of history, says plainly: I am free and am therefore not
the subject under discussion than those they are talking with.
the subjects of this disease may grow up to be as strong and healthy as
the subjugation of a people, a general historian looks for the cause
the subscapular vessels; anterior or pectoral groups lie behind the
the subscription was fifteen rubles a head, and at which there were
the substance of the speeches--infected him too. He did not renounce
the suburb. "Moscow deserted!" he said to himself. "What an incredible
the success of their enterprise. He could not resist looking at them
the suction bell is persevered with. If there is a large periglandular
the sufferings of a man he disliked, those new thoughts had come to
the suite and a convoy of Croats. Beside Kutuzov sat an Austrian
the suite.
the suite. "But, gentlemen..."
the sum of them is 666, and that Napoleon therefore the beast foretold
the summer, and then how he had asked her about Boris.
the sun gleaming on the blue waters. There was perfect stillness.
the sun's progress!" exclaimed Franklin. Protests of a few opponents in
the sunshine in the yard.
the superficial lymph vessels, and the deep lymphatics may sometimes be
the superior officers, who was acquainted with the higher authorities,
the support of the United States, Huerta was doomed.
the supports attached to Tushin's battery had been moved away in the
the suppuration rapidly involves the surrounding cellular tissue, and
the supra-sternal notch, but usually towards the right side of the
the surest sign that they fully understood one another.
the surface and caused an ulcer, this is treated on general principles,
the surface and demanded satisfaction. From that evening she seemed to
the surface and permit of infection which leads to ulceration. Varicose
the surface, although this may be so slight that it escapes observation
the surface, of a pinkish or brownish-pink pink colour, and sends out
the surface, sinks to the depths, and again emerges. There now,
the surface. All her inward labor, her dissatisfaction with herself,
the surfaces of the bone. In the shaft of a long bone its eruption on
the surgeon in the course of an operation, wounds accidentally inflicted
the surrounding bone and so causes the abscess to increase in size. If
the surrounding parts must be got rid of before contraction of the sore
the surrounding skin is covered with a layer, about half an inch thick,
the surrounding tissues.
the sutler's hut without his boots." He recognized the agreeable,
the sutlers. On receiving Boris' letter he rode with a fellow
the sweep of the prairie. Few monuments of other races and antiquity
the swelling and induration may lead to narrowing of the urethra, so
the swelling partakes of the characters of a phlegmon with threatening
the swelling that came from bad food, preferred to remain on duty, and
the symbol of defeat. Jackson destroyed the bank. Polk signed the tariff
the symptoms are sometimes so slight that the nature of the injury may
the symptoms which arise when the body is impacted between the articular
the synovial membrane are often associated with an abundant exudate or
the synovial membrane between the stretched fibres of the capsular
the synovial membrane of a joint, and projects into its interior, giving
the synovial membrane or directly on the articular surface--in either
the system as a whole, vary with different irritants and with the
the table and began to lay them out for a game of patience.
the table sat the countess with Marya Dmitrievna on her right and Anna
the table to write to the governor.
the table with a determined and drunken gesture and preparing to climb
the table, onto which he threw it.
the table.
the table. Denisov was sitting there scratching with his pen on a
the table. He began to doze. Suddenly a feeling of happiness seized
the tail of the gun carriage, moved forward and, not noticing the
the talk reverted to its former lively tone.
the talk went off into merry jests and gossip.
the talking himself, and continued to talk with the sort of
the tariff and the trusts"--such was the battle cry which had been taken
the tariff, and taxation.
the tariff, trusts, and monopolies. Supported by a loyal following, he
the taxing power of that body. Two devices were thought adapted to these
the teacher first follow the text closely and then review the subject
the teacher's fault or the pupil's, this same thing happened every
the temperature chart, any portion of the original dressing which
the temperature is low, a grave prognosis is indicated. The tongue is
the temperature rises rapidly with a rigor and runs an irregular course
the temperature usually rises one or two degrees. There is swelling and
the tendency of blood to coagulate when in contact with damaged tissue.
the tendo-calcaneus, the movements at the ankle-joint are restricted,
the tendon by resecting a portion of the great saphenous vein.
the tendon of the biceps, in the hip in the bursal extension beneath the
the tendons, and this is usually successful in bringing about a
the tenets of the Friends, gave freedom of conscience to those "who
the tent to where the horses stood saddled.
the tent.
the tenth I don't receive news that they have all got away I shall
the term indicates, it occurs in old persons, but the patient's age is
the terminal loops of the cutaneous blood vessels and the terminations
the terms of an organic act, passed by Congress in 1902, the third stage
the terms of the proposed League, endorsed the general idea of an
the terms of this agreement, you must cease using and return or destroy
the terms of this agreement, you must cease using and return or destroy
the terrible pain of being lifted onto the stretcher, the jolting
the terrible strain, put on speed close to the hare, knocked it off
the terrible submarines. American soldiers took part in the last great
the territories, Lincoln was prepared to give to Southern leaders a
the territory might themselves decide whether they would have slavery or
the territory statehood and the rights of American citizens. Federalists
the territory, he became a slave again in Missouri by virtue of the law
the territory. Pioneers who looked with hungry eyes on the fertile
the territory. They joined Americans from the older states in clearing
the tertiary type are produced.
the test of all the years that followed; namely, that the affair was one
the testicle, abdomen, or head, and occasionally marked nervous
the theorists are often one sided, and therefore one should not
the thick spot of paint representing the highest light in the
the thigh are often wasted and are liable to twitch.
the thing over, some conceit prevents your apologizing, and you wish
the things. "These aren't needed," said she, putting aside some plates
the third and fourth metacarpal bones distally and to the radius or ulna
the third day when something could have been done, that army was
the third degree of chilblain and the milder forms of true frost-bite;
the third division and convinced himself that there really were no
the third place, provision was made for continuity by having only
the third week.
the third, a pair of women's gloves, he said: "Dear brother, these
the thirsty desert and turned its good-for-nothing sand into
the thirteen original states won their independence as separate and
the thorax. The chyle escapes and accumulates in the cellular tissue of
the thought of the perilous journey. All routes were crowded with
the thought that this man did not, and never would, know any of
the thoughtful expression of his face.
the thoughtful profile of her drooping face. She moved, and the ball
the thoughts he has dreamed of for nights, but looks around for help
the thousands of appeals, memorials, petitions, and complaints, and the
the threatening and angry roar of the crowd. Like the seventh and last
the three-mile limit. When, in the summer of 1807, the American frigate
the thrombus becoming organised and obliterating the vein.
the thyreoid nor the secondary growth in the bones is necessarily
the tibia consists of a shaft or _diaphysis_, and two extremities or
the tibialis anterior. It is most often met with in relation to the
the time I gave him no answer. Now I recalled every detail of that
the time I stood alone with him in the dark temple it seemed to me
the time had come to join her sister states "in resisting the
the time it entered Moscow till it was destroyed is like studying
the time of their admission." Not content with this, the law went on to
the time, by their officers' order, the men sat on the ground. One,
the time, in the second case it is the origin); and the question of
the time, wondered at his enjoyment and regretted that there was no
the tingling test is helpful in determining whether or not regeneration
the tissue in which it arises, that determines the maximum incidence of
the tissue there ensues an inflammatory reaction, which is characterised
the tissues and intentionally left there, for example, suture and
the tissues around it. In course of time a _traumatic arterial aneurysm_
the tissues by removing a foreign body or a piece of dead bone, there
the tissues is an impediment to repair. Mechanical causes, such as
the tissues is immediately followed by an oozing of blood, which soon
the tissues of the brain or spinal cord in man ever takes place. Any
the tissues with which they come in contact, and so render them less
the title before?
the toes, fingers, ears, or nose, is preceded by formication, numbness,
the tomb of the little princess, and in this chapel was a marble
the tone in which he addressed her.
the tongue in which they were written. These are tributes not only to
the tongue may be relieved by swabbing the mouth with a mixture of
the top of the incline turned round and galloped full speed back
the tortoise has covered another one hundredth, and so on forever.
the town and attracted little attention from the inhabitants. The town
the town.
the town. Some Cossacks of Dokhturov's detachment reported having
the towns of Worcester and Springfield and broke up the courts of
the towns showed a growing hostility to a system of government that
the towns, who were by no means content with their position.
the traffic in them was highly profitable. Orphans and dependents were
the trails, across the Isthmus of Panama, and around Cape Horn. Before
the transactions of the shadow legislature. The currency was in utter
the transverse part of the arch, the trachea is pulled down with each
the transverse sinus as a sequel to chronic suppuration in the mastoid
the traveler as marking a new country, were all accentuated by the
the treatment is carried out on the same lines as for boils.
the treatment is carried out on the same lines, but it is seldom
the treatment of a fractured thigh.
the treatment of condylomata the greatest attention must be paid to
the treatment of neuralgia.
the treatment of which lengthening of the shortened muscles or their
the treaty committing the United States to the administration of distant
the treaty of 1783--terms which were not fulfilled until after the
the tree and says the apple fell because he wanted to eat it and
the tree is harmed, and your teeth are set on edge. Like an
the trees, and the hissing of the saber, "Ozheg-zheg-zheg..." and
the trees. Denisov, the esaul, and Petya rode silently, following
the trench with a shy smile or, politely making way for the
the trenches by October, 1917, and had their first severe encounter with
the trial intended? The Fatherland, the destruction of Moscow! And
the triceps and anconeus may also suffer.
the trigger, as he had not before held a pistol in his hand--a fact
the triumph of mind over matter, fascinating as a romance, need not be
the troops are stationed, nor by the number of cannon or of
the troops in turn should enter Moscow a la maraude* to obtain
the troops occurs, as in all national wars.
the troops pass by him. That morning Kutuzov seemed worn and
the troops plunder the city; then, hesitating whether to leave a
the troops to cross it? Napoleon gave orders that the troops should
the troops you command justify us in expecting.
the troops, whose spirits would thereby be raised to the highest
the true boundary between Venezuela and British Guiana. He added that it
the true path of life suddenly came to Princess Mary with such force
the trunk-neuroma already described. The tumours, which vary greatly in
the trunks put in, he ordered the horses to be harnessed. Only those
the trusts to be made up of a network of large and small capitalists,
the truth of his statements.
the truth of the common saying that the rich were growing richer and the
the truth of the statement that the greater or lesser success of one
the truth that the strength of an army depends on its spirit. To
the truth to his hearers--who like himself had often heard stories
the truth, how I would unmask his deceivers!" And in order to
the truth. In the first place I like her very much, I feel drawn to
the tuberculous lesion occurs in a child who is the subject of inherited
the tuberculous tissue that has undergone caseation, or even
the tubs and stood, hanging her head.
the tumour contain a brownish glairy fluid. These tumours have been
the tumour grow into the small veins, and, becoming detached, are
the tumour is called a _villous papilloma_, the best-known example of
the tumour is hard, and is known as a _scirrhous cancer_--a form which
the tumour, which may amount to two degrees or more, is a point of
the tumour. In rodent cancers of the skin, for example, both radium and
the tune. Bolkonski was not there. None of these gentlemen changed his
the tunica muscularis contract and those of the tunica externa retract,
the turn of the staircase, one could hear the footstep of someone in
the twentieth time and finding some peculiarly deep meaning in each
the twenty-fifth, in the position we intended and had fortified. But
the twenty-sixth, attacked the whole Russian army, which was in
the twenty-sixth--there are no words worthy to do it justice! I tell
the two countries over the Maine boundary. A year after closing this
the two girls white gauze over pink silk slips, with roses on their
the two medial lumbricals produces no symptoms that can be recognised.
the two points of a compass--_loss of epicritic sensibility_ (Head and
the type of contraction with the constant current, is known as the
the ulcer extends in area and depth. The term _rupia_ is applied when
the ulcer must be so modified as to bring it into the state of a healing
the ulcer?--in other words, In what particulars does it differ from a
the ulcers, and in turn break down. While in the nodular stage the
the ulnar nerve, with, in addition, those intrinsic muscles of the hand
the ultimate cause of the movement of the locomotive in the pressure
the ultimate result depends on the amount of separation between the ends
the unconsciousness and freedom of his movements.
the underlying bursa. The majority of so-called corn solvents consist of
the understanding of the force which produces events, and furnish no
the undertaking. This operation lasted until January, 1917, when the
the undoubted possibility of natural cure, are satisfied with promoting
the unfortunate, but even silver lost its value in relation to gold.
the unhappy quarrel, then against the way in which the war was waged,
the union except Massachusetts, Vermont, Kentucky, and Tennessee. This
the union in 1792 without any property restrictions. In the same year
the union indefinitely. An adjustment of pretensions was the last
the union of the two nations who in conjunction can maintain exclusive
the union, the Federalists had so little influence, on account of their
the union. Is it high strategy of war, a question of the general best
the unions of all the different crafts into a national organization; but
the unspoken is golden. Man can be master of nothing while he fears
the upland region of South Carolina, schooled in poverty and adversity,
the uplifted whip meant that he saw a sitting hare.)
the upper end of the humerus and in the bones in the region of the
the upper extremity, in the middle of the arm. A tourniquet should never
the upper waters of the Ohio while the colony was still under the Penn
the urethra, the face, or the spinal cord, are associated with severe
the use of a shaving-brush contaminated by spores. The path of infection
the use of antiseptic dressings is called for to prevent infection and
the use of cod-liver oil, and from preparations containing iron and
the use of performing various operations on the French who were
the use of the hand, especially in grasping movements and when the hand
the usual formalities he left the lodge and went home.
the usual lines, any chemical agent being finally got rid of, however,
the usurper, the whole nation will certainly throw itself into the
the uterus, for example, from a retained portion of placenta.
the utility companies and the politicians was, to say the least, not
the utmost power and therefore to have the possibility of bringing
the utterance of that foreign word, incomprehensible to others as well
the valley. All this, eloquent of enterprise as it truly is, does not
the vanquished received fifteen million dollars in cash and the
the varicosity. It depends rather upon the degree of pressure in the
the various arrivals, "Charme de vous voir,"* greeted the Rostovs
the various battles four times more men than the French army; the
the various officials, old and young, military and civilian, who
the vascular tension. The benefit derived from potassium iodide
the vast forest that had concealed them and, separating, flowed on and
the vehicles packed with china that had been captured from him at
the vein by pressure, and the symptoms of arterial aneurysm replace
the veins and nerves are similar to those produced by an aneurysm of the
the venous hum disappears.
the verdict of history as the proof of manifest destiny, called for
the vertebral canal and lead to spinal meningitis, which usually proves
the vertebral canal causing pressure on the spinal medulla.
the very couch he had so feared of late.
the very difficulties and preoccupations of the journey, which she
the very edge, but never losing sight of the moving French. That
the very existence of Your Majesty's American dominions.... Deeply
the very fields where the French had now to be fought; the adjacent
the very hour that Kutuzov was reviewing the troops for the first
the very idea of marrying for money is repugnant to me."
the very outset he addressed himself to the problem of the huge public
the very process of dominating another's will was in itself a
the vessel involved.
the vessel lies in contact with bone. The presence of diseased patches
the vessel occupied by clot is brought about by the formation of
the vessel wall leads to the obliteration of the lumen.
the vessel wall, each flap having a small sinus on its cardiac side.
the vessels and vascular spaces undergo a remarkable development. The
the vicinity of a joint, it may interfere with movement; on the medial
the victor belong the spoils of victory," became the avowed principle of
the village joined the haulers, and the wattle wall, which was about
the village of Borodino and thence turned to the left, passing an
the village of Mikulino to that of Shamshevo. To the left of the
the village. Tell it to stop and await my orders."
the villages of Bezubova and Zakharino showed in the distance. On
the virus is attacking developing instead of fully formed tissues.
the virus of syphilis has been introduced at the same time. The
the viscera, mention should be made of gumma of the testis, which causes
the visitors and countess alike--turned to look at her as if wondering
the visitors, and before the visitors I tell you that in future you
the vitality, such as loss of blood, exposure, insufficient food, loss
the voice and a characteristic "brassy" cough may result from paralysis
the voices sounded louder and louder, especially that of the colonel
the volume of immigration. Indeed a material reduction was resolutely
the vulgarity of the expressions that were natural to her, though
the wagons and tied on the loads. The adjutants and battalion and
the waiter filled his glass he changed his mind and altered it to
the wall by people who probably were unaware of the patriotic
the wall of the vein--phlebitis.
the wall, as if running a sword through an invisible foe, and
the wall. Pierre hid his face, from which a faint smile forgot to fade
the walls, and leaving a passage in the middle. Most of them were
the walls. In the middle stood what were probably a king and a
the war could not have occurred.
the war had been waged by the North on the theory that no state could
the war offered many problems. From first to last it extended from
the war that everyone expected and to prepare for which the Emperor
the war with Spain, the Department of State had many an occasion to
the war, and like everyone else unconsciously exaggerated their sorrow
the war, constantly applied to Lincoln the epithet of "Caesar." Wendell
the war.
the watchman's hut or it might be a cavern leading to the very
the water routes of the Lakes, thus creating a strategic center for
the water, which ran along the ruts in streams.
the way full-blooded grown-up men cry, though angry with himself for
the way in which he snapped off negotiations with Colombia and
the way of New Orleans in order to realize funds by drafts on their
the way of production. Under this stern economic necessity, Puritans,
the way! Make way!"
the way!... Let us pass!... Stop there, you devil with the cart!
the way," said an officer.
the wealthy Julie with emotion, and resignation to the Divine will.
the wealthy city.
the weeping Mademoiselle Bourienne in her arms and gently stroking her
the weight of his great name to the inherent merits of the measures
the weight of the body, and the pelvis assumes the shape of a trefoil,
the weight of the body, may interfere with the function of the limb, and
the welfare of his serfs. He was joyfully planning this new life, when
the welfare of the French, German, or English people, or, in its
the wells and fought for the water and drank it down to the mud.
the western forces push toward the east several times in 1805, 1806,
the wet nurse and little Prince Nicholas (as his grandfather called
the wheel and loom were taken out of the homes to the factories operated
the while, new silver lodes, discovered in the Far West, were pouring
the whistle and hiss of the flames, the excited shouts of the
the whistling of projectiles, and the piteous moaning of the cook,
the white man's title to the soil.
the white population was steadily growing. The colored migration
the whiteness of that apron, which symbolized strength and purity;
the whole Northwest to the union while the fate of Washington's army was
the whole army is in despair that this most important place has been
the whole army, from its chiefs to the lowest soldier, without
the whole battle of the twenty-sixth of August took place.
the whole campaign and by the battle of Borodino, the Russian army-
the whole company.
the whole corn crop on any single acre of the Bogucharovo fields.
the whole country. A gage of defiance was thrown down to the
the whole day was finally and indubitably answered in the affirmative.
the whole district, Balashev was brought to Vilna--now occupied by the
the whole foot becomes greatly swollen and distorted by flattening of
the whole length of the table.
the whole locality. The soldiers of Dessaix's division advancing
the whole meaning of a song lies in the words and that the tune
the whole morning calling on the principal Austrian dignitaries.
the whole number of electors appointed; and if no person have such
the whole number shall be necessary to a choice. But no person
the whole of the affected surface is touched with the actual cautery at
the whole of the low tent, as a few weeks previously, on that hot
the whole of the muscles of the upper limb may be flaccid, and the arm
the whole produce along the line of the Illinois River to the East, but
the whole retreat insisted that battles, which were useless then,
the whole story of life. You talk of Bonaparte and his career," said
the whole suite of rooms without drawing breath, and then he
the whole world what it was that people had mistaken for strength as
the whole, the relations between America and the mother country were
the wild laughter that convulsed his usually impassive features.
the wild set led by Dolokhov. Zherkov had met Dolokhov abroad as a
the will and letter are not destroyed, then you will have nothing
the will in Pierre's favor are among the count's papers, then, my dear
the will of the companies holding the franchises. Mergers or unions of
the will of the people, he had been chosen commander in chief. He
the window and beg him for the love of heaven to drive carefully
the window and went to the door. Suddenly the strange sound of a
the window sill, with a pale but radiant face.
the window sill.
the window.
the windows of the Senate House the soldiers threw chairs into the
the windows, icons, woodwork, and still unbuttressed walls, and should
the windows, the fence, and on Pierre's horses standing before the
the windows.
the winter rye and the stubble. Again Erza and Milka were abreast,
the winter, and Natasha felt sure he had already arrived.
the wisdom of his early course. The addition of Santo Domingo to the
the wolf herself that all was now over. The terrified wolf pressed
the wolf jumped up more quickly than anyone could have expected and,
the wolf or understanding the situation. Old Karay had turned his head
the wolf, who, increasing her speed, bounded on in the same
the woman, handing the little girl to her. "Give her back to them,
the women had spread out their linen," said one of the men, gazing
the women of England were enfranchised before the adoption of the
the women of Pennsylvania to work sewing and collecting supplies. Even
the wood (it was plain that he had had a lesson) and stopped behind
the wood a brown hare with white feet sprang out and, scared by the
the wood it had to reform under grapeshot, of which Napoleon was
the wood, should turn the Russian left flank. This could not be done
the wood, with the two scraggy oaks rising above the aspen undergrowth
the word of command.
the word) in the officer's voice, in the expression of his face and in
the words chance and genius become superfluous.
the words of Rostopchin, that French soldiers have to be incited to
the words: "Gallop off to Korchevo and carry out instructions!"
the work of men. Men are His tools." She looked a little above
the work on his farm. In autumn he gave himself up to hunting with the
the work on which he is engaged, even with the air he breathes or
the work.  You can easily comply with the terms of this agreement by
the work.  You can easily comply with the terms of this agreement by
the workers.
the workmen came out the smith, wrenching himself free from the tavern
the world and mention the significant imperial and commercial points
the world had ever seen. Under a Republican administration also the
the world is not right."
the world! But what am I to do if I love her?" he thought, and he
the world, I have not lived till now. At last I live, but I can't live
the world, but we are a different matter..."--without knowing why or
the world, from Africa to the steppes of Muscovy alike, was enough
the world. In the excited state of American opinion, few gave heed to
the worst of it was that the pain distracted him and prevented his
the worst," said the Austrian general, evidently wishing to have
the wound and the virulence of the sepsis would of themselves justify
the wound begin to throw out minute buds and fine processes, which
the wound in a vein is thus held open, the negative pressure during
the wound inspected. Urgent amputations are performed. Moribund patients
the wound is aseptic_, and the ends of the divided nerve are sutured or
the wound is infected with pyogenic bacteria. If it is so infected,
the wound open on a mucous surface, such as the mouth or nasal cavity,
the wound, or if it is serious from the outset and likely to be critical
the wound.
the wounded are to go, and a courier from Petersburg brings a letter
the wrist may be shortened, so as to place the hand in the position of
the wrist takes place just after its emergence from beneath the annular
the wrong he had done Sonya, felt herself to blame toward her, and
the yard stood the carts ready corded. The carriages were at the front
the year he went abroad to be initiated into the higher secrets of the
the years passed these tendencies gained momentum. The already huge
the young Polish count, Willarski, whom Pierre had known slightly in
the young Republicans were taunted by some of their older party
the young bees and rear a queen, and that it exists to perpetuate
the young countess resembled Diana in her passion for the chase as
the young countess?" he asked. "Where is she?"
the young gentleman under his protection stopped him. The firing was
the young ladies. "I can just imagine what a funny figure that
the young lady visitor and the countess' eldest daughter (who was four
the young lady.
the young man as if about to say something in reply, but changed his
the young man's shoulder.
the young man's simple-minded eagerness, was explaining his pet
the young prince. The members of the household were all gathered in
the young soldier at the execution. Pierre looked at the soldier and
the younger generation Pierre and Boris Drubetskoy--awaited the prince
the younger members of the company, and asked himself each time, "What
theater, its wheels squeaking over the snow. Natasha and Sonya,
their activities long before and had already observed the French
their acute onset and progress, and by the absence of other evidence of
their adoption the spirit of liberty and democracy. In 1847 over fifty
their amoeboid movement, or are themselves eaten up by the growing
their annual upkeep. The surplus trees, such as had burdened the
their arguments confuted by such conclusive evidence of the advantages
their armies of slaves from the older states. New Orleans, a good market
their arms and their sabers in the air.
their arms. With the precision and definiteness customary in
their artillery, and half their men, and fled, getting past the
their bands playing, and by the Grand Duke's orders the men had
their bivouacs to the hum of voices, and the army swayed and started
their bodies and with tails turned away from the center of the
their bonds sank to twenty-five or even ten cents on the dollar. The
their bows and trying to escape as quickly as from the glances fixed
their brains to find some thought and hastened to utter it. The old
their campfires. When they had descended to the bridge Petya and
their causing a dilatation of the vessels, and so inducing a hyperaemia
their caustic criticisms of the Federalist President and his policies.
their clinical manifestations may vary, are all associated with the
their cloth was forbidden by the English Parliament. Within two decades
their clothing trades and the manufacture of cotton bagging. Five
their commanding officers, the civilians who managed finances and
their conqueror? Was the will of the Confederation of the Rhine
their consciences. Thousands came to escape the bondage of poverty in
their countrymen in Texas. Unacquainted with the niceties of diplomacy,
their curiosity. In three carriages involved among the munition carts,
their customary course and do everything except what impedes the great
their customary long-established relations on the matter.
their customary pursuits, hasten from one side of Europe to the other,
their decorations, not only the elegant, pomaded officers, but every
their departure by the twenty-eighth of August and the carts that were
their devotion was unstinted and their sacrifices equal to the
their different lodgings. As soon as the men of the various
their dominion in the South. Their declaration that neither the law nor
their doubts about the wisdom of admitting Western states; but the party
their employees to assume the heavy losses due to accidents. The
their enterprise. In a word, they came to look upon the planter as a
their excitability to the faradic current is diminished.
their expression to tear open the veil of convention that separates
their falls, result solely from the greater or lesser fulfillment by
their fearful denunciations of the faithless. They wrote the books for
their fears for the future. So things stood when a swift succession of
their feelings, who discussed Russia's position at the time
their fields, for land without labor was worth no more than land in the
their first child who was delicate, when they had to change the wet
their fortunes beyond the Appalachians, so now Kit Carson, James Bowie,
their fortunes to the New World. Scholars came from Oxford and
their hands. The old count felt this most. He would probably have been
their having been in the battle before Moscow, they cried "Vive
their hearts the one thing needed tomorrow--that which Timokhin has.
their heroic struggle for independence"; newspapers, scouting the
their horses, polished their arms, brought in straw from the
their immersion in antiseptic baths is sometimes useful. The free
their interpretation of the Bible, and, very soon after their arrival in
their knotted purple veins were lying on the quilt; his left eye gazed
their last respects to the deceased filled the house rented by the
their little echoes in just the same way. "Trakh-ta-ta-takh!" came the
their lives. On behalf of nationalism and a perpetual union, the stanch
their lymph from the mouth, nose, throat, and ear.
their march to the frontier. Our dear Emperor has left Petersburg
their masters, had supper, fed the horses, and came out into the
their minds by the fact that they saw they were really useful, as in
their mouths, and fanned it with the skirts of their greatcoats,
their multitude and the immensity of the power they constituted.
their muskets ready, and formed rank. The officers buttoned up their
their mutual affection, and parted smiling, the German returning to
their narration events occur solely by the will of a Napoleon, and
their neighbours. Hutchinson insisted on the fact that there is little
their normal structure. The patient must avoid wearing anything, such as
their number, and who at the best if the flight continued would have
their numbers constantly decreased. In the middle of the day Murat
their numbers, but the sums were either more or less than 666. Once
their old name and chose the simple title of the "Union party."
their operations. Indeed, many of the great mergers or combinations in
their organization and their methods of government, the trustees did not
their origin to this disease, while the abundance of giant cells with
their own accord and increased their pace. The near side horse,
their own accord, and the movement died down of itself just as it
their own hands, he was more than pleased; but he could not marshal the
their own labor. In those regions the number of slaves seldom rose above
their own navy genuine American citizens. The process itself, even when
their own party colleagues in the upper chamber. In the end they were
their own ranks. Their opponents, the Tories, had by this time given up
their own resources what might be needed for the success of the
their own serf carpenters out of their own birchwood. The house was
their own sweet wills, blazed the trail, opening paths and sending back
their passage over. Though the bill was soon repealed, the practice
their pipes. The handsome young soldier who had brought the wood,
their poisons. The onset of the condition is marked by a feeling of
their positions and maintaining a hellish fire under which the
their posts and put an end to smuggling. In the revenue act of June 29,
their power of resistance, that the virulence of the most active
their power, he resolutely took the salver with both hands and
their presentation at the office of the Assistant Treasurer of the
their proper values. On the one side of the ledger must be set the
their protests on record. Abigail, the ingenious and witty wife of John
their proximity to the head of the government may be. This
their pupils retain as they pass along the regular route. No teacher of
their rear by seven in the morning but had not reached it by five in
their regiment, and addressing the company in general asked whether
their regiments, the others go off by themselves in different
their reign, the principle had become well established that the king did
their respective numbers, which shall be determined by adding to the
their riches, put in their own eloquent pleas. But the members of
their riders into the ravine. Petya rode beside Denisov, the pulsation
their right to live in any of the dominions, but owing to the easy-going
their romance, up to the appearance of the pauvre mere; they
their seats in the dining room, according to their rank and
their selection of a candidate. The tariff plank might carry
their serried lines of homesteads to the Rockies and beyond.
their shops, and service was being held in the churches as usual.
their shoulders and checking the peasants, who were walking unevenly
their status in society, their influence on the course of events will be
their subject to the already overloaded curriculum. If the successive
their surmises and the rewards this or that general received; but
their sway to the entire domain. California was a state of more than
their tea talked of the price of corn, the crops, and the good weather
their things and was busy for whole days. The count and countess
their ticket, the Republican convention, in a whirlwind of enthusiasm,
their toe-nails carelessly or tear them with their fingers. Where the
their trade and set royal officers upon them to enforce the law. This
their training in Germany, took up the pen in defense of the Central
their trophic nerve cells in the spinal medulla. Immediate suturing of
their turn for an audience showed embarrassment and servility; the
their unwillingness to see the Spanish colonies transferred to any other
their very tails, and a watery light showed itself through the bare
their visits to the French theater and aroused to a patriotic
their wagons and cattle; and that they were seldom out of the sound of
their wealth or free white population, as the convention might decide.
their white neighbors as farmers or cattle raisers. The disappearance of
their whiteness, "the peasants at Mozhaysk were saying that when
their withdrawal in perfect order. The old prince understood from this
their work was still subject to the approval of the states, frankly said
theirs?" said the woman.
them (in his dream the category to which these men belonged was as
them Metivier who from the time Helene reached Moscow had been an
them Pierre realized what contempt and animosity they all felt for the
them Prince Andrew was natural and pleasant. Others, the majority,
them a little, but the thought of her husband and his unreasonable
them a three days' rest and then, on the sixteenth of September, to go
them all the more zealous in the defense of every right against
them and grew more impatient the longer he waited. Lying on his bed
them and the English government supervised their local affairs, their
them as presents now became the most exacting of the creditors.
them at the mercy of their masters." It would not be unfair to add that
them at the railway stations and special cars on the railway lines. In
them be taken... where's the hurry?"
them by the white ribbon they will wear on the left arm. Several
them chose; but, as few masters had cash to dispense, the new relation
them continuously from the White House. The natural resources of the
them cut the crops and burn wood to their hearts' content. I don't
them enter the tete-de-pont.* They spin him a thousand gasconades,
them experienced in fighting but few of them "regulars" in the military
them exposed to the blood-stream.
them from the mouth, and also with pyogenic organisms. _The submental
them from the other end of the corridor, Strauch, an Austrian
them happens solely for the attainment of their sheepish aims; they
them in pure, correct French many interesting details about the armies
them in the same words, about their health and her own, and the health
them into opposition to the British Crown and Parliament. Most of them
them into the river Marina and drowned some eighteen thousand in one
them it was a question of the life or death of their fatherland, and
them itself. America in this way set out upon the high road that led
them lymph exudes and leucocytes migrate into the tissues. In from
them of the golden bridge, and they laughed at and slandered him,
them on the march to Radzivilov.
them or make them move. On the one hand, the chief steward put the
them or to go where he was sent. This was the brilliant charge of
them rode the King of Naples himself accompanied by a numerous suite.
them self-government and control of their own affairs." The following
them smiled seriously at the merry fellow, while the merry fellow
them so, and that they must stop this and the carts must be got
them stood the two younger princesses holding handkerchiefs to their
them swiftly beneath the feet of Thy faithful servants! For Thou art
them the right to demand answers to their questions, and that the sole
them the round-faced officer who had marched so gaily and
them to come to the United States. By act of Congress in 1907 the
them to defend their country--the very incitement which was the
them to demand the entire archipelago, on the theory that the occupation
them to the old order and dreaded with genuine horror all thought of
them up again, and themselves carried goods away with the help their
them up, to find an answer to the question that engrossed him. He
them when he heard a familiar, lisping, voice behind the shed.
them with the noise of firing, they came to a small wood. There it was
them with the other squadrons.
them would get angry or sulky with her; but the serfs fulfilled no
them) listened with alarm, supposing these words to mean that the
them, 'You shall not press upon the brow of labor this crown of thorns.
them, De Bow, lamenting that "the great cities of the North have
them, and for her in particular. He had promised to be at the ball and
them, and he asked where the old prince was and whether he was
them, and she doubts the means we have of gaining them. That is the
them, as it had to go: that is, never in the way people devised, but
them, but feared lest the prince might at any moment indulge in some
them, on the contrary, run farther away. Among the soldiers in the
them, such as the so-called "recurrent fibroid of Paget," grow
them, thought they were Austrians, and all at once discovered from the
them, which they had given out to the prisoners to make up into
them. All were conscious of this unseen line, and the question whether
them. Alpatych also knew that on the previous day another peasant
them. By this act he precipitated the conflict he had sought to avoid.
them. He repudiated socialism and the socialists, on both theoretical
them. He walked among the crowd with rapid steps, scanning the various
them. If he is not rich I will give her the means; I will ask my
them. Not only were huge sums offered for the horses and carts, but on
them. Prince Andrew, taking advantage of the Emperor's permission,
them. The mass of the people, however, bent on the great experiment,
them. There were wounded in the yards, at the windows of the houses,
them; and by a series of measures Congress put the entire man power of
them; but the later the lesions the less is the risk of their containing
them; finally they had to yield themselves. The last struggle in
themselves about the room.
themselves along the Vozdvizhenka, the Nikolski, and the Tverskoy
themselves and the church." Roads and bridges were built; millions were
themselves and the connection in which the historical persons stood to
themselves around some particular incident. So now the courtiers'
themselves as in the depths of a forest amid that crowd of
themselves at the Club, but met in private houses in intimate circles,
themselves become dangerous. As a rule, the propriety of using a vaccine
themselves by the example of Krasnoe and of the Berezina. It is only
themselves in the other sleigh.
themselves in the same way.
themselves just as strangely, unexpectedly, and at the same time
themselves of Kutuzov's absence and of the fine weather. A short,
themselves the least responsibility and vice versa.
themselves to come along and do the work. But the Arizonians, mindful of
themselves to the extent of disobeying sentinels and officers, and
themselves with such nonsense, continued to lie at the opposite side
themselves), the officers on foot and at their proper posts. Boris had
themselves, and in this way the natural cure of certain diseases is
themselves, and show that the new force they have devised does not
themselves, issued by the Congress in May, 1776, was quickly acted upon.
themselves, spent their days wielding the pick and shovel, and their
themselves, their situation, and the person for whom they were
themselves, tried to keep near the commander in chief (whose bench
themselves. In this way the female part of families by their industry
then "Hurrah!"... Then the general march, and again "Hurrah!
then Napoleonic France itself. To strain the facts to fit the rules of
then again looking at the fire, which seemed to him dazzlingly red,
then another, and the sound of hundreds of seemingly merry French
then another, sprang helter-skelter from the wood opposite and the
then appointed to supervise the enrollment decreed throughout
then at another, and their faces for the most part only expressed
then at what was approaching in the distance from the opposite side-
then back again, re-entering, he by the front and she by the back
then back, and between the two rows, which separated, the Emperor
then be removed through a small incision; otherwise, the joint must be
then cast off, the irritation resulting from the contact of the dead
then choose a middle course. They insisted on the retention of the
then footsteps were heard. Natasha was looking at the mirror, but
then forms between the lips of the wound in the vessel wall and projects
then having subjected to criticism the explanation of "power" that
then he wrote this vile, infamous paper, but I thought the thing was
then made complete. The blood supply of the proposed flap may influence
then of the unexplained trowel, he told him to toil with it to cleanse
then penalized by embargoes, opposed the declaration of war on Great
then prevailed in the government--an activity that in the opinion of
then proposed to carry over into city government an idea from the
then rubbed with methylated spirit, which is allowed to dry on the skin.
then splashing into puddles as they crossed a road. The misty sky
then spoken of as a _phlebolith_; it gives a shadow with the X-rays.
then the Constitution disappears and Congress is supreme. Since,
then the aide-de-camp who had opened the ball, and several other young
then the center of power, saw no good reason for expansion. The planters
then the consequences of my action are still plainer to me and I
then they both paused while the orchestra played and the man
then think of luring Napoleon on, but quite the contrary. The luring
then to the old countess' rooms.
then went into the maids' room. There an old maidservant was grumbling
then women's. The voices grew in harmonious triumphant strength, and
then words of abuse, dreadful words, ejaculated one after the other.
then, if it must be!" and she slammed the casement.
then, testing her strength, ran upstairs again, observing the result.
then. The time for Prince Andrew's return and marriage was
then? What am I going to do?" And he immediately gave himself the
thence in the blood-stream. These emboli lodge in the minute vessels of
theoreticians who so love their theory that they lose sight of the
theorist in whom all the characteristics of those others were united
theory by a huge experiment and proving its soundness to the whole
theory can always say that such and such a person took the lead
theory from the fact that the humerus is rarely involved below the
theory of the Constitution. That theory, as every one knows, was
therapeutic benefit in syphilis. Pain or restlessness may call for the
there a courier fresh from the army, an acquaintance of his own, who
there again kindled in all those faces the same expression of
there any freshness. But on the road, the highroad along which the
there are cases in which removal by operation is impossible, the
there are frequent twitchings of the limb. A characteristic reflex is
there are reasons for this and that I could not have exiled the
there are wavy red lines running from the source of infection towards
there at the ball, in those brightly lighted rooms--with music,
there can be no doubt about the victory for the battlefield remains in
there develop a series of small, hard, round nodules in the skin and
there for five minutes left the room.
there for. Am I not right, good Christians?" said the tall youth, with
there grew up along the coast a number of prosperous commercial centers
there had not been time to move. The Emperor, surrounded by his
there himself, Prince Bagration sent Zherkov to tell the general in
there in the meadow behind the village, three of them are dragging
there is a considerable amount of intercellular fibrous tissue, the
there is a double bed. He lay down on the edge of it and I burned with
there is a loose body in the joint--but is met with chiefly in the
there is a minimum amount of blood-clot between them, when the patient
there is a narrowing of the spaces between the articular ends of the
there is an effusion into the joint, especially the knee or elbow; and
there is considerable pain, and the discharge is purulent and often
there is impairment of mobility which affects the thumb, and to a less
there is more or less uniform thickening of the tunica intima from
there is more tendency for the disease to relapse and to invade the
there is much distension of the joint, considerable relief follows upon
there is no pitting on pressure, and the swelling does not disappear on
there is pain, as well as incapacity of the limb. As in ordinary oedema,
there is paralysis of the coraco-brachialis, biceps, and part of the
there is subcutaneous ecchymosis, and the accumulation of blood may
there may be blood pigment in the urine. The severity of these phenomena
there may be nothing to suggest the presence of an abscess.
there must be no traction on the flap that will endanger its blood
there must be some control had of the situation.... If force was denied,
there rose before him the Danube at bright noonday: reeds, the Russian
there round the taverns solitary shouts or drunken songs could be
there should be no discriminations against other nations in the matter
there tenderness on pressing over the nerve, or sensations of tingling
there to the church of St. Nicholas on the Arbat, where he had long
there twice fired his pistol. So now the general explicitly forbade
there was a decided drift in affairs. For one thing, the proportion of
there was a possibility that war and the occupation of Venezuelan
there was a war near Moscow, there would be fighting at the town
there was an order not to move, and that they would unharness the
there was enough truth in them to warrant renewed vigilance on the part
there was much talk of the grandeur of this important meeting.
there was no need to hurry. However, he put his horse to a trot in the
there was nobody else in the room, addressed Pierre.
there was nothing he could teach them. All the powers of his soul,
there was one of boredom, curiosity as to the meaning of the
there was the same furniture, the same walls, sounds, and smell, and
there was to be observed a distinct severing of the old ties between
there were all ready for the breaking plow great reaches of almost
there were intelligent children who grew up in the great colonial school
there were several hundred people in the Kentucky region. Like the older
there were still the count's games of whist and boston, at which-
there were the foul air and the dust.
there were three ways of handling the delicate situation--and only
there where the rows of hay are lying in the hollow, there's the
there! Oh yes, mon cher, he is the greatest man of the ages past or
there, as a dense cloud of smoke arose from it. The hussars had
there, as the result of innumerable and varying forces, did people
there, just as you will inevitably have to learn what lies the other
there, that the hounds had separated into two packs, that somewhere
there," and he pointed to the village in front of them with the
there. Pierre had the air of a man preoccupied with considerations
there. That was what the officers desired. But it was impossible to
there?" he said, turning to the door as he heard a tread of heavy
thereafter to the states for their review.
thereby aggravate and perpetuate the tuberculous disease. This
thereby became still more attractive to them. Returning from the yard,
thereby showing how unjust were the reproaches Princess Mary had
thereby torn across. The cyst is usually situated between the skin and
therefore be described as _permanent signs of the inherited disease_:
therefore generally regarded the change with satisfaction as a return to
therefore met with unaltered looks the angrily inquisitive
therefore organized publicity in the Virginias, Iowa, Ohio, Indiana,
therefore presented to the mind on every side as the necessary, natural,
therefore variously interpreted. The life of old Prince Bolkonski,
therefore you seek wisdom and virtue. Is that not so?" said the
therefore, a formal affair, but was constantly employed on the
therefore, he urged, is the task before Congress. "With adequate revenue
therefore, to find business men taking the lead in breaking down
thereof a stable and independent government of their own." To the form
thermogene wool, and the knee is flexed over a pillow; in some cases
these actions from men above him; he himself never gives an order. The
these are the steppes of Asia! It's a nasty country all the same. Au
these away. Put this on the seat and this to the right."
these battalions went away, the guns would remain without support.
these bearded peasants at work on the battlefield, with their queer,
these burst there are formed a number of openings in the skin, giving it
these cases, and is best employed by packing the wound with iodoform
these changes are taking place the collateral arteries become enlarged,
these circumstances, he nevertheless delivered the definite order that
these conditions exists--the facts of history almost always contradict
these conditions, a malignant transformation of the fibroma into sarcoma
these differ from the type; and that we may in addition recognise the
these difficult circumstances, and that in all the world he alone
these diseases. Lastly, in the _tetany_ of children, or that following
these drugs are specially indicated when sugar is present in the urine.
these ends it is the right of the people to alter or abolish it and
these exclamations, and dimly made out something leaning against the
these fugitives were allowed to pass by special permission. The eyes
these gloves do not deck hands that are unclean." While the Grand
these historians not as the results of free transferences of the
these is attended with infiltration, the prepuce cannot be pulled
these jesting remarks he rose, taking Pierre by the arm, and drew
these may be added, interference with function in the inflamed part, and
these may readily disseminate the infection.
these means by an act worthy of himself and of the French army, he let
these memories temptations of the devil would surge into her
these operations, the canal of exit through the bone should be
these people lagged behind himself--who never left the country--in
these people"--he pointed to the peasants--"asks you to come up to the
these points, it must be borne in mind that the damage to the deeper
these she had prolonged conversations in private on the vanity of
these tastes, and he was incapable of considering what the
these towns. Serving as the port of entry for Pennsylvania, Delaware,
these two scenes may be measured the change in the privileges of women
these two seats of infection has been the subject of considerable
these two, the main, if not the sole, current of immigration was from
these various meanings to the factor does not yield results which
these, corrosive sublimate is the most generally used. Wood-wool
they accepted the suffrage provisions of the states.
they advanced in support of their program was simple. Most of the
they all seemed attentive to what was happening on the stage, and
they are commonest on the sole of the foot and other parts subjected to
they are depressed or elevated in relation to the surrounding parts. (2)
they are described with the diseases of muscles.
they are immovably fixed to the adjacent bone by suture, pegs, or
they are incompetent and fail to support the column of blood which bears
they are spread, account for the diffuse nature of the process.
they are the most aggravatedly criminal; of all villains, they are the
they are thrown into spasm by the abnormal impulses of tetanus.
they are to cross last and to fire the bridge as I ordered; and the
they asked few questions about the effect of this "alien invasion" upon
they asked him a few questions about the army and the battle, and then
they asked the old man: 'What are you being punished for, Daddy?'--'I,
they attack our center we, having the center battery on this high
they avoided looking at the young couple, and heedless and unobservant
they be "drawn into the arms of, or be dependent upon foreigners."
they became the direct government of the country they possessed. The
they began burying the dead--where the battle was you know--well,
they besought the delegates to endorse socialism. The president of the
they both knew, had moved with her cubs to the Otradnoe copse, a small
they brought him news that Murat had been taken prisoner, and the
they called the room for the hunt servants.
they can reply to history's essential question: what is power? The
they comprehended the destiny of the nation. Sons of Federalist fathers
they could compel obedience to law. The two great powers of government,
they could not possibly be, and so did not deliver the order.
they could within the British lines or into Canada, where the British
they crowded the Southern ports with their vessels. The English Royal
they cursed the day before and will curse again a month later.
they did all they could to destroy themselves. From the time they
they do the guns."
they enjoyed in British markets and under the protection of the British
they enjoyed many advantages over the New England rivals, and at the
they entered, the bronze handle of one of the doors turned and
they fell off their horses. Some of the horses were drowned and some
they gave that the story about Sergey Kuzmich, the laughter, and the
they got to the hollow the less they could see but the more they
they had a majority, and in this they were vigorously supported by the
they had done at the start. It was here that the prisoners for the
they had fled, stirred anew the ancient wrath against that combination.
they halted in silence. There was nothing fresh to be seen from the
they have come to," said he, pointing to the prisoners. "Worse off
they heal and then break out again; sometimes the skin becomes infected,
they insisted in season and out that reformers who desired to rid the
they insisted on the admission of Missouri as a slave state, balanced
they knew anything of the 6th Regiment. None of them knew anything,
they knew ought to be talked over at length. At last the
they last met and both were in a hurry to show the changes that had
they look like sinuses running through the muscles, a feature that must
they may be part of a general infection involving the endocardium,
they might "wring one more President from the bloody shirt." They
they might be laughing at his way of life) he himself joined in the
they might be up to on the sly" (she meant that they would be
they might be who were to blame for the false and ridiculous
they never took their eyes off the couple. In the intervals of the
they often survive several severe attacks. After middle life the
they operated through agents sent to the colony. When they came over the
they owe of respect to the dead and buried history--the dead and buried
they passed the church opposite the house. Those who were to remain in
they present no tendency to ulcerate and bleed unless the overlying skin
they pressed westward until, by the close of the colonial period, they
they pursued it steadfastly to the end. First, they applied force
they pushed it through Congress. So Texas, amid the groans of Boston and
they reached the frontier.
they received their compensation in the contract labor law. In 1862
they regard Smolensk as the place where they hope to recover. During
they retired. He could not bear the idea of letting the enemy even
they revered neither the government nor the church of England imposed
they rose with their prosperity in the social and political scale. It
they saw in him only No. 17 of the captured Russians, arrested and
they saw the French.
they seem to-day, had a profound influence on colonial life and on the
they set the swift express, rushing from New York to San Francisco in
they settled down in the sitting room, "does it ever happen to you
they shouted at the militiamen who stood hesitating before the man
they sold most of their cotton. The tariff, they contended, raised the
they sought to enter a wage contract with the great companies; they
they stand in the social hierarchy the less are they free.
they tend to prevent evaporation from the skin. Opium should be given
they tend to spread upwards towards the abdomen, and, to a less extent,
they themselves were in, of giving way to the pity they felt for the
they tilled and looking to the sun in heaven and the labor of their
they violated the Sherman Anti-Trust law. In taking this step Chief
they were all contemptible because their aim was the welfare of
they were being taken to the proper place. Pierre felt himself to be
they were by half the world, and so he had to repudiate truth,
they were greeting was riding quickly. When the soldiers of the
they were in the carriage. "He hardly recognizes anybody."
they were left alone in the drawing room.
they were not Christians, but they too have souls. It's what the old
they were not ready. He did not wish to deprive them of the pleasure
they were on the headwaters of the Ohio and in possession of a flatboat,
they were powerful friends of protection for American enterprise. As the
they were the cause of the firing and shouting. But the firing and
they whispered to one another, and the old servant who was holding the
they who gave the East no rest until their vision was seen by the
they would all have to go begging. The count was so weak, and
they would be content with nothing short of free coinage at the ratio of
they wrung from President Hayes a measure forbidding the use of United
they'll say so again and again, and that will be the end of it. My
they, or territories organized out of them, could come into the union as
thick and curved, and the ends of the fingers become club-shaped. Skin
thick mustache trembled as he untied the ropes. The body collapsed.
thickened and its bright green stood out sharply against the
thickened by the deposit in them of connective tissue, this variety
thickening of the bone affected, both on the surface and in the
thickening of the ends of the nerves, embedded in scar tissue at the
thickening of the periosteum, oedema, pain, and tenderness on pressure
thickening of the synovial membrane. In a small number there is an
thickening of the tunica intima, whereby the lumen of the vessel becomes
thickening of the wall may take place in a uniform and concentric
thickens, and as the granulation tissue is slowly replaced by young
thickens, and eventually forming the smooth, non-vascular covering of
thickly and with a faraway look in his shining eyes, he told the whole
thickly overgrown with bushes and were firing at the Cossacks who
thickness it assumes a bluish hue and eventually the cells become
thickness of the soft tissues is destroyed by the ulcerative process,
thickness. The fat disappears and is replaced by a mucoid effusion
thigh broken by a shell splinter, had been carried into the kitchen.
thigh, is soft and prominent when the muscle is relaxed, less prominent
thigh, the two communicating by a narrow channel under Poupart's
thin face, looked at Pierre kindly, with a fixed smile. The third
thin piece of lint or gauze is applied over the inflamed part and kept
thin, and pathological fracture may result. The bone becomes expanded,
thin, the other dark, shaggy, and sinewy, with a flat nose. The
thing as before, yet when under the same conditions and with the
thing for the Rostovs, they are said to be utterly ruined."
thing is impossible. I only wish I could spare my brother the first
thing is that the Emperor is here. How he looked at me and wished to
thing that could happen. They went away even before the battle of
thing that left the deepest mark on her mind was the solidarity of the
thing the farther I go forward in my judgment, the more doubtful
thing to do), arson cannot be regarded as the cause, for the same
thing, in the interest of a great monopoly. For another thing, it
thing. After the destruction of Moscow and of his property, thrown out
thing; of the press and political activity, for another. Merchants and
things compared with the heights to which his soul had just been
things depended on arrangements made by the staff, I should be there
things had to be. From the passage they went into a large, dimly lit
things in the history of labor. Bondmen differed from the serfs of the
things on the staff had of late been exceedingly strained. Ermolov had
things that he has been expelled by the police."
things used in the course of the operation, or from the dressings
things, Defects may take the form of incomplete, inaccurate or
things, Defects may take the form of incomplete, inaccurate or
things, accepted Pierre's taking up his residence in the house without
things, that Congress could make no law respecting the establishment of
things," and the skin over his left temple puckered, "either you
things. But the work of unloading, once started, could not be
things: either a return to the former belief in the direct
think of her?--The real truth, because you know Andrew is risking so
think that he would go away without having sold his three roans to the
think that they will show themselves unworthy of the noble prize for
think you were talking of the Schon Grabern affair? Were you there?"
thinkers, but has never been denied. They do not see that the role
thinking about the game as he always thought only of whatever he was
thinking of? Not of the military regulations or of the arrangement
thinking only of their own losses but kindling hatred of the foe.
thinking the matter over told himself that he would propose
thinking, mechanically broke the seal and read a love letter from
thinking--and the pretext for that was a game of patience. When she
thinking. I go to bed after two in the morning, thoughts come and I
thinks it is doing something for itself--he submissively fulfilled the
thinks, or at any rate feels, anyone who comes in sight of the
thinned and gives way, resulting in the formation of a sinus.
third house in the village of Gorki.
third report shook the air, then a fourth and a fifth boomed
third room came sounds of laughter, the shouting of familiar voices,
third year. Lands were sold by one legislature and the sales were
third, protection from outside interference.... The greedy commercialism
third; and the vicomte was served up to the company in the choicest
thirds of a mile was stopped on the highroad. Rostov saw the
thirteen and fourteen do who are wearing long dresses for the first
thirteen in your family and all the property... They've brought us
thirteen. All but two were in the West. Two of them were in the
thirtieth he attacked Mortier's division, which was on the left
thirty days after inoculation, to be followed, in about half the cases,
thirty to seventy per cent of the population. This marked the doom of
thirty, the advantage to the owner of the coupon was obvious. Moreover
thirty," said he, looking at Shinshin and the count with a joyful,
thirty-eight guns were taken on the spot, besides standards and
thirty-five feet long and seven feet high, moved forward along the
thirty-five years, and been fourteen years a resident within the United
thirty-three per cent on the invested capital. "This," said a
thirty-two states. The United States, Great Britain, France, Italy, and
this Republican opposition lay partly in the terms of peace imposed on
this agreement for keeping the Project Gutenberg-tm name associated with
this agreement for keeping the Project Gutenberg-tm name associated with
this aim, we occupy ourselves either with the mystery which in our
this apparent supineness was not all due to the British generals. The
this arrangement that led the Chinese delegation to withhold their
this by measures directed towards improving the general health, by the
this caused some delay at the doors, but after all he did at last
this company the insignificance of those people was so definitely
this confusion, division, and the unpopularity of the foreign
this conjecture was confirmed by the sad tone in which her elders
this continent and its fiat is law upon the subjects to which it
this did duty for bedsteads and couches. The roof was so constructed
this end has derived its new blood supply, the other end is detached
this example, thus helping to enhance the price of the yellow metal. All
this expectation did not upset the regular routine of life in the
this extraordinary gathering not only of nobles but also of the
this feeling from others and even from herself, the stronger it
this final step was given by the rise of the Populist movement in the
this generalization the whole series of commands is also generalized
this goal is the greatness of the Roman, Spanish, or French realm;
this group there are also two clinical types. The first is met with in
this has not been demonstrated. The infection is supposed to be conveyed
this heart, so kind and generous? Say 'perhaps'... The future is so
this hemisphere. The positive obligations resulting from its application
this holiday time. "Seize the moments of happiness, love and be loved!
this holiday: everywhere were blackened ruins, and the few Russians to
this indication is the cause. But despite their endeavors to prove
this institution. The price of the government bonds would be increased,
this is confined to the synovial and peri-synovial tissues--_acute
this is impracticable, a ligature is applied above and below the
this is in turn aspirated, and then 1 or 2 c.c. of the solution injected
this is right on the other side."
this last period of the campaign is quite rightly considered by the
this law, there was passed and submitted to the states the fourteenth
this letter, he launched his expedition, and in the spring of 1818 was
this loving despot--the more cruel because he loved her and for that
this may be my only chance of seeing the Emperor. It won't be long now
this may be produced in a variety of ways. In certain diseases of the
this method of observation it often happens that the observer,
this mighty exploit, which began in the spring of 1804 and ended in the
this most noble, most excellent, and truly divine constitution." The
this movement Governor La Follette of Wisconsin took the lead and his
this new appeal with alacrity--an augury of the secession to come.
this note of defiance, couched in the language used in the Kentucky
this old man, living alone in the country for so many years, could
this or that the man ought to have known it for himself.
this performed, they either pass back into the circulation in virtue of
this period, the Republicans also took a broad view of their obligations
this point, the Republicans in Congress proposed to write into the
this procedure affords the freest possible access. Diseased synovial
this process the coagulum only plays a passive role by forming a
this provision of law, the call for the convention had expressly stated
this purpose there was advanced a scheme known as the recall--which
this question. All the contradictions and obscurities of history and
this red borzoi. Natasha saw and felt the agitation the two elderly
this results in the formation of a thrombus which occludes the vessel.
this rule which leaves out of account the spirit of the army
this scab the formation of granulation tissue, its transformation into
this spot" (he stooped and pointed to the sloping ledge outside the
this station, but compared to the thoughts that now occupied him it
this stranger the trouble, but the Mason told him that was not
this the old man inspired in all his visitors alike a feeling of
this time it was defeated by the upper house of the Danish parliament.
this time the women had more supporters among the men. Horace Greeley,
this to the princess, Alpatych had his own belongings taken out of the
this unknown essence of life while that essence itself can only be the
this unknown factor--the spirit of an army--is a problem for science.
this victory. The opponents of the greenbacks, unable to stop the
this was sufficient to cause his whole body to slip as he sat on the
this whispering and feeling the sensation of this drawing out and
this whole drone population of the army began blowing hard that way,
this you will see that you have a perfect right to reassure the
this, burst into the room. He opened the casement. The night was
this, but in the second year of his marriage his view of that form
this, the remarks of all except Pfuel had one common trait that had
this, they should be painted with cocaine and then cauterised. When the
this. Drooping in spirit and closing their eyes before the menacing
this. Involuntarily Rostov recalled all the good he had heard about
this?" But these doubts only lasted a moment. Pierre glanced at the
thoracic duct, the pleura, or the junction of the subclavian and
thorough-going democracy and I wished to make the democracy industrial
thoroughly discouraged about the outcome of pacific measures. When the
those Penza and Nizhegorod estates and had apportioned the use of
those along the posterior border of the sterno-mastoid. In many cases
those at the groin, the distension of the veins may be so great that
those chaises!... See that fellow there sitting on the trunks....
those countries where it is not yet known." The Czar, who incidentally
those dead had been lying there for nearly a month, and says the
those efforts were redoubled, and with lengthening years told upon the
those for the tibial (internal popliteal). After complete division, all
those in the axilla, from cancer of the breast; those along the
those in the nature of a civil strife, it was found necessary to use
those laws is the problem of history.
those of a certain marshal when approaching Moscow. He gazed at the
those of a merry peasant dance) began to sound, all the doorways of
those of his regiment, to Timokhin and the like--people quite new to
those of ordinary pyogenic infection; the involvement of the bone may be
those of other labor groups before them had failed; and the rank and
those of shock; and it is treated on the same lines.
those of the arterio-venous form, the systolic bruit persisting, while
those of the commander in chief.
those of the enemy, but, as a result of the loss of the Shevardino
those of the face and of the cranial vault, are also exempt. The
those of the hospital class who suffer from it tend to accumulate in
those of the symbol."
those pills to give by the clock, the warm drinks, the chicken
those postures which predispose to deformities, the child should lie as
those presented by the limb of a corpse.
those recently arrived from Russia, both Guards and regiments of the
those regions lay stretched out in the shade of a convenient palm,
those resulting from heat. Electricity and the Rontgen rays also produce
those situated at the root of the neck, is more certain. Extirpation of
those strongest of all influences: the intrigues, flattery, and
those taking the largest direct share in the event take on
those that are lost and making it possible for the graft to become
those that have been absorbed into the nervous system. Thorough
those which give rise to secondary growths in the marrow of bones and
those who are, or have been, the subjects of tuberculous disease.
those who by force, intimidation, or threat interfered with the
those who had come with Napoleon and about the uniforms they wore, and
those who wavered in the singleness of their devotion to the union.
those who were moving the gun.
those who were not themselves dressed up, the young people decided
those with the pioneering spirit made ready to take possession of the
those words and understood the meaning of the rebuke and despair in
though Napoleon was already not far from Kutuzov on the old Kaluga
though at Helene's one had to ridicule the Moscow enthusiasm, at
though defeated, was not out of the sphere of American influence; for,
though each retained its own peculiarities and made concessions to the
though he evidently enjoyed the beauty of his companion, was
though in imagination he had long regarded himself as the possessor of
though in revenge for this failure, the enemy placed ten guns to the
though it knew that the time of its destruction was near when the
though mentioned, was not taken seriously. Abuse of the opposition was
though not at heart a keen sportsman, knew the rules of the hunt well,
though sectional, was a part of the national system of economy. Northern
though the French had offered to move him from the men's to the
though the calm frost of twenty degrees Reaumur, the dazzling sunshine
though the fear of huge military establishments was equally present. The
though the law of inevitability in history, like the law of Copernicus
though ultimately vanquished, attack of terror before the unknown.
thought Rostov, "that the Emperor will meet me and give me an order as
thought Sonya as she stood in the dark passage, "now or never I must
thought about certain particulars in the indictments brought against
thought and spirit of the land. The appearance, during the struggle with
thought as to who had taken whom prisoner, the Frenchman ran back to
thought he, and dismounted slowly among the guns. He delivered the
thought he. And he turned round and galloped back to the place where
thought how he would impress Boris and all his comrades of the
thought it would be the easiest way to abate Indian troubles. The
thought of buying the whole Louisiana country. He was simply dazed when
thought of his friend and how much he expected of him in the future.
thought of such a thing, it is only the cabinet that says it."
thought of the dangers to which her brother, the only intimate
thought of the future. "What then?... Then, I don't know.... But why
thought of the humiliation of arrogant Austria and that in a week's
thought of the life that lay before her.
thought of the separation awaiting her and drawing near had not
thought of whom now the blood rushed to his heart and he felt a
thought that Rugay, the red hound, was like Uncle, and that if he were
thought the major-domo on his master's behalf.
thought the old prince. And he began explaining why he could not put
thought the princess, turning away and continuing to read. But Julie
thought turned him back on to the track of his morning's anger,
thought, and with the gentle, patronizing intonation natural to a
thought, and, having deduced the refutation he needed, would again
thought, expecting every moment to meet the monarch, and conscious
thought, felt, and seen so much (having traveled both in the east
thought, recalling that she had been here the Sunday before, "and
thought--referring to the little princess who was not in the dining
thought. Having wept, talked, and wiped away their tears, the two
thought. She opened the door and the bright daylight in that
thought: "I am going to save the army."
thoughts about the women.
thoughts before going to her father. The doctor came downstairs and
thoughts of her betrothed, of Princess Mary, or of life in the country
thoughts of the vanity of all things human came to him oftener than
thoughts rather than the trend of the conversation--"and that's a
thoughts to the state of Moscow.
thoughts, quite contrary to the restless confusion into which he
thousand Germans came to America, the forerunners of a migration that
thousand against a hundred thousand. Yet the shrewd and experienced
thousand feet upon the cliffs ... are as much business men as the few
thousand had fallen in battle. From this beginning the succeeding
thousand in the North as against nearly seven hundred thousand in the
thousand men and spent many millions." Then came an inquiry whether the
thousand men required to secure his personal safety, and that the
thousand men, and the downfall of Napoleonic France, on which at
thousand miles away at Washington. The new Republican party in 1856
thousand miles of railway. By 1880 the figure had doubled. During the
thousand miles were cut off the sea voyage from New York to San
thousand persons attend the whirling wheels driven by steam. They write
thousand pounds freehold. A state senator in Massachusetts had to be the
thousand rubles quitrent received from Pierre's peasants, which the
thousand thanks, dear friend, for the volume you have sent me and
thousand ways. The demand for farm machinery, clothing, boots, shoes,
thousand who could see their appeals on the printed page. Men who had
thousand, and he would find himself in the position of Mack at Ulm. If
thousand-ruble as well as the one-ruble borzois. That's it, come
thousand. He had fixed on that number because forty-three was the
thousand. Rostov had just prepared a card, by bending the corner of
thousands could easily dispense with the services of any particular
thousands of bushels every hour. The refrigerator car and ship made the
thousands of miles of railways, revealing the magic strength of
thousands of them who actually fought in the union army, the Republicans
thousands of workers during the rush months and turned them out at other
thrashing for letting a private traveler have the courier horses.
thread is attached, is inserted into the space from which the tumour was
thread. A third with pins in her mouth was running about between the
thread. Radium causes a reaction in the tissues attended with exudation
threads in the subcutaneous cellular tissue.
threatened the very existence of the young government. Washington and
threatened to cut the American standard to the point of subsistence. By
threatened to strike him, and on being led out had rushed into the
threatened with "condign punishment the authors, perpetrators, and
threatened with starvation if unemployed, was no match for the employer
threatening Bald Hills--even then I wouldn't serve in the Russian
threatening cloud during the hay harvest he would return from the
threateningly at the end as at the beginning of the battle. The
threats and intimidation curtailed the sale of British goods and the use
threats in no way endangering the security of the measures by which
three and then four more appeared and then from each, with the same
three columns, went on as a single group. The symptoms of disorder
three days after the delivery of his speech at the lodge he lay on a
three hundred thousand. Between 1820 and 1860 the immigrants from the
three millions in 1850. At the same time slavery itself was transformed.
three months General Houston overwhelmed Santa Ana at the San Jacinto,
three objects mentioned by the Rhetor, this last, that of improving
three on the list of those voted for as President, the House of
three or four months, the lump in front of the elbow remains stationary
three significant measures relative to trusts. Rejecting utterly the
three tents with flaps turned back, pitched at the edge of a birch
three times more common on the side on which the breast cancer is
three weeks of the march he had learned still another new, consolatory
three were Roman Catholics and had the Pope's indulgence for doing
three-fourths the size of the Louisiana purchase. Though it was a
three-quarters of a million three years later; and passing the million
three. One was to remove the cause of friction by changing the spirit of
threshold facing the quartermaster who was reporting to him. On seeing
threshold. He went into his wife's room. She was lying dead, in the
threw himself into a chair, gazing at those in the room as if
thrice daily. A course of treatment at one of the reputed spas--Aix,
thrill diminish and the pressure effects become less marked. When the
thrill in the hearts of Nicholas and Natasha, arousing in them the
throat), leaped with a movement of her hind legs out of the gully, and
throat. Streptococci are also concerned in the production of spreading
throats and wiping the hoarfrost from their faces in the vestibule,
throats, Lincoln was nominated for the presidency by the Republicans. In
thrombosis in the vessel, or in obliteration of its lumen.
thrombosis is a well-known condition, the thrombosis extending into the
thrombosis should develop at the point of suture, the artery is
thrombosis, and similar changes are found in the veins. The condition is
thrombotic stage the part may assume a purplish hue.
thrombus to spread upwards and to involve the deep veins. Thrombi
thrombus which may in its turn be dispersed so that pulsation in the sac
throne against continuing the war. Burke, Fox, the younger Pitt, Barre,
thrones and aristocracies, breaking the armies of irresponsible power on
thronged together and were pushed off the road. The convoy formed up.
thronging and hurrying, blocked the street.
throngs pressed into the White House, "upset the bowls of punch, broke
through 1.E.7 or obtain permission for the use of the work and the
through 1.E.7 or obtain permission for the use of the work and the
through a muscle, the repeated contractions tend to prevent healing
through a small hole in the centre. The process slowly and gradually
through adequate representation of the employees. Representation is a
through an incision at the fold of the buttock, and forcibly pull upon
through blundering the people were destined to learn the highest of all
through his general, he could and would intercede with the Emperor
through his lorgnette, suddenly turned completely round toward the
through its matrix at the point of the toe, while the soft parts over it
through narrow village streets when we are marching against the
through richer soil than was found in the bottoms of the Red River
through the Island Lake country, and will have five good North Dakota
through the Project Gutenberg Association (the "Project").
through the Project Gutenberg Association (the "Project").
through the South and the West the war was popular. New England
through the afferent lymph vessels, which convey them from some lesion
through the blockade, the submarine campaign would be dropped.
through the blood-stream.
through the cannula and expands into an umbrella shape.
through the country. The German papers in America and a few American
through the crowd, went out of the drawing room and reappeared a
through the crowd.
through the deep dust that rose to the very hubs of the wheels, and
through the door on tiptoe. He could not walk well on tiptoe and his
through the door.
through the door. That door opened and Natasha came out, looking
through the frontier; expeditions were organized to prevent the landing
through the frost-bound air.
through the hour glass before the Whig party was to be broken and
through the mails. Finally citizens had the right of petition; it
through the medium of articles contaminated by a syphilitic
through the mud. He did not even trouble to find out where Denisov had
through the naive and intelligent count and played with him as with
through the negotiations of James Gadsden, a further cession of lands
through the parietes of the chest, threatens to rupture externally. This
through the pioneer epoch and into the age of great finance. Before he
through the profunda is sufficient to maintain the vascular supply, and
through the ranks, and above all being unable to see anything in front
through the rooms a long time considering what she should do. Toward
through the rooms as quickly as possible, finish with the bows and
through the sac.
through the screen of its hot fine particles one could look with naked
through the skin of a tuberculous abscess. The base is soft, pale, and
through the snow into a birch forest to the right of the village,
through the states. They induced state legislatures to enact laws
through the town, as the army was retreating to the Ryazan road beyond
through the waiting room, clutching his head.
through the wood and lay down." (He suddenly lay down on his stomach
through the wood, met Tuchkov there barring his way, and could not and
through their respective colonial assemblies; that the Stamp Act showed
through thick and thin, the planters became a power in the federal
through water used for washing, or by the bites of insects.
through which she could hear all that passed in the study.
through which the judges wished the answers of the accused to flow
throughout all the organs and fluids of the body.
throughout an army one and the same temper, known as "the spirit of
throughout life one or more of the following characteristics, which may
throughout most of the North, the drift was against all forms of
throughout the United States.
throughout the West Indies and in the Philippine Islands. That course
throughout the continent." At other times, Indian trade was regulated in
throughout the earth, challenging kings and potentates, shaking down
throughout the naevoid tissue and so obliterates the vessels.
throughout the whole cavalry division as Vaska Denisov. Cadet
throughout the whole extent of the muscle, disintegrating its fibres and
throw snowballs and stones. Then the exasperated soldiers fired into the
throw this bone--a bill for thirty thousand rubles--to the poor
throwing cannon balls at the French with both hands.
throwing down his chisel. (The wheel continued to revolve by its own
throwing down the wax, the seal, and the paper, with his accustomed
throwing into the flames the remains of sheds, chairs, tables, wheels,
throwing off of a superficial sequestrum. The edges and deep surface of
throwing them down from the balcony. Petya's eyes grew bloodshot,
thrown down on one of the tubs, picked it up.
thrown into relief by the wasting of the muscles above and below the
thrown into the House of Representatives, where the Federalists held the
thrown into the scale, the Americans themselves had learned many things
thrown off as a slough--moist or dry according to the presence or
thrown some St. George's Crosses he had in his pocket into the battery
thrust their pipes into their boots, their bags into the carts, got
thumb. The hand assumes a characteristic attitude: the index and middle
thundering at their doors, demanded that they surrender the privilege to
thunderstorm. Sonya and Natasha, in the light-blue dresses they had
thunderstorms and earthquakes which have shaken the pillars of society
thus enabling the American postal service to catch up with that of other
thus generalised, the condition is called _general tuberculosis_.
thus obliterating the joint, cavity, and resulting in fibrous or bony
thus unconsciously preparing himself for the day when he was to speak
thus: "If a battle takes place within the next three days the French
thyreoid gland, or the genito-urinary organs. The symptoms appear in
thyreoid, and lower part of the pharynx, and pour their lymph into the
tibia, the swelling becomes softer, and gives evidence of fluctuation.
tibial behind the medial malleolus for haemorrhage from the sole of the
ticket, held a convention at Indianapolis where, with the sanction of
tied and cut short, and a dressing is applied. A week later the threads
tied round the waist with a rope. He had a nightcap on his head and
tied. Care must be taken not to injure the important nerves,
ties between the two nations that it is not surprising to find every
ties those of commerce and intercourse. The revenue measure of 1792 bore
tight--and often thinking they were escaping ran right into the
tighter and tighter. The Frenchman was about to say something, when
tightly packed together, the impression is that of a plastic mass having
tightly stretched over them. It is more frequent in the negro and in
till he lay across the bed with his head lower than the pillow, and
till healthy granulations appear. (2) The venous return must be
till it fills the sac. Sometimes a portion of the clot in the sac is
till it replaces the cell protoplasm. In this way white fibrous tissue
till our efforts shall have beaten back the enemies of our Fatherland,
till pus escapes along its groove, and then the track is widened by
till six o'clock in the evening without even stopping to eat.
till teatime she would prepare the countess, and after tea, with God's
till the eve of the enemy's entry into the city.
till the morning of the twentieth, when the memorable battle of
till the spring. Now only twelve hundred rubles was left of that
till the standard for the individual patient is arrived at. As the grey
till there is no sulcus between the nail edge and the pulp of the finger
till they are sixty or seventy, without a gray hair or the loss of a
till they were ready to drop, and so said the grown-up young men and
tilling the stony soil of their native states, poured through New York
tilt hammer, and no furnace for making steel" should be built in the
tilting a keg, filled one after another the canteen lids held out to
timber, and other resources were brought into use. In the West the free
time a number of dissatisfied Republicans openly espoused the Democratic
time a system of stricter control over the dominions was ushered in by
time acquire a myelin sheath; the cells of the neurolemma multiply and
time and knew that the chief way to make them obey is to show no
time and then at last dragged her off, and behind the scenes something
time at all for it. The chief reason for devoting no time either to
time at the Emperor Francis.
time before leaving the church.
time both of the events and of the person who commands, and (2) the
time did not notice the killed and wounded, though many fell near him.
time do not wait. For instance, on the twenty-eighth it is suggested
time during the whole campaign, and left the broken ranks of the
time for a very long while he began making happy plans for the future.
time he might, perhaps, see and take part in the first Russian
time he obtained the tranquillity and ease of mind he had formerly
time in his dreams he still saw himself in the conditions of
time in the history of the Anglo-Saxon race the problem of aridity, the
time it was in the complete stillness of the night. Everybody near him
time lead to gradual stretching of the scar tissue which closes the gap
time of invasion, war, and rebellion. In all the provinces, except
time of the day. Nicholas, who had been visiting some neighbors that
time of the enrollment, when in reply to an invitation to dinner he
time of the state of the fatherland and offered various conjectures as
time of the year for the chase. The hounds of that ardent young
time publish the same, excepting such parts as may in their judgment
time reading. The books he read were chiefly historical, and on
time that it all resulted from the fact that the alliance between
time that these hints began to make the countess anxious and she
time the "force bill," designed to give the President ample authority in
time they passed into the limbo of dead experiments.
time to finish. The old prince interrupted her.
time to get on," he added, and, stepping off the raft, he looked up at
time to reply, took the repetition for a denial, the more readily as
time to the modern world. Copies of these remarkable documents prepared
time to the music, crumpling her program. "Look, there's Alenina,"
time to the person you received it from. If you received it
time to the person you received it from. If you received it
time to the song and looking at those driving past as if he pitied all
time to the song.
time to this, with stern but varied faces, the wall of soldiers
time to time ordain and establish. The judges, both of the Supreme and
time to time, with fever and aggravation of the local symptoms and
time to turn away when the old man, opening his eyes, fixed his steady
time to waste. On the fifteenth, the day of the old prince's death,
time to win fame as the historian of the _Decline and Fall of the Roman
time was supported by a Democratic majority in the House. Harrison was
time with her. Sonya, as she listened, thought of the immense
time with results as pitiful, if less extensive. The calamity inflicted
time with the actions of millions of other men assumes an historic
time without male society, on Anatole's appearance all the three women
time, Alpatych got down and turned into the side street to look at the
time, German settlements. In fact the migration became so large that
time, and his power only the resultant of various forces, and then his
time, and no one can gauge the force of this or that detachment.
time, but that the terrible memory would, on the contrary, dwell in
time, hearing the lighthearted French conversation from the next room.
time, not My Lady, but the well-known song: Came a maiden down the
time, only explains from a fresh side the truth admitted thousands
time. He declared that the working-man, single-handed and empty-handed,
time. He no longer seemed stout, though he still had the appearance of
time. He stopped in the village at the priest's house in front of
time. In 1761 it was again the subject of a bitter controversy which
time. It took away from the spoilsmen a few thousand government
time. The Guards had already left Petersburg on the tenth of August,
time; and he had made England the first country in the world."
time; now they exchanged remarks, recalling the doctor's uneasiness
times and the same notes were thrummed again, but the listeners did
times parts of the Pavlograd regiment had exchanged shots with the
times repulsed. In the center the French had not got beyond
times shook his head sadly, pointing them out to the Austrian
times that try men's souls," he opened. "The summer soldier and the
times, had settled down beside her under the quilt, spread out her
times. The inevitable result was an army of migratory laborers wandering
times: it was a war of good sense, for real interests, for the
timidly from behind the backs of the generals. As he stepped past
timidly opened the door which moved noiselessly and easily. She paused
timidly to the corner where Denisov sat. She saw that everybody was
timidly, into the anteroom, then hiding behind one another they pushed
tinge of the inflamed mucous membrane and a thin film of shed epithelium
tingling, and finally by complete loss of sensation. The part attacked
tips of the fingers disappear from progressive ulceration, and in the
tiptoe and kissed the hand which lay under his head. Nicholas turned
tired footmen and cooks were getting the supper, Count Bezukhov had
tired of being run after by women, his vanity was flattered by the
tired of urging upon his Eastern friends the importance of the lands
tired of waiting--prepare for the war. All the efforts of those who
tissue and bring about repair--a fibrous cicatrix remaining to mark the
tissue cells, but chiefly to the exudate in the connective
tissue closely adherent to or fused with the surrounding tissues, so
tissue covering the ends of the bones becomes moulded into shape, its
tissue elements of the part affected, and by involving these in the
tissue in the wall of a vein, the contraction and retraction of its
tissue is eventually formed around the body. The tissues of the capsule
tissue is formed. Finally the tuberculous tissue breaks down and
tissue is liable to break down and lead to the formation of a cold
tissue like the thyreoid gland or the mesentery, a stitch should be
tissue makes itself manifest. Before applying the grafts it is usual to
tissue may be considerable and result in unsightly deformity. The entire
tissue may be scraped away with the sharp spoon, or destroyed by
tissue of the buttock or into the substance of the gluteus muscle. The
tissue of the extremity as a whole (Fig. 89). It usually begins in early
tissue resembling bone but deficient in lime salts, and the _petrifying
tissue resembling wash-leather. The caseated tissue of a gumma differs
tissue with a covering of epithelium resembling that of the surface from
tissue, especially in the larger vessels. The thickness of the vessel
tissue, from which fine fibrous processes pass to the tunica externa.
tissue, hyaline cartilage and bone, the necessary nutriment being
tissue, or in the periosteum of a superficial bone, such as the palate,
tissue, presents little tendency to infect the lymphatics.
tissue, such as a fragment of muscle, which readily adheres to the
tissue, such as the end of a finger, the tip of the nose or a portion of
tissue, the joint lesion may not be recognised at an early stage because
tissue, the nerve must be exposed and freed from its surroundings
tissue, the reparative process goes on slowly, and it may be many weeks
tissue, which undergoes the usual conversion into scar tissue. If the
tissue--_inflammatory oedema_. The more open the structure of the tissue
tissue--the so-called "healing by second intention."
tissue. An anaesthetic is rarely called for, except in children. The
tissue. The nerve fibres are chiefly of the medullated type, and they
tissue. Whether the inner and middle coats are ruptured or not, blood
tissue; the same dose a week later; 0.6 grm. the following week; then
tissue_ are met with chiefly in the tongue, nose, throat, larynx, and
tissue_, which is produced in the damaged area in response to the
tissues are chiefly directed towards repairing the damage done to the
tissues around the artery.
tissues assume a greenish-black colour from the formation in them of a
tissues is always more extensive than appears on the surface, and that
tissues of the animal attacked, certain substances--_antibodies_--are
tissues of the body after death, with their capacity of being used for
tissues or of the limb as a whole. If the pus perforates the joint
tissues such as muscle, and in such organs as the mamma. The pigmented
tissues to the presence of the virus is chiefly composed of lymphocytes
tissues, and the extreme difficulty of securing and maintaining asepsis,
tissues, especially when attempts to sterilise the wound have not been
tissues, even when the greatest care is exercised as to dosage and
tissues, provide for it a suitable environment. The presence of a
tissues, the cure, if such it may be called, is not necessarily a
tissues, whereby it becomes fixed to these and to the skin.
tissues. If the original injury is attended with much shock, the
tissues. The bursae and tendon sheaths in the vicinity may influence the
to "revise and amend" the existing scheme of government, not to make a
to "the good sense" of his countrymen.
to 101 o or 102 o F. and the patient loses flesh. The lymph glands,
to 102 o F.), especially if there are also haemorrhages elsewhere. The
to Bald Hills, and the recent news of his father's death--and had
to Buckle, despite their seeming disagreements and the apparent
to Dresden, could not help having his head turned by the homage he
to English statesmen than the idea that the colonies should bear part of
to Europe in person largely to accomplish that end. Part One of the
to France, and Secretary of State, he had aided the Federalists in
to God for their victory over the French on the fourteenth of June,
to Judge Parker had taught the party that victory did not lie in a
to Knyazkovo with a crowd of soldiers, reached the dressing station,
to Kutuzov. The aim of the Russian army was to pursue the French.
to Lincoln by the abolitionists; but was steadily put aside. He knew
to Major Ekonomov, he could not help taking notice of the soldier.
to Malo-Yaroslavets, the place where the last battle with the French
to Moreau to enter the Russian service.... "Wonderful!... Were the
to Moscow at the end of the summer, that is, to doing the very thing
to Moscow by the skill of the Russian commanders. Here besides the law
to Moscow the strength of the Russian army was trebled.
to Moscow. On the way Pierre was told of the death of his
to Moscow. The state of the count's affairs became quite obvious a
to Napoleon's, were concentrated in one place, the troops inspired
to New York for his first inaugural. Against the lazy sailing vessel
to Nicholas' prayer, was prompted by this: the thought of getting
to Nicholas. The letters were from the old count, the countess, Petya,
to Olmutz, to unite with the troops arriving from Russia, he risked
to Paris and have remained Russian. Well, I don't esteem you the
to Pierre as if to see the action of the farthest gun and looked at
to Pierre to constitute perfect happiness; and the choice of
to Pierre's words. More than once, when the noise of the wheels
to Pierre, and he gazed with his eyes fixed on the red reflection of
to Poland, forming the Holy Alliance, entrusting power to Arakcheev,
to Rostov when the animal was handed over to the hussar.
to Santa Fe, to Oregon, and to California. They were upon the scene when
to Siberia, many died of cold and hunger on the road, many returned of
to Valley Forge for the winter of 1777-78. New York City and
to a careful historian, "formed the aristocracy of the province by
to a cherry. The treatment consists in removing them by dissection.
to a close the long and costly French and Indian War and was staggering
to a corner of the room and threw himself on a sofa with his face to
to a finger, especially in women and children. Thrombosis occurs in the
to a grand meeting of all the employees with the employers'
to a group of affections of which lumbago is the best-known example. The
to a ligature having slipped from a large vessel such as the external
to a man excluded from taking part in political affairs. The union was
to a rapid and wide spread of the process. The skin becomes moist and
to a simple _interference with the blood supply_ of a part; while the
to a small house on the Sivtsev Vrazhek.
to a smart orderly, who, with the peculiar contempt with which a
to a stout major who was walking back along the street past the row of
to abolitionists before the war, had become at last a real concern. The
to accept battle on the march against an enemy three times as
to achieve it, Pierre hastily took the blunt jagged dagger in a
to acquire the disease--as, for example, while passing through the
to act as a ligament permanently extending the wrist; it is attached to
to afford a clue to that of the larger arteries. Calcified arteries are
to aggravate the spasms which are always induced by the attempt to
to agriculture did not conflict with the interests of the majority of
to all this, rose and approached the princess. He seemed unable to
to allow of the establishment of the reaction of degeneration. If this
to and fro for seven long, hot days, and taking forty-six ballots, the
to and fro, and dispatching of adjutants--was confined to the
to another channel and express his own deeply felt idea for the sake
to another, whether by accident, as in the case of a surgeon wounding
to any suit in law or equity, commenced or prosecuted against one of the
to apply also to the state government.
to appreciate the gravity of the situation. While men love the annals of
to arrange for departure of the prince, the princess, his son, and the
to ascertain the position of affairs.
to ask the countess and you to do me the honor of coming to tea and to
to assume that the movement of the bells is caused by the position
to assume the characters of the moist type.
to assume the moderate role themselves. They put aside Mr. Bryan and
to attain the size of the patella. The smaller varieties may number
to attend to the estate, and would be in better spirits and temper,
to authorize the construction of a line and to grant land and money in
to avoid intercourse with the Petersburg Brothers, but to take up only
to avoid ruin by cooperation in fixing prices; (2) the growth of markets
to bathe the wound, the handkerchief or other extemporised dressing
to be "expanded" by the growth in its interior.
to be a period in which social forces were gathering for the great
to be among the foremost statesmen and thinkers in America. Every field
to be angry and swore at the French with the funniest curses. The only
to be animated by the same desire.
to be appointed first secretary at Vienna? The baron by all accounts
to be brought together so as to form a tube of skin: after the
to be conferred upon the new government there was less occasion for a
to be confused is the variety of cephalic tetanus in which the muscles
to be diagnosed from the other forms of hydrops already considered--the
to be firing at the enemy.
to be found in any good encyclopedia, especially the Britannica.
to be found in the writings of a few early intellectual leaders. During
to be fulfilled if but approximately. When one of the opinions
to be in time for the governor's party.
to be influenced by a predisposition on the part of individual bones.
to be kept out. He seized the door, making a final effort to hold it
to be kissed, and again Prince Andrew noticed tears in the old man's
to be like this!" she thought. She kept looking round in turn at the
to be lodged in a defect or excavation in one of the articular surfaces,
to be maintained in America; (3) the remaining colonial charters were to
to be of a red or pink colour, with a pale grey patch in the centre,
to be of the dry type. The occlusion of the vein as well as the artery
to be parted from her husband and be left alone in the country, in her
to be preferred, and is performed in the same way as for naevus. The
to be reckoned by the condition of his arteries rather than by the
to be searched, and the persons or things to be seized.
to be to unload the muskets, muskets, explode the ammunition, and
to be treated as such. When located in the shaft of a long bone,
to be trying to understand the most intimate places of her heart, and,
to be unlearned, and others have but little bearing on the problems
to be worthy of it. This rescript began with the words: "Sergey
to become citizens, between the ages of twenty and forty-five
to become infected. It is highly probable that the common form of
to behave with her. The evening before, in the first happy moment of
to behold the Constitution exalted and defended against the pretensions
to believe in the efficacy of that plan, was directing the whole
to believe, the exhausted, wavering men felt comforted and inspirited.
to betray his confusion, instantly continued in the same pleasant
to blame. All that he had been specially put in charge of, the state
to blow his nose on his checked handkerchief) to illustrate the theory
to bring a number of families into Texas. The omnipresent Yankee, in the
to bring her out of her neutrality and draw her into the war; how part
to build a state of some kind out of the Spanish dominions adjoining
to businessmen that the cause of the way was the Continental System
to by the formation of new bone, resulting in a remarkable degree of
to cancer of the breast; and in extensive tuberculous disease of the
to change the Articles had failed because amendment required the
to come out, even into the light of heaven again."
to come to wake Natasha at three in the morning, but generally found
to concentrate all the artillery in the center, and secondly, to
to conserve its heat, and elevated to such an extent as to promote the
to consist of the contents of a book of funny anecdotes. Before
to contract the muscle, its belly is seen to be drawn towards the
to convert the ulcer into an aseptic healing sore.
to cooperate with the victors in any settlement of Europe's
to cross the ditch on foot. The Emperor, wishing to rest and feeling
to cry, sobbing like a child. The door opened. The doctor with his
to cry. The Tsar called the colonel of the regiment and said a few
to death two officers and two hundred and fifty-eight members of the
to defend American rights by arms if necessary. It transformed the
to defend Moscow or the announcement of his intention to take the
to defend Moscow was a physical impossibility in the full meaning of
to depress the tissues, and so interfere with protective phagocytosis.
to destroy his army, the most skillful strategist could hardly have
to dinner," evidently displeased both reader and audience. The
to dinner. I suppose he won't go?" she continued, turning to the
to dispose of land, minerals, and timber in their own way. In the quest
to dispute, the plan had to be abandoned at the end of ten years.
to divide the honors by sending General Scott to strike a blow at the
to do so. In many states, about the same time, it was provided that no
to do that? I think there were not many such gallant sons of the
to do the best he could, he thought out everything, and that is why he
to do the opposite," replied Bennigsen.
to do this continent justice; the business of it will soon be too
to do. Which of the two?"
to dominate every department of surgery, and it is from the standpoint
to doubt it now. Rostov rode in the direction pointed out to him, in
to drive straight home. But the nearer he drew to the house the more
to drive them out of Russia, minimizing as far as possible the
to effect a junction with the first one from which it was said to be
to eight days the swelling subsides and the joint returns to normal. A
to electric stimulation, while others behave as if the whole nerve-trunk
to enable the purification to be carried out thoroughly. After carefully
to enter the Brotherhood of Freemasons under my sponsorship?"
to enter the superficial veins, where the backward pressure is so great
to enter; there were no hawkers, nor the usual motley crowd of
to errors in diagnosis. In other cases there is slight jaundice. The
to expand or "mushroom" when it strikes the body, and its stopping power
to explain the plan of operation for the coming campaign. He explained
to express it. But on the eighth of August a committee, consisting
to express the thoughts that filled his mind. He began to explain that
to face the problem raised by the transmission of abolition literature
to facilitate the application of forceps and ligatures.
to fall asleep, as he leaned against the wall.
to fifty tons were built at the towns along the rivers and piloted down
to finance their voyage across the sea is a matter of pure conjecture.
to find her. When he appeared at the door she grew flurried, evidently
to five days. They are usually situated in the vicinity of the fraenum,
to fix the tendon in its place. An incision is made over the tendon; if
to flight; may they be ensnared when they know it not, and may the
to flow downwards in the course of the nerve, with the positive
to fly away into the sky, everyone must know me, so that my life may
to follow Pierre. Pierre, taking him by the arm, pulled him toward
to forestall him, threw off his fur coat and ran on tiptoe through the
to form a large tumour which fills up the axillary space. The disease
to get away: at that moment she hated the stiff, elderly princess, who
to get ready to dance in the large hall, and the sound of the feet and
to give the signal to fire the mines and blow up the bridge, this
to give you the love you do not feel, and your prayer would have
to go to the cities to make a living or become laborers in the mills or
to gossip in drawing rooms of the Club, from gossip to carousals and
to govern here." The fifteenth amendment to the federal Constitution,
to grow when the skeleton is mature and has no tendency to change its
to haemorrhages, and therefore also to pigmentation, and to the formation
to hand the squadron over to the next in seniority and appear before
to handle him. You know the story of the handkerchief? It is
to happen? Everyone has left Moscow and the people are rioting. How is
to hasten to the utmost the movements of the baggage trains of the
to have a tete-a-tete talk with the friend of her childhood,
to have caused necrosis of part of the diaphysis. The shadow of the dead
to have grown thicker round Sonya and Natasha as the air does before a
to have something to say in her salon, and secretaries of the embassy,
to head off the wolf, and the borzois passed it, running faster still.
to hear the words she had uttered and to see before him her eyes,
to help drive slave owners from the free soil of the West. There he
to help feeling sad? Moscow--she's the mother of cities. How can one
to her Princess Mary was sitting on the sofa in her room, holding
to her surprise found her still dressed and asleep on the sofa. Open
to her table in the sitting room.
to her the time when she was not like that and when everything was
to herself, kept looking round toward the drawing-room door. It opened
to him a horse dealer in the town and a landowner fourteen miles out
to him about the building looked angrily at Princess Mary and
to him and he had not once been to see the Rostovs since the day of
to him and smiling so near him than the wine of her charm rose to
to him at the camp, which treated the tranquillity of the capital
to him by his female relations, was repugnant to him. The other way
to him essential, and the second aim, that of purifying and
to him from all parts of Moscow. Those about him had never seen the
to him jabbering! Fine, isn't it? It's all the Frenchy can do to
to him that everyone regarded the Italian in the same light, and he
to him to cross to the Kaluga road, but just then an adjutant
to him was that he sought and did not find in himself the former
to him, Pierre got up and went with the soldiers. They took him to the
to him, Prince Andrew on the eve of battle felt agitated and irritable
to him, and he applied for advice to the holy brethren of the
to him, though the question he was about to ask was the chief motive
to him, wishing also to break up the circle of restraint he
to him, with the same feelings. All their faces were now shining
to him. He liked Petersburg and despised Moscow. The remembrance of
to him. Someone obligingly took the dish from Bagration (or he
to himself, passing in review the principal pictures of the magic
to himself. It was around him that the people chiefly crowded,
to his colleagues in the British Parliament the resources of an
to his groom who was holding his horses and, asking which was the
to his heirs in perpetual succession. The proprietor was a rich and
to his horses, he began to pass the first sleigh.
to his mental state. The unaccustomed coarse food, the vodka he
to his side with his face to the wall. He sighed.
to his sister, was that in the expression the sculptor had happened to
to his throat. "I'm galloping to the commander of the corps. How do
to his wealth, and being in the habit of lording it over these people,
to hold their own for more than a hundred years after the English
to hunt and settle anywhere in the region. The vanguard of British fur
to incur indebtedness, securing the right of the United States to
to infection by such organisms as are present in the wound. A similar
to inflammation at the epiphysial junctions, are most often observed at
to inform you... But, don't be uneasy," he added, noticing that the
to inspect the water and milk supplies of our cities; to construct and
to intermediate degrees of temperature are enclosed within the dotted
to introduce it was Massachusetts. The year was 1888. Before the end of
to it that those entering at the bottom have a chance to rise to the
to its dominions, the United States enlarged its sphere of influence in
to kiss before his execution." So thought Pierre, and the whole of
to kiss for him "dear Sonya, whom he loved and thought of just the
to know what you men are like. Are you the same as we? No?"
to law and fact, with such exceptions and under such regulations as the
to lay and collect taxes directly and knowing the hatred of the
to life by pyogenic complications inducing gangrene of the limb, the
to ligate the common carotid or the vertebral artery in the neck,
to live long enough to protest against the doctrine of nullification
to live this earthly life. And the more imbued he became with that
to live, he swayed to and fro with dignity, offered surmises about the
to live. Hard as it was for Princess Mary to emerge from the realm
to look at that oak, as if expecting something from it. Under the oak,
to look into the matter can easily convince himself.
to look on at a dinner where there was no place for him. In the next
to looking out for themselves. The plantation bell had called them to
to make an adroit thrust en prime, and so on--the cudgel of the
to make his acquaintance and joyfully welcomed the rich newcomer,
to make something exceptional of them," said the visitor.
to make the whole affair public. You are offended at being put on duty
to me a poor sort of fellow. As for the past two years people have
to meet Pierre. She sighed, looking toward the door of the room
to meet the Cossacks, while others ran down the hill toward the
to mention a few--was founded to give them the advantages of higher
to mention the estate and home of my birth--my father, who died of
to microscopical examination should be had recourse to. The sections
to mining. Their missionaries, who hunted in the highways and byways of
to more than three years' service as chief magistrate, on the
to mouth at different ends of the army did not even resemble what
to move on and not block the way.
to move their forces from right to left during the battle. So it
to necessity than one standing on dry ground, and that makes the
to necrosis of the skin.
to negotiate with the government at Bogota a treaty authorizing the
to nothing. During the war in Italy he is several times on the verge
to nourish the parts beyond. If the pulsation returns within a week of
to observe the Emperor who was in the same room. The Emperor was not
to offer any testimony in evidence. Finally, to "put teeth" into the
to one another freely, but another motive was to avoid the danger of
to one of the cutaneous nerves. The hard fibroma known as _keloid_ is
to one of those who were still in the drawing room, drew a chair
to one side of the road. The cavalry regiment, as it descended the
to other manifestations of life. And so it is with the purpose of
to others for any weakness, passion, or temptation--the possibility of
to our outposts, inventing on the way all that had not taken place but
to ours, but very early we said to ourselves that we were losing the
to over-stretching of the plexus, and is nearly always of the
to pass round the doctors who were not even in his way; but all at
to pay their obligations with money worth fifty cents on the dollar; the
to persist with it. In some cases ligation of the afferent vessels has
to persuade her to get away as quickly as possible, and the head of
to pity the old man--the cause of their losses (if they were
to play; there may be some rise of temperature in the evening.
to please the Emperor, he alone--incurring thereby the Emperor's
to point out those who were to be brought in next. The wounded men
to population. The fact that four of the nine judges dissented from this
to pray, but could do neither. With wide-open eyes she gazed at the
to predominate that the reparative process is effectively established by
to press on the vagus, recurrent and sympathetic nerves, on the
to prevail upon Napoleon III to withdraw his troops. Without the support
to prevent an enemy from advancing along the Smolensk road to Moscow.
to prevent the conversation from taking an unpleasant course, told a
to prevent the inflammatory reaction going beyond the stage in which it
to prevent their horses neighing. The secrecy of the undertaking
to prevent them drying up and cracking by the liberal application of
to preventing the passage of exciting afferent impulses, Crile advocates
to private companies instead of being sold outright. The area of the
to prove an illusion. A series of startling events swept the country
to prove that the campaign of 1813 and the restoration of the Bourbons
to provide himself with some books for the campaign, and had spent
to put the finishing stroke to independence. "The greasy mechanics of
to question a Russian prisoner captured by the cavalry. Followed by
to raise a blister, a hot fomentation should be applied to the part.
to raise its voice. This was the party of the elders, reasonable men
to react to light, abnormality of the reflexes, and the discovery of
to read and write by the deacon, like your father and me. Now tell me,
to receive the guests and the visitors.
to recognize the Bolshevists or to permit unhampered trade with them.
to recur locally after removal; others--especially the more cellular
to reduce the displacement. A striking feature is the extensive
to refer to Anatole and flushed at the thought of him--"did you love
to relapse again with use of the limb.
to remain, but ordered the venerable old postmaster Klyucharev to be
to remove longer segments of the veins. It consists in the employment of
to repair the damage done by it.
to report to the Emperor the number of prisoners taken in
to resist the attacks of the phagocytes. The method is most successful
to retire from the army and return and marry Sonya, Nicholas, serious,
to retire from the army and return home. On receiving this letter,
to review his armed peasants and domestic serfs. She sat by the window
to right and left as if anxious to get the first moments of the
to rule.... Just the same as now--I ask you, Count--who will be
to run, talking, firing into the air, and disobeying orders. The moral
to say something but could not. Her brother had guessed right: the
to say something, but Napoleon always interrupted him. To the
to say to the Tsar or to Kutuzov, even if they were alive and
to say, and consequently the rapidity and justice of his intonation
to say, and sometimes questioned her carefully about the Penza and
to say, in Nicholas' house. The young Countess Bezukhova was not often
to say, only about one in every ten adult males had a voice in the
to secondary growths. The malignant neuroma is met with chiefly in the
to secondary haemorrhage, and the interesting observation was often made,
to secure a future for Project Gutenberg into the next millennium.
to secure a future for Project Gutenberg into the next millennium.
to see either the place they were leaving or that to which they were
to see her there, but he had failed to recognize her because the
to see in the glass how the back fitted, she heard in the drawing room
to see the gaze under which she felt that she could not think, but
to see them. Marya Dmitrievna talked to the count about something
to seize the offenders, in the Floridas, if necessary. The high-spirited
to sell government bonds; and to his dismay he found that as soon as the
to send a representative to the Faceted Palace to recover things
to serve in public office as leaders of the people and ornaments to
to set fire to the Schon Grabern village, delayed the French
to settle the question of selection. Pierre disturbed the symmetry
to several days, a reddish nodule resembling a small boil appears at the
to shed the blood of our peoples for such a misunderstanding, and
to shoulder, their bayonets interlocking, moved over the bridge in a
to sign it. "A monster" out of the "thick veil of secrecy," declaimed a
to simulate closely those of an acute suppurative condition. When the
to smash something. Pushing away the footmen he tugged at the frame,
to some unknown "warm rivers." Hundreds of peasants, among them the
to speak of her alone, that early and terrible death has had the
to speak--he turned back, rapidly mounted the stairs again with the
to spend that night at a place three miles out of Moscow. The next
to spread along the lymph spaces in the long axis of the nerve, as well
to spread. The infected part, however, is often long of healing. The
to stand in the same submissive attitude. As if inflamed by the sight,
to stir the anger of Republicans and Federalists alike. It regarded the
to stir, so as to warm the water that had trickled to their bodies and
to stop "muckraking" and proceed to the constructive work of removing
to stop. In a side street near the crossroads where the vehicles had
to strike the keyboard with both hands.
to such a degree that many of them came up to her, stared her in the
to such excesses that many mild opponents of the stamp tax were
to supply men and not spare ourselves... That is the least we can do!"
to support a Protestant church. Tillers of the soil by necessity, they
to survive." The notion, therefore, that these immense business concerns
to suture the opening in the wall. This does not necessarily result in
to tableaux vivants. Napoleon rode up the high ground at Semenovsk,
to take Murat prisoner; nor the result of immediately destroying the
to take an active part in the shaping of public policy and the making of
to take her in his arms. But seeing a stranger the sickly,
to take in the meaning of his words.
to take it and hand it personally to the French Emperor. When
to take its place among the powers of the earth. It was an epoch of
to take the place of competition and enmity; and to increase the
to take the smallest speck for the image of a man or of a coffin,
to tell them about what had happened in the Semenovsk regiment, then
to ten thousand slaves. The ship owners of New England were not far
to that of Vice-President of the United States.
to that which had said: "The Pavlograd hussars?"
to that: 'I made it up myself.' And so it was reported to the count,
to thaw. On the fifteenth, when young Rostov, in his dressing gown,
to the Cathedral of the Assumption--and Petya unexpectedly received
to the Constitution. Ten of them were soon ratified and became in 1791 a
to the Emperor Alexander that the war was being carried on contrary to
to the Empress of Austria, and having, as his historian tells us,
to the Floridas. England held Canada, Newfoundland, and the West Indies
to the French as la grande redoute, la fatale redoute, la redoute du
to the French camp with Dolokhov. If he can, so can I!"
to the French solemnly upbraiding them for having destroyed his
to the German farmers and in nearly every colony were to be found, in
to the Kaluga road, and the commander in chief himself needs sleep and
to the Kiev province, where he had the greatest number of serfs,
to the King Prussia and others: 'So much the worse for you. Tu l'as
to the Lodge--were so strong that he could not resist them. Again
to the Narragansett country was Rhode Island granted a charter of
to the North and West. Thus Southern industries were given easy outlets
to the Project Gutenberg-tm License for all works posted with the
to the Project Gutenberg-tm License for all works posted with the
to the Republicans; the silver miners, less lavishly but with the same
to the Rostovs that the prince was not receiving, but that the
to the Ryazan estate or to the one near Moscow."
to the Treasury in Petersburg to recruit the militia, and then to
to the United States Senate for ratification and to his country for
to the United States coaling stations at certain points to be agreed
to the United States, the reopening of the European War in 1803, after a
to the United States. This seemed at first an easy matter. All that was
to the White House instead.
to the White House. Again in 1840, in 1844, in 1848, and in 1860, the
to the abundant formation of scar tissue these sinuses have rigid edges
to the action of heat and chemical germicides.
to the actual contact of the sooty pan with the skin.
to the advantage of the holders of long-term investments bearing a fixed
to the animals that have attracted our attention, and to study the
to the army now that it is in danger. I understand that. Mon cher,
to the back porch. Natasha got up and looked out of the window. An
to the ballroom, which she particularly liked for its loud
to the base of the skull and brain. The vertebrae may become involved by
to the battalion commander. "Oh, my God!" he added, stepping
to the bitter end. The weight of Washington's moral force was
to the bone. Sometimes the excessive tension and virulent toxins induce
to the border states where the spirit of secession was strong enough to
to the boundaries of Louisiana gave the United States a claim to West
to the bridge, onto it, and to the fords and the boats. Kutuzov
to the caprice of fate and the designs of rogues. During the few
to the commissioner. I enter, and at the table... who do you think?
to the constitution of the people, not to the constitution of the
to the corner to listen to what was being said.
to the country for his election.
to the dancers. He invited Prince Andrew to come and see them, and
to the dip by echelons." So he reasoned.... All the time he had been
to the distant Dakotas and still farther afield. So the development of
to the distracted people. He did seek security for government funds by
to the doctors (as it cannot occur to a wizard that he is unable to
to the door of the shed.
to the drawing room, the crowd made a rush for the doors, and
to the drawing room.
to the end of his activity in 1812, never once swerving by word or
to the end..." thought he.
to the enemy's picket line to reconnoiter personally, and twice to the
to the esaul. "Why didn't you bwing that one?"
to the ever-recurring sounds, distinguishing the whistle of flying
to the eye and orbit, with narrowing of the palpebral fissure, recession
to the fair."
to the farmers whose votes would determine the fate of the election.
to the farther side of the bridge and stopped the infantry. Beside the
to the first squadron?"
to the fluid. The injection should be repeated every two hours until the
to the footman who was helping him on with his cloak, listened
to the footmen, and awaited each expected dish with some anxiety.
to the foreign body, the fibroblasts proliferate and a capsule of scar
to the front of his squadron, and before he had time to finish
to the gallows, as calmly as if he were returning home from a long
to the general progress of events but were guided only by their
to the general. "In the heat of a battle it is easy to make a mistake.
to the girls. "You must look for husbands for them whether you like it
to the glands. The glands most frequently infected in this way are the
to the government in London, consisted of three parts: (1) the royal
to the great sciatic nerve_ are rare except in war. Partial division is
to the greater or lesser interval of time between the commission of
to the head of the state and all done to death by assassins." On
to the head steward's calculation, about two million rubles.
to the high price of labor and the high profits of capital in those
to the history of those current questions which must form the subject
to the house but remained in the village awaiting her departure.
to the house where the commander in chief was.
to the humble democracy that brought him forth. His whole career was
to the hussar with cold, red hands, and raising his eyebrows gazed
to the irritation of nerve filaments of the part, rendered all the more
to the island of Elba, not depriving him of the title of Emperor and
to the kind of tender, self-conscious, romantic friendship between a
to the landowner, fourteen miles away, who had the stud. Everything
to the law of necessity, to one who knows the circumstances in which
to the left was the dying embers of a campfire, that the man who had
to the left where the Voyna flowing between its marshy banks falls
to the left, and galloped in the direction of Kovno, preceded by
to the left, and thither Rostov rode, not hoping to find anyone but
to the lower floor.
to the maid, "bring the princess her gray dress, and you'll see,
to the markets of the nation and brought within the main currents of
to the means by which the powers that the Constitution confers are to be
to the meatus and canal of the urethra, in either of which situations
to the men.
to the minutest detail every word, every gesture, and every shade in
to the muscles of mastication. It is really a mild form of chronic
to the nonsense talked by the Austrian generals. Shinshin, standing
to the normal course of civilized life, naturally aroused intense and
to the normal number. In this _digestion leucocytosis_ the increase is
to the nursery, but Sonya was not there either. Natasha concluded that
to the old conditions of life, Nicholas found it very pleasant to be
to the old prince's for news of him.
to the old prince.
to the orderly. (This was Shcherbinin, Konovnitsyn's adjutant.)
to the overbalancing power of the North.
to the patient and may be sufficient indication for operative treatment.
to the peoples as clerk to master.
to the pleasure of deceiving me, if it really were true. Yes, if it
to the police superintendent's trap which drove into the square
to the ports of one State over those of another: nor shall vessels bound
to the power of the Beast was as yet only one of the fancies that
to the present site of Buffalo on Lake Erie, through a level country. In
to the prince and smiling amiably at him as if to show that
to the printer and get a wagon load of money, one quire of which will
to the process. In the spore-free condition, the organisms are readily
to the question he knew was in his wife's mind.
to the reception room, where he found some ten officers and generals.
to the reckless doctrine that there was a "higher law" than the
to the reports of the Cossacks there had previously been nobody--there
to the result of the battle to be fought in a few days.
to the revision and control of the Congress.
to the right of the Moskva. But wherever it may be, many a man will be
to the same results as do similar processes in other tissues. The
to the science of history, whose aim is to enable nations and humanity
to the seaboard or perhaps been driven into independence as the thirteen
to the service and patriotically Russian. He resented Shinshin's
to the shore while a powerful French fleet shut off their escape by sea.
to the smallest detail for the purpose they had to fulfill, than
to the socialists did not mean, however, that it was indifferent to
to the soldiers' bonfires and with his long gray mustache, his white
to the sounds in the same way that one stretches oneself or walks
to the southern boundary of Minnesota, and a new commonwealth on the
to the spirit of reform vitally affected women in the home and in
to the staff officer on duty.
to the struggle for independence. When it was confined to the realm of
to the surface, and the constitutional symptoms are slight. The pus may
to the syringe. Experience has shown that even large abscesses, such as
to the tendon sheath. It is hour-glass-shaped in the common flexor
to the tumour tissue, which is scraped out with the spoon. Bloodgood
to the twentieth, the whole eighty thousand allied troops rose from
to the twenty-second day after the primary infection, when the organisms
to the union by January 1, 1863, the fatal blow at their "peculiar
to the unlawful aid in money, arms, and supplies, afforded to the
to the very thick of the battle and had now caused him to run away
to the vestibule. There an old footman and two young ones were playing
to the wheels. The cart was loaded high, and at the very top, beside a
to the whole country, Congress, in January, 1865, on the urgent
to the will of a chosen man, and guided the will of that chosen man so
to the world in which she had been living of late, and she felt not
to the world she found herself in. All that was going on before her
to their liberties." Such was the tenor of their appeal to the voters.
to them or to their property is promptly punished. His Majesty the
to them than the accumulated winter of both poles. We know that, whilst
to them, but the simple idea never occurred to any of them that they
to them. Even in the early years of the eighteenth century the royal
to them. She went through the accounts with Alpatych, conferred with
to think of the interview with his dying father which awaited him.
to this opinion, to one of them alone the right to prescribe rules for
to those engaged in the industry, as early as 1879, led a number of
to those in Virginia, and the system was given up for one of separate
to throw on him all the blame of other men's mistakes is very easy,
to throw some sharpshooters into the wood.
to toxic causes and not to the operation--gives rise to the so-called
to transfer him to the Western Army. Kutuzov, who was already weary of
to transfer their rights to the government of the United States,
to turn away from them, and took up a book, or hurried of to the
to turn the count's heavy body toward the wall.
to us now. No one will deny that that cause was, on the one hand,
to us. Such is the inevitable fate of men of action, and the higher
to use the vigorous language of Mr. Lodge, arrayed itself against "not
to various diplomatic considerations the Russian armies--just those
to visit him in Moscow or at Bald Hills later on; and if not, the
to vote at any election for the choice of electors for President and
to vote for President of the United States. The time had arrived for a
to wage war on behalf of American commerce; to reestablish the hated
to what he dreaded more than anything in the world--to ridicule; but
to whether they want rain or fine weather: "The wind has blown the
to which he was subject, and was thus at the duc's mercy. The latter
to which it travels from the focus of infection by way of the nerve
to which the Russian army was itself exposed. It was impossible to
to whom he was again talking with the same involuntary smile. Sonya
to whom these entreaties were addressed, though he was sorry for the
to work too. At first her intervention in the business of packing
to," thought the old man, "then they might do as they please." With
toast was drunk in tavern and private home. The rejoicing could
tobacco, and naval stores command the world; and we have the sense to
tobacco, rice, tar, pitch, and pine; the Middle colonies, grain, flour,
today? Eh? Afraid of the 'minister' as that idiot Alpatych called
toe (she had on a new and favorite pair of shoes) and listening to the
toe, on one or on both sides, is that most frequently affected. The
toe--_subungual exostosis_--it displaces the nail, and may project
toes and fingers--especially the great toe and the little finger--the
toes and moving noiselessly in his bast shoes over the roots and wet
toes may droop and the heel be drawn up, resulting in one variety of pes
toes, stepped to the middle of the room and stood still.
together by the bonds of a common interest. They had leisure and wealth.
together everyone kept silent. Sometimes the others would get up and
together in a shovel--the guests who had been scattered about in
together out there... both playing the hero... Ah, Vasili
together the Indians of the Northwest under British protection and gave
together the legs that were already spreading apart. Then they dressed
together was to supplement the wage system by other ties. Sometimes lump
together with his awakening from sleep. And compared to the duration
together with loss of pulsation, may be the only local signs. When the
together with the objections, to the other House, by which it shall
together with the resolute, insolent intelligence of his eyes,
together without drainage. As the cavity fills up with new bone the
together, and made some steps on the very tips of her toes.
together, and she was calling on the Rostovs for that purpose. The
together, others disputed that opinion and maintained that the Emperor
together, the distinctions between North and South were becoming more
together, thundered on the right and in the center, while the
together. It is, however, only when the proliferative changes have come
together. Several of the field galloped to the spot where the fight
together; and "boom, boom!" came the sounds confirming what the eye
told Princess Mary, and went in to see the prince. It happened that on
told him, pointing to the right.
told him, understood it all, and at the same time followed a train
told his abrupt stories of the past, or uttered yet more abrupt and
told in Russian, German, and Czech by the crowd of fugitives who
told that I am giving you the grain to keep you here--that is not
told the field marshal that it was impossible to fight there before
told them something funny and kept them amused, while he watched the
told was the case at Thermopylae. So why should he have made such a
tolerated, it may be replaced by the ammonium or sodium iodide.
tomorrow... there's to be an Extraordinary Meeting of the nobility,
tone of the conversation was such as indicated that no one approved of
tone, "but the prince told me to 'go and tell the colonel that the
tones the men moved forward.
tongue to the cheek, and from one vocal cord to the other; these being
tongue. A moment later he heard a cry from the wooded ravine that a
tongue." It was the King James version just from the press that the
tongues, reading only foreign newspapers, and looking to the Old World
tonic contraction and the clonic spasms characteristic of tetanus.
tonsil and posterior part of the tongue. In the same group are three or
too close to the procession: the Emperor was passing from the palace
too extraordinary," and at the very moment she thought this, the
too great for the stoutest patriots.
too remembered the word pink being used, and saw in this the most
too the force of free will, incomprehensible in itself but of which
too tightly. The most serious and permanent injuries of this nerve are
too, but it's only now that I feel such love. It's not the same as
too, was an element in the situation. Whatever the cause, the
too-noisy group, and by a word or slight rearrangement kept the
too. Had Helene herself shown the least sign of hesitation, shame,
took Balashev by the arm and crossed the room with him,
took Rostov, who was sitting beside him, by the hand. Rostov was
took a direct part in the events, and all the questions that seemed
took a significant step in the direction of declaring the minimum wages
took a small bundle of scraps from inside his shirt and gave it to the
took about fifteen hundred bushels to pay the same debt when wheat was
took both Rostov's hands and led him into the next room. His eyes,
took from the shelf the first book that came to his hand (it was
took her to her own room and made her lie down on the bed. Natasha lay
took her to the place where they were all to meet. The hounds had
took his leave. The same inquisitive, challenging, and rather
took his part. He could talk about rural economy with the count,
took his place she concluded, from the rapid manner in which after
took in his hand the report he had prepared for the Emperor.
took it straight into her open heart, divining the secret meaning of
took on the unattractive martyrlike expression it so often wore, as
took part in it. Waged over the nature of the union, it made a
took part in the war and had no perception whatever of the inevitable,
took possession of him and the same words rose to his lips. But she
took possession of the family, but the rejoicing was external and
took several steps that were in favor of the South. In proclaiming
took the boy on his knee, played with him, and looked round at
took the first opportunity to gain his confidence, flatter him, become
took up the suggestion with Madison and Jefferson as well as with his
took up the sword. Francis Marion was a shy and modest planter of South
took us there in three hours! Only the near one died of it."
took, but retiring instead to Mozhaysk along the devastated Smolensk
topics did not prevent a clear understanding but on the contrary was
tore down the Nikitski Boulevard.
tormented by the insoluble question whether she loved Anatole or
tormented by the question whether Kuragin was alive. And he dared
torments had followed, and only the heavens promised peace. Toward
tortuous, and thickened lymph vessels in which the parent worm is
torture her the more painfully; she felt jealous of Natasha who had
tossing back her hair, kissed him full on the lips.
total destruction of the true skin; (5) charring of muscles; (6)
touch the quilt, followed her suggestion and pressed his lips to the
touch with the facts of the case. The fortifying of the Kremlin, for
touched frontiersmen to the quick. The contests between the king's
touched his shirt collar, and the hand holding the bottle was lifted
touched them. He was conscious of the warmth of her body, the scent of
touching his horse and turning purple in the face. "Vill you be so
touching the boy's hand. "Entrez, entrez."*[2]
touching the ground.
touchingly grateful for the benefits conferred on them. Everywhere
tough membrane, developed in the interior of the parent cell. Spores are
tourniquet for too long a time, has been known to lead to death of the
tourniquet is firmly applied, a part being selected where the vessel can
tourniquet, or it may be bruised or torn in fractures of the upper end
tourniquet, over the main vessel of the limb on the proximal side of the
tourniquet; in the head by a pad and bandage; in the thorax or abdomen
toward Anna Pavlovna, and Anna Pavlovna, with the same sad smile
toward Missouri and along the southern border westward to the Red River.
toward democracy. The mayor, aldermen, and citizens of New York City
toward evening on the fourth of August.
toward her. The count was more perturbed than ever by the condition of
toward him. The foremost, wearing a Cossack cloak and lambskin cap and
toward one another that the larger number take a more direct share,
toward the coach. But having taken a dozen steps he seemed to remember
toward the freehold qualification. In Virginia, the rural voter had to
toward the hare.
toward the prince.
toward the whip who had sighted the hare.
toward them the duties demanded of him. And Nicholas' management
towards the abdomen.
towards the central area of the joint, or throughout the entire extent
towards the centre it is black, shading off through blue and grey into a
towards the palm.
towards the pelvis, or backward towards the loin. On palpation a
towards the spinal cord.
towards the trunk. Extensive gangrene may ensue. There is no special
town is as much a business man as the corporation counsel in a great
town, used to hide there, and many of the residents at Otradnoe,
town," said Pierre, "and that the position..."
town--and Smolensk held out all day long. At the battle of Borodino,
towns any more. The fact is the old simon-pure cowboy days are gone
towns laid out beyond the Merrimac River by emigrants from Massachusetts
towns of the Archduchy of Austria, and yet other regiments freshly
towns on the basis of the amount of taxes paid, against heavy taxes, and
towns rushed with work. They also increased trade with the mother
towns. The _fifth_ of the measures was the Quebec Act, which granted
towns. The stations on the line will be well equipped with elevators and
towns. The treatment they received there varied. On one occasion the
towns." In the interior, Hartford in Connecticut, Lancaster and York in
townsfolk consider characteristic of the country--rumors of war are
townsfolk to turn into the yards and to draw up at the entrances of
township of Iowa or the industrial center of the East. Its intensive
townsman was carried through the waves of infantry; and sometimes like
toxaemia is profound, and the face and lips assume a characteristic
toxaemia is to be associated with the incapacity of the wall of the
toxins are gradually eliminated from the body the symptoms abate, and if
toxins on the tissues, the gangrenous process presents different
trace. "Hey, look at the trace horse!... Get her leg out! She'll
traced the source of the Germanic migration. The potato blight that fell
traced until the seat of injury is found. In the case of the first
traces broke, and lungs were strained with shouting. The officers
traces. The shaft horse swayed from side to side, moving his ears as
track, neither to the right nor to the left but along the old--the
tract _The Subjection of Women_, widely read throughout the
tract was a cry for continued support of the Revolution. "These are the
tracts were recovered for the national domain. An agitation was begun
trade and credit, it followed as night the day that in time the planters
trade between the same and Great Britain." The old Molasses Act had been
trade concessions. The chief sources of bitterness--the failure of the
trade from us as the canals and railways which Eastern capital is
trade resumed its normal course. The Declaratory Act, as a mere paper
trade unions and federated in a national organization. The power of
trade with the independent Latin-American colonies and they protested
trade, it was stipulated that a two-thirds vote in the Senate should be
trade, observant officers in the provinces would have conveyed the news
trade." It likewise defined and limited the uses which the federal
trade.... Where goes the value of our labor but to those who, taking
trademark owner, any agent or employee of the Foundation, anyone
trademark owner, any agent or employee of the Foundation, anyone
trades, were simply forced to raise and support armies, to learn the
trading corporation. It was the London Company, created by King James I,
traditions of chivalry and, desiring to conceal the facts of the case,
traditions, adopted in 1836 a "gag rule" which prevented the reading of
traffic slacken because the food shipped was not of the best quality?
trained the family to get used to him, proudly assuring them all
trained to discipline who on duty at the word of command kills a
tramp of the many horses, grew so confused that it leaped along the
trampling through the deep snow, and muttering incoherent words:
tranquil in the yard. Only someone's orderly passed through the
tranquil too. The thought which tranquillized Rostopchin was not a new
transactions of everyday life were deemed worthy of a place in the pages
transfer, the new blood is not always tolerated by the old, in which
transferred from the Guards just before this campaign. He behaved very
transferred is known as the _graft_ or the _transplant_. The simplest
transferred to Napoleon in 1806? Was the will of the Russian people
transferred to Napoleon in 1809, when our army in alliance with the
transferred to the Duke of York on its capture from the Dutch in 1664,
transferred to the surface, for which they should be made to form a
transformed into fat, and in the event of a subsequent lactation they
transient importance. They could point with satisfaction to the election
transit and the level, the drill and the dredge, the pick and the spade;
translation of the word would effectively prove to Prince Vasili the
translucently white hand he held a handkerchief, while with the
transmissible from the ox to the human subject, and that the milk of
transmission is not known. In the case of a syphilitic mother it is most
transmit the tendency to their male offspring. The sons, on the other
transmitted from infected parents to their offspring, the children
transmitted to the Emperor after his death.
transmitted to the Senate with his cordial approval, only to have it
transmitted to them are the parts of the mechanism which the impulse
transmitted to them. The fact that compression of the vessel does not
transmitting the disease to the next generation, the method of
transplanted into the subcutaneous cellular tissue of the abdominal wall
transport and of the whole army, had to remain stationary in face of
transportation after the opening of the era of steam navigation. Shrewd
transportation. This service was supplied to industry by the steamship,
transported by the blood-current to distant organs, where they are
transported elsewhere by the lymph or blood-stream, of giving rise to
transports could arrive, the men dispersed about the abandoned and
trap (as he called the Drissa camp) in which we were situated.
trap. I have faith only in God and the lofty destiny of our adored
trappers, Spanish traders from the Southwest, Virginia planters with
traps. Natasha and Nicholas got into the other. "Uncle" wrapped
trash worth a cent or two on the dollar. There was no other expression
trauma, inhibit the action of the nuclei in the region of the fourth
traumatic in origin, being produced either by fracture of the base of
traumatic origin, and is best treated by excision of the sac.
traveler there began to visit the United States the thoughtful observer
traveling case, and the countess leaned out and said what she had to
traveling through the three provinces entrusted to him, was pedantic
traveling with them; his state was very critical, but the doctor
treachery of the Austrians, a defective commissariat, the treachery of
treason in their efforts to hamper the government of the United States;
treason, felony, and breach of the peace, be privileged from arrest
treason. The general assembly of Connecticut reminded the administration
treasurer to dole it out. Thus the colonists learned some of the
treasury nearly all the specie available in the Southern banks. This
treated Bonaparte as an equal and that the latter was quite at ease
treated by the use of such drugs as digitalis, strophanthus, or
treated in detail here. The effects of invention on social and political
treated on general principles. In the region of the face, neck, and
treated on the assumption that he suffers from diphtheria. So much doubt
treated on the same lines as ordinary burns.
treated on the same lines.
treaties had been a broken reed. On the character and functions of the
treating some officers to pies and real doppelkummel. The officers
treatises on estate management, disliked factories, the raising of
treatment by the Moore-Corradi method. Two feet of finely drawn silver
treatment consists in disinfecting the wound, closing the tendon-sheath,
treatment consists in drawing off the contents through a hollow needle
treatment for fractures in the region of the elbow, the splints and
treatment if instituted before the stage which is attended with
treatment of Cuba and Porto Rico and condemned the Philippine policy in
treatment of disease by radiations, injury is sometimes done to the
treatment of history, there is now a marked tendency in the direction of
treatment, death taking place in from one to four days. The
treatment--the grossly damaged portions of tissue undergo dry gangrene;
treatment. The alternative is the application of radium or of the
treatment. The symptoms may be relieved by rest and by soothing
treaty of Washington providing for the arbitration not merely of the
treaty of peace was signed, the Congress, having found out how futile
treaty ratified by the Senate.
treaty that closed the war before "rough and ready" General Taylor, a
treaty with Germany, the Covenant of the League of Nations, was due to
treaty, he turned to the Senate for "counsel." As prearranged with party
treaty, however, sharing the misgivings of Senator Hoar as to the
treaty, were bent on silencing all censure. The measures therefore had
tree in the garden snapped with the frost, and then all was again
tree, that roof lit up by the sun? No one knows, but one wants to
treeless prairie, where every stick of timber was precious. In the other
treeless prairies, though open to homesteads, favored the great estate
trees in the mist of early dawn, hundreds of feet splashing through
trees, the sand, the bricks and roofs of the houses, the green
trembling hands turned toward himself the bloodstained,
trembling hands. Two more prisoners were led up. In the same way and
tremors. The patient may show hysterical symptoms. This condition is
trench itself was the room, in which the lucky ones, such as the
trenches had been dug. Within the entrenchment stood ten guns that
trend of affairs, but only of the task nearest to hand. First they
trend of the future.
trephine or chisel, and the presence of an abscess may be at once
trepidation in his benefactor's lifetime. The room, dusty and
trial by battle. On May 1, Commodore Dewey at Manila Bay shattered the
trial of international causes by the ancient process of battle. It was
trial shall be at such place or places as the Congress may by law have
triangles are equal; please note that the angle ABC..."
tributaries formed the natural channel for the transportation of heavy
tribute as the price of continued friendship. When the news of this
tribute into the exchequer of the Penn family. In the royal provinces,
tribute laid upon the rest of the country. As an offset they offered a
tribute to them for the inspiration and material aid which they had
tribute-bearer to the manufacturer and financier. "The South,"
tried briefly and coldly to inform him of the facts, in her son's
tried hard to give the old energy and fire, but which sounded like
tried staking the total of his losses on it, then he looked round
tried to hide his agitation. But the more he tried to hide it the more
tried to pass either in front of them or to the right or left, but
tried to pray. She assumed an attitude of prayer, looked at the icons,
tried to pretend to the steward that he was attending to it. The
tried to prove anything to him. When Count Rostopchin at the Yauza
tried to rescue the tall lad only increased the fury of the crowd.
tried to set forth the important aspects, problems, and movements of
tried, and, failing improvement, the nail-fold and lunule should be
trigeminus, for example, it may cause enlargement of the upper lid and
trismus, and the spasms chiefly affect the muscles of the neck and
triumph of industry and business enterprise. In the South many of the
triumph, Seward turned to the increase of American power in another
triumph, the British Parliament passed its first reform bill, which
triumphant. Well could the historian write: "Conquests equaling in
triumphantly exclaimed the _Mechanics' Free Press_ of Philadelphia in
triumphantly secured the mop and still did not realize what awaited
triumphantly, and to have the last word she promptly changed the
triumphs. The dispositions for the next battle are planned by him
trivial causes, and so meanly fed that they fled in crowds to the
trivial injuries as a pin-prick or a scratch, the signs of acute
trivial, and nothing is important, it's all the same--only to save
triviality--these are the enchanted circle I cannot escape from. I
trochanter once a week. The contents of the syringe are slowly
trochanter. The clinical features are those of an indolent hydrops, with
trooper on the flank, a noncommissioned officer who had stopped beside
troops and covered by smoke clouds from the guns, and the slanting
troops arrived from Russia. With this object he intended to meet the
troops as soon as order is restored and the state governments ready to
troops being obliged to take part in useless aggressive movements. The
troops below the hill and fell far short of the enemy, a little
troops commanded according to the strategy evolved in European
troops crowded together by the riverbanks and in Borodino. A white
troops in France during the European War. Although allied to frost-bite,
troops in labor disputes. On this platform, the Populists polled over a
troops in order to destroy the French army, which without external
troops the carts would not be forthcoming.
troops to bring to a peaceful haven "a wreck upon the ocean, drifting
troops trod on their heels the greater distance they had to cover.
troops was on his way down through the heart of northern New York,
troops, and at the same time could not admit the idea of his hero
troops, indicates the objective, and hardly ever uses a weapon
troops, these did not meet with success either. The theaters set up in
troops. At the inn at Yankovo he respectfully took leave of her, for
tropical Africa, South America, and the West Indies. The impregnated
trot downhill toward the dragoons. Hardly had they reached the
trot, he no longer saw either our own or the enemy's fires, but
trotted in a preoccupied manner in front of the ranks with tail
trouble and all our arrangements to the minutest detail remain the
trouble except the one he knew of--that Prince Andrew's marriage
troubled the French. They imagined it to be a call to arms. A few
troubling and the weary could be at rest, as they read in the Bible. In
trousers to above the knee. Pierre hurriedly began taking off his
trousseau had to be ordered and the house sold. Moreover, Prince
trowel and three pairs of gloves, and then the Grand Master
true Jeffersonian, had been reestablished in 1816 under the
true diphtheria, that when the diagnosis between the two is uncertain
true in the case of saving the union. "When in the economy of
true path out of the labyrinth of lies!
true. On the contrary, I ask you to go with all your belongings to our
trunk is more exposed to injury than any other nerve in the body. It is
trunk, and may even involve branches of other trunks with which the
trunk, the patient being stripped and examined by daylight. Among the
trunk--caused by the tearing of the renal artery in rupture of the
trunks leading from the focus of infection, in the hope of "blocking"
trunks their length varies. The permanent occlusion of those portions of
trunks. On the ground, beside the trunks, sat a thin woman no longer
trustees in 1752, went into the hands of the crown. New York,
trusts and favoring labor unions. When the Republican convention
trusts were the product of the tariff or of governmental action of any
trusts, and the trade unions--the subjects of debate among the people
trusts, monopolies, mines, railways; and the chief means of production.
trusts,' with which to go to the country." Whatever its purpose, its
trying in vain to find the answer to some question.
trying not to lose a word of the speech which was incomprehensible
trying only to be ahead of the others; but just at the bridge, not
trying to appear cordial and at ease. From the first glance Princess
trying to attract as little attention as possible, he left the room.
trying to avoid seeing the girl she ran toward the house.
trying to bar the road. Infantry regiments, we are told, advanced to
trying to free himself from some men who were holding him by the
trying to get something out of the rich man?"
trying to hinder the robbers, having lost all motive and all sense
trying to imagine Karataev's opinion on the subject. "He would not
trying to set him at the others.
trying to snatch it from one another. The expression on all their
trying to tell him something. He had a look at all the details of
tube of radium should be inserted into the cavity, to prevent recurrence
tube which allows the patient to breathe freely during the period while
tubercle and also by epithelioma secondary to disease in the tongue or
tubercle and death of the affected portion of bone, there results a
tubercle has been removed and there is no pyogenic infection, the wound
tubercle may again become active and get the upper hand of the tissues,
tubercles may be seen on the surface of the membrane, or the surface may
tubercles, so that they remain embedded in the substance of the
tuberculin and exposure to the Rontgen rays have proved beneficial. The
tuberculin in tuberculosis, a papule or a pustule forming at the site of
tuberculosis in other parts of the body at any subsequent period of
tuberculosis of the skin known as "lupus" arises by direct infection
tuberculosis of the skin of the finger, known as _anatomical tubercle_.
tuberculosis, and to waxy degeneration of the internal organs. The mixed
tuberculosis, general dissemination of the disease is rare.
tuberculosis, the disease may be first located in the synovial membrane,
tuberculous abscess. The ulcers and sinuses persist indefinitely, or
tuberculous affections in the frequency with which they attack the
tuberculous disease as it is met with in the spine, or in the
tuberculous disease in the marrow gives rise to signs sufficiently
tuberculous disease of the synovial membrane. From errors in diagnosis
tuberculous disease. If the diagnosis is not established after
tuberculous disease. The patient has usually had a discharging sinus for
tuberculous granulation tissue erupts through the cortex of the bone, it
tuberculous granulation tissue in the deeper layer of the periosteum,
tuberculous granulation tissue. The bodies are smooth and of a
tuberculous infection spreads to the lymph vessels, and the limb as a
tuberculous or pyogenic focus in the bone close to the joint.
tuberculous tissue on the tendon itself is removed with a sharp spoon.
tuberculous tissue which has not yet undergone caseation. The abscess
tuberculous, and the syphilitic.
tuberosity of the tibia is apparently enlarged, and there is a
tumour (Fig. 45). The fat is arranged in lobules separated by
tumour and shelling it out. Care must be taken that none of the outlying
tumour diminishes the tendency to recurrence; a portion of the
tumour of bone may grow from the cellular elements of the periosteum,
tumour shrinks in size after the use of radium and becomes operable, it
tumour which is chiefly met with in the mandible. The cystic spaces of
tumour, and continuous with that of the bone from which it is growing
tumour, and substituting for it a corresponding portion from the tibia
tumour, sometimes only over a limited area. Frequently the margin only
tumour, until, after removal, the tooth is recognised in its interior.
tumour. The soft forms grow rapidly, and eat away the bone, without
tumours of the jaw.
tumours of the nerve-trunks. The inconvenience caused by the bulk and
tumours of the uterus, the rectum, or the pelvic bones. It may result
tumours retain the outer fibrous layer as a capsule. Malignant tumours
tumours show little or no tendency to increase in size, and the pain
tumours the shell of bone is removed over an area sufficient to allow of
tumours vary in size, and the skin, which is almost devoid of hairs, is
tumours_, and especially cancer, from the seat of the primary disease to
tumours_; those which invade the bones, either by metastasis from other
tunic unbuttoned; Pierre sat between his wife and the old countess. He
turbid, in the latter case resembling chyle. The affection is frequently
turf. The hut was made in the following manner, which had then come
turn he was able to vanquish the socialists in the Federation, although
turn into vexation and anger at the stupid arrangements and at the
turn the count against him, he nevertheless on the day of his
turn them out, had she not at the same time been giving careful
turn. He enforced the laws and, usually with the consent of a council,
turn: that a court-martial had been appointed, and that in view of the
turned Metivier out by the scruff of his neck because he is a
turned and never stayed. The Constitution of the United States, he
turned and went out of the corridor.
turned away and was about to ask the countess again how to go to
turned away as if to hide from Michaud the tears that rose to his
turned away from him frowning and addressed the esaul, conveying his
turned away from that life of devotion, submission, and the poetry
turned away. She did not venture to ask any questions, and shut the
turned from his partner with eyes and ears intent on the colonel.
turned her face to the window, looked out in such a way that it was
turned him out of the booth at Grunth. He was shouting in a gasping
turned onto the Kaluga road to the day their leader fled from the
turned pale with fright and made signs to the boy. He grew silent, and
turned the heads of the Moscow ladies, especially by the fact that
turned to Zherkov. The nervous irritation aroused by the appearance of
turned to him and took the letters.
turned to speak to his daughter, the beautiful Helene.
turned to the United States for aid in its war on England and sent over
turned to the minister of the United States in London. The British prime
turned to the prince. "But we daren't. In our regiment two officers
turned up in the evening that he was applying for leave and was
turned up. One's quite frozen and the other's an awful swaggerer. He's
turning away from the girls, who at once assumed an air of
turning flexibly. It was as if all the powers of his soul were
turning her head and clutching with both hands at her hair which the
turning his back to the Emperor retired two steps, twitching off the
turning his horse in front of the squadron.
turning into the village already... they will have their buckwheat
turning the conversation upon Pierre's matrimonial affairs, by way
turning to the visitor she added: "She is my youngest girl."
turning up the hem of her skirt.
turns frequently. But wherever it may turn there always will be the
turns out that 'the enemy of the human race' pays no heed to our
tutelage of the British ministry, no matter how excellent it might be or
tutor and putting the boy in his charge, then he ought to retire
tutors, and governesses followed singly. The footmen began moving
tutors, and governesses. From behind the crystal decanters and fruit
twelve horses got ready for the princess' carriages and eighteen carts
twelve o'clock left the third column with which he had been and
twentieth century, were merely the signs of a new age. The nation had
twentieth century. At the opening of 1913 two states, Colorado and
twenty dollars, the right of trial by jury shall be preserved, and no
twenty or thirty years. Spontaneous cure never takes place, and the risk
twenty paces of the cannon. He heard the whistle of bullets above
twenty thousand Puritans, the yeomen, the Virginia gentlemen, and the
twenty years (1860-80), the population of Nebraska leaped from 28,000 to
twenty years a second United States Bank--the institution which
twenty years before, was a movement among the peasants to emigrate
twenty-eight days. While the disease is incubating, there is nothing to
twenty-fifth and twenty-sixth were not completed, and secondly, by the
twenty-four hours. In front of them all fled the Emperor, then the
twenty-four hours. The functions of the skin are further aided by
twenty-four sharpshooters with discharged muskets, standing in the
twenty-four to thirty-six hours, the capillaries of the part adjacent to
twenty-fourth, and part of the line--the left flank--had been drawn
twenty-fourth, the first and chief action of the battle of Borodino
twenty-ninth of July Kutuzov received the title of Prince. This
twenty-one by which the total exceeded the round sum of forty-three
twenty-six per cent lower than the figures of 1907. The protective
twenty-sixth at Borodino, and each day and hour and minute of the
twenty-three years. The peasants feared him more than they did their
twice a day. In peacetime it is only necessary to billet troops in the
twisted up the hare, threw it neatly and smartly across his horse's
twitched its ears as the bayonets touched it, and snorted, spurting
twitched rapidly all the time with a feverish tremor. The man was
twitching and grunting. An aide-de-camp, who had entered the bedroom
twitchings, and sometimes convulsions. Finally the pupils dilate, the
two bands and two choirs of singers. Rostov danced the Trepak with
two candles and placed them on the window sill, though it was
two days before Princess Mary arrived. It was the last spiritual
two days' march and the enemy's outposts after a brief interchange
two different lines of activity: one, of the constitutional and
two equal halves on the palm of his hand, sprinkled some salt on it
two even expressed a desire for a monarchy. The dangers of democracy
two first questions by giving the names of his regiment and of his
two front teeth were missing that had been knocked out by the butt end
two halves: one half is she, and there all is joy, hope, light: the
two measures Congress restored federal control over the monetary system
two negotiating countries in dire peril. On February 15, the battleship
two nights," replied the doctor, and he sat down morosely beside his
two or more who have equal votes, the Senate shall choose from them by
two or three days. These are mostly referable to the lungs and brain.
two packs: the sound of the larger pack, eagerly giving tongue,
two persons, of whom one at least shall not be an inhabitant of the same
two years Arizona and New Mexico were "under the roof." So the
two, the term _acute necrosis_, formerly applied to the disease, was
two-thirds of that House shall agree to pass the bill, it shall be sent,
two-thirds of the members present.
two-thirds. All the muscles of the arm, forearm, and hand are paralysed,
type of patients who are liable to lumbago, and the two affections are
type of the arborescent lipoma, project into the cavity of the joint,
type of the disease and the joint affected; in the joints of the fingers
type, and a young woman. That very young woman seemed to Pierre the
type. In a number of cases the inflammation is acute and the patient is
types are almost exclusively met with in the knee.
tyrannical existence of the same colossus."
tyranny, but the tyrant, stand forth.... Let names of Whig and Tory be
tyranny; and denunciation of the spoils system. Though Jackson was
ulcer becomes red and angry-looking, the granulations disappear, and a
ulcer in the lower third of the leg, the perforating ulcer on the sole
ulcer is smooth and glazed, or occupied by necrosed tissue, and the
ulcer or osteomyelitis, it may be better to amputate the limb.
ulcer or wart-for example on the face in old people--it presents the
ulcer, including its edges and about a quarter of an inch of the
ulcer--namely, one in which the granulations become large, soft, pale,
ulcerate, simulating the appearance of a malignant tumour. Large tumours
ulceration and resulting in stenosis; and lesions of the _nervous
ulceration of cartilage and of articular caries is attended with the
ulceration of the skin over the most prominent part of the growth. The
ulceration of the skin_ of the face, groin, or scrotum, healing at one
ulcers are exceedingly intractable. Secondary deposits in the
ulcers in the soft palate and pillars of the fauces, which may lead to
ulcers may also originate from the bursting of a small peri-phlebitic
ulcers of the throat the patient should gargle frequently with chlorine
ulcers. Less frequently there is a relapse of the eye affections, or of
ulcers. When the disease begins in the bone, the marrow is converted
ulcers; if the tumour tissue protrudes through the gap in the skin, it
ulna in children (Fig. 126). It commences at the growing extremity of
ulna sufficient to admit of dorsiflexion of the joints and lengthening
ulnaris is often compensated for by the action of the palmaris longus.
ultimate plans may be, the interest of Your Majesty's service
ulyulyuing, had rushed out from the wood. He saw Karay seize the wolf,
unable to dorsiflex the wrist or fingers (Fig. 90). If the hand and
unable to rise to the height of such a question, who saw in the
unable to say it because Mademoiselle Bourienne was in the way, and
unable to state the cause of his embarrassment, but it resulted from
unable to unravel. He had gone to Joseph Alexeevich's house, on the
unable to use the limb; the part is hot, swollen, and tender, and
unable to walk. They dragged him along, holding him up under the arms,
unable, from the masses around them, the smoke and the increasing fog,
unaccustomed to severe discipline, and impatient at the restraints
unaffected bone maintains the length and contour of the limb; in the
unaffected, and by the normal artery being felt pulsating over or
unaffected. The low vitality of the tissues favours the growth of
unanimous approval for any change in the plan of government; it decreed
unarmed inhabitants. And the men who commit these crimes, especially
unavoidable in frequently addressing one to whom the title was still a
unbroken skin. On this assumption the modern system of wound treatment
unbrushed tufts of hair sticking up behind and the hastily brushed
unburned quarters of Moscow) the whole mass of prisoners suddenly
uncertain American participation in the League of Nations.
uncertain in his own mind or fearing a revival of the contest just
unchanged. Uncompromising delegates from the South withdrew to Richmond,
unchanging stonily severe expression; and, sitting down opposite the
uncomfortable and was a man mounted on a horse, while looking at the
uncomfortable in the role of her benefactor.
uncomfortable, but as soon as the conversation concerned himself he
uncommon from interference with growth at the ossifying junction.
uncomplicated typhoid fever, and in the early stages of cancerous
uncompromising Democrat. They accused Grant of using "the powers and
uncompromising advocates of universal emancipation. Far and wide the
unconcerned and did not stir. An adjutant, dismounting, lifted the
unconditionally transferred to the ruler or rulers they have chosen,
unconscious and paid no attention to the newcomers. Those who were
unconscious, and thanks especially to the fact that the privations
unconsciously and quite forgetting her condition, prepared for the
unconsciously carried away and began speaking with the suppressed
unconsciously clearing a path seven yards wide as the people on both
unconsidered tune, like the song of a bird, was extraordinarily
unconstitutional, easily forgetting Hamilton's masterly defense of the
unconstitutional. The Constitution remained unchanged; times and
unconstitutional; but the Court, usually on technical grounds, avoided
uncontrollable bleeding from a comparatively slight injury, such as the
uncovered parts of the body--most commonly the skin of the hands, arms,
uncut book from the high desk.
undaunted by the fate of his Albany plan of twenty years before, again
under General Shafter and shelled by the American ships, gave up the
under President Harrison, as assistant secretary of the navy under
under a fall of masonry, and in machinery accidents. When the patient is
under a heavy burden of debt and taxes. The war had been fought partly
under a tight prepuce, an incision should be made along the dorsum to
under aseptic conditions has already been described as the type of ideal
under favourable conditions for conveying the disease from one person to
under favourable conditions, the prognosis is good, but a longer time is
under him; "turn this way!" he shouted to those with the gun. "It
under local anaesthesia, the portion of skin containing the corn and
under observation in view of the risk of recurrence.
under powerful leaders, the commoners, or "third estate," swept aside
under public control and the government was empowered to embark upon a
under state supervision. In some cases the state legislature fixed the
under the "PROJECT GUTENBERG" trademark.
under the "PROJECT GUTENBERG" trademark.
under the Constitution in 1789. The following year its essential
under the Constitution; namely, the Missouri Compromise. It is true,
under the United States.
under the authority of the United States, shall be the supreme law of
under the blanket. He heard a rustle behind him and a shadow
under the burden of these insoluble problems, so he abandoned
under the cognizance of the physician, it may be attended with phenomena
under the command of General Pershing was quickly sent out to capture
under the crown in 1754--this in spite of the fact that the majority of
under the direction of powerful men working single-handed, or of small
under the epidermis. The putrefactive gases evolved cause the skin to
under the federal Constitution could not impair. Two years later he
under the feet of the pressing, struggling crowd.
under the following heads: (1) frame of government; (2) powers of
under the guise of a tax on goods made by children below the age limit.
under the indomitable seamanship of the Puritans, who labored with the
under the influence of a definite cause, have a natural termination, and
under the influence of a variety of exciting sensations. Only Pierre
under the influence of injury, prolonged or repeated irritation,
under the kerchief, and the loose skin that hung under her chin.
under the late Emperor, and was nicknamed 'the King of Prussia.' He is
under the leadership of Carranza, a friend of Madero, Villa, a bandit of
under the leadership of Samuel Adams. It held regular meetings, sent
under the leadership of the Dakotas. For a long time the Dakota
under the lining. Pierre was about to begin reading.
under the management of gigantic trusts. Short railway lines were
under the name of "rider's bone." It follows bruising and partial
under the name of _spirochaeta pallida_ or _spironema pallidum_. It is a
under the periosteum, each being derived from a focus of suppuration in
under the pressure of the finger--a condition known as _craniotabes_.
under the shakos, faces with broad cheekbones, sunken cheeks, and
under the shed, became quiet and with the baby in her arms went to the
under the shirt cuffs, laid down the pack and took up a glass and a
under the skin, the Rontgen rays are less efficient; if radium is
under the supervision of the federal government. Protests against
under the table, searched everywhere, and stood still in the middle of
under the table.
under the treaty of 1778.
under the weight of his knapsack.
under the woolen shawl, cried:
under treatment, but is liable to relapse on a repetition of the
under whatever obligations the government deemed imperative. Never was a
underclothing, limped out and, leaning against the doorpost, looked
undergo a horny change. This results in the formation of concentrically
undergo calcification or ossification. The most important transition of
undergo erosion and are absorbed by the gradually increasing pressure of
undergo necrosis, in which the overlying skin or mucous membrane
undergoes rupture is completed. The violent muscular contractions of
understand and state the patient's condition.
understand from those in authority. Rostopchin was so pleased with the
understand him. Moreover, Speranski, either because he appreciated the
understand how he could ask such a question. Pierre went into the
understand how it is you don't see the charm of these delicious
understand it! I cannot endure any more," he said, and left the
understand the Emperor Alexander's loftiness of soul. She has
understand the cause. She continually fancied that either he would
understand the cruelty..."
understand the deception and confusion," he thought, "but how am I
understand the general position."
understand the importance of the coming campaign.
understand why he spoke with such admiration and delight of the
understand, not because he lacked the power to do so but because he
understand, still she could not doubt, and at any rate loved the
understand. He told her of external social events and of the people
understand. I could not have done it myself, I should not have had the
understand." This expressed, in concise form, exactly the sentiments of
understanding but not wishing to appear to do so. The princess as
understanding the folly of the rest of mankind and the
understanding why he should be disturbed by the bad composition of the
understood anything of the sort. He only saw in her a pretty and fresh
understood for the first time all the cruelty of his rejection of her,
understood it and, leaving aside the question of Moscow, of the
understood only in relation to the forces of the time. For that reason,
understood something else--something the living did not and could
understood that "rest" implies more than the mere state of physical
understood that the woman he had known as a child, of whom when her
understood the full importance of the rite now being performed and
understood the last part. In particular, the words "I will come back
understood them her personal feeling became interwoven in the
understood what was said to him, the German submitted and took his men
understood, crossed himself and kissed the icon. There was a look of
understood. Beginning with the battle of Borodino, from which time his
undertaken, as difficulties are liable to ensue in connection with the
undertaken, as the ankylosis recurs.
undifferentiated tissue elements or "rests," and so determine the growth
undismayed by the savageness of the countenance which the desert turned
undisturbed as monuments of the safety with which error of opinion may
undisturbed by interference from without, as the country advances in
undisturbed by the proximity of the sac; the best example is the
undisturbed; locally, the part is cool, of natural colour and free from
undivided control of the army, and hoping that more decisive action
undoubtedly some men of the baser sort who looked on politics as a game
undress, drink some water, and send for the doctor.
undue movement of the affected part, and improper applications and
uneven, their texture sclerosed in parts, and the medullary canal is
unexpected and striking beauty. For the first time all that pure,
unexpected and unintended clash of arms at Lexington and Concord in the
unexpected idea and he had not the strength to turn it back again.
unexpected ideas every day--especially the foreigners, who did so with
unexpected rapidity that he had not time to finish arranging the
unexpectedly causes him to kill him--thereby convincing the mob more
unexpectedly interrupted. Once he stopped it by shouting: "The white
unexpectedly loathsome. He ceased keeping a diary, avoided the company
unexpectedly reopened in the warm climate, which obliged him to
unexpectedly rose to his mind, and going over the pictures of that
unexpectedly the French fell into confusion and stopped short from the
unexpectedly. Timokhin, armed only with a sword, had rushed at the
unexplored. Even to the wildest imagination there seemed to be territory
unfavourable--with the multiplicity of the lesions, and with the
unfordable river we burn the bridges to separate ourselves from our
unfortunate and interesting Helene was in doubt which of the two men
unfortunate events--the loss of almost the whole of the Rostovs'
unfortunately quite common for such persons to become the subjects of
unfortunately the exception.
unfounded, for we know that he could not restrain the troops from
unhealthy raw surface when the slough separates.
unhooked his saber. He came out from behind the chairs, clasped his
uniform and mounted on a lean, dark-gray horse, the other in an
uniform open over a white vest, and the St. Andrew ribbon over his
uniform or bossed, the consistence varies at different parts, and the
uniform showing the creases where it had been folded and thick gold
uniform value from one end of the land to the other. The branches of the
uniform, with a jerk to his horse, rode up to the porch, swung his leg
uniform. The study smelt strongly of tobacco and dogs. "Uncle" asked
uniformity also about the endless succession of fertile fields spreading
uniforms advanced toward the bridge at a run. Smoke appeared again but
uniforms ten paces off, and the firing had begun to subside. Suddenly,
unilateral, and develops without apparent cause. The pain, which occurs
uninjured and slightly wounded--had left it long ago. All about the
uninjured nerve-bundles continue to transmit impulses with the result
unintentional superciliousness, as if ashamed to confess that the
unintentionally, he poured too many drops into the glass. He threw the
union and confederation for the general defense of his Majesty's
union and insisted on calling them "traitors" and "rebels." The
union is a compact among sovereign states from which the parties may
union navy are recorded in the falling export of cotton: $202,000,000 in
union takes place with a minimum of intervening fibrous tissue. The
union, and liberty. This was the address which called forth from
union. In order to permit action on a national scale, it gave the
union. Moreover, President Jackson, at the height of his popularity, had
union. Nevertheless on this point the advocates of states' rights were
unions for the purpose of increasing wages, shortening hours, and
unions of their own, had been built up outside the control of employers.
unions, founded in 1886 on the basis of beginnings made five years
unions. In short, the power of the trust in finance, in manufacturing,
unique position of the cowboys among the Americans is jeopardized in a
unite and there await the enemy. It was plain that Armfeldt had
united in the promotion of measures of this kind. As in the case of the
united or fused to the surrounding bone. It follows from this that the
uniting medium between the divided surfaces. During the first twelve
uniting the Atlantic and the Pacific, was the occasion of a great
uniting the ruptured tendon by open operation.
units should be injected intra-thecally daily for four or five days, the
units. The first method of history is to take an arbitrarily
unity, the same could not be said of Puritanism. The Plymouth Pilgrims
universal historians, another, newer force--the idea--is added, the
universal suffrage," ran another. As for the aid rendered by the
universal. The talent, the energy, the ambition that formerly sought
universe, in the whole universe there is a kingdom of truth, and we
universities, or the freedom of Poland or the greatness of Russia,
university to join the army. I will confess to you, dear Mary, that in
unknown ground, and nowhere encountering the enemy. On the contrary,
unknown to him, of believing in the possibility of attaining
unlearned in books, saw with their own eyes the resources of the
unless it affects the scalp and forehead and is associated with the
unless the Congress by their adjournment prevent its return, in which
unless the existence of the primary cancer is discovered.
unless when in cases of rebellion or invasion the public safety may
unlicensed by the government and uncontrolled by the church, was,
unlike those resulting from the breaking down of superficial syphilitic
unlocked the door and went in without giving her an answer....
unloosed. The Daughters of Liberty in a quieter way were making a very
unmercifully, and occasionally a brutal murder was committed. Often the
unnatural animation, the cause of which Pierre so well understood.
unnatural clearness. Near by could be seen the familiar ruins of a
unnatural manner of the princess who--she thought--was making a
unnatural that she first felt ashamed for the actors and then amused
unnecessary in the more benign sarcomas, and in the more malignant forms
unnecessary. They were not in the least abashed. The old woman,
unpleasant things to everyone and upset them. Let's go to the
unpleasantly struck, too, by the excessive contempt for others that he
unpleasantness and anxiety to the court circle of which Anna
unquestioning support of the administration in its final step. "Every
unreaped corn was scorched and shed its grain. The marshes dried up.
unrecognisable. The inflammation may spread to the meninges, the
unrecognizable at the moment he entered because on that face whose
unrecorded in the diaries of wiseacres, rarely mentioned in the speeches
unrelated to his past interests, and he seized on these the more
unsatisfactory because it did not renounce the right to tax or repeal
unsatisfactory condition of the circulation; while, if it forms quickly
unsatisfactory, but worst of all was his customary couch in the study.
unsatisfied expectation--the feeling that "everything is just the
unseen before, were now visible in the distance. And farther still,
unseen but evidently important task. They all gazed with the same
unskilled, the employers closed in upon them; then the Knights declined
unsolved problem just how many of the colonists were able to bear the
unstable and irritating as the worthless notes of revolutionary days,
unsteady steps and returning to his room lay down on the sofa and
unstinted service, but the results of their deliberations only
unsuccessful attempt to remove the tumour. The features are those of a
unsuitable dressings or ill-fitting appliances, may also act in the same
unsuitable soil, and the organisms do not readily find a footing. Any
until 1803 when the case of Marbury _vs._ Madison was decided. In
until after the middle of the century that foreign lands proved to be
until at the end of two, three, or four weeks both vessels and cells
until in the course of time the crust separates, leaving a scar.
until it rivaled in the number of people employed, the capital engaged,
until it ruptures. As a result of pyogenic infection the cyst may be
until its blood supply from its new bed is assured; the detachment is
until late the following Wednesday did enough troops arrive to restore
until pain and tenderness have disappeared. The attitude in which the
until puberty, when the skin and its appendages become more active, or
until the escape of the contents--particularly hairs--supplies the clue.
until the examination is completed.
until the general conflagration." Of the same opinion was the young and
until the muscle is kept at rest by a splint, or put out of action by
until the opening of navigation in the spring and they are no longer
until the sequestrum is removed. Even after healing has taken place,
until their outpost towns adjoined the Hudson Valley settlements. In New
until they break down and form abscesses, which are usually about the
untouched since the death of Joseph Bazdeev was now even gloomier.
ununited fracture. The same combination is seen in an exaggerated degree
unutterable which means the All. Talks with Brother V. strengthen,
unwise in us to implicate ourselves, by artificial ties, in the ordinary
unwise, and unprecedented steps in the history of the party. Senator
up Austria to the limit. To use the language of the German authorities:
up a musketry fire at the French cavalry that was pursuing our troops.
up and change, but up to the first of September nothing had done so.
up and down the room for a long time, no longer piercing an
up and the vessel again secured. The internal administration of heroin
up as in the night; hundreds of business men invested fortunes in
up by withdrawing the clear, jelly-like contents through a hollow
up except as a preparation for operations on the sac with a view to
up from behind the bank by unseen hands. Prince Andrew and the officer
up full-armed in a single night. It was, on the contrary, nourished
up he spread a map on the table. "All eventualities have been
up her downy little lip. "All the pretty women in society will be
up her eyes sternly, continued to upbraid the general who had won from
up in the Gachina suburb across the Dnieper, at the inn kept by
up in the process of ossification. They are believed to occur more
up in unhealthy surroundings. There is evidence that the most important
up its mind on the final disposition of the Philippines. Perhaps, before
up on the Shevardino mound to observe the enemy. On the twenty-fourth,
up on the beds if one drew close to the table. Denisov, who was living
up on the floor, jerked her thin and rather short plait of hair to the
up on the foot or leg. In other cases a small sore surrounded by a
up the bedclothes as she settled down, raising her knees to her
up the first cudgel that comes to hand and strike with it till the
up the heavens, and champagne flowed. The crisis so long expected had
up the hill to support the battery. As they took the places vacated by
up the hill to the guns.
up the margins of the rent in the wall and securing them with a
up the plan of campaign against Napoleon and, having induced Alexander
up the work of reclamation where the government left off; it is to these
up this project, for it was not they who had suffered from the
up to her guests, first the vicomte and then the abbe, as peculiarly
up to her, she seated herself in the drawing room to await the
up to him for the day he had lost. He was happy as a lover when the
up to him, and he gazed at the opposite bank. Then he became
up to his waist in the water joyfully wriggling his muscular figure
up to the bonfire, and addressing Tushin asked him to have the guns
up to the group and shouted at Mishka.
up to the old man like this, and falls down at his feet! 'You are
up to the sick man and squatted down beside him.
up to the unknown general and blocking his way to the door. "Whom
up with his black horses over the winter rye to the place reserved for
up with his cloak, but now neither the lodge nor his benefactor was
up with the troops moving toward him and has taken up a strong
up with the two foremost borzois, pushed ahead of them regardless of
up within him against the someone to whom what was happening might
up, and the fight was at an end. The regimental commander and Major
up, first blue and then red, Shcherbinin lit the tallow candle, from
up, handled the floundering silvery fish in the watering can, on
up, jerking the rings of the leashes and pricking their ears. Karay
up, stopped near the hounds, waiting to see how the matter would
up, there was no part of the Russian army that had not suffered in the
up. Cotton had in fact become "king" and the planters depended for their
up. Then he begins to mutter incoherently, to pull off the bedclothes,
upheaval and the years of dissolution that ensued, the Spanish colonies
uphill with the carts, and their calls to one another, could be
uplands or to the Northwest.
upon "every consumer in the land for the benefit of our manufacturers."
upon Ireland visited the Rhine Valley and Southern Germany at the same
upon a fragility of the bone, but on the loss of the muscular sense and
upon all plans to increase the amount of money in circulation. First
upon as a high degree of leucocytosis. According to Ehrlich, the
upon as a state of profound exhaustion of the mechanism that exists in
upon erosion of the cartilage (Fig. 156).
upon him and his mustache twisted upwards, sat the ruddy
upon him like wolves upon the fold. If he went out they waylaid him; if
upon him, or to listen to all that was told him. The faces all
upon its capacity for irritating the tissues and so inducing a
upon such government as dangerous to the liberties of citizens and
upon the English taxpayer. The Sugar Act of 1764 was the result of this
upon the President for the papers relative to the treaty negotiations,
upon the constitutionality of acts of Congress.
upon the formation of an international association. Indeed he had gone
upon the inhabitants and that attempts to impose them otherwise were
upon the map how a few straggling lines became a perfect mesh of closely
upon the nation to take up arms against an assailant that had in effect
upon the nerve and free it from the pressure of a fragment of bone or
upon the plexus from below, as when a man in falling from a height
upon the recovery of the impoverished and battle-torn countries of
upon their citizens by the Boxers; but the United States, finding the
upon their natural rights, and in influential circles she urged the
upon them by the sword. How many came we do not know, but shipping
upon to deal with a dangerous situation created in Mexico by the
upon to relinquish her authority and withdraw from the island; and the
upon whether the gangrene is of the dry or moist type. The general
upon, embraced the following terms: the independence of Cuba; the
upon, especially in the case of women, as they may be ignorant of its
upon. The Cubans made strong protests against what they deemed
upper end of the field, where there were some sheds built of charred
upper end of the humerus, the patient is unable to abduct or to elevate
upper extremity which would be unjustifiable in the case of a lower
upper part of the femoral. On account of the tension of the fascia lata,
upright against the palings with its face smeared with soot.
upright on the sofa and listened with sparkling eyes. She tried
uprising in Rhode Island which brought the exclusive rule by freeholders
uprisings that threatened the existence of the state governments.
uprisings. Hamilton distrusted the people. "Your people is a great
upset Natasha was and jested resolutely and loudly at table with the
upstairs to see Vogel and his wife who lived on the upper story.
upward like the horns of the moon against Ohio on the east and in the
upwards in the subcutaneous planes, leaving the overlying skin
upwards towards the shoulder-joint, which may become infected. When the
upwards, in the way affected by the Emperor Alexander, and, having
ureters or the intestine, or by complicating pregnancy and parturition.
urged Congress to fix a reasonable price for the land, not "too
urged it. After observing closely the course affairs, President
urged, were necessary to safeguard the purity of the ballot, not merely
urticarial or erythematous rash, pain and swelling of the joints, and a
us at the least firing. The Emperor's gratitude was announced to the
us from Schon Grabern. On the left our troops were close to a copse,
us, may they be before the faces of Thy faithful warriors as dust
us, she prayed for the members of her own family, her father and
use his influence with the commander in chief to induce him to take
use of Bier's bandage. If this fails, the distended sheath is laid open,
use of opiates, of which heroin is the most efficient.
use of some form of _tourniquet_, such as the elastic tube of Esmarch or
use of the initiative and referendum, practically bound legislators to
use or strain of the tendons involved. In exceptional cases the skin is
use the railways as the means of exchange. Consequently he fixed low
use them for their own advantages," and employed the "public service of
use, and then it should be given along with the food.
use. Two important pure food and drug laws, enacted during the same
used to prevent its depreciation, without result. To the issues of the
used to roll on the ground, and he fell upon Eykhen, threatening him
used to secure the fixation of bones, or solid paraffin employed to
used to the darkness Pierre saw that the man was taking off his leg
used to turn the busy mills grinding the grain from the spreading farm
used, supposing the whole sting of her remark to lie in that word.
used. The extensive port-wine stains so often met with on the face are
useful and the Emperor Alexander held him in high esteem personally.
useful as _a primary dressing_ in all. As soon as the sloughs separate
useful as a preliminary step. The base of the ulcer and the thickened
useful in allaying the local irritation. One of the best means of
useful in mechanically cleansing the injured parts. Peroxide of hydrogen
useless for grafting; connective tissues, on the other hand, such as
uses every moment of the life of kings as a tool for its own purposes.
using it; but also in the North, particularly in New York City, where it
using the limb. The wounds heal well, but the victims of tabes are
using the spoon, care must be taken that its sharp edge does not
usual hearings, settled the disputes in such a way that Taft received a
usual hour, Mademoiselle Bourienne and Anatole met in the
usual in the middle of the hall and choosing the place where the
usual phenomena which attend suppuration, but the pus is slow in coming
usual tranquil and impenetrable expression. It was the heavy tread
usual, without undressing, in the room next to the one where the
usually affected being the medial cord, which is made up of fibres from
usually ascribed to some strain of the wrist--for example, in girls
usually attacks only one foot, it is not uncommon for the other foot to
usually be checked and the occurrence of suppuration prevented. If this
usually be found; it may be impossible to find it in the exudate within
usually cease growing when the skeleton attains maturity--the conversion
usually circular, thin, white, shining like satin, and the surrounding
usually determines gangrene. When an embolus becomes impacted at the
usually grows upwards and laterally, projecting above the sternum and
usually in the region of the lunule. This affection entails a
usually larger, the induration is more diffused, and the enlarged glands
usually leave a permanent bluish-black tattooing of the skin. When the
usually met with in the feet, but the upper extremity may be affected,
usually occur near the natural openings of mucous canals--for example,
usually occurs at a comparatively early stage. The secondary growths are
usually originate in venous cysts or pouches, and at acute bends on the
usually permeated with miliary tubercles. On opening the joint, these
usually precedes death of the bone. The bones especially affected by
usually preferred the former, especially in the Far South. Still another
usually recover if the focus from which absorption of toxic material is
usually restored, the conducting paths being re-established by the
usually solitary, about the size of a bean or almond, concavo-convex in
usually subcutaneous, and is frequently situated on the head or neck in
usually the case, only one of several collateral channels is implicated,
usually the femur, or, what is more remarkable, the condition may affect
usually the first sign of the malady; in time the muscles undergo
usually the medial condyle of the femur, from which it is readily
usually ushered in with fever, and signs of lymphangitis in the part
usually worn away and disappear. The surrounding muscles undergo
usually, in the genius of the commanders. But the assignment of
usurpations" which had induced them to throw off the government of King
uterine, and spermatic veins, and from the veins in the lower part of
uterus on the large venous trunks in the pelvis, may so obstruct the
uterus, and may cause serious symptoms by pressing injuriously on the
uterus, which is the most common situation, these tumours contain a
utilities was accepted in nearly every section of the union.
uttered aloud the caressing word he had said to her on the day of
uttered certain words, seems to us senseless. He had the power and
uttered!" pronounced the Mason in a stern and tremulous voice.
vacancies happen by resignation, or otherwise, during the recess of the
vacant space. If there is marked disease of the vessel, Matas' operation
vaccination has been abolished by the use of calf lymph.
vacillating, a coward, dense, dilatory, and has all bad qualities. The
vacillation between the various plans that were proposed had even
vague and difficult to localise, later it is referred to the interior of
vaguely conscious that he might be the cause of the sadness her face
vain to drive from the spot. Disregarding the officers' orders, the
valet informed him that Prince Anatole was with the countess. The
valet was rubbing him down. Another valet, with his finger over the
valgus, the great toe coming to lie beneath the second one; the
valley of the Ohio could hardly restrain their impatience. Soldiers of
valleys nearly all monopolized by planters, and they were by the force
value of the far-away country under the guns of the English forts, where
value of their exports, a hundred millions or more, "to be used in the
value of their possessions, the thirty peasant carts that had come
value of this terrible cudgel which regardless of the rules of
valves of the heart and give rise to endocarditis.
vanguard of the army reached France. A slow and steady stream followed.
vanguard of the whole army, that Napoleon was there and the whole army
vanguard, rewards were promised, and the men received a double
vanished again, evidently wishing to avoid the inquiring looks and
vanishing amid the clouds of dust they raised and making the air
vanity as author of the military plan, argued that Bonaparte might
vanquished; we can now turn our thoughts to the second, Bonaparte. But
vara. The clavicle or humerus may sustain greenstick fracture from the
variable degree of fever. These symptoms, to which the name _serum
variable quantity. In the vast majority of cases no ill effects follow,
variance with the explicit provisions of that instrument itself ... with
variation, and with the same expression on his full, cheerful,
variations in the surface tension of different varieties of cells,
varies from a mere restriction of the normal range of movement, up to a
varies from brown to black, according to the amount of melanin pigment
varies in consistence at different parts, and the X-ray picture shows a
varies: when small in amount the growth is brown, when abundant it is a
varieties include the _chloroma_, which is of a light-green colour, and
varieties of prepatellar bursitis, it is convenient to take this as the
varieties of the bacillus pyocyaneus, it is usually of a blue or green
varieties, although met with chiefly in the bones, may occur in soft
varieties, particularly bacilli, are propagated by the formation of
variety is the ossifying chondro-sarcoma, which undergoes ossification
variety known as _ambrine_ is excellent--appears to be the best; the
variety of the ankylosis, and the attitude of the joint. When there is
variety the commonest pyogenic or pus-forming organisms belong (Fig. 2).
variety, and is frequently associated with pouching of the aorta. It
variety, and the same thing over and over again would weary anyone.
variety, infection usually occurring through some slight abrasion in the
variety, only it grows more rapidly, and by destroying the nerve fibres
various cells are attracted to the bacteria by a peculiar chemical or
various mutual interests. For instance, the Pennsylvania Railroad
various uniforms on the fields and meadows belonging to the Davydov
various ways the accuracy of a problem that has already been proved.
variously coloured scars caused by tattooing. The only satisfactory
varix and phlebitis with chronic ulcer; in the arm as a result of
vary in character according to the tissue in which the cyst has
varying fortunes, it resulted in the discomfiture and retirement of
varying thickness. The most common seats of the condition are the lower
vascular areas in the neighbourhood of joints. Thus gangrene of the
vascular connective tissue pass in between the nodules of cartilage
vascular lesions of a syphilitic type in the articular arteries.
vascular; and the new bone that is formed is imperfectly calcified. The
vases the count kept glancing at his wife and her tall cap with its
vast holding of diversified interest, such as the Santa Anita ranch near
vast orb of the sun. In front, far off on the farther shore of that
vault of the skull, and to the mandible. The base of the skull is not
vehement, scolded, and sometimes flung the exercise book away.
vehicles of all kinds overtaking one another and blocking the muddy
veil from the secret of the countess' malady, an unwary young man
vein beyond endeavouring to maintain the heart's action by hypodermic
vein communicates with the artery through the medium of a sac--_varicose
vein is established, and the clinical features are those of a
vein winding about among the capillaries may sometimes be detected.
vein, may enter the blood-stream, in which it is carried to distant
veins and some fever and disturbance of health and temper. In the course
veins interferes with the nutrition of the skin (Hilton). The importance
veins they become engorged. Under the conjunctivae there are
veins to equal that in the arterioles, so that the capillary circulation
veins, and in such cases it is spoken of as the _varicose ulcer_ (Fig. 14).
veins, as is shown by the fact that it is relieved by elevation of the
venae cavae, the portal vein and its tributaries, the hepatic, renal,
venous circulation of the parts implicated; other combinations cause
venous congestion of a part, such as occurs, for example, in the leg
venous return without at the same time interfering with the inflow of
ventricle and cerebellum which maintain the muscular tone, with the
venture to suggest that Russia had saved Europe) "do any harm? The
ventured to defend the unlucky editor were deprived of their licenses to
ventured too far out of town with the proclamation and killed them.
veranda of his house in Kiev. And without linking up the events of the
veranda, and glided over the parquet to the door opening into the
veranda, he stood still. They were moving toward the door. Boris,
verdict to the effect that Congress did have the power to prohibit
verge of dissolution, "scarce held together by the strength of a hair,"
verging in the direction of open war. The New York and Boston papers
verily he did it. He firmly shaped the enterprise of the colony along
verses composed and printed in the hero's honor. Bagration, on
verses in the bosom of her dress close to her bony little chest, ran
vertebrae (Fig. 71) and posterior portions of the ribs, form a swelling
vertebrae opposite the umbilicus, if the spine is arched well forwards
vertebrae, and jaws. As they grow they may cause little alteration in the
vertebral border of the scapula, and the cristal border of the ilium.
vertebral spines or in the lines of the cervical nerves, and the
vertical for three or four minutes; the veins are thus emptied by
vertically now, and all was still. The whole sun appeared on the
very beginning of the action.) "I think I sent you?" he added, turning
very best one trammeled by the presence and authority of the monarch.
very clever but eccentric, and a bore. The poor girl is very
very day he gave the village Elder orders to collect carts to move the
very day that it seemed to him that either he had told the coachman
very definition of tyranny." The devices which the convention adopted to
very existence had been due quite as much to the conduct of the state
very highest circles were attempts made to keep in mind the
very infective discharge. Under the influence of irritation and want of
very lightly. She went to the table, set down the tray, and with her
very much about the new building. He has been reading a little, but
very nice. Only not quite my taste--he is so narrow, like the
very opening of the war that the next duty of Englishmen "is to
very pertinently asked why the same principle did not apply to women.
very poor, but for my own part at any rate, for the very reason that
very quickly, letting the borzois gain on him, and, finally having
very serious and weighty matter, and the fact that A had been
very serious impressions--such as the retreat from Smolensk, his visit
very soon, but as it was still early the hunt went farther. At
very strong ones. The left flank..." here the officer paused. "Well,
very thing that constituted the whole reward for her self-sacrifice
very time the pendulum was beginning to swing backward.
very various kinds, from monarchs to journalists, who lead the masses.
very wealthy heiress and also by the fact that the older she grew
vesicles form and in turn burst, and the eschar increases in size. The
vesicles on the surface. Children are most commonly attacked,
vessel and judge of its purity? Only by the inner purification of
vessel and, after seizing the crew, set it on fire. A royal commission,
vessel by destruction of the endothelium, and this predisposes to
vessel is to be taken seriously; it is usually necessary to _open up the
vessel wall. To this stage in the process the term _atheroma_ is
vessel walls, owing to the contraction and retraction of the coats and
vessel, especially when these are situated in the vicinity of the knee,
vessel, forming a valvular obstruction to the blood-flow. In most cases
vessel. Concurrently and by the same process the external clot is
vessels and in the lymphatics that accompany them.
vessels are beginning to degenerate, although the heart is still
vessels are diseased. The rupture may be incomplete or complete.
vessels develop at one or more points in the course of a vein, a
vessels in cicatricial tissue. This usually begins about the period of
vessels of which they are composed, into the capillary, the venous, and
vessels stationed along the American coast were authorized to stop,
vessels take origin in the lymph spaces of the tissues and in the
vessels were built to transport goods to the West Indies or to the
vessels, lymphatics, and nerves. That part of the corium immediately
vessels, or in connective-tissue spaces, so that it may only reach the
vessels, to close the opening in each by suture; this may be difficult
vessels. Among the fibroblasts, larger multi-nucleated cells--_giant
vessels. Douching the wound with hot sterilised water (about 110 o F.),
vessels. This inability of the vessels to contract and retract is met
vessels; and if it fails to arrest the flow through these, it is useless
veterans of the Grand Army of the Republic" by going fishing on
veterans of the war, now thoroughly organized into the Grand Army of the
veterans.... Vive l'Empereur!" came the voices of men, old and
veterinary surgeons, or hide-porters. Infection may occur on the face by
vetoed the bill. Still the issue lived. The Republicans, strong among
vetoes. The Supreme Court, which, under Marshall, had held refractory
vexation and left the room. The old count began irresolutely to
viands mingled with the smell of smoke. Pierre sat up and sighed.
vibration of their wings an aerial living sound, the only reply is a
vice and must endeavor to secure that the honest man may, even in this
vicinity of a joint may be invested with a synovial sac or bursa--the
vicinity of a nerve, as, for example, when the brachial nerves are
vicinity of the knee is characteristic of tertiary syphilis.
vicinity of the original lesion, and, breaking loose, are carried
vicinity. The Russians who entered Moscow, finding it plundered,
vicious and determined look steadily fixed on the icons, as though
vicissitudes of her politics or the ordinary combinations and collisions
vicomte and from the vicomte to their hostess. In the first moment
vicomte continued, with the air of a man who, in a matter with which
vicomte in a vigorous attack on the orator.
victim," he thought as he looked at the tall lad flourishing his
victories brought the French complete destruction, while the series of
victories that on receiving news of the defeat some would simply not
victorious at the polls. "The balance of power has at length got into
victorious majority. It was carried through the Lords in the face of
victoriously, "he's going to clear up the whole affair for
victory but in my opinion was nothing of the kind. We civilians, as
victory gained by liberty." Thomas Paine saw in the great event "the
victory gained by the Austrians, and of the retreat of the
victory of 1892, the Democrats in the House again attempted to bring
victory or defeat, the glory of our Russian arms is secure. Except
victory, a triumph under ordinary circumstances, was all the more
victory, does not give up the command of the army to General
victory, what effect would that have on the general course of
victory. He stood a little behind the governor and held himself with
victory. Kutuzov reported so to the Emperor. He gave orders to prepare
victory. Then he began to imagine that the Russians were running
victory. Under the original Constitution, it had been expressly provided
view of the planting interest that, from the arena of national politics,
view said: "It is true that we do not feel the movement of the
view that, when dilatation is the predominant element, it results from a
view the aim of every religion was merely to preserve certain
view, it is essential that the lower extremities should be approximately
view, regarded all these little adjutants on the staff of whom the
view, was to dispatch more troops to crush the "rebels"; and that very
view: love of one's neighbor and Christianity--and all this in the
views. He said the peasants were obdurate and that at the present
vigor and the year 1883 marked a series of railway triumphs. In February
vigorous action of Hamilton the prize might have been snatched out of
vigorous and the men are hard at work. The comparative immunity of women
vigorous efforts of the honest and sincere friends of the freedmen to
vigorous person who had fought so desperately with the marauder and
vigorous protests on the part of natives and American citizens against
vigorous protests, first against the obnoxious acts which precipitated
vile, idle, vicious life!" but dared not break the silence.
village and stacked its arms in front of the last huts.
village street, swaying, pressing upon and cutting the shoulders of
villages of any district and the number of fires in that district
villages what had been abandoned in the ruined houses and the streets.
vindicating the military powers of union soldiers and shaking the
violated the federal Constitution. In 1810, in the case of Fletcher
violates the Constitution. This power was not expressly conferred on the
violating the law. This measure, prepared by the Department of Justice,
violation of the Constitution of the United States and therefore null
violence and destructive doctrines, he held that "the organization of
violence attended with comminution of the bone. The nerve may be crushed
violence: the whole plexus; the upper-arm type; and the lower-arm type.
violent compression of the arm, as when an elastic tourniquet is applied
violent effort to adduct the limb. A swelling forms in the upper and
violent flexion of the joint, the muscular effort causing stretching or
violent twist of the foot. There is severe pain and considerable
violently, and the horse, flourishing its tail and extending its neck,
violently; but he wore the air of a man little concerned in what the
virtue of the closely knit organization of its business and finance, one
virtue of the isolated cells of the rete Malpighii which it contains, is
virtue--love of death. Only the vicissitudes of life can show us its
virtue. Nothing, I am convinced, but the depreciation of our currency
virtues were:  1. Discretion, the keeping of the secrets of the Order.
virtues, the seven vices, and the seven gifts of the Holy Spirit.
virulence of the toxins may prevent the leucocytes reacting, and
virulence of the toxins prevents reaction taking place, and leucocytosis
virulence, drove away with their swords the crowd of prisoners who
virulent as the number of federal employees increased. The holders of
virus into the general circulation, and its being carried to all parts
virus. The first appearance is that of a sharply defined papule, rarely
viscera, the pain is frequently referred to other parts, usually to an
visible about a mile and a half off on the opposite heights. Down
visible above the bush on his right.
visible by the glow of the charcoal.
visible for weeks in the floor of the ulcer.
visible in the moonlight--the horses began to tug at the reins of
visible in the snow and a shovel had been left sticking in one of
visible, still wet with the night's rain; the drooping branches of the
visible. Rostov, always closely followed by Ilyin, rode along the side
visit him and waited in the lofty antechamber ante chamber just as the
visit his neglected estates at the same time and pick up his son
visited by the members of the French embassy and by many belonging
visited me and we had a preliminary talk about the reception of a
visited the Foundling Hospital and, allowing the orphans saved by
visiting all the places he meant to go to and where he had been
visitor alluded to, though she had already heard about the cause of
visitors after him to Moscow in a most masterly way. The whole army
visitors and arranged about refreshments for the gentry and the serfs,
visitors was Mademoiselle Bourienne. She greeted the father and
visitors would gather there for a day or two. The rest of the year
visitors. The greatest attention of all to Boris' narrative was
visitors. The young people were in one of the inner rooms, not
visitors. Whole families of the Rostovs' and Bolkonskis' relations
vital activity; (2) the _adrenal glands_, the secretion of
vital parts of the treaty. These were rejected by President Wilson as
vital significance. In the first place, it was recognized that an enemy
vitality until it has formed an organic connection with the tissue in
vitality, and with the addition of a little sepsis, readily necroses and
vive?"* and the click of a musket.
vividly pictured herself as Prince Andrew's wife, and the scenes of
vividly to her mind. "They, the French, would settle in this house: M.
vocation is to be happy with another kind of happiness, the
vodka and roast goose or suckling pig. But in nothing in the house was
vodka brought, with some wine which the French had taken from a
vodka) was the subject of the liveliest jokes by the whole detachment-
voice Natasha had known previously, but the one that had sung As 'twas
voice about some intrigue going on in Petersburg. The old prince's
voice addressing the publican. "What have you killed a man for, you
voice which expressed joy for himself, severity for the regiment,
voice, and Lieutenant Telyanin, a small officer of the same
voice, hurrying one word after another, came through the open door.
voice, obviously so elated by the sound of firing, by the prospect
voice, seizing the soldier by his round shoulders and throwing him
voice, the crowd moaned and heaved forward, but again paused.
voice, turning for a moment to the front line, and slightly swinging
voice. "There was no one else in the room except myself. So that if it
voices again, but instead of the band a choir began singing a
voices as Rostov passed through the anteroom.
voices in the crowd could be heard saying. "Quite a young fellow
voices in the crowd, and the people rushed toward the reader.
voices of prophets, the parables of Evangelists, stories of mission
voices of the wounded were more distinctly heard than any other
voices of visitors, and the soft steps of the footmen. At one end of
voices shouted and talked at the same time, so that Count Rostov had
voices shouting together came up from the slope. For a moment
voices sounded louder and calmer, the stretchers disappeared from
voices was audible through the closed window.
voices were but feebly heard amid the uproar and one saw by their
volatile substances, such as ammonia or smelling-salts, to the nose; the
volition, to perform for the hive life--that is to say, for history-
volume than silver--made the sole basis of the national monetary system.
volume. The German treaty alone embraces about 80,000 words.
voluntarily they could leave it. Such was the constitutional doctrine of
voluntarily undertaken the debts and was obviously not guilty of
vomiting of blood from the stomach, as _haematemesis_; the passage of
vomiting, diminished secretion of the alimentary juices, and weakening
vomiting. The colour improves; the pulse becomes full and bounding; the
vote a homestead for yourself? That is the only thing Uncle Sam will
vote for Bell, the Unionist candidate, who stood firmly for the
vote of three to one; and the third intolerable act by a vote of four to
vote to a Republican candidate for President. Before the Civil War, the
vote was counted, it was found that Adams had been defeated; while the
vote, the House was morally bound to accept the popular judgment and
vote--Delaware thus enjoying the same weight as Virginia. There was no
vote. The outcome of the reversal was astounding. Judge Parker's vote
voted by the House of Representatives after the display of some
voted for, and of the number of votes for each; which list they shall
voted on or before 1867 or was the son or grandson of any such person.
voters, like the politicians, were in a state of indecision. Hayes had a
voters, while the Senators were to be elected indirectly by the state
voters. The significance of this action is obvious. Congress threw
votes against 1,800,000 for his opponent. The bitter things said about
votes and fourteen of them were returned to the House of
votes as Vice-President, shall be the Vice-President, if such number be
votes as against Bryan's 6,509,000. The congressional elections were
votes for assumption in return for votes for the capital. Enough
votes into four parts and no one received a majority. Under the
voting for and against the bill shall be entered on the journal of each
wage-earners rose into the tens of millions. The immigration of aliens
wages and shorter hours, and prejudice the public against it. At every
wages as the price of remaining. Southern planters likewise had feared
wages for women. It approved the regulation, rather than the
wages, to make contracts, to transact business, and to testify in the
wagons, rode in search of the commander in chief and of his own
wagons." Other lines of travel were also crowded and with the passing
waist, was still living in Pierre's house. The two younger ones had
waist, which often burns the skin and causes a chronic ulcer, and many
waistcoat, smoothed his hair, yawned, and followed Alpatych into the
waistcoat. "It's the saute, most likely," she added with a smile.
wait which would take them to the Warsaw highroad, and from there they
waiting for a vacancy to command a regiment, and have the happiness to
waiting for the beat. Only on horse back and in the mazurka was
waiting for the ladies to appear, Prince Andrew set off for home.
waiting in the passage, heard with fear and delight first the young
waiting to let her pass. She let the girl go in, and then listening at
walk a mile, then he stripped the flowers from the wormwood that
walk, and in the distal portion of a bone which is the seat of an
walked along beside her while the coach still moved on.
walked along just behind "Uncle's" horse with the serene air of a
walked away from the fire.
walked between the ranks.
walked toward the "warm rivers." Many of them were punished, some sent
walked without feeling the pain, though at night his feet were more
walking up and down the room past Alpatych who stood by the door, he
walking with a staff, a wallet on her back, along the dusty road,
walking, the bone may be straightened by a cuneiform resection.
wall become contracted; later the muscles of the back and thorax are
wall depends chiefly on the development of the muscular coat. The
wall had fallen in, the wooden roof was collapsing, and the rafters
wall of a shed, the roof of which had already been removed.
wall of the half-burned house against which Pierre was leaning.
wall, and, after eroding the ribs, to the pleura.
wall--_emigration of leucocytes_--and move towards the seat of
wall_ with the sharp spoon. An incision is made which will give free
walls hung round with Persian carpets. The part of the room behind the
walls of some brick houses. Pierre gazed at the ruins and did not
walls of the smaller blood vessels; the bundles of fibrous tissue are
walls. While the most common situation is in the subcutaneous tissue, a
walnut, but specimens in museums show that, if left to Nature, the
walnut. After a variable period it usually softens in the centre, the
waltz on the clavichord, while a fourth, lying on the clavichord, sang
wandering cells soon accumulate round the focus of infection, and form a
wandering in front of the house among the rosebushes. The shutters
want of conductivity in the nerve--and if the muscles have undergone
want some men to start a furnace forthwith; the iron, coal, and molders
want to," thought Pierre. "But this man knows the truth and, if he
want? What's the matter?" made Natasha approach more swiftly to what
wanted a home on the soil, it made little difference if single landlords
wanted at that stage of the campaign. It would be difficult and even
wanted to be agitated, Nicholas and his health would be the pretext,
wanted to purchase manufactures in the cheapest market, England, where
wanted to talk to them. On the road he was stopped by a French
wants the floor on which he has hurt himself to be beaten. The pursuit
wants to go to the war," replied Pierre, addressing the princess
war and not a game. As it is now, war is the favorite pastime of the
war and secretly regretting this, saw only the dark side.
war and the peace that had been concluded. "Yes, I have been much
war are spying, treachery, and their encouragement, the ruin of a
war began to spread in Moscow; people spoke of an appeal by the
war centers of the nation. In a memorable address to the American
war closed, were shaped by events beyond their control. The emancipation
war of 'criminal aggression' against the Filipinos entailing an annual
war of self-defense. "The military masters of Germany," he exclaimed,
war sharing the hardships of American army life. Pulaski fell at the
war that had been announced in a manifesto, and about the
war to defend in vain the independence of his native land. To these
war was touched on, or what the nobility had been convened for, the
war were added the labors of private citizens. Hayn Solomon, a merchant
war! But the enemy has lost masses...
war"; and, laughing contemptuously, went on into the room from which
war, during which, under the pretence of military necessity or war power
war. A terrible disaster befell Generals Arnold and Montgomery in the
war. On the last day of July, it made a temperate but firm answer to
warfare. It's all vewy well--only not for those who get it in the
warfare. The dramatic scene or episode, so useful in arousing the
warlike sound of steel on whetstone. He climbed onto the wagon and sat
warm, then tidied up the things on the table and in his own corner,
warm, well-ventilated room, and the foot of the bed elevated. Cardiac
warmer. Elevation of the part, wrapping it in cotton wool, and removal
warmly advocated the acquisition of Santo Domingo. This little republic
warn me of the humor my father is in. I do not allow myself to judge
warned his countrymen that they were treading in the path of the
warned them against sectional jealousies. He remonstrated against the
warning by others. Many prescriptions were offered by doctors of the
warning finger at his master. "They are on the scent of the cubs..."
warning gesture and stood still in the dim light beneath the curtain
warning in the Commons. "Believe me--remember I this day told you so--"
warrant, that independence would be the result of the joint operations.
warranted by the Constitution which he had sworn to uphold.
warranted them in drawing together for the protection of an institution
warranties or the exclusion or limitation of certain types of damages.
warranties or the exclusion or limitation of certain types of damages.
warrior, taking this as a hint that he was to occupy the coveted region,
warships of France joined the American privateers in preying on supply
warts, and fibroid tumours of the uterus. They produce no constitutional
warty or cauliflower-like outgrowths (Fig. 58). The infection of the
warty thickening of the epidermis--_lupus verrucosus_. In the fingers
was God. What had she to do with the justice or injustice of other
was I thinking? I mustn't forget. How shall I speak to the Emperor?
was Lieutenant Berg, an officer in the Semenov regiment with whom
was Sonya.) Princess Mary ran up the steps. "This way, this way!" said
was a bad man, and that in the duel with Bezukhov, Pierre was right
was a bar to their return. All civil and military places under the
was a call for the "Americanization" of the alien already within our
was a common complication of wounds. In the present day it is not only
was a dark hour for the American Revolution. Washington's brilliant
was a former leader in the American Federation of Labor.
was a genius, but at the same time it had to be acknowledged that
was a good thing to reduce their powers and pretensions. The
was a hoar frost now turning to dew, but in the valleys it still lay
was a place and everything waiting for him in the Archives Department!
was a plain farmer: he did not like innovations, especially the
was a round hole in the canvas to represent the moon, shades were
was a smell of alcohol, and sounds of voices and shouting in the
was a straggler he could tell them nothing definite about the troops
was a triumph for America. England recognized the independence of the
was a wounded French general, whom the officers surrounded. Crowds
was able to let it come to that, it means that I loved him from the
was about to happen in the bedroom. Pierre did not eat anything though
was absurd, he urged, for 180,000 men in one state to have the same
was accompanied by an armed revolt against the government in 1794. The
was accustomed, to sleep on a hard sofa without undressing and eat the
was actually at hand, the second Continental Congress, which met at
was added a war on England. Then came the Reign of Terror, during which
was added the danger of a possible revolt in Ireland, where the spirit
was admitted to the union to balance a slave state. In 1833, the people
was adopted. The old bell in Independence Hall, as it is now known, rang
was again "more democracy," namely, the abolition of the party
was again her partner. He reminded her of their first encounter in the
was alive and only slightly bruised. On the basis of these necessarily
was already broad daylight, though the corps should long before have
was already lost on the twenty-fourth, and obviously led to the loss
was already seated in the drawing room. The count took the gentlemen
was also promoted by a clause in the Northwest Ordinance declaring that
was an act of the same Congress making interstate railways liable to
was an easy task for the revolutionary leaders. They had only to build
was an incessant movement and buzz of voices. The chief magnates sat
was angry at the intrusion of the masculine element, both husband
was antipathetic to the Emperor and that the latter disliked his
was approaching the fire. As he was going along a foot path across a
was arranging a seat for the countess in the huge high coach that
was as inevitable as the retreat of the army beyond Moscow without
was asleep. He woke him up, told him to harness, and went into the
was assaulted in the streets of Boston, finding refuge from the angry
was at Krasnoe and at the Berezina (in both cases we had superior
was awaiting the Emperor's arrival and the beginning of a new
was being debated. "American independence," as the historian Bancroft
was being drawn up and, with the aid of the Code Napoleon and the
was blocked by the Republicans in the Senate. When, after the sweeping
was boiling and where the steward's high bedstead stood with its
was built principally by Chinese labor. The Eastern end, the Union
was by the sight of his superiors, he did not notice the staff of
was camping out at night for months in the snow with fifteen degrees
was chosen for their last stronghold, the Supreme Court. By historic
was clearly seen. The lines of that mouth were remarkably finely
was common in post-boys, from the repeated flexion and extension of the
was completely discredited. As in the case of taxes a direct authority
was concerned with, or he wanted to give the Russian special messenger
was conferred on the federal judiciary, the apex of which was the
was confirmed in this delusion by the fact that she had become a
was conscious of the movement of his lips and the snuffling of his
was considered bad in the Pavlograd regiment and, when given an order,
was continued unbroken until 1913 when President Wilson returned to the
was convinced that he alone could maintain command of the army in
was created. In every direction noteworthy advances were made in the
was cross with the stupid old man (as he called Rostov), who had
was denounced later by the friends of silver as "the crime of '73," a
was descending brightly upon the Danube and the dark hills around
was destined to pass under the rule of the Dutch, and finally under the
was diminishing when it was struck down altogether. In New York, the
was directed to--Pierre and Helene. Prince Vasili mimicked the sobbing
was disconcerted. The sight of the discomposure of that old man of the
was doing; the thought of meeting the Emperor at any moment was so
was driven from its usual channels and prices were enhanced. When the
was driving into the court of Count Bezukhov's house. As the wheels
was easier to criticize than to find another solution of the problem.
was embarrassing. In the treaty of alliance with France, the United
was equally impossible to George III and the majority in Parliament. To
was even made in 1834 to federate all the crafts into a permanent
was even more beautiful than it had been three days before at the
was expected within a few days. Princess Mary and the old prince
was finally laid down to the effect that in fixing rates state
was firm and clear. The Monroe Doctrine, it said, even if not so widely
was first described by Charcot in 1868--hence the term "Charcot's
was fixed at six years instead of two, as in the case of the House. In
was followed by a bright cheerful morning. The snow was thawing in the
was followed by a shoe factory from Massachusetts. The packing industry
was foolish. And running over the events of the day he remembered
was for the same means to transport his goods to the consumer on the
was forced to accept a new constitution for France vesting the
was formed and the war with Russia begun by the will of one man,
was formerly the source of much confusion in diagnosis, and it was
was fortunate in disposing of it, he could meet the installments, which
was fought and where the obvious disintegration of the French army
was fresh and dewy. A herd of cattle was being driven along the road
was full of joy and happiness. On receiving the order he gave his
was getting into his trap. The innkeeper stood at the gate.
was going on as usual. The members who were assembling for dinner were
was great on the bridge of Arcola, and in the hospital at Jaffa
was great, but now that he has become a wretched comedian the
was happening and at any cost correct, or remedy, the mistake if he
was hard alike on the lazy, the depraved, and the weak, and tried to
was heard ahead. "Forward by the left. Walk, march!" came the order
was heard respectfully congratulating the dying man on having received
was heard speaking all the time and the sound of his words was as
was heard with respect and his pleas were rejected. The bill passed both
was heard, and out of the foggy darkness the figure of a sergeant of
was hot in the room, the inside shutters of which were closed. He
was immediately diverted by an exclamation at the other side of the
was immediately killed. Prince Andrew again seized the standard and,
was impossible, but she stopped because she had seen by the sudden
was in her prayer. Yes, that was the prayer that moves mountains,
was in keeping with the news of victory which was conveyed, not only
was in the hands of an astute leader, Sir Robert Walpole, who betrayed
was in the world..."
was inadequate for the task. He could make nothing of it. Bennigsen
was infected with the merrily excited mood that goes with the
was involved in the slavery controversy. Indeed it was submerged in it.
was it the romantic love stimulated by himself that he experienced for
was killed by the British crown. As late as 1772, Virginia, not daunted
was laid upon incomes beginning with four per cent on incomes in the
was large and of an old pattern. The French swarming round their
was laughing at something, mingled in a merry sound, like the chirping
was leaning against one of the columns in a respectful attitude
was lying in the corner. Horribly unlike a man as that body looked,
was making one of the best matches in Russia.
was materially reduced. The energy of the agricultural population went
was met by soldiers who had sheltered in the village houses. They
was much like the old, in fact. It was still one of barter. The planter
was mustered in favor of building the capital on the banks of the
was necessary for ratification. The sentiment for and against the treaty
was necessary to order an attack, and it was fixed for the fifth of
was no longer possible for the hussars to retreat with the infantry.
was no longer possible to take the whole of it away.
was no longer with the family, he had gone on with his regiment
was no longer with the same troops and baggage trains with which it
was no more a position than any other spot one might find in the
was no test. Rovers on the deep and stragglers in the ports of both
was not a cheerful one, Dunyasha, who went with her in the carriage,
was not a matter of life but rather of death, as the saying is.
was not approved. That very autumn they lost in the congressional
was not concerned about the Emperor or any of those great people
was not only just but a safeguard against the "excesses of democracy."
was not only the President's right but his duty "to do anything that the
was not submitted to popular vote, and on the point of numbers we have
was not the question "What for?" but the question "How?" that
was not the same, not at all the same, as what had happened in his
was not until the latter part of October that he definitely instructed
was occupied by the opposing forces.
was of how he had saved the life of a Pole (in general, the saving
was offered in the law of 1908 limiting the hours of railway employees
was on the chief topic of the day: the illness of the wealthy and
was only just beginning to guess what love is, derived the notion that
was only more vividly conscious of the fact that if his affairs had
was orderly to the bravest general, and still more, he was going
was out of the question to be under French rule, it would be the worst
was out of the room.
was placed that day with the other arrested suspects, as the
was planted in 1761 and that the great Pontiac conspiracy was formed two
was played, and that the power he was supposed to hold was no longer
was pleased with them as he had been pleased with those of the naval
was prepared to die with the city train bands under the walls of the
was produced. The disability varies in different cases, and it may
was promptly disowned by the United States government.
was put into effect in Sumter, South Carolina, in 1912. Like the
was quick and positive. The legislatures of the Southern states, while
was quickly felt in national councils. The Democratic party in the North
was rather out of place in this brilliant society, the whole company
was ratified promptly by the Senate. The purchase price, $7,200,000, was
was reached. The income tax bill was dropped for the present; but
was reached. The local government passed into the hands of a governor
was reading the letter. He went on tiptoe to the nursery door and
was ready, the stranger opened his eyes, moved to the table, filled
was really a council of war. The conversations all dealt with public
was really true. From the very first days of their married life
was received--assumed the position natural to it.
was reduced to small proportions by the flotation of the United States
was reinforced in the platform. "As labor creates the wealth of the
was removable, followed by the insertion of a tube of radium for ten
was removed, after reflecting the soft parts, by paring away the excess
was repeated a hundred times. The balalayka was retuned several
was represented as a brilliant victory over the French, and so the
was required, interrupted his wife's remarks and touched on the
was resolute, calm, and animatedly alert, as never before. The
was rest, tranquillity, and freedom. But when he had been on the
was right, wrote to Kutuzov the first words that occurred to him,
was rumored, the allowance of forage money to captains of companies
was said of them, and they were thrown over the parapet and removed
was said to be receiving no one, and instead of the celebrated
was saying something to Tikhon, speaking of the Crimea and its warm
was saying was even more clever and to the point, but it was evident
was saying, Prince Vasili is the next heir through his wife, but the
was saying, and he looked on without interfering. Karataev thanked the
was saying, but he knew (the categories of thoughts were also quite
was seen swaying in the gloom of the night. The lower stakes cracked
was settled for all time that "the new colonies were not to be exploited
was silent and seemed confused. The prince asked her about her father,
was simple: "The Southern states are still in the union and it is the
was sitting at the head of the table. On either side of her sat the
was sitting by her sister at the tea table, and reluctantly, without
was sitting under the wagon, but it might be the kindest, bravest,
was sitting. The curtains were drawn, and a single candle was
was sleeping. A cricket chirped from across the passage; someone was
was so dark in the forest... and he had such kind... No, I can't
was so savage that even the ministers had to tone down his pamphlets
was some painted cardboard representing trees, and at the back was a
was spared. It was charged that each of the political parties had fallen
was speaking to, and saw the quartermaster, Topcheenko.
was spent chiefly at Prince Vasili's house in the company of the stout
was standing they could see the French. Immediately beyond the forest,
was standing, crumbling down the earth; a black ball flashed before
was still an open question, leaving to the future, in this way, the
was still in our hands, it was approved by the staff and accepted as a
was still unspent, weighed on his heart and poisoned the artificial
was strangely and agreeably struck by the fact that there was
was struck down by the assassin's hand, he above all others in
was struggling with the yard porter who was trying to lock it. With
was sustained by the Presbyterians. Two colleges looked to the
was taken by the passage of the Hepburn act. The Interstate Commerce
was taken to the clauses which affected the rights of American citizens
was talking of her life, the thought that Theodosia alone had found
was talking to Mademoiselle Bourienne. The countess caressed the
was talking to him about the first sitting of the Council of State
was talking too loudly and vehemently with the abbe, so she hurried to
was that the Russian army moved voluntarily, with no such threat of
was the bustle and thrill of suspense usual at such moments. Outside
was the cause his grief.
was the center of ancient civilization; that modern civilization has
was the climax of a historical movement extending over half a century.
was the field of battle. He did not notice the sound of the bullets
was the first Napoleon did not win. The profoundest and most excellent
was the first pretty girl who caught his eye; but scarcely had he
was the first to gallop into the village street.
was the measure of his labor, the product of his toil under the summer
was the petition to the Emperor drawn up by the auditor, in which
was the place of mourning for the younger female generation in the
was the practice to hear at the same time the agent of the colony so
was the result of chance rather than of calculation. A personal quarrel
was the rightful remedy to be used by the states in the redress of
was the story of a girl who had been seduced, and to whom her poor
was the unexpected realization of the fact that he still valued life
was the view of the battlefield itself, of Borodino and the hollows on
was the way he referred to the Emperor) "need only say the word and
was the wealthy proprietor, like Lord Baltimore or William Penn, who
was there at Shevardino, you see, where the oak is, but now we have
was there no victory, but from all sides came the same news of
was therefore more self-sufficient than the seaboard line of great
was therefore unpleasantly struck by the presence of French officers
was they who picked up the gauge thrown down by the Populists, though a
was this terrible affair decided? Moscow must be abandoned. The army
was to be the reading of a letter from His Lordship the Bishop when
was to blame for the mistake, but because he was an object of
was to capture them? Can the French be so enormously superior to us
was to explain the whole affair by word of mouth, besides delivering a
was too far separated from our right flank and the cavalry were all
was too precious to be given to foreigners, who were for the most part
was transferred to that "dark and bloody ground"; while to the
was tried. In the early days of the Jamestown colony, the land, though
was true. No one had taken any notice, for everyone knew the sensation
was undoubtedly in the protective tariff. To him nothing was more
was unescorted, Denisov with his hussars had seized it by force. The
was urged in another. Finally, on February 6, 1899, the requisite
was visiting them for the third time already.
was weak and inapt but she attained her object. The conversation was
was welling out making a large stain on the grass.
was whipped at the post and fined as well.
was won at Paris, and Benjamin Franklin was the hero of the occasion,
was worst of all for his relations was the fact that there was still a
was, in a large measure, attributed to the want of a judiciary to hold
was, in the beginning, provincial. The historic mission of uniting
was, stood on the Pratzen Heights.
was, under the reconstruction acts, compelled to ratify the fourteenth
was, when he met the big coach just entering the town gates was
was: Freemasonry is the best expression of the best, the eternal,
washed away or the ligature displaced, permitting of fresh bleeding
washed out eight million dollars' worth of gold. Under the gold they
washed the sands, and dug up the soil in their feverish search for gold,
washed, perfumed, and powdered in just the same way. She had washed
washing with saline solution or eusol, and the surrounding skin painted
waste the whole world, rises against us; these lawless men are
waste, and within from three to five days, they cease to react to the
waste, folly, and corruption. The "reconstruction" assembly of South
wasted from prolonged disuse, a considerable time may elapse before the
watch-glass around the edge of the orbit with adhesive plaster.
watched for many days the battle royal in the national convention of
watched from the various roads by the fugitive Muscovites and by the
watched him smilingly, and he rode off by the winding path down the
watched him. The older men, who thought it undignified to amuse
watched the regimental commander's back and mimicked his every
watchful eye on the young man who so alarmed her, noticed that he
watching the count and Marya Dmitrievna. Natasha kept pulling everyone
watching the drift of affairs, were slowly driven to the conclusion that
watching what was going on in the passage. Some women passing with
watching--as under an invisible cap--to see what went on in the world.
watchman in the night he called to the country: "All's well."
watchman's hut in the forest less than a mile from Shamshevo, to
water and fixed over the fomentation, by retaining the heat, obviates
water and found homes in the American wilderness at the opening of the
water communication between Lake Erie and the Ohio River through a rich
water does in a creek. Had the Russian army been alone without any
water had been spilled on the carpet. They were met by a deacon with a
water or with perchloride of mercury (1 in 2000); if the ulcer continues
water that lay in the ruts.
water to one side. The soldiers' faces were more and more clearly
water works, telephone, and street railway companies under the
waters of the Allegheny, and Fort Duquesne at the junction of the
waters. The hint was sufficient. The Kaiser accepted the proposal and
waterways; and the day is not far distant when stock-raising must be
watery in consistence (ichorous), with few cells. Where the granulations
wattle shed from which came the sound of officers' voices in eager
wave ahead of it, when it turns frequently the wave ahead of it also
wave may be detected passing both up and down the vein.
wave of moral enthusiasm, having attracted to itself, if not the
waves of the current beat softly against it below. Prince Andrew
waves of the great movement abate, and on the calm surface eddies
wavy. Some move by a screw-like contraction of the protoplasm, some by
wavy. When there is a central gumma, the shadow is interrupted by a
wax candles burned brightly, the silver and crystal gleamed, so did
way and there is the formation of exuberant granulations and of
way at the same time, a _contused-wound_ results. Bruising occurs when
way back to Tatarinova had stopped where the service was being held.
way forget, or do not know, the inevitable conditions which always
way into the middle of the group, listened, and convinced himself that
way of American railways and American vessels. So the railway builder
way of a grossly damaged portion of the vessel wall. In the scrotum, the
way of practical suggestions, the Senator offered as a solution of the
way that provisions are supplied and the routes indicated," said
way the action began for the first, second, and third columns, which
way the innumerable people who took part in the war acted in accord
way to the surface by the easiest anatomical route, and discharges
way to the very frontier of civilization and wrote books to inform or
way was made for him, was approaching the icon.
way without engaging the cogwheels.
way, and lead to wide destruction of skin, and the resulting sinuses and
way, and rudely breaking the frost-bound stillness, the troykas
way, leading to secondary haemorrhage. If the vessel ruptures into an
way. When they had come to the edge of the forest it was noticeably
ways of diffusing civilization more expedient than by the
ways, it may be through the skin or through a mucous surface.
we are examining and the judgment upon it, that period will be finite,
we cannot regard "power" as the cause of events.
we could not think how to address the reply! If not as 'Consul' and of
we have determined of right belongs to Venezuela." The serious character
we have got the French army between two fires; Michaud says that the
we have seen, formed local unions in the large cities. Between 1830 and
we have the _small round-celled_ and the _large round-celled_ sarcoma,
we know how or by what the way was prepared for his activity. If we
we know the laws of inevitability to which it is subject (from the
we know, the only means of preventing such return. The irritation
we let our feeble human minds roam, the better we shall please God,
we may believe contemporary laments, the power of the crown in America
we put them into the wing, the men's room, or the nurse's room, we
we should probably have defended the Shevardino Redoubt--our left
we went to the Sparrow Hills with Madame Jacquot?... It's such an
we'll all die fo' him!" added the orator with animation.
weak condition._--If the weak condition of the ulcer is due to anaemia
weak had long since been left behind and only the flower of the
weak sublimate lotion. When the chancre is within the meatus, iodoform
weak, unfinished entrenchments, but the disadvantage of that
weak. The tongue is dry and brown. There is profuse sweating,
weakness of the limbs which pass off with rest--_intermittent
weakness, tiredness, stiffness, and inability to use the limb, these
wealth and connections he belonged to the groups old and honored
wealth and independence of the province.
wealth and population of the North. Texas, it was said, could be divided
wealth and population. Of this the British made good use. Though early
wealth of Moscow and the strength of its plunderers was destroyed. But
wealth of the Church.
wealth. Between 1783 and 1829, eleven states were added to the original
weapon is discharged, and the part of the body struck.
weapon is placed in contact with the skin, the subcutaneous tissues are
weapons to the drunken rabble; now had processions displaying the
wear a red ribbon round the left arm.
wearing a cross round his neck, approached the speaker.
wearing down and total disappearance of the ends of the bones is the
wearing spectacles, sat in the drawing room in a loose dress,
wearing the Cross of St. George, awarded to soldiers for bravery in
wearing the white Horse Guard's cap and a military overcoat with a
weather had cleared up, and near the next hut two officers and a cadet
weather, the hounds, and the huntsman that he was being carried away
weather. "The weather is beautiful, Princess; and besides, in Moscow
weeks after he had been hit. His face had the same swollen pallor as
weeks improvement may begin. The clot which forms is liable to soften
weeks, and the wound may be quite healed before the disease declares
weeks. In the course of the reparative process the tendon and its sheath
weighed all the circumstances, concluded that the battle was lost, and
weighed every word in it to the best of his ability.)
weighing a million tons fell because the last navvy struck it for
weight and dignity to the chief executive of the nation, as symbols of
weight in national counsels as 750,000 men in another state. "The
weight of the body. Scoliosis is the usual type of spinal curvature, and
weight of the hanging body, and how the workman sat down, his head
weight of the limb may justify its removal.
weight of the limb may lead to curvature of the neck of the femur--coxa
weight to Adams and assured his triumph, much to the chagrin of
weight. His white head twitched with the effort. At last he rose,
weights upon the shoulder it may be contused, and the resulting
weighty and uninterrupted as the booming on the battlefield, but
welcomed by his home circle as the best of sons, a hero, and their
welcomed his Serene Highness with the cross at the church, and she
welcomed it as a sign of its return to power. The more moderate
welcomed them to spheres of wider usefulness, and declared that the
welfare of his army or of the doings of the enemy, or of the welfare
welfare of his soul is at stake. Ah, it is awful: the duties of a
well as economic grounds. In the constitutional convention of 1787,
well as in the forests and fields of the West.
well as in their phagocytic action, and in the course of destroying the
well as on land, friction between the royal officers and the colonists
well as the false paper money which flooded Moscow lost its value. The
well as to the removal of the loose bodies.
well established in the West Indies, had their attention also fixed upon
well in the regiment but was not liked; Rostov especially detested him
well known for his views on the bank, the tariff, and internal
well or firmly in the saddle. The battalions shouted "Hurrah!" and
well that the charitable Prussian ladies send us two pounds of
well up the leg.
well, I am finding out.... Only do let me into the very... into the
well-being of all--the food, clothing, and shelter of the whole people.
well-defined "rolled" border which consists of the peripheral portion of
well-defined narrow line which represents the epiphysial cartilage,
well-defined node, or the whole shaft may become the seat of an
well-settled and industrious community, its admission to the union was
well-supplied district and the parallel road was open to him along
well.... You say: join our brotherhood and we will show you the aim of
went about among the mummers without removing her spectacles,
went about the rooms fashionably dressed but looking sad and dull.
went away. The Frenchman looked at the linen, considered for a moment,
went before Congress and urged the passage of the suffrage amendment to
went downstairs to his own room. A quarter of an hour later the old
went epoch-making events. In 1832, the year of Jackson's second
went into details concerning the estate management, asking for
went into effect. The German army was in rapid retreat and
went into the anteroom with him.
went nearer and saw that the lamp stood on a black table on which
went off to another part of the shed.
went on foot through the town.
went on to the game without omitting a single dish or one of the
went on, addressing Pierre rapidly between her sobs. "The fire broke
went on, addressing his son and patting Pierre on the shoulder. "A
went on, continuing the conversation they had begun. And considering
went out into the vestibule.
went out of the room to change her costume. In the drawing room people
went past the ladies into the little drawing room. With quick steps he
went past, when some troops retreated, and when great masses of the
went so far as to join with the Democrats in a movement to break the
went there and found two thirds of the men and horses knocked out, two
went through the conservatories, the serfs' quarters, and the
went to the door that led to his own apartments.
went to the door.
went to the middle of the ballroom to sing, but with quite a different
went to the mirror, and gazed a long time at his own face. Then he
went to the window. He wished to take leave of Princess Mary, but
went to their horses. Hayne, the same groom who had been at
went too high, but the last round fell in the midst of a group of
went up the steps to where the coffin stood, to give her the
went up to her daughter and touched her head with the back of her hand
went up to the commander in chief, and presented arms.
went up to the harp that stood there in a corner. He took off its
went, seeing only the borzois and the hare and fearing only to lose
were "to protect the weak, the innocent, and the defenceless from the
were English or American. They spoke the same language, so that language
were Indians, growing more and more hostile as the frontier advanced and
were Prince Vasili and the generals, had the benefit of the
were Russians: Bagration, Ermolov (who was beginning to come to the
were a basis for Indian marauders who periodically swept into the
were a king! All the same, the French are charming, very charming.
were about to present the last petition of Congress to the king on
were agreed that the foreigner should be taught to speak and write the
were alight. The crowd was evidently watching for the roof to fall in,
were alike familiar and his own. The blue-gray bandy legged dog ran
were all gazing eagerly at the icon. As soon as the tired chanters,
were all hugging him, and the serfs, men and maids, flocked into the
were all looking at the field of battle as he was, and, as it seemed
were all silent. The glow spread, rising and failing, farther and
were already being reaped, made his calculations as to the sowing
were already close to the wall, and from the gallery resounded the
were already occupied. The German who knew little French, answered the
were already on the crest of the Alleghanies.
were also distinguished by the fact that she always presented some new
were always the same.
were among the prettiest. They were both particularly happy and gay.
were among their own people. The chief cause of the wastage of
were appointed by the king, and its faith and service were set forth by
were bazaars, shops, warehouses, market stalls, granaries--for the
were being fired through openings in the earthwork.
were being more and more denuded by Russian troops moving down the
were binding the West to the East and turning the traffic from New
were bold enough to speak and write against the Revolution were
were brought in by the Dorogomilov gate and taken to various parts
were building shelters with merry chatter and laughter; around the
were built county committees and then the larger colonial committees,
were burned, the cross-ties entirely destroyed, and the rails bent and
were by no means ready for the impending action. From privates to
were called upon to supervise the ships sailing to and from our ports;
were carried forward--and you did not look at the other page."
were contests over the apportionment of taxes and the quotas of troops
were daily increasing. Trade with the colonies, the greatest single
were declared to be in the interest of the crown and for the
were deeply discouraged, but the resourceful Hamilton, a delegate from
were defeated at the ensuing election. The need of national assistance
were destroying deserted villages, but that the French did not harm
were directing; but this affair of the war went on independently of
were driven from the continent, thought that they had no other country
were due to other things beside Alexander's will--such as the activity
were eager to extend their business operations. The strength of the
were engaged in clandestine trade with the Dutch. It carried with it an
were for the moment repulsed. Our reserve units were able to join
were formed into the royal province of New Hampshire in 1679.
were gazing at the dead man.
were gazing eagerly at the steaming boiler, waiting till the sample,
were given by the officers on the spot nearest to the units concerned,
were given to raise recruits, ten men in every thousand for the
were going and should have heard the sobs. It seems as though
were harassed and worried by the guerrilla warriors of Marion, Sumter,
were hardly announced before he began to ask the advice of his
were hardly heard in comparison with the noise of the firing outside
were heard from the crowd around, and at the same moment a mounted
were held in the same year state suffrage conferences in Indiana,
were his friends and neighbors.... Because of the proportions which
were holding the horses. Balaga took his seat in the front one and
were in attendance on the Emperor without any definite appointments:
were in due time to make America the greatest industrial nation on the
were in holes. But this defect was not due to any fault of the
were in no way binding) might give time for part of the transport to
were in vogue at the Karagins'. Only a few of these young men, among
were its taxing powers, carried a resolution of amendment to the
were jealousies between the planting states and the commercial states.
were just what he needed in his angry mood. One of the first bullets
were left behind in enemy hands while the sick Russians left behind
were likewise none bold enough to contend that the anarchy of state
were lost if the Emperor would give another division.
were lying or sitting on them. Some were walking about the rooms in
were made to sell the stamps. They sacked and burned the residences of
were many and varied; but they included the prevention of extortion by
were many dead whom he did not know, but some he recognized. The young
were married and so further increased the fame of these dances. What
were merely out for a ride. He glanced with pity at the excited face
were momentous. By the peace of 1763, Canada and the territory east of
were more than ninety thousand inhabitants in the territory; so it was
were most important that the sinewy white arm he was flourishing
were not billeted on the inhabitants as is usual in towns but lived in
were not borne by the waves from one shore to another as before.
were not consecutive and clear but only the feeling that prompted
were not executed because they could not be. Apart from that, the
were not on the far side of the streams and hollows of Sokolnitz and
were not on the side of the planters. Already Americans of a far
were not realized they drifted away from the order. The troubles were
were not secure unless supported by the suffrage. In this same
were not speaking of anything he wished to hear. Some discussed the
were now to leave Moscow like everyone else, his flight from home, the
were nowhere else for the family to talk but here at the ball. She did
were often attacked and sometimes burned to the ground. Garrison himself
were on the lookout for him, and when they caught sight of a figure in
were out of humor and dissatisfied with the affair, and so did not
were parted," she added, looking smilingly at the little girl who
were passing. The whistling sound of the runners on the snow and the
were plates of raisins, walnuts, and almonds. The governesses were
were powerless and appealed for aid. The mine owners rejected the
were propitious for a third attempt to win the presidency. The disaster
were provincials, and the very people they had entertained in Moscow
were pushing back the crowd, Rostov kept his eyes on every movement of
were put up for elections in the early thirties and in a few cases were
were raised too late. A call for help ran through the western border of
were returning from the attack. Rostov got out of their way,
were rife of the imaginary approach of columns from Russia, of some
were romping with a young bear, one pulling him by the chain and
were saying that the Russian ladies are not equal to the French? One
were saying, 'Ah, she's not the one I'm after, so it's not worth
were sent for the solution of difficulties that might be
were sent over at the opening of the contest, the recruits drummed up
were signs of approaching death. As she stepped to the door she
were sitting or lying on the floor. He was telling me something, and I
were smiling. Though the commander was occupied in giving instructions
were so far from home that he accepted "Uncle's" offer that the
were so jaded that at a meeting of the huntsmen it was decided to give
were so serious, though she was still holding the ends of her
were some of the European writers on American affairs?
were standing motionless; then he came to the region occupied by
were starting from their sockets to watch their chief. On reaching the
were stressed by Gerry of Massachusetts: "All the evils we experience
were supreme, notwithstanding the efforts of the crown to overbear their
were taking up, or preparing to take up, their positions for the
were the African negroes brought to America and sold into slavery. When
were the French. A group of Cossack scouts retired down the hill at
were the Rostovs.
were the first Anglo-Saxons to encounter aridity, and they were baffled
were the fun of the game which interested him most.
were the holy relics, the arms, ammunition, gunpowder, and stores of
were the reserve. Higher up the hill, on the very horizon, our guns
were the same as those that had engaged their attention since the
were the symbol of futility. Into the struggle for the formation of the
were the withdrawal of the British from Philadelphia, the battle of
were then in love, though less ecstatically, with their Tsar and the
were there to awaken curiosity about the region. No sonorous bells in
were therefore very anxious to secure for their section the largest
were thrown out of employment. The government had sown folly and was
were to be citizens of the new republic were separated from those who
were to control the development of Porto Rico and the Philippines. The
were to meet. He sat in the caleche, dozing and waking up by turns,
were told so (on the contrary their superior officers, and Napoleon
were too advanced for the members of his party in Congress, and where
were trying through the Dowager Empress Marya Fedorovna to secure it
were unable to pay for their passage is established beyond the shadow of
were unshakable. We pass the time as we can, but in war as in war! The
were vain and both halves of the door noiselessly opened. It
were vast Indian frontiers of the state of Georgia, unsettled and almost
were very much exposed--and she seemed to bring the glamour of a
were visible through the wonderfully clear air, brightly illuminated
were visible to the veriest street urchin. "Now," said Gouverneur
were, and where the French, he did not know. There was no one near.
were, his personal power and strength, affirming the existence of a
were, in the first place, constitutional reasons. The Congress of the
were, of chief of the Emperor's staff. He came out of the study into
west was the power of Spain, humiliated, it is true, by the disaster to
west. Bulgaria was stripped of her gains in the recent Balkan wars.
west. The population, which had numbered 135,000 in 1880, passed the
western scouts searched for overland routes to the Pacific. Zebulon
westward as far as Gaul, across the Mediterranean, and eastward into
wet ground. The Cossacks saw that his arms and legs jerked rapidly
what Fabvier told him of the heroism and devotion of his troops
what I have seen. The troops are in complete disorder..."
what I say: 'If I had wobbed the Tweasuwy...'"
what Konovnitsyn had foreseen on the night of the eleventh of
what a voice she has; though she's my daughter, I tell the truth
what all the Russians of that day desired--to drive the French out
what capacity he was questioned by Bennigsen, the Grand Duke,
what class he could belong. The French followed him with
what distressed the princess most of all was her father's
what do we, I mean the Austrian court, care for your victories?
what grounds it is not necessary to inquire, that the leaders of the
what had happened during that half-hour to the troops entrusted to
what happened. It is very difficult to tell the truth, and young
what he had to deliver to them from the highest leaders of their
what he had too long been thinking of so painfully to the exclusion of
what he meant by the words all is over, "and the count's papers are
what he said was not the outcome of cunning calculations, but of a
what he saw before him. "What is the connection of that man with my
what he sought at his very feet. All his life he had looked over the
what he wanted to say and solved the question that tormented him.
what he was saying. But the Emperor Francis continued to look about
what he would have done at that moment had Helene not fled from the
what is good for humanity. This assumption is all the more natural and
what is to become of me?" thought he. He had the unfortunate
what it may--then out of all the continually expressed wishes of
what it was ein Mann zu sein.* Vera at the same time smiling with a
what of it? So much the better!"
what she had told her other suitor; that is, she put the matter so
what the seventh virtue was and could not recall it.
what the universal historians do, and consequently they not only
what they are. But how cast off all the superfluous, devilish burden
what was being done in the political world. Incidents were related
what was going on at the staff at headquarters and to consider means
what was going on before him. So the way in which these people
what was going on in front of him--at the battery. He now saw
what was going on in front. Whether all the enemy forces were, as we
what was taking place in the covered trap. Several times Rostov,
what way that death was but an expression of the infinite goodness
what we have brought away.... The icons, and my dowry bed, all the
what we know of the essence of life.
whatever circumstances I may be placed. But if you want to know the
whatever it is." And he looked round in the sleigh.
whatever movement I made would be the only one. That I did not lift my
whatever muddles those at the top may make, we shall win tomorrow's
whatever source derived, without apportionment among the several States,
whatever under the Constitution to charter such a private corporation.
whatever." The effect of this measure upon the hat industry was almost
whatnots, cupboards, and little tables. The quilt of a high, white
wheat belt. Passengers could now travel by canal boat into the West with
wheels; others again as an intellectual influence, like the smoke that
when Anisya Fedorovna entered. On the tray was a bottle of herb
when Bagration was killed and nine tenths of the men of our left flank
when I was in Petersburg I felt (I can this to you) that the whole
when Prince Andrew entered his father's dressing room (not with the
when Theodore Roosevelt took the oath of office, the presidency passed
when a treaty of purchase was negotiated only to be rejected by the
when any battle must be horrible and senseless--was the very time to
when at that unusual morning hour, gazing at the dark face of the
when called into the actual service of the United States; he may require
when desirable; but it could at the same time maintain a regular army
when even a large quantity of iodoform is inserted into the cavity of
when examined microscopically reveal the colonies of actinomyces.
when grasped between the fingers appears to be in size and consistence
when he could get more rewards by doing nothing on the staff, and
when he favored the modification of the common law "so as to put
when he is invited to surrender principles essential to the safety of
when he received the nomination for President.
when he returned with the horse all in a lather, he informed Lavrushka
when he said to Kutuzov: 'Your Emperor and the Fatherland award you
when he saw the minister seated at a large table reading some papers
when his attention was diverted by the desperate shrieks of the
when it appears on parts of the body other than the genitals. It differs
when it had surrounded the French on three sides and when its aim
when it immediately enters a large vein. The poison is innocuous when
when it is once established. It has been proved experimentally that the
when it is passively extended, and disappears when the muscle is thrown
when it is varicose. The onset of the attack is indicated by a sudden
when it swerves--"rider's sprain"; of the abdominal muscles in vomiting,
when men abandoned the conception of the fixity of the earth.
when nothing better could be found for the privates. From local
when one of the aides-de-camp rode up to them.
when one of the generals addressed Kutuzov asking whether he wished
when planning his design he had more than once come to the
when pursued. More than once he had driven them through the town
when ratified by the legislatures of three-fourths of the several
when self-confidence was of no avail in relation to the one question
when she occasionally drew it down to meet the lower lip. As is always
when speaking of the highest aristocracy, to an ambassador's ball he
when the French were fleeing toward Smolensk, there were hundreds of
when the armistice was signed.
when the blood pressure is raised, as in crying, and if the tumour is
when the forces of disorder are loose and the wreckers with their false
when the infected tissues are exposed to the rays of the
when the knee is extended, and becomes softer and more prominent when it
when the new case is incapable of resisting the strain put upon it, and
when the patient gets up he should wear a supporting elastic bandage.
when the skin is irritated it may ulcerate and fungate. The treatment
when the slightly harmful pills in the little gilt box had to be
when the sole is tickled.
when the strength of that impetus was exhausted and no fresh push
when the tendon is moved in its sheath. The crepitation may be soft like
when the tendon passes through muscle than through interosseous
when the vaccine is prepared from organisms isolated from the patient
when the veins are varicose, by preventing the access of healthy blood,
when the young man had departed. "There is never any 'impossible'
when the youthful Speranski was at the zenith of his fame and his
when their leave permits had been passed at the town gate and they had
when they all came out into the frost and got into the sleighs,
when they had looked it from the hill, the officer had pointed out
when they rushed from the covert... the horse worth a thousand
when this disease affects the genitals or anus; they are rarely the seat
when this function ceases, many of the glands become involuted and are
when this is done. The child cannot believe that the strongest and
when we have removed their only firm basis, a conviction in the minds of
when we know what is needed!" said he, trying to be heard above the
when we watch the ants round their ruined heap, the tenacity,
when, after 1807, he continued to serve in the Pavlograd regiment,
whence came sounds of shrieks and laughter. The small, muddy, green
whence the native Irish had been driven by the conqueror's sword. There
whenever any copy of a Project Gutenberg-tm work (any work on which the
whenever any copy of a Project Gutenberg-tm work (any work on which the
whenever the right of choice shall devolve upon them, before the fourth
whenever the story produced an effect she glanced at Anna Pavlovna, at
where Harrisburg was later founded. Along the southern tier of counties
where and why, along the passage leading to the rooms on the ground
where each is lord of the soil he cultivates. Where a log cabin is all
where fugitives were concealed in the daytime between their long night
where he gave his hand to the plague-stricken; but... but there are
where he had ridden out at the head of the Guards, in his casque and
where he was standing down below, or from the knoll above on which
where it is more needed, by holding them vertically in the air for a few
where it winds round the neck of the fibula, because it is superficial
where nothing resembled reality. The big dark blotch might really be
where she considered the resonance was best.
where stood the high bedstead with its silken hangings. On leaving the
where the French could not see the smoke. In the passage of the
where the French pickets had been standing that evening.
where the Moskva River is, and we have thrown up three redoubts there,
where the bare-legged Duport, in a tinsel-decorated jacket, jumped
where the enemy ought to be, now he fancied it was only something in
where the enemy was, might have arranged some more advantageous plan
where the loose covers had been removed from the furniture, a
where the prices of corn and hogs fixed his earnings for the year.
where the profundity and genius of this movement lay, for not much
where the rivals suddenly recognized one another; and the ladies
where the screen of trees was less dense. On reaching a large oak tree
where the skin is thin or red. If the cannula becomes blocked with
where the sleighs had been left, in a small clearing in the pine
where they had the majority. In New York City, for instance, the local
where they pleased. There were very few resident landlords in the
where they were mainly supported by the government. The supervision of
where they were sitting on the sofa, but through the big windows the
where they were to take him Pierre did not know: back to the coach
where two batteries should be set up by the morrow to act against
where we are really going in the darkness, and that we shall arrive
where you are--at the heart of affairs and of the world--is the talk
where. We have an excellent priest, he conducts the service decently
whereas it was perhaps not known, since the enemy was in movement.
whereas the only reasonable aim was to shorten those marches. To
whereas the sum of individual wills is never expressed by the activity
whereby shipowners and other persons of means furnished the passage
wherein the crime shall have been committed, which district shall have
wherever the hussar regiment went and his jealousy had become a
wherever the position was most difficult all through the
whether any "gentlemen of the embassy" were present or not,
whether by the impaction of an embolus or the formation of a thrombus in
whether he had really been there the night before and really seen
whether or no the French were running after them, but not daring to.
whether pus is found or not, the bone should be opened in the vicinity
whether the Russians had not withdrawn, and was told that the
whether the time had not already come to put her project into
whether there is hope that he may consent to reduce the term by four
whether they were right or wrong. As to the French disorders and
which England was laboring had been largely incurred in the defense of
which His Highness the Archduke Ferdinand has honored me, I imagine
which I shall lead the army."
which Pierre had been present at the beginning of the battle.
which Prince Andrew had gone and made the sign of the cross in his
which Prince Andrew involuntarily watched as one does watch the
which accidents so commonly occur during the shooting season, the charge
which accompanied them, formed for two months the subject of
which accompanies the hyperaemic stages of the process, Bier was led to
which affects the synovial membrane of a joint. It is usually associated
which after his sleepless night he had not the slightest doubt, and
which all the historians give, from the compilers of memoirs and the
which alone could speak for all the provinces at the same time. Neither
which an enormous map of the environs of Brunn was spread out.
which an undue fragility of the bones dates from intra-uterine life. It
which are carried away in the blood or lymph stream undergo necrosis and
which are loosely tied to afford sufficient space between them for the
which are met with in the mamma and ovary. A characteristic feature of
which are most active during adolescence, for example at the knee-joint.
which are not authorized. "A law repugnant to the Constitution," he
which are so characteristic of the disease, are usually preceded for
which are so liable to develop from contraction of the cicatrices are
which are the hooded snakes of India, the rattle-snakes of America, the
which are usually covered by crusted discharge. The disease tends to
which are usually depressed and adherent to the bone.
which began its career on the Hudson in 1807; by the canals, of which
which bore fruit under the administrations of Taft and Wilson in laws
which brought the French armies into Russia.
which by their growth and proliferation fill up the gap with young
which case a slip may be taken from an adjacent tendon; in the case of
which causes thickening of the diaphysis; this is most marked at the
which communicate freely with the lymph vessels. The cells composing the
which communicate with the joint is most often met with in the region of
which consists in a modified excision. The deformities resulting from
which consists in inducing an artificial hyperaemia in the inflamed area,
which constitutes ulceration. The dead portion is known as a _slough_.
which constrains them to demand the equal station to which they are
which covered with snow, appeared on the landing where the footman
which crawled between the infantry and cavalry and took up its
which curl up within the lumen, the outer coat alone being held in the
which demanded the call, he wanted to see that original, eager girl
which dictated the Philippine policy of the Republican administration
which did not arrive. The French, avoiding the Russians, dispersed and
which do not entail putting the ilio-psoas muscle on the stretch.
which does not yield to blistering, the periosteum may be incised and
which eats into and replaces the articular cartilage. Clinically, the
which forbade disfranchisement on account of race. Support for the
which form the sac, on the inner aspect of which laminated clot is
which gained for him the general good will. This was his
which gangrene naturally tends to become arrested--namely, at the highly
which gives rise to the _hydatid cyst_. The liver is by far the most
which gradually covers the sore, becoming paler in colour as it
which had been admitted in 1861, it escaped the invasion of slave owners
which had been aroused by the angry contest over ratification. "The
which had been issued by the Congress since the beginning of the
which had brought about the truce between the North and the South, in
which had grown restive under him, and plunged into the water, heading
which had laid the world "in blood and ashes." Instead of praising the
which had long before developed between the Pacific ports and Hawaii,
which had no connection with the matter in hand. His haggard face
which had no meaning for anyone else, but gave him some of the best
which had previously impelled them to go no longer existed. The
which had taken possession of their souls at the consciousness of
which has destroyed the contents of the Orbit.
which has given rise to the loose bodies, and it is exceptional to meet
which has passed through the walls of capillaries. After bathing
which have a high power of resistance, form in the centre of the rods,
which have already healed. In the course of years large tracts of the
which have never yet been fully explained--McKinley ignored the final
which he clasped his tobacco pouch, inside the bosom of his dressing
which he had already passed. Through the terrible and deafening roar
which he had met Rostov, tried to enliven the conversation. One of the
which he had ready in his mind, of all he knew and had seen. But the
which he had so long been deprived. And he suddenly turned from the
which he had to speak to the Marshal, was driving up the avenue in the
which he held the hilt of his naked saber, looked just as it usually
which he helped to bring upon mankind, who summoned the delegates of the
which he meant to double the three thousand just put down to his
which he presented to Prince Bagration. On the salver lay some
which he took from his pocket began asking the officer in how far
which he was trustee. This Marshal was Count Ilya Rostov, and in the
which he was using solely for the welfare of Russia. In Prince
which healing occurs when the access of fresh bacteria is prevented is
which his talk was full, were for the most part not the coarse and
which humanity is being led is known to the historians: to one of them
which hurt the back of his head; then when they propped him against
which if neglected may lead to the formation of fissures and superficial
which imposes limits to the legislatures of the several states." In the
which influenced the whole army and directed it along the Mozhaysk
which inspired the respect of the onlookers, "Will it be long? Are
which intellectual knowledge is divided. The highest wisdom is one.
which interfere with the growth of epithelium.
which is an enlargement of the lymph glands. As the primary growth is
which is characterised by its occurrence earlier in life, by the pain
which is met with in the urinary bladder. Papillomatous growths are
which is most likely to be at fault (Arthur Keith). The disorder of
which is not only more profound, but also lasts much longer than the
which is one form of cancer of the skin, will be discussed with new
which is only about 4% of the present number of computer users.
which is only about 4% of the present number of computer users.
which is the more free the more abstract its interests, and his
which is the salt of mirth, and they were not even aware that such a
which is the very essence of the soul and does not require an
which is variously described as being like the lash of a whip, a blow
which it gives rise are pain down the limb from pressure on the sciatic
which it held its sessions. In a little while it became the master of
which it is placed, so that it may derive the necessary nourishment from
which it is probably frequently mistaken, but in the syphilitic
which it lies. This clear zone separating the shadow of the dead bone
which it occurs, and of an effort on the part of these tissues to
which it took origin, forms between the fascia and the overlying skin.
which la Mosquee (as Napoleon termed the church of Basil the
which lies in the family.
which makes a single ragged wound having much the appearance of that
which may adhere to the walls is removed by rubbing with dry gauze. The
which may be demonstrated in the exudate in the joint and in the
which may last for months. Paroxysms of pain may be excited by the
which may result in sloughing of fasciae and tendons. When the infection
which menaced the planting interest. As the former grew in magnitude and
which might be paid to women and children. Oregon, the following year,
which might be seized and confiscated. In the second place, it was
which might have destroyed his prestige--do not appear upon the
which name the brother who prepared a seeker for entrance into the
which nations are led, modern history should study not the
which not only confirms the diagnosis, but, in many instances,
which occurs in old people, and some forms of cancer in the rectum--are
which occurs in these situations in non-syphilitic children, the points
which originated in the days of the Dutch West India Company, when
which our outposts now scouted close up to the French stationed at
which regardless of the difference of the aims set for the common
which represents the reaction of the tissues to the entrance of the
which revealed how deep-seated was the distrust of the capacity of the
which rose above the other sounds, did not cease for a moment. The
which seemed widespread everywhere. The cook's moans had now subsided.
which severe headache and paralysis are the most prominent.
which she did not admit. From early in the morning, wearing a dressing
which she did not in the least understand but to which she
which she had first entered the room--the smile of a perfectly
which she knew so well), on the lock of gray hair that escaped from
which she laughed; at the other could be heard the story of the
which she used to run when playing at tag, ran through the ballroom to
which showed that he only understood the meaning of his words after he
which stood the commander in chief's carriage, and he sat down on
which struck the country with terrible force in the following summer.
which suppuration usually occurs, so that the fungus comes to lie in a
which take place in the skeleton during the period of growth, modify
which the French (having occupied Borodino) were attacking in the
which the French were directing all their energies. Beyond a certain
which the Rostovs always attended. He was pointedly attentive to Sonya
which the United States shall be a party;--to controversies between two
which the actions for which they blame him (the Holy Alliance, the
which the animal went when excited. Bending his foaming muzzle to
which the application of the suction bell is persevered with. The
which the arteries, veins, and capillaries are all involved. It is met
which the cadet under fire for the first time had experienced.
which the chief symptoms are pulsation in the orbit and protrusion of
which the colonists suffered through British regulation of their
which the diagnosis is founded are discussed with the different tissues
which the doctors attributed to eating this root. But in spite of
which the elder ones chiefly belonged, including, Pierre thought,
which the fire of life had seemed extinguished, now flashed with
which the government cannot go with any good practical results in
which the human mind cannot avoid when it deals with separate elements
which the inoculation takes place. As observed on the fingers of adults,
which the iodine is applied as described above. The staining of the skin
which the man was placed whose action is being judged, and according
which the more this person expresses opinions, predictions, and
which the name _syphilitic onychia_ has been applied; more commonly the
which the nerve-trunk is involved secondarily either by scar tissue in
which the organisms are active. This is most efficiently accomplished by
which the pain becomes excruciating. In the early stages there are
which the patient describes his pain. For example, the pain caused by
which the patient's spine is arched forwards by allowing the lower
which the people of New England have of late carried on the whale
which the phlebitis is associated. Ligation of the vein on the cardiac
which the planters, with all their skill and energy, could hardly
which the rapid firing could be heard. The shots came from the yard of
which the raw surface is painted with undiluted carbolic acid and
which the road ran. The sunshine from behind the hill did not
which the sick man had been laid in a stately pose in keeping with the
which the skin is freely movable. They are usually adherent to the
which the sole aim was the children's moral welfare delighted him. Had
which the steward met by showing the necessity of first paying off the
which the textile industry of New England, the iron mills of
which the troops had stood and were standing, but a moral victory that
which the trunk of the great saphena vein in the thigh is alone
which the tumour grows. In the papillomas of the skin--commonly known as
which the vessels of the dorsum of the penis can be felt as indurated
which there had seemed no escape. She wrote that the last
which they are derived, and partly because the new connective tissue
which they are given have cleared up. If the potassium salt is not
which they cause; exposure to the X-rays is to be preferred to
which they develop, and the free lymphatic circulation by means of which
which they had approved in their platform. They had declared: "The
which they had started. The colonel and some of his men got across and
which they pass to the mesenteric glands where they become arrested and
which they were throwing everything superfluous, made the eyes
which time the patient is liable to suffer from manifestations which are
which to his amazement had gained him the St. George's Cross and
which unites the deepest bass with the shrillest tenor, and round
which was a portrait. In the middle of one of the longest sentences,
which was animated by the beauty of the morning and by his talk with
which was being mown down by the soldiers, evidently for fodder.
which was blazing briskly. The walls were all on fire and the back
which was characterized by two distinct features. In the first place,
which was clearly impossible. But a freak of fate made the
which was concerned with the relation between church and state. They
which was lying on the table and went out of his study by the other
which was pitched that day on the steep left bank of the Niemen, and
which was ruining Europe; to the generals and old soldiers that the
which was soon to carry the first reform bill of 1832, extending the
which was to be found "the cream of really good society, the bloom
which was to keep her faithful to me for the whole year of my absence!
which we do not understand). The more we try to explain such events in
which were signed in September, 1850, by the new President, Millard
which were soon reckoned among the first commercial towns of the whole
which were the remains of supper. A footman, thinking no one saw
which were to be the first to descend the heights to attack the French
which what was needed for success in the service was not effort or
which would in some measure restore the affections of the Americans.
which, according to the stenographic report of the convention, became
which, although both ends of the vessel may bleed, is more copious from
which, swelling, growing, rolling, and blending, extended over the
which--adrenalin--acting as a stimulant of the sympathetic system, so
whiff of fresh air, and a new white sphinx appeared, standing at the
while I must not touch a hair of the wily agitator who induces him to
while ago that universal auntie Anna Mikhaylovna told me, under the
while being moved, and the probing of his wound at the dressing
while by way of additional compensation to France the rich coal basin of
while carts were passing out of the gate. Pierre turned away with
while drying it at the fire and how they had laughed at him.
while he dressed for dinner. The old prince always dressed in
while he was searching for a route around the world. That same year also
while here the enemy would ruin you..."
while in the Lords it was not even necessary to go through the formality
while in the ligaments and peri-articular structures it leads to the
while nearer still, in the hollows and woods, there burst from the
while not opposing limitations clarifying the obligations of the United
while others on the contrary reported that the Russian army bad been
while still searching for the papers he glanced at her several times.
while telling the tale of the merchant who suffered innocently,
while the demand arose for the exclusion of the Japanese as well. In
while the earth was gay.
while the historians of culture evade it and answer something quite
while the husband is alive.
while the man who commanded more would evidently work less with his
while the priest with a goose feather anointed the boy's little red
while the temperature rises to 103 o, 104 o, or 105 o F. The pulse is
while the trunk muscles may be involved, those of respiration as a rule
while those behind began to halt. With the same feeling with which
while we, on the other hand, with our left wing by far outflank his
while. The night was dark and damp. They could not see the horses, but
whip in the sand when a caleche dashed up noisily. A man in a
whip over his shoulder, as when Rostov had seen him on the eve of
whippers-in. Besides the family, there were eight borzoi kennelmen and
whirring in rapid flight and alighting on the ground, a shell
whiskers rode up to the gate and, glancing at Prince Andrew,
whiskers trimmed, which changed his appearance for the worse. There
whisper in the room, a noise in the street, a draught of cold air, the
whisper, then pointed to the quilt. The eyes and face of the sick
whispered softly: "And the tea?" His remembering such a small detail
whispered the name hastily), "is in Russia, and in the army again.
whispered to the boy to come downstairs.
whispers among his generals and marshals at the rear of his suite.
whispers, among which Anna Mikhaylovna's was the most distinct.
whispers, and, whenever anyone went into or came from the dying
whistle of bullets" at the memorable battle in western Pennsylvania.
whistling all around, and he experienced tenfold the joy of living, as
whistling and the sound of a torban, drowned every now and then by
whistling from every side, or the projectiles that flew over him,
whistling over the frozen snow, drove up to the porch.
white and others like them walking singly across the field shouting
white church. "That's where one crosses the Kolocha. You see down
white foam from his bit, tramping the planks of the bridge with his
white hat was doing no harm, but either sat quietly on the slope of
white light of this morning which I feel is dawning for me." The three
white manhood suffrage in the North had been swept away and the woman's
white men who had stood side by side with them "in the dark days of
white neck he moved toward the door with a more cheerful expression.
white nodules or flakes of lymph at the margin of the pupil is
white parts assuming a livid red hue and becoming the seat of an acute
white spring clouds floating across the clear blue sky. He was not
white, homogeneous material, from which there radiate into the softer
who appeared at his call. "Hurry off and tell Maksim, the gardener, to
who are now the children of earth are--eternally--children of the
who assume the unconditional transference of the people's will.
who at the sound of shouting had run in from an adjoining room.
who attempted to stir up unlawful combinations against the government
who before the battle of Austerlitz began said that it would be
who can order bread to be brought up at the right time and say who
who cannot mount a horse, who drops asleep at a council, and has the
who could hear the voice of Patrick Henry and Samuel Adams, there were a
who did not himself know what Rostov's relations with the Polish
who did not own land were deprived of the vote and excluded from office.
who did well their part, there yet remains the duty of recognizing the
who drew his sword under the elm at Cambridge and took command of the
who entered went up one by one to the field marshal; he pressed the
who first bought negroes at the auction block intended to establish a
who first joined his army? The Emperor Alexander, not I! And you offer
who follow occupations involving constant use of the shoulder--for
who found shelter within the party. For that matter neither did the
who frankly represented the planting interest, the industrial system was
who gives himself the airs of a monarch."
who had already come to a substantial agreement that the war must stop.
who had assailed the labor and the homes of the people. William Jennings
who had been at the Rostovs' name-day party.
who had been from the beginning excluded from every college in the
who had been the most zealous for its success; General Knox, head of the
who had come personally to point out to the princess the necessity for
who had come up to the fire sent to ask his colonel whether he would
who had come with the carts resounded as they shouted to one another
who had driven the old prince to town returned bringing papers and
who had evidently just arrived, entered quickly, slamming the door.
who had formed the circle of her contemporaries and had once been a
who had gathered round Rostov--a fresh arrival from the world outside-
who had gone to see the experiment in republicanism with their own eyes,
who had halted. He stood on a knoll in the stubble, holding his whip
who had just returned from Vienna, two diplomatists, the old aunt, a
who had known him before, and despite his abhorrence of the civil
who had remained in the street. A shopman who entered told her that
who had run up and was looking down on the stretcher.
who handle septic material, occurs in the sulcus between the nail and
who hardly ever came to that room as the old prince had forbidden
who has time to think of the impression he makes on others, but is
who have virtuous aims," said Pierre, feeling ashamed of the
who imagine the South united in defense of extreme views in 1860 was the
who in 1682 had gone down the Mississippi to the Gulf, had been followed
who in 1827 became the editor of a "Ladies' Magazine," published in
who is a bleeder, whilst they do not themselves suffer from the disease,
who is connected with the Montmorencys through the Rohans, one of
who kills most people receives the highest rewards.
who knows he is listened to, but like the birds, evidently giving vent
who made his way along the course of the Tennessee River in 1870 wrote:
who maintains that its chief function is to limit the formation of new
who means to rest after a ceremony. He drew his left foot out of the
who never lost sight of her, took the seat himself. Anatole sat down
who occupied one of the highest posts in the Empire. In Vilna she
who on the plea of building up the temple of Solomon have tried to
who organized "peace meetings" soon found themselves in the toils of the
who promptly excluded them from the sessions on the ground that it was
who ran downstairs and looked over from the halfway landing.
who rejects all knowledge that does not come from Him; and the less we
who repudiated free silver and made a direct appeal for the conservative
who saw him come out from the merchants' hall with tears of emotion in
who saw nothing in Freemasonry but the external forms and
who sent for the man. 'From whom did you get the proclamation?' 'I
who set aside any act of a state legislature passed in the interests of
who stood in the midst of the group, without a coat, and with his fine
who strain or over-use their tendons become the subjects of
who takes the least direct share in the action and directs his
who thought "the broad back of America" could readily bear Hamilton's
who till then had been the laughingstock both of the French and the
who was arrested in 1735 for criticising the administration. Lawyers who
who was behind him and to whom he had not spoken since the previous
who was drawn into the campaign by lot or by conscription. This
who was galloping toward the knoll on a lathering horse. It was
who was just entering. The newcomer wore a blue swallow-tail coat with
who was now his only hope. Karay, with all the strength age had left
who were not at that moment marching with the company. The hussar
who were singing the service for the twentieth time that day, began
who were subjected to governors and judges appointed by the crown and
who were waiting for Napoleon to come out, were standing at the porch,
who were walking, driving past, and settling down all around. The
who willfully obstructed enlistment. The Sedition act was still more
who without his boots (he had given them to the canteen keeper to
who wrote it does not understand. We all profess the Christian law
who, by art and science, had conquered the aridity of the desert and
who, of the whole family, was the most gifted with a capacity to
who, stooping low, entered the battery to carry away the wounded man.
who, without claims on her progeny, drink up the life blood of her
whole Russian army were convinced that the battle of Borodino was a
whole administration in their hands; the election of the members of the
whole affair would go to the devil!" Pfuel was one of those
whole and the states are the best judges of their particular interest,"
whole appearance suggests that of one of the large anthropoid apes. The
whole aspect of surgical pathology, that many of the infective diseases
whole body jerked at each step. The eldest princess followed him,
whole country should bear the cost of abolishing it. About the same time
whole country was ready to join the French Republic in its contest with
whole families toward the southeast. As birds migrate to somewhere
whole foreign business of England two generations before. At the first
whole house was scrubbed and cleaned on Saturdays; neither she nor the
whole interest of these preparations for war lay in the fact that
whole length of the great saphena vein to be dragged out in one piece.
whole matter, she felt herself all the time in an awkward position.
whole month and this is the first time I have seen him in society.
whole morning in the fields or on the threshing floor, he returned
whole of Russian society and to the whole world.
whole of his imprisonment, but even grew in strength as the
whole of the bite should at once be excised, and crystals of
whole of the lining membrane by dissection, the portion that is left
whole of the overlying cartilage. The dense varieties met with in the
whole of this retreat during the finest period of summer and with
whole outlook on the universe is constructed--the incomprehensible
whole pack rushed across the field toward the very spot where the wolf
whole place and the warm air heated by the crowd, Natasha little by
whole regiment!" The staff captain's voice began to tremble. "You have
whole soul, her whole being, into the subject that absorbed her, the
whole time of his activity utter one word inconsistent with the single
whole treaty of peace was approved, though a few of the powers made
whole trousseau. When they got home she turned everybody out of the
wholesale migration of Germans began with the founding of Pennsylvania.
wholly inadequate to uphold the independence which had been declared.
whom I have just saved from the flames," said he. "Good-by!" And
whom I have the honor of conversing so pleasantly, instead of being in
whom all the regiment knew for a rogue.
whom for some reason everyone called "The King of Rome."
whom he had vanquished. The French dragoon officer was hopping with
whom he introduced. The Abbe Morio and many others had also come.
whom he meant to obtain a transfer from the militia to the active
whom he passed it. Pierre began to feel a sense of uneasiness, and the
whom it had been entrusted. The more he realized the absence of all
whom was John D. Rockefeller. The trustees, in turn, issued
whom were evidently in the village itself and behind the hill. To
whose claim to their estates rested upon the title of conquest and
whose dietary largely consists of rye bread. Trivial injuries may be the
whose family it remained until 1776. The two Carolinas were first
whose life had once been bounded by the daily routine of labor, found in
whose opinions he wished to know in view of the impending
whose sole offense was opposition to the government of kings and
why for several centuries the collective will is not withdrawn from
why: first, I know that though he rarely speaks about the wife he
wick, and she saw Prince Andrew clearly with his arms outside the
wide of the margins, to take the strain off the coaptation stitches.
wide sweep from the headwaters of the Mississippi to the banks of the
wide-open space adjoining the Povarskoy on one side and the gardens of
wide-spreading steppes in the midst of which lay the holy city of
widely damaged, the gradually increasing tension of the extravasated
widely discussed, proposed a general convention for the purpose of
widespread oedema are characteristic. The bacillus can be obtained from
width of the field, an enormous mass of cavalry in brilliant white
wielders of pick and shovel to the Far West, Wisconsin would early have
wife and the children,' and the old man began to weep. Now it happened
wife in the early days of their marriage, took her about with him
wife to alight, and let her pass into the house before him. Old
wife was wrong and that he was neglecting one of the first rules of
wife's name, confirmed the order to give up all the carts to the
wife's nephew, wrote two business letters, and walked over to the
wife, waiting for the game to end.
wife, was talking in low tones to the elderly lady about Pierre.
wife. It was evident that he not only knew everyone in the drawing
wife. Jefferson, looking into the future, condemned the system by which
wilderness. Many of them had been across the Mississippi and had beheld
wilderness. Those who looked with sympathy upon the growing popular
wildly toward the battery. (This was the attack for which Ermolov
will all the same never be like those Petersburg young men."
will allow him personally to express the deep respect that,
will always be noticeable ahead of it. To those on board the ship
will answer for it!" shouted Berg, who was now assistant to the
will applaud the resolution that has been reached and you will return in
will be considered later with the surgery of the bones and joints and
will be constructed and ready for operation at the commencement of the
will be difficult to return to the old regime."
will be empty," said the old woman to the old attendant.
will be found only in the larger libraries.
will be less panic and less gossip," ran the broadsheet "but I will
will be made and fund raising will begin in the additional states.
will be made and fund raising will begin in the additional states.
will be my teacher..." And lowering his big arm he offered it to the
will be possible. In the contrary case, Your Majesty, I shall see
will be punished as he deserves," said he with the vindictive heat
will be safeguarded, since such is the will of the greatest and most
will be surprised to hear that the reason for this is Buonaparte!
will be under the fostering care of the government, we shall no longer
will deceive or be deceived. And I am off to the army. Why? I myself
will decide the matter, but those who devised it," said Bilibin
will defend our compatriots of the province entrusted to your care
will displease the court besides. (You know there is some kind of
will do me the favor."
will faithfully execute the office of President of the United States,
will give them just laws; I will teach them the meaning of true
will go wrong, and who is not displeased that it should be so. The
will hide it from the count." She entered the room with resolute
will join us, and the peace I shall conclude will be worthy of my
will no longer need the conceptions of chance or genius.
will of the people is unconditionally transferred to historical
will of the people to their rulers, and that historical leaders have
will of the whole people. Still more difficult would it be to find
will place the howitzers of the 3rd and 8th Corps, sixteen in all,
will ratify it; but it is only a trick. March on, destroy the
will receive the last of their formal instruction in the high school.
will rush to obey the summons. "Send Dmitri to me!"
will say (as he has done before) that I'm in the dumps."
will slash at him!" thought Rostov, gripping the hilt of his saber.
will soon begin beating us. One can't walk in the streets. But,
will the event seems to have taken place. Napoleon III issues a decree
will throw you back beyond the Dvina and beyond the Dnieper, and
will to prove thee in the duties of marriage, be ready to fulfill
will usually be followed by recovery. In the acute forms following on
will, and as far as was in his power held the troops back. He did
will--his words--are only part of the general activity expressed in an
will." As to matters of government, "it is not in the power of Britain
willing to arbitrate the points in controversy. This inquiry he
willing! What is it, gentlemen?" he added, turning to the officer.
willingly promised to do it all for her, Natasha sat down on the
willingly recognized, and Bennigsen is the only such man."
win the support of the South. This he undoubtedly sought to do when he
winced. "The cession of Louisiana and the Floridas by Spain to France,"
wind, for the force of the wind is beyond the influence of the buds. I
winding through a thick, low-growing birch wood. In the middle of
window a carriage with lanterns, standing at the entrance. She went
window the moans of the adjutant could be heard more distinctly. She
window thinking about the strangeness of what had occurred.
window to the veranda and smiled under his mustache and winked so
window with two old ladies. Natasha came into the room, went up to
window, from which the double frame had been removed (by order of
windows opening into the conservatory, with its large bust and full
windows, expecting he knew not what, and envying alike the notables he
windows, laughing and walking through the rooms. In cellars and
windows, the sick and wounded lay in two rows with their heads to
winds to blow when the oak buds unfold, I cannot agree with the
wine and viands. Groups of singers stood outside the windows. The
wine with dignity and looking to the count for approval.
wines. These latter the butler thrust mysteriously forward, wrapped in
wing from the position they had intended to occupy and took up a new
winging of the scapula is at once increased. If the scapula is compared
wings ready to fly upwards. The angel's upper lip was slightly
winked at him gaily, smiled, and rested his foot against the orchestra
winter clothing--of which there was sufficient in Moscow for the whole
winter of 1775 as they attempted to bring Canada into the revolution--a
wiped the tears from his eyes and from the letter, then having dried
wiping. The area round the sore should be cleansed before the fresh
wire were introduced. The patient, a woman, aet. 47, lived for ten months
wisest of its people have no remedy for its pain, and the hope of
wish to utilize the fortunes of war to humiliate an honored monarch.
wish was to attack next day, and the whole army desired to do so.
wished to end the conversation. She knew her remarks sounded
wished to gain some advantage would attract the Emperor's attention by
wished to go away, but the officer would not hear of it. He was so
wished to see the regiment just in the state in which it had been on
wished to spoil the general pleasure and disappoint everyone's
wishes about it, and as the event results from the collective activity
wishes to be. And she deduced the essentials of his wishes quite
wishes to test me!" His heart contracted and the blood rushed to his
wishing to be severe, found nothing to say; the others did not venture
wishing to find symptoms of the approach of the end.
with "gross incivility" and the crowds shouting "Pitt forever!" The
with Count Rostov, the general, and the colonel. At the card table
with Dron.) Princess Mary raised herself on the sofa on which she
with Kutuzov on the Poklonny Hill but ever since the battle of
with Michael Ivanovich I know all that goes on in the world and
with Napoleon with even greater warmth than the year before. Orders
with Napoleon, the firmness he displayed in 1812 and the campaign of
with Pierre, Natasha met her on the threshold.
with Prince Dolgorukov to the advanced post of the French army.
with Sonya. Sometimes the household both among themselves and in his
with Tushin, stepping across the bodies and under a terrible fire from
with a decanter on a tray as "my dear" and "my sweet," asked about the
with a disinfectant and deodorant lotion, such as Condy's fluid. The
with a fibroma in the interior of the lower end of the femur of an
with a half-contemptuous smile on his lips, scarcely touching the peak
with a happy look of resignation to the will of God on her face. Their
with a knife; also, after certain diseases, the liability to infection
with a laugh still more so, he quitted the table.
with a letter in which Kutuzov entrusted them to the humanity of the
with a message to Kutuzov, perhaps even to the sovereign himself.
with a pad over the condyle, care being taken to avoid pressure on the
with a shade of contempt for the youthfulness of this officer and with
with a smile that never left his face. Jauntily shifting the
with a spinous projection from the bone, which is capable of being
with a strained frown she peered toward the world where he was. And
with a threatening gesture. "If the purse isn't found I'll flog you,
with a transparent body, flying up to the clouds. And I seemed to know
with a tuft of gray hair at the back of his head and wearing a
with a view to avoiding the onset of moist gangrene. After granulations
with a zeal which rivaled that of the crown, sought, in turn, to silence
with accumulated secretion, a _cystic adenoma_, the best examples of
with admiration at the Milky Way.
with alarm lest something should have happened to the child while he
with all his might toward the bushes. He did not now run with the
with all their strength, and held back the crowd that was pushing
with amputation at the shoulder-joint, to prevent the collateral
with an alteration in the attitude of the limb, and the displacement of
with an effort sideways down the steps to the level of the street,
with an old mother and a hunchback sister, and was the most
with as encapsulated tumours. When they originate from the glands of the
with at the umbilicus or on the genitals.
with banks still bare of grass. It was at the end of a village that
with beaming face at the princess without speaking and evidently not
with benefit for the relief of pain in cases in which ulceration of
with blows at arm's length, or holding the head of the ax would cut
with bruising and crushing of the tissues and grinding of gross dirt
with business and labor represented a departure from the old idea of
with cancer when operating for the disease. A cancer should not be cut
with carbolic acid, the resulting wound being treated by the open
with cheers for the new order in France were hurrahs for "the people's
with chiefly on the upper part of the trunk, the neck, and the scalp. It
with chyle--_chylorrhoea_. If the wound involves the only existing main
with closed eyes. The troops were no longer moving, but stood with the
with cotton, forms one of the most inspiring chapters in our history. It
with difficulty clambered out on the further bank. And as soon as they
with difficulty from the thoughts that preoccupied him.
with diseases of that organ. The fibrous overgrowths in the skin, known
with disfavor, and in 1684 King Charles II annulled the old charter of
with dogs appeared out of the mist, approaching the Rostovs. In
with each beat of the heart. If the main artery be compressed on the
with emotion, protested against the departure from old tests of
with evident pleasure and listened to the conversation of his two
with evident regret, in 1852, that "last autumn, the rich regions of
with excessive absorption of the framework of a bone, whereby it becomes
with exposure of the chalky masses (_tophi_). The hands may become
with extravasation of blood into the connective-tissue sheaths, and is
with favor to the voice of the South. Calhoun stated what seemed to be a
with feverish eyes at the door in front of him as if trying to
with flushed and animated faces, laughing loudly. In the middle of the
with fractures and in the reduction of dislocations. The veins most
with freedom of the press. The Puritans of Massachusetts were no less
with frightened eyes, went with unusually hurried steps down the
with gaitered legs and turned-out toes, climbed the hill with
with granulations. In the majority of cases it is to be regarded as a
with great pain and runs a slow course. It is treated on the same lines
with great suddenness and prompt him to the coarsest and most reckless
with gypsies and "ladykins" as he called the cocottes. More than
with hands blackened to the wrists. There were sounds of men
with her black markings and powerful quarters, gaining upon the
with her eyes indicated a chair that stood beside the bed. Pierre
with her golden domes and crosses scintillating and twinkling in the
with her husband was not maintained by the poetic feelings that had
with her son. The son is getting married! Then Bezukhov, eh? He is
with her that evening. Even those playing cards behind the partition
with him Pierre, who had not been to the Rostovs' once since the ball.
with him except the young princesses.... They are still young...." She
with him expecting something to happen), all the personal desires
with him for an attack on the transport.
with him into the arcade. Some soldiers started running away in a
with him--an apparent agreement being the simplest way to avoid
with him. Only Natasha and the countess remained in the room. Petya
with him. What does that mean? Does it mean that it's the real
with his back to Natasha and now facing her, but during the whole of
with his family had carted corn all night; or of the fact that his
with his hands, down which the grease trickled, Petya was in an
with his knees close up to his head and one shoulder higher than the
with his little burden to the Gruzinski garden at the corner of the
with his spurs, and giving it the rein leaped lightly over. Only a
with his thumb to the room where Telyanin was sitting, he frowned
with his waddling gait to the porch. "Whew... whew... whew!" he
with horror that the meaning of all he had seen and thought in the
with hugh monograms A and N. In the windows of the houses also flags
with impaired appetite, headache, and it may be looseness of the bowels.
with in India. Infection takes place through an abrasion of the skin,
with in a multiple form, and may occur in several generations of the
with in the connective tissue of the skin and sheaths of nerves, and
with in the elbow, but it occurs also in the knee and ankle. There is a
with in the inherited disease, the most important is a _papular_
with in the late stages of mammary cancer. The area within which the
with in the lower extremity, and usually occurs in those who are
with in the stomach and colon.
with in the stomach and intestine. As it resembles an adenoma in
with inimical politeness lurking in the corners of his thin lips
with innumerable lights. Police were stationed at the brightly lit
with iodine, after which the edges are approximated by sutures. The raw
with iodoform gauze, no attempt being made to close the wound.
with it) and drew his attention to the verses.
with it, and again the women and men of weaker mold, Petya among them,
with its own particular tone. The largest of these was the French
with its red halo was still burning, and the same shirtlike sphinx lay
with its treaty obligations, we believe that the government of the
with lacerated and contaminated wounds greatly reduces the frequency of
with lanterns were sent to the crossroads to guide him over the
with lice, curled round his head like a cap. The look of his eyes
with life, but the malady that had formerly found expression in such
with marked pallor of the surface of the body and coldness of the skin,
with minor exceptions, was turned over to the Allied and Associated
with more perplexing tasks in front of it. The North had a monetary
with much animation and cheerfully nodded to his son as the latter
with no maneuvers or plans, again began running along the beaten
with none of the embarrassment so commonly shown by young men in their
with one another, and that they do not correspond with the features of
with one another. It is the seat of the affection known as "housemaid's
with other wounded and captured Russian officers he was carried to the
with our regiment all the time, so that we had every comfort and every
with overgrowth of the epidermis and of the hairs--_naevoid mole_.
with pale but happy faces round the carts. The news that carts were to
with pale faces round the cook. The loudest sound in that crowd was
with particular emphasis as if in it lay the gist of the matter.
with pity for the foe and consciousness of the justice of our cause,
with pleasure but whom he would slap in the face before the Emperor.
with powder and burned, and the hair singed. At ranges varying from six
with profit. The first and chief object of our Order, the foundation
with pyogenic organisms. Even when the abscess is opened, the
with red-liveried footmen and footmen in plumed hats. From the
with resolute and triumphant steps between the French soldiers.
with resolute strides and went into the house.
with respectfully bowed head, seemed also to be waiting. The silence
with rodent cancer. The syphilitic lesion belongs to the tertiary
with saline solution or recourse may be had to operative measures, the
with satisfaction before the large mirror.
with serf labor, to which Pierre did not agree. On the other hand,
with shy delight at the faces, uniforms, and decorations of the
with similar looks, these two glanced vainly at the onlookers with
with sly womanish eyes from under her brows at the young men.
with smoke. The excited faces of the soldiers were blackened with
with soda fomentations, removing the unhealthy granulations, and
with stiff-necked colonial legislatures. There were protests against the
with stiffness, and with flexion, the condition closely resembles
with strength for the fight. Take up the spear and shield and arise to
with streptococci. In suppuration of the axillary glands the abscess may
with suppuration, amputation affords the best chance of recovery.
with suppuration. In exceptionally acute septic conditions the extreme
with symptoms from impaction of the body between the articular surfaces.
with that air of escaping from the ills of life with which unhappy
with that event have been executed, we forget about the others that
with that in the corresponding artery on the healthy side, shows that on
with that latent warmth of feeling Pierre had noticed the day before
with that on the sound side, it is seen that, in addition to the lower
with the Algonquins and the Mohawks, were marked by periodic and
with the British and French in their life-and-death contest with
with the Carolinas in defending their borders against Indian forays.
with the Emperor Francis occupied his thoughts.
with the Emperor Napoleon, and in the upper circles of Petersburg
with the Empress and during the royal apprenticeship of my son, to
with the European system of family prestige and vast estates based on
with the French and their savage allies.
with the French islands in the West Indies and Dutch Guiana, where sugar
with the Indians ten or twelve years earlier. Daniel Morgan, one of the
with the National Civic Federation, an association of business men,
with the Polish sergeant.
with the Quartering Act was wrung from the reluctant province. In the
with the Rostovs. Not by a single word had Nicholas alluded to the
with the Tsar, as if such relations with an Emperor were an everyday
with the X-rays.
with the account given by Ropes, for instance, will ask for no further
with the agents of New York and Massachusetts to discuss problems of
with the aid of this topical syllabus. The references are to pages.
with the air of an old brigadier.
with the appalling menace of a winter without heat. Governors and mayors
with the apparatus of O'Dwyer; but when this instrument is not
with the army, he spent the night in apartments prepared for him on
with the army, was not there. He had gone to Petersburg, but Prince
with the arterial blood supply. It is most frequently observed in the
with the bursa.
with the chances of his becoming President. Tyler had not deceived them
with the companies. He needed a job; his wife and children would starve
with the count and invited him to draw his covert.
with the course of time. Evidently the day for revision--at best a
with the darkness of the night. After a while the moving mass became
with the decanter in her haste had not closed the door (everything
with the degree of force which produced the injury, and in shape with
with the democracy of Jefferson, and his appeal was clothed in the
with the dogs, while from under them could be seen her gray hair and
with the effort, raised it with difficulty onto the saddle, leaned
with the enemy's movements, and so it might be supposed that all
with the event. Had that event not occurred these hints would have
with the exercise of that right."
with the expression with which people compliment their host at a ball.
with the external world in time and in dependence on cause, that is,
with the flagstaff that had been dropped beside him. (The flag had
with the formation of fibrous tissue on such a liberal scale as to
with the formation of new bone in excess. It will be evident that in
with the formation of ulcers and sinuses--have been described with
with the frontier lamented the passing of the picturesque days: "The
with the greatest pleasure--which he did not conceal and which his
with the harsh voice, and it was that affair and this soldier that
with the impetuosity he used to show at catchplay, now and then
with the infinitely small can now yield solutions in other more
with the irresistible law of growth. We could no more resist the
with the island reached more than one hundred millions annually; and the
with the knee flexed. The nerve is sensitive to pressure, the most
with the latter's opposition to "imperialism"; but he had added quickly:
with the letter, came on tiptoe to the countess' door and paused.
with the main army and that Kutuzov has been appointed commander in
with the methods of re-forming the nose.
with the minimum of disfigurement. If the cancer already covers an
with the mother country which culminated in union for the war of
with the news of the burning of Moscow, dont les flammes eclairaient
with the object of his love at the Sukharev water tower. At the time
with the old lady.
with the old prince."
with the opposite wall. The method of filling bone cavities devised by
with the other forms of phagocytes they ingest and destroy the bacteria.
with the people of the other states and will forthwith proceed to
with the permission of the copyright holder, your use and distribution
with the permission of the copyright holder, your use and distribution
with the phrase "Project Gutenberg" associated with or appearing on the
with the phrase "Project Gutenberg" associated with or appearing on the
with the present state of affairs, had arrived during that
with the primary growth in the centre.
with the production and distribution of Project Gutenberg-tm
with the production and distribution of Project Gutenberg-tm
with the rank of lieutenant; but as it is I receive two hundred and
with the recommendation that it, in turn, transmit the document, not to
with the representatives of the company; and periodically the agents of
with the rest, aware of an unpleasant feeling of depression in his
with the rest."
with the result that a more or less circular hole is formed in the wall
with the risk of infection taking place, and should this occur, the
with the rough products of their native skill. The finer goods, bought
with the sac directly.
with the same favor; but the whole land was nevertheless dotted with
with the same gloomy expression, but suddenly turned to Pierre with
with the self-destruction toward which--ever dissecting and dissecting
with the sergeant to meet some mounted men who were riding along the
with the skill of militiamen, as they were in unfamiliar territory. The
with the skin of the sacrum and buttocks during the time he is on the
with the smile of a coquettish girl, which at one time probably came
with the soldiers, quite forgetting that his inn was at the bottom
with the spoon. The cavity is then lightly packed with rubber dam, or,
with the still living tissue inducing the formation of granulations on
with the suave ministers at Madrid. The results of the exchange of
with the swift sinister whistle of a cannon ball, now with the
with the terrestrial globe--to show, in contrast to that grandeur, the
with the transmission of the mails or interstate commerce in any form.
with the truth, simplicity, and strength of the class of men he
with the uneven movements of the bearers, and the cold listless gaze
with the union, the seceding states denied every point in the Northern
with the veins clearly outlined. Early disappearance of sensation is a
with the village, the church, and the large white house. The bare
with the vitality of the flaps.
with the wealthy young Brothers who were influential through their
with the words: "Morning dawned, the sun was rising," and
with their adjutants had come to witness the curious phenomenon of the
with their band and not sent away with the other prisoners. Petya
with their booty and their stories, and all came to look at the
with their designs for controlling the entire government. In the first
with their struggling neighbors. Even the preachers and teachers, who
with their thin or thick waists drawn in to the utmost, their red
with them the English common law. Under that law, a married woman's
with them--the French stumbled upon Neverovski's division and
with them. Austrian column guides were moving in and out among the
with them; if the nerve has been properly struck the injection is
with these changes in the vessels, the leucocytes in the blood of the
with this agreement, and any volunteers associated with the production,
with this agreement, and any volunteers associated with the production,
with this object a splint may be helpful; the usual remedies for
with those lining the Haversian canals and the medullary cavity.
with those of New York, Pennsylvania, and New England in the settlement
with those of the nervous system--which go to make up the condition
with three) and the music ceased. A worried aide-de-camp ran up to the
with tubercle bacilli, they may lead to the formation of one form of
with twenty thousand men to defend the town against Napoleon's whole
with ulceration of skin, it is often necessary to remove the diseased
with ulceration, a certain number of the polynuclear leucocytes are
with uncalled-for wrath, and therefore much to the surprise of the
with undue frequency in certain families. The same influence is more
with unexpected rapidity and ran out into the corridor.
with various figures worked upon it, at the other was something
with what difficulty the father had dragged his legs upstairs while
with where the presence of a toxin is known to produce them, that in all
with which Karataev generally lay down at the halting places, and when
with which Pierre spoke of that dead father, and from the careful,
with which his mother received him did not please the sixteen-year-old
with which it comes in contact, such as the eyelids, the walls of the
with which our sovereign the Emperor has honored us. But to judge what
with which surgeons formerly had to deal are now all but unknown. The
with which the Emperor Alexander had ascended the throne, and which he
with which the graft is in contact: a portion of sterilised marine
with which to attack and defeat the enemy should he cross the Lech.
with whom he happened to be. He loved his dog, his comrades, the
with you. May I?" he added in a low voice so as not to disturb the
with, particularly in the Democratic party. They had a majority in the
with--for example, in the breast and in the marrow of long bones--in the
with. The persistence of sinuses is usually due to disease in one or
withdraw and had failed. The corollary of this latter line of argument
withdraw from the Philippines." In November of the same year he wrote to
withdraw more blood, hot fomentations should be applied to the bite. As
withdraw the cavalry to the other side of the dip. Prince Andrew,
withdrawal of United States troops. The war on the remaining remnants of
withdrawal of fluid. The best possible result being rigid ankylosis in a
withdrawing the armies at an acute angle--we led the French on to
withdrawing the needle some saline is run in to diminish the risk of
withdrawn by a hollow needle from enlarged lymph glands. The saliva of
withdrawn by the exploring needle.
withdrawn from Southern capitals did they succeed in capturing the
withdrawn from the union. In February, Texas followed. Virginia,
withheld recognition. In the meantime Mexico was torn by insurrections
withheld; bounties were not to be granted from the treasury nor import
within a few hours of the injury the whole part rapidly becomes painful,
within a fortnight of birth. For practical purposes the most useful
within a month after birth and before the eruptions on the skin appear.
within a week, but more frequently occurs during the second or third
within an hour or two of the administration, and usually disappear
within that period any other emolument from the United States, or any of
within the Democratic party over the nomination of candidates revealed
within the dotted line.
within the space of less than thirty years penetrated, explored, and
without a name, and not even a Frenchman, emerges--by what seem the
without a smile or a change in the expression of his fixed eyes,
without a swelling heart and tears of sadness and rapture. So the
without any warning and without regard to the loss of American lives.
without any warrant in the Constitution and devised in the interest of
without any wind. The only motion in the air was that of the dripping,
without apologies. In the early days of 1776, Thomas Paine issued the
without at all noticing that his involuntary smile had stabbed the
without fear and concealing it from the doctor, she agreed to
without getting his letter to the Emperor. The Emperor!... He is
without going out of the house, waiting for the money his father could
without having lost a single man. The second squadron that had been in
without hearing Boris to the end spurred his horse.
without her parents' knowledge and that the cause of this was
without his father's consent, and he could do the same, but that she
without his noticing it the feeling of offense immediately turned into
without its consent, shall be deprived of its equal suffrage in the
without knowing why--rode behind on his artillery nag. Though the
without looking at Pierre. "At the present time it is difficult to
without mentioning the matter to the commander in chief.
without muskets who, holding up the skirts of their overcoats, were
without muskets, entering the Bazaar empty-handed and silently
without my order. You are causing me to lose the fruits of a campaign.
without paying for the privilege and waging war on one another over the
without producing any serious results, had it not been for the war
without recovering consciousness. In the majority of cases the patient
without replying. Belliard began talking loudly and eagerly to the
without solution of continuity of the skin. When the integument gives
without stint to the suppression of the revolt. Then they devoted such
without sympathy for the farmers who showed low tariff or free trade
without the advantages of education or the refinements of cultivated
without the aid of grafts are tedious in healing.
without thinking of the tremendous significance of that immense and
without trying to change the other's views and without condemning him,
without waiting to be prompted by the governor's wife and not asking
without warrant, as a great personal triumph for the President. He had
without, as in a blow, a kick, or a fall; or from within, as by the
withstand the attacks of moderate numbers of pyogenic bacteria of
withstand the enemy's attack very long. About Tushin and the battalion
withstand the general calamity. Everything that is young and strong is
witness to the competing power of western wheat fields. Sheep and cattle
witnessed the overthrow of the clergy and the nobility; but middle
wives and children." The nobleman smote his breast. "We will all
wolf's lope and the borzoi's slower pace made it plain that Karay
wolf's path and his borzois once more stopped the animal's advance.
wolf, which, with her broad-browed head hanging down and the bitten
wolf. By the way the hunt approached and receded, by the cries of
wolf. Nearer and nearer... now she was ahead of it; but the wolf
wolves swooped down," said the woman, pointing to the French soldiers.
wolves to be fed and the sheep to be safe..." or: "They cannot
woman in the vehicle. An officer in charge of transport was beating
woman more than her. She knew that for the Penza estates and
woman suffrage in the British Parliament and the author of a powerful
woman's footsteps running along the path. She rose and saw Dunyasha
woman's gloves are intended for you too. Give them to the woman whom
woman's husband, a short, round-shouldered man in the undress
woman's voice and the rustle of a silk dress behind the door.
women as the writings of Locke and Paine had served that of men. The
women in the equal suffrage states to compel one or both of the national
women past middle life. These growths are often multiple; the individual
women who do the daily work in our mines and factories, on our
women's industries, such as spinning and weaving; the denial of equal
women's political power. The history of their labor, their education,
women, affecting especially the great vessels at the root of the neck,
women, and children of "all sorts and conditions." The major portion
women, and children of the large peasant family crowded into the
women, between the ages of eighteen and thirty, who are the subjects of
women, made heavy inroads upon the trade of the English merchants in
women, making, if the average number of dependents upon them be
won a more brilliant victory than in Arizona. His weapons have been the
won't be responsible," she remarked, turning to the author: "I have
won't begin proceedings, but I advise you to ride over to the staff
wonder Southern statesmen saw, in the annexation of Texas and the
wonder-working icon of the Holy Mother of God has been revealed.' On
wonder-working icon of the Iberian Mother of God and go to fight, or
wondered whether the guests had all observed her father's hostile
wont, rode out in front of the outposts, parading his courage. A
wood on the village and turn the enemy's position.
wood whirling in the river, an hussar on foot, an orderly, or a
wood, where wagons were stationed. The dressing station consisted of
wood. In the wood, wagons and horses were standing. The horses were
wood. The French had attacked the men collecting wood in the copse. It
woodcutting, and, allowing the French to pass him, had made a
wooden wing of the house, which was burning brightly and fiercely. One
woods and the carts should not be provided. Without saying anything of
woods the Rostovs were hunting and let his man snatch a fox their dogs
wool, and in the use of hot-air or electric baths, the parts being
wool, from the periphery towards the trunk.
woolen cloth as the chief staple in a lucrative foreign trade, and the
woolen cloth. Then the blow fell. Toward the end of the seventeenth
wools. As evaporation takes place through wool dressings, the discharge
word from the princess that she would be very glad to see Pierre if he
word of command the expression of cheerful serenity on the faces of
words Your Majesty at every opportunity, with the affectation
words quarante-deux,* which was the term allowed to the beast that
words to express their contempt. The Republicans retaliated in kind.
words to the soldiers who were carrying him, now with his eyes fixed
words, and his recognition of the possibility of everyone thinking,
words, the people of a territory could abolish slavery when the Court
words. He put on the air of one who finds it impossible to reply to
words. He understood that for him the storm had blown over, and that
words. The countess went into the oratory and there Sonya found her on
words; his face twitched and the calf of his left leg began to
wore down the submarine menace to Allied shipping.
work his charms) because the business of their lives was to cure,
work on his third bowl. All the young soldiers smiled gaily as they
work out that way. The Federation was only six years old when a new
work the Bible became the center of interest. The English version was
work their will on the tissues. When the stagnant fluid is got rid of by
work was completed and in a secret session of the full conference the
work were separated from the rest by a trench, everyone experienced
work, and the traveler became absorbed in it. Pierre looked at him.
work, or courage, or perseverance, but only the knowledge of how to
work, passing first the Underwood tariff act of 1913, which made a
work, you must comply either with the requirements of paragraphs 1.E.1
work, you must comply either with the requirements of paragraphs 1.E.1
work. Tell the Cossack to fetch my kit. I have two French uniforms
work. The federal civil service act of 1883 opened the way to reform by
worked alone. Sometimes two or more were associated like partners in the
worked at the _serum diagnosis of hydatid disease_, regards the
worked zealously to that end, and though the Emperor Napoleon
workers from the public treasury.
workers representing all the leading trades and crafts, organized into
workers were thrown out of employment; and yet, while on the point of
workers--"the spoils system" in all its fullness. On only one point did
working in the garden, or superintending the building that was
working people complained in 1830: "The poor have no laws; the laws are
working--one of the earliest and most picturesque of colonial
workingmen of the East and the immigrants from Europe, was a thing of
workingmen unemployed, oppression instituted, and the loss of the
workmen surrounding the publican paused in indecision.
works and give answers to the religious questions. Massachusetts was
works based on the work as long as all references to Project Gutenberg
works based on the work as long as all references to Project Gutenberg
works, and the medium on which they may be stored, may contain
works, and the medium on which they may be stored, may contain
works. Despite these efforts, the Project's eBooks and any
works. Despite these efforts, the Project's eBooks and any
workshops should be kept in Europe and with them the artisans with their
world as the Monroe Doctrine. To the autocrats of Europe he announced
world depended on Attila's caprice. The farther back in history the
world in the days of Napoleon. On June 28, the heir to the
world that the United States would not join in a scramble to punish the
world-wide commercial operations. Though fully aware of the advantages
world. Agriculture was to fall behind in the race for supremacy.
world. Napoleon merely laid the cross on Lazarev's breast and,
worldly sciences of physics, history, chemistry, and the like, into
worn at church, walking about the room singing. She had her back to
worn at the meeting of the Council of State, stood at the table with a
worn at the theater, looking pretty and conscious of it, were standing
worn away, so that in a ball-and-socket joint like the hip, the head of
worn for a long time, went to present himself to the authorities.
worn in cold weather, and sudden changes of temperature avoided. The
worse, but whether telling a story or giving an opinion the speaker
worse. Designed as security for the planters, it proved a powerful
worst commander in chief if independent would be better than the
worth in gold only about half the price of 1870.
worth mentioning. But in the secret depths of her soul the question
worthier, sweeter, and better than the feelings which the beautiful
worthless as waste paper. The South was subject to the North. That which
worthlessness of the Drissa camp lies in having the river behind it,
would I not give now to be unmarried! You are the first and only one
would again be stopped and the countess herself would lean out of
would again have risen had not the prince still held her fast, "though
would appear to involve mainly the fibrous tissue of muscles, although
would be abandoned not merely since his interview the previous day
would be already known in Moscow and that the ladies about his father-
would be decided that evening. The visitors were seated at supper.
would be overshadowed and at length overborne in the struggle of giants.
would be surrendered, and then dispersed all about the town to the
would be the duty of this country "to resist by every means in its
would be transferred to the Guards at once?" said she.
would clinch the gains so far secured and establish white supremacy
would come true, so out of keeping was it with the chill darkness
would cost something more both at Baltimore and Alexandria. The waggon
would declare that he had no opinion at all on the matter. Another who
would disappear; and anyone looking at the rear of the French army
would do so. The locality and the position of our troops were known to
would enable them to bring on an industrial crisis in the manufacturing
would ensure Napoleon's destruction, was an absurdity, threatening the
would give my life twice over..." He looked at the countess, and
would give the countess the consolation of seeing at least one of
would give their blessing to such a marriage. Nicholas, for the
would go away without having heard from the staff--and this interested
would go to the drink shop or fall ill. Just as I could not stand
would happen after its inevitable abandonment. How could the
would happen, with more patience than the horses, especially the
would have at seeing the fright of that small and frail but proud
would have been more surprised than Mademoiselle Bourienne at the
would have been the savior of Russia. Along that line of thought
would have bent the Americans under a harsh rule or brought on in his
would have done so; he continually made the gesture of a man wishing
would have equal voice. Wilson of Pennsylvania, on behalf of the more
would have given the Emperor Alexander Moldavia and Wallachia, and now
would have happened." He saw the frightened and then infuriated face
would have hit Alpatych, the overseer, had not the latter
would have killed him and have proceeded to fight the Russians because
would have said that the Russians need only make one more slight
would have supposed, long ago have effaced? But the spirit and the
would have the man punished who had allowed himself to seize a fox
would hurry up and come and marry her!" thought he on his way to the
would meet Kuragin who he knew was now in the army.
would not be a bad thing if he introduced to them the pretty Polish
would not be a manly thing to do. When the carriages had all passed
would not be admitted to the Emperor. But it was impossible to smarten
would not be in time to lock the door though he painfully strained all
would put an end to the power of the beast, that is, of Napoleon,
would result from such an account of the duel.
would seem ridiculous to give some to the drummer boy.
would take command, but only that he would be with the army. The
would then be taken, but the command of the armies became still more
would today agree with Pfuel, tomorrow with his opponent, and the
would turn away to the portrait of his dead Lise, who with hair curled
would turn" the Western settlers away from the seaboard to the
would win the hearts of the people. Having learned that there were
would, he supposed, share the general Russian antipathy to the
wouldn't go, but I knew that today is the sort of day when you
wouldn't have room to turn round there. If you must go, go to the
wound are the first to become contracted; but in the majority of
wound becoming infected are not past, because the hands of the doctor,
wound in the soft parts is valvular the haemorrhage is arrested and an
wound in the wall of the artery has been closed. The gradual stretching
wound is closed with "bipped" silk sutures; one of these--the "waiting
wound the liver cells proliferate and a certain amount of regeneration
wound, its ends should be brought together with sutures. If the ends are
wound. An assistant or nurse, who is to take no other part in the
wound_, clear out the clots and infected tissues with a sharp spoon,
wounded and four dead. Two men in peasant coats ran away at the foot
wounded and take the trunks to the storerooms. When they understood
wounded as only the whole strength of Russia could have wounded it,
wounded did he frown and turn away from the sight, shouting angrily at
wounded in the Catherine Hospital where we will have some water
wounded in the leg at the battle of Borodino. They were accompanied by
wounded left on the field.
wounded looked silently, with the languid interest of sick children,
wounded man and Natasha the thought occurred that should he recover
wounded men at Mozhaysk and understood what the soldier had meant when
wounded men running back and the disordered rear of the army,
wounded on the head by a sword.
wounded on their muskets. A general with his suite came to the
wounded was correct, others that it was not, and explained the false
wounded, climbed with difficulty out of the gully.
wounded, together with the heaviness of his head and the news that
wounds in the palm of the hand, the sole of the foot, or the scalp,
wounds of the fingers--especially of the thumb or little finger--and is
wounds treated by the open method.
wounds. The communication is usually between the common carotid artery
wove. They fashioned ships and sailed the seas. They bartered and
wrapped in rags and one cheek was swollen to the size of a baby's
wrapping paper, and ropes were scattered about. The peasants and house
wraps and sat down on the sofa. Petya, leaning on his elbow, fell
wreaths of black smoke rolled from under the roof. There was another
wrested from the Puritans of the colony the right to elect their own
wretches? What is the use of that, when a third of their army has
wrist and in the tendons at the ankle. The tuberculous granulation
wrist is flexed to a right angle it is possible to extend the fingers.
wrist joints should be gradually extended until the deformity is
wrist produces little loss of deep sensibility, unless the tendons are
wrist, deep touch can be appreciated over the whole of the area
wrist, particularly in the extensors of the thumb, and it is most
wrist, shoulder. The hip and spine are most often affected in childhood
wrist, the hand should be dorsiflexed and the fingers flexed slightly
wrist, the sheaths of the extensor tendons as well as the synovial
wrist. The awful pain he suffered made him moan incessantly and
wrist_, the abductor-opponens group of muscles and the two lateral
wrists visible from under the shirt sleeves, those hands which he
wrists, which held him in their power.... The ten fell to him.
write, told Rostov the contents of his letter.
writers boasted would never perplex the planting South, had come in full
writing table in a shady corner by the window.
writing table. He worked well whatever the import of his work. It
writing to the children of the peasants and household serfs.
written and signed agreement, incorporating the spirit of obedience to
written explanation to the person you received the work from.  If you
written explanation to the person you received the work from.  If you
written in 1790, he attacked with terrible wrath the whole program of
written near Vitebsk after the French had occupied that town, gave a
written report. Toward midnight Bolkhovitinov, having received the
wrong in actions that follows from the consciousness of freedom?
wrongs inflicted on the Duke of Oldenburg, the nonobservance of the
wrongs, the movement of troops into Prussia--undertaken (as it
wrote John Winthrop, the first Puritan governor in America. Far to the
wrote Le russe Besuhof and adding up the numbers got 671. This was
wrote books and pamphlets. They filled most of the chairs in the
wrote in his diary on New Year's Day, 1905, that the President was
wrote it myself.' Well, you know the count," said the adjutant
wrote the words L'Empereur Alexandre, La nation russe and added up
wrote this letter to the Governor for Princess Mary, she signed it,
wrote), and my love has no aim but the happiness of those I love;
yard porter to admit the persons who would be coming that evening, but
yard. His face expressed the relief of relaxed strain felt by a man
yards away, crowds of men could be seen through the shimmering mist.
yards, delightful to Pierre at that moment. He could see the clear
year that saw the introduction of slavery. Although the industry soon
year the captains of industry turned out goods worth nearly twenty times
year's harvest, Nicholas pointed to the red-spotted bitch.
year's leaves. The coarse evergreen color of the small fir trees
year, were designed to protect the public against diseased meats and
year. When sensation returns, the area of insensibility to pain steadily
years after the assassination of Garfield, made little change for a long
years after the first meeting of the Congress of the United States, and
years after the original amputation by Mr. A. G. Miller.]
years afterwards, the bone may become painful and tender. The symptoms
years as his first counselor, the Secretary of State. The principles of
years before from the mortification to which his wife had subjected
years before was on the high road to success at last. New and powerful
years before. Thus, as the result of an extraordinary upheaval the
years elapsed before the first newspaper appeared, bearing the curious
years had striven only for his people's welfare, the originator of the
years have elapsed than to one who examined it the day after it was
years his wife had succeeded in gaining the reputation "d' une femme
years later the open challenge came from South Carolina, he replied that
years later, made them a part of his program, and in the same year South
years of age, whom Pierre had formerly met at the gypsies' and knew as
years of life; rectal cancer is not infrequently met with during the
years of my acquaintance with it? The government of the Constitution?
years of the four. Cleveland was confronted by a belligerent Republican
years of their independence they have done absolutely nothing for the
years or centuries, and only the Deity, independent of everything, can
years or more passed by. The old man was living as a convict,
years the flooding tide of home seekers rose higher and higher.
years the old miller had been accustomed to sit in his tasseled cap
years they had spent in the country.
years while the Republicans had every President but one showed that the
years, and usually affects one eye before the other. It commences as a
years, the Republicans, in their speeches and platforms, made "a
years," exclaimed Livingston, the principal author of the Louisiana
years. Christopher Heath found that improvement followed ligation of the
years. The operation consists in dividing the skin and capsule over the
years; the other, in which the disease is more rapidly disseminated and
years; the scars are sounder and are less liable to break down again;
yellow floor; these disappear quickly on the use of an antiseptic
yellow purulent discharge. They are devoid of the induration of
yellow, and lemon-coloured at its margins, the central part being the
yesterday's action, was standing by the door after delivering his
yet another waved the flies off her husband's face, lest he should
yet at the same time was conscious of his strength as a part of that
yet been employed in the treatment of syphilis.
yet been made to gratify that interest. For the present it is an
yet begun dancing. An aide-de-camp, the Master of Ceremonies, went
yet believe that the affair had come to an actual duel). "You know,
yet dies first'; that's what the old folks used to tell us," he
yet in the end, in spite of all the handicaps, the small freehold of a
yet seen. In 1899 the smelters formed a trust with a capital of
yet so similar in that they had both lived and both died and in the
yet to his surprise it did not destroy the structure, though it
yielded to it! But they... they were steady and calm all the time,
yielding them a penny. Thus by the labors and sacrifices of citizens,
you afraid?" The prince shook his head, again repeated the same
you are going by yourself, are having the horses saddled and said
you are not aware of the fact..."
you are one of those gentlemen of the chamber who have not
you at the same time, my honored benefactor," wrote Prince Vasili. "My
you bwing the first one?"
you by the same experience of debauchery; but to promise a maid to
you did gain a brilliant victory, if even the Archduke Karl gained a
you have written it yourself?' said he, and he took up the Hamburg
you know the condition I am in? I must talk about it to someone."
you make? New England will throw in fish and onions. The middle states,
you must, at no additional cost, fee or expense to the user, provide a
you must, at no additional cost, fee or expense to the user, provide a
you not going to the right place? Go to Kolyazin where a
you now. The little corporal... I saw him give the cross to one of the
you see the plumes?..." was whispered among the crowd.
you should add your efforts and should, if possible, forget the
you whole.' So he begged: 'Take me to her, take me to her.' It's the
you will be so kind, I'll fix a time and go down to the estate just
you would like to know if we have added it since the list you have,
you would like to know if we have added it since the list you have,
you! Stop, stop!" she cried to the coachman.
you'll like it," and he patted her cheek. "It will drive all the
you'll step into the officers' wards you'll see for yourself," he
you're not ashamed to bury such pearls in the country?"
you, Papa" (he smote himself on the breast as a general he had heard
you, and you have been entered in the diplomatic corps and made a
you, mon cousin, seem to consider me a perfect fool," said the
you, my dear. One day you are dull, and the next you refuse to see
you, who do not believe in the truth of the light and who have not
you," he added, and was about to go to the drawing room.
you," she said with the facility in lying natural to a society
you--those German gentlemen won't win the battle tomorrow but will
you. Think that he is your father... perhaps in the agony of death."
you. Though I don't like letting you go, it is the best way. So go,
you... go," and he continued to put on the uniform the valet handed
you...."), "in destroying them, and will send these visitors to the
you? Why doesn't he come to the house?"
young Bolkonski's wife, this very evening, and perhaps the thing can
young German woman he had married in Poland. The doctor, whether
young adult women, and from its following upon lupus of the toes or foot
young face, disfigured by the half-shaven head, hung down
young fellow repeated one after the other, and they moved up the
young ladies might go to the Melyukovs', Sonya, generally so timid and
young man in the fur-lined coat and pointing to the bottom step of the
young ones. Every face bore almost the same smile, expressing unseemly
young women are dressed in black! The flower of their proud aristocracy
young, as well as children, popped out from the back entrance to
young, of most diverse characters and social positions. On the faces
younger. On all these faces, as on the faces of the crowd Petya had
your Emperor exposing himself to the first blows of the enemy, for
your chivalry just the same." He paused. "However, we must get to
your doing so; but I warn you that if you dare to play the fool in
your estates yourself but only wanted a quiet life, the harsher your
your father the truth when he was in favor, and in your case it's my
your habitual valor carry disorder and confusion into the enemy's
your sake I mention it, Monsieur Kiril. The other day if it had not
your written explanation.  The person or entity that provided you with
your written explanation.  The person or entity that provided you with
yours, is not at all to blame that my face has the misfortune to
yourself, your excellency!' says I, and I just tumbled on the bottom
yourself...." But he could not restrain himself and with the virulence
youth, beaten almost to death. And for a long time, despite the
youth. (Strictly speaking, Daniel Cooper was one figure of the
youthful Alexander Hamilton, realizing the weakness of the Articles, so
youthful face as he held the candle, and the face of another man who
youthful thoughts and hopes, contrary to the whole tenor of his
youthful, in his soul. It vanished as soon as he returned to the
youths, look at our ladies! The French are our Gods: Paris is our
zeal. It no longer seemed strange to them but on the contrary it
zone of ciliary congestion around the cornea. The appearance of minute
zone of healthy skin around it and a somewhat large zone of the
zone which corresponds to the layer of granulations lining the cavity in
zone--not the red margin--an artificial leucocytosis is produced, and
zoology was not merely acknowledged by all the religions and all the
| These are marked in the HTML version only.                         |
| Transcriber's note: The original text used the apothecaries'       |
| standard. All the special characters are preserved in the UTF-8    |
| symbols here rendered as [ounce] and [dram]. The substitutions     |
| used for other special characters, such as the oe ligature, are    |
